BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.20.308 and 2005 c 314 s 307 and 2005 c 269 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Any person who operates a motor vehicle within this state is
deemed to have given consent, subject to the provisions of RCW
46.61.506, to a test or tests of his or her breath or blood for the
purpose of determining the alcohol concentration or presence of any
drug in his or her breath or blood if arrested for any offense where,
at the time of the arrest, the arresting officer has reasonable grounds
to believe the person had been driving or was in actual physical
control of a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug or was in violation of RCW 46.61.503. Neither
consent nor this section precludes a police officer from obtaining a
search warrant for a person's breath or blood.
(2) The test or tests of breath shall be administered at the
direction of a law enforcement officer having reasonable grounds to
believe the person to have been driving or in actual physical control
of a motor vehicle within this state while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug or the person to have been driving or
in actual physical control of a motor vehicle while having alcohol in
a concentration in violation of RCW 46.61.503 in his or her system and
being under the age of twenty-one. However, in those instances where
the person is incapable due to physical injury, physical incapacity, or
other physical limitation, of providing a breath sample or where the
person is being treated in a hospital, clinic, doctor's office,
emergency medical vehicle, ambulance, or other similar facility or
where the officer has reasonable grounds to believe that the person is
under the influence of a drug, a blood test shall be administered by a
qualified person as provided in RCW 46.61.506(5). The officer shall
inform the person of his or her right to refuse the breath or blood
test, and of his or her right to have additional tests administered by
any qualified person of his or her choosing as provided in RCW
46.61.506. The officer shall warn the driver, in substantially the
following language, that:
(a) If the driver refuses to take the test, the driver's license,
permit, or privilege to drive will be revoked or denied for at least
one year; and
(b) If the driver refuses to take the test, the driver's refusal to
take the test may be used in a criminal trial; and
(c) If the driver submits to the test and the test is administered,
the driver's license, permit, or privilege to drive will be suspended,
revoked, or denied for at least ninety days if the driver is age
twenty-one or over and the test indicates the alcohol concentration of
the driver's breath or blood is 0.08 or more, or if the driver is under
age twenty-one and the test indicates the alcohol concentration of the
driver's breath or blood is 0.02 or more, or if the driver is under age
twenty-one and the driver is in violation of RCW 46.61.502 or
46.61.504.
(3) Except as provided in this section, the test administered shall
be of the breath only. If an individual is unconscious or is under
arrest for the crime of vehicular homicide as provided in RCW 46.61.520
or vehicular assault as provided in RCW 46.61.522, or if an individual
is under arrest for the crime of driving while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or drugs as provided in RCW 46.61.502, which arrest
results from an accident in which there has been serious bodily injury
to another person, a breath or blood test may be administered without
the consent of the individual so arrested.
(4) Any person who is dead, unconscious, or who is otherwise in a
condition rendering him or her incapable of refusal, shall be deemed
not to have withdrawn the consent provided by subsection (1) of this
section and the test or tests may be administered, subject to the
provisions of RCW 46.61.506, and the person shall be deemed to have
received the warnings required under subsection (2) of this section.
(5) If, following his or her arrest and receipt of warnings under
subsection (2) of this section, the person arrested refuses upon the
request of a law enforcement officer to submit to a test or tests of
his or her breath or blood, no test shall be given except as authorized
under subsection (3) or (4) of this section.
(6) If, after arrest and after the other applicable conditions and
requirements of this section have been satisfied, a test or tests of
the person's blood or breath is administered and the test results
indicate that the alcohol concentration of the person's breath or blood
is 0.08 or more if the person is age twenty-one or over, or 0.02 or
more if the person is under the age of twenty-one, or the person
refuses to submit to a test, the arresting officer or other law
enforcement officer at whose direction any test has been given, or the
department, where applicable, if the arrest results in a test of the
person's blood, shall:
(a) Serve notice in writing on the person on behalf of the
department of its intention to suspend, revoke, or deny the person's
license, permit, or privilege to drive as required by subsection (7) of
this section;
(b) Serve notice in writing on the person on behalf of the
department of his or her right to a hearing, specifying the steps he or
she must take to obtain a hearing as provided by subsection (8) of this
section;
(c) Mark the person's Washington state driver's license or permit
to drive, if any, in a manner authorized by the department;
(d) Serve notice in writing that the marked license or permit, if
any, is a temporary license that is valid for sixty days from the date
of arrest or from the date notice has been given in the event notice is
given by the department following a blood test, or until the
suspension, revocation, or denial of the person's license, permit, or
privilege to drive is sustained at a hearing pursuant to subsection (8)
of this section, whichever occurs first. No temporary license is valid
to any greater degree than the license or permit that it replaces; and
(e) Immediately notify the department of the arrest and transmit to
the department within seventy-two hours, except as delayed as the
result of a blood test, a sworn report or report under a declaration
authorized by RCW 9A.72.085 that states:
(i) That the officer had reasonable grounds to believe the arrested
person had been driving or was in actual physical control of a motor
vehicle within this state while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or drugs, or both, or was under the age of twenty-one years and
had been driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle
while having an alcohol concentration in violation of RCW 46.61.503;
(ii) That after receipt of the warnings required by subsection (2)
of this section the person refused to submit to a test of his or her
blood or breath, or a test was administered and the results indicated
that the alcohol concentration of the person's breath or blood was 0.08
or more if the person is age twenty-one or over, or was 0.02 or more if
the person is under the age of twenty-one; and
(iii) Any other information that the director may require by rule.
(7) The department of licensing, upon the receipt of a sworn report
or report under a declaration authorized by RCW 9A.72.085 under
subsection (6)(e) of this section, shall:
(a) Suspend, revoke, or deny the person's license, permit, or
privilege to drive or any nonresident operating privilege, as provided
in RCW 46.20.3101, such suspension, revocation, or denial to be
effective beginning sixty days from the date of arrest or from the date
notice has been given in the event notice is given by the department
following a blood test, or when sustained at a hearing pursuant to
subsection (8) of this section, whichever occurs first; and
(b) Upon the effective date of a suspension, revocation, or denial
under (a) of this subsection, require that a person may drive only a
motor vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition interlock device as
provided in RCW 46.20.720.
(8) A person receiving notification under subsection (6)(b) of this
section may, within thirty days after the notice has been given,
request in writing a formal hearing before the department. The person
shall pay a fee of two hundred dollars as part of the request. If the
request is mailed, it must be postmarked within thirty days after
receipt of the notification. Upon timely receipt of such a request for
a formal hearing, including receipt of the required two hundred dollar
fee, the department shall afford the person an opportunity for a
hearing. The department may waive the required two hundred dollar fee
if the person is an indigent as defined in RCW 10.101.010. Except as
otherwise provided in this section, the hearing is subject to and shall
be scheduled and conducted in accordance with RCW 46.20.329 and
46.20.332. The hearing shall be conducted in the county of the arrest,
except that all or part of the hearing may, at the discretion of the
department, be conducted by telephone or other electronic means. The
hearing shall be held within sixty days following the arrest or
following the date notice has been given in the event notice is given
by the department following a blood test, unless otherwise agreed to by
the department and the person, in which case the action by the
department shall be stayed, and any valid temporary license marked
under subsection (6)(c) of this section extended, if the person is
otherwise eligible for licensing. For the purposes of this section,
the scope of the hearing shall cover the issues of whether a law
enforcement officer had reasonable grounds to believe the person had
been driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle
within this state while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug or had been driving or was in actual physical control of a
motor vehicle within this state while having alcohol in his or her
system in a concentration of 0.02 or more if the person was under the
age of twenty-one, whether the person was placed under arrest, and (a)
whether the person refused to submit to the test or tests upon request
of the officer after having been informed that such refusal would
result in the revocation of the person's license, permit, or privilege
to drive, or (b) if a test or tests were administered, whether the
applicable requirements of this section were satisfied before the
administration of the test or tests, whether the person submitted to
the test or tests, or whether a test was administered without express
consent as permitted under this section, and whether the test or tests
indicated that the alcohol concentration of the person's breath or
blood was 0.08 or more if the person was age twenty-one or over at the
time of the arrest, or 0.02 or more if the person was under the age of
twenty-one at the time of the arrest. The sworn report or report under
a declaration authorized by RCW 9A.72.085 submitted by a law
enforcement officer is prima facie evidence that the officer had
reasonable grounds to believe the person had been driving or was in
actual physical control of a motor vehicle within this state while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs, or both, or the
person had been driving or was in actual physical control of a motor
vehicle within this state while having alcohol in his or her system in
a concentration of 0.02 or more and was under the age of twenty-one and
that the officer complied with the requirements of this section.
A hearing officer shall conduct the hearing, may issue subpoenas
for the attendance of witnesses and the production of documents, and
shall administer oaths to witnesses. The hearing officer shall not
issue a subpoena for the attendance of a witness at the request of the
person unless the request is accompanied by the fee required by RCW
5.56.010 for a witness in district court. The sworn report or report
under a declaration authorized by RCW 9A.72.085 of the law enforcement
officer and any other evidence accompanying the report shall be
admissible without further evidentiary foundation and the
certifications authorized by the criminal rules for courts of limited
jurisdiction shall be admissible without further evidentiary
foundation. The person may be represented by counsel, may question
witnesses, may present evidence, and may testify. The department shall
order that the suspension, revocation, or denial either be rescinded or
sustained.
(9) If the suspension, revocation, or denial is sustained after
such a hearing, the person whose license, privilege, or permit is
suspended, revoked, or denied has the right to file a petition in the
superior court of the county of arrest to review the final order of
revocation by the department in the same manner as an appeal from a
decision of a court of limited jurisdiction. Notice of appeal must be
filed within thirty days after the date the final order is served or
the right to appeal is waived. Notwithstanding RCW 46.20.334, RALJ
1.1, or other statutes or rules referencing de novo review, the appeal
shall be limited to a review of the record of the administrative
hearing. The appellant must pay the costs associated with obtaining
the record of the hearing before the hearing officer. The filing of
the appeal does not stay the effective date of the suspension,
revocation, or denial. A petition filed under this subsection must
include the petitioner's grounds for requesting review. Upon granting
petitioner's request for review, the court shall review the
department's final order of suspension, revocation, or denial as
expeditiously as possible. The review must be limited to a
determination of whether the department has committed any errors of
law. The superior court shall accept those factual determinations
supported by substantial evidence in the record: (a) That were
expressly made by the department; or (b) that may reasonably be
inferred from the final order of the department. The superior court
may reverse, affirm, or modify the decision of the department or remand
the case back to the department for further proceedings. The decision
of the superior court must be in writing and filed in the clerk's
office with the other papers in the case. The court shall state the
reasons for the decision. If judicial relief is sought for a stay or
other temporary remedy from the department's action, the court shall
not grant such relief unless the court finds that the appellant is
likely to prevail in the appeal and that without a stay the appellant
will suffer irreparable injury. If the court stays the suspension,
revocation, or denial it may impose conditions on such stay.
(10)(a) If a person whose driver's license, permit, or privilege to
drive has been or will be suspended, revoked, or denied under
subsection (7) of this section, other than as a result of a breath or
blood test refusal, and who has not committed an offense for which he
or she was granted a deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW,
petitions a court for a deferred prosecution on criminal charges
arising out of the arrest for which action has been or will be taken
under subsection (7) of this section, or notifies the department of
licensing of the intent to seek such a deferred prosecution, then the
license suspension or revocation shall be stayed pending entry of the
deferred prosecution. The stay shall not be longer than one hundred
fifty days after the date charges are filed, or two years after the
date of the arrest, whichever time period is shorter. If the court
stays the suspension, revocation, or denial, it may impose conditions
on such stay. If the person is otherwise eligible for licensing, the
department shall issue a temporary license, or extend any valid
temporary license marked under subsection (6) of this section, for the
period of the stay. If a deferred prosecution treatment plan is not
recommended in the report made under RCW 10.05.050, or if treatment is
rejected by the court, or if the person declines to accept an offered
treatment plan, or if the person violates any condition imposed by the
court, then the court shall immediately direct the department to cancel
the stay and any temporary marked license or extension of a temporary
license issued under this subsection.
(b) A suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under this section,
other than as a result of a breath or blood test refusal, shall be
stayed if the person is accepted for deferred prosecution as provided
in chapter 10.05 RCW for the incident upon which the suspension,
revocation, or denial is based. If the deferred prosecution is
terminated, the stay shall be lifted and the suspension, revocation, or
denial reinstated. If the deferred prosecution is completed, the stay
shall be lifted and the suspension, revocation, or denial canceled.
(c) The provisions of (b) of this subsection relating to a stay of
a suspension, revocation, or denial and the cancellation of any
suspension, revocation, or denial do not apply to the suspension,
revocation, denial, or disqualification of a person's commercial
driver's license or privilege to operate a commercial motor vehicle.
(11) When it has been finally determined under the procedures of
this section that a nonresident's privilege to operate a motor vehicle
in this state has been suspended, revoked, or denied, the department
shall give information in writing of the action taken to the motor
vehicle administrator of the state of the person's residence and of any
state in which he or she has a license.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.20.720 and 2004 c 95 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The court may order that after a period of suspension,
revocation, or denial of driving privileges, and for up to as long as
the court has jurisdiction, any person convicted of any offense
involving the use, consumption, or possession of alcohol while
operating a motor vehicle may drive only a motor vehicle equipped with
a functioning ignition interlock. The court shall establish a specific
calibration setting at which the interlock will prevent the vehicle
from being started. The court shall also establish the period of time
for which interlock use will be required.
(2) The department shall require that, ((after)) upon the effective
date of any applicable period of suspension, revocation, or denial of
driving privileges imposed under RCW 46.20.308 and 46.20.3101, or upon
conviction of an alcohol-related violation of RCW 46.61.502 or
46.61.504 or an equivalent local ordinance, a person may drive only a
motor vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition interlock device
((if the person is convicted of an alcohol-related violation of RCW
46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or an equivalent local ordinance)).
The department may waive the requirement for the use of such a
device if it concludes that such devices are not reasonably available
in the local area. The device is not necessary on vehicles owned by a
person's employer and driven as a requirement of employment during
working hours.
The ignition interlock device shall be calibrated to prevent the
motor vehicle from being started when the breath sample provided has an
alcohol concentration of 0.025 or more. The period of time of the
restriction will be for the duration of any suspension, revocation, or
denial of driving privileges imposed under RCW 46.20.308, 46.20.3101,
or 46.61.5055, and for an additional period after any applicable period
of suspension, revocation, or denial of driving privileges as follows:
(a) For a person who has not previously been restricted under this
section, a period of one year;
(b) For a person who has previously been restricted under (a) of
this subsection, a period of five years;
(c) For a person who has previously been restricted under (b) of
this subsection, a period of ten years.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.20.740 and 2004 c 95 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall attach or imprint a notation on the
driving record of any person restricted under RCW 46.20.720 stating
that the person may operate only a motor vehicle equipped with a
functioning ignition interlock device. The department shall determine
the person's eligibility for licensing based upon written verification
by a company doing business in the state that it has installed the
required device on a vehicle owned or operated by the person seeking
reinstatement. If, based upon notification from the interlock provider
or otherwise, the department determines that an ignition interlock
required under this section is no longer installed or functioning as
required, the department shall suspend the person's license or
privilege to drive. Whenever the license or driving privilege of any
person is suspended or revoked as a result of noncompliance with an
ignition interlock requirement, the suspension shall remain in effect
until the person provides notice issued by a company doing business in
the state that a vehicle owned or operated by the person is equipped
with a functioning ignition interlock device.
(2) It is a misdemeanor for a person with such a notation on his or
her driving record to operate a motor vehicle that is not so equipped.
(3) The arresting officer shall immediately notify the department
of the arrest and transmit to the department within seventy-two hours
a sworn report or report under a declaration authorized by RCW
9A.72.085 that states:
(a) That the person was driving a motor vehicle in violation of a
requirement to drive only a motor vehicle equipped with a functioning
ignition interlock device;
(b) The vehicle license number plate applicable to the motor
vehicle being driven at the time of the arrest; and
(c) Whenever the driver of a vehicle is arrested for a violation of
subsection (2) of this section, the vehicle is subject to summary
impoundment, pursuant to the terms and conditions of an applicable
local ordinance or state agency rule at the direction of a law
enforcement officer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW
to read as follows:
The department, upon the receipt of a sworn report or report under
declaration authorized by RCW 9A.72.085 under RCW 46.20.740(3), shall
cause the certificate of license registration that corresponds to the
vehicle license number plate under RCW 46.20.740(3)(b) to be canceled.
It is a misdemeanor to drive a motor vehicle with a canceled
certificate of license registration.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.55.113 and 2005 c 390 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever the driver of a vehicle is arrested for a violation of
RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.504, 46.20.342, ((or)) 46.20.345, 46.20.740(2), or
section 4 of this act, the vehicle is subject to summary impoundment,
pursuant to the terms and conditions of an applicable local ordinance
or state agency rule at the direction of a law enforcement officer.
(2) In addition, a police officer may take custody of a vehicle, at
his or her discretion, and provide for its prompt removal to a place of
safety under any of the following circumstances:
(a) Whenever a police officer finds a vehicle standing upon the
roadway in violation of any of the provisions of RCW 46.61.560, the
officer may provide for the removal of the vehicle or require the
driver or other person in charge of the vehicle to move the vehicle to
a position off the roadway;
(b) Whenever a police officer finds a vehicle unattended upon a
highway where the vehicle constitutes an obstruction to traffic or
jeopardizes public safety;
(c) Whenever a police officer finds an unattended vehicle at the
scene of an accident or when the driver of a vehicle involved in an
accident is physically or mentally incapable of deciding upon steps to
be taken to protect his or her property;
(d) Whenever the driver of a vehicle is arrested and taken into
custody by a police officer;
(e) Whenever a police officer discovers a vehicle that the officer
determines to be a stolen vehicle;
(f) Whenever a vehicle without a special license plate, placard, or
decal indicating that the vehicle is being used to transport a person
with disabilities under RCW 46.16.381 is parked in a stall or space
clearly and conspicuously marked under RCW 46.61.581 which space is
provided on private property without charge or on public property;
(g) Upon determining that a person is operating a motor vehicle
without a valid driver's license in violation of RCW 46.20.005 or with
a license that has been expired for ninety days or more;
(h) When a vehicle is illegally occupying a truck, commercial
loading zone, restricted parking zone, bus, loading, hooded-meter,
taxi, street construction or maintenance, or other similar zone where,
by order of the director of transportation or chiefs of police or fire
or their designees, parking is limited to designated classes of
vehicles or is prohibited during certain hours, on designated days or
at all times, if the zone has been established with signage for at
least twenty-four hours and where the vehicle is interfering with the
proper and intended use of the zone. Signage must give notice to the
public that a vehicle will be removed if illegally parked in the zone.
(3) When an arrest is made for a violation of RCW 46.20.342, if the
vehicle is a commercial vehicle and the driver of the vehicle is not
the owner of the vehicle, before the summary impoundment directed under
subsection (1) of this section, the police officer shall attempt in a
reasonable and timely manner to contact the owner of the vehicle and
may release the vehicle to the owner if the owner is reasonably
available, as long as the owner was not in the vehicle at the time of
the stop and arrest and the owner has not received a prior release
under this subsection or RCW 46.55.120(1)(a)(ii).
(4) Nothing in this section may derogate from the powers of police
officers under the common law. For the purposes of this section, a
place of safety may include the business location of a registered tow
truck operator.

Sec. 6 RCW 46.63.020 and 2005 c 431 s 2, 2005 c 323 s 3, and 2005
c 183 s 10 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Failure to perform any act required or the performance of any act
prohibited by this title or an equivalent administrative regulation or
local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution relating to traffic
including parking, standing, stopping, and pedestrian offenses, is
designated as a traffic infraction and may not be classified as a
criminal offense, except for an offense contained in the following
provisions of this title or a violation of an equivalent administrative
regulation or local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution:
(1) RCW 46.09.120(2) relating to the operation of a nonhighway
vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or a
controlled substance;
(2) RCW 46.09.130 relating to operation of nonhighway vehicles;
(3) RCW 46.10.090(2) relating to the operation of a snowmobile
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or narcotics or habit-forming drugs or in a manner endangering the person of another;
(4) RCW 46.10.130 relating to the operation of snowmobiles;
(5) Chapter 46.12 RCW relating to certificates of ownership and
registration and markings indicating that a vehicle has been destroyed
or declared a total loss;
(6) RCW 46.16.010 relating to the nonpayment of taxes and fees by
failure to register a vehicle and falsifying residency when registering
a motor vehicle;
(7) RCW 46.16.011 relating to permitting unauthorized persons to
drive;
(8) RCW 46.16.160 relating to vehicle trip permits;
(9) RCW 46.16.381(2) relating to knowingly providing false
information in conjunction with an application for a special placard or
license plate for disabled persons' parking;
(10) RCW 46.20.005 relating to driving without a valid driver's
license;
(11) RCW 46.20.091 relating to false statements regarding a
driver's license or instruction permit;
(12) RCW 46.20.0921 relating to the unlawful possession and use of
a driver's license;
(13) RCW 46.20.342 relating to driving with a suspended or revoked
license or status;
(14) RCW 46.20.345 relating to the operation of a motor vehicle
with a suspended or revoked license;
(15) RCW 46.20.410 relating to the violation of restrictions of an
occupational or temporary restricted driver's license;
(16) RCW 46.20.740 relating to operation of a motor vehicle without
an ignition interlock device in violation of a license notation that
the device is required;
(17) RCW 46.20.750 relating to assisting another person to start a
vehicle equipped with an ignition interlock device;
(18) Section 4 of this act relating to driving with a canceled
certificate of license registration;
(19) RCW 46.25.170 relating to commercial driver's licenses;
(((19))) (20) Chapter 46.29 RCW relating to financial
responsibility;
(((20))) (21) RCW 46.30.040 relating to providing false evidence of
financial responsibility;
(((21))) (22) RCW 46.37.435 relating to wrongful installation of
sunscreening material;
(((22))) (23) RCW 46.37.650 relating to the sale, resale,
distribution, or installation of a previously deployed air bag;
(((23))) (24) RCW 46.44.180 relating to operation of mobile home
pilot vehicles;
(((24))) (25) RCW 46.48.175 relating to the transportation of
dangerous articles;
(((25))) (26) RCW 46.52.010 relating to duty on striking an
unattended car or other property;
(((26))) (27) RCW 46.52.020 relating to duty in case of injury to
or death of a person or damage to an attended vehicle;
(((27))) (28) RCW 46.52.090 relating to reports by repairmen,
storagemen, and appraisers;
(((28))) (29) RCW 46.52.130 relating to confidentiality of the
driving record to be furnished to an insurance company, an employer,
and an alcohol/drug assessment or treatment agency;
(((29))) (30) RCW 46.55.020 relating to engaging in the activities
of a registered tow truck operator without a registration certificate;
(((30))) (31) RCW 46.55.035 relating to prohibited practices by tow
truck operators;
(((31))) (32) RCW 46.61.015 relating to obedience to police
officers, flaggers, or firefighters;
(((32))) (33) RCW 46.61.020 relating to refusal to give information
to or cooperate with an officer;
(((33))) (34) RCW 46.61.022 relating to failure to stop and give
identification to an officer;
(((34))) (35) RCW 46.61.024 relating to attempting to elude
pursuing police vehicles;
(((35))) (36) RCW 46.61.500 relating to reckless driving;
(((36))) (37) RCW 46.61.502 and 46.61.504 relating to persons under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs;
(((37))) (38) RCW 46.61.503 relating to a person under age twenty-one driving a motor vehicle after consuming alcohol;
(((38))) (39) RCW 46.61.520 relating to vehicular homicide by motor
vehicle;
(((39))) (40) RCW 46.61.522 relating to vehicular assault;
(((40))) (41) RCW 46.61.5249 relating to first degree negligent
driving;
(((41))) (42) RCW 46.61.527(4) relating to reckless endangerment of
roadway workers;
(((42))) (43) RCW 46.61.530 relating to racing of vehicles on
highways;
(((43))) (44) RCW 46.61.655(7) (a) and (b) relating to failure to
secure a load;
(((44))) (45) RCW 46.61.685 relating to leaving children in an
unattended vehicle with the motor running;
(((45))) (46) RCW 46.61.740 relating to theft of motor vehicle
fuel;
(((46))) (47) RCW 46.37.671 through 46.37.675 relating to signal
preemption devices;
(((47))) (48) RCW 46.64.010 relating to unlawful cancellation of or
attempt to cancel a traffic citation;
(((48))) (49) RCW 46.64.048 relating to attempting, aiding,
abetting, coercing, and committing crimes;
(((49))) (50) Chapter 46.65 RCW relating to habitual traffic
offenders;
(((50))) (51) RCW 46.68.010 relating to false statements made to
obtain a refund;
(((51))) (52) Chapter 46.70 RCW relating to unfair motor vehicle
business practices, except where that chapter provides for the
assessment of monetary penalties of a civil nature;
(((52))) (53) Chapter 46.72 RCW relating to the transportation of
passengers in for hire vehicles;
(((53))) (54) RCW 46.72A.060 relating to limousine carrier
insurance;
(((54))) (55) RCW 46.72A.070 relating to operation of a limousine
without a vehicle certificate;
(((55))) (56) RCW 46.72A.080 relating to false advertising by a
limousine carrier;
(((56))) (57) Chapter 46.80 RCW relating to motor vehicle wreckers;
(((57))) (58) Chapter 46.82 RCW relating to driver's training
schools;
(((58))) (59) RCW 46.87.260 relating to alteration or forgery of a
cab card, letter of authority, or other temporary authority issued
under chapter 46.87 RCW;
(((59))) (60) RCW 46.87.290 relating to operation of an
unregistered or unlicensed vehicle under chapter 46.87 RCW.

--- END ---