BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 2005 c 259 s 1 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
The legislature finds that:
(1) Autism is a complex developmental disability that typically
appears during the first three years of life;
(2) As many as one million five hundred thousand Americans are
believed to have some form of autism;
(3) The number of children with autism is increasing;
(4) Autistic behaviors not only make life difficult for people with
autism but also make life hard for their families, health care
providers, and teachers;
(5) Families coping with this devastating illness are searching for
answers about its causes, diagnosis, prevention, and treatment;
(6) Presently, there is no effective means to prevent, fully treat,
or cure the disorder;
(7) Early intervention is critical for affected children to gain
maximum benefit from current therapies;
(8) Strategies about how to best prevent, identify, treat, and
accommodate the needs of individuals with autism and their families are
urgently needed; and
(9) It is very difficult to find and access resources and services
for adults with autism and Aspergers Syndrome.

Sec. 2 2005 c 259 s 2 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
(1) The caring for Washington individuals with autism task force is
created to:
(a) Study and make recommendations to the legislature regarding the
growing incidence of autism;
(b) Assist in implementing the recommendations; and
(c) Evaluate ways to improve the delivery and coordination of
autism services in the state.
(2) The task force shall consist of fourteen members: Four members
of the legislature, including two members of the senate appointed by
the president of the senate, one of the majority party and one of the
minority party, and two members of the house of representatives
appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, including one
of the majority party and one of the minority party; and ten additional
members appointed by the governor, who shall include at least:
(a) Two parents of children with autism;
(b) A parent of an adult individual with autism;
(c) A representative of the autism center at the University of
Washington;
(((c))) (d) A representative of the department of health;
(((d))) (e) A representative of the department of social and health
services;
(((e))) (f) A representative of the office of the superintendent of
public instruction;
(((f))) (g) A representative of a local school district;
(((g))) (h) A representative of an educational service district;
and
(((h))) (i) An expert in the field of early intervention services.
(3) The task force shall:
(a) Review the ((available literature and consult with experts to
gain an understanding of the causes of the disorder and its incidence
in Washington;
(b) Assess the availability of services currently provided for
early screening, diagnosis, and treatment of the disorder;
(c) Assess the availability of services to assist families of
individuals with autism;
(d) Review the effectiveness of programs and services provided to
individuals with autism and their families;
(e) Review other issues and concerns that the task force believes
would be helpful in arriving at sound policy recommendations; and
(f) Complete its review and submit its)) recommendations submitted
by the task force to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of
the legislature and the governor ((by)) in December ((1,)) 2006 and,
within available funding, assist in their implementation;
(b) Review and continue to refine criteria for regional autism
centers throughout Washington state based on community needs in each
area;
(c) Consult with experts, as needed, to ensure that implemented
services are of high quality and meet the intended purpose of the task
force recommendations;
(d) Compile information for and create the "Washington service
guidelines for individuals with autism spectrum disorders - birth
through the lifespan" book as described in the 2006 task force
recommendations;
(e) Monitor the federal combating autism act and its funding
availability and make recommendations on applying for grants as
available to assist in implementation of the 2006 task force
recommendations;
(f) Review other issues and concerns that the task force believes
would be helpful in implementing the current recommendations; and
(g) Provide a report to the appropriate policy and fiscal
committees of the legislature and the governor by December 1, 2008, on
the status of implementation of the 2006 task force recommendations.
(4) The department of health shall be the lead agency in providing
staff needed for the performance of the work of the task force. The
department may seek additional staff assistance from the office of the
superintendent of public instruction and the committee staff of the
legislature.
(5) Legislative members of the task force shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative
members, except those representing an employer or organization, are
entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

--- END ---