BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Since the 1992 enactment of the
reclaimed water act, the value of reclaimed water as a new source of
supply has received increasing recognition across the state and across
the nation. New information on the matters in this section has
increased awareness of the need to better manage, protect, and conserve
water resources and to use reclaimed water in that process. The
legislature now finds the following:
(a) Global warming and climate change. Global warming has reduced
the volume of glaciers in the North Cascade mountains to between
eighteen to thirty-two percent since 1983, and up to seventy-five
percent of the glaciers are at risk of disappearing under projected
temperatures for this century. Mountain snow pack has declined at
virtually every measurement location in the Pacific Northwest, reducing
the proportion of annual river flow to Puget Sound during summer months
by eighteen percent since 1948. Global warming has also shifted peak
stream flows earlier in the year in watersheds covering much of
Washington state, including the Columbia river basin, jeopardizing the
state's salmon fisheries. The state's recent report on the economic
impacts of climate change indicate that water resources will be one of
the areas most affected, and that many utilities may need to invest
major resources in new supply and conservation measures. Developing
and implementing adaptation strategies, such as water conservation that
includes the use of reclaimed water, can extend existing water supply
systems to help address the global warming impacts. In particular,
because reclaimed water uses existing sources of supply and fairly
constant base flows of wastewater, it has year-round dependability,
without regard to any given year's climate variability. This is
particularly important during summer months, when outdoor demands peak
and stream flows are critical for fish.
(b) Puget Sound. The governor has initiated a Puget Sound
partnership, with a request for an initial strategy to address high
priority problems. In December, the partnership delivered a strategy
that includes expanded use of reclaimed water both in order to improve
the Puget Sound's water quality by reducing wastewater discharges and
by replacing current sources of supply for nonpotable uses that
detrimentally affect stream flows and habitat.
(c) Salmon recovery. The federal fisheries services recently
approved a salmon recovery plan for the Puget Sound, which was
developed across multiple watersheds by numerous local governments,
tribal governments, and other parties to achieve sustainable
populations of salmon and other species. That plan includes an
adaptive management component where continued efforts will be made to
address issues, including problems with instream flows, identified as
a limiting factor in virtually all the watersheds, through strategies
that will be developed by regional and watershed implementation groups.
A potentially significant strategy may be the substitution of reclaimed
water for nonpotable uses where it will benefit streams and habitat.
(d) Water quality. Increasingly stringent federal standards for
water quality are forcing a number of communities to develop strategies
for wastewater treatment that, in addition to providing higher
treatment levels, will reduce the quantity of discharges. For many of
those communities, facilities to produce reclaimed water will be a
necessary approach to achieve both water quality and water supply
objectives.
(e) Watershed plans. Under the watershed planning act of 1997,
approximately two-thirds of the watersheds in the state have used a
bottoms-up approach to developing collaborative plans for meeting
future water supply needs. Many of those plans include the use of
reclaimed water for meeting those needs.
(f) Columbia river water management. Pursuant to legislation and
funding provided in 2006, federal, state, and local governments and
agencies, along with tribal governments, user groups, environmental
organizations, and others are developing a comprehensive strategy for
the mainstem Columbia that will ensure supplies for future growth while
protecting stream flows and fish habitat. The strategy will include
multiple tools that may include the potential development of new
storage, conservation measures, and water use efficiency. One pathway
toward conservation and efficiency is likely to be identification and
implementation of reclaimed water opportunities.
(g) Development schedule. The time frame required to plan, design,
construct, and begin use of reclaimed water can be extensive due to the
public information and acceptance efforts required in addition to
planning, design, and environmental assessment required for
infrastructure projects. This extended time frame necessitates the
initiation of reclaimed water projects as soon as possible.
(2) It is therefore the intent of the legislature to:
(a) Effectuate and reinvigorate the original intent behind the
reclaimed water act to expand the use of reclaimed water for nonpotable
uses throughout the state;
(b) Restate and emphasize the use of reclaimed water as a matter of
water resource management policy;
(c) Address current barriers to the use of reclaimed water, where
changes in state law will resolve such issues;
(d) Develop information from the state agencies responsible for
promoting the use of reclaimed water and address regulatory, financial,
planning, and other barriers to the expanded use of reclaimed water,
relying on state agency expertise and experience with reclaimed water;
(e) Facilitate achieving state, regional, and local objectives
through use of reclaimed water for water supply purposes in high
priority areas of the state, and in regional and local watershed and
water planning;
(f) Provide planning tools to local governments to incorporate
reclaimed water and related water conservation into land use plans,
consistent with water planning;
(g) Expand the scope of work of the advisory committee established
under chapter 279, Laws of 2006 to identify other reclaimed water
issues that should be addressed; and
(h) Provide initial funding, and evaluate options for providing
additional direct state funding, for reclaimed water projects.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.46.005 and 2001 c 69 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that by encouraging the use of reclaimed
water while assuring the health and safety of all Washington citizens
and the protection of its environment, the state of Washington will
continue to use water in the best interests of present and future
generations.
To facilitate the immediate use of reclaimed water ((as soon as is
practicable, the legislature encourages the cooperative efforts of the
public and private sectors and the use of pilot projects)) for uses
approved by the departments of ecology and health, the state shall
expand both direct financial support and financial incentives for
capital investments in water reuse and reclaimed water to effectuate
the goals of this chapter. The legislature further directs the
department of health and the department of ecology to coordinate
efforts towards developing an efficient and streamlined process for
creating and implementing processes for the use of reclaimed water.
It is hereby declared that the people of the state of Washington
have a primary interest in the development of facilities to provide
reclaimed water to replace potable water in nonpotable applications, to
supplement existing surface and ground water supplies, and to assist in
meeting the future water requirements of the state.
The legislature further finds and declares that the utilization of
reclaimed water by local communities for domestic, agricultural,
industrial, recreational, and fish and wildlife habitat creation and
enhancement purposes, including wetland enhancement, will contribute to
the peace, health, safety, and welfare of the people of the state of
Washington. To the extent reclaimed water is appropriate for
beneficial uses, it should be so used to preserve potable water for
drinking purposes, contribute to the restoration and protection of
instream flows that are crucial to preservation of the state's salmonid
fishery resources, contribute to the restoration of Puget Sound by
reducing wastewater discharge, provide a drought resistant source of
water supply for nonpotable needs, and be a source of supply integrated
into state, regional, and local strategies to respond to population
growth and global warming. Use of reclaimed water constitutes the
development of new basic water supplies needed for future generations
and local and regional water management planning should consider
coordination of infrastructure, development, storage, water reclamation
and reuse, and source exchange as strategies to meet water demands
associated with population growth and impacts of global warming.
The legislature further finds and declares that the use of
reclaimed water is not inconsistent with the policy of antidegradation
of state waters announced in other state statutes, including the water
pollution control act, chapter 90.48 RCW and the water resources act,
chapter 90.54 RCW.
The legislature finds that other states, including California,
Florida, and Arizona, have successfully used reclaimed water to
supplement existing water supplies without threatening existing
resources or public health.
It is the intent of the legislature that the department of ecology
and the department of health undertake the necessary steps to encourage
the development of water reclamation facilities so that reclaimed water
may be made available to help meet the growing water requirements of
the state.
The legislature further finds and declares that reclaimed water
facilities are water pollution control facilities as defined in chapter
70.146 RCW and are eligible for financial assistance as provided in
chapter 70.146 RCW. The legislature finds that funding demonstration
projects will ensure the future use of reclaimed water. The
demonstration projects in RCW 90.46.110 are varied in nature and will
provide the experience necessary to test different facets of the
standards and refine a variety of technologies so that water purveyors
can begin to use reclaimed water technology in a more cost-effective
manner. This is especially critical in smaller cities and communities
where the feasibility for such projects is great, but there are scarce
resources to develop the necessary facilities.
The legislature further finds that the agricultural processing
industry can play a critical and beneficial role in promoting the
efficient use of water by having the opportunity to develop and reuse
agricultural industrial process water from food processing.

Sec. 3 RCW 90.46.120 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 5 s 13 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The owner of a wastewater treatment facility that is reclaiming
water with a permit issued under this chapter has the exclusive right
to any reclaimed water generated by the wastewater treatment facility.
Use ((and)), distribution ((of the)), and the recovery from aquifer
storage of reclaimed water by the owner of the wastewater treatment
facility is exempt from the permit requirements of RCW 90.03.250 and
90.44.060. Revenues derived from the reclaimed water facility shall be
used only to offset the cost of operation of the wastewater utility
fund or other applicable source of system-wide funding.
(2) If the proposed use or uses of reclaimed water are intended to
augment or replace potable water supplies or create the potential for
the development of additional potable water supplies, such use or uses
shall be considered in the development of ((the)) any regional water
supply plan or plans addressing potable water supply service by
multiple water purveyors. Such water supply plans include plans
developed by multiple jurisdictions under the relevant provisions of
chapters 43.20, 70.116, 90.44, and 90.82 RCW, and the water supply
provisions under the utility element of chapter 36.70A RCW. The method
by which such plans are approved shall remain unchanged. The owner of
a wastewater treatment facility that proposes to reclaim water shall be
included as a participant in the development of such regional water
supply plan or plans.
(3) Where opportunities for the use of reclaimed water exist within
the period of time addressed by a water system plan, a water supply
plan, or a coordinated water system plan developed under chapters 43.20
((or)), 70.116, 90.44, and 90.82 RCW, and the water supply provisions
under the utility element of chapter 36.70A RCW, these plans must be
developed and coordinated to ensure that opportunities for reclaimed
water are evaluated. The requirements of this subsection (3) do not
apply to water system plans developed under chapter 43.20 RCW for
utilities serving less than one thousand service connections.

Sec. 4 RCW 90.46.130 and 2002 c 329 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,
facilities that reclaim water under this chapter shall not impair any
existing water right downstream from any freshwater discharge points of
such facilities unless there is compensation or mitigation for such
impairment ((is agreed to by the holder of the affected water right)).
(b) Any reclaimed water project that reduces the quantity of sewage
treatment plant effluent discharged directly into marine waters is
deemed to not impair any existing water rights.
(2) Agricultural water use of agricultural industrial process water
and use of industrial reuse water under this chapter shall not impair
existing water rights within the water source that is the source of
supply for the agricultural processing plant or the industrial
processing and, if the water source is surface water, the existing
water rights are downstream from the agricultural processing plant's
discharge points existing on July 22, 2001, or from the industrial
processing's discharge points existing on June 13, 2002.
(3) The department of ecology shall convene and staff a task force
to review potential barriers or issues related to development of
reclaimed water projects pursuant to the evaluation of water rights
impairment under this section and related impairment issues and shall
report the findings and any recommendations of this review to the
appropriate standing committees of the legislature no later than
December 31, 2007. The task force shall be cochaired by a
representative from the water quality and the water resources programs
at the department, and shall consist of representatives of interested
groups, including the attorney general, the department of health, local
governments, tribal governments, water utilities, reclaimed water
utilities, wastewater utilities, environmental organizations,
agricultural organizations, and businesses. The task force shall
report its findings to the appropriate legislative committees on or
before December 1, 2007. The task force and report shall address the
following topics at a minimum: (a) Internal processing of reclaimed
water permits by the department, including the ability to deliver
timely decisions on potential impairment of water rights; (b)
compliance with state and federal water quality standards on existing
and future discharges, including potential requirements on wastewater
utilities to reduce discharges to water and increase upland discharges;
(c) nature of water that is imported into a watershed or potentially
exported from the watershed in the form of effluent or reclaimed water;
(d) inequities or different treatment of processing of reclaimed water
permits and wastewater permits for similar treatment and facilities;
(e) ability of existing provisions of state law, such as chapter 90.48
RCW, to address possible impacts to, and mitigation for, stream flows
and fish habitat; (f) technical ability to determine impacts to water
sources from reclaimed water facilities; (g) approaches to these issues
in other western states with significant use of reclaimed water.

Sec. 5 2006 c 279 s 3 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
(1) In order to identify and pursue other measures to facilitate
achieving the objectives in RCW 90.46.005 for expanded, appropriate,
and safe use of reclaimed water, the department of ecology and the
department of health shall provide the legislature with relevant
information through periodic progress reports, as provided in this
section.
(2) The department of ecology ((must present)) shall provide
interim reports to the appropriate committees of the legislature by
January 1, 2008, and January 1, 2009, that summarize the steps taken to
that date towards the final rule making required by ((section 1 of this
act)) RCW 90.46.015. The reports ((must)) shall include, at a minimum,
a summary of participation in the rule advisory ((group and))
committee, the topics considered by the department, and issues
identified by the rule advisory committee as barriers to expanded use
of reclaimed water that may not be addressed within the rules to be
adopted by the department.
(3) In addition to subsection (2) of this section, the department
shall form a subtask force consisting of not more than ten members
chosen from the existing rule advisory committee to further identify
and recommend actions to increase the promotion of reclaimed water as
a water supply and water resource management option. At a minimum, the
subtask force shall consider (a) issues assigned by the rule advisory
committee; (b) staffing levels, resources, and roles within both state
agencies; (c) optimizing organizational structure; and (d) unresolved
legal issues specific to reclaimed water use. Information regarding
these topics shall be appended to the required interim reports as the
topics are considered by the advisory group.

Sec. 6 RCW 90.82.043 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 4 s 3 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Within one year of accepting funding under RCW 90.82.040(2)(e),
the planning unit must complete a detailed implementation plan.
Submittal of a detailed implementation plan to the department is a
condition of receiving grants for the second and all subsequent years
of the phase four grant.
(2) Each implementation plan must contain strategies to provide
sufficient water for: (a) Production agriculture; (b) commercial,
industrial, and residential use; and (c) instream flows. Each
implementation plan must contain timelines to achieve these strategies
and interim milestones to measure progress.
(3) The implementation plan must clearly define coordination and
oversight responsibilities; any needed interlocal agreements, rules, or
ordinances; any needed state or local administrative approvals and
permits that must be secured; and specific funding mechanisms.
(4) In developing the implementation plan, the planning unit must
consult with other entities planning in the watershed management area
and identify and seek to eliminate any activities or policies that are
duplicative or inconsistent.
(5)(a) By December 1, 2003, and by December 1st of each subsequent
year, the director of the department shall report to the appropriate
legislative standing committees regarding statutory changes necessary
to enable state agency approval or permit decision making needed to
implement a plan approved under this chapter.
(b) Beginning with the December 1, 2007, report, and then every two
years thereafter, the director shall include in each report the extent
to which reclaimed water has been identified in the watershed plans as
potential sources or strategies to meet future water needs, and
provisions in any watershed implementation plans that discuss barriers
to implementation of the water reuse elements of those plans. The
department's report shall include an estimate of the potential cost of
reclaimed water facilities and identification of potential sources of
funding for them.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) By January 1, 2008, the department of
health shall file a brief report with the appropriate committees of the
legislature on the general status of:
(a) Development of permit fees for industrial and commercial uses
of reclaimed water as required by RCW 90.46.030;
(b) Development of standards and guidelines for greywater use as
required by RCW 90.46.140; and
(c) Permitting of greywater use by local health officers and
plumbing officials in accordance with standards and guidelines
developed pursuant to RCW 90.46.140.
(2) The report shall also identify:
(a) A general description of the number, type, and location of
reclaimed water opportunities included in water supply and coordinated
water system plans since 2003, as required by RCW 90.46.140;
(b) The best information currently available regarding potential
public health risks associated with reclaimed water, if any, any known
occurrences of any public health incidents associated with reclaimed
water use, the approaches to reclaimed water-related public health
issues taken in other states, and resource needs of the department to
evaluate any known public health risks; and
(c) A description of a basic public information and public
acceptance program necessary to generate public support for the
beneficial use of reclaimed water.
(3) In order to ensure brevity of the report, the department should
include references to existing documents, reports, internet sites, and
other sources of detailed information on the foregoing issues.

Sec. 8 RCW 90.54.020 and 1997 c 442 s 201 are each amended to
read as follows:
Utilization and management of the waters of the state shall be
guided by the following general declaration of fundamentals:
(1) Uses of water for domestic, stock watering, industrial,
commercial, agricultural, irrigation, hydroelectric power production,
mining, fish and wildlife maintenance and enhancement, recreational,
and thermal power production purposes, and preservation of
environmental and aesthetic values, and all other uses compatible with
the enjoyment of the public waters of the state, are declared to be
beneficial.
(2) Allocation of waters among potential uses and users shall be
based generally on the securing of the maximum net benefits for the
people of the state. Maximum net benefits shall constitute total
benefits less costs including opportunities lost.
(3) The quality of the natural environment shall be protected and,
where possible, enhanced as follows:
(a) Perennial rivers and streams of the state shall be retained
with base flows necessary to provide for preservation of wildlife,
fish, scenic, aesthetic and other environmental values, and
navigational values. Lakes and ponds shall be retained substantially
in their natural condition. Withdrawals of water which would conflict
therewith shall be authorized only in those situations where it is
clear that overriding considerations of the public interest will be
served.
(b) Waters of the state shall be of high quality. Regardless of
the quality of the waters of the state, all wastes and other materials
and substances proposed for entry into said waters shall be provided
with all known, available, and reasonable methods of treatment prior to
entry. Notwithstanding that standards of quality established for the
waters of the state would not be violated, wastes and other materials
and substances shall not be allowed to enter such waters which will
reduce the existing quality thereof, except in those situations where
it is clear that overriding considerations of the public interest will
be served. Technology-based effluent limitations or standards for
discharges for municipal water treatment plants located on the
Chehalis, Columbia, Cowlitz, Lewis, or Skagit river shall be adjusted
to reflect credit for substances removed from the plant intake water
if:
(i) The municipality demonstrates that the intake water is drawn
from the same body of water into which the discharge is made; and
(ii) The municipality demonstrates that no violation of receiving
water quality standards or appreciable environmental degradation will
result.
(4) The development of multipurpose water storage facilities shall
be a high priority for programs of water allocation, planning,
management, and efficiency. The department, other state agencies,
local governments, and planning units formed under section 107 or 108
of this act shall evaluate the potential for the development of new
storage projects and the benefits and effects of storage in reducing
damage to stream banks and property, increasing the use of land,
providing water for municipal, industrial, agricultural, power
generation, and other beneficial uses, and improving stream flow
regimes for fisheries and other instream uses.
(5) Adequate and safe supplies of water shall be preserved and
protected in potable condition to satisfy human domestic needs.
(6) Multiple-purpose impoundment structures are to be preferred
over single-purpose structures. Due regard shall be given to means and
methods for protection of fishery resources in the planning for and
construction of water impoundment structures and other artificial
obstructions.
(7) Federal, state, and local governments, individuals,
corporations, groups and other entities shall be encouraged to carry
out practices of conservation as they relate to the use of the waters
of the state. In addition to traditional development approaches,
improved water use efficiency ((and)), conservation, and use of
reclaimed water shall be emphasized in the management of the state's
water resources and in some cases will be a potential new source of
water with which to meet future needs throughout the state. Use of
reclaimed water should be employed through state and local planning and
programs with incentives for state financial assistance recognizing
programs and plans that encourage the use of conservation and reclaimed
water use, and state agencies shall continue to review and reduce
regulatory barriers and streamline permitting for the use of reclaimed
water where appropriate.
(8) Development of water supply systems, whether publicly or
privately owned, which provide water to the public generally in
regional areas within the state shall be encouraged. Development of
water supply systems for multiple domestic use which will not serve the
public generally shall be discouraged where water supplies are
available from water systems serving the public.
(9) Full recognition shall be given in the administration of water
allocation and use programs to the natural interrelationships of
surface and ground waters.
(10) Expressions of the public interest will be sought at all
stages of water planning and allocation discussions.
(11) Water management programs, including but not limited to, water
quality, flood control, drainage, erosion control and storm runoff are
deemed to be in the public interest.

Sec. 9 RCW 90.54.180 and 1989 c 348 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Consistent with the fundamentals of water resource policy set forth
in this chapter, state and local governments, individuals,
corporations, groups and other entities shall be encouraged to carry
out water use efficiency and conservation programs and practices
consistent with the following:
(1) Water efficiency and conservation programs should utilize an
appropriate mix of economic incentives, cost share programs, regulatory
programs, and technical and public information efforts. Programs which
encourage voluntary participation are preferred.
(2) Increased water use efficiency and reclaimed water should
receive consideration as a potential source of water in state and local
water resource planning processes. In determining the cost-effectiveness of alternative water sources, consideration should be
given to the benefits of conservation, waste water recycling, and
impoundment of waters. Where reclaimed water is a feasible replacement
source of water, it shall be used by state agencies and state
facilities for nonpotable water uses in lieu of the use of potable
water. For purposes of this requirement, feasible replacement source
means (a) the reclaimed water is of adequate quality and quantity for
the proposed use; (b) the proposed use is approved by the departments
of ecology and health; (c) the reclaimed water can be reliably supplied
by a local public agency or public water system; and (d) the cost of
the reclaimed water is reasonable relative to the costs of conservation
or other potentially available supplies of potable water, after taking
into account all costs and benefits, including environmental costs and
benefits.
(3) In determining the cost-effectiveness of alternative water
sources, full consideration should be given to the benefits of storage
which can reduce the damage to stream banks and property, increase the
utilization of land, provide water for municipal, industrial,
agricultural, and other beneficial uses, provide for the generation of
electric power from renewable resources, and improve stream flow
regimes for fishery and other instream uses.
(4) Entities receiving state financial assistance for construction
of water source expansion or acquisition of new sources shall develop,
and implement if cost-effective, a water use efficiency and
conservation element of a water supply plan pursuant to RCW
43.20.230(1).
(5) State programs to improve water use efficiency should focus on
those areas of the state in which water is overappropriated; areas that
experience diminished streamflows or aquifer levels; regional areas
that the governor has identified as high priority for investments in
improved water quality and quantity, including the Spokane river, the
Columbia river basin, and the Puget Sound; areas most likely to be
affected by global warming; and areas where projected water needs,
including those for instream flows, exceed available supplies.
(6) Existing and future generations of citizens of the state of
Washington should be made aware of the importance of the state's water
resources and the need for wise and efficient use and development of
this vital resource. In order to increase this awareness, state
agencies should integrate public ((education)) information programs on
increasing water use efficiency into existing public information
efforts. This effort shall be coordinated with other levels of
government, including local governments and Indian tribes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 58.17 RCW
to read as follows:
In determining whether a proposed short plat, short subdivision, or
subdivision meets the requirements for potable water supplies as
required under RCW 58.17.060 or 58.17.110, and otherwise serves the
public use and interest, the city, town, or county may require:
(1) Conformance to any water conservation ordinances or plans
adopted by the city, town, or county;
(2) Use of water conservation measures consistent with any regional
watershed plan adopted under chapter 90.82 RCW, or any regional water
supply plan as described in RCW 90.46.120 if the city or county
determines that the measures contained within such a regional supply
plan conform to its respective conservation ordinances and water,
sewer, and comprehensive land use plan; and
(3) Use of reclaimed water where potable water is not required, if
it is consistent with any applicable local ordinance adopted for water
reuse or use of reclaimed water.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 90.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of ecology shall establish a subtask force from
the existing rule advisory committee by July 31, 2007, composed of no
more than ten members including a representative from the department of
ecology, who shall serve as chair, a representative from the department
of health, and representatives from city, county, and water-sewer
district utilities, and the environmental and business communities. By
January 1, 2008, the subtask force shall submit to the appropriate
legislative committees a recommendation for a long-term dedicated
funding program to construct reclaimed water facilities. To minimize
the administrative burden, the subtask force shall work toward a
coordinated effort with the current clean water state revolving fund
and centennial clean water fund integrated program under which
reclaimed water projects with a water quality benefit are currently
eligible and shall review the "2006 Inventory of State Infrastructure
Programs" produced by the joint legislative audit and review committee.
The subtask force shall also review current existing conservation and
water reuse plans or programs for cities, counties, and districts and
provide a report to the appropriate legislative committees regarding
the number, general nature, and extent that conservation and reclaimed
water use is identified or incorporated into such plans. The subtask
force also shall consider, and recommend, provisions on the inclusion
of reclaimed water use criteria or requirements as an element of water
use efficiency requirements required under RCW 70.119A.180 and for
water system, public water system, and/or regional water plans as
required under chapters 43.20 and 70.119 RCW.
(2) The recommendation shall provide a comprehensive funding, loan,
and grant program that includes the following:
(a) Eligibility requirements: Eligible components should include
the additional water reclamation components to treat wastewater
effluent to reclaimed water standards, distribution pump stations,
storage, trunk lines, and distribution lines, and multiple-purpose
projects in proportion to the costs allocated to reclaimed water;
(b) Competitive process for funding: The funding should be
competitive and establish a maximum percentage or maximum funding
amount available to any applicant;
(c) Priorities for funding that target reclaimed water projects
ready to proceed, local support for the project, projects in areas that
have adopted mandatory use ordinances or letters of intent to execute
user contracts, projects providing broader public benefits to
environmental water quality or water resource needs such as Puget Sound
restoration, Columbia river water management strategies, water quality
improvements, wetlands habitat, and instream flows, projects with
benefits that clearly extend to citizens other than the utility
ratepayers; and
(d) A proposed grant program for projects in identified high
priority areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 90.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that the state should take a lead in
increasing the visibility of the use of reclaimed water.
(2) The department of general administration shall develop a
proposal to provide a comprehensive campus-wide plan for the use of
nonpotable water in lieu of the use of potable water for irrigation and
related outdoor uses, to serve as a demonstration project for the use
of reclaimed water. The department of general administration shall
work with the city of Olympia to provide a report to the legislature by
December 1, 2007, of the needed infrastructure, cost, and potential
funding sources for the project.

--- END ---