BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that Washington
citizens receive health care from a variety of health care providers.
Some of those providers are presently not licensed or otherwise
regulated by the state of Washington. The legislature intends that
complementary and alternative health care shall be regulated only to
the extent provided in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Complementary and alternative health care" means healing
methods and treatments including, but not limited to: (a) Acupressure;
(b) anthroposophy; (c) aromatherapy; (d) ayurveda; (e) culturally
traditional healing practices; (f) detoxification practices and
therapies; (g) energetic healing; (h) polarity therapy; (i) folk
practices; (j) healing practices utilizing heat, cold, water, touch,
and light; (k) colostrum therapy; (l) healing touch; (m) herbology or
herbalism; (n) homeopathy; (o) nondiagnostic iridology; (p) meditation;
and (q) traditional Oriental practices, as Qigong energy healing.
"Complementary and alternative health care" does not include surgery,
X-ray radiation, administering or dispensing legend drugs and
controlled substances, practices that invade the human body by puncture
of the skin, setting fractures, the use of medical devices as defined
in chapter 18.71 RCW, any practice included in the practice of
dentistry as defined in chapter 18.32 RCW, or the manipulation or
adjustment of articulations of joints or the spine as described in
chapter 18.25 RCW.
(2) "Complementary and alternative health care client" means an
individual who receives care from a complementary and alternative
health care practitioner.
(3) "Complementary and alternative health care practitioner" means
a person who:
(a) Provides complementary and alternative health care; and
(b) Provides such care for remuneration or holds himself or herself
out to the public as a practitioner of complementary and alternative
health care.
(4) "Department" means the department of health.
(5) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of health.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 No individual shall provide complementary
and alternative health care unless that individual is registered with
the department in accordance with this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A practitioner may refer to himself or
herself by a title or qualification conferred on the individual by
virtue of degrees, training, experience, credentials, or other
qualifications attained by the practitioner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A health care practitioner licensed or
registered by the department or a health-related licensing board, who
provides complementary and alternative health care while practicing
under the practitioner's license or registration, shall be regulated
by, and be under the jurisdiction of, the applicable health-related
licensing board with regard to complementary and alternative health
care. A practitioner may not hold himself or herself out to the public
as being licensed or registered by the department or a health-related
licensing board when providing complementary and alternative health
care.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A complementary and alternative health care
practitioner may not provide a medical diagnosis or recommend
discontinuance of medically prescribed treatments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This chapter does not apply to, control,
prevent, or restrict the practice, service, or activity of lawfully
marketing or distributing food products, including dietary supplements
as defined in the federal dietary supplement health and education act,
educating customers about such products, or explaining the use of such
products.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) The secretary shall prescribe an
application form to register individuals who wish to provide
complementary and alternative health care, requesting the following
information from the applicant:
(a) The applicant's name, home and business address, telephone
number, gender, and date and location of birth;
(b) The modalities the applicant practices;
(c) The training and education the applicant has received;
(d) Whether the applicant employs licensed health care
professionals or works under the supervision of a licensed health care
professional and, if so, the names and business information of those
professionals;
(e) Whether the applicant has been convicted of a felony;
(f) Any health care license or certificate the applicant holds in
Washington;
(g) Whether an applicant voluntarily surrendered a license or
certificate issued by a health-related licensing board in this state
after civil or criminal charges were filed against the applicant in
this state or another jurisdiction;
(h) Any medical or physical conditions that may impair an applicant
from providing complementary and alternative health care services;
(i) Any treatment for alcohol abuse, controlled substance abuse,
prescription drug abuse, or illegal drug abuse that an applicant has
received during the ten years immediately preceding the date the
applicant submits the application;
(j) Any disciplinary action taken against the applicant by the
department or a similar agency in another state that allows individuals
to provide complementary and alternative health care;
(k) Any current investigations involving the applicant conducted in
a state that allows individuals to provide complementary and
alternative health care.
(2) The application form shall require the applicant to promise to
provide each client with a copy of the client bill of rights required
under this chapter, to obtain a signed copy of that bill of rights
prior to providing any care to a client, and to retain a copy of each
signed bill of rights and records of a client's care for a period of
five years after the last visit by the client. The application form
shall be signed by the applicant, and the information in the
application form shall be provided by the applicant under penalty of
perjury.
(3) The department shall maintain a list of all registered
complementary and alternative health care practitioners and any
disciplinary actions taken against such practitioners.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) To register with the department, an
applicant shall satisfy all of the following criteria:
(a) Be at least eighteen years of age;
(b) Complete the application form prescribed by the secretary and
submit the form to the department; and
(c) Pay a registration fee.
(2) The department shall not register an applicant if the applicant
was convicted of a felony or disciplined by the department or a
comparable disciplinary authority in another jurisdiction. An
applicant is not disqualified from registration if the felony or the
disciplinary action against the applicant was for the provision of
complementary and alternative health care as permitted under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A registration issued under this chapter is
valid for one year. A practitioner may renew such registration by
providing to the department such information as it may prescribe and by
paying a renewal fee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) The department shall register
complementary and alternative health care practitioners, investigate
complaints, and take disciplinary actions against all complementary and
alternative health care practitioners for violations of prohibited
conduct, as defined in chapter 18.130 RCW.
(2) The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs
registered practice and the registration and discipline of persons
under this chapter. The department is the disciplining authority under
this chapter.
(3) The department shall forward to the appropriate health-related
licensing boards any complaints that fall within the jurisdiction of
such boards.
(4) The department shall provide any person who makes a complaint
against a complementary and alternative health care practitioner a
description of the department's actions relating to the complaint.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) All complementary and alternative
health care practitioners shall provide to each complementary and
alternative health care client prior to providing any care a written
copy of the complementary and alternative health care client bill of
rights. A copy must be posted in a prominent location in the office of
the complementary and alternative health care practitioner. Reasonable
accommodations shall be made for those clients who cannot read or who
have communication impairments and those who do not read or speak
English. The complementary and alternative health care bill of rights
shall include the following:
(a) The name, complementary and alternative health care title,
business address, and telephone number of the complementary and
alternative health care practitioner;
(b) The degrees, training, experience, or other qualifications of
the practitioner regarding the complementary and alternative health
care being provided, followed by the following statement in bold print:

"THE STATE OF WASHINGTON HAS NOT ADOPTED ANY EDUCATIONAL AND
TRAINING STANDARDS FOR COMPLEMENTARY AND ALTERNATIVE HEALTH
CARE PRACTITIONERS. THIS STATEMENT OF CREDENTIALS IS FOR
INFORMATION PURPOSES ONLY.

A COMPLEMENTARY AND ALTERNATIVE HEALTH CARE PRACTITIONER MAY
NOT PROVIDE A MEDICAL DIAGNOSIS OR RECOMMEND DISCONTINUANCE OF
MEDICALLY PRESCRIBED TREATMENTS. IF A CLIENT DESIRES A
DIAGNOSIS FROM OTHER HEALTH CARE PROVIDERS AUTHORIZED TO MAKE
A DIAGNOSIS, THE CLIENT MAY SEEK SUCH SERVICES AT ANY TIME."

(c) If the practitioner is also a licensed health care
professional, the following statement shall be in the bill of rights in
bold print:

"I HOLD THE FOLLOWING LICENSES AND CERTIFICATIONS ISSUED BY THE
STATE OF WASHINGTON: (list of licenses and certifications).
HOWEVER, I AM PROVIDING MY SERVICES TO YOU AS A COMPLEMENTARY
AND ALTERNATIVE HEALTH CARE PRACTITIONER AND NOT AS A LICENSED
HEALTH CARE PROFESSIONAL. THE STATE HAS NOT ADOPTED ANY
EDUCATION OR TRAINING REQUIREMENTS FOR COMPLEMENTARY AND
ALTERNATIVE HEALTH CARE PRACTITIONERS."

(d) The name, business address, and telephone number of the
practitioner's supervisor, if any;
(e) Notice that a complementary and alternative health care client
has the right to file a complaint with the practitioner's supervisor,
if any, and the procedure for filing complaints;
(f) The address and telephone number of the department and notice
that a client may file complaints with the department;
(g) The practitioner's charge per unit of service, the
practitioner's method of billing for such charge, the name of insurance
companies that have agreed to reimburse the practitioner, health
maintenance organizations with whom the practitioner contracts to
provide services, and whether the practitioner accepts medicare,
medical assistance, or general assistance medical care;
(h) A statement that the client has a right to reasonable notice of
changes in services or charges;
(i) A brief summary, in plain language, of the theoretical approach
used by the practitioner in providing services to clients;
(j) Notice that the client has a right to complete and current
information concerning the practitioner's assessment and recommended
service that is to be provided, including the expected duration of the
service to be provided;
(k) A statement that clients may expect courteous treatment and to
be free from verbal, physical, or sexual abuse by the practitioner;
(l) A statement that client records and transactions with the
practitioner are confidential, unless release of these records is
authorized in writing by the client, or otherwise provided by law;
(m) A statement of the client's right to be allowed access to
records and written information from records in accordance with chapter
70.02 RCW;
(n) A statement that the client has the right to choose freely
among available practitioners and to change practitioners after
services have begun, within the limits of health insurance, medical
assistance, or other health programs;
(o) A statement that the client has a right to coordinate transfer
when there will be a change in the provider of services;
(p) A statement that the client may refuse services or treatment,
unless otherwise provided by law; and
(q) A statement that the client may assert the client's rights
without retaliation.
(2) Prior to the provision of any complementary and alternative
health care, the client must attest in writing that the client has
received the complementary and alternative health care client bill of
rights.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 The information and records of a
complementary and alternative health care practitioner pertaining to a
client shall be privileged communications, the same as now or hereafter
may exist in the relationship of physician and patient, and shall not
be released or subjected to disclosure without the client's consent or
as otherwise required by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 70.02 RCW
to read as follows:
Complementary and alternative health care practitioners registered
under chapter 18.-- RCW (sections 1 through 13 of this act) are subject
to this chapter.

Sec. 15 RCW 18.130.040 and 2004 c 38 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This chapter applies only to the secretary and the boards and
commissions having jurisdiction in relation to the professions licensed
under the chapters specified in this section. This chapter does not
apply to any business or profession not licensed under the chapters
specified in this section.
(2)(a) The secretary has authority under this chapter in relation
to the following professions:
(i) Dispensing opticians licensed and designated apprentices under
chapter 18.34 RCW;
(ii) Naturopaths licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW;
(iii) Midwives licensed under chapter 18.50 RCW;
(iv) Ocularists licensed under chapter 18.55 RCW;
(v) Massage operators and businesses licensed under chapter 18.108
RCW;
(vi) Dental hygienists licensed under chapter 18.29 RCW;
(vii) Acupuncturists licensed under chapter 18.06 RCW;
(viii) Radiologic technologists certified and X-ray technicians
registered under chapter 18.84 RCW;
(ix) Respiratory care practitioners licensed under chapter 18.89
RCW;
(x) Persons registered under chapter 18.19 RCW;
(xi) Persons licensed as mental health counselors, marriage and
family therapists, and social workers under chapter 18.225 RCW;
(xii) Persons registered as nursing pool operators under chapter
18.52C RCW;
(xiii) Nursing assistants registered or certified under chapter
18.88A RCW;
(xiv) Health care assistants certified under chapter 18.135 RCW;
(xv) Dietitians and nutritionists certified under chapter 18.138
RCW;
(xvi) Chemical dependency professionals certified under chapter
18.205 RCW;
(xvii) Sex offender treatment providers and certified affiliate sex
offender treatment providers certified under chapter 18.155 RCW;
(xviii) Persons licensed and certified under chapter 18.73 RCW or
RCW 18.71.205;
(xix) Denturists licensed under chapter 18.30 RCW;
(xx) Orthotists and prosthetists licensed under chapter 18.200 RCW;
(xxi) Surgical technologists registered under chapter 18.215 RCW;
((and))
(xxii) Recreational therapists; and
(xxiii) Complementary and alternative health care practitioners
registered under chapter 18.-- RCW (sections 1 through 13 of this act).
(b) The boards and commissions having authority under this chapter
are as follows:
(i) The podiatric medical board as established in chapter 18.22
RCW;
(ii) The chiropractic quality assurance commission as established
in chapter 18.25 RCW;
(iii) The dental quality assurance commission as established in
chapter 18.32 RCW;
(iv) The board of hearing and speech as established in chapter
18.35 RCW;
(v) The board of examiners for nursing home administrators as
established in chapter 18.52 RCW;
(vi) The optometry board as established in chapter 18.54 RCW
governing licenses issued under chapter 18.53 RCW;
(vii) The board of osteopathic medicine and surgery as established
in chapter 18.57 RCW governing licenses issued under chapters 18.57 and
18.57A RCW;
(viii) The board of pharmacy as established in chapter 18.64 RCW
governing licenses issued under chapters 18.64 and 18.64A RCW;
(ix) The medical quality assurance commission as established in
chapter 18.71 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under
chapters 18.71 and 18.71A RCW;
(x) The board of physical therapy as established in chapter 18.74
RCW;
(xi) The board of occupational therapy practice as established in
chapter 18.59 RCW;
(xii) The nursing care quality assurance commission as established
in chapter 18.79 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under
that chapter;
(xiii) The examining board of psychology and its disciplinary
committee as established in chapter 18.83 RCW; and
(xiv) The veterinary board of governors as established in chapter
18.92 RCW.
(3) In addition to the authority to discipline license holders, the
disciplining authority has the authority to grant or deny licenses
based on the conditions and criteria established in this chapter and
the chapters specified in subsection (2) of this section. This chapter
also governs any investigation, hearing, or proceeding relating to
denial of licensure or issuance of a license conditioned on the
applicant's compliance with an order entered pursuant to RCW 18.130.160
by the disciplining authority.
(4) All disciplining authorities shall adopt procedures to ensure
substantially consistent application of this chapter, the Uniform
Disciplinary Act, among the disciplining authorities listed in
subsection (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 Sections 1 through 13 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

--- END ---