BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.43.944 and 2005 c 518 s 929 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The fire service training account is hereby established in the
state treasury. The fund shall consist of:
(a) All fees received by the Washington state patrol for fire
service training;
(b) All grants and bequests accepted by the Washington state patrol
under RCW 43.43.940; and
(c) ((Twenty)) Thirty-five percent of all moneys received by the
state on fire insurance premiums.
(2) Moneys in the account may be appropriated only for fire service
training. ((During the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
appropriate funds from this account for school fire prevention
activities within the Washington state patrol.)) Of the funds received
under subsection (1)(c) of this section, twenty-eight and one-half
percent shall be allocated to the firefighter joint apprenticeship
training program.

--- END ---