BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the economic
vitality of Washington state requires robust rail and freight systems
capable of providing its businesses, ports, and agricultural producers
with competitive access to domestic and international markets. The
legislature further finds that a carefully planned program of state
investments in rail and freight infrastructure will allow Washington
state to realize important public benefits, including increased safety
and economic growth. To the extent that state funds are used to
improve rail infrastructure, the legislature declares that it is the
policy of the state of Washington to examine the cost of any rail
infrastructure improvement as compared to the public benefits to be
gained by making the improvement according to the following priorities,
in order of relative importance: (1) Economic, safety, or
environmental advantages of freight movement by rail compared to
alternative modes; (2) self-sustaining economic development that
creates family-wage jobs; (3) preservation of transportation corridors
that would otherwise be lost; (4) increased access to efficient and
cost-effective transport to market for Washington's agricultural and
industrial products; (5) better integration and cooperation within the
regional, national, and international systems of freight distribution;
and (6) mitigation of impacts of increased rail traffic on communities.
In all cases, state investment in rail infrastructure should be
allocated to leverage the greatest amount of partnership funding
possible, and should only be considered when there is a demonstrably
lower likelihood of obtaining the benefits specified in this section
without at least some state funding of the infrastructure improvement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The department of transportation shall plan
and coordinate the state's investment in the preservation and
improvement of rail infrastructure and the rail transportation system.
The department shall furnish quarterly updates to the transportation
commission and the transportation committees of the house of
representatives and senate regarding the development and execution of
the plan for the state's participation in the preservation and
improvement of rail infrastructure and the rail transportation system.
In executing its duties under this chapter, the department shall
carefully consider the recommendations that the transportation
commission shall, from time to time, but at least annually by August
1st, make in writing to the department. The department shall promptly
and diligently furnish information that the transportation commission
or the transportation committees of the house of representatives or
senate may request relating to the rail transportation system or the
rail infrastructure actions and projects plan described in section 3 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The department of transportation shall
identify rail infrastructure needs that could be addressed through the
state's financial or other participation. The department shall
consider possible types of state participation to address a rail
infrastructure need, and shall analyze reasonable possibilities
according to priorities identified in section 1 of this act by
developing and implementing the benefit/impact evaluation methodology
referenced in the statewide rail capacity and needs study finalized in
December 2006. The department shall convene a work group comprised of
people representing the following: (1) The transportation commission;
(2) the freight mobility strategic investment board; (3) Washington
public ports association; (4) Washington trucking association; (5) the
department of community, trade and economic development; (6) union
pacific railroad; (7) burlington northern santa fe railway; (8) all
aboard Washington; (9) association of counties; (10) association of
cities; (11) the department of agriculture; and (12) manufacturers and
agricultural growers that use the rail system to distribute their
products. The work group shall collaborate with the department to
develop the benefit/impact analysis method to be used to evaluate all
proposed state actions or projects according to the priorities
established in section 1 of this act. Based upon the benefit/impact
analysis, the department shall develop and sequence a plan of actions
and projects in which the state should participate. The rail
infrastructure actions and projects plan must include an explanation of
the analysis undertaken, and the conclusions derived from the analysis,
for actions and projects recommended for state participation, as well
as those actions and projects considered, but not recommended. The
department shall update and report the plan to the transportation
commission and the transportation committees of the house of
representatives and senate by October 1st each year. The department
shall monitor any circumstance with a foreseeable impact on the plan,
and advise the transportation commission and the transportation
committees of the house of representatives and senate by February 15th
each year regarding any changed circumstances that affect the plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 By December 15th each year, the
transportation commission shall report to the transportation committees
of the house of representatives and senate the commission's concurrence
or disagreement with the advisability of the actions and projects
recommended by the department of transportation in the plan developed
by the department under section 3 of this act. The commission shall
base its determinations on the priorities identified in section 1 of
this act, and an evaluation of each action or project according to the
methodology developed as part of the statewide rail capacity and needs
study finalized in December 2006. If the commission finds that certain
actions or projects do not appear within the department's plan, but
warrant consideration, then the commission shall report its own
analysis of the action or project to the transportation committees of
the house of representatives and senate.

Sec. 5 RCW 47.06A.020 and 2005 c 319 s 125 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board shall:
(a) Adopt rules and procedures necessary to implement the freight
mobility strategic investment program;
(b) Solicit from public entities proposed projects that meet
eligibility criteria established in accordance with subsection (4) of
this section; and
(c) Review and evaluate project applications based on criteria
established under this section, and prioritize and select projects
comprising a portfolio to be funded in part with grants from state
funds appropriated for the freight mobility strategic investment
program. In determining the appropriate level of state funding for a
project, the board shall ensure that state funds are allocated to
leverage the greatest amount of partnership funding possible. After
selecting projects comprising the portfolio, the board shall submit
them as part of its budget request to the office of financial
management and the legislature, and by August 1st each year, the board
shall provide a copy of its portfolio of selected projects to the
department and the commission. The board shall ensure that projects
submitted as part of the portfolio are not more appropriately funded
with other federal, state, or local government funding mechanisms or
programs. The board shall reject those projects that appear to improve
overall general mobility with limited enhancement for freight mobility.
The department shall consider the portfolio furnished by the board
in developing and updating the state's plan for participation in rail
infrastructure improvements, and the commission shall consider the
portfolio furnished by the board when reviewing the department's plan
and making recommendations to the legislature under section 4 of this
act. The board shall provide periodic progress reports on its
activities to the office of financial management and the senate and
house transportation committees.
(2) The board may:
(a) Accept from any state or federal agency, loans or grants for
the financing of any transportation project and enter into agreements
with any such agency concerning the loans or grants;
(b) Provide technical assistance to project applicants;
(c) Accept any gifts, grants, or loans of funds, property, or
financial, or other aid in any form from any other source on any terms
and conditions which are not in conflict with this chapter;
(d) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as necessary to carry out
the purposes of this chapter; and
(e) Do all things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers
expressly granted or implied under this chapter.
(3) The board shall designate strategic freight corridors within
the state. The board shall update the list of designated strategic
corridors not less than every two years, and shall establish a method
of collecting and verifying data, including information on city and
county-owned roadways.
(4) The board shall utilize threshold project eligibility criteria
that, at a minimum, includes the following:
(a) The project must be on a strategic freight corridor;
(b) The project must meet one of the following conditions:
(i) It is primarily aimed at reducing identified barriers to
freight movement with only incidental benefits to general or personal
mobility; or
(ii) It is primarily aimed at increasing capacity for the movement
of freight with only incidental benefits to general or personal
mobility; or
(iii) It is primarily aimed at mitigating the impact on communities
of increasing freight movement, including roadway/railway conflicts;
((and))
(c) The project must have a total public benefit/total public cost
ratio of equal to or greater than one; and
(d) To the greatest extent possible, the project must be consistent
with the benefit/impact analysis developed by the department and
freight stakeholders under section 3 of this act, and address the
legislative priorities identified in section 1 of this act.
(5) From June 11, 1998, through the biennium ending June 30, 2001,
the board shall use the multicriteria analysis and scoring framework
for evaluating and ranking eligible freight mobility and freight
mitigation projects developed by the freight mobility project
prioritization committee and contained in the January 16, 1998, report
entitled "Project Eligibility, Priority and Selection Process for a
Strategic Freight Investment Program." The prioritization process
shall measure the degree to which projects address important program
objectives and shall generate a project score that reflects a project's
priority compared to other projects. The board shall assign scoring
points to each criterion that indicate the relative importance of the
criterion in the overall determination of project priority. After June
30, 2001, the board may supplement and refine the initial project
priority criteria and scoring framework developed by the freight
mobility project prioritization committee as expertise and experience
is gained in administering the freight mobility program.
(6) It is the intent of the legislature that each freight mobility
project contained in the project portfolio submitted by the board
utilize the greatest amount of nonstate funding possible. The board
shall adopt rules that give preference to projects that contain the
greatest levels of financial participation from nonprogram fund
sources. The board shall consider twenty percent as the minimum
partnership contribution, but shall also ensure that there are
provisions allowing exceptions for projects that are located in areas
where minimal local funding capacity exists or where the magnitude of
the project makes the adopted partnership contribution financially
unfeasible.
(7) The board shall develop and recommend policies that address
operational improvements that primarily benefit and enhance freight
movement, including, but not limited to, policies that reduce
congestion in truck lanes at border crossings and weigh stations and
provide for access to ports during nonpeak hours.

Sec. 6 RCW 47.76.240 and 1995 c 380 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The state, counties, local communities, ports, railroads, labor,
and shippers all benefit from continuation of rail service and should
participate in its preservation. Lines that provide benefits to the
state and local jurisdictions, such as avoided roadway costs, reduced
traffic congestion, economic development potential, environmental
protection, and safety, should be assisted through the joint efforts of
the state, local jurisdictions, and the private sector.
State funding for rail service, rail preservation, and corridor
preservation projects must benefit the state's interests. The state's
((interest is served by reducing public roadway maintenance and repair
costs, increasing economic development opportunities, increasing
domestic and international trade, preserving jobs, and enhancing
safety. State funding for projects is contingent upon appropriate
local jurisdiction and private sector participation and cooperation.
Before spending state moneys on projects the department shall seek
federal, local, and private funding and participation to the greatest
extent possible)) participation in rail infrastructure improvements is
governed by chapter 47.-- RCW (created in section 7 of this act).
(1) The department of transportation shall continue to monitor the
status of the state's mainline and branchline common carrier railroads
and preserved rail corridors through the state rail plan and various
analyses, and shall seek alternatives to abandonment prior to
interstate commerce commission proceedings, where feasible.
(2) The utilities and transportation commission shall intervene in
interstate commerce commission proceedings on abandonments, when
necessary, to protect the state's interest.
(3) The department of transportation, in consultation with the
Washington state freight rail policy advisory committee, shall
establish criteria for evaluating rail projects and corridors of
significance to the state.
(4) Local jurisdictions may implement rail service preservation
projects in the absence of state participation.
(5) The department of transportation shall continue to monitor
projects for which it provides assistance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 47 RCW.

--- END ---