BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Autism spectrum disorder is a complex developmental disability
that typically appears during the first three years of life;
(2) As many as one million five hundred thousand Americans are
believed to have some form of autism;
(3) Autistic behaviors not only make life difficult for people with
autism but also make life hard for their families, health care
providers, and teachers;
(4) Early intervention is critical for affected children to gain
maximum benefit from current therapies;
(5) Washington lacks the capacity to adequately provide autism
spectrum disorder diagnostic services, coordinated care, and trained
professionals who can serve individuals with autism spectrum disorder
across the lifespan from birth through adulthood;
(6) Serious gaps occur at all levels and in all regions of the
state making it difficult for families to obtain timely diagnoses or
services for their child;
(7) Access to diagnostic services and therapies varies
considerably. Families living in rural areas have to travel long
distances to get a diagnosis and appropriate treatment. Even in urban
areas where more services and autism spectrum disorder trained
providers are available, waiting lists are long; and
(8) Effective and timely intervention requires local treatment
options.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish the regional centers for
Washington individuals with autism program. In establishing the
program, the department shall:
(a) Establish regional centers in targeted areas of the state to:
(i) Provide diagnostic services and therapies;
(ii) Train parents and professionals;
(iii) Coordinate with currently available services;
(iv) Address gaps in services; and
(v) Promote a medical home to assure culturally effective,
comprehensive health care;
(b) Confer with the caring for Washington individuals with autism
task force, established in chapter 259, Laws of 2005, on the
implementation of the regional centers for Washington individuals with
autism program;
(c) Expand one existing regional center and locate at least one new
regional center in western Washington and expand one existing regional
center and locate at least two new regional centers in eastern
Washington.
(2) Regional centers shall work in partnership with existing
service providers and supports to provide:
(a) Training to parents and family members, physicians, teachers,
and other allied health professionals;
(b) Technical assistance to schools, adult day programs, and
community agencies in the region;
(c) Flexible form of support and training to enable children to
stay in their own homes;
(d) Seamless, wrap-around services that promote independence and
promote inclusion and community integration. Such services shall be
coordinated and multidisciplinary and include:
(i) Diagnostic services to children and families;
(ii) Evidence-based therapies such as speech, occupational therapy,
effective education, counseling, individual and group therapy, and
applied behavioral analysis;
(iii) Family and individual supports, including respite care;
(iv) After school programs;
(v) Social skills training;
(vi) Recreation and athletic opportunities;
(vii) Employment programs and job coaching;
(viii) Companion home opportunities for adults with autism spectrum
disorder; and
(ix) Transition support; and
(e) Web-based distance learning and telemedicine services.
(3) Regional centers shall develop consortia of care to minimize
duplication of services.

--- END ---