BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the service and
sacrifices of our veterans and their families have ensured the security
and way of life for this state and for this nation. The legislature
further finds that the state has an obligation to help ensure that all
veterans have a proper burial service. However, the legislature also
finds that there has been significant difficulty providing military
honors for veterans buried in private cemeteries. It is the intent of
the legislature to help provide for the performance of military honors
at all funeral services for veterans.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 72.36 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall ensure that provision is made for all eligible
veterans buried in Washington state to receive military funeral honors.
The department is authorized to implement this section through
interagency contracts with the Washington military department or by
other appropriate means.

--- END ---