BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I: FINDINGS AND INTENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS. The legislature
finds that:
(1) The people of Washington have expressed strong concerns about
health care costs and access to needed health services. Even if
currently insured, they are not confident that they will continue to
have health insurance coverage in the future and feel that they are
getting less, but spending more.
(2) Many employers, especially small employers, struggle with the
cost of providing employer-sponsored health insurance coverage to their
employees, while others are unable to offer employer-sponsored health
insurance due to its high cost. In addition, small employers continue
to invest a significant amount of their time in the health insurance
business as they are the lone gateway to coverage for their employees.
This is time better served meeting their customers' needs and
fulfilling the many demands and challenges of our ever-changing
marketplace. Even after much research has been done by the employer to
secure a health benefit plan that works for everyone, it is, too often,
that some individuals are forced into a choice of health care coverage
they would have never made on their own, if given that chance.
(3) Six hundred thousand Washingtonians are uninsured.
Three-quarters work or have a working family member; two-thirds are low
income; and one-half are young adults. Many are low-wage workers who
are not offered, or eligible for, employer-sponsored coverage. Others
struggle with the burden of paying their share of the costs of
employer-sponsored health insurance, while still others turn down their
employer's offer of coverage due to its costs.
(4) Lack of portability remains a constant problem as thousands of
Washington residents go uninsured every year simply because they are
temporarily between jobs or their new job does not offer an affordable
option for them. In addition, two-income earner families are punished
by the system as they are forced to choose one employer's health
insurance plan over another without a chance to collect premium
contributions from both.
(5) Access to health insurance and other health care spending has
resulted in improved health for many Washingtonians. Yet, we are not
receiving as much value as we should for each health care dollar spent
in Washington state. By failing to sufficiently focus our efforts on
prevention and management of chronic diseases, such as diabetes,
asthma, and heart disease, too many Washingtonians suffer from
complications of their illnesses. By failing to make health insurance
coverage affordable for low-wage workers and self-employed people,
health problems that could be treated in a doctor's office are treated
in the emergency room or hospital. By failing to focus on the most
effective ways to maintain our health and treat disease, Washingtonians
have not made lifestyle changes proven to improve health, nor do they
receive the most effective care.
(6) There are very few incentives for young adults, nineteen
through thirty years old, to purchase their own health coverage.
Young, healthy adults are often quoted rates that are incongruent with
their level of risk and do not make financial sense when they look at
the cost benefit ratio. By failing to offer the right incentives for
this population to enroll in a health insurance plan, we have created
layers of problems such as increased uncompensated care and less
preventative care being sought.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 LEGISLATIVE INTENT. The legislature
intends, through the public/private partnership reflected in this act,
to improve our current health care system so that:
(1) Health insurance coverage is more affordable for employers,
employees, self-employed people, and other individuals;
(2) The process of choosing and purchasing health insurance
coverage is well-informed, clearer, and simpler;
(3) Prevention, chronic care management, wellness, and improved
quality of care are a fundamental part of our health care system;
(4) Administrative costs at every level are reduced;
(5) As a result of these changes, more people in Washington state
have access to affordable health insurance coverage and health outcomes
in Washington state are improved; and
(6) More insurance coverage choices are available to all health
consumers.

PART II: HEALTH INSURANCE CONNECTOR
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Basic health plan" means the program administered under
chapter 70.47 RCW.
(2) "Carrier" means a carrier as defined in RCW 48.43.005.
(3) "Commissioner" means the insurance commissioner established
under RCW 48.02.010.
(4) "Connector" means the Washington state health insurance
connector established in section 203 of this act.
(5) "Connector board" and "board" means the board of the Washington
state health insurance connector established in section 204 of this
act.
(6) "Eligible individual" means an individual who is eligible to
participate in the connector by reason of meeting one or more of the
following qualifications:
(a) The individual is a Washington resident, meaning that the
individual is, and continues to be, legally domiciled and physically
residing on a permanent and full-time basis in a place of permanent
habitation in Washington that remains the person's principal residence
and from which the person is absent only for temporary or transitory
purposes. A person who is a full-time student attending an institution
outside of Washington may maintain his or her Washington residency;
(b) The individual is not a Washington resident but is employed, at
least twenty hours a week on a regular basis, at a Washington location
by a bona fide employer, and the individual's employer does not offer
a group health insurance plan, or the individual is not eligible to
participate in any group health insurance plan offered by the
individual's employer;
(c) The individual, whether a resident or not, is enrolled in, or
eligible to enroll in, a participating employer plan;
(d) The individual is self-employed in Washington, and if a
nonresident self-employed individual, the individual's principal place
of business is in Washington;
(e) The individual is a full-time student attending an institution
of higher education located in Washington;
(f) The individual, whether a resident or not, is a dependent of
another individual who is an eligible individual;
(g) The individual is eligible for benefits under section 210 of
the federal trade act of 2002, at 26 U.S.C. Sec. 35(c).
(7) "Eligible employer" means any individual, partnership,
association, corporation, business trust, or person or group of persons
employing one or more persons, and filing payroll tax information on
each person.
(8) "Executive director" means an individual appointed by a vote of
the connector board to serve as the secretary of administration and
finance for the connector board.
(9) "Health plan" or "health benefit plan" means a health plan or
health benefit plan as defined in RCW 48.43.005.
(10) "Participating individual" means a person who has been
determined by the connector to be, and continues to be, an eligible
individual or an employee of a participating employer plan for purposes
of obtaining coverage through the connector.
(11) "Participating employer plan" means a group health plan, as
defined in federal law, Sec. 706 of ERISA (29 U.S.C. Sec. 1186), that
is sponsored by an employer and for which the plan sponsor has entered
into an agreement with the connector, in accordance with the provisions
of section 207 of this act, for the connector to offer and administer
health insurance benefits for enrollees in the plan.
(12) "Preexisting condition" means a preexisting condition as
defined in RCW 48.43.005.
(13) "Premium assistance payment" means a payment made to carriers
by the connector as provided in section 208 of this act.

Sec. 202 RCW 41.05.021 and 2006 c 103 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1))) The Washington state health care authority is created
within the executive branch. The authority shall have an administrator
appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate. The
administrator shall serve at the pleasure of the governor. The
administrator may employ up to seven staff members, who shall be exempt
from chapter 41.06 RCW, and any additional staff members as are
necessary to administer this chapter. The administrator may delegate
any power or duty vested in him or her by this chapter, including
authority to make final decisions and enter final orders in hearings
conducted under chapter 34.05 RCW. The primary duties of the authority
shall be to: Administer state employees' insurance benefits and
retired or disabled school employees' insurance benefits; administer
the basic health plan pursuant to chapter 70.47 RCW; study state-purchased health care programs in order to maximize cost containment in
these programs while ensuring access to quality health care; and
implement state initiatives, joint purchasing strategies, and
techniques for efficient administration that have potential application
to all state-purchased health services. The authority's duties
include, but are not limited to, the following:
(((a))) (1) To administer health care benefit programs for
employees and retired or disabled school employees as specifically
authorized in RCW 41.05.065 and in accordance with the methods
described in RCW 41.05.075, 41.05.140, and other provisions of this
chapter;
(((b))) (2) To analyze state-purchased health care programs and to
explore options for cost containment and delivery alternatives for
those programs that are consistent with the purposes of those programs,
including, but not limited to:
(((i))) (a) Creation of economic incentives for the persons for
whom the state purchases health care to appropriately utilize and
purchase health care services, including the development of flexible
benefit plans to offset increases in individual financial
responsibility;
(((ii))) (b) Utilization of provider arrangements that encourage
cost containment, including but not limited to prepaid delivery
systems, utilization review, and prospective payment methods, and that
ensure access to quality care, including assuring reasonable access to
local providers, especially for employees residing in rural areas;
(((iii))) (c) Coordination of state agency efforts to purchase
drugs effectively as provided in RCW 70.14.050;
(((iv))) (d) Development of recommendations and methods for
purchasing medical equipment and supporting services on a volume
discount basis;
(((v))) (e) Development of data systems to obtain utilization data
from state-purchased health care programs in order to identify cost
centers, utilization patterns, provider and hospital practice patterns,
and procedure costs, utilizing the information obtained pursuant to RCW
41.05.031; and
(((vi))) (f) In collaboration with other state agencies that
administer state purchased health care programs, private health care
purchasers, health care facilities, providers, and carriers:
(((A))) (i) Use evidence-based medicine principles to develop
common performance measures and implement financial incentives in
contracts with insuring entities, health care facilities, and providers
that:
(((I))) (A) Reward improvements in health outcomes for individuals
with chronic diseases, increased utilization of appropriate preventive
health services, and reductions in medical errors; and
(((II))) (B) Increase, through appropriate incentives to insuring
entities, health care facilities, and providers, the adoption and use
of information technology that contributes to improved health outcomes,
better coordination of care, and decreased medical errors;
(((B))) (ii) Through state health purchasing, reimbursement, or
pilot strategies, promote and increase the adoption of health
information technology systems, including electronic medical records,
by hospitals as defined in RCW 70.41.020(4), integrated delivery
systems, and providers that:
(((I))) (A) Facilitate diagnosis or treatment;
(((II))) (B) Reduce unnecessary duplication of medical tests;
(((III))) (C) Promote efficient electronic physician order entry;
(((IV))) (D) Increase access to health information for consumers
and their providers; and
(((V))) (E) Improve health outcomes;
(((C))) (iii) Coordinate a strategy for the adoption of health
information technology systems using the final health information
technology report and recommendations developed under chapter 261, Laws
of 2005((.));
(((c))) (3) To analyze areas of public and private health care
interaction;
(((d))) (4) To provide information and technical and administrative
assistance to the board;
(((e))) (5) To review and approve or deny applications from
counties, municipalities, and other political subdivisions of the state
to provide state-sponsored insurance or self-insurance programs to
their employees in accordance with the provisions of RCW 41.04.205,
setting the premium contribution for approved groups as outlined in RCW
41.05.050;
(((f))) (6) To establish billing procedures and collect funds from
school districts in a way that minimizes the administrative burden on
districts;
(((g))) (7) To publish and distribute to nonparticipating school
districts and educational service districts by October 1st of each year
a description of health care benefit plans available through the
authority and the estimated cost if school districts and educational
service district employees were enrolled;
(((h))) (8) To facilitate and cooperate with the Washington state
health insurance connector established in section 203 of this act as
follows:
(a) Establish, if the connector board finds it necessary, a risk
adjustment mechanism for premiums paid to carriers;
(b) Establish and manage a system for determining eligibility for
premium assistance payments and remitting premium assistance payments
to the carriers in accordance with the health insurance connector;
(9) To apply for, receive, and accept grants, gifts, and other
payments, including property and service, from any governmental or
other public or private entity or person, and make arrangements as to
the use of these receipts to implement initiatives and strategies
developed under this section; and
(((i))) (10) To promulgate and adopt rules consistent with this
chapter as described in RCW 41.05.160.
(((2) On and after January 1, 1996, the public employees' benefits
board may implement strategies to promote managed competition among
employee health benefit plans. Strategies may include but are not
limited to:
(a) Standardizing the benefit package;
(b) Soliciting competitive bids for the benefit package;
(c) Limiting the state's contribution to a percent of the lowest
priced qualified plan within a geographical area;
(d) Monitoring the impact of the approach under this subsection
with regards to: Efficiencies in health service delivery, cost shifts
to subscribers, access to and choice of managed care plans statewide,
and quality of health services. The health care authority shall also
advise on the value of administering a benchmark employer-managed plan
to promote competition among managed care plans.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 (1) There is hereby established by the
state of Washington the Washington state health insurance connector as
a body corporate and an independent instrumentality of the state of
Washington, created to serve public purposes provided for in this act,
but with legal existence separate from that of the state of Washington.
(2) The connector is hereby recognized as a not-for-profit
corporation in accordance with the provisions of Title 24 RCW, and
shall seek recognition of the same status by the United States in
accordance with the provisions of the United States internal revenue
code, 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c).
(3) The limited purpose of the connector is to facilitate the
availability, portability, choice, and adoption of private health
insurance plans to eligible individuals and groups, as provided in this
chapter.
(4) The connector shall be administered by the executive director
and governed by the Washington state health insurance connector board
established in section 204 of this act.
(5) The board shall appoint an executive director to serve as the
secretary of administration and finance for the connector and shall
grant him or her the following powers and duties:
(a) Plan, direct, coordinate, and execute administrative functions
in conformity with the policies and directives of the board;
(b) Employ professional and clerical staff as necessary;
(c) Report to the board on all operations under his or her control
and supervision;
(d) Prepare an annual budget and manage the administrative expenses
of the connector; and
(e) Undertake any other activities necessary to implement the
powers and duties set forth in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 (1) The Washington state health insurance
connector board is hereby established. The function of the board is to
develop and approve policies necessary for operation of the Washington
state health insurance connector.
(2) The connector board shall be composed of seventeen voting
members initially appointed by the governor as follows:
(a) A member in good standing of the American academy of actuaries;
(b) A health economist;
(c) Two representatives of small businesses;
(d) Two employee health plan benefits specialists;
(e) Two representatives of health care consumers;
(f) A physician licensed in good standing under chapter 18.57 RCW;
(g) A health insurance broker licensed in good standing under
chapter 48.17 RCW;
(h) A representative of organized labor;
(i) A representative of business associations;
(j) A representative from the association of Washington health care
plans;
(k) The assistant secretary of the department of social and health
services, health recovery services administration, ex officio;
(l) The insurance commissioner, ex officio;
(m) The administrator of the health care authority, ex officio; and
(n) The executive director, ex officio.
(3) The governor shall appoint the initial members of the board to
staggered terms not to exceed four years. Members appointed or elected
thereafter shall serve two-year terms. Members of the board shall be
compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.250 and shall be reimbursed
for their travel expenses while on official business in accordance with
RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. The board shall prescribe rules for the
conduct of its business. The executive director shall serve as chair
of the board. Meetings of the board shall be at the call of the chair.
(4) The board may establish technical advisory committees or seek
the advice of technical experts when necessary to execute the powers
and duties included in section 205 of this act.
(5) Upon the end of each corresponding term of service for such
positions as are to be prescribed, the board shall provide rules and
guidelines, such as they are necessary, for the nomination and
selection of industry representatives by their peers for the following
ten board positions:
(a) Two representatives of small businesses;
(b) Two employee health plan specialists;
(c) Two representatives of health care consumers;
(d) A physician licensed in good standing under chapter 18.57 RCW;
(e) A health insurance broker licensed in good standing under
chapter 48.17 RCW;
(f) A representative of organized labor; and
(g) A representative of trade associations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 The connector board has the following
duties and powers:
(1) Establish procedures for the enrollment of eligible individuals
and groups, including:
(a) Publicizing the existence of the connector and disseminating
information on eligibility requirements and enrollment procedures for
the connector;
(b) Establishing procedures to determine each applicant's
eligibility for purchasing insurance offered by the connector,
including a standard application form for eligible individuals and
groups seeking to purchase health insurance through the connector, as
well as persons seeking a premium assistance payment. The application
shall include information necessary to determine an applicant's
eligibility, previous health insurance coverage history, and payment
method;
(c) Establishing rules related to minimum participation of
employees in groups seeking to purchase health insurance through the
connector;
(d) Preparing and distributing certificate of eligibility forms and
application forms to insurance brokers and the general public; and
(e) Establishing and administering procedures for the election of
coverage by participating individuals during open enrollment periods
and outside of open enrollment periods upon the occurrence of any
qualifying event specified in the federal health insurance portability
and accountability act of 1996 or applicable state law. The procedures
shall include preparing and distributing to participating individuals:
(i) Descriptions of the coverage, benefits, limitations,
copayments, and premiums for all participating plans; and
(ii) Forms and instructions for electing coverage and arranging
payment for coverage;
(2) Establish and manage a system of collecting and transmitting to
the applicable carriers all premium payments or contributions made by
or on behalf of participating individuals, including developing
mechanisms to receive and process automatic payroll deductions for
participating individuals enrolled in employer plans;
(3) Establish a plan for operating a health insurance service
center to provide eligible individuals and employers with information
on the connector and manage connector enrollment, and for publicizing
the existence of the connector and the connector's eligibility
requirements and enrollment procedures;
(4) Establish other procedures for operations of the connector,
including but not limited to procedures to:
(a) Seek and receive any grant funding from the federal government,
departments or agencies of the state, and private foundations;
(b) Contract with professional service firms as may be necessary in
the board's judgment, and to fix their compensation;
(c) Contract with companies which provide third-party
administrative and billing services for insurance products;
(d) Charge and equitably apportion among participating institutions
its administrative costs and expenses incurred in the exercise of the
powers and duties granted by this chapter;
(e) Adopt bylaws for the regulation of its affairs and the conduct
of its business;
(f) Sue and be sued in its own name, plead, and be impleaded;
(g) Establish lines of credit, and establish one or more cash and
investment accounts to receive payments for services rendered and
appropriations from the state, and for all other business activity
granted by this chapter except to the extent otherwise limited by any
applicable provision of the employee retirement income security act of
1974; and
(h) Enter into interdepartmental agreements with the office of the
insurance commissioner, department of social and health services,
health care authority, and any other state agencies the board deems
necessary to implement this chapter; and
(5) Begin offering access to health benefit plans under this act on
September 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 ENROLLMENT AND COVERAGE ELECTION. Any
eligible individual may apply to participate in the connector. An
employer, a labor union, or an educational, professional, civic, trade,
church, or social organization that has eligible individuals as
employees or members may apply on behalf of those eligible persons.
Upon determination by the connector that an individual is eligible to
participate in the connector, he or she may enroll in a health plan
offered through the connector during the next open enrollment period
or, outside of open enrollment periods, upon the occurrence of any
qualifying event specified in the federal health insurance portability
and accountability act of 1996 or applicable state law. The initial
open enrollment period is September 1, 2008, through November 30, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207 PARTICIPATING EMPLOYER PLANS. (1) Any
employer may apply to the connector to be the sponsor of a
participating employer plan.
(2) Any employer seeking to be the sponsor of a participating
employer plan shall, as a condition of participation in the connector,
enter into a binding agreement with the connector that includes the
following conditions:
(a) The sponsoring employer designates the connector to be the
plan's administrator for the employer's group health plan, and the
connector agrees to undertake the obligations required of a plan
administrator under federal law;
(b) Any individual eligible to participate in the connector by
reason of his or her eligibility for coverage under the employer's
participating employer plan, regardless of whether any such individual
would otherwise qualify as an eligible individual if not enrolled in
the participating employer plan, may elect coverage under any health
plan offered through the connector, and neither the employer nor the
connector shall limit such individual's choice of coverage from among
all the health plans offered;
(c) The employer agrees that, for the term of the agreement, the
employer will not offer to individuals eligible to participate in the
connector by reason of their eligibility for coverage under the
employer's participating employer plan any separate or competing health
plan, regardless of whether any such individuals would otherwise
qualify as eligible individuals if not enrolled in the participating
employer plan;
(d) The employer reserves the right to offer benefits supplemental
to the benefits offered through the connector, but any supplemental
benefits offered by the employer shall constitute a separate plan or
plans under federal law, for which the executive director shall not be
the plan administrator and for which neither the executive director nor
the connector shall be responsible in any manner;
(e) The employer reserves the right to determine the criteria for
eligibility and enrollment in the participating employer plan and the
terms and amounts of the employer's contributions to that plan, so long
as for the term of the agreement with the connector the employer agrees
not to alter or amend any criteria or contribution amounts at any time
other than during an annual period designated by the connector for
participating employer plans to make such changes in conjunction with
the connector's annual open enrollment period;
(f) The employer agrees to make available to the connector any of
the employer's documents, records, or information, including copies of
the employer's federal and state tax and wage reports, that the
executive director reasonably determines are necessary for the
connector to verify:
(i) That the employer is in compliance with the terms of its
agreement with the connector governing the employer's sponsorship of a
participating employer plan;
(ii) That the participating employer plan is in compliance with
applicable laws relating to employee welfare benefit plans,
particularly those relating to nondiscrimination in coverage; and
(iii) The eligibility, under the terms of the employer's plan, of
those individuals enrolled in the participating employer plan;
(g) The employer agrees to also sponsor a "cafeteria plan" as
permitted under federal law, 26 U.S.C. Sec. 125, for all employees
eligible for coverage under the employer's participating employer plan.
(3) Beginning on January 1, 2009, the state of Washington shall
enter into an agreement with the connector to be the sponsor of a
participating employer plan on behalf of all individuals eligible for
health insurance benefits paid in whole or in part by the state of
Washington by reason of current or past employment by the state, or by
reason of being a dependent of such an individual, except for any
individuals who are eligible only for benefits consisting solely of
coverage of expected benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208 CONNECTOR PREMIUM ASSISTANCE PROGRAM. (1)
The connector shall provide the basic and underlying administrative
functions for the premium assistance program established in this
section and remit premium assistance payments to carriers offering
health plans through the connector. All eligibility, regulatory, and
programmatic decisions shall be made by the health care authority, and
such information shall be shared with the connector board as deemed
necessary.
(2) Beginning January 1, 2009, the administrator of the health care
authority shall accept applications for premium assistance from
eligible individuals and employees of participating employer plans who
have family income up to two hundred percent of the federal poverty
level, as determined annually by the federal department of health and
human services, on behalf of themselves, their spouses, and their
dependent children.
(3) The health care authority shall design and implement a schedule
of premium assistance payments that is based upon gross family income,
giving appropriate consideration to family size and the ages of all
family members. The benchmark plan for purposes of designing the
premium assistance payment schedule shall be in conformity with the
average quality of benefits covered in the top three subscribed plans
in the individual insurance market as of January 1, 2007. After
January 1, 2009, the benchmark plan for purposes of the premium
assistance payment schedule shall be adjusted in conformity with the
top three subscribed plans in the connector.
The premium assistance schedule shall be applied to eligible
individuals, and to the employee premium obligation remaining after
employer premium contributions for employees of participating employer
plans, so that employees benefit financially from their employers'
contribution to the cost of their coverage through the connector. Any
surcharge included in the premium under section 211 of this act shall
be included when determining the appropriate level of premium
assistance payments.
(4) A financial sponsor may, with the prior approval of the
executive director, pay the premium or any other amount on behalf of an
eligible individual or employee of a participating employer plan, by
arrangement with the individual or employee and through a mechanism
acceptable to the executive director. The executive director shall
establish a mechanism for receiving premium payments from the United
States internal revenue service for eligible individuals who are
eligible for benefits under section 210 of the federal trade act of
2002, at 26 U.S.C. Sec. 35(c).
(5) The connector shall remit the premium assistance in an amount
determined under subsection (3) of this section to the carrier offering
the health plan in which the eligible individual or employee of a
participating employer plan has chosen to enroll. If, however, such
individual or employee has chosen to enroll in a high deductible health
plan, any difference between the amount of premium assistance that the
individual or employee would receive and the applicable premium rate
for the high deductible health plan shall be deposited into a health
savings account for the benefit of that individual or employee.
(6) As of January 1, 2009, all basic health plan enrollees under
chapter 70.47 RCW shall transition to the premium assistance program.
The health care authority shall provide information and assistance
necessary to allow enrollees to successfully transition to the premium
assistance program, including assistance with enrolling in the
connector and choosing a health plan during the 2008 open enrollment
period.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 209 CONNECTOR PREMIUM ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT. The
connector premium assistance account is hereby established in the
custody of the state treasurer. Any nongeneral fund--state funds
collected for the connector premium assistance program shall be
deposited in the connector premium assistance account. Moneys in the
account shall be used exclusively for the purposes of administering the
connector premium assistance account, including payments to carriers on
behalf of eligible individuals and employees of participating employer
plans. Only the executive director may authorize expenditures from the
account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 210 BROKER COMMISSIONS. (1) When an eligible
individual or eligible group is enrolled in the connector by a health
insurance broker or solicitor licensed under chapter 48.17 RCW, the
connector shall pay the broker a commission determined by the connector
board. In setting the commission, the connector board shall consider
rates of commissions paid to brokers for health plans issued under
chapters 48.21, 48.44, and 48.46 RCW as of January 1, 2007.
(2) In cases where a membership organization enrolls in the
connector its eligible members, or the eligible members of its member
entities, the plan chosen by each individual shall pay the organization
a fee equal to the commission specified in subsection (1) of this
section. Nothing in this section shall be deemed either to require a
membership organization that enrolls persons in the connector to be
licensed by Washington as an insurance broker, or to permit such an
organization to provide any other services requiring licensure as an
insurance broker without first obtaining such license.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 211 SURCHARGE FOR CONNECTOR EXPENSES. (1) The
connector is authorized to apply a surcharge to all health benefit
plans, which shall be used only to pay for administrative and
operational expenses of the connector. Such a surcharge shall be
applied uniformly to all health benefit plans offered through the
connector and shall be included in the premium for each health plan.
As part of the premium, the surcharge shall be subject to the premium
tax under RCW 48.14.020. These surcharges shall not be used to pay any
premium assistance payments under this chapter.
(2) Each carrier participating in the connector shall be required
to furnish such reasonable reports as the board determines necessary to
enable the executive director to carry out his or her duties under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 212 FINANCIAL REPORT. The connector shall
keep an accurate account of all its activities and of all its receipts
and expenditures and shall annually make a report as of the end of its
fiscal year to its board, to the governor, and to the legislature, such
reports to be in a form prescribed by the board. The board may
investigate the affairs of the connector, may severally examine the
properties and records of the connector, and may prescribe methods of
accounting and the rendering of periodical reports in relation to
projects undertaken by the connector. The connector shall be subject
to biennial audit by the state auditor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 213 REPORTS. No later than two years after
the connector begins operation and every year thereafter, the connector
shall conduct a study of the connector and the persons enrolled in the
connector and shall submit a written report to the governor and the
legislature on the status and activities of the connector based on data
collected in the study. The report shall also be available to the
general public. The study shall review:
(1) The operation and administration of the connector, including
surveys and reports of health benefit plans available to participating
individuals and on the experience of the plans. The experience on the
plans shall include data on enrollees in the connector, the operation
and administration of the connector premium assistance program,
expenses, claims statistics, complaints data, how the connector met its
goals, and other information deemed pertinent by the connector; and
(2) Any significant observations regarding utilization and adoption
of the connector.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 214 REPORT ON MEDICAID AND STATE CHILDREN'S
HEALTH INSURANCE PROGRAM ENROLLEE PARTICIPATION IN THE CONNECTOR. On
or before September 1, 2010, the Washington state institute for public
policy in cooperation with the connector board shall prepare a report
and shall make recommendations regarding the participation of
categorically needy medicaid and state children's health insurance
program enrollees in the connector. The report shall be submitted to
the governor, the secretary of the department of social and health
services, and relevant committees of the legislature. The report shall
examine the following issues:
(1) The impact of medicaid and state children's health insurance
program enrollees participating in the connector, with respect to the
utilization of services and cost of health plans offered through the
connector;
(2) Whether any distinction should be made between adult and child
enrollees;
(3) The need for a new section 1115 waiver from the federal
government for moving a sizable portion of the medicaid and state
children's health insurance program population into a defined
contribution model;
(4) A study of other states that have attempted similar reforms
involving a defined contribution model within their medicaid population
and whether any ideas should be incorporated to facilitate the move of
enrollees to the connector;
(5) Whether any cost savings to the state would result from the
incorporation of medicaid and state children's health insurance program
enrollees to the connector;
(6) The effect any such move would have on the premiums of current
connector enrollees;
(7) The capacity of participating carriers in the connector to
properly manage the care of medicaid and state children's health
insurance program enrollees;
(8) The impact of expanded choice and cost sharing on medicaid
enrollees;
(9) What specific categories of categorically needy medicaid and
state children's health insurance program enrollees, if any, should be
excluded from participation in the connector; and
(10) If the board recommends participation of any medicaid eligible
citizens in the connector, how the composition of the board should be
modified to reflect their participation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 215 RULES. The executive director may adopt
any rules necessary to implement this chapter.

PART III: INSURANCE REGULATION OF HEALTH BENEFIT PLANS
OFFERED THROUGH THE CONNECTOR
Sec. 301 RCW 48.43.005 and 2006 c 25 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless otherwise specifically provided, the definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Adjusted community rate" means the rating method used to
establish the premium for health plans adjusted to reflect actuarially
demonstrated differences in utilization or cost attributable to
geographic region, age, family size, and use of wellness activities.
(2) "Basic health plan" means the plan described under chapter
70.47 RCW, as revised from time to time.
(3) "Basic health plan model plan" means a health plan as required
in RCW 70.47.060(2)(e).
(4) "Basic health plan services" means that schedule of covered
health services, including the description of how those benefits are to
be administered, that are required to be delivered to an enrollee under
the basic health plan, as revised from time to time.
(5) "Catastrophic health plan" means:
(a) In the case of a contract, agreement, or policy covering a
single enrollee, a health benefit plan requiring a calendar year
deductible of, at a minimum, one thousand five hundred dollars and an
annual out-of-pocket expense required to be paid under the plan (other
than for premiums) for covered benefits of at least three thousand
dollars; and
(b) In the case of a contract, agreement, or policy covering more
than one enrollee, a health benefit plan requiring a calendar year
deductible of, at a minimum, three thousand dollars and an annual out-of-pocket expense required to be paid under the plan (other than for
premiums) for covered benefits of at least five thousand five hundred
dollars; or
(c) Any health benefit plan that provides benefits for hospital
inpatient and outpatient services, professional and prescription drugs
provided in conjunction with such hospital inpatient and outpatient
services, and excludes or substantially limits outpatient physician
services and those services usually provided in an office setting.
(6) "Certification" means a determination by a review organization
that an admission, extension of stay, or other health care service or
procedure has been reviewed and, based on the information provided,
meets the clinical requirements for medical necessity, appropriateness,
level of care, or effectiveness under the auspices of the applicable
health benefit plan.
(7) "Concurrent review" means utilization review conducted during
a patient's hospital stay or course of treatment.
(8) "Connector" means the Washington state health insurance
connector established in sections 203 through 205 of this act.
(9) "Covered person" or "enrollee" means a person covered by a
health plan including an enrollee, subscriber, policyholder,
beneficiary of a group plan, or individual covered by any other health
plan.
(((9))) (10) "Creditable coverage" means continual coverage of the
applicant under any of the following health plans, with no lapse in
coverage of more than sixty-three days immediately prior to the date of
application:
(a) A group health plan;
(b) Health insurance coverage;
(c) Part A or Part B of Title XVIII of the social security act,
approved July 30, 1965 (79 Stat. 291; 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395c et seq. or
1395j et seq., respectively);
(d) Title XIX of the social security act, approved July 30, 1965
(79 Stat. 343; 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.), other than coverage
consisting solely of benefits under section 1928;
(e) Chapter 55 of Title 10, United States Code (10 U.S.C. Sec. 1071
et seq.);
(f) A medical care program of the Indian health service or of a
tribal organization;
(g) A state health benefits risk pool;
(h) A health plan offered under Chapter 89 of Title 5, United
States Code (5 U.S.C. Sec. 8901 et seq.);
(i) The basic health plan as established in chapter 70.47 RCW;
(j) The health insurance pool as established in chapter 48.41 RCW;
(k) A health benefit plan under section 5(e) of the peace corps act
(22 U.S.C. Sec. 2504(e)); or
(l) Any other qualifying coverage required by the health insurance
portability and accountability act of 1996 (HIPAA, Title II), as it may
be amended, or regulations under that act.
(11) "Dependent" means, at a minimum, the enrollee's legal spouse
and unmarried dependent children who qualify for coverage under the
enrollee's health benefit plan.
(((10))) (12) "Eligible employee" means an employee who works on a
full-time basis with a normal work week of thirty or more hours. The
term includes a self-employed individual, including a sole proprietor,
a partner of a partnership, and may include an independent contractor,
if the self-employed individual, sole proprietor, partner, or
independent contractor is included as an employee under a health
benefit plan of a small employer, but does not work less than thirty
hours per week and derives at least seventy-five percent of his or her
income from a trade or business through which he or she has attempted
to earn taxable income and for which he or she has filed the
appropriate internal revenue service form. Persons covered under a
health benefit plan pursuant to the consolidated omnibus budget
reconciliation act of 1986 shall not be considered eligible employees
for purposes of minimum participation requirements of chapter 265, Laws
of 1995.
(((11))) (13) "Eligible individual" means an individual, including
a sole proprietor, who is a resident of Washington state. "Eligible
individual" includes any individual who is eligible for benefits under
section 210 of the federal trade act of 2002, at 26 U.S.C. Sec. 35(c).
(14) "Emergency medical condition" means the emergent and acute
onset of a symptom or symptoms, including severe pain, that would lead
a prudent layperson acting reasonably to believe that a health
condition exists that requires immediate medical attention, if failure
to provide medical attention would result in serious impairment to
bodily functions or serious dysfunction of a bodily organ or part, or
would place the person's health in serious jeopardy.
(((12))) (15) "Emergency services" means otherwise covered health
care services medically necessary to evaluate and treat an emergency
medical condition, provided in a hospital emergency department.
(((13))) (16) "Enrollee point-of-service cost-sharing" means
amounts paid to health carriers directly providing services, health
care providers, or health care facilities by enrollees and may include
copayments, coinsurance, or deductibles.
(((14))) (17) "Grievance" means a written complaint submitted by or
on behalf of a covered person regarding: (a) Denial of payment for
medical services or nonprovision of medical services included in the
covered person's health benefit plan, or (b) service delivery issues
other than denial of payment for medical services or nonprovision of
medical services, including dissatisfaction with medical care, waiting
time for medical services, provider or staff attitude or demeanor, or
dissatisfaction with service provided by the health carrier.
(((15))) (18) "Health care facility" or "facility" means hospices
licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW, hospitals licensed under chapter
70.41 RCW, rural health care facilities as defined in RCW 70.175.020,
psychiatric hospitals licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW, nursing homes
licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW, community mental health centers
licensed under chapter 71.05 or 71.24 RCW, kidney disease treatment
centers licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW, ambulatory diagnostic,
treatment, or surgical facilities licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW,
drug and alcohol treatment facilities licensed under chapter 70.96A
RCW, and home health agencies licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW, and
includes such facilities if owned and operated by a political
subdivision or instrumentality of the state and such other facilities
as required by federal law and implementing regulations.
(((16))) (19) "Health care provider" or "provider" means:
(a) A person regulated under Title 18 or chapter 70.127 RCW, to
practice health or health-related services or otherwise practicing
health care services in this state consistent with state law; or
(b) An employee or agent of a person described in (a) of this
subsection, acting in the course and scope of his or her employment.
(((17))) (20) "Health care service" means that service offered or
provided by health care facilities and health care providers relating
to the prevention, cure, or treatment of illness, injury, or disease.
(((18))) (21) "Health carrier" or "carrier" means a disability
insurer regulated under chapter 48.20 or 48.21 RCW, a health care
service contractor as defined in RCW 48.44.010, or a health maintenance
organization as defined in RCW 48.46.020.
(((19))) (22) "Health plan" or "health benefit plan" means any
policy, contract, or agreement offered by a health carrier to provide,
arrange, reimburse, or pay for health care services except the
following:
(a) Long-term care insurance governed by chapter 48.84 RCW;
(b) Medicare supplemental health insurance governed by chapter
48.66 RCW;
(c) Coverage supplemental to the coverage provided under chapter
55, Title 10, United States Code;
(d) Limited health care services offered by limited health care
service contractors in accordance with RCW 48.44.035;
(e) Disability income;
(f) Coverage incidental to a property/casualty liability insurance
policy such as automobile personal injury protection coverage and
homeowner guest medical;
(g) Workers' compensation coverage;
(h) Accident only coverage;
(i) Specified disease and hospital confinement indemnity when
marketed solely as a supplement to a health plan;
(j) Employer-sponsored self-funded health plans;
(k) Dental only and vision only coverage; and
(l) Plans deemed by the insurance commissioner to have a short-term
limited purpose or duration, or to be a student-only plan that is
guaranteed renewable while the covered person is enrolled as a regular
full-time undergraduate or graduate student at an accredited higher
education institution, after a written request for such classification
by the carrier and subsequent written approval by the insurance
commissioner.
(((20))) (23) "Material modification" means a change in the
actuarial value of the health plan as modified of more than five
percent but less than fifteen percent.
(((21))) (24) "Participating individual" means a person who has
been determined by the connector to be, and continues to be, an
eligible individual, an employee of a participating employer plan, or
a member of an association health plan for purposes of obtaining
coverage through the connector. As used in this section, "association
health plan" includes health plans offered through associations,
trusts, and member-governed groups.
(25) "Participating employer plan" means a group health plan, as
defined in federal law, Sec. 706 of ERISA (29 U.S.C. Sec. 1186), that
is sponsored by an employer and for which the plan sponsor has entered
into an agreement with the connector, in accordance with the provisions
of section 207 of this act, for the connector to offer and administer
health insurance benefits for enrollees in the plan.
(26) "Preexisting condition" means any medical condition, illness,
or injury that existed any time prior to the effective date of
coverage.
(((22))) (27) "Premium" means all sums charged, received, or
deposited by a health carrier as consideration for a health plan or the
continuance of a health plan. Any assessment or any "membership,"
"policy," "contract," "service," or similar fee or charge made by a
health carrier in consideration for a health plan is deemed part of the
premium. "Premium" shall not include amounts paid as enrollee point-of-service cost-sharing.
(((23))) (28) "Review organization" means a disability insurer
regulated under chapter 48.20 or 48.21 RCW, health care service
contractor as defined in RCW 48.44.010, or health maintenance
organization as defined in RCW 48.46.020, and entities affiliated with,
under contract with, or acting on behalf of a health carrier to perform
a utilization review.
(((24))) (29) "Small employer" or "small group" means any person,
firm, corporation, partnership, association, political subdivision,
sole proprietor, or self-employed individual that is actively engaged
in business that, on at least fifty percent of its working days during
the preceding calendar quarter, employed at least two but no more than
fifty eligible employees, with a normal work week of thirty or more
hours, the majority of whom were employed within this state, and is not
formed primarily for purposes of buying health insurance and in which
a bona fide employer-employee relationship exists. In determining the
number of eligible employees, companies that are affiliated companies,
or that are eligible to file a combined tax return for purposes of
taxation by this state, shall be considered an employer. Subsequent to
the issuance of a health plan to a small employer and for the purpose
of determining eligibility, the size of a small employer shall be
determined annually. Except as otherwise specifically provided, a
small employer shall continue to be considered a small employer until
the plan anniversary following the date the small employer no longer
meets the requirements of this definition. A self-employed individual
or sole proprietor must derive at least seventy-five percent of his or
her income from a trade or business through which the individual or
sole proprietor has attempted to earn taxable income and for which he
or she has filed the appropriate internal revenue service form 1040,
schedule C or F, for the previous taxable year except for a self-employed individual or sole proprietor in an agricultural trade or
business, who must derive at least fifty-one percent of his or her
income from the trade or business through which the individual or sole
proprietor has attempted to earn taxable income and for which he or she
has filed the appropriate internal revenue service form 1040, for the
previous taxable year. A self-employed individual or sole proprietor
who is covered as a group of one on the day prior to June 10, 2004,
shall also be considered a "small employer" to the extent that
individual or group of one is entitled to have his or her coverage
renewed as provided in RCW 48.43.035(6).
(((25))) (30) "Utilization review" means the prospective,
concurrent, or retrospective assessment of the necessity and
appropriateness of the allocation of health care resources and services
of a provider or facility, given or proposed to be given to an enrollee
or group of enrollees.
(((26))) (31) "Wellness activity" means an explicit program of an
activity consistent with department of health guidelines, such as,
smoking cessation, injury and accident prevention, reduction of alcohol
misuse, appropriate weight reduction, exercise, automobile and
motorcycle safety, blood cholesterol reduction, and nutrition education
for the purpose of improving enrollee health status and reducing health
service costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 CERTIFICATION OF HEALTH BENEFIT PLANS BY
THE OFFICE OF THE INSURANCE COMMISSIONER. (1) Health benefit plans
offered through the connector established in section 203 of this act
shall be filed with the office of the insurance commissioner.
(2) No health benefit plan may be offered through the connector
unless the commissioner has first certified to the connector that:
(a) The carrier seeking to offer the plan is an admitted carrier in
Washington state and is in good standing with the office of the
insurance commissioner;
(b) The plan meets the rating specifications under section 303 of
this act, the preexisting condition provisions under RCW 48.43.015 and
48.43.025, the issue and renewal provisions of RCW 48.43.035, and the
requirements of this section; and
(c) The plan and the carrier are in compliance with all other
applicable Washington state laws.
(3) No plan shall be certified that excludes from coverage any
individual otherwise determined by the connector as meeting the
eligibility requirements for participating individuals.
(4) Each certification shall be valid for a uniform term of at
least one year, but may be made automatically renewable from term to
term in the absence of notice of either:
(a) Withdrawal by the commissioner; or
(b) Discontinuation of participation in the connector by the
carrier.
(5) Certification of a plan may be withdrawn only after notice to
the carrier and opportunity for hearing. The commissioner may,
however, decline to renew the certification of any carrier at the end
of a certification term.
(6) Each plan certified by the commissioner as eligible to be
offered through the connector shall contain a detailed description of
benefits offered including maximums, limitations, exclusions, and other
benefit limits.
(7) The connector shall not decline or refuse to offer, or
otherwise restrict the offering to any participating individual, any
plan that has obtained, in a timely fashion in advance of the annual
open season, certification by the commissioner in accordance with the
provisions of this section.
(8) The connector shall not impose on any participating plan or any
carrier or plan seeking to participate in the connector any terms or
conditions, including any requirements or agreements with respect to
rates or benefits, beyond, or in addition to, those terms and
conditions established and imposed by the commissioner in certifying
plans under the provisions of this section.
(9) The commissioner shall establish and administer, rules and
procedures for certifying plans to participate in the connector, in
accordance with the provisions of this section.
(10) Nothing in this section precludes an association or member-governed group from offering a commissioner-approved plan for purchase
by its members in the connector such that:
(a) Member-governed and association plans are not permitted to
exclude other eligible connector enrollees from obtaining coverage
through the plan; and
(b) Member-governed groups and associations may provide a secondary
level of membership for a nominal monthly fee that allows participation
in said plan by nonmembers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 HEALTH PLAN RATING METHODOLOGY. Premium
rates for health benefit plans sold through the connector are subject
to the following provisions:
(1)(a) An insurer offering any health benefit plan through the
connector may offer and actively market a health benefit plan featuring
a limited schedule of covered health care services. Nothing in this
subsection precludes an insurer from offering, or a consumer from
purchasing, other health benefit plans that may have more comprehensive
benefits than those included in the product offered under this
subsection. An insurer offering a health benefit plan under this
subsection shall clearly disclose all covered benefits to consumers in
a brochure filed with the insurance commissioner.
(b) A health benefit plan offered under this subsection shall
provide coverage for hospital expenses and services rendered by a
physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW but is not subject
to the requirements of RCW 48.21.130, 48.21.140, 48.21.141, 48.21.142,
48.21.144, 48.21.146, 48.21.160 through 48.21.197, 48.21.200,
48.21.220, 48.21.225, 48.21.230, 48.21.235, 48.21.240, 48.21.244,
48.21.250, 48.21.300, 48.21.310, or 48.21.320.
(2) Nothing in this section prohibits an insurer from offering, or
a purchaser from seeking, health benefit plans with benefits in excess
of the health benefit plan offered under subsection (1) of this
section. All forms, policies, and contracts shall be submitted for
approval to the commissioner, and the rates of any plan offered under
this section shall be reasonable in relation to the benefits thereto.
(3) The carrier shall develop its rates based on an adjusted
community rate and may only vary the adjusted community rate for:
(a) Geographic area;
(b) Family size;
(c) Age; and
(d) Wellness activities.
(4) The adjustment for age in subsection (3)(c) of this section may
not use age brackets smaller than five-year increments, which shall
begin with age twenty and end with age sixty-five. Participating
individuals under the age of twenty shall be treated as those age
twenty.
(5) The contractor shall be permitted to develop separate rates for
individuals age sixty-five or older for coverage for which medicare is
the primary payer and coverage for which medicare is not the primary
payer. Both rates are subject to the requirements of this section.
(6) The permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than
four hundred twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups.
(7) A discount for wellness activities is permitted to reflect
actuarially justified differences in utilization or cost attributed to
such programs.
(8) Rating factors shall produce premiums for identical eligible
individuals that differ only by the amounts attributable to plan
design, with the exception of discounts for health improvement
programs.
(9)(a) Except to the extent provided otherwise in (b) of this
subsection, adjusted community rates established under this section
shall pool the medical experience of all eligible individuals
purchasing coverage through the connector. However, annual rate
adjustments for each health benefit plan offered through the connector
may vary by up to plus or minus six percentage points from the overall
adjustment of a carrier's entire pool. In addition, high deductible
health plans with health savings accounts are allowed a variance of
plus four or minus eight percentage points from the overall adjustment
of a carrier's entire pool. Any such overall adjustment is to be
approved by the insurance commissioner, upon a showing by the carrier,
certified by a member of the American academy of actuaries that: (i)
The variation is a result of deductible leverage, benefit design, or
provider network characteristics; and (ii) for a rate renewal period,
the projected weighted average of all benefit plans will have a revenue
neutral effect on the carrier's connector clients. Variations of
greater than six percentage points or minus eight percentage points for
high deductible health plans with health savings accounts, are subject
to review by the commissioner, and must be approved or denied within
sixty days of submittal. A variation that is not denied within sixty
days shall be deemed approved. The commissioner must provide to the
carrier a detailed actuarial justification for any denial within thirty
days of the denial.
(b) Carriers may treat persons under age thirty as a separate
experience pool for purposes of establishing rates for health plans
approved by the commissioner and available in the connector. The rates
charged for this age group are not subject to subsection (6) of this
section.

Sec. 304 RCW 48.43.012 and 2001 c 196 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1))) No carrier may reject an individual for ((an individual))
a health benefit plan through the connector established in section 203
of this act based upon preexisting conditions of the individual except
as provided in RCW 48.43.018.
(((2) No carrier may deny, exclude, or otherwise limit coverage for
an individual's preexisting health conditions except as provided in
this section.
(3) For an individual health benefit plan originally issued on or
after March 23, 2000, preexisting condition waiting periods imposed
upon a person enrolling in an individual health benefit plan shall be
no more than nine months for a preexisting condition for which medical
advice was given, for which a health care provider recommended or
provided treatment, or for which a prudent layperson would have sought
advice or treatment, within six months prior to the effective date of
the plan. No carrier may impose a preexisting condition waiting period
on an individual health benefit plan issued to an eligible individual
as defined in section 2741(b) of the federal health insurance
portability and accountability act of 1996 (42 U.S.C. 300gg-41(b)).
(4) Individual health benefit plan preexisting condition waiting
periods shall not apply to prenatal care services.
(5) No carrier may avoid the requirements of this section through
the creation of a new rate classification or the modification of an
existing rate classification. A new or changed rate classification
will be deemed an attempt to avoid the provisions of this section if
the new or changed classification would substantially discourage
applications for coverage from individuals who are higher than average
health risks. These provisions apply only to individuals who are
Washington residents.))

Sec. 305 RCW 48.43.015 and 2004 c 192 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For a health benefit plan offered to a group or through the
connector established in sections 203 through 205 of this act, every
health carrier shall reduce any preexisting condition exclusion,
limitation, or waiting period in the group health plan in accordance
with the provisions of section 2701 of the federal health insurance
portability and accountability act of 1996 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300gg).
(2) For a health benefit plan offered to a group other than a small
group:
(a) If the individual applicant's immediately preceding health plan
coverage terminated during the period beginning ninety days and ending
sixty-four days before the date of application for the new plan and
such coverage was similar and continuous for at least three months,
then the carrier shall not impose a waiting period for coverage of
preexisting conditions under the new health plan.
(b) If the individual applicant's immediately preceding health plan
coverage terminated during the period beginning ninety days and ending
sixty-four days before the date of application for the new plan and
such coverage was similar and continuous for less than three months,
then the carrier shall credit the time covered under the immediately
preceding health plan toward any preexisting condition waiting period
under the new health plan.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection, a preceding health plan
includes an employer-provided self-funded health plan, the basic health
plan's offering to health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees as
established by chapter 192, Laws of 2004, and plans of the Washington
state health insurance pool.
(3) For a health benefit plan offered ((to a small group)) through
the connector established in sections 203 through 205 of this act:
(a) If the individual applicant's immediately preceding health plan
coverage terminated during the period beginning ninety days and ending
sixty-four days before the date of application for the new plan and
such coverage was similar and continuous for at least nine months, then
the carrier shall not impose a waiting period for coverage of
preexisting conditions under the new health plan.
(b) If the individual applicant's immediately preceding health plan
coverage terminated during the period beginning ninety days and ending
sixty-four days before the date of application for the new plan and
such coverage was similar and continuous for less than nine months,
then the carrier shall credit the time covered under the immediately
preceding health plan toward any preexisting condition waiting period
under the new health plan.
(c) For the purpose of this subsection, a preceding health plan
includes an employer-provided self-funded health plan, the basic health
plan's offering to health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees as
established by chapter 192, Laws of 2004, and plans of the Washington
state health insurance pool.
(4) ((For a health benefit plan offered to an individual, other
than an individual to whom subsection (5) of this section applies,
every health carrier shall credit any preexisting condition waiting
period in that plan for a person who was enrolled at any time during
the sixty-three day period immediately preceding the date of
application for the new health plan in a group health benefit plan or
an individual health benefit plan, other than a catastrophic health
plan, and (a) the benefits under the previous plan provide equivalent
or greater overall benefit coverage than that provided in the health
benefit plan the individual seeks to purchase; or (b) the person is
seeking an individual health benefit plan due to his or her change of
residence from one geographic area in Washington state to another
geographic area in Washington state where his or her current health
plan is not offered, if application for coverage is made within ninety
days of relocation; or (c) the person is seeking an individual health
benefit plan: (i) Because a health care provider with whom he or she
has an established care relationship and from whom he or she has
received treatment within the past twelve months is no longer part of
the carrier's provider network under his or her existing Washington
individual health benefit plan; and (ii) his or her health care
provider is part of another carrier's provider network; and (iii)
application for a health benefit plan under that carrier's provider
network individual coverage is made within ninety days of his or her
provider leaving the previous carrier's provider network. The carrier
must credit the period of coverage the person was continuously covered
under the immediately preceding health plan toward the waiting period
of the new health plan. For the purposes of this subsection (4), a
preceding health plan includes an employer-provided self-funded health
plan, the basic health plan's offering to health coverage tax credit
eligible enrollees as established by chapter 192, Laws of 2004, and
plans of the Washington state health insurance pool.
(5) Every health carrier shall waive any preexisting condition
waiting period in its individual plans for a person who is an eligible
individual as defined in section 2741(b) of the federal health
insurance portability and accountability act of 1996 (42 U.S.C. Sec.
300gg-41(b)).
(6))) Subject to the provisions of subsections (1) through (((5)))
(3) of this section, nothing contained in this section requires a
health carrier to amend a health plan to provide new benefits in its
existing health plans. In addition, nothing in this section requires
a carrier to waive benefit limitations not related to an individual or
group's preexisting conditions or health history.

Sec. 306 RCW 48.43.018 and 2004 c 244 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in (a) through (e) of this subsection, ((a
health carrier may)) the connector established in section 203 of this
act shall require any person applying ((for)) as an individual,
separate from an employer-based health plan, for a health benefit plan,
to complete the standard health questionnaire designated under chapter
48.41 RCW. The health questionnaire shall be kept by the connector and
shall be provided upon the request of any carrier receiving an
application from an individual, separate from any employer plan, for
coverage, and without such individual providing proof of creditable
coverage lasting eighteen consecutive months or more.
(a) If a person is seeking ((an individual)) a health benefit plan
due to his or her change of residence from one geographic area in
Washington state to another geographic area in Washington state where
his or her current health plan is not offered, completion of the
standard health questionnaire shall not be a condition of coverage if
application for coverage is made within ninety days of relocation.
(b) If a person is seeking ((an individual)) a health benefit plan:
(i) Because a health care provider with whom he or she has an
established care relationship and from whom he or she has received
treatment within the past twelve months is no longer part of the
carrier's provider network under his or her existing Washington
((individual)) health benefit plan; and
(ii) His or her health care provider is part of another carrier's
provider network; and
(iii) Application for a health benefit plan under that carrier's
provider network ((individual)) coverage is made within ninety days of
his or her provider leaving the previous carrier's provider network;
then completion of the standard health questionnaire shall not be a
condition of coverage.
(c) If a person is seeking ((an individual)) a health benefit plan
due to his or her having exhausted continuation coverage provided under
29 U.S.C. Sec. 1161 et seq., completion of the standard health
questionnaire shall not be a condition of coverage if application for
coverage is made within ninety days of exhaustion of continuation
coverage. A health carrier shall accept an application without a
standard health questionnaire from a person currently covered by such
continuation coverage if application is made within ninety days prior
to the date the continuation coverage would be exhausted and the
effective date of the individual coverage applied for is the date the
continuation coverage would be exhausted, or within ninety days
thereafter.
(d) If a person is seeking ((an individual)) a health benefit plan
due to his or her receiving notice that his or her coverage under a
conversion contract is discontinued, completion of the standard health
questionnaire shall not be a condition of coverage if application for
coverage is made within ninety days of discontinuation of eligibility
under the conversion contract. A health carrier shall accept an
application without a standard health questionnaire from a person
currently covered by such conversion contract if application is made
within ninety days prior to the date eligibility under the conversion
contract would be discontinued and the effective date of the
((individual)) coverage applied for is the date eligibility under the
conversion contract would be discontinued, or within ninety days
thereafter.
(e) If a person is seeking ((an individual)) a health benefit plan
and, but for the number of persons employed by his or her employer,
would have qualified for continuation coverage provided under 29 U.S.C.
Sec. 1161 et seq., completion of the standard health questionnaire
shall not be a condition of coverage if: (i) Application for coverage
is made within ninety days of a qualifying event as defined in 29
U.S.C. Sec. 1163; and (ii) the person had at least twenty-four months
of continuous group coverage immediately prior to the qualifying event.
A health carrier shall accept an application without a standard health
questionnaire from a person with at least twenty-four months of
continuous group coverage if application is made no more than ninety
days prior to the date of a qualifying event and the effective date of
the individual coverage applied for is the date of the qualifying
event, or within ninety days thereafter.
(2) If, based upon the results of the standard health
questionnaire, the person qualifies for coverage under the Washington
state health insurance pool, the following shall apply:
(a) The carrier may decide not to accept the person's application
for enrollment in its ((individual)) health benefit plan; and
(b) Within fifteen business days of receipt of a completed
application, the carrier shall provide written notice of the decision
not to accept the person's application for enrollment to both the
person and the administrator of the Washington state health insurance
pool. The notice to the person shall state that the person is eligible
for health insurance provided by the Washington state health insurance
pool, and shall include information about the Washington state health
insurance pool and an application for such coverage. If the carrier
does not provide or postmark such notice within fifteen business days,
the application is deemed approved.
(3) If the person applying for ((an individual)) a health benefit
plan: (a) Does not qualify for coverage under the Washington state
health insurance pool based upon the results of the standard health
questionnaire; (b) does qualify for coverage under the Washington state
health insurance pool based upon the results of the standard health
questionnaire and the carrier elects to accept the person for
enrollment; or (c) is not required to complete the standard health
questionnaire designated under this chapter under subsection (1)(a) or
(b) of this section, the carrier shall accept the person for enrollment
if he or she resides within the carrier's service area and provide or
assure the provision of all covered services regardless of age, sex,
family structure, ethnicity, race, health condition, geographic
location, employment status, socioeconomic status, other condition or
situation, or the provisions of RCW 49.60.174(2). The commissioner may
grant a temporary exemption from this subsection if, upon application
by a health carrier, the commissioner finds that the clinical,
financial, or administrative capacity to serve existing enrollees will
be impaired if a health carrier is required to continue enrollment of
additional eligible individuals.

Sec. 307 RCW 48.43.025 and 2001 c 196 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For group health benefit plans for groups other than small
groups, no carrier may reject an individual for health plan coverage
based upon preexisting conditions of the individual and no carrier may
deny, exclude, or otherwise limit coverage for an individual's
preexisting health conditions; except that a carrier may impose a
three-month benefit waiting period for preexisting conditions for which
medical advice was given, or for which a health care provider
recommended or provided treatment within three months before the
effective date of coverage. Any preexisting condition waiting period
or limitation relating to pregnancy as a preexisting condition shall be
imposed only to the extent allowed in the federal health insurance
portability and accountability act of 1996.
(2) For group health benefit plans ((for small groups)) offered
through the connector established in sections 203 through 205 of this
act, no carrier may reject an individual for health plan coverage based
upon preexisting conditions of the individual and no carrier may deny,
exclude, or otherwise limit coverage for an individual's preexisting
health conditions. Except that a carrier may impose a nine-month
benefit waiting period for preexisting conditions for which medical
advice was given, or for which a health care provider recommended or
provided treatment within six months before the effective date of
coverage. Any preexisting condition waiting period or limitation
relating to pregnancy as a preexisting condition shall be imposed only
to the extent allowed in the federal health insurance portability and
accountability act of 1996.
(3) No carrier may avoid the requirements of this section through
the creation of a new rate classification or the modification of an
existing rate classification. A new or changed rate classification
will be deemed an attempt to avoid the provisions of this section if
the new or changed classification would substantially discourage
applications for coverage from individuals or groups who are higher
than average health risks. These provisions apply only to individuals
who are Washington residents.

Sec. 308 RCW 48.43.035 and 2004 c 244 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
For group health benefit plans and for health benefit plans offered
through the connector established in sections 203 through 205 of this
act, the following shall apply:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 48.43.018, all health carriers shall
accept for enrollment any state resident within the group to whom the
plan is offered and within the carrier's service area and provide or
assure the provision of all covered services regardless of age, sex,
family structure, ethnicity, race, health condition, geographic
location, employment status, socioeconomic status, other condition or
situation, or the provisions of RCW 49.60.174(2). The insurance
commissioner may grant a temporary exemption from this subsection, if,
upon application by a health carrier the commissioner finds that the
clinical, financial, or administrative capacity to serve existing
enrollees will be impaired if a health carrier is required to continue
enrollment of additional eligible individuals.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, all
health plans shall contain or incorporate by endorsement a guarantee of
the continuity of coverage of the plan. For the purposes of this
section, a plan is "renewed" when it is continued beyond the earliest
date upon which, at the carrier's sole option, the plan could have been
terminated for other than nonpayment of premium. The carrier may
consider the group's anniversary date as the renewal date for purposes
of complying with the provisions of this section.
(3) The guarantee of continuity of coverage required in health
plans shall not prevent a carrier from canceling or nonrenewing a
health plan for:
(a) Nonpayment of premium;
(b) Violation of published policies of the carrier approved by the
insurance commissioner;
(c) Covered persons entitled to become eligible for medicare
benefits by reason of age who fail to apply for a medicare supplement
plan or medicare cost, risk, or other plan offered by the carrier
pursuant to federal laws and regulations;
(d) Covered persons who fail to pay any deductible or copayment
amount owed to the carrier and not the provider of health care
services;
(e) Covered persons committing fraudulent acts as to the carrier;
(f) Covered persons who materially breach the health plan; or
(g) Change or implementation of federal or state laws that no
longer permit the continued offering of such coverage.
(4) The provisions of this section do not apply in the following
cases:
(a) A carrier has zero enrollment on a product;
(b) A carrier replaces a product and the replacement product is
provided to all covered persons within that class or line of business,
includes all of the services covered under the replaced product, and
does not significantly limit access to the kind of services covered
under the replaced product. The health plan may also allow
unrestricted conversion to a fully comparable product;
(c) No sooner than January 1, 2005, a carrier discontinues offering
a particular type of health benefit plan offered for groups of up to
two hundred if: (i) The carrier provides notice to each group of the
discontinuation at least ninety days prior to the date of the
discontinuation; (ii) the carrier offers to each group provided
coverage of this type the option to enroll, with regard to small
employer groups, in any other small employer group plan, or with regard
to groups of up to two hundred, in any other applicable group plan,
currently being offered by the carrier in the applicable group market;
and (iii) in exercising the option to discontinue coverage of this type
and in offering the option of coverage under (c)(ii) of this
subsection, the carrier acts uniformly without regard to any health
status-related factor of enrolled individuals or individuals who may
become eligible for this coverage;
(d) A carrier discontinues offering all health coverage in the
small group market or for groups of up to two hundred, or both markets,
in the state and discontinues coverage under all existing group health
benefit plans in the applicable market involved if: (i) The carrier
provides notice to the commissioner of its intent to discontinue
offering all such coverage in the state and its intent to discontinue
coverage under all such existing health benefit plans at least one
hundred eighty days prior to the date of the discontinuation of
coverage under all such existing health benefit plans; and (ii) the
carrier provides notice to each covered group of the intent to
discontinue the existing health benefit plan at least one hundred
eighty days prior to the date of discontinuation. In the case of
discontinuation under this subsection, the carrier may not issue any
group health coverage in this state in the applicable group market
involved for a five-year period beginning on the date of the
discontinuation of the last health benefit plan not so renewed. This
subsection (4) does not require a carrier to provide notice to the
commissioner of its intent to discontinue offering a health benefit
plan to new applicants when the carrier does not discontinue coverage
of existing enrollees under that health benefit plan; or
(e) A carrier is withdrawing from a service area or from a segment
of its service area because the carrier has demonstrated to the
insurance commissioner that the carrier's clinical, financial, or
administrative capacity to serve enrollees would be exceeded.
(5) The provisions of this section do not apply to health plans
deemed by the insurance commissioner to be unique or limited or have a
short-term purpose, after a written request for such classification by
the carrier and subsequent written approval by the insurance
commissioner.
(6) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the
guarantee of continuity of coverage applies to a group of one only if:
(a) The carrier continues to offer any other small employer group plan
in which the group of one was eligible to enroll on the day prior to
June 10, 2004; and (b) the person continues to qualify as a group of
one under the criteria in place on the day prior to June 10, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 309 INSURANCE MARKET CONSOLIDATION. (1) A
carrier shall not issue or renew an individual health benefit plan,
other than through the connector established in section 203 of this
act, after January 1, 2009.
(2) A carrier shall not issue or renew a small group health benefit
plan, including a plan offered through an association or
member-governed group whether or not formed specifically for the
purpose of purchasing health care, other than through the connector
established in section 203 of this act, after January 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 310 RULES. The commissioner may adopt any
rules necessary to implement this chapter.

PART IV: INDIVIDUAL RESPONSIBILITY
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 STATEMENT OF COVERAGE FORM. (1) Each
employer in Washington shall annually file with the commissioner a form
for each employee employed within Washington indicating the health
insurance coverage status of the employee and the employee's dependents
including the source of coverage and the name of the insurer or plan
sponsor and, if no coverage is indicated:
(a) The employee's election to, in lieu of insurance coverage, take
full personal responsibility for any and all health care-related
expenses incurred while without coverage, including but not limited to:
Preventative, emergency, and major medical services;
(b) The employee's election to apply, or not apply, for coverage
through the connector; and
(c) The employee's election to be considered, or not to be
considered, for any publicly financed health insurance program or
premium subsidy program administered by Washington.
(2) Each form shall be signed by the individual to whom it
pertains.
(3) Each self-employed individual in Washington shall annually file
the same form with the commissioner.
(4) The secretary of the department of social and health services
shall annually file the same form with the commissioner on behalf of
all individuals receiving medical assistance benefits through a state-funded program, excepting such individuals as who are also covered by
Part A or Part B of Title XVIII of the social security act (79 Stat.
291; 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395c et seq. or 1395j et seq., respectively).
(5) For purposes of this section, "health insurance coverage" does
not include any coverage consisting solely of one or more excepted
benefits.
(6) The commissioner shall prepare and distribute such forms.

PART V: HIGH-RISK TRANSFER POOL TASK FORCE
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 HIGH-RISK TRANSFER POOL TASK FORCE. (1)
The insurance market of Washington state can benefit from a more
effective model for transferring high-risk claims among health
insurance carriers.
(a) Carriers already pay for half of all high-risk claims through
assessments that go toward the health insurance pool;
(b) Consumers are asked to share in that responsibility with higher
premium costs; and
(c) Because they are the most directly affected by any high-risk
transfer system, carriers are best suited to develop and come to
agreement with the commissioner on a model that would effectively
balance risk among carriers but not artificially shift costs to
average-risk consumers or the state.
(2) On a date no later than September 1, 2007, the insurance
commissioner shall convene a high-risk transfer pool task force
consisting of representatives from each insurance carrier licensed to
sell health benefit plans in Washington state as of January 1, 2007.
(3) A series of meetings shall be held among all task force members
at a location to be determined by the commissioner. The following
parameters apply:
(a) Discussion shall be limited to risk transfer solutions that
minimize or exclude any state subsidy and preserve the affordability of
insurance products for all state residents; and
(b) Such discussion shall examine the potential for leveraging
additional federal funds for lower-income pool participants.
(4) In direct consultation with the commissioner, the task force
members shall develop a risk transfer proposal that will best serve the
connector, its carriers, and its enrollees for transferring high-risk
claims evenly among carriers.
(5) The task force shall consider active and proposed models from
other states that function to spread high risk in the most equitable
manner possible.
(6) The task force shall complete its work on a date no later than
January 1, 2008, and shall publish a final report for public
consumption.
(7) The final report shall be submitted to the house of
representatives and senate health care committees for expedient
consideration and further action.

PART VI: CONFORMING AMENDMENTS, REPEALERS, AND
EFFECTIVE DATES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 (1) Sections 102, 201, and 203 through 215
of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 41 RCW.
(2) Sections 302, 303, 309, and 310 of this act are each added to
chapter 48.43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602 Part headings and captions used in this
act are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed, effective January 1, 2009:
(1) RCW 48.01.260 (Health benefit plans -- Carriers -- Clarification)
and 2000 c 79 s 40;
(2) RCW 48.20.025 (Schedule of rates for individual health benefit
plans -- Loss ratio -- Remittance of premiums -- Definitions) and 2003 c 248
s 8, 2001 c 196 s 1, & 2000 c 79 s 3;
(3) RCW 48.20.028 (Calculation of premiums -- Adjusted community
rating method -- Definitions) and 2006 c 100 s 1, 2000 c 79 s 4, 1997 c
231 s 207, & 1995 c 265 s 13;
(4) RCW 48.20.029 (Calculation of premiums -- Members of a purchasing
pool--Adjusted community rating method--Definitions) and 2006 c 100 s
2;
(5) RCW 48.21.045 (Health plan benefits for small employers--Coverage -- Exemption from statutory requirements -- Premium rates--Requirements for providing coverage for small employers -- Definitions)
and 2004 c 244 s 1, 1995 c 265 s 14, & 1990 c 187 s 2;
(6) RCW 48.21.047 (Requirements for plans offered to small
employers -- Definitions) and 2005 c 223 s 11 & 1995 c 265 s 22;
(7) RCW 48.43.038 (Individual health plans -- Guarantee of continuity
of coverage--Exceptions) and 2000 c 79 s 25;
(8) RCW 48.43.041 (Individual health benefit plans -- Mandatory
benefits) and 2000 c 79 s 26;
(9) RCW 48.44.017 (Schedule of rates for individual contracts -- Loss
ratio -- Remittance of premiums -- Definitions) and 2001 c 196 s 11 & 2000
c 79 s 29;
(10) RCW 48.44.021 (Calculation of premiums -- Members of a
purchasing pool -- Adjusted community rating method -- Definitions) and
2006 c 100 s 4;
(11) RCW 48.44.022 (Calculation of premiums -- Adjusted community
rate -- Definitions) and 2006 c 100 s 3, 2004 c 244 s 6, 2000 c 79 s 30,
1997 c 231 s 208, & 1995 c 265 s 15;
(12) RCW 48.44.023 (Health plan benefits for small employers--Coverage -- Exemption from statutory requirements -- Premium rates--
Requirements for providing coverage for small employers) and 2004 c 244
s 7, 1995 c 265 s 16, & 1990 c 187 s 3;
(13) RCW 48.44.024 (Requirements for plans offered to small
employers -- Definitions) and 2003 c 248 s 15 & 1995 c 265 s 23;
(14) RCW 48.46.062 (Schedule of rates for individual agreements--Loss ratio -- Remittance of premiums -- Definitions) and 2001 c 196 s 12 &
2000 c 79 s 32;
(15) RCW 48.46.063 (Calculation of premiums--Members of a
purchasing pool -- Adjusted community rating method -- Definitions) and
2006 c 100 s 6;
(16) RCW 48.46.064 (Calculation of premiums -- Adjusted community
rate -- Definitions) and 2006 c 100 s 5, 2004 c 244 s 8, 2000 c 79 s 33,
1997 c 231 s 209, & 1995 c 265 s 17;
(17) RCW 48.46.066 (Health plan benefits for small employers--Coverage -- Exemption from statutory requirements -- Premium rates--Requirements for providing coverage for small employers) and 2004 c 244
s 9, 1995 c 265 s 18, & 1990 c 187 s 4;
(18) RCW 48.46.068 (Requirements for plans offered to small
employers -- Definitions) and 2003 c 248 s 16 & 1995 c 265 s 24;
(19) RCW 70.47A.010 (Finding -- Intent) and 2006 c 255 s 1;
(20) RCW 70.47A.020 (Definitions) and 2006 c 255 s 2;
(21) RCW 70.47A.030 (Program established -- Administrator duties) and
2006 c 255 s 3;
(22) RCW 70.47A.040 (Premium subsidies -- Enrollment verification,
status changes -- Administrator duties -- Rules) and 2006 c 255 s 4;
(23) RCW 70.47A.050 (Enrollment to remain within appropriation) and
2006 c 255 s 5;
(24) RCW 70.47A.060 (Rules) and 2006 c 255 s 6;
(25) RCW 70.47A.070 (Reports) and 2006 c 255 s 7;
(26) RCW 70.47A.080 (Small employer health insurance partnership
program account) and 2006 c 255 s 8;
(27) RCW 70.47A.090 (State children's health insurance program--Federal waiver request) and 2006 c 255 s 9; and
(28) RCW 70.47A.900 (Captions not law -- 2006 c 255) and 2006 c 255
s 11.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604 Sections 304 through 308 of this act take
effect January 1, 2009.

--- END ---