BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.32.260 and 2005 c 64 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any member whose public school service is interrupted by active
service to the United States as a member of its uniformed services, or
to the state of Washington, as a member of the legislature, may upon
becoming reemployed in the public schools, receive credit for that
service upon presenting satisfactory proof, and contributing to the
member reserve, either in a lump sum or installments, amounts
determined by the director. Except that no military service credit in
excess of five years shall be established or reestablished after July
1, 1961, unless the service was actually rendered during time of war.
This section shall be administered in a manner consistent with the
requirements of the federal uniformed services employment and
reemployment rights act.
(1) The surviving spouse or eligible child or children of a member
who left the employ of an employer to enter the uniformed services of
the United States and died while serving in the uniformed services may,
on behalf of the deceased member, apply for retirement system service
credit under this subsection up to the date of the member's death in
the uniformed services. The department shall establish the deceased
member's service credit if the surviving spouse or eligible child or
children:
(a) Provides to the director proof of the member's death while
serving in the uniformed services;
(b) Provides to the director proof of the member's honorable
service in the uniformed services prior to the date of death; and
(c) Pays the employee contributions required under chapter 41.45
RCW within five years of the date of death or prior to the distribution
of any benefit, whichever comes first.
(2) A member who leaves the employ of an employer to enter the
uniformed services of the United States and becomes totally
incapacitated for continued employment by an employer while serving in
the uniformed services is entitled to retirement system service credit
under this subsection up to the date of discharge from the uniformed
services if:
(a) The member obtains a determination from the director that he or
she is totally incapacitated for continued employment due to conditions
or events that occurred while serving in the uniformed services;
(b) The member provides to the director proof of honorable
discharge from the uniformed services; and
(c) The member pays the employee contributions required under
chapter 41.45 RCW within five years of the director's determination of
total disability or prior to the distribution of any benefit, whichever
comes first.
(3)(a) After completing twenty-five years of creditable service,
any member may have service in the armed forces that was performed
prior to membership in the retirement system credited to him or her as
a member. However, the total number of years of military service
credit from all sources, as authorized by any statute, may not exceed
five years. The member shall pay one-half of the actuarially
equivalent value of the increase in the member's benefit resulting from
the request for crediting of military service under this subsection, as
determined by the director. This payment must be made prior to
retirement.
(b) This section does not apply to any individual, not a veteran
within the meaning of RCW 41.04.005.

--- END ---