BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Notwithstanding the provisions of Title 77
RCW relating to wildlife, and section 2 through 9 of this act relating
to exotic animals, a city or county may prohibit by ordinance the
keeping of wildlife, as defined in RCW 77.08.010, and may prohibit by
ordinance the keeping of exotic animals as defined in section 2 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 As used in sections 1 through 9 of this act,
"exotic animal" means:
(1) Any member of the family Felidae not indigenous to Washington,
except the species Felis catus (domestic cat);
(2) Any nonhuman primate;
(3) Any wolf (Canis lupus);
(4) Any nonwolf member of the family Canidae not indigenous to
Washington, except the species Canis familiaris (domestic dog); and
(5) Any bear, except the black bear (Ursus americanus).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 It is the policy of this state that the
keeping of exotic animals be regulated so as to ensure the health,
welfare, and safety of those animals and to ensure the security of
facilities in which they are kept, so as to avoid undue physical or
financial risk to the public. It is the policy of this state that
regulation place no more burden upon the keepers of exotic animals than
is required to accomplish the purposes expressed in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A person who sells an exotic animal must,
prior to accepting the offer to purchase, provide the prospective
purchaser of the animal with informational material approved by the
department of agriculture regarding the care, husbandry, health, and
nutritional needs of the animal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The requirements for a permit in sections 6
and 9 of this act shall not apply to:
(1) A wildlife rehabilitation center operated under a valid permit
issued by the department of fish and wildlife under Title 77 RCW; or
(2) A facility operated under a valid license or registration
issued by the United States department of agriculture pursuant to the
federal animal welfare act of 1970 (7 U.S.C. Sec. 2133 or 2136).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 No person may keep an exotic animal in this
state unless, before acquiring the animal, the person possesses a valid
department of agriculture permit for that animal issued pursuant to
section 9 of this act. No person may keep an exotic animal in this
state for more than thirty days after the expiration, revocation, or
suspension of a permit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Any person who keeps an exotic animal shall
keep the animal under conditions of confinement or control that, given
the nature of the animal, would be imposed by a reasonable and prudent
keeper to avoid physical or financial risk to the public as a result of
escape of the animal or otherwise.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) A keeper of an exotic animal is strictly
liable for:
(a) Costs incurred by any person or city, county, or state agency
in attempting to remedy the animal's escape from custody;
(b) Personal injury, property damage, or similar loss directly or
indirectly caused by the animal's escape from custody, the lack of
custody over the animal, or efforts to remedy the animal's escape from
custody; and
(c) Personal injury directly caused by the animal while in custody.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, if an injury or
escape by an exotic animal is in whole or in part the result of a
willful unlawful act by a person other than the keeper, the keeper's
liability for damages resulting from the escape or injury is the amount
of total damages multiplied by the percentage of fault attributable to
the keeper's negligence.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) The department of agriculture shall
issue permits for the keeping of exotic animals, as defined in section
2 of this act.
(2) The department shall adopt reasonable rules for issuing permits
to keep exotic animals and establishing conditions thereof. The
conditions shall be directed toward ensuring the health, welfare, and
safety of the animals, and, where necessary, the security of facilities
in which the animals are kept so as to avoid undue physical or
financial risk to the public. The rules shall be no more restrictive
upon keepers of exotic animals than is reasonably necessary to carry
out subsection (1) of this section and the purposes of section 3 of
this act.
(3) A separate permit shall be required for each species of exotic
animal kept. A permit shall be valid for a period of two years from
the date of issue and may be renewed.
(4) The department may charge a fee for the issuance and renewal of
permits under this section. The fee shall not exceed three hundred
dollars for each issuance and one hundred dollars for each renewal.
(5) The department may revoke a permit upon finding a violation of
rules adopted under this section, or the department may issue a finding
of violation and a warning to remedy the violation by a specified date.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1 through 9 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 16 RCW.

--- END ---