BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that it is imperative
for Washington citizens to have access to an affordable higher
education. The legislature further finds that ever-increasing tuition
at state colleges and universities has made higher education
increasingly unaffordable for many families and students. The
legislature also finds that increasing tuition at state colleges and
universities has made family and student financial planning for higher
education difficult. It is the intent of the legislature to require
that tuition levels at state colleges and universities be stabilized
for families and students by freezing the tuition fee rates for full-time students at the level in effect on their first day of class.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.15.067 and 2006 c 161 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Tuition fees shall be established under the provisions of this
chapter.
(2) Beginning with the 2003-04 academic year and ending with the
2008-09 academic year, reductions or increases in full-time tuition
fees for resident undergraduates shall be as provided in the omnibus
appropriations act.
(3) Beginning with the 2003-04 academic year and ending with the
2008-09 academic year, the governing boards of the state universities,
the regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the state
board for community and technical colleges may reduce or increase full-time tuition fees for all students other than resident undergraduates,
including summer school students and students in other self-supporting
degree programs. Percentage increases in full-time tuition fees may
exceed the fiscal growth factor. Reductions or increases may be made
for all or portions of an institution's programs, campuses, courses, or
students.
(4) Academic year tuition for full-time students at the state's
institutions of higher education beginning with 2009-10, other than
summer term, shall be as charged during the 2008-09 academic year
unless different rates are adopted by the legislature.
(5) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to high school students enrolling in participating institutions of
higher education under RCW 28A.600.300 through 28A.600.400.
(6) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to eligible students enrolling in a community or technical college
under RCW 28C.04.610.
(7) For the academic years 2003-04 through 2008-09, the University
of Washington shall use an amount equivalent to ten percent of all
revenues received as a result of law school tuition increases beginning
in academic year 2000-01 through academic year 2008-09 to assist needy
low and middle income resident law students.
(8) For the academic years 2003-04 through 2008-09, institutions of
higher education shall use an amount equivalent to ten percent of all
revenues received as a result of graduate academic school tuition
increases beginning in academic year 2003-04 through academic year
2008-09 to assist needy low and middle-income resident graduate
academic students.
(9)(a) Beginning with the 2007-08 academic year, for the duration
of each full-time student's enrollment and full-time attendance at a
college or university, tuition fees for each full-time student shall
remain fixed at the rate in effect on the first day of the first
academic term in which that student is enrolled. Colleges and
universities may only make annual inflation adjustments to tuition fees
charged to each full-time student.
(b) For full-time students who have attended colleges or
universities before the 2007-08 academic year, tuition fees for each
full-time student shall remain fixed at the rate in effect on the first
day of the first academic term of the 2007-08 academic year. Colleges
and universities may only make annual inflation adjustments to tuition
fees charged to each full-time student.
(10) Subsection (9) of this section does not apply when a full-time
student withdraws from a college or university, transfers to a
different college or university, or relinquishes full-time status.
When a former full-time student later reenrolls as a full-time student,
tuition fees shall remain fixed at the rate in effect on the first day
of the first academic term of reenrollment as a full-time student.
When a full-time student transfers to a different college or
university, tuition fees shall remain fixed at the rate in effect on
the first day of the first academic term that the full-time student is
enrolled at that college or university. However, this subsection does
not apply if a full-time student withdraws from a college or
university, or relinquishes full-time status because of serious medical
illness or personal injury, or because of military service, including
national guard duty or reserve activation. Upon later reenrollment as
a full-time student, the student's tuition fees shall remain fixed at
the rate in effect on the first day of the first academic term
following the 2007-08 academic year that the full-time student was
enrolled at that college or university, pursuant to subsection (9) of
this section.
(11) Subsection (9) of this section does not apply when a full-time
student who has received an undergraduate degree at a college or
university is immediately enrolled as a full-time student in a graduate
degree program at the same college or university. When a full-time
student who has received an undergraduate degree at a college or
university is immediately enrolled as a full-time student in a graduate
degree program at the same college or university, tuition fees shall
remain fixed at the rate in effect on the first day of the first
academic term that the full-time student is enrolled in any graduate
program at that college or university. Colleges and universities may
only make annual inflation adjustments to tuition fees charged to each
full-time student.
(12) As used in this section, "inflation" means the percentage
change in the implicit price deflator for the United States for each
fiscal year as published by the federal bureau of labor statistics.

--- END ---