BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It is the policy of the state that the state wildlife account
be self-supporting and that the license and permit fee revenues to the
state wildlife account must be sufficient to fund the cost of the
department's programs that support those activities.
(2) For each statutory license or permit fee that references this
section, the commission shall periodically adjust the fee to ensure
that state wildlife account revenues are sufficient to fund these
activities. No fee may be increased by more than ten percent in any
calendar year without prior legislative approval.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.55 RCW
to read as follows:
By July 1, 2009, the department shall develop and implement a fee
schedule for hydraulic project permits issued by the department under
this chapter. The fees must be set at a level that is sufficient to
fund the cost of the hydraulic project permitting program, including
the department's costs incurred in monitoring and inspecting permitted
projects. The fees received by the department must be deposited into
the state wildlife account and may be expended exclusively for the
purposes of the hydraulic project permitting program.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.32.350 and 2002 c 283 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to a small game hunting license, a supplemental permit
or stamp is required to hunt for western Washington pheasant or
migratory birds.
(1) A western Washington pheasant permit is required to hunt for
pheasant in western Washington. Western Washington pheasant permits
must contain numbered spaces for recording the location and date of
harvest of each western Washington pheasant.
(2) The permit shall be available as a season option, a youth full
season option, or a three-day option. The fee for this permit is:
(a) For the resident and nonresident full season option, thirty-six
dollars;
(b) For the youth full season option, eighteen dollars;
(c) For the three-day option, twenty dollars.
(3) A migratory bird validation is required for all persons sixteen
years of age or older to hunt migratory birds. The fee for the
validation for hunters is ten dollars for residents and nonresidents.
The fee for the stamp for collectors is ten dollars.
(4) The migratory bird license must be validated at the time of
signature of the licensee.
(5) The fees specified in this section are subject to adjustment by
the commission under section 1 of this act.

Sec. 4 RCW 77.32.370 and 1998 c 191 s 26 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A special hunting season permit is required to hunt in each
special season established under chapter 77.12 RCW.
(2) Persons may apply for special hunting season permits as
provided by rule of the commission.
(3) The application fee to enter the drawing for a special hunting
permit is five dollars for residents, fifty dollars for nonresidents,
and three dollars for youth.
(4) The fees specified in this section are subject to adjustment by
the commission under section 1 of this act.

Sec. 5 RCW 77.32.380 and 2003 c 317 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Persons who enter upon or use clearly identified department
improved access facilities with a motor vehicle may be required to
display a current annual fish and wildlife lands vehicle use permit on
the motor vehicle while within or while using an improved access
facility. An "improved access facility" is a clearly identified area
specifically created for motor vehicle parking, and includes any boat
launch or boat ramp associated with the parking area, but does not
include the department parking facilities at the Gorge Concert Center
near George, Washington. One vehicle use permit shall be issued at no
charge with an initial purchase of either an annual saltwater,
freshwater, combination, small game hunting, big game hunting, or
trapping license, or a watchable wildlife decal, issued by the
department. The annual fee for a fish and wildlife lands vehicle use
permit, if purchased separately, is ten dollars. A person to whom the
department has issued a vehicle use permit or who has purchased a
vehicle use permit separately may purchase additional vehicle use
permits from the department at a cost of five dollars per vehicle use
permit. Revenue derived from the sale of fish and wildlife lands
vehicle use permits shall be used solely for the stewardship and
maintenance of department improved access facilities.
Youth groups may use department improved access facilities without
possessing a vehicle use permit when accompanied by a vehicle use
permit holder.
(2) The vehicle use permit must be displayed from the interior of
the motor vehicle so that it is clearly visible from outside of the
motor vehicle before entering upon or using the motor vehicle on a
department improved access facility. The vehicle use permit can be
transferred between two vehicles and must contain space for the vehicle
license numbers of each vehicle.
(3) Failure to display the fish and wildlife lands vehicle use
permit if required by this section is an infraction under chapter 7.84
RCW, and department employees are authorized to issue a notice of
infraction to the registered owner of any motor vehicle entering upon
or using a department improved access facility without such a vehicle
use permit. The penalty for failure to clearly display the vehicle use
permit is sixty-six dollars. This penalty is reduced to thirty dollars
if the registered owner provides proof to the court that he or she
purchased a vehicle use permit within fifteen days after the issuance
of the notice of violation.
(4) The fees and penalties specified in this section are subject to
adjustment by the commission under section 1 of this act.

Sec. 6 RCW 77.32.430 and 2005 c 192 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Catch record card information is necessary for proper
management of the state's food fish and game fish species and shellfish
resources. Catch record card administration shall be under rules
adopted by the commission. There is no charge for an initial catch
record card. Each subsequent or duplicate catch record card costs ten
dollars.
(2) A license to take and possess Dungeness crab is only valid in
Puget Sound waters east of the Bonilla-Tatoosh line if the fisher has
in possession a valid catch record card officially endorsed for
Dungeness crab. The endorsement shall cost no more than three dollars,
including any or all fees authorized under RCW 77.32.050, when
purchased for a personal use saltwater, combination, or shellfish and
seaweed license. The endorsement shall cost no more than one dollar,
including any or all fees authorized under RCW 77.32.050, when
purchased for a temporary combination fishing license authorized under
RCW 77.32.470(3)(a).
(3) Catch record cards issued with affixed temporary short-term
charter stamp licenses are not subject to the ten-dollar charge nor to
the Dungeness crab endorsement fee provided for in this section.
Charter boat or guide operators issuing temporary short-term charter
stamp licenses shall affix the stamp to each catch record card issued
before fishing commences. Catch record cards issued with a temporary
short-term charter stamp are valid for one day.
(4) The department shall include provisions for recording marked
and unmarked salmon in catch record cards issued after March 31, 2004.
(5) The funds received from the sale of catch record cards and the
Dungeness crab endorsement must be deposited into the wildlife ((fund))
account. The funds received from the Dungeness crab endorsement may be
used only for the sampling, monitoring, and management of catch
associated with the Dungeness crab recreational fisheries. Moneys
allocated under this section shall supplement and not supplant other
federal, state, and local funds used for Dungeness crab recreational
fisheries management.
(6) The fees specified in this section are subject to adjustment by
the commission under section 1 of this act.

Sec. 7 RCW 77.32.450 and 2005 c 140 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A big game hunting license is required to hunt for big game.
A big game license allows the holder to hunt for forest grouse,
unclassified wildlife, and the individual species identified within a
specific big game combination license package. Each big game license
includes one transport tag for each species purchased in that package.
A hunter may not purchase more than one license for each big game
species except as authorized by rule of the commission. The fees for
annual big game combination packages are as follows:
(a) Big game number 1: Deer, elk, bear, and cougar. The fee for
this license is sixty-six dollars for residents, six hundred sixty
dollars for nonresidents, and thirty-three dollars for youth.
(b) Big game number 2: Deer and elk. The fee for this license is
fifty-six dollars for residents, five hundred sixty dollars for
nonresidents, and twenty-eight dollars for youth.
(c) Big game number 3: Deer or elk, bear, and cougar. At the time
of purchase, the holder must identify either deer or elk. The fee for
this license is forty-six dollars for residents, four hundred sixty
dollars for nonresidents, and twenty-three dollars for youth.
(d) Big game number 4: Deer or elk. At the time of purchase, the
holder must identify either deer or elk. The fee for this license is
thirty-six dollars for residents, three hundred sixty dollars for
nonresidents, and eighteen dollars for youth.
(e) Big game number 5: Bear and cougar. The fee for this license
is twenty dollars for residents, two hundred dollars for nonresidents,
and ten dollars for youth.
(2) In the event that the commission authorizes a two animal big
game limit, the fees for the second animal are as follows:
(a) Elk: The fee is twenty dollars for residents, two hundred
dollars for nonresidents, and ten dollars for youth.
(b) Deer: The fee is twenty dollars for residents, two hundred
dollars for nonresidents, and ten dollars for youth.
(c) Bear: The fee is ten dollars for residents, one hundred
dollars for nonresidents, and five dollars for youth.
(d) Cougar: The fee is ten dollars for residents, one hundred
dollars for nonresidents, and five dollars for youth.
(3) In the event that the commission authorizes a special permit
hunt for goat, sheep, or moose, the permit fees are as follows:
(a) Mountain goat: The fee is one hundred dollars for residents,
one thousand dollars for nonresidents, and fifty dollars for youth.
(b) Sheep: The fee is one hundred dollars for residents, one
thousand dollars for nonresidents, and fifty dollars for youth.
(c) Moose: The fee is one hundred dollars for residents, one
thousand dollars for nonresidents, and fifty dollars for youth.
(4) Multiple season big game permit: The commission may, by rule,
offer permits for hunters to hunt deer or elk during more than one
general season. Only one deer or elk may be harvested annually under
a multiple season big game permit. The fee is one hundred fifty
dollars for residents and one thousand five hundred dollars for
nonresidents.
(5) Authorization to hunt the species set out under subsection
(3)(a) through (c) of this section or in multiple seasons as set out in
subsection (4) of this section is by special permit issued under RCW
77.32.370.
(6) The commission may adopt rules to reduce the price of a license
or eliminate the transportation tag requirements concerning bear or
cougar when necessary to meet harvest objectives.
(7) The fees specified in this section are subject to adjustment by
the commission under section 1 of this act.

Sec. 8 RCW 77.32.460 and 2006 c 15 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A small game hunting license is required to hunt for all
classified wild animals and wild birds, except big game. A small game
license also allows the holder to hunt for unclassified wildlife.
(a) The fee for this license is thirty dollars for residents, one
hundred fifty dollars for nonresidents, and fifteen dollars for youth.
(b) The fee for this license if purchased in conjunction with a big
game combination license package is sixteen dollars for residents,
eighty dollars for nonresidents, and eight dollars for youth.
(c) The fee for a three-consecutive-day small game license is fifty
dollars for nonresidents.
(2) In addition to a small game license, a turkey tag is required
to hunt for turkey.
(a) The fee for a primary turkey tag is fourteen dollars for
residents and forty dollars for nonresidents. A primary turkey tag
will, on request, be issued to the purchaser of a youth small game
license at no charge.
(b) The fee for each additional turkey tag is fourteen dollars for
residents, sixty dollars for nonresidents, and nine dollars for youth.
(c) All moneys received from turkey tags must be deposited in the
state wildlife account. One-third of the moneys received from turkey
tags must be appropriated solely for the purposes of turkey management.
An additional one-third of the moneys received from turkey tags must be
appropriated solely for upland game bird management. Moneys received
from turkey tags may not supplant existing funds provided for these
purposes.
(3) The fees specified in this section are subject to adjustment by
the commission under section 1 of this act.

Sec. 9 RCW 77.32.470 and 2005 c 192 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A personal use saltwater, freshwater, combination, temporary,
or family fishing weekend license is required for all persons fifteen
years of age or older to fish for or possess fish taken for personal
use from state waters or offshore waters.
(2) The fees for annual personal use saltwater, freshwater, or
combination licenses are as follows:
(a) A combination license allows the holder to fish for or possess
fish, shellfish, and seaweed from state waters or offshore waters. The
fee for this license is thirty-six dollars for residents, seventy-two
dollars for nonresidents, and five dollars for youth.
(b) A saltwater license allows the holder to fish for or possess
fish taken from saltwater areas. The fee for this license is eighteen
dollars for residents, thirty-six dollars for nonresidents, and five
dollars for resident seniors.
(c) A freshwater license allows the holder to fish for, take, or
possess food fish or game fish species in all freshwater areas. The
fee for this license is twenty dollars for residents, forty dollars for
nonresidents, and five dollars for resident seniors.
(3)(a) A temporary combination fishing license is valid for one to
five consecutive days and allows the holder to fish for or possess
fish, shellfish, and seaweed taken from state waters or offshore
waters. The fee for this temporary fishing license is:
(i) One day - Seven dollars for residents and fourteen dollars for
nonresidents;
(ii) Two days - Ten dollars for residents and twenty dollars for
nonresidents;
(iii) Three days - Thirteen dollars for residents and twenty-six
dollars for nonresidents;
(iv) Four days - Fifteen dollars for residents and thirty dollars
for nonresidents; and
(v) Five days - Seventeen dollars for residents and thirty-four
dollars for nonresidents.
(b) The fee for a charter stamp is seven dollars for a one-day
temporary combination fishing license for residents and nonresidents
for use on a charter boat as defined in RCW 77.65.150.
(c) A transaction fee to support the automated licensing system
will be taken from the amounts set forth in this subsection for
temporary licenses.
(d) Except for active duty military personnel serving in any branch
of the United States armed forces, the temporary combination fishing
license is not valid on game fish species for an eight-consecutive-day
period beginning on the opening day of the lowland lake fishing season.
(4) A family fishing weekend license allows for a maximum of six
anglers: One resident and five youth; two residents and four youth; or
one resident, one nonresident, and four youth. This license allows the
holders to fish for or possess fish taken from state waters or offshore
waters. The fee for this license is twenty dollars. This license is
only valid during periods as specified by rule of the department.
(5) The commission may adopt rules to create and sell combination
licenses for all hunting and fishing activities at or below a fee equal
to the total cost of the individual license contained within any
combination.
(6) The fees specified in this section are subject to adjustment by
the commission under section 1 of this act.

Sec. 10 RCW 77.65.480 and 1991 sp.s. c 7 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A taxidermy license allows the holder to practice taxidermy for
profit. The fee for this license is one hundred eighty dollars.
(2) A fur dealer's license allows the holder to purchase, receive,
or resell raw furs for profit. The fee for this license is one hundred
eighty dollars.
(3) A fishing guide license allows the holder to offer or perform
the services of a professional guide in the taking of game fish. The
fee for this license is one hundred eighty dollars for a resident and
six hundred dollars for a nonresident.
(4) A game farm license allows the holder to operate a game farm to
acquire, breed, grow, keep, and sell wildlife under conditions
prescribed by the rules adopted pursuant to this title. The fee for
this license is seventy-two dollars for the first year and forty-eight
dollars for each following year.
(5) A game fish stocking permit allows the holder to release game
fish into the waters of the state as prescribed by rule of the
commission. The fee for this permit is twenty-four dollars.
(6) A fishing or field trial permit allows the holder to promote,
conduct, hold, or sponsor a fishing or field trial contest in
accordance with rules of the commission. The fee for a fishing contest
permit is twenty-four dollars. The fee for a field trial contest
permit is twenty-four dollars.
(7) An anadromous game fish buyer's license allows the holder to
purchase or sell steelhead trout and other anadromous game fish
harvested by Indian fishermen lawfully exercising fishing rights
reserved by federal statute, treaty, or executive order, under
conditions prescribed by rule of the director. The fee for this
license is one hundred eighty dollars.
(8) The fees specified in this section are subject to adjustment by
the commission under section 1 of this act.

--- END ---