BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 8.28 RCW
to read as follows:
For all condemnation proceedings under this title, the owner of a
building may recover from the acquiring agency lost income from
existing leases that are cancelled or not renewed as a result of the
condemnation proceeding. To recover lost income under this section,
the existing lease must be in effect before notice of the condemnation
proceeding is delivered to the owner of the building.

Sec. 2 RCW 8.26.055 and 1988 c 90 s 5 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) In addition to amounts otherwise authorized by this chapter, a
displacing agency shall make a payment to or for a displaced person
displaced from a dwelling not eligible to receive a payment under RCW
8.26.045 if the dwelling was actually and lawfully occupied by the
displaced person for not less than ninety days immediately before (a)
the initiation of negotiations for acquisition of the dwelling, or (b)
in any case in which displacement is not a direct result of
acquisition, such other event as the lead agency prescribes. The
payment shall consist of the amount necessary to enable the person to
lease or rent for a period not to exceed forty-two months, a comparable
replacement dwelling, but not to exceed five thousand two hundred fifty
dollars; however, the payment must at least cover the difference in
lease amounts between the displaced person's dwelling and a comparable
replacement dwelling for the length of time that the displaced person
has been displaced from his or her dwelling. At the discretion of the
displacing agency, a payment under this subsection may be made in
periodic installments. Computation of a payment under this subsection
to a low-income displaced person for a comparable replacement dwelling
shall take into account the person's income.
(2) A person eligible for a payment under subsection (1) of this
section may elect to apply the payment to a down payment on, and other
incidental expenses pursuant to, the purchase of a decent, safe, and
sanitary replacement dwelling. The person may, at the discretion of
the displacing agency, be eligible under this subsection for the
maximum payment allowed under subsection (1) of this section, except
that, in the case of a displaced homeowner who has owned and occupied
the displacement dwelling for at least ninety days but not more than
one hundred eighty days immediately before the initiation of
negotiations for the acquisition of the dwelling, the payment shall not
exceed the payment the person would otherwise have received under RCW
8.26.045(1) had the person owned and occupied the displacement dwelling
one hundred eighty days immediately before the initiation of the
negotiations.

--- END ---