BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.65.010 and 2005 c 20 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided by this title, a person may not
engage in any of the following activities without a license or permit
issued by the director:
(a) Commercially fish for or take food fish or shellfish;
(b) Deliver from a commercial fishing vessel food fish or shellfish
taken for commercial purposes in offshore waters. As used in this
subsection, "deliver" means arrival at a place or port, and includes
arrivals from offshore waters to waters within the state and arrivals
from state or offshore waters;
(c) Operate a charter boat or commercial fishing vessel engaged in
a fishery;
(d) Engage in processing or wholesaling food fish or shellfish; or
(e) Act as a guide for salmon for personal use in freshwater rivers
and streams, other than that part of the Columbia river below the
bridge at ((Longview)) Astoria.
(2) No person may engage in the activities described in subsection
(1) of this section unless the licenses or permits required by this
title are in the person's possession, and the person is the named
license holder or an alternate operator designated on the license and
the person's license is not suspended.
(3) A valid Oregon license that is equivalent to a license under
this title is valid in the concurrent waters of the Columbia river if
the state of Oregon recognizes as valid the equivalent Washington
license. The director may identify by rule what Oregon licenses are
equivalent.
(4) No license or permit is required for the production or
harvesting of private sector cultured aquatic products as defined in
RCW 15.85.020 or for the delivery, processing, or wholesaling of such
aquatic products. However, if a means of identifying such products is
required by rules adopted under RCW 15.85.060, the exemption from
licensing or permit requirements established by this subsection applies
only if the aquatic products are identified in conformance with those
rules.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.65.150 and 2006 c 186 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall issue the charter licenses and angler
permits listed in this section according to the requirements of this
title. The licenses and permits and their annual fees and surcharges
are:

License or Permit Annual Fee Governing

(RCW 77.95.090 Surcharge) Section

Resident Nonresident

(a) Nonsalmon charter $225 $375

(b) Salmon charter $380 $685 RCW 77.70.050

(plus $100) (plus $100)

(c) Salmon angler $ 0 $ 0 RCW 77.70.060

(d) Salmon roe $ 95 $ 95 RCW 77.65.350

(2) A salmon charter license designating a vessel is required to
operate a charter boat from which persons may, for a fee, fish for
salmon, other food fish, and shellfish. The director may issue a
salmon charter license only to a person who meets the qualifications of
RCW 77.70.050.
(3) A nonsalmon charter license designating a vessel is required to
operate a charter boat from which persons may, for a fee, fish for food
fish other than salmon and shellfish.
(4)(a) "Charter boat" means a vessel from which persons may, for a
fee, fish for food fish or shellfish for personal use in those state
waters set forth in (b) of this subsection. "Charter boat" also means
a vessel from which persons may, for a fee, fish for food fish or
shellfish for personal use in offshore waters or in the waters of other
states. The director may specify by rule when a vessel is a "charter
boat" within this definition.
(b) A person may not operate a vessel from which persons may, for
a fee, fish for food fish or shellfish in Puget Sound, Grays Harbor,
Willapa Bay, Pacific Ocean waters, Lake Washington, or the Columbia
river below the bridge at ((Longview)) Astoria unless the vessel is
designated on a charter boat license.
(5) A charter boat licensed in Oregon may fish without a Washington
charter license under the same rules as Washington charter boat
operators in ocean waters within the jurisdiction of Washington state
from the southern border of the state of Washington to Leadbetter
Point, as long as the Oregon vessel does not take on or discharge
passengers for any purpose from any Washington port, the Washington
shore, or a dock, landing, or other point in Washington. The
provisions of this subsection shall be in effect as long as the state
of Oregon has reciprocal laws and regulations.
(6) A salmon charter license under subsection (1)(b) of this
section may be renewed if the license holder notifies the department by
May 1st of that year that he or she will not participate in the fishery
during that calendar year. The license holder must pay the one
hundred-dollar enhancement surcharge, plus a fifteen-dollar handling
charge, in order to be considered a valid renewal and eligible to renew
the license the following year.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.65.370 and 1998 c 190 s 98 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person shall not offer or perform the services of a
professional salmon guide in the taking of salmon for personal use in
freshwater rivers and streams, other than in that part of the Columbia
river below the bridge at ((Longview)) Astoria, without a professional
salmon guide license.
(2) Only an individual at least sixteen years of age may hold a
professional salmon guide license. No individual may hold more than
one professional salmon guide license.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The department of fish and wildlife shall
direct all necessary resources to negotiating a reciprocity agreement
with the state of Oregon regarding the license requirements for salmon
fishing guides downstream of the Longview bridge. The department must
report back to the legislature on the progress of the negotiations by
November 1, 2007.

--- END ---