BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 44.04 RCW
to read as follows:
A member of the legislature may not introduce as prime sponsor more
than fifteen bills during a legislative session, excluding committee
substitute bills.

--- END ---