BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 SHORT TITLE. This act may be cited as the
"Pacific Northwest maritime national heritage area feasibility
assessment act."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 FINDINGS. The legislature finds that:
(1) The natural and cultural geography of western Washington is
shaped by the Pacific Ocean, the straits, and the inland waterways of
Puget Sound;
(2) For hundreds of years, native peoples relied upon these
interconnected saltwater passages for sustenance and for mobility
within the region and beyond;
(3) The first Euro-American immigrants to the area continued to
depend almost exclusively upon these waterways for the movement of
people and goods;
(4) The early industries of the region, including logging, mining,
and agriculture, utilized the waterways for commerce even after the
advent of railroads and overland roads;
(5) All manner of vessels were designed, built, and maintained on
the shores of western Washington, resulting in the proliferation of
marine and boat building industries;
(6) Fisheries, commercial water transport, and recreational boating
became essential to the economic health of the region;
(7) Maritime skills and traditions flourished in the form of sail
making, knot work, boat building, woodworking, and maritime art, music,
and storytelling;
(8) This maritime culture has left a tangible legacy on the
landscape of western Washington in the form of boatyards, canneries,
coastguard stations, dry docks, ferry landings, lighthouses, marinas,
naval stations, piers, shipyards, wharfs, and all manner of vessels;
(9) In today's global economy our traditional maritime culture is
increasingly endangered by the loss of jobs in the maritime industries,
the decline of family fishing, the erosion of maritime skills,
waterfront development pressures, the high cost of historic vessel
preservation, and other factors;
(10) Over seventy-five organizations and public agencies in western
Washington currently focus on some aspect of preserving and
interpreting our maritime heritage;
(11) Over one hundred historic sites, museums, and attractions
relating to maritime heritage currently exist in western Washington;
(12) The communities of Gig Harbor, Grays Harbor, Port Townsend,
Seattle, Tacoma, and others are working tirelessly to create
significant regional maritime heritage centers that collect and steward
important maritime resources, offer high quality educational
programming, and promote heritage tourism;
(13) These communities wish to collaborate with other interested
organizations, agencies, tribes, and communities in positioning our
collective maritime heritage as a premier regional attraction and
distinctive cultural amenity; and
(14) National heritage areas designated by the United States
congress provide a mechanism to protect, enhance, celebrate, and
promote such assemblages of thematically related natural, cultural,
historic, and scenic resources through local partnerships.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this act unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of archaeology and historic
preservation.
(2) "Director" means the director of the department of archaeology
and historic preservation.
(3) "National heritage area" means a locally managed, congressional
designation that focuses heritage-centered interpretation,
conservation, and development projects over a complex matrix of public
and private land.
(4) "Study area" means (a) coastal areas of Washington counties
bordering the Pacific Ocean, including Pacific, Grays Harbor,
Jefferson, and Clallam counties; and (b) coastal areas of Washington
counties bordering on Puget Sound and straits to the north, including
Whatcom, San Juan, Skagit, Island, Snohomish, King, Pierce, Thurston,
Mason, Kitsap, Jefferson, and Clallam counties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 PROPOSED PACIFIC NORTHWEST MARITIME NATIONAL
HERITAGE AREA. (1) The director, in consultation with appropriate
state, tribal, and local governmental agencies, with federal land
managers within the study area, with the advisory group created in
subsection (2) of this section, and with other interested
organizations, shall conduct a preliminary assessment to determine the
feasibility of seeking congressional designation for a Pacific
Northwest maritime national heritage area in western Washington.
(2) The director may consult with individuals from the public and
private sector or ask the individuals to establish an advisory
committee. Members of such an advisory committee are not entitled to
expense reimbursement. The advisory committee shall include, but is
not limited to, representatives from the following organizations:
(a) 4Culture and Seattle/King county maritime heritage initiative
partners;
(b) Foss waterway seaport/working waterfront maritime museum;
(c) Gig Harbor peninsula historical society/harbor history museum;
(d) Grays Harbor historical seaport authority;
(e) Northwest maritime center and wooden boat foundation;
(f) Pacific Northwest maritime heritage council and member groups;
and
(g) United Indians of all tribes.
(3) The assessment shall include analysis, documentation, and
determinations on whether:
(a) The study area:
(i) Has an assemblage of natural, cultural, scenic, and historic
resources that together represent distinctive aspects of American
heritage worthy of recognition, conservation, interpretation, and
continuing use;
(ii) Reflects traditions, customs, beliefs, and folk life that are
a valuable part of the national story;
(iii) Provides outstanding conservation, recreation, and
educational opportunities;
(iv) Contains resources that are important to the identified theme
and that retain a degree of integrity capable of supporting
interpretation; and
(v) Could be managed as an assemblage through partnerships among
public and private entities at the local, regional, state, or federal
level; and
(b) The residents, business interests, nonprofit organizations, and
federal, tribal, state, and local governments within the study area:
(i) Have demonstrated support for designation of a national
heritage area;
(ii) Are involved in the planning;
(iii) Support the proposed boundary map;
(iv) Have developed a conceptual plan outlining roles for all
participants; and
(v) Have agreed upon a suitable and willing management entity to
plan and implement the project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 REPORT. Not later than two fiscal years
after the date on which funds are made available to carry out the
assessment, the director shall submit a report setting forth the
findings, conclusions, and recommendations of the director with respect
to the feasibility assessment to the senate committee on natural
resources, ocean and recreation, and to the house committee on
community and economic development and trade.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 APPROPRIATION. The sum of one hundred fifty
thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2008, from the general
fund to the department of archaeology and historic preservation for the
purposes of carrying out this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 CAPTIONS. Captions used in this act are not
any part of the law.

--- END ---