BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.32.584 and 2006 c 189 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Between January 1, 2007, and December 31, 2007, a member of
plan 1 employed as a supreme court justice, court of appeals judge, or
superior court judge may make a one-time irrevocable election, filed in
writing with the member's employer, the department, and the
administrative office of the courts, to accrue an additional benefit
equal to one and one-half percent of average final compensation for
each year of future service credit from the date of the election.
Between the effective date of this section and December 31, 2007, a
current or separated member who was previously employed as a supreme
court justice, court of appeals judge, or superior court judge and who
is not yet a retiree under this chapter may make a one-time irrevocable
election to purchase an increased benefit multiplier for the member's
years of service as a justice or judge pursuant to subsection (2) of
this section.
(2)(a) A member who chooses to make the election under subsection
(1) of this section may apply to the department to increase the
member's benefit multiplier by one and one-half percent per year of
service for the period in which the member served as a justice or judge
prior to the election. The member shall pay, for the applicable period
of service, the actuarially equivalent value of the increase in the
member's benefit resulting from the increase in the benefit multiplier
as determined by the director. This payment must be made prior to
retirement.
(b) Subject to rules adopted by the department, a member applying
to increase the member's benefit multiplier under this section may pay
all or part of the cost with a lump sum payment, eligible rollover,
direct rollover, or trustee-to-trustee transfer from an eligible
retirement plan. The department shall adopt rules to ensure that all
lump sum payments, rollovers, and transfers comply with the
requirements of the internal revenue code and regulations adopted by
the internal revenue service. The rules adopted by the department may
condition the acceptance of a rollover or transfer from another plan on
the receipt of information necessary to enable the department to
determine the eligibility of any transferred funds for tax-free
rollover treatment or other treatment under federal income tax law.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.32.587 and 2006 c 189 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In lieu of the retirement allowance provided under RCW
41.32.498, the retirement allowance payable for service as a supreme
court justice, court of appeals judge, or superior court judge, for
those justices or judges who elected to participate under RCW
41.32.584(1), shall be equal to three and one-half percent of average
final compensation for each year of service earned after the date of
the election. The total retirement benefit accrued or purchased under
chapter 189, Laws of 2006 or this act in combination with benefits
accrued during periods served prior to the election shall not exceed
seventy-five percent of average final compensation.
(2) In lieu of the retirement allowance provided under RCW
41.32.498, the retirement allowance payable for service as a supreme
court justice, court of appeals judge, or superior court judge, for
those justices or judges newly elected or appointed after January 1,
2007, shall be equal to three and one-half percent of average final
compensation for each year of service after January 1, 2007. The total
retirement benefits accrued under chapter 189, Laws of 2006 in
combination with benefits accrued during periods served prior to
January 1, 2007, shall not exceed seventy-five percent of average final
compensation.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.40.124 and 2006 c 189 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Between January 1, 2007, and December 31, 2007, a member of
plan 1 or plan 2 employed as a supreme court justice, court of appeals
judge, or superior court judge may make a one-time irrevocable
election, filed in writing with the member's employer, the department,
and the administrative office of the courts, to accrue an additional
benefit equal to one and one-half percent of average final compensation
for each year of future service credit from the date of the election in
lieu of future employee and employer contributions to the judicial
retirement account plan under chapter 2.14 RCW. Between the effective
date of this section and December 31, 2007, a current or separated
member who was previously employed as a supreme court justice, court of
appeals judge, or superior court judge and who is not yet a retiree
under this chapter may make a one-time irrevocable election to purchase
an increased benefit multiplier for the member's years of service as a
justice or judge pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.
(2)(a) A member who chooses to make the election under subsection
(1) of this section may apply to the department to increase the
member's benefit multiplier by an additional one and one-half percent
per year of service for the period in which the member served as a
justice or judge prior to the election. The member shall pay, for the
applicable period of service, the actuarially equivalent value of the
increase in the member's benefit resulting from the increase in the
benefit multiplier as determined by the director. This payment must be
made prior to retirement.
(b) Subject to rules adopted by the department, a member applying
to increase the member's benefit multiplier under this section may pay
all or part of the cost with a lump sum payment, eligible rollover,
direct rollover, or trustee-to-trustee transfer from an eligible
retirement plan. The department shall adopt rules to ensure that all
lump sum payments, rollovers, and transfers comply with the
requirements of the internal revenue code and regulations adopted by
the internal revenue service. The rules adopted by the department may
condition the acceptance of a rollover or transfer from another plan on
the receipt of information necessary to enable the department to
determine the eligibility of any transferred funds for tax-free
rollover treatment or other treatment under federal income tax law.

Sec. 4 RCW 41.40.127 and 2006 c 189 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Between January 1, 2007, and December 31, 2007, a member of
plan 1 or plan 2 employed as a district court judge or municipal court
judge may make a one-time irrevocable election, filed in writing with
the member's employer and the department, to accrue an additional
benefit equal to one and one-half percent of average final compensation
for each year of future service credit from the date of the election.
Between the effective date of this section and December 31, 2007, a
current or separated member who was previously employed as a district
court judge or municipal court judge and who is not yet a retiree under
this chapter may make a one-time irrevocable election to purchase an
increased benefit multiplier for the member's years of service as a
justice or judge pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.
(2)(a) A member who chooses to make the election under subsection
(1) of this section may apply to the department to increase the
member's benefit multiplier by one and one-half percent per year of
service for the period in which the member served as a judge prior to
the election. The member shall pay, for the applicable period of
service, the actuarially equivalent value of the increase in the
member's benefit resulting from the increase in the benefit multiplier
as determined by the director. This payment must be made prior to
retirement.
(b) Subject to rules adopted by the department, a member applying
to increase the member's benefit multiplier under this section may pay
all or part of the cost with a lump sum payment, eligible rollover,
direct rollover, or trustee-to-trustee transfer from an eligible
retirement plan. The department shall adopt rules to ensure that all
lump sum payments, rollovers, and transfers comply with the
requirements of the internal revenue code and regulations adopted by
the internal revenue service. The rules adopted by the department may
condition the acceptance of a rollover or transfer from another plan on
the receipt of information necessary to enable the department to
determine the eligibility of any transferred funds for tax-free
rollover treatment or other treatment under federal income tax law.

Sec. 5 RCW 41.40.404 and 2006 c 189 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In lieu of the retirement allowance provided under RCW
41.40.185, the retirement allowance payable for service as a supreme
court justice, court of appeals judge, or superior court judge, for a
member who elects to participate under RCW 41.40.124(1), shall be equal
to three and one-half percent of average final compensation for each
year of service earned after the date of the election. The total
retirement benefit accrued or purchased under chapter 189, Laws of 2006
or this act in combination with benefits accrued during periods served
prior to the election shall not exceed seventy-five percent of average
final compensation.
(2) In lieu of the retirement allowance provided under RCW
41.40.185, the retirement allowance payable for service as a supreme
court justice, court of appeals judge, or superior court judge, for
those justices or judges newly elected or appointed after January 1,
2007, shall be equal to three and one-half percent of average final
compensation for each year of service after January 1, 2007. The total
retirement benefits accrued under chapter 189, Laws of 2006 in
combination with benefits accrued during periods served prior to
January 1, 2007, shall not exceed seventy-five percent of average final
compensation.

Sec. 6 RCW 41.40.408 and 2006 c 189 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In lieu of the retirement allowance provided under RCW
41.40.185, the retirement allowance payable for service as a district
court judge or municipal court judge, for those judges who elected to
participate under RCW 41.40.127(1), shall be equal to three and one-half percent of average final compensation for each year of service
earned after the election. The total retirement benefit accrued or
purchased under chapter 189, Laws of 2006 or this act in combination
with benefits accrued during periods served prior to the election shall
not exceed seventy-five percent of average final compensation.
(2) In lieu of the retirement allowance provided under RCW
41.40.185, the retirement allowance payable for service as a district
court judge, or municipal court judge, for those judges newly elected
or appointed after January 1, 2007, and who are not eligible for
membership under chapter 41.28 RCW, shall be equal to three and one-half percent of average final compensation for each year of service
after January 1, 2007. The total retirement benefits accrued under
chapter 189, Laws of 2006 in combination with benefits accrued during
periods served prior to January 1, 2007, shall not exceed seventy-five
percent of average final compensation.

Sec. 7 RCW 41.40.767 and 2006 c 189 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In lieu of the retirement allowance provided under RCW
41.40.620, the retirement allowance payable for service as a supreme
court justice, court of appeals judge, or superior court judge, for
those justices or judges who elected to participate under RCW
41.40.124(1), shall be equal to three and one-half percent of average
final compensation for each year of service earned after the election.
The total retirement benefit accrued or purchased under chapter 189,
Laws of 2006 or this act in combination with benefits accrued during
periods served prior to the election shall not exceed seventy-five
percent of average final compensation.
(2) In lieu of the retirement allowance provided under RCW
41.40.620, the retirement allowance payable for service as a supreme
court justice, court of appeals judge, or superior court judge, for
those justices or judges newly elected or appointed after January 1,
2007, shall be equal to three and one-half percent of average final
compensation for each year of service after January 1, 2007. The total
retirement benefits accrued under chapter 189, Laws of 2006 in
combination with benefits accrued during periods served prior to
January 1, 2007, shall not exceed seventy-five percent of average final
compensation.

Sec. 8 RCW 41.40.770 and 2006 c 189 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In lieu of the retirement allowance provided under RCW
41.40.620, the retirement allowance payable for service as a district
court judge or municipal court judge for those judges who elected to
participate under RCW 41.40.127(1) shall be equal to three and one-half
percent of the average final compensation for each year of such service
earned after the election. The total retirement benefit accrued or
purchased under chapter 189, Laws of 2006 or this act in combination
with benefits accrued during periods served prior to the election shall
not exceed seventy-five percent of average final compensation.
(2) In lieu of the retirement allowance provided under RCW
41.40.620, the retirement allowance payable for service as a district
court judge, or municipal court judge, for those judges newly elected
or appointed after January 1, 2007, and who are not eligible for
membership under chapter 41.28 RCW, shall be equal to three and one-half percent of average final compensation for each year of service
after January 1, 2007. The total retirement benefits accrued under
chapter 189, Laws of 2006 in combination with benefits accrued during
periods served prior to January 1, 2007, shall not exceed seventy-five
percent of average final compensation.

Sec. 9 RCW 41.40.870 and 2006 c 189 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Between January 1, 2007, and December 31, 2007, a member of
plan 3 employed as a supreme court justice, court of appeals judge, or
superior court judge may make a one-time irrevocable election, filed in
writing with the member's employer, the department, and the
administrative office of the courts, to accrue an additional plan 3
defined benefit equal to six-tenths percent of average final
compensation for each year of future service credit from the date of
the election in lieu of future employer contributions to the judicial
retirement account plan under chapter 2.14 RCW. Between the effective
date of this section and December 31, 2007, a current or separated
member who was previously employed as a supreme court justice, court of
appeals judge, or superior court judge and who is not yet a retiree
under this chapter may make a one-time irrevocable election to purchase
an increased benefit multiplier for the member's years of service as a
justice or judge pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.
(2)(a) A member who chooses to make the election under subsection
(1) of this section may apply to the department to increase the
member's benefit multiplier by six-tenths percent per year of service
for the period in which the member served as a justice or judge prior
to the election. The member shall pay, for the applicable period of
service, the actuarially equivalent value of the increase in the
member's benefit resulting from the increase in the benefit multiplier
as determined by the director. This payment must be made prior to
retirement.
(b) Subject to rules adopted by the department, a member applying
to increase the member's benefit multiplier under this section may pay
all or part of the cost with a lump sum payment, eligible rollover,
direct rollover, or trustee-to-trustee transfer from an eligible
retirement plan. The department shall adopt rules to ensure that all
lump sum payments, rollovers, and transfers comply with the
requirements of the internal revenue code and regulations adopted by
the internal revenue service. The rules adopted by the department may
condition the acceptance of a rollover or transfer from another plan on
the receipt of information necessary to enable the department to
determine the eligibility of any transferred funds for tax-free
rollover treatment or other treatment under federal income tax law.
(3) A member who chooses to make the election under subsection (1)
of this section shall contribute a minimum of seven and one-half
percent of pay to the member's defined contribution account.

Sec. 10 RCW 41.40.873 and 2006 c 189 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Between January 1, 2007, and December 31, 2007, a member of
plan 3 employed as a district court judge or municipal court judge may
make a one-time irrevocable election, filed in writing with the
member's employer and the department, to accrue an additional plan 3
defined benefit equal to six-tenths percent of average final
compensation for each year of future service credit from the date of
the election. Between the effective date of this section and December
31, 2007, a current or separated member who was previously employed as
a district court judge or municipal court judge and who is not yet a
retiree under this chapter may make a one-time irrevocable election to
purchase an increased benefit multiplier for the member's years of
service as a justice or judge pursuant to subsection (2) of this
section.
(2)(a) A member who chooses to make the election under subsection
(1) of this section may apply to the department to increase the
member's benefit multiplier by six-tenths percent per year of service
for the period in which the member served as a judge prior to the
election. The member shall pay, for the applicable period of service,
the actuarially equivalent value of the increase in the member's
benefit resulting from the increase in the benefit multiplier as
determined by the director. This payment must be made prior to
retirement.
(b) Subject to rules adopted by the department, a member applying
to increase the member's benefit multiplier under this section may pay
all or part of the cost with a lump sum payment, eligible rollover,
direct rollover, or trustee-to-trustee transfer from an eligible
retirement plan. The department shall adopt rules to ensure that all
lump sum payments, rollovers, and transfers comply with the
requirements of the internal revenue code and regulations adopted by
the internal revenue service. The rules adopted by the department may
condition the acceptance of a rollover or transfer from another plan on
the receipt of information necessary to enable the department to
determine the eligibility of any transferred funds for tax-free
rollover treatment or other treatment under federal income tax law.
(3) A member who chooses to make the election under subsection (1)
of this section shall contribute a minimum of seven and one-half
percent of pay to the member's defined contribution account.

Sec. 11 RCW 41.40.877 and 2006 c 189 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
In lieu of the retirement allowance provided under RCW 41.40.790,
the retirement allowance payable for service as a supreme court
justice, court of appeals judge, or superior court judge, for those
justices or judges who elected to participate under RCW 41.40.870(1),
shall be equal to one and six-tenths percent of average final
compensation for each year of service earned after the election. The
total retirement benefit accrued or purchased under chapter 189, Laws
of 2006 or this act in combination with benefits accrued during periods
served prior to the election shall not exceed thirty-seven and one-half
percent of average final compensation.

Sec. 12 RCW 41.40.880 and 2006 c 189 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
In lieu of the retirement allowance provided under RCW 41.40.790,
the retirement allowance payable for service as a district court judge
or municipal court judge, for those judges who elected to participate
under RCW 41.40.873(1), shall be equal to one and six-tenths percent of
average final compensation for each year of service earned after the
election. The total retirement benefit accrued or purchased under
chapter 189, Laws of 2006 or this act in combination with benefits
accrued during periods served prior to the election shall not exceed
thirty-seven and one-half percent of average final compensation.

--- END ---