BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the military and
its personnel play a vital role in defending the lives and freedom of
all Americans. The legislature intends to honor the contribution of
the military by the establishment of appropriate monuments located on
state property near each military base in the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 38.40 RCW
to read as follows:
The military department, in consultation with the department of
transportation, shall erect and maintain a monument to be constructed
from permanent materials, such as masonry, stone, or concrete, at an
appropriate location on state property near each military base in the
state. The purpose of the monument is to alert persons as to the
presence and location of the military base. The monument, at a
minimum, shall identify the military base's name, branch of service,
and appropriate military insignia. To the extent possible, and in
conformance with applicable traffic safety standards as determined by
the department of transportation, these monuments shall be uniform in
size and design throughout the state.

--- END ---