BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
establish:
(1) A surcharge to the business and occupation tax on retail
establishments; and
(2) A tax credit for certain retail establishments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section and
section 3 of this act unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Employee" means any individual employed by an employer.
(b) "Employer" means an employer as defined in RCW 49.46.010 who
employed a total of five hundred or more employees in any calendar
quarter in the preceding calendar year at any and all locations in
Washington.
(c) "Health care services expenditures" means amounts paid by an
employer for the purpose of providing or reimbursing the cost of health
care services, as defined in RCW 48.43.005, for its employees or their
dependents in the state of Washington. These amounts include, but are
not limited to: Payments by an employer on behalf of its employees or
their dependents for medical care, prescription drugs, vision care,
dental care, long-term care, and health savings accounts as defined
under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 223 of the federal internal revenue code, and
reimbursements by such an employer to its employees or their dependents
for the cost of health care services when the employees or their
dependents had no entitlement to the reimbursement. These amounts do
not include:
(i) Payments made directly or indirectly for workers' compensation
or medicare benefits;
(ii) Any costs of health care services, taxes, or assessments that
such an employer is required to pay pursuant to any federal or state
law other than under section 3 of this act; or
(iii) Any amounts deducted from an employee's wages.
(d) "Payroll" means all wages paid by an employer to its employees.
(e) "Wage" means wage as defined in RCW 49.46.010.
(2) In addition to the taxes imposed under RCW 82.04.250(1), a
surcharge is imposed on those persons who are subject to any of the
taxes imposed under RCW 82.04.250(1). Except as otherwise provided in
section 3 of this act, the surcharge is equal to one-half of one
percent added to the rate provided in RCW 82.04.250(1).
(3) All receipts from the surcharge imposed under this section
shall be deposited into the health services account created in RCW
43.72.900.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Employers taxable as retailers under RCW 82.04.250(1) shall be
allowed a credit against those taxes paid if:
(a) The employer reports to the department in the form and manner
prescribed by the department:
(i) Health care services expenditures in the preceding calendar
year; and
(ii) Payroll in the preceding calendar year.
(b) The department determines that health care services
expenditures are equal to or exceed nine percent of payroll.
(2) If the department determines that health care services
expenditures are equal to or exceed nine percent of payroll, then the
department shall allow a credit equal to the amount of the surcharge,
as determined in section 2(2) of this act.

--- END ---