BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The governing board of a higher education
investment district created under section 2 of this act may submit an
authorizing proposition to the voters of the district, and if the
proposition is approved by a majority of persons voting, the district
may fix and impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of
this chapter.
The tax authorized in this section is in addition to any other
taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from those persons who
are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the
occurrence of any taxable event within the higher education investment
district. The rate of the tax may not exceed two-tenths of one percent
of the selling price in the case of a sales tax, or value of the
article used, in the case of a use tax.
Moneys received from any tax imposed under this section must be
used for the purpose of providing funds for the costs associated with
the financing, design, acquisition, construction, equipping,
maintaining, and the operations for a higher education facility as
defined in section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The county legislative authority of a
county with a population greater than six hundred thousand persons but
less than seven hundred fifty thousand persons may create a higher
education investment district that is coextensive with the boundaries
of the county.
(2) The county legislative authority that meets the criteria of
section 1 of this act may enter into an agreement under chapter 39.34
RCW with any contiguous counties for the creation and joint operation
of a higher education investment district.
(3) A higher education investment district is created upon adoption
of a resolution providing for the creation of such a district by the
county legislative authority or county legislative authorities in which
the proposed district is located.
(4) A higher education investment district is a municipal
corporation, an independent taxing "authority" within the meaning of
Article VII, section 1 of the state Constitution, and a "taxing
district" within the meaning of Article VII, section 2 of the state
Constitution.
(5) No taxes authorized under section 1 of this act may be assessed
or levied unless a majority of the voters of the higher education
investment district has approved such tax at a general or special
election. A single ballot proposition may validate the imposition of
the sales and use tax under section 1 of this act.
(6) A higher education investment district constitutes a body
corporate and possesses all the usual powers of a corporation for
public purposes as well as all other powers that may now or hereafter
be specifically conferred by statute, including, but not limited to,
the authority to: Hire employees, staff, and services; enter into
contracts; and sue and be sued.
(7) A county legislative authority or a city council may transfer
property to the higher education investment district created under this
chapter. No property that is encumbered with debt or that is in need
of major capital renovation may be transferred to the district without
the agreement of the district and revenues adequate to retire the
existing indebtedness.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The governing board of the higher education
investment district must consist of nine members selected as follows:
(1) Two members appointed by the legislative authorities of the cities
and towns; (2) three members appointed by the legislative authorities
of the counties; and (3) four members appointed by the legislative
authorities of the counties based upon recommendations from local
organizations. The members appointed may not be members of the
legislative authorities. The members appointed under subsection (3) of
this section must be based on recommendations received from local
organizations that include, but are not limited to, the local chamber
of commerce, local economic development council, or the local labor
council. The members of the governing board must be appointed to serve
four-year terms. Of the initial members, two must be appointed for a
one-year term, three must be appointed to a three-year term, and the
remainder must be appointed for four-year terms.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 For the purposes of this chapter, "higher
education facility" means an independent comprehensive four-year
institution of higher education with a polytechnical focus.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

--- END ---