BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Major public facilities, public works,
and capital projects with significant public funding generally aim to
accrue broad benefits to the people of Washington. However, sometimes
the interest of the stakeholder community that bears the
disproportionate cost of the broad public benefit by absorbing a
deleterious impact upon itself is overlooked or inadequately addressed.
These impacts may include dislocation, displacement, and the overall
disintegration of an identifiable existing community and its historical
and cultural character. The legislature finds that the preservation
and restoration of the character of such a community, and the
community's historical and cultural character, are important public
policy goals that can be achieved through the creation of community
preservation and development authorities.
(2) Community preservation and development authorities are hereby
created to restore or enhance the health, safety, and economic well-
being of communities adversely impacted by the construction of, or
ongoing operation of, multiple major public facilities, public works,
and capital projects with significant public funding.
(3) Community preservation and development authorities have the
following purposes:
(a) To revitalize, enhance, and preserve the unique character of
impacted communities;
(b) To mitigate the adverse effects of multiple major public
facilities projects, public works projects, or capital projects with
significant public funding, or a secure community transition facility
as defined in RCW 71.09.020(14);
(c) To restore a local area's sense of community;
(d) To reduce the displacement of community members and businesses;
(e) To stimulate the community's economic vitality;
(f) To enhance public service provisions;
(g) To improve the standard of living of community members; and
(h) To preserve historic buildings or areas by returning them to
economically productive uses that are compatible with or enhance their
historic character.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Community" means a group of people who reside or work in the
geographic area established by the community preservation and
development authority board or the proposal to create the authority and
who currently or historically share a distinct cultural identity or
local history.
(2) "Community preservation and development authority" or
"authority" means an authority created by members of an impacted
community.
(3) "Constituency" means the general membership of the community
preservation and development authority, which membership shall be open
to all persons eighteen years of age and over who are residents,
property owners, employees, or business persons within the geographic
boundaries established by the authority or the proposal to create the
authority.
(4) "Impacted community" means a community that has been adversely
impacted by the construction of, or ongoing operation of, multiple
major public facilities, public works, and capital projects with
significant public funding.
(5) "Major public facilities project, public works project, or
capital project with significant public funding" means any capital
project whose total cost exceeds ten million dollars. On July 1, 2009,
and on July 1st of each odd-numbered year thereafter, the capital
project cost threshold shall be adjusted by the capital project cost
adjustment factor for inflation established by the office of financial
management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The residents, property owners,
employees, or business owners of an impacted community may propose
formation of a community preservation and development authority. The
proposal to form a community preservation and development authority
must be presented in writing to the appropriate legislative committee
in both the house of representatives and the senate. The proposal must
contain proposed general geographic boundaries that will be used to
define the community for the purposes of the authority. Proposals
presented after January 1, 2008, must identify in its proposal one or
more stable revenue sources that (a) have a nexus with the multiple
publicly funded facilities that have adversely impacted the community,
and (b) can be used to support future operating or capital projects
that will be identified in the strategic plan required under section 5
of this act.
(2) Formation of the community preservation and development
authority is subject to legislative authorization by statute. The
legislature must find that (a) the area within the proposal's
geographic boundaries meets the definition of "impacted community"
contained in section 2(4) of this act and (b) those persons that have
brought forth the proposal are members of the community as defined in
section 2(1) of this act and, if the authority were approved, would
meet the definition of constituency contained in section 2(3) of this
act. For proposals brought after January 1, 2008, the legislature must
also find that the community has identified one or more stable revenue
sources as required in subsection (1) of this section. The legislature
may then act to authorize the establishment of the community
preservation and development authority in law.
(3) The affairs of a community preservation and development
authority shall be managed by a board of directors, consisting of the
following members:
(a) Two members who own, operate, or represent businesses within
the community;
(b) Two members who are involved in providing nonprofit community
or social services within the community;
(c) Two members who are involved in the arts and entertainment
within the community;
(d) Two members with knowledge of the community's culture and
history; and
(e) One member who is involved in a nonprofit or public planning
organization that directly serves the impacted community.
(4) No member of the board shall hold office for more than four
years. Board positions shall be numbered one through nine, and the
terms staggered as follows:
(a) Board members elected to positions one through five shall serve
two-year terms, and if reelected, may serve no more than one additional
two-year term.
(b) Board members initially elected to positions six through nine
shall serve a three-year term only.
(c) Board members elected to positions six through nine after the
initial three-year term shall serve two-year terms, and if reelected,
may serve no more than one additional two-year term.
(5) With respect to an authority's initial board of directors: The
state legislative delegation and those proposing formation of the
authority shall jointly establish a committee to develop a list of
candidates to stand for election once the authority has received
legislative approval as established in subsection (2) of this section.
For the purpose of developing the list and identifying those persons
who meet the criteria in subsection (3)(a) through (e) of this section,
community shall mean the proposed geographic boundaries as set out in
the proposal. The board of directors shall be elected by the
constituency during a meeting convened for that purpose by the state
legislative delegation.
(6) With respect to subsequent elections of an authority's board of
directors: A list of candidates shall be developed by the authority's
existing board of directors and the election shall be held during the
annual local town hall meeting as required in section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) A community preservation and development
authority shall have the power to:
(a) Accept gifts, grants, loans, or other aid from public or
private entities; and
(b) Exercise such additional powers as may be authorized by law.
(2) A community preservation and development authority shall have
no power of eminent domain nor any power to levy taxes or special
assessments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A community preservation and development
authority shall have the duty to:
(1) Establish specific geographic boundaries for the authority
within its bylaws based on the general geographic boundaries
established in the proposal submitted and approved by the legislature;
(2) Solicit input from members of its community and develop a
strategic preservation and development plan to promote the health,
safety, and economic well-being of the impacted community and to
preserve its cultural and historical identity;
(3) Include within the strategic plan a prioritized list of
projects identified and supported by the community, including capital
or operating components that address one or more of the purposes under
section 1(3) of this act;
(4) Establish funding mechanisms to support projects and programs
identified in the strategic plan including but not limited to grants
and loans;
(5) Use gifts, grants, loans, and other aid from public or private
entities to carry out projects identified in the strategic plan; and
(6) Demonstrate ongoing accountability for its actions by:
(a) Reporting to the appropriate committees of the legislature, one
year after formation and every biennium thereafter, on the authority's
strategic plan, activities, accomplishments, and any recommendations
for statutory changes;
(b) Reporting any changes in the authority's geographic boundaries
to the appropriate committees of the legislature when the legislature
next convenes in regular session;
(c) Convening a local town hall meeting with its constituency on an
annual basis to: (i) Report its activities and accomplishments from
the previous year; (ii) present and receive input from members of the
impacted community regarding its proposed strategic plan and activities
for the upcoming year; and (iii) hold board member elections as
necessary; and
(d) Maintaining books and records as appropriate for the conduct of
its affairs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The legislature authorizes the establishment
of the Pioneer Square-International District community preservation and
development authority, which boundaries are those contained in the
Pioneer Square-International District within the city of Seattle.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The community preservation and development
authority account is created in the state treasury. The account is
composed of two subaccounts, one for moneys to be appropriated for
operating purposes, and the other for moneys to be appropriated for
capital purposes. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for
projects under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Prior to making siting, design, and
construction decisions for future major public facilities, public works
projects, or capital projects with significant public funding, state
and local government agencies may:
(1) Communicate and consult with the community preservation and
development authority and impacted community, including assessing the
compatibility of the proposed project with the strategic plan adopted
by the authority; and
(2) Make reasonable efforts to ensure that negative, cumulative
effects of multiple projects upon the impacted community are minimized.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---