BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 15.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Biofuel economic development grant programs may be created
under this section. The purpose of a biofuel economic development
grant program is to encourage the production of feedstock grown in
Washington and to maintain biofuel infrastructure in the state.
(2) A biofuel producer, agricultural cooperative, or both may opt
to administer a biofuel economic development grant program under this
section, which in addition to any other requirements of this section,
must meet the following:
(a) Program grant funding may only be granted to eligible farmers;
(b) Grant funds must be paid to eligible farmers as follows:
(i) Two cents per pound for oil seed;
(ii) Twenty-five cents per bushel for grains, including corn; and
(iii) Eighty-four cents per ton of sugar beets;
(c) An itemized statement must be provided to all eligible farmers
who receive a grant under this section by the biofuel producer or
agricultural cooperative administering the grant, that separately
states the amount paid, which is attributable to the market rate of the
agricultural product sold and the amount paid, which is attributable to
the biofuel economic development grant program.
(3) If the agricultural product is sold to the biofuel producer by
an agricultural cooperative:
(a) And the biofuel producer opts to administer a biofuel economic
development grant program, the biofuel producer and the cooperative may
enter into an agreement to each receive fifty percent of any tax credit
amount received under section 2 of this act;
(b) And the biofuel producer opts not to administer a biofuel
economic development grant program, only the agricultural cooperative
is eligible to administer the program under this section and only the
agricultural cooperative is eligible to receive the tax credit under
section 2 of this act.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section unless
the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Eligible farmer" means a farmer, as defined in RCW 82.04.213,
who is subject to an agreement for the calendar year with a biofuel
producer or agricultural cooperative to sell an agricultural product,
which is grown in the state of Washington.
(b) "Biofuel producer" means a person who operates a facility for
the production of ethanol, biodiesel, or both from agricultural
products.
(c) "Agricultural cooperative" means a cooperative organization of
farmers, as defined in RCW 82.04.213, which has a valid agreement with
a biofuel producer, for the calendar year in which the cooperative or
biofuel producer administers a biofuel economic development grant
program under this section, for the purpose of selling agricultural
products received from an eligible farmer to a biofuel producer.
(d) "Agricultural product" means oil seed, a product of grain
cultivation, including corn, or sugar beets.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the limits and provisions of this section, a credit
is authorized against the tax otherwise due under this chapter for
persons engaged in the activity of administering a biofuel economic
development grant program, as provided in section 1 of this act.
(2) Persons engaged in the activity of administering a biofuel
economic development grant program are eligible for a tax credit
against taxes due under this chapter, which is equal to one hundred
percent of the amount of biofuel economic development grants paid by
the person in a calendar year.
(3) Any amount received by a person as a tax credit under
subsection (2) of this section must be used during the calendar year in
which the tax credit or refund was received for the sole purpose of
funding biofuel economic development grants under section 1 of this
act.
(4) The maximum credit that may be earned for each calendar year
under subsection (2) of this section for a person is limited to the
lesser of:
(a) Two hundred thousand dollars; or
(b) The amount of tax due under this chapter.
(5) No application is necessary for the tax credit. The person
must keep records necessary for the department to verify eligibility
under this section. These records include information establishing
that the grant recipients are eligible farmers, as defined under
section 1 of this act. For the purposes of this section, a bill of
lading is sufficient evidence for a person receiving a tax credit under
this section to establish that the agricultural product of a grant
recipient is grown in Washington state.
(6) If at any time the department finds that a person is not
eligible for a tax credit under this section, the amount of taxes for
which a credit has been used is immediately due. The department shall
assess interest, but not penalties, on the credited taxes for which the
person is not eligible. The interest shall be assessed at the rate
provided for delinquent excise taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW, shall be
assessed retroactively to the date the tax credit was taken, and shall
accrue until the taxes for which a credit has been used are repaid.
(7) The definitions in section 1 of this act apply to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act expires December 1, 2009.

--- END ---