BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that a viable
manufacturing industry is critical to providing the state economy with
family-wage jobs and improving the quality of life for workers and
communities. To perform in the emerging global marketplace, Washington
manufacturers must master new technologies, streamline production
processes, improve quality assurance, expand environmental compliance,
and enhance methods of work organization. Only through modernization
techniques, reflecting the specific needs and capabilities of the
individual firms, can Washington manufacturers both compete
successfully in the market of the future and pay good living wages.
Most small and midsize manufacturers do not have the resources that
will allow them to easily access modernization technical assistance and
the skills training needed to make them globally competitive. Because
of the statewide public benefit to be gained from increasing the
availability of modernization services, it is the intent of the
legislature to create a new mechanism in a manner that reduces the
up-front costs of these services for small and midsize manufacturing
firms. It is further the intent of the legislature that Washington
state increase its support for the manufacturing extension program, to
expand the delivery of modernization services to small and midsize
Washington manufacturers, and to leverage federal funding and private
resources devoted to such efforts.
The successful implementation of modernization services will enable
a firm to reduce costs, increase sales, and to become more profitable.
Such growth will result in increased revenue from the state business
and occupation taxes paid by manufacturers who have engaged in
modernization services. It is the intent of the legislature to set
aside a portion of these new revenues to assure the success of a
continuing modernization service program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Costs of extension services" and "extension service costs"
mean the direct costs experienced under a contract with a qualified
manufacturing extension partnership affiliate for modernization
extension services, including but not limited to amounts in the
contract for costs of consulting, instruction, materials, equipment,
rental of class space, marketing, and overhead.
(2) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(3) "Director" means the director of the department of community,
trade, and economic development.
(4) "Modernization extension allowance" and "allowance" mean a
voucher, credit, or other instrument issued to a participant from the
department, verifying that funds from the manufacturing modernization
account will be forwarded to the qualified manufacturing extension
partnership affiliate selected by the participant and will cover
identified costs of extension services.
(5) "Modernization extension services" and "service" mean a service
funded under this chapter and performed by a qualified manufacturing
extension partnership affiliate. The services may include but are not
limited to strategic planning, continuous improvement, business
development, six sigma, quality improvement, environmental health and
safety, lean processes, energy management, innovation and product
development, human resources and training, supply chain management, and
project management.
(6) "Outreach services" means those activities performed by an
affiliate to increase the awareness of Washington manufacturers on the
opportunities and benefits of implementing cutting edge technology,
techniques, and best practices. "Outreach services" includes but is
not limited to salaries of outreach staff, client follow-up, public
educational events, manufacturing orientated trade shows, electronic
communications, newsletters, advertising, direct mail efforts, and
contacting business organizations for names of manufacturers who might
need assistance.
(7) "Program" means the Washington manufacturing modernization
extension service program created in section 3 of this act.
(8) "Qualified manufacturing extension partnership affiliate" and
"affiliate" mean a private nonprofit organization established under RCW
24.50.010 or other organizations that are eligible or certified to
receive federal matching funds from the national institute of standards
and technology manufacturing extension partnership program of the
United States department of commerce.
(9) "Small manufacturer" means a private employer whose primary
business is adding value to a product through a manufacturing process
and employs one hundred or fewer employees within Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The Washington manufacturing
modernization extension service program is created to provide
assistance to small manufacturers located in the state of Washington.
(2)(a) Application to receive funding under this program must be
made to the department of community, trade, and economic development in
a form and manner specified by the department. Successful applicants
are eligible to receive a modernization extension allowance from the
department to cover the costs of assistance by a qualified
manufacturing extension partnership affiliate. An applicant may not
receive an allowance or allowances of over two hundred thousand dollars
per calendar year.
(b) The department must grant allowances to applicants who meet the
following criteria:
(i) The applicant has a valid agreement with a qualified
manufacturing extension partnership affiliate to engage in
modernization extension services;
(ii) The applicants must agree to: (A) Make a payment to the
manufacturing modernization account created in section 8 of this act in
an amount equal to one-quarter of the amount of the modernization
extension allowance, upon completion of the modernization extension
service; and (B) make monthly or quarterly payments over the subsequent
eighteen months, as specified in their agreement with the affiliate, to
the manufacturing modernization account created in section 8 of this
act in an amount equal to three-quarters of the amount of the
modernization extension allowance;
(iii) The applicant is a small manufacturer at the time the
applicant entered into an agreement with a qualified manufacturing
extension partnership affiliate; and
(iv) The applicant must ensure that the number of employees the
applicant has in the state during the calendar year following the
completion of the program will be equal to or greater than the number
of employees the applicant had in the state in the calendar year
preceding the start of the program.
(3) The director may solicit and receive gifts, grants, funds,
fees, and endowments, in trust or otherwise, from tribal, local,
federal, or other governmental entities, as well as private sources,
for the purpose of providing modernization extension allowances under
this chapter. All revenue solicited and received by the department
under this chapter must be deposited into the manufacturing
modernization account created in section 8 of this act.
(4) The department may adopt rules to implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This chapter, being necessary for the
welfare of the state and its inhabitants, shall be liberally construed
to effect its purposes. Insofar as the provisions of this chapter are
inconsistent with the provisions of any general or special law, or
parts thereof, the provisions of this chapter shall be controlling.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for participants in the Washington manufacturing modernization
extension services program created in section 3 of this act. The
credit allowed under this section is equal to fifty percent of the
value of a program participant's payments to the manufacturing
modernization account created in section 8 of this act. If a
participant in the program does not meet the qualifications in section
3(2)(b)(iv) of this act, the participant must remit to the department
the value of any credits taken plus interest. The credit earned by a
participant in one calendar year may be carried over to be credited
against taxes incurred in a subsequent calendar year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that accountability and effectiveness are
important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to make policy
choices regarding the best use of limited state resources the
legislature needs information on how a tax incentive is used.
(2) Each person claiming a tax credit under section 5 of this act
shall report information to the department by filing a complete annual
survey. The survey is due by March 31st of the year following any
calendar year in which a tax credit under section 5 of this act is
taken. The department may extend the due date for timely filing of
annual surveys under this section as provided in RCW 82.32.590. The
survey shall include the amount of tax credit taken. The survey shall
also include the following information for employment positions in
Washington:
(a) The number of total employment positions;
(b) Full-time, part-time, and temporary employment positions as a
percent of total employment;
(c) The number of employment positions according to the following
wage bands: Less than thirty thousand dollars; thirty thousand dollars
or greater, but less than sixty thousand dollars; and sixty thousand
dollars or greater. A wage band containing fewer than three
individuals may be combined with another wage band; and
(d) The number of employment positions that have employer-provided
medical, dental, and retirement benefits, by each of the wage bands.
The first survey filed under this subsection shall also include
information for the twelve-month period immediately before first use of
a tax incentive.
(3) The department may request additional information necessary to
measure the results of the credit program, to be submitted at the same
time as the survey.
(4) All information collected under this section, except the amount
of the tax credit taken, is deemed taxpayer information under RCW
82.32.330. Information on the amount of tax credit taken is not
subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330.
(5) If a person fails to submit an annual survey under subsection
(2) of this section by the due date of the report or any extension
under RCW 82.32.590, the department shall declare the amount of taxes
credited for the previous calendar year to be immediately due and
payable. The department shall assess interest, but not penalties, on
the amounts due under this section. The interest shall be assessed at
the rate provided for delinquent taxes under this chapter,
retroactively to the date the credit was claimed, and shall accrue
until the taxes for which the credit was claimed are repaid. This
information is not subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW
82.32.330.
(6) The department shall use the information from this section to
prepare summary descriptive statistics by category. No fewer than
three taxpayers shall be included in any category. The department
shall report these statistics to the legislature each year by September
1st.
(7) The department shall study the tax credit authorized in section
5 of this act. The department shall submit a report to the finance
committee of the house of representatives and the ways and means
committee of the senate by December 1, 2013. The report shall measure
the effect of the credit on job creation, job retention, company
growth, the movement of firms or the consolidation of firms' operations
into the state, and such other factors as the department selects.

Sec. 7 RCW 82.32.590 and 2006 c 354 s 17, 2006 c 300 s 10, 2006
c 177 s 8, 2006 c 112 s 7, and 2006 c 84 s 7 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
(1) If the department finds that the failure of a taxpayer to file
an annual survey or annual report under RCW 82.04.4452, section 6 of
this act, 82.32.5351, 82.32.650, 82.32.635, 82.32.640, 82.32.630,
82.32.610, or 82.74.040 by the due date was the result of circumstances
beyond the control of the taxpayer, the department shall extend the
time for filing the survey or report. Such extension shall be for a
period of thirty days from the date the department issues its written
notification to the taxpayer that it qualifies for an extension under
this section. The department may grant additional extensions as it
deems proper.
(2) In making a determination whether the failure of a taxpayer to
file an annual survey or annual report by the due date was the result
of circumstances beyond the control of the taxpayer, the department
shall be guided by rules adopted by the department for the waiver or
cancellation of penalties when the underpayment or untimely payment of
any tax was due to circumstances beyond the control of the taxpayer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) The manufacturing modernization account
is hereby created in the custody of the state treasurer. Only the
director may authorize expenditures from the account and no
appropriation is required for expenditures.
(2) The money in the account must be used solely for allowances
under the Washington manufacturing modernization extension services
program created in section 3 of this act, conducting outreach services
by a qualified manufacturing extension partnership affiliate, or the
department's costs for the administration of the Washington
manufacturing modernization extension service program.
(3) Annually, the director must appropriate ten percent of the
funds in the manufacturing modernization account to qualified
manufacturing extension partnership affiliates for the purpose of
conducting outreach services.
(4) Upon receipt of a modernization extension allowance, the
director must make an appropriation to the qualified manufacturing
extension partnership affiliate chosen by the program participant in an
amount equal to the full costs of extension services.
(5) All payments received from a program participant in the
Washington manufacturing modernization extension services program
created in section 3 of this act must be deposited into the
manufacturing modernization account. The deposit of payments under
this section from a program participant cease when the department
specifies that the program participant has met the monetary obligations
of the program.
(6) All revenue solicited and received under the provisions of
section 3(3) of this act must be deposited into the manufacturing
modernization account.
(7) The legislature intends that all appropriations from the
manufacturing modernization account made to qualified manufacturing
extension partnership affiliates will be eligible as the state match in
an affiliate's application for federal matching funds under the
manufacturing extension partnership program of the United States
department of commerce's national institute of standards and
technology.
(8) The definitions in section 2 of this act apply to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) On an annual basis, qualified manufacturing extension
partnership affiliates must provide the department with a list of
companies with which they have conducted modernization services during
the previous year. The department will identify the amount of the
business and occupation taxes that each of these companies paid to the
state during the year when the affiliate provided modernization
services. This amount will become the company's base tax year payment.
(2) During the first year following the year in which the
modernization service was conducted by the affiliate, the department
will identify the amount of the business and occupation taxes paid by
the company. If the amount exceeds the company's base tax year payment
under subsection (1) of this section, ninety percent of the portion of
the payment that is in excess of the base tax year payment will be
deposited into the manufacturing modernization account and the
remainder will be deposited into the state general fund.
(3) During the second year following the year in which the
modernization service was conducted by the affiliate, the department
will identify the amount of the business and occupation taxes paid by
the company. If the amount exceeds the company's base tax year
payment, seventy-five percent of the portion of the payment that is in
excess of the base tax year payment will be deposited into the
manufacturing modernization account and the remainder will be deposited
into the state general fund.
(4) The definitions in section 2 of this act apply to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 1 through 4 and 8 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Section 5 of this act expires July 1, 2018.

--- END ---