BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.20.113 and 1993 c 228 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of licensing shall provide a statement whereby
the licensee may certify his or her ((willingness)) unwillingness to
make an anatomical gift under RCW 68.50.540((, as now or hereafter
amended)). The department shall provide the statement in at least one
of the following ways:
(((1))) (a) On each driver's license; or
(((2))) (b) With each driver's license; or
(((3))) (c) With each in-person driver's license application.
(2) A licensee who fails to certify an unwillingness to make an
anatomical gift under this section consents to make an anatomical gift
under RCW 68.50.540.

--- END ---