BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.55.005 and 1997 c 393 s 20 and 1997 c 3 s 201 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Inflation" means the percentage change in the implicit price
deflator for personal consumption expenditures for the United States as
published for the most recent twelve-month period by the bureau of
economic analysis of the federal department of commerce in September of
the year before the taxes are payable;
(2) "Limit factor" means:
(a) For taxing districts with a population of less than ten
thousand in the calendar year prior to the assessment year, one hundred
((six)) one percent;
(b) For taxing districts for which a limit factor is authorized
under RCW 84.55.0101, the lesser of the limit factor authorized under
that section or one hundred ((six)) one percent;
(c) For all other districts, the lesser of one hundred ((six)) one
percent or one hundred percent plus inflation; and
(3) "Regular property taxes" has the meaning given it in RCW
84.04.140.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.55.0101 and 1997 c 3 s 204 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
Upon a finding of substantial need, the legislative authority of a
taxing district other than the state may provide for the use of a limit
factor under this chapter of one hundred ((six)) one percent or less
unless an increase greater than this limit is approved by the voters at
an election as provided in RCW 84.55.050. In districts with
legislative authorities of four members or less, two-thirds of the
members must approve an ordinance or resolution under this section. In
districts with more than four members, a majority plus one vote must
approve an ordinance or resolution under this section. The new limit
factor shall be effective for taxes collected in the following year
only.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 RCW 84.55.092 (Protection of future levy
capacity) and 1998 c 16 s 3, 1988 c 274 s 4, & 1986 c 107 s 3 are each
repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 and 2 of this act apply both
prospectively and retroactively to taxes levied for collection in 2002
and thereafter.

--- END ---