BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.04.280 and 2007 c 516 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the legislature to establish policy goals
for the ((planning,)) operation, performance of, and investment in, the
state's transportation system. The policy goals ((established under
this section are deemed consistent with the)) shall consist of, but not
be limited to, the following benchmark categories adopted by the
state's blue ribbon commission on transportation on November 30, 2000.
In addition to improving safety, public investments in transportation
should support achievement of these ((policy)) and other priority
goals:
(((a) Preservation: To maintain, preserve, and extend the life and
utility of prior investments in transportation systems and services;
(b) Safety: To provide for and improve the safety and security of
transportation customers and the transportation system;
(c) Mobility: To improve the predictable movement of goods and
people throughout Washington state;
(d) Environment: To enhance Washington's quality of life through
transportation investments that promote energy conservation, enhance
healthy communities, and protect the environment; and
(e) Stewardship: To continuously improve the quality,
effectiveness, and efficiency of the transportation system.
(2) The powers, duties, and functions of state transportation
agencies must be performed in a manner consistent with the policy goals
set forth in subsection (1) of this section.
(3))) No interstate highways, state routes, and local arterials
shall be in poor condition; no bridges shall be structurally deficient,
and safety retrofits shall be performed on those state bridges at the
highest seismic risk levels; traffic congestion on urban state highways
shall be significantly reduced and no worse than the national mean;
delay per driver shall be significantly reduced and no worse than the
national mean; per capita vehicle miles traveled shall be maintained at
2000 levels; the nonauto share of commuter trips shall be increased in
urban areas; administrative costs as a percentage of transportation
spending shall achieve the most efficient quartile nationally; and the
state's public transit agencies shall achieve the median cost per
vehicle revenue hour of peer transit agencies, adjusting for the
regional cost-of-living.
(2) These policy goals ((are intended to)) shall be the basis for
((establishing)) establishment of detailed and measurable ((objectives
and related)) performance ((measures)) benchmarks.
(((4))) (3) It is the intent of the legislature that the ((office
of financial management)) transportation commission establish
((objectives and)) performance measures ((for the department of
transportation and other state agencies with transportation-related
responsibilities)) to ensure transportation system performance at
local, regional, and state government levels ((progresses toward the
attainment of the policy goals set forth in subsection (1) of this
section. The office of financial management shall submit initial
objectives and performance measures to the legislature for its review
and shall provide copies of the same to the commission during the 2008
legislative session. The office of financial management shall submit
objectives and performance measures to the legislature for its review
and shall provide copies of the same to the commission during each
regular session of the legislature during an even-numbered year
thereafter.
(5) This section does not create a private right of action)), and
the transportation commission should work with the appropriate
government entities to accomplish this.

--- END ---