BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.343.050 and 1990 c 161 s 3 and 1990 c 33 s 326 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Upon receipt by the educational service district superintendent of
a resolution adopted by the board of directors or a written petition
from a first-class or second-class school district signed by at least
twenty percent of the registered voters of a school district previously
divided into directors' districts, which resolution or petition shall
request dissolution of the existing directors' districts and
reapportionment of the district into no fewer than three directors'
districts and with no more than two directors at large, the
superintendent, after formation of the question to be submitted to the
voters, shall give notice thereof to the county auditor who shall call
and hold a special election of the voters of the entire school district
to approve or reject such proposal, such election to be called,
conducted and the returns canvassed as in regular school district
elections.
If approval of a majority of those registered voters voting in said
election is acquired, at the expiration of terms of the incumbent
directors of such school district their successors shall be elected in
the manner approved.

--- END ---