BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.17.080 and 2006 c 344 s 30 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) On the day the treasurer is designated, each candidate or
political committee shall file with the commission and the county
auditor or elections officer of the county in which the candidate
resides, or in the case of a political committee, the county in which
the treasurer resides, in addition to any statement of organization
required under RCW 42.17.040 or 42.17.050, a report of all
contributions received and expenditures made prior to that date, if
any.
(2) At the following intervals each treasurer shall file with the
commission and the county auditor or elections officer of the county in
which the candidate resides, or in the case of a political committee,
the county in which the committee maintains its office or headquarters,
and if there is no office or headquarters then in the county in which
the treasurer resides, a report containing the information required by
RCW 42.17.090:
(a) On the twenty-first day and the seventh day immediately
preceding the date on which the election is held; and
(b) On the tenth day of the first month after the election; and
(c) On the tenth day of each month in which no other reports are
required to be filed under this section: PROVIDED, That such report
shall only be filed if the committee has received a contribution or
made an expenditure in the preceding calendar month and either the
total contributions received or total expenditures made since the last
such report exceed two hundred dollars.
When there is no outstanding debt or obligation, and the campaign
fund is closed, and the campaign is concluded in all respects, and in
the case of a political committee, the committee has ceased to function
and has dissolved, the treasurer shall file a final report. Upon
submitting a final report, the duties of the treasurer shall cease and
there shall be no obligation to make any further reports.
The report filed twenty-one days before the election shall report
all contributions received and expenditures made as of the end of the
((fifth)) one business day before the date of the report. The report
filed seven days before the election shall report all contributions
received and expenditures made as of the end of the one business day
before the date of the report. Reports filed on the tenth day of the
month shall report all contributions received and expenditures made
from the closing date of the last report filed through the last day of
the month preceding the date of the current report.
(3) For the period beginning the first day of the fourth month
preceding the date on which the special election is held, or for the
period beginning the first day of the fifth month before the date on
which the general election is held, and ending on the date of that
special or general election, each Monday the treasurer shall file with
the commission and the appropriate county elections officer a report of
each bank deposit made during the previous seven calendar days. The
report shall contain the name of each person contributing the funds so
deposited and the amount contributed by each person. However,
contributions of no more than twenty-five dollars in the aggregate from
any one person may be deposited without identifying the contributor.
A copy of the report shall be retained by the treasurer for his or her
records. In the event of deposits made by a deputy treasurer, the copy
shall be forwarded to the treasurer for his or her records. Each
report shall be certified as correct by the treasurer or deputy
treasurer making the deposit.
(4) If a city requires that candidates or committees for city
offices file reports with a city agency, the candidate or treasurer so
filing need not also file the report with the county auditor or
elections officer.
(5) The treasurer or candidate shall maintain books of account
accurately reflecting all contributions and expenditures on a current
basis within five business days of receipt or expenditure. During the
eight days immediately preceding the date of the election the books of
account shall be kept current within one business day. As specified in
the committee's statement of organization filed under RCW 42.17.040,
the books of account must be open for public inspection by appointment
at the designated place for inspections between 8:00 a.m. and 8:00 p.m.
on any day from the eighth day immediately before the election through
the day immediately before the election, other than Saturday, Sunday,
or a legal holiday. It is a violation of this chapter for a candidate
or political committee to refuse to allow and keep an appointment for
an inspection to be conducted during these authorized times and days.
The appointment must be allowed at an authorized time and day for such
inspections that is within twenty-four hours of the time and day that
is requested for the inspection.
(6) The treasurer or candidate shall preserve books of account,
bills, receipts, and all other financial records of the campaign or
political committee for not less than five calendar years following the
year during which the transaction occurred.
(7) All reports filed pursuant to subsection (1) or (2) of this
section shall be certified as correct by the candidate and the
treasurer.
(8) Copies of all reports filed pursuant to this section shall be
readily available for public inspection for at least two consecutive
hours Monday through Friday, excluding legal holidays, between 8:00
a.m. and 8:00 p.m., as specified in the committee's statement of
organization filed pursuant to RCW 42.17.040, at the principal
headquarters or, if there is no headquarters, at the address of the
treasurer or such other place as may be authorized by the commission.
(9) After January 1, 2002, a report that is filed with the
commission electronically need not also be filed with the county
auditor or elections officer.
(10) The commission shall adopt administrative rules establishing
requirements for filer participation in any system designed and
implemented by the commission for the electronic filing of reports.

--- END ---