BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there is a
critical shortage of food animal veterinarians particularly in rural
areas of the state. The legislature finds that among the factors
contributing to this shortage is the need to repay student loans that
are taken out to pay for an extensive and high-cost education. To pay
these student loans, licensed graduates currently find it necessary to
take higher paying positions that provide service to companion and
small animals.
The legislature finds that the livestock industry provides a
critical component of the food supply. Providing adequate animal
health and disease diagnostic services is of high importance not only
to protect animal health, but also for the protection of our food
supply, the protection of public health from potential effects of
contagious diseases, and to provide an essential disease detection and
response capability.
The legislature intends to increase the supply of food animal
veterinarians by providing incentives to graduates of Washington State
University college of veterinary medicine to focus on food animal
health services to address this critical shortage.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "College" means the Washington State University college of
veterinary medicine.
(2) "Conditional scholarship" means a loan that is forgiven in
whole or in part if the recipient renders service as a food animal
veterinarian in this state.
(3) "Eligible student" means a student who is registered for at
least six credit hours or the equivalent, is making satisfactory
academic progress as defined by the college, has declared veterinary
medicine for his or her major, and has a declared intention to practice
veterinary medicine with an emphasis in food animal medicine in the
state of Washington.
(4) "Food animal" means any species commonly recognized as
livestock including, but not limited to, poultry, cattle, swine, and
sheep.
(5) "Food animal veterinarian" means a veterinarian licensed and
registered under chapter 18.92 RCW and engaged in general and food
animal practice as a primary specialty, who has at least fifty percent
of his or her practice time devoted to large production animal
veterinary practice.
(6) "Forgiven" or "to forgive" or "forgiveness" means to practice
veterinary medicine with an emphasis in food animal medicine in the
state of Washington in lieu of monetary repayment.
(7) "Participant" means an eligible student who has received a
conditional scholarship under this chapter.
(8) "Satisfied" means paid-in-full.
(9) "University" means Washington State University.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The food animal veterinarian conditional
scholarship program is established. The program shall be administered
by the university. In administering the program, the university has
the following powers and duties:
(1) To select, in consultation with the college, up to two students
each year to receive conditional scholarships;
(2) To adopt necessary rules and guidelines;
(3) To publicize the program;
(4) To collect and manage repayments from students who do not meet
their obligations under this chapter; and
(5) To solicit and accept grants and donations from public and
private sources for the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The university shall select participants
based on an application process conducted by the university.
(2) The university shall establish a selection committee for
screening and selecting recipients of the conditional scholarships.
The selection committee shall include at least two representatives from
the college, at least one of whom is a faculty member teaching in food
animal veterinary medicine, and at least one representative from the
beef, dairy, or sheep industry.
(3) The selection criteria shall emphasize factors demonstrating a
sustained interest in food animals and serving the needs of
Washington's agricultural communities. The criteria shall also take
into account the need for food animal veterinarians in diverse areas of
the state and allocate funds in a manner designed to represent a
cross-section of geographic locations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 To remain an eligible student and receive
continuing disbursements under the program, a participant must be
considered by the college to be making satisfactory academic progress.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The university may award conditional
scholarships to eligible students from the funds appropriated to the
university for this purpose, or from any private donations, or any
other funds given to the university for this program. The amount of
the conditional scholarship awarded an individual may not exceed the
amount of resident tuition and fees at the college, as well as the cost
of room, board, laboratory fees and supplies, and books, incurred by an
eligible student and approved by a financial aid administrator at the
university. Participants are eligible to receive conditional
scholarships for a maximum of five years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) A participant in the conditional
scholarship program incurs an obligation to repay the conditional
scholarship, with interest, unless he or she is employed as a food
animal veterinarian in Washington state for each year of scholarship
received, under rules adopted by the university.
(2) The interest rate shall be determined annually by the
university.
(3) The minimum payment shall be set by the university. The
maximum period for repayment is ten years, with payments of principal
and interest accruing quarterly commencing six months from the date the
participant completes or discontinues the course of study, including
any internship or residency in food animal medicine and surgery.
Provisions for deferral of payment shall be determined by the
university.
(4) The entire principal and interest of each payment shall be
forgiven for each payment period in which the participant is employed
as a food animal veterinarian in this state until the entire repayment
obligation is satisfied. Should the participant cease to be employed
as a food animal veterinarian in this state before the participant's
repayment obligation is completed, payments on the unsatisfied portion
of the principal and interest shall begin the next payment period and
continue until the remainder of the participant's repayment obligation
is satisfied.
(5) The university is responsible for collection of repayments made
under this section and shall exercise due diligence in such collection,
maintaining all necessary records to ensure that maximum repayments are
made. Collection and servicing of repayments under this section shall
be pursued using the full extent of the law, including wage garnishment
if necessary. The university is responsible to forgive all or parts of
such repayments under the criteria established in this section and
shall maintain all necessary records of forgiven payments.
(6) Receipts from the payment of principal or interest or any other
subsidies to which the university as administrator is entitled, that
are paid by or on behalf of participants under this section, shall be
deposited in the food animal veterinarian conditional scholarship
account and shall be used to cover the costs of granting the
conditional scholarships, maintaining necessary records, and making
collections under subsection (5) of this section. The university shall
maintain accurate records of these costs, and all receipts beyond those
necessary to pay such costs shall be used to grant conditional
scholarships to eligible students.
(7) The university shall adopt rules to define the terms of
repayment, including applicable interest rates, fees, and deferments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) The food animal veterinarian conditional
scholarship account is created in the custody of the state treasurer.
No appropriation is required for expenditures of funds from the
account. The account is not subject to allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW except for moneys used for program administration.
(2) The university shall deposit into the account all moneys
received for the program. The account shall be self-sustaining and
consist of funds appropriated by the legislature for the food animal
veterinarian conditional scholarship program, private contributions to
the program, and receipts from participant repayments.
(3) Expenditures from the account may be used solely for
conditional scholarships to participants in the program established by
this chapter and costs associated with program administration by the
university.
(4) Disbursements from the account may be made only on the
authorization of the university.

Sec. 9 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2007 c 523 s 5, 2007 c 357 s 21, and
2007 c 214 s 14 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the foster care scholarship endowment fund, the foster care
endowed scholarship trust fund, the students with dependents grant
account, the basic health plan self-insurance reserve account, the
contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined
fund drive account, the commemorative works account, the Washington
international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the developmental
disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account, the fair fund,
the family leave insurance account, the food animal veterinarian
conditional scholarship account, the fruit and vegetable inspection
account, the future teachers conditional scholarship account, the game
farm alternative account, the GET ready for math and science
scholarship account, the grain inspection revolving fund, the juvenile
accountability incentive account, the law enforcement officers' and
fire fighters' plan 2 expense fund, the local tourism promotion
account, the produce railcar pool account, the regional transportation
investment district account, the rural rehabilitation account, the
stadium and exhibition center account, the youth athletic facility
account, the self-insurance revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide
abatement account, the children's trust fund, the Washington horse
racing commission Washington bred owners' bonus fund account, the
Washington horse racing commission class C purse fund account, the
individual development account program account, the Washington horse
racing commission operating account (earnings from the Washington horse
racing commission operating account must be credited to the Washington
horse racing commission class C purse fund account), the life sciences
discovery fund, the Washington state heritage center account, and the
reading achievement account. However, the earnings to be distributed
shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's
service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right of way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

--- END ---