BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.64 RCW
to read as follows:
It is the intent of the legislature to protect and promote public
health, safety, and welfare by ensuring the timely availability of all
legally prescribed drugs and devices in all state licensed pharmacies.
The legislature intends that each pharmacy comply with its duty to
timely dispense all legally prescribed drugs and devices or the
therapeutic equivalent in order to meet the pharmaceutical needs of its
patients.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.64 RCW
to read as follows:
Beginning January 1, 2009, a pharmacy owner must file with the
department an annual declaration that it has complied with its duty to
timely dispense all legally prescribed drugs and devices or the
therapeutic equivalent in order to meet the pharmaceutical needs of its
patients, unless the department has granted an exception to that
pharmacy owner.
If the pharmacy owner fails to file the declaration required by
this section, no renewal or new license shall be issued (except upon
compliance with administrative procedures, administrative requirements,
and fees determined as provided in RCW 18.64.043).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 18.64 RCW
to read as follows:
The secretary shall by January 1, 2009, develop rules for granting
exceptions to the requirement to dispense all legally prescribed drugs
and devices in section 2 of this act based upon the nature and needs of
the population served by each pharmacy location.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.64.043 and 1996 c 191 s 43 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The owner of each pharmacy shall pay an original license fee to
be determined by the secretary, and annually thereafter, on or before
a date to be determined by the secretary, a fee to be determined by the
secretary, for which he or she shall receive a license of location,
which shall entitle the owner to operate such pharmacy at the location
specified, or such other temporary location as the secretary may
approve, for the period ending on a date to be determined by the
secretary as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280, and each such
owner shall at the time of filing proof of payment of such fee as
provided in RCW 18.64.045 as now or hereafter amended, file with the
department on a blank therefor provided, a declaration of ownership and
location, which declaration of ownership and location so filed as
aforesaid shall be deemed presumptive evidence of ownership of the
pharmacy mentioned therein. The pharmacy owner's declaration of
compliance with its duty to timely dispense all legally prescribed
drugs and devices, as required by section 2 of this act, must be filed
with the declaration of ownership and location and proof of payment of
the license fee.
(2) It shall be the duty of the owner to immediately notify the
department of any change of location ((or)), ownership, or ability to
dispense all legally prescribed drugs and devices and to keep the
license of location or the renewal thereof and declaration of
compliance properly exhibited in said pharmacy.
(3) Failure to comply with this section shall be deemed a
misdemeanor, and each day that said failure continues shall be deemed
a separate offense.
(4) In the event such license fee remains unpaid on the date due,
no renewal or new license shall be issued except upon compliance with
administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees
determined as provided in RCW 43.70.250 ((and)), 43.70.280, and
18.64.043.

--- END ---