BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.102.020 and 2007 c 229 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Annual state contribution limit" means seven million five
hundred thousand dollars statewide per fiscal year.
(2) "Assessed value" means the valuation of taxable real property
as placed on the last completed assessment roll.
(3) "Base year" means the first calendar year following the
calendar year in which a sponsoring local government, and any
cosponsoring local government, receives approval by the board for a
project award, provided that the approval is granted before October
15th. If approval by the board is received on or after October 15th
but on or before December 31st, the "base year" is the second calendar
year following the calendar year in which a sponsoring local
government, and any cosponsoring local government, receives approval by
the board for a project award.
(4) "Board" means the community economic revitalization board under
chapter 43.160 RCW.
(5) "Demonstration project" means one of the following projects:
(a) Bellingham waterfront redevelopment project;
(b) Spokane river district project at Liberty Lake; and
(c) Vancouver riverwest project.
(6) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(7) "Fiscal year" means the twelve-month period beginning July 1st
and ending the following June 30th.
(8) "Local excise taxes" means local revenues derived from the
imposition of sales and use taxes authorized in RCW 82.14.030 at the
tax rate that was in effect at the time the revenue development area
was approved by the board, except that if a local government reduces
the rate of such tax after the revenue development area was approved by
the board, "local excise taxes" means the local revenues derived from
the imposition of the sales and use taxes authorized in RCW 82.14.030
at the lower tax rate.
(9) "Local excise tax allocation revenue" means the amount of local
excise taxes received by the local government during the measurement
year from taxable activity within the revenue development area over and
above the amount of local excise taxes received by the local government
during the base year from taxable activity within the revenue
development area, except that:
(a) If a sponsoring local government adopts a revenue development
area and reasonably determines that no activity subject to tax under
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW occurred within the boundaries of the
revenue development area in the twelve months immediately preceding the
approval of the revenue development area by the board, "local excise
tax allocation revenue" means the entire amount of local excise taxes
received by the sponsoring local government during a calendar year
period beginning with the calendar year immediately following the
approval of the revenue development area by the board and continuing
with each measurement year thereafter; ((and))
(b) For revenue development areas approved by the board in calendar
years 2006 and 2007 that do not meet the requirements in (a) of this
subsection and if legislation is enacted in this state during the 2007
legislative session that adopts the sourcing provisions of the
streamlined sales and use tax agreement, "local excise tax allocation
revenue" means the amount of local excise taxes received by the
sponsoring local government during the measurement year from taxable
activity within the revenue development area over and above an amount
of local excise taxes received by the sponsoring local government
during the 2007 or 2008 base year, as the case may be, adjusted by the
department for any estimated impacts from retail sales and use tax
sourcing changes effective in 2008. The amount of base year adjustment
determined by the department is final; and
(c) If the sponsoring local government of a revenue development
area related to a demonstration project reasonably determines that no
local excise tax distributions were received between August 1, 2008,
and December 31, 2008, from within the boundaries of the revenue
development area, "local excise tax allocation revenue" means the
entire amount of local excise taxes received by the sponsoring local
government during a calendar year period beginning with 2009 and
continuing with each measurement year thereafter.
(10) "Local government" means any city, town, county, port
district, and any federally recognized Indian tribe.
(11) "Local infrastructure financing" means the use of revenues
received from local excise tax allocation revenues, local property tax
allocation revenues, other revenues from local public sources, and
revenues received from the local option sales and use tax authorized in
RCW 82.14.475, dedicated to pay either the principal and interest on
bonds authorized under RCW 39.102.150 or to pay public improvement
costs on a pay-as-you-go basis subject to RCW 39.102.195, or both.
(12) "Local property tax allocation revenue" means those tax
revenues derived from the receipt of regular property taxes levied on
the property tax allocation revenue value and used for local
infrastructure financing.
(13)(a) "Revenues from local public sources" means:
(i) Amounts of local excise tax allocation revenues and local
property tax allocation revenues, dedicated by sponsoring local
governments, participating local governments, and participating taxing
districts, for local infrastructure financing; and
(ii) Any other local revenues, except as provided in (b) of this
subsection, including revenues derived from federal and private
sources.
(b) Revenues from local public sources do not include any local
funds derived from state grants, state loans, or any other state moneys
including any local sales and use taxes credited against the state
sales and use taxes imposed under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW.
(14) "Low-income housing" means residential housing for low-income
persons or families who lack the means which is necessary to enable
them, without financial assistance, to live in decent, safe, and
sanitary dwellings, without overcrowding. For the purposes of this
subsection, "low income" means income that does not exceed eighty
percent of the median family income for the standard metropolitan
statistical area in which the revenue development area is located.
(15) "Measurement year" means a calendar year, beginning with the
calendar year following the base year and each calendar year
thereafter, that is used annually to measure state and local excise tax
allocation revenues.
(16) "Ordinance" means any appropriate method of taking legislative
action by a local government.
(17) "Participating local government" means a local government
having a revenue development area within its geographic boundaries that
has entered into a written agreement with a sponsoring local government
as provided in RCW 39.102.080 to allow the use of all or some of its
local excise tax allocation revenues or other revenues from local
public sources dedicated for local infrastructure financing.
(18) "Participating taxing district" means a local government
having a revenue development area within its geographic boundaries that
has entered into a written agreement with a sponsoring local government
as provided in RCW 39.102.080 to allow the use of some or all of its
local property tax allocation revenues or other revenues from local
public sources dedicated for local infrastructure financing.
(19)(a)(i) "Property tax allocation revenue value" means
seventy-five percent of any increase in the assessed value of real
property in a revenue development area resulting from:
(A) The placement of new construction, improvements to property, or
both, on the assessment roll, where the new construction and
improvements are initiated after the revenue development area is
approved by the board;
(B) The cost of new housing construction, conversion, and
rehabilitation improvements, when such cost is treated as new
construction for purposes of chapter 84.55 RCW as provided in RCW
84.14.020, and the new housing construction, conversion, and
rehabilitation improvements are initiated after the revenue development
area is approved by the board;
(C) The cost of rehabilitation of historic property, when such cost
is treated as new construction for purposes of chapter 84.55 RCW as
provided in RCW 84.26.070, and the rehabilitation is initiated after
the revenue development area is approved by the board.
(ii) Increases in the assessed value of real property in a revenue
development area resulting from (a)(i)(A) through (C) of this
subsection are included in the property tax allocation revenue value in
the initial year. These same amounts are also included in the property
tax allocation revenue value in subsequent years unless the property
becomes exempt from property taxation.
(b) "Property tax allocation revenue value" includes seventy-five
percent of any increase in the assessed value of new construction
consisting of an entire building in the years following the initial
year, unless the building becomes exempt from property taxation.
(c) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, "property tax
allocation revenue value" does not include any increase in the assessed
value of real property after the initial year.
(d) There is no property tax allocation revenue value if the
assessed value of real property in a revenue development area has not
increased as a result of any of the reasons specified in (a)(i)(A)
through (C) of this subsection.
(e) For purposes of this subsection, "initial year" means:
(i) For new construction and improvements to property added to the
assessment roll, the year during which the new construction and
improvements are initially placed on the assessment roll;
(ii) For the cost of new housing construction, conversion, and
rehabilitation improvements, when such cost is treated as new
construction for purposes of chapter 84.55 RCW, the year when such cost
is treated as new construction for purposes of levying taxes for
collection in the following year; and
(iii) For the cost of rehabilitation of historic property, when
such cost is treated as new construction for purposes of chapter 84.55
RCW, the year when such cost is treated as new construction for
purposes of levying taxes for collection in the following year.
(20) "Taxing district" means a government entity that levies or has
levied for it regular property taxes upon real property located within
a proposed or approved revenue development area.
(21) "Public improvements" means:
(a) Infrastructure improvements within the revenue development area
that include:
(i) Street, bridge, and road construction and maintenance,
including highway interchange construction;
(ii) Water and sewer system construction and improvements,
including wastewater reuse facilities;
(iii) Sidewalks, traffic controls, and streetlights;
(iv) Parking, terminal, and dock facilities;
(v) Park and ride facilities of a transit authority;
(vi) Park facilities and recreational areas, including trails; and
(vii) Storm water and drainage management systems;
(b) Expenditures for facilities and improvements that support
affordable housing as defined in RCW 43.63A.510.
(22) "Public improvement costs" means the cost of: (a) Design,
planning, acquisition including land acquisition, site preparation
including land clearing, construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation,
improvement, and installation of public improvements; (b) demolishing,
relocating, maintaining, and operating property pending construction of
public improvements; (c) the local government's portion of relocating
utilities as a result of public improvements; (d) financing public
improvements, including interest during construction, legal and other
professional services, taxes, insurance, principal and interest costs
on general indebtedness issued to finance public improvements, and any
necessary reserves for general indebtedness; (e) assessments incurred
in revaluing real property for the purpose of determining the property
tax allocation revenue base value that are in excess of costs incurred
by the assessor in accordance with the revaluation plan under chapter
84.41 RCW, and the costs of apportioning the taxes and complying with
this chapter and other applicable law; (f) administrative expenses and
feasibility studies reasonably necessary and related to these costs;
and (g) any of the above-described costs that may have been incurred
before adoption of the ordinance authorizing the public improvements
and the use of local infrastructure financing to fund the costs of the
public improvements.
(23) "Regular property taxes" means regular property taxes as
defined in RCW 84.04.140, except: (a) Regular property taxes levied by
public utility districts specifically for the purpose of making
required payments of principal and interest on general indebtedness;
(b) regular property taxes levied by the state for the support of the
common schools under RCW 84.52.065; and (c) regular property taxes
authorized by RCW 84.55.050 that are limited to a specific purpose.
"Regular property taxes" do not include excess property tax levies that
are exempt from the aggregate limits for junior and senior taxing
districts as provided in RCW 84.52.043.
(24) "Property tax allocation revenue base value" means the
assessed value of real property located within a revenue development
area for taxes levied in the year in which the revenue development area
is adopted for collection in the following year, plus one hundred
percent of any increase in the assessed value of real property located
within a revenue development area that is placed on the assessment
rolls after the revenue development area is adopted, less the property
tax allocation revenue value.
(25) "Relocating a business" means the closing of a business and
the reopening of that business, or the opening of a new business that
engages in the same activities as the previous business, in a different
location within a one-year period, when an individual or entity has an
ownership interest in the business at the time of closure and at the
time of opening or reopening. "Relocating a business" does not include
the closing and reopening of a business in a new location where the
business has been acquired and is under entirely new ownership at the
new location, or the closing and reopening of a business in a new
location as a result of the exercise of the power of eminent domain.
(26) "Revenue development area" means the geographic area adopted
by a sponsoring local government and approved by the board, from which
local excise and property tax allocation revenues are derived for local
infrastructure financing.
(27) "Small business" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
19.85.020.
(28) "Sponsoring local government" means a city, town, or county,
and for the purpose of this chapter a federally recognized Indian tribe
or any combination thereof, that adopts a revenue development area and
applies to the board to use local infrastructure financing.
(29) "State contribution" means the lesser of:
(a) One million dollars;
(b) The state excise tax allocation revenue and state property tax
allocation revenue received by the state during the preceding calendar
year;
(c) The total amount of local excise tax allocation revenues, local
property tax allocation revenues, and other revenues from local public
sources, that are dedicated by a sponsoring local government, any
participating local governments, and participating taxing districts, in
the preceding calendar year to the payment of principal and interest on
bonds issued under RCW 39.102.150 or to pay public improvement costs on
a pay-as-you-go basis subject to RCW 39.102.195, or both; or
(d) The amount of project award granted by the board in the notice
of approval to use local infrastructure financing under RCW 39.102.040.
(30) "State excise taxes" means revenues derived from state retail
sales and use taxes under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW, less the amount
of tax distributions from all local retail sales and use taxes, other
than the local sales and use taxes authorized by RCW 82.14.475, imposed
on the same taxable events that are credited against the state retail
sales and use taxes under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW.
(31) "State excise tax allocation revenue" means the amount of
state excise taxes received by the state during the measurement year
from taxable activity within the revenue development area over and
above the amount of state excise taxes received by the state during the
base year from taxable activity within the revenue development area,
except that:
(a) If a sponsoring local government adopts a revenue development
area and reasonably determines that no activity subject to tax under
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW occurred within the boundaries of the
revenue development area in the twelve months immediately preceding the
approval of the revenue development area by the board, "state excise
tax allocation revenue" means the entire amount of state excise taxes
received by the state during a calendar year period beginning with the
calendar year immediately following the approval of the revenue
development area by the board and continuing with each measurement year
thereafter; ((and))
(b) For revenue development areas approved by the board in calendar
years 2006 and 2007 that do not meet the requirements in (a) of this
subsection and if legislation is enacted in this state during the 2007
legislative session that adopts the sourcing provisions of the
streamlined sales and use tax agreement, "state excise tax allocation
revenue" means the amount of state excise taxes received by the state
during the measurement year from taxable activity within the revenue
development area over and above an amount of state excise taxes
received by the state during the 2007 or 2008 base year, as the case
may be, adjusted by the department for any estimated impacts from
retail sales and use tax sourcing changes effective in 2008. The
amount of base year adjustment determined by the department is final;
and
(c) If the sponsoring local government of a revenue development
area related to a demonstration project reasonably determines that no
local excise tax distributions were received between August 1, 2008,
and December 31, 2008, from within the boundaries of the revenue
development area, "state excise tax allocation revenue" means the
entire amount of state excise taxes received by the state during a
calendar year period beginning with 2009 and continuing with each
measurement year thereafter.
(32) "State property tax allocation revenue" means those tax
revenues derived from the imposition of property taxes levied by the
state for the support of common schools under RCW 84.52.065 on the
property tax allocation revenue value.
(33) "Real property" has the same meaning as in RCW 84.04.090 and
also includes any privately owned improvements located on publicly
owned land that are subject to property taxation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Section 1 of this act expires June 30, 2039.

--- END ---