BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.28.060 and 2007 c 464 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every person who shall employ, and every parent, guardian or
other person having the care, custody or control of such child, who
shall permit to be employed, by another, any child under the age of
fourteen years at any labor whatever, in or in connection with any
store, shop, factory, mine or any inside employment not connected with
farm or house work, without the written permit thereto of a judge of a
superior court of the county wherein such child may live, shall be
guilty of a misdemeanor.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to children
employed as:
(a) Actors or performers in film, video, audio, or theatrical
productions; ((or))
(b) Youth soccer referees who have been certified by a national
referee certification program; or
(c) Workers for, and under the supervision of, their parents.

--- END ---