BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 90.44 RCW
to read as follows:
A withdrawal of public groundwaters for fire prevention purposes,
in an amount not exceeding five thousand gallons a day, is exempt from
the permit requirements of RCW 90.44.050. For the purposes of this
section, "fire prevention purposes" includes, but is not limited to,
water applied or stored for emergency fire suppression activities or
for the application of water to trees or other vegetation in order to
prevent or address hazardous fire conditions.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.44.050 and 2003 c 307 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
After June 6, 1945, no withdrawal of public groundwaters of the
state shall be begun, nor shall any well or other works for such
withdrawal be constructed, unless an application to appropriate such
waters has been made to the department and a permit has been granted by
it as herein provided((: EXCEPT, HOWEVER, That)). However, any
withdrawal of public groundwaters for stock-watering purposes, or for
the watering of a lawn or of a noncommercial garden not exceeding one-half acre in area, or for single or group domestic uses in an amount
not exceeding five thousand gallons a day, or as provided in RCW
90.44.052 or in section 1 of this act, or for an industrial purpose in
an amount not exceeding five thousand gallons a day, is and shall be
exempt from the provisions of this section, but, to the extent that it
is regularly used beneficially, shall be entitled to a right equal to
that established by a permit issued under the provisions of this
chapter((: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That)). The department from time to
time may require the person or agency making any such small withdrawal
to furnish information as to the means for and the quantity of that
withdrawal((: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That)). Additionally, at the option
of the party making withdrawals of groundwaters of the state not
exceeding five thousand gallons per day, applications under this
section or declarations under RCW 90.44.090 may be filed and permits
and certificates obtained in the same manner and under the same
requirements as is in this chapter provided in the case of withdrawals
in excess of five thousand gallons a day.

--- END ---