BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The purpose of this chapter is to assure
that persons or entities authorized to prescribe, dispense, or purchase
prescription drugs in Washington use an evidence-based approach.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The legislature finds that:
(1) The state of Washington has an interest in maximizing the well-being of its residents and in containing health care costs;
(2) To further its legitimate interest in the well-being of its
residents and containing health care costs, the state of Washington has
shown, through numerous legislative and executive branch activities, a
strong commitment to evidence-based care and cost-effective health
purchasing. The commitment is demonstrated through establishment of
the Washington evidence-based prescription drug program and the state
preferred drug list under RCW 70.14.050, establishment of the
prescription drug purchasing consortium under RCW 70.14.060, and both
generic and therapeutic drug substitution under chapter 69.41 RCW. The
Washington state health technology assessment program, established
under chapter 70.14 RCW, is applying the principles of evidence-based
care and cost-effective purchasing to the review of medical devices and
procedures for state-purchased health care programs. Finally, the
state of Washington is an active participant in the Puget Sound health
alliance, whose goal is to improve the quality and transparency of
health services provided across the public and private sectors;
(3) In 2004, the pharmaceutical industry spent twenty-seven billion
dollars marketing pharmaceuticals in the United States and spent more
than any other sector in the United States on its sales force and media
advertising. Pharmaceutical manufacturers spend twice as much on
marketing as on research and development;
(4) Marketing programs are designed to increase sales, income, and
profit. Frequently, progress toward these goals comes at the expense
of evidence-based care and sometimes the health of individual patients;
(5) There is considerable evidence that pharmaceutical marketing
campaigns lead doctors to prescribe drugs based on incomplete and
biased information, particularly for prescribers who lack the time to
perform substantive research assessing whether the messages they are
receiving from pharmaceutical representatives are full and accurate;
(6) The federal food and drug administration requires marketing and
advertising to be fair and balanced; however, the federal food and drug
administration has limited legal ability to enforce this requirement;
(7) Newer drugs on the market do not necessarily provide additional
benefits over older drugs but do add costs and as yet unknown side
effects;
(8) Between 1975 and 2000, fifty percent of all drug withdrawals
from the market and "black box warnings" were within the first two
years of the release of the drug. One-fifth of all drugs are subject
to "black box warnings" or withdrawal from the market because of
serious public health concerns. Marketing that results in prescribers
using the newest drugs also results in prescribing drugs that are more
likely to be subject to these warnings and withdrawal;
(9) Nearly one-third of the five-fold increase in spending on drugs
in the United States over the last decade can be attributed to
marketing-induced shifts in doctors' prescribing from existing,
effective, and lower cost, often generic, therapies to new and more
expensive treatments, which often have little or no evidence-based
therapeutic value;
(10) Several studies suggest that drug samples clearly affect
prescribing behavior in favor of the sample, and that the presence of
drug samples may influence physicians to dispense or prescribe drugs
that differ from their preferred drug source; and
(11) This act is necessary to promote the use of safe and
clinically effective drugs, and to advance health care cost-containment
efforts for the state, consumers, and businesses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Program" means the prescription drug professional education
program.
(2) "Administrator" means the administrator of the authority.
(3) "Authority" means the health care authority.
(4) "State purchased health care" means the same as defined in RCW
41.05.011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) By January 1, 2009, the authority shall
establish the prescription drug professional education program to:
(a) Enhance the health of residents of the state;
(b) Promote evidence-based treatment;
(c) Encourage better communication between state agencies and
health care practitioners participating in state purchased health care
programs; and
(d) Reduce the health complications and unnecessary costs
associated with nonevidence-based drug prescribing.
(2) The authority shall design the program with state agencies
administering state purchased health care programs. In designing the
program, the authority shall consult with national experts, prescribers
and dispensers of drugs, carriers and health plans, hospitals, pharmacy
benefit managers, and consumers.
(3) The program shall consist of outreach and education to
prescribers and dispensers of drugs in the state and shall include
evidence-based information, including the use of generic drugs as
demonstrated in the state's prescription drug purchasing consortium
under RCW 70.14.060.
(4) The program shall provide information to prescribers through a
variety of means, including written and web-based materials and
personal visits.
(5) Where possible, the program shall share prescriber-specific
data in a report card format that compares each prescriber's practice
to evidence-based practice standards that promote safety and cost-effectiveness. Such data shall be confidential and made available only
to the individual prescriber, unless the data is aggregated for
reporting purposes.
(6) Starting January 10, 2009, and annually thereafter, the
authority shall provide to the legislature an annual report on the
operation of the program. The report shall include information on the
outreach and education components of the program, the impact of the
program on prescribing practices, revenues, expenditures, and balances;
and savings attributable to the program in state-funded health care
programs.
(7) Beginning April 1, 2009, each manufacturer of prescription
drugs that are provided to Washington state residents through the
medicaid program under chapter 74.09 RCW shall pay a fee of five
thousand dollars per calendar year to the state. Fees collected under
this subsection shall be used to cover the cost of implementing this
chapter.
(8) The authority may solicit grants and donations from public and
private sources for the program.
(9) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit carriers
having integrated delivery systems with pharmacy management programs
from establishing and using their own evidenced-based prescribing
standards and educational efforts as a means of meeting the goals and
objectives of the prescription drug professional education program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The prescription drug professional education
program account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All
receipts from the fee established in section 4 of this act must be
deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used
only for the prescription drug professional education program. Only
the administrator or the administrator's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The authority may adopt rules to implement
the provisions of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This chapter may be known and cited as the
prescription drug evidence-based education act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---