BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.24.031 and 2004 c 271 s 158 are each amended to
read as follows:
A candidate who desires to have his or her name printed on the
ballot for election to an office other than president of the United
States, vice president of the United States, or an office for which
ownership of property is a prerequisite to voting shall complete and
file a declaration of candidacy. The secretary of state shall adopt,
by rule, a declaration of candidacy form for the office of precinct
committee officer and a separate standard form for candidates for all
other offices filing under this chapter. Included on the standard form
shall be:
(1) A place for the candidate to declare that he or she is a
registered voter within the jurisdiction of the office for which he or
she is filing, and the address at which he or she is registered;
(2) A place for the candidate to indicate the position for which he
or she is filing;
(3) A place for the candidate to indicate a party designation, if
applicable;
(4) A place for the candidate to indicate the amount of the filing
fee accompanying the declaration of candidacy or for the candidate to
indicate that he or she is ((filing a nominating)) submitting a filing
fee petition in lieu of the filing fee under RCW 29A.24.091;
(5) A place for the candidate to sign the declaration of candidacy,
stating that the information provided on the form is true and swearing
or affirming that he or she will support the Constitution and laws of
the United States and the Constitution and laws of the state of
Washington.
In the case of a declaration of candidacy filed electronically,
submission of the form constitutes agreement that the information
provided with the filing is true, that he or she will support the
Constitutions and laws of the United States and the state of
Washington, and that he or she agrees to electronic payment of the
filing fee established in RCW 29A.24.091.
The secretary of state may require any other information on the
form he or she deems appropriate to facilitate the filing process.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.24.070 and 2006 c 263 s 614 are each amended to
read as follows:
Declarations of candidacy shall be filed with the following filing
officers:
(1) The secretary of state for declarations of candidacy for
statewide offices, United States senate, and United States house of
representatives;
(2) The secretary of state for declarations of candidacy for the
state legislature, the court of appeals, and the superior court when
the candidate is seeking office in a district comprised of voters from
two or more counties((. The secretary of state and the county auditor
may accept declarations of candidacy for candidates for the state
legislature, the court of appeals, and the superior court when the
candidate is seeking office in a district comprised of voters from one
county));
(3) The county auditor for all other offices. For any nonpartisan
office, other than judicial offices and school director in joint
districts, where voters from a district comprising more than one county
vote upon the candidates, a declaration of candidacy shall be filed
with the county auditor of the county in which a majority of the
registered voters of the district reside. For school directors in
joint school districts, the declaration of candidacy shall be filed
with the county auditor of the county designated by the superintendent
of public instruction as the county to which the joint school district
is considered as belonging under RCW 28A.323.040((;
(4) For all other purposes of this title, a declaration of
candidacy for the state legislature, the court of appeals, and the
superior court filed with the secretary of state shall be deemed to
have been filed with the county auditor when the candidate is seeking
office in a district composed of voters from one county)).
Each official with whom declarations of candidacy are filed under
this section, within one business day following the closing of the
applicable filing period, shall transmit to the public disclosure
commission the information required in RCW 29A.24.031 (1) through (4)
for each declaration of candidacy filed in his or her office during
such filing period or a list containing the name of each candidate who
files such a declaration in his or her office during such filing period
together with a precise identification of the position sought by each
such candidate and the date on which each such declaration was filed.
Such official, within three days following his or her receipt of any
letter withdrawing a person's name as a candidate, shall also forward
a copy of such withdrawal letter to the public disclosure commission.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.24.091 and 2006 c 206 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
A filing fee of one dollar shall accompany each declaration of
candidacy for precinct committee officer; a filing fee of ten dollars
shall accompany the declaration of candidacy for any office with a
fixed annual salary of one thousand dollars or less; a filing fee equal
to one percent of the annual salary of the office at the time of filing
shall accompany the declaration of candidacy for any office with a
fixed annual salary of more than one thousand dollars per annum. No
filing fee need accompany a declaration of candidacy for any office for
which compensation is on a per diem or per meeting attended basis.
A candidate who lacks sufficient assets or income at the time of
filing to pay the filing fee required by this section shall submit with
his or her declaration of candidacy a filing fee petition. The
petition shall contain not less than a number of signatures of
registered voters equal to the number of dollars of the filing fee.
The signatures shall be of voters registered to vote within the
jurisdiction of the office for which the candidate is filing.
When the candidacy is for:
(1) A statewide office, the fee shall be paid to the secretary of
state;
(2) A legislative or judicial office that includes territory from
more than one county, the fee shall be paid to the secretary of state
for equal division between the treasuries of the counties comprising
the district((.));
(((2))) (3) A legislative or judicial office that includes
territory from only one county((:
(a))), the fee shall be paid to the county auditor ((if the
candidate filed his or her declaration of candidacy with the county
auditor;
(b) The fee shall be paid to the secretary of state if the
candidate filed his or her declaration of candidacy with the secretary
of state. The secretary of state shall then promptly transmit the fee
to the county auditor of the county in which the legislative or
judicial office is located.));
(((3))) (4) A city or town office, the fee shall be paid to the
county auditor, who shall transmit it to the city or town clerk for
deposit in the city or town treasury.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---