BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of a county may impose a sales and
use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The tax is in
addition to other taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from
those persons who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and
82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within the county.
The rate of tax shall be applied to the selling price in the case of a
sales tax or value of the article used in the case of a use tax and may
not exceed:
(a) .04 percent in a county with a population of less than five
hundred thousand persons; and
(b) .02 percent in a county with a population of five hundred
thousand or more persons.
(2) The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section shall be
deducted from the amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or
paid over to the department under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The
department shall perform the collection of such taxes on behalf of the
county at no cost to the county.
(3) Moneys collected under this section shall only be used for
implementation of water quality or water quantity projects, including
but not limited to an on-site program management plan for a marine
recovery area under chapter 70.118A RCW, a water quality project
consistent with the Puget Sound action agenda under RCW 90.71.260, a
water quality or water quantity component of a watershed plan approved
under chapter 90.82 RCW, a groundwater management area plan, or a water
quality project consistent with objectives determined by a total
maximum daily load analysis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2008.

--- END ---