BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9A.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to the information required to be provided by a sex
offender or kidnapping offender who is required to register under the
provisions of RCW 9A.44.130, the county sheriff may request the
offender to provide his or her electronic mail address, internet
communication name, or the uniform resource locator of any personal web
site created or operated by the person. The county sheriff shall
forward any information obtained to the Washington state patrol as
provided in RCW 43.43.540.
(2) The Washington state patrol may share information regarding a
registered sex offender or kidnapping offender's electronic mail
address, internet communication name, or uniform resource locator of
any personal web site created or operated by the person with a business
or organization that offers electronic communication or remote
computing services for the purpose of prescreening users or for
comparison with information that is held by the requesting business or
organization. The requesting business or organization must agree not
to further disseminate the information.

--- END ---