BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that recreational
opportunities are instrumental in promoting human health and well-being
and are part of the heritage of Washington state. State trust lands,
aquatic lands, and other state-owned lands managed by the department of
natural resources provide significant recreational opportunities, along
with other social, economic, and environmental benefits. Lands managed
by the department of natural resources provide, among other values:
(a) Renewable energy resources;
(b) Sustainable revenue for school construction, local governments,
and other state institutions;
(c) Recreational and educational opportunities;
(d) Habitat for fish and wildlife;
(e) Clean air and water; and
(f) Funding for restoration and public access to state-owned
aquatic lands.
(2) The legislature further finds that the state's population has
nearly doubled from three million four hundred thousand to six million
five hundred thousand since the multiple use concept was adopted under
chapter 79.10 RCW, and is projected to increase by another two million
two hundred thousand by 2030. Population growth has increased demand
for recreational access and presents current and future challenges that
must be addressed, such as: Increasing potential for conflict with
adjacent and nearby land uses, including residential land uses; new
forms of trail-based recreation that compete with traditional uses; the
rapid increase of motorized and mechanized recreation; changes in
ownership patterns of large land holdings across the state; the
incompatibility of certain human activities with environmental
protections for endangered species, clean water, clean air, climate
impacting emissions, and habitat; and increased competition for
funding.
(3) The legislature further finds that efforts by the department of
natural resources to consolidate state trust lands will provide more
opportunities for citizens to access larger blocks of state-owned
lands. Therefore, it is prudent to reexamine the policies for
recreational access on state-owned lands and establish a vision for the
future with recommended policy improvements that are:
(a) Environmentally responsible;
(b) Sustainably funded; and
(c) Compatible with trust land and state land management
obligations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A work group is established to make
recommendations to improve recreation on state trust lands, aquatic
lands, and other state-owned lands managed by the department of natural
resources.
(2) The work group's recommendations to improve recreation on
state-owned lands must be compatible with adjacent and nearby land
uses, including residential land uses. The work group shall examine
relevant existing laws and rules and recommend policy changes and
funding alternatives for consideration by the legislature to ensure
safe, sustainable, and enjoyable recreational access. In conducting
this work, the work group must consider: The legal obligations for
trusts, aquatic lands, and natural areas; consistency with
environmental standards needed to protect lands and natural systems;
and related work group recommendations such as the Puget Sound action
agenda defined in chapter 90.71 RCW, the Washington biodiversity
strategy created in executive order 04-02, and the invasive species
council recommendations defined in chapter 79A.25 RCW. The work group
must provide recommendations on ways to coordinate trail maintenance
work with volunteer organizations on state-owned lands.
(3) The work group is comprised of a balanced representation of
individuals with recreational interests and knowledge regarding
specific regions of the state. The work group must consist of no more
than twenty-eight members appointed by the commissioner of public lands
in consultation with the following entities:
(a) Recreational associations and organizations;
(b) Environmental protection associations and organizations;
(c) Corporate and community leaders;
(d) Major landowners;
(e) Local governments;
(f) Tribal governments;
(g) The United States forest service;
(h) The parks and recreation commission;
(i) The recreation and conservation office;
(j) The department of fish and wildlife;
(k) State trust land beneficiaries;
(l) State land leaseholders and contractors;
(m) A representative of the governor, appointed by the governor;
and
(n) Members of the senate and house of representatives, as
appointed by the legislature.
(4) The commissioner of public lands, or the commissioner's
designee, shall serve as chair, and the department of natural resources
shall provide technical and staff support for the work group created by
this section.
(5) Work group members shall be compensated as provided in RCW
43.03.250 and shall receive reimbursement for travel expenses as
provided by RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Costs associated with the
work group must be paid by the department of natural resources from the
general fund appropriation made available to the department of natural
resources.
(6) The work group shall conduct a minimum of two open public
workshops to solicit input from key stakeholders, citizens, and local
jurisdictions, at least one of which must be conducted in a location
east of the crest of the Cascade mountain range.
(7) The work group shall hold meetings, at diverse locations
throughout the state, to gather input from key stakeholders, citizens,
and local jurisdictions regarding the group's proposed recommendations.
(8) The work group shall coordinate with the stakeholder
recreational advisory committees appointed or established by the
commissioner of public lands.
(9) The commissioner of public lands shall submit to the
appropriate standing committees of the legislature, no later than
December 1, 2008, its findings and recommendations for legislation that
is necessary to implement the work group's findings.

--- END ---