BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.06.460 and 2007 c 320 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The governor is authorized to enter into cigarette tax
contracts with the Squaxin Island Tribe, the Nisqually Tribe, Tulalip
Tribes, the Muckleshoot Indian Tribe, the Quinault Nation, the
Jamestown S'Klallam Indian Tribe, the Port Gamble S'Klallam Tribe, the
Stillaguamish Tribe, the Sauk-Suiattle Tribe, the Skokomish Indian
Tribe, the Yakama Nation, the Suquamish Tribe, the Nooksack Indian
Tribe, the Lummi Nation, the Chehalis Confederated Tribes, the Upper
Skagit Tribe, the Snoqualmie Tribe, the Swinomish Tribe, the Samish
Indian Nation, the Quileute Tribe, the Kalispel Tribe, the Confederated
Tribes of the Colville Reservation, the Cowlitz Indian Tribe, the Lower
Elwha Klallam Tribe, the Makah Tribe, the Hoh Tribe, ((and)) the
Spokane Tribe, and the Shoalwater Bay Tribe. Each contract adopted
under this section shall provide that the tribal cigarette tax rate be
one hundred percent of the state cigarette and state and local sales
and use taxes within three years of enacting the tribal tax and shall
be set no lower than eighty percent of the state cigarette and state
and local sales and use taxes during the three-year phase-in period.
The three-year phase-in period shall be shortened by three months each
quarter the number of cartons of nontribal manufactured cigarettes is
at least ten percent or more than the quarterly average number of
cartons of nontribal manufactured cigarettes from the six-month period
preceding the imposition of the tribal tax under the contract. Sales
at a retailer operation not in existence as of the date a tribal tax
under this section is imposed are subject to the full rate of the
tribal tax under the contract. The tribal cigarette tax is in lieu of
the state cigarette and state and local sales and use taxes, as
provided in RCW 43.06.455(3).
(2) A cigarette tax contract under this section is subject to RCW
43.06.455.

--- END ---