BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares that
constructive leisure pursuits by Washington citizens are very
important. This act is intended to encourage responsible participation
in the hobby of collecting, preserving, restoring, and maintaining
vessels of historic and special interest, a hobby that contributes to
the enjoyment of Washington citizens and the preservation of
Washington's classic boat memorabilia.

Sec. 2 RCW 88.02.010 and 1983 c 7 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) (("Vessel" means every watercraft used or capable of being used
as a means of transportation on the water, other than a seaplane.
(2) "Owner" means a person who has a lawful right to possession of
a vessel by purchase, exchange, gift, lease, inheritance, or legal
action whether or not the vessel is subject to a security interest.
(3))) "Collector" means the owner of one or more vessels who
collects, purchases, acquires, trades, or disposes of the vessels or
their parts for the collector's personal use, to preserve, restore, and
maintain the boat for hobby or historical purposes.
(2) "Dealer" means a person, partnership, association, or
corporation engaged in the business of selling vessels at wholesale or
retail in this state.
(((4))) (3) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(4) "Historic vessel" means any vessel that is at least sixty years
old and is only being used for participation in club activities,
exhibitions, tours, parades, and occasional pleasure boating, but does
not include vessels that are used for commercial or rental purposes.
(5) "Owner" means a person who has a lawful right to possession of
a vessel by purchase, exchange, gift, lease, inheritance, or legal
action whether or not the vessel is subject to a security interest.
(6) "Vessel" means every watercraft used or capable of being used
as a means of transportation on the water, other than a seaplane.

Sec. 3 RCW 88.02.050 and 2007 c 342 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Application for a vessel registration shall be made to the
department or its authorized agent in the manner and upon forms
prescribed by the department. The application shall state the name and
address of each owner of the vessel and such other information as may
be required by the department, shall be signed by at least one owner,
and shall be accompanied by a vessel registration fee of ten dollars
and fifty cents per year and the excise tax imposed under chapter 82.49
RCW.
(2) Five additional dollars must be collected annually from every
vessel registration application. These moneys must be distributed in
the following manner:
(a) Two dollars must be deposited into the derelict vessel removal
account established in RCW 79.100.100. If the department of natural
resources indicates that the balance of the derelict vessel removal
account, not including any transfer or appropriation of funds into the
account or funds deposited into the account collected under RCW
88.02.270, reaches one million dollars as of March 1st of any year, the
collection of the two-dollar fee must be suspended for the following
fiscal year.
(b) One dollar and fifty cents must be deposited in the aquatic
invasive species prevention account created in RCW 77.12.879.
(c) One dollar must be deposited into the freshwater aquatic algae
control account created in RCW 43.21A.667.
(d) Fifty cents must be deposited into the aquatic invasive species
enforcement account created in RCW 43.43.400.
(3) Any fees required for licensing agents under RCW 46.01.140
shall be in addition to the ten dollar and fifty cent annual
registration fee and the five-dollar fee created in subsection (2) of
this section.
(4) Upon receipt of the application and the registration fee, the
department shall assign a registration number and issue a decal for
each vessel. The department shall create and issue a separate decal
for each historic vessel. The registration number and decal shall be
issued and affixed to the vessel in a manner prescribed by the
department consistent with the standard numbering system for vessels
set forth in volume 33, part 174, of the code of federal regulations.
A valid decal affixed as prescribed shall indicate compliance with the
annual registration requirements of this chapter.
(5) The vessel registrations and decals are valid for a period of
one year, except that the director of licensing may extend or diminish
vessel registration periods, and the decals therefor, for the purpose
of staggered renewal periods. For registration periods of more or less
than one year, the department may collect prorated annual registration
fees and excise taxes based upon the number of months in the
registration period. Vessel registrations are renewable every year in
a manner prescribed by the department upon payment of the vessel
registration fee, excise tax, and the derelict vessel fee. Upon
renewing a vessel registration, the department shall issue a new decal
to be affixed as prescribed by the department.
(6) When the department issues either a notice to renew a vessel
registration or a decal for a new or renewed vessel registration, it
shall also provide information on the location of marine oil recycling
tanks and sewage holding tank pumping stations. This information will
be provided to the department by the state parks and recreation
commission in a form ready for distribution. The form will be
developed and prepared by the state parks and recreation commission
with the cooperation of the department of ecology. The department, the
state parks and recreation commission, and the department of ecology
shall enter into a memorandum of agreement to implement this process.
(7) A person acquiring a vessel from a dealer or a vessel already
validly registered under this chapter shall, within fifteen days of the
acquisition or purchase of the vessel, apply to the department or its
authorized agent for transfer of the vessel registration, and the
application shall be accompanied by a transfer fee of one dollar.

Sec. 4 RCW 88.02.050 and 2007 c 342 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Application for a vessel registration shall be made to the
department or its authorized agent in the manner and upon forms
prescribed by the department. The application shall state the name and
address of each owner of the vessel and such other information as may
be required by the department, shall be signed by at least one owner,
and shall be accompanied by a vessel registration fee of ten dollars
and fifty cents per year and the excise tax imposed under chapter 82.49
RCW. In addition, two additional dollars must be collected annually
from every vessel registration application. These moneys must be
deposited into the derelict vessel removal account established in RCW
79.100.100. If the department of natural resources indicates that the
balance of the derelict vessel removal account, not including any
transfer or appropriation of funds into the account or funds deposited
into the account collected under RCW 88.02.270, reaches one million
dollars as of March 1st of any year, the collection of the two-dollar
fee must be suspended for the following fiscal year. Any fees required
for licensing agents under RCW 46.01.140 shall be in addition to the
ten dollar and fifty cent annual registration fee and the two-dollar
derelict vessel fee.
(2) Upon receipt of the application and the registration fee, the
department shall assign a registration number and issue a decal for
each vessel. The department shall create and issue a separate decal
for each historic vessel. The registration number and decal shall be
issued and affixed to the vessel in a manner prescribed by the
department consistent with the standard numbering system for vessels
set forth in volume 33, part 174, of the code of federal regulations.
A valid decal affixed as prescribed shall indicate compliance with the
annual registration requirements of this chapter.
(3) The vessel registrations and decals are valid for a period of
one year, except that the director of licensing may extend or diminish
vessel registration periods, and the decals therefor, for the purpose
of staggered renewal periods. For registration periods of more or less
than one year, the department may collect prorated annual registration
fees and excise taxes based upon the number of months in the
registration period. Vessel registrations are renewable every year in
a manner prescribed by the department upon payment of the vessel
registration fee, excise tax, and the derelict vessel fee. Upon
renewing a vessel registration, the department shall issue a new decal
to be affixed as prescribed by the department.
(4) When the department issues either a notice to renew a vessel
registration or a decal for a new or renewed vessel registration, it
shall also provide information on the location of marine oil recycling
tanks and sewage holding tank pumping stations. This information will
be provided to the department by the state parks and recreation
commission in a form ready for distribution. The form will be
developed and prepared by the state parks and recreation commission
with the cooperation of the department of ecology. The department, the
state parks and recreation commission, and the department of ecology
shall enter into a memorandum of agreement to implement this process.
(5) A person acquiring a vessel from a dealer or a vessel already
validly registered under this chapter shall, within fifteen days of the
acquisition or purchase of the vessel, apply to the department or its
authorized agent for transfer of the vessel registration, and the
application shall be accompanied by a transfer fee of one dollar.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 88.02 RCW
to read as follows:
A historic vessel registered under RCW 88.02.050 may only be used
for participation in club activities, exhibitions, tours, parades, and
occasional pleasure boating.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.49.010 and 2000 c 229 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An excise tax is imposed for the privilege of using a vessel
upon the waters of this state, except vessels exempt under RCW
82.49.020. Except for historic vessels, the annual amount of the
excise tax is one-half of one percent of fair market value, as
determined under this chapter, or five dollars, whichever is greater.
The annual amount of the excise tax for any historic vessel as defined
in RCW 88.02.010 is one-quarter of one percent of fair market value, as
determined under this chapter, or five dollars, whichever is greater.
Violation of this subsection is a misdemeanor.
(2) Persons who are required under chapter 88.02 RCW to register a
vessel in this state and who register the vessel in another state or
foreign country and avoid the Washington watercraft excise tax are
guilty of a gross misdemeanor and are liable for such unpaid excise
tax. The department of revenue may assess and collect the unpaid
excise tax under chapter 82.32 RCW, including the penalties and
interest provided in chapter 82.32 RCW.
(3) The excise tax upon a vessel registered for the first time in
this state shall be imposed for a twelve-month period, including the
month in which the vessel is registered, unless the director of
licensing extends or diminishes vessel registration periods for the
purpose of staggered renewal periods under RCW 88.02.050. A vessel is
registered for the first time in this state when the vessel was not
registered in this state for the immediately preceding registration
year, or when the vessel was registered in another jurisdiction for the
immediately preceding year. The excise tax on vessels required to be
registered in this state on June 30, 1983, shall be paid by June 30,
1983.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Section 3 of this act expires June 30, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Section 4 of this act takes effect June 30,
2012.

--- END ---