BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.214 and 1994 c 22 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Newspaper" means a publication issued regularly at stated
intervals at least twice a month and printed on newsprint in tabloid or
broadsheet format folded loosely together without stapling, glue, or
any other binding of any kind, or means any newspaper-labeled
supplement produced in any media.

--- END ---