BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that Washingtonians
sixty-five years of age and older will nearly double in the next twenty
years, from eleven percent of our population today to almost twenty
percent of our population in 2025. Younger people with disabilities
will also require supportive long-term care services. Nationally,
young people with a disability account for thirty seven percent of the
total number of people who need long-term care.
The legislature further finds that to address this increasing need,
the long-term care system should support autonomy and self-determination, and support the role of informal caregivers and
families. It should promote personal planning and savings combined
with public support, when needed. It should also include culturally
appropriate, high quality information, services, and supports delivered
in a cost-effective and efficient manner.
The legislature further finds that the long-term care system should
utilize evidence-based practices for the prevention and management of
chronic disease to improve the general health of Washingtonians over
their lifetime and reduce health care and long-term care costs related
to ineffective chronic care management.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.41.040 and 1987 c 409 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall administer this chapter and shall establish
such rules and standards as the department deems necessary in carrying
out this chapter. The department shall not require the development of
((plans of care or)) discharge plans by nursing homes, boarding homes,
or adult family homes providing respite care service under this
chapter.
The department shall develop standards for the respite program in
conjunction with the selected area agencies on aging. The program
standards shall serve as the basis for soliciting bids, entering into
subcontracts, and developing sliding fee scales to be used in
determining the ability of eligible participants to participate in
paying for respite care.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.20.350 and 2004 c 142 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The boarding home licensee shall conduct a preadmission
assessment for each resident applicant. The preadmission assessment
shall include the following information, unless unavailable despite the
best efforts of the licensee:
(a) Medical history;
(b) Necessary and contraindicated medications;
(c) A licensed medical or health professional's diagnosis, unless
the individual objects for religious reasons;
(d) Significant known behaviors or symptoms that may cause concern
or require special care;
(e) Mental illness diagnosis, except where protected by
confidentiality laws;
(f) Level of personal care needs;
(g) Activities and service preferences; and
(h) Preferences regarding other issues important to the resident
applicant, such as food and daily routine.
(2) The boarding home licensee shall complete the preadmission
assessment before admission unless there is an emergency. If there is
an emergency admission, the preadmission assessment shall be completed
within five days of the date of admission. For purposes of this
section, "emergency" includes, but is not limited to: Evening,
weekend, or Friday afternoon admissions if the resident applicant would
otherwise need to remain in an unsafe setting or be without adequate
and safe housing.
(3) The boarding home licensee shall complete an initial resident
service plan upon move-in to identify the resident's immediate needs
and to provide direction to staff and caregivers relating to the
resident's immediate needs. The initial resident service plan shall
include as much information as can be obtained, under subsection (1) of
this section.
(4) When a facility provides respite care, before or at the time of
admission, the facility must obtain sufficient information to meet the
individual's anticipated needs. At a minimum, such information must
include:
(a) The name, address, and telephone number of the individual's
attending physician, and alternate physician if any;
(b) Medical and social history, which may be obtained from a
respite care assessment and service plan performed by a case manager
designated by an area agency on aging under contract with the
department, and mental and physical assessment data: and,
(c) Physician's orders for diet, medication and routine care
consistent with the individual's status on admission.
(d) Ensure the individuals have assessments performed, where
needed, and where the assessment of the individual reveals symptoms of
tuberculosis, follow required tuberculosis testing requirements; and
(e) With the participation of the individual and, where
appropriate, their representative, develop a plan of care to maintain
or improve their health and functional status during their stay in the
facility.

Sec. 4 RCW 74.41.050 and 2000 c 207 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall develop an evidence-based tailored caregiver
assessment and referral tool and contract with area agencies on aging
or other appropriate agencies to conduct family caregiver long-term
care information and support services to the extent of available
funding. The responsibilities of the agencies shall include but not be
limited to: (1) Administering a program of family caregiver long-term
care information and support services; ((and)) (2) negotiating rates of
payment, administering sliding-fee scales to enable eligible
participants to participate in paying for respite care, and arranging
for respite care information, training, and other support services; (3)
within funds appropriated for this specific purpose, providing the
option of a one-time voucher benefit per caregiver screened to meet the
needs critical to health or safety of either the adult care recipient
or the caregiver. In evaluating the need for respite services,
consideration shall be given to the mental and physical ability of the
caregiver to perform necessary caregiver functions.

Sec. 5 RCW 74.38.040 and 1983 c 290 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
The community based services for low-income eligible persons
provided by the department or the respective area agencies may include:
(1) Access services designed to provide identification of eligible
persons, assessment of individual needs, reference to the appropriate
service, and follow-up service where required. These services shall
include information and referral, outreach, transportation and
counseling. Within funds appropriated for this specific purpose, they
shall also include long-term care planning and options counseling,
information and crisis intervention, and streamlined assistance to
access a wide array of public and private community-based services.
These access services shall be available to eligible people of all ages
who are in need of them, with the exception of transportation.
Services would be available to individuals, concerned families or
friends, or professionals working with issues related to aging,
disabilities, and caregivers;
(2) Day care offered on a regular, recurrent basis. General
nursing, rehabilitation, personal care, nutritional services, social
casework, mental health as provided pursuant to chapter 71.24 RCW
and/or limited transportation services may be made available within
this program;
(3) In-home care for persons, including basic health care;
performance of various household tasks and other necessary chores, or,
a combination of these services;
(4) Counseling on death for the terminally ill and care and
attendance at the time of death; except, that this is not to include
reimbursement for the use of life-sustaining mechanisms;
(5) Health services which will identify health needs and which are
designed to avoid institutionalization; assist in securing admission to
medical institutions or other health related facilities when required;
and, assist in obtaining health services from public or private
agencies or providers of health services. These services shall include
health screening and evaluation, in-home services, health education,
and such health appliances which will further the independence and
well-being of the person;
(6) The provision of low cost, nutritionally sound meals in central
locations or in the person's home in the instance of incapacity. Also,
supportive services may be provided in nutritional education, shopping
assistance, diet counseling and other services to sustain the
nutritional well-being of these persons;
(7) The provisions of services to maintain a person's home in a
state of adequate repair, insofar as is possible, for their safety and
comfort. These services shall be limited, but may include housing
counseling, minor repair and maintenance, and moving assistance when
such repair will not attain standards of health and safety, as
determined by the department;
(8) Civil legal services, as limited by RCW 2.50.100, for
counseling and representation in the areas of housing, consumer
protection, public entitlements, property, and related fields of law;
(9) Long-term care ombudsman programs for residents of all long-term care facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
Within funds appropriated for this purpose, the department shall
develop a statewide fall prevention program. The program shall include
networking community services, identifying service gaps, making
affordable senior-based, evaluated exercise programs more available,
providing consumer education to older adults, their adult children, and
the community at large, and conducting professional education on fall
risk identification and reduction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 74.39A RCW
to read as follows:
Within funds appropriated for this purpose, the department shall
provide additional support for residents in community settings who
exhibit challenging behaviors that put them at risk for institutional
placement. The residents must be receiving services under the
community options program entry system waiver under section 1905(c) of
the federal social security act and must have been evaluated under the
individual comprehensive assessment reporting and evaluation process.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
Within funds appropriated for this purpose, the department shall
establish two dental access projects to serve seniors and other adults
who have problems accessing basic and specialty dental care because of
a physical or mental disability. The projects shall provide:
(1) Enhanced reimbursement rates for certified dentists for
specific procedures;
(2) Reimbursement for trained medical providers for preventive oral
health services;
(3) Training, development, and implementation through a partnership
with the University of Washington school of dentistry;
(4) Local program coordination including outreach and case
management; and
(5) An evaluation that measures the change in utilization rates and
cost savings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---