BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that hypoglycemia is
a severe medical problem for people with diabetes. Maintaining control
of blood sugar levels requires disciplined self-management, a challenge
especially for young children, adolescents, and the elderly.
Hypoglycemic episodes can have catastrophic outcomes, resulting in
seizure, brain damage, and death. Rapid and appropriate administration
of oral glucose can counteract a severe hypoglycemic episode, and may
make the difference between life and death.
The legislature finds that the administration of oral glucose is
not indicated in certain situations, and the administration of glucagon
is the preferred method of treatment. The legislature further finds
that some situations may arise when glucagon must be administered by
injection to save a person's life. It is paramount that emergency
response personnel receive appropriate training on the use of emergency
glucagon pens to treat severe hypoglycemia.
The purpose of this act is to authorize emergency medical
technicians to administer glucagon in emergency situations and to have
glucagon emergency kits available in their emergency care supplies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.73 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All of the state's ambulance and aid services shall make
glucagon emergency kits available to their emergency medical
technicians in their emergency care supplies. The emergency medical
technician may administer glucagon.
(2) Nothing in this section authorizes the administration of
glucagon by a first responder.

--- END ---