BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that methicillin
resistant staphylococcus aureus poses a serious threat to the health of
the residents of Washington state. In addition to health care
facilities, the infection has been recently identified in community
settings such as schools and nursing homes. One recent study estimates
that the invasive infection is responsible for over eighteen thousand
deaths in the United States in 2005.
The legislature intends to establish a system for monitoring
invasive methicillin resistant staphylococcus aureus and taking
measures to prevent its spread in health care settings and the
community. The legislature expects the monitoring system to build upon
existing reporting mechanisms established through the notifiable
conditions system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Every laboratory shall notify the local health jurisdiction of
confirmed cases of invasive methicillin resistant staphylococcus aureus
and shall cooperate with public health authorities in any investigation
of cases or outbreaks.
(2) Every health care provider who receives notification from a
laboratory that a patient has a confirmed case of invasive methicillin
resistant staphylococcus aureus shall notify the local health
jurisdiction of any known risk factors associated with invasive
methicillin resistant staphylococcus aureus as they pertain to the
patient and which may assist the local health jurisdiction with the
identification of the potential source of the infection. Every health
care provider shall cooperate with public health authorities in any
investigation of cases or outbreaks.
(3) Every local health jurisdiction shall:
(a) Conduct any necessary investigations or other public health
interventions for reported cases of invasive methicillin resistant
staphylococcus aureus as required by the circumstances; and
(b) Notify the department of confirmed cases of invasive
methicillin resistant staphylococcus aureus as reported and a summary
of any responses by the local health jurisdiction.
(4) The state board shall adopt rules to implement this section,
including standards for clinical identification of invasive methicillin
resistant staphylococcus aureus by laboratories, requirements for the
timing and means of notifications, the contents of notifications, and
the responsibilities of local health jurisdictions. The state board
shall consider incorporating the notification requirements of this
section into existing reporting requirements to minimize the burden on
reporting entities.
(5) The department shall provide regular summaries of the
notifications that it receives by geographic location, the frequency of
the cases in different types of facilities, and the risk factors
associated with the patients affected.
(6) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Case of invasive methicillin resistant staphylococcus aureus"
means an instance of methicillin resistant staphylococcus aureus that
has been located in a culture that is derived from a normally sterile
body site. A normally sterile body site includes, but is not limited
to, blood, cerebrospinal fluid, pleural fluid, pericardial fluid,
peritoneal fluid, joint/synovial fluid, bone, or internal body site.
The state board may establish standards for including sinus-related
methicillin resistant staphylococcus aureus and necrotizing methicillin
resistant staphylococcus aureus as cases of invasive methicillin
resistant staphylococcus aureus.
(b) "Health care provider" means any person having direct or
supervisory responsibility for the delivery of health care who is
licensed or certified by a disciplining authority identified in RCW
18.130.040(2).
(c) "Laboratory" means any facility licensed as a medical test site
under chapter 70.42 RCW.
(d) "Local health jurisdiction" means a city, county, city-county,
or district public health jurisdiction as defined in chapter 70.05,
70.08, or 70.46 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall provide assistance to local health
jurisdictions with the establishment of a strategy to support efforts
to prevent the spread of multidrug resistant organisms.
(2) Each local health jurisdiction shall establish a multidrug
resistant organism control strategy, based upon epidemiologic data,
which must include:
(a) An infection control and prevention plan that provides
guidelines and education strategies for controlling multidrug resistant
infections for health care providers, health care facilities, community
institutions, and patients;
(b) An antibiotic utilization plan that establishes recommendations
for health care providers, health care facilities, and patients for the
identification and management of skin and soft tissue infections and
the appropriate use of antibiotics; and
(c) An agricultural education plan that addresses the use of
antibiotics and veterinary infection control practices to the extent
applicable within the local health jurisdiction.
(3) The multidrug resistant organism control strategy must be
developed in coordination with local health care providers, health care
facilities, community institutions, and public representatives. The
multidrug resistant organism control strategy must be submitted to the
department by July 1, 2009, and made publicly available within the
local health jurisdiction.

--- END ---