BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the Washington
park arboretum is the official arboretum of the state of Washington.
The University of Washington and the city of Seattle cooperatively
established the arboretum in 1934, with Seattle holding title to the
property and the University of Washington designing, developing, and
managing the arboretum and botanic garden. The arboretum is a central
component of the University of Washington botanic gardens, along with
collections in the Union Bay gardens, around the center for urban
horticulture, in the Union Bay natural area, and in the Otis Douglas
Hyde herbarium.
The legislature finds that the Washington park arboretum contains
a dynamic collection of trees and other woody plants that are hardy in
the maritime Pacific Northwest. Collections are selected and arranged
to display their beauty and function in urban landscapes, to
demonstrate their natural ecology and diversity, and to conserve
important species and cultivated varieties for the future. There is no
fee for admission to the arboretum, allowing everyone to enjoy and
learn from its collections.
The legislature also finds that the Washington park arboretum holds
one of the most prestigious plant collections in the world. The
arboretum consists of approximately twenty thousand trees, shrubs, and
vines, of which over ten thousand are catalogued. The collection
includes approximately four thousand six hundred different species and
one hundred thirty-nine endangered species. Collections include
rhododendron, azalea, mountain ash, pine, spruce, cedar, fir,
crabapple, holly, magnolia, camellia, and Japanese maple. The
arboretum's collection of oaks and maples is the richest in the nation,
and the conifers, hollies, and magnolias also rank among the nation's
finest collections. The arboretum displays ninety-five percent of its
holdings, whose estimated value is almost eighty-two million dollars.
The legislature further finds that the Washington park arboretum's
mission is to serve the public, students at all levels, naturalists,
gardeners, and nursery and landscape professionals with its
collections, educational programs, interpretation, and recreational
opportunities. Therefore, the legislature intends to provide
additional tools and resources to the University of Washington botanic
gardens as it preserves and provides public access to the important
educational, recreational, social, and cultural state resources that
the arboretum and other botanic garden collections have to offer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.20 RCW
to read as follows:
It is the goal of the legislature that the Washington park
arboretum's collections, exhibits, and facilities be preserved,
maintained, and presented in a manner befitting one of the world's most
prestigious plant collections. Therefore, the Washington park
arboretum must strive to:
(1) Enhance public appreciation for the aesthetic diversity of
temperate wood plants;
(2) Educate the public and regional school population about urban
landscape use and the natural biology of temperate wood plants;
(3) Conserve and keep healthy both natural and cultivated woody
plants to preserve diversity for future appreciation;
(4) Maintain and enhance collections, exhibits, and facilities to
create the best possible ambiance and visitor experience; and
(5) Cooperate with local, regional, national, and international
entities that have a similar mission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28B.20 RCW
to read as follows:
The University of Washington botanic gardens endowed curatorship is
established within the University of Washington to support a staff
position within the botanic gardens, which currently falls under the
college of forest resources. The purpose of the endowed curatorship is
to ensure that perpetual funding exists for a botanic gardens curator
who shall focus on: (1) The preservation, maintenance, and
presentation of the botanic garden's collections; and (2) the goals
established for the Washington park arboretum in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28B.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The University of Washington botanic gardens endowed
curatorship account is created in the custody of the state treasurer.
All moneys appropriated by the legislature for the University of
Washington botanic gardens endowed curatorship or to the account must
be placed in the account. The state treasurer must release money in
the account according to the procedures set forth in subsection (2) of
this section. The account is subject to allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for
expenditures.
(2) Until June 30, 2013, the state treasurer must release one
million dollars from the University of Washington botanic gardens
endowed curatorship account to the University of Washington board of
regents for inclusion in the University of Washington consolidated
endowment fund when both: (a) The University of Washington board of
regents requests that the funds be released; and (b) the University of
Washington demonstrates to the treasurer that it will match the state
funds with an equal amount of funds contributed by nonstate sources for
the University of Washington botanic gardens endowed curatorship. The
state and nonstate moneys must each be placed in the University of
Washington consolidated endowment fund. The University of Washington
may not invade the principal invested for the botanic gardens endowed
curatorship. Distributions from the consolidated endowment fund
resulting from this investment must be used solely for purposes of the
University of Washington botanic gardens endowed curatorship.
(3) The state treasurer must transfer any funds remaining in the
University of Washington botanic gardens endowed curatorship account on
July 1, 2013, to the general fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The department of natural resources'
natural heritage program shall host a working conference on the future
of arboretums and botanic gardens in Washington. The objective of the
conference is to explore the current status of arboretums and botanic
gardens in the state and develop strategies to sustain and enhance
these important scientific, educational, and recreational resources.
(2) The natural heritage program shall work with appropriate
arboretums, botanic gardens, and interested public and private entities
in preparing for and conducting the conference. To enhance the
effectiveness of the conference and its products, the natural heritage
program shall seek to frame issues and outline options through issue
summaries and preliminary meetings with appropriate entities.
(3) Among the topics that the conference should address are:
(a) The challenges currently facing Washington's arboretums and
botanic gardens, including funding, maintenance, and collections
management challenges;
(b) Strategies arboretums and botanic gardens might adopt to
address the identified challenges; and
(c) Recommendations on ways the legislature, state agencies, and
local governments might assist arboretums and botanic gardens address
the identified challenges.
(4) The natural heritage program shall schedule the conference at
a time sufficient to prepare a summary of the conference proceedings
and recommendations for submission to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 15, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The sum of one million dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2009, from the general fund to the University of Washington
botanic gardens endowed curatorship account created in section 4 of
this act for the purposes of this act.

--- END ---