BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that Washington's
coastal and ocean resources provide vital economic, recreation,
transportation, and cultural benefits to the state. The legislature
seeks to continue recent state and local efforts to preserve and
enhance the state's coastal and ocean resources, such as the work of
the Washington ocean policy work group and the state's existing marine
resources committees.
The legislature finds that outer coast marine resources committees,
authorized by the legislature in 2007, provide a mechanism for
communities to discuss and develop solutions for the issues facing
coastal resources and communities. However, additional state
investments are necessary to allow outer coast marine resources
committees to fulfill their full potential. Therefore, the legislature
intends by this act to provide additional support and resources for
outer coast marine resources committees in order to benefit the coastal
and ocean resources of Washington.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.125.020 and 2007 c 344 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A marine resources committee, as described in RCW 36.125.010,
may be created by the legislative authority of any county bordering the
marine waters of the outer coast or Puget Sound, in cooperation with
all appropriate cities and special districts within their boundaries.
Adjacent county legislative authorities shall coordinate their efforts
whenever there is a mutual interest in creating a marine resources
committee.
(2) A county may delegate the management and oversight of a marine
resources committee created by the county under RCW 36.125.010 to a
city, or cities, within its jurisdiction, if the city or cities are
located on the marine waters of the outer coast or southern Puget Sound
and are willing to accept the delegation.
(3)(a) Participating county legislative authorities must select
members of the marine resources committee, ensuring balanced
representation from: Local government; local residents; scientific
experts; affected economic interests; affected recreational interests;
and environmental and conservation interests. Additionally,
participating county legislative authorities must invite tribal
representatives to participate in the marine resources committee.
(b) In lieu of creating a new entity, participating county
legislative authorities may designate a lead entity created under RCW
77.85.050 to also serve as a marine resources committee. County
legislative authorities may only make this designation where the lead
entity consents in writing to also serve as a marine resources
committee.
(c) An initiating county may delegate its appointment authority to
a city or cities that have received from the county the delegated
responsibilities of managing and overseeing the marine resources
committee.
(4) County residents may petition the county legislative authority
to create a marine resources committee. Upon receipt of a petition,
the county legislative authority must respond in writing within sixty
days as to whether they will authorize the creation of a marine
resources committee as well as the reasons for their decision.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 36.125 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The outer coast marine resources committee program is created
to provide support for the development, administration, and
coordination of outer coast marine resources committees and their
projects.
(2) The director of fish and wildlife is the administrator of the
outer coast marine resources committee program. As the administrator
of the program, the director of fish and wildlife shall:
(a) Provide each outer coast marine resources committee with a
coordinator to support the administration and work of the committee;
and
(b) Distribute grants to outer coast marine resources committees
for projects that benefit Washington's coastal marine resources. The
director of fish and wildlife shall develop procedures and criteria for
allocating funds for projects, which may include annual allocation of
funding to each committee.
(3) Each outer coast marine resources committee shall prepare and
deliver an annual report to the director of fish and wildlife by
October 31st of each year. The report must include, but is not limited
to, a summary of actions taken that year and prioritized
recommendations for future action. The director of fish and wildlife
shall compile the individual outer coast marine resources committee
reports into a consolidated report, and provide the consolidated report
to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by
December 31st of each year.

--- END ---