BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Phosphorus loading of surface waters can stimulate the growth
of weeds and algae, and that such growth can have adverse
environmental, health, and aesthetic effects;
(b) Lawn fertilizers contribute to phosphorus loading, and limits
on turf fertilizer containing phosphorus can significantly reduce the
discharge of phosphorus into the state's ground and surface waters;
(c) Turf fertilizers containing no or very low phosphorus are
readily available and maintaining established turf in a healthy and
green condition is not dependent on the addition of phosphorus
fertilizers; and
(d) While significant reductions of phosphorus from laundry
detergent and dishwashing detergent have been achieved, similar
progress in reducing phosphorus contributions from turf fertilizer has
not been accomplished.
(2) The legislature intends by this act to significantly limit the
use of fertilizers containing the plant nutrient phosphorus.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(2) "Director" means the director of the department of ecology.
(3) "Impervious surface" means a highway, street, sidewalk, parking
lot, driveway, or other artificial surface that prevents infiltration
of water into the soil.
(4) "Turf" means noncrop land planted in closely mowed, managed
grasses including, but not limited to, residential and commercial
residential property, private golf courses, and property owned by
federal, state, or local units of government, including parks,
recreation areas, and public golf courses. Turf does not include
managed pasture, hayland, hay, turf grown on turf farms, home or
commercial vegetable production, or any other form of agricultural
production.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of
this section, after January 1, 2010, a person may not apply to turf a
fertilizer containing the plant nutrient phosphorus.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply when:
(a) Applying a solid fertilizer containing less than 0.67 percent
phosphate (P2O5) by weight or a liquid fertilizer applied at a rate not
greater than 0.3 pounds of phosphate (P2O5) per one thousand square feet
of turf;
(b) Laboratory test results or other certification by a turf
specialist is performed within the three years previous to the
application indicates that the level of available phosphorus in the
soil is insufficient to support healthy turf growth, and the test
results or certification, and the application rate, are consistent with
standards approved by the department in consultation with the
Washington State University extension service;
(c) The property owner or an agent of the property owner is first
establishing turf via seed or sod procedures, and only during the first
growing season; or
(d) The fertilizer containing the plant nutrient phosphorus is
applied to a golf course consistent with golf course application
standards adopted by the department, and a report following each
growing season is provided to the department.
(3) This section does not apply to the application of turf
fertilizer for agricultural uses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A person may not apply a fertilizer to an
impervious surface. Fertilizer released on an impervious surface must
be immediately contained and either legally applied to turf or any
other legal site or returned to the original or other appropriate
container.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The department may issue a notice of
corrective action to a person in violation of section 3 or 4 of this
act.
(2) A city or county may adopt an ordinance providing for
enforcement of the requirements of sections 3 and 4 of this act. A
city or county adopting an ordinance has jurisdiction concurrent with
the department to enforce this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The department shall produce consumer
information on the application restrictions under section 3 of this
act, and on recommended best practices for turf fertilizer and other
residential landscaping uses. The information shall be produced in
consultation with the Washington State University extension service,
fertilizer industry representatives, lakes health organizations, and
other interested parties. The information must be in a format and of
a content suitable for posting and distribution at retail points of
sale of fertilizer that contains phosphorus and is for use on turf.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 90 RCW.

--- END ---