BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the purchase of
a watchable wildlife decal offers a valuable opportunity for
individuals to voluntarily contribute to the enhancement of the
habitat, infrastructure, trails, corridors, and communities that
provide wildlife viewing opportunities in this state. In addition to
improving wildlife habitat and recreational opportunities, watchable
wildlife programs also significantly contribute to the economic
vitality of Washington's rural areas.
The legislature finds that Washington has made great strides to
enhance watchable wildlife activities and tourism while also protecting
the wildlife resources that attract the viewers. However, the
legislature also finds that additional investments in the watchable
wildlife program are needed and will further benefit Washington's
wildlife and rural communities, and increase wildlife viewing and other
recreational opportunities in the state. Therefore, the legislature
intends to use creative measures in an effort to increase the number of
individuals who voluntarily purchase watchable wildlife decals.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.32.560 and 2003 c 317 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may sell watchable wildlife decals. Proceeds
from the sale of the decal must be deposited into the state wildlife
((fund)) account created in RCW 77.12.170 and must be dedicated to the
support of the department's watchable wildlife activities. The
department may also use proceeds from the sale of the decal for
marketing the decal and for marketing watchable wildlife activities in
the state.
(2) The term "watchable wildlife activities" includes but is not
limited to: Initiating partnerships with communities to jointly
develop watchable wildlife projects, building infrastructure to serve
wildlife viewers, assisting and training communities in conducting
wildlife watching events, developing destination wildlife viewing
corridors and trails, tours, maps, brochures, and travel aides, and
offering grants to assist rural communities in identifying key wildlife
attractions and ways to protect and promote them.
(3) The commission must adopt by rule the cost of the watchable
wildlife decal. A person may, at their discretion, contribute more
than the cost as set by the commission by rule for the watchable
wildlife decal in order to support watchable wildlife activities. A
person who purchases a watchable wildlife decal must be issued one
vehicle use permit free of charge.
(4)(a) Until December 1, 2010, the department, under the authority
of the director, shall carry out a watchable wildlife raffle pilot
project.
(b) The pilot project must consist of no fewer than three separate
watchable wildlife raffles and associated tours. The department shall
select raffle winners from the pool of watchable wildlife decal
holders. The department shall provide raffle winners with a wildlife
viewing tour on department owned or managed lands, and in doing so may
work cooperatively with nongovernmental entities and individuals. The
tour should provide participants with a desirable, high quality, and
rare wildlife viewing experience. The department shall seek to
publicize the raffles and tours, including the tour destinations, to
increase public awareness of the department's watchable wildlife
program, watchable wildlife decals, and the pilot project.
(c) During the pilot project, the department is encouraged to use
other creative measures in an effort to increase the number of
individuals who voluntarily purchase watchable wildlife decals.
(d) The department shall provide the appropriate committees of the
legislature with a brief summary of the pilot project and relevant
policy recommendations, if any, by December 1, 2010.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.46.010 and 1996 c 101 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The public policy of the state of Washington on gambling is to keep
the criminal element out of gambling and to promote the social welfare
of the people by limiting the nature and scope of gambling activities
and by strict regulation and control.
It is hereby declared to be the policy of the legislature,
recognizing the close relationship between professional gambling and
organized crime, to restrain all persons from seeking profit from
professional gambling activities in this state; to restrain all persons
from patronizing such professional gambling activities; to safeguard
the public against the evils induced by common gamblers and common
gambling houses engaged in professional gambling; and at the same time,
both to preserve the freedom of the press and to avoid restricting
participation by individuals in activities and social pastimes, which
activities and social pastimes are more for amusement rather than for
profit, do not maliciously affect the public, and do not breach the
peace.
The legislature further declares that the raising of funds for the
promotion of bona fide charitable or nonprofit organizations is in the
public interest as is participation in such activities and social
pastimes as are hereinafter in this chapter authorized.
The legislature further declares that the conducting of bingo,
raffles, and amusement games and the operation of punchboards, pull-tabs, card games and other social pastimes, when conducted pursuant to
the provisions of this chapter and any rules and regulations adopted
pursuant thereto, are hereby authorized, as are only such lotteries for
which no valuable consideration has been paid or agreed to be paid as
hereinafter in this chapter provided.
The legislature further declares that fishing derbies shall not
constitute any form of gambling and shall not be considered as a
lottery, a raffle, or an amusement game and shall not be subject to the
provisions of this chapter or any rules and regulations adopted
hereunder.
The legislature further declares that raffles authorized by the
fish and wildlife commission involving hunting big game animals or wild
turkeys or as authorized under RCW 77.32.560 shall not be subject to
the provisions of this chapter or any rules and regulations adopted
hereunder, with the exception of this section and RCW 9.46.400.
All factors incident to the activities authorized in this chapter
shall be closely controlled, and the provisions of this chapter shall
be liberally construed to achieve such end.

Sec. 4 RCW 9.46.400 and 1996 c 101 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any raffle authorized by the fish and wildlife commission involving
hunting big game animals or wild turkeys or under RCW 77.32.560 shall
not be subject to any provisions of this chapter other than RCW
9.46.010 and this section or to any rules or regulations of the
gambling commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act expires January 1, 2011.

--- END ---