BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that Washington
contains an array of marine protected areas managed by state, federal,
tribal, and local governments. The many entities managing marine
protected areas have developed distinct goals for protected areas,
criteria for protected area establishment, management practices,
terminology, and monitoring practices for these areas. The legislature
supports all efforts to protect, conserve, and sustainably manage
marine life and resources. However, the legislature finds that
additional coordination between marine protected areas managers will
improve the collective resource protection capacity of marine protected
areas in Washington. The legislature further finds that additional
coordination between state agencies and local governments and citizens
will increase local involvement in, and the success of, marine
protected areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The marine protected areas work group is
established. The work group shall:
(a) Examine the current inventory and management of Washington's
marine protected areas;
(b) Develop recommendations to improve coordination and consistency
among marine protected areas and marine protected areas managers
regarding goals for protected areas, criteria for protected area
establishment, management practices, terminology, and monitoring
practices;
(c) Develop recommendations to improve the integration of science
into marine protected area establishment and management decisions;
(d) Develop recommendations to further integrate local governments
and nongovernmental organizations into the establishment and management
of marine protected areas; and
(e) Provide any other recommendations to improve the effectiveness
of marine protected areas in Washington.
(2) The director of fish and wildlife, or the director's designee,
shall chair the work group. The chair shall invite representatives of
state agencies and local governments with jurisdiction over or that
manage marine protected areas in Washington to participate in the work
group. These entities must include, but are not limited to, the
department of fish and wildlife, the department of natural resources,
the state parks and recreation commission, and appropriate marine
resources committees. The chair shall invite representatives of
appropriate federal agencies and tribal governments to participate in
the work group. The chair may also invite other appropriate state
agencies to participate in the work group. The chair is responsible
for convening the work group and for directing the work of the work
group. State agencies invited to participate in the work group must
participate and work cooperatively with the department of fish and
wildlife to carry out this act.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "marine protected area" means
a geographic marine or estuarine area designated by a state, federal,
tribal, or local government in order to provide long-term protection
for part or all of the resources within that area.
(4) By December 1, 2009, the work group must provide the
appropriate committees of the legislature with: (a) An inventory of
marine protected areas in Washington; and (b) a summary of the issues
and recommendations identified under subsection (1)(b) through (e) of
this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) If chapter . . . . (Substitute Senate
Bill No. 6307), Laws of 2008 or a subsequent version thereof, becomes
law, the marine protected areas work group established under section 2
of this act must focus its efforts on marine protected areas in coastal
waters as defined in RCW 43.143.020.
(2) If chapter . . . . (Substitute Senate Bill No. 6307), Laws of
2008 or a subsequent version thereof, does not become law, the marine
protected areas work group established under section 2 of this act must
focus its efforts on all marine waters of the state. The marine
protected areas work group and the Puget Sound partnership must work
jointly to carry out section 2 of this act regarding marine protected
areas in Puget Sound as defined in RCW 90.71.010.

--- END ---