BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.04.155 and 2007 c 218 s 87, 2007 c 210 s 1, and
2007 c 133 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) This section provides uniform small works roster provisions to
award contracts for construction, building, renovation, remodeling,
alteration, repair, or improvement of real property that may be used by
state agencies and by any local government that is expressly authorized
to use these provisions. These provisions may be used in lieu of other
procedures to award contracts for such work with an estimated cost of
two hundred thousand dollars or less. The small works roster process
includes the limited public works process authorized under subsection
(3) of this section and any local government authorized to award
contracts using the small works roster process under this section may
award contracts using the limited public works process under subsection
(3) of this section.
(2)(a) A state agency or authorized local government may create a
single general small works roster, or may create a small works roster
for different specialties or categories of anticipated work. Where
applicable, small works rosters may make distinctions between
contractors based upon different geographic areas served by the
contractor. The small works roster or rosters shall consist of all
responsible contractors who have requested to be on the list, and where
required by law are properly licensed or registered to perform such
work in this state. A state agency or local government establishing a
small works roster or rosters may require eligible contractors desiring
to be placed on a roster or rosters to keep current records of any
applicable licenses, certifications, registrations, bonding, insurance,
or other appropriate matters on file with the state agency or local
government as a condition of being placed on a roster or rosters. At
least once a year, the state agency or local government shall publish
in a newspaper of general circulation within the jurisdiction a notice
of the existence of the roster or rosters and solicit the names of
contractors for such roster or rosters. In addition, responsible
contractors shall be added to an appropriate roster or rosters at any
time they submit a written request and necessary records. Master
contracts may be required to be signed that become effective when a
specific award is made using a small works roster.
(b) A state agency establishing a small works roster or rosters
shall adopt rules implementing this subsection. A local government
establishing a small works roster or rosters shall adopt an ordinance
or resolution implementing this subsection. Procedures included in
rules adopted by the department of general administration in
implementing this subsection must be included in any rules providing
for a small works roster or rosters that is adopted by another state
agency, if the authority for that state agency to engage in these
activities has been delegated to it by the department of general
administration under chapter 43.19 RCW. An interlocal contract or
agreement between two or more state agencies or local governments
establishing a small works roster or rosters to be used by the parties
to the agreement or contract must clearly identify the lead entity that
is responsible for implementing the provisions of this subsection.
(c) Procedures shall be established for securing telephone,
written, or electronic quotations from contractors on the appropriate
small works roster to assure that a competitive price is established
and to award contracts to the lowest responsible bidder as defined in
RCW 39.04.010. Invitations for quotations shall include an estimate of
the scope and nature of the work to be performed as well as materials
and equipment to be furnished. However, detailed plans and
specifications need not be included in the invitation. This subsection
does not eliminate other requirements for architectural or engineering
approvals as to quality and compliance with building codes. Quotations
may be invited from all appropriate contractors on the appropriate
small works roster. As an alternative, quotations may be invited from
at least five contractors on the appropriate small works roster who
have indicated the capability of performing the kind of work being
contracted, in a manner that will equitably distribute the opportunity
among the contractors on the appropriate roster. However, if the
estimated cost of the work is from one hundred thousand dollars to two
hundred thousand dollars, a state agency or local government((, other
than a port district,)) that chooses to solicit bids from less than all
the appropriate contractors on the appropriate small works roster must
also notify the remaining contractors on the appropriate small works
roster that quotations on the work are being sought. The government
has the sole option of determining whether this notice to the remaining
contractors is made by: (i) Publishing notice in a legal newspaper in
general circulation in the area where the work is to be done; (ii)
mailing a notice to these contractors; or (iii) sending a notice to
these contractors by facsimile or other electronic means. For purposes
of this subsection (2)(c), "equitably distribute" means that a state
agency or local government soliciting bids may not favor certain
contractors on the appropriate small works roster over other
contractors on the appropriate small works roster who perform similar
services.
(d) A contract awarded from a small works roster under this section
need not be advertised.
(e) Immediately after an award is made, the bid quotations obtained
shall be recorded, open to public inspection, and available by
telephone inquiry.
(3) In lieu of awarding contracts under subsection (2) of this
section, a state agency or authorized local government may award a
contract for work, construction, alteration, repair, or improvement
projects estimated to cost less than thirty-five thousand dollars using
the limited public works process provided under this subsection.
Public works projects awarded under this subsection are exempt from the
other requirements of the small works roster process provided under
subsection (2) of this section and are exempt from the requirement that
contracts be awarded after advertisement as provided under RCW
39.04.010.
For limited public works projects, a state agency or authorized
local government shall solicit electronic or written quotations from a
minimum of three contractors from the appropriate small works roster
and shall award the contract to the lowest responsible bidder as
defined under RCW 39.04.010. After an award is made, the quotations
shall be open to public inspection and available by electronic request.
A state agency or authorized local government shall attempt to
distribute opportunities for limited public works projects equitably
among contractors willing to perform in the geographic area of the
work. A state agency or authorized local government shall maintain a
list of the contractors contacted and the contracts awarded during the
previous twenty-four months under the limited public works process,
including the name of the contractor, the contractor's registration
number, the amount of the contract, a brief description of the type of
work performed, and the date the contract was awarded. For limited
public works projects, a state agency or authorized local government
may waive the payment and performance bond requirements of chapter
39.08 RCW and the retainage requirements of chapter 60.28 RCW, thereby
assuming the liability for the contractor's nonpayment of laborers,
mechanics, subcontractors, material suppliers, suppliers, and taxes
imposed under Title 82 RCW that may be due from the contractor for the
limited public works project, however the state agency or authorized
local government shall have the right of recovery against the
contractor for any payments made on the contractor's behalf.
(4) The breaking of any project into units or accomplishing any
projects by phases is prohibited if it is done for the purpose of
avoiding the maximum dollar amount of a contract that may be let using
the small works roster process or limited public works process.
(5)(a) A state agency or authorized local government may use the
limited public works process of subsection (3) of this section to
solicit and award small works roster contracts to small businesses that
are registered contractors with gross revenues under one million
dollars annually as reported on their federal tax return.
(b) A state agency or authorized local government may adopt
additional procedures to encourage small businesses that are registered
contractors with gross revenues under two hundred fifty thousand
dollars annually as reported on their federal tax returns to submit
quotations or bids on small works roster contracts.
(6) As used in this section, "state agency" means the department of
general administration, the state parks and recreation commission, the
department of natural resources, the department of fish and wildlife,
the department of transportation, any institution of higher education
as defined under RCW 28B.10.016, and any other state agency delegated
authority by the department of general administration to engage in
construction, building, renovation, remodeling, alteration,
improvement, or repair activities.

Sec. 2 RCW 39.30.020 and 1974 ex.s. c 74 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to any other remedies or penalties contained in any
law, municipal charter, ordinance, resolution, or other enactment, any
municipal officer by or through whom or under whose supervision, in
whole or in part, any contract is made in willful and intentional
violation of any law, municipal charter, ordinance, resolution, or
other enactment requiring competitive bidding or procurement procedures
for public work consultant services, upon such contract shall be held
liable to a civil penalty of not less than three hundred dollars and
may be held liable, jointly and severally with any other such municipal
officer, for all consequential damages to the municipal corporation.
If, as a result of a criminal action, the violation is found to have
been intentional, the municipal officer shall immediately forfeit his
office. For purposes of this section, "municipal officer" ((shall))
means an "officer" or "municipal officer" as those terms are defined in
RCW 42.23.020(2).

Sec. 3 RCW 39.80.010 and 1981 c 61 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature hereby establishes a state policy, to the extent
provided in this chapter, that governmental agencies publicly announce
requirements for architectural ((and)), engineering, and other
construction-related services, and negotiate contracts for
architectural ((and)), engineering, and other construction-related
services on the basis of demonstrated competence and qualification for
the type of professional services required and at fair and reasonable
prices.

Sec. 4 RCW 39.80.020 and 1999 c 153 s 55 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section shall apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "State agency" means any department, agency, commission,
bureau, office, or any other entity or authority of the state
government.
(2) "Local agency" means any city and any town, county, special
district, municipal corporation, agency, port district or authority, or
political subdivision of any type, or any other entity or authority of
local government in corporate form or otherwise.
(3) "Special district" means a local unit of government, other than
a city, town, or county, authorized by law to perform a single function
or a limited number of functions, and including but not limited to,
water-sewer districts, irrigation districts, fire districts, school
districts, community college districts, hospital districts,
transportation districts, and metropolitan municipal corporations
organized under chapter 35.58 RCW.
(4) "Agency" means both state and local agencies and special
districts as defined in subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this section.
(5) "Architectural and engineering services" ((or "professional
services")) means professional services rendered by any person, other
than as an employee of the agency, contracting to perform activities
within the scope of the general definition of professional practice in
chapters 18.08, 18.43, or 18.96 RCW.
(6) "Other construction-related services" means consultant services
provided by any person, other than as an employee of the agency, in
connection with and furtherance of any public work for project
management, construction supervision, or construction management.
Other construction-related services do not include architectural and
engineering services, legal services, accounting or auditing services,
claims consultant services, or other similar services that may be
required in connection with any public work.
(7) "Public work" has the meaning set forth in RCW 39.04.010.
(8) "Public work consultant services" means architectural,
engineering, and other construction-related services provided by a
consultant.
(9) "Person" means any individual, organization, group,
association, partnership, firm, joint venture, corporation, or any
combination thereof.
(((7))) (10) "Consultant" means any person providing
((professional)) architectural, engineering, or other construction-related consultant services who is not an employee of the agency for
which the services are provided.
(((8))) (11) "Application" means a completed statement of
qualifications together with a request to be considered for the award
of one or more contracts for professional services.

Sec. 5 RCW 39.80.030 and 1981 c 61 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each agency shall publish in advance that agency's requirement for
((professional)) public work consultant services. The announcement
shall state concisely the general scope and nature of the project or
work for which the services are required and the address of a
representative of the agency who can provide further details. An
agency may comply with this section by: (1) Publishing an announcement
on each occasion when ((professional)) public work consultant services
provided by a consultant are required by the agency; or (2) announcing
generally to the public its projected requirements for any category or
type of ((professional)) public work consultant services.

Sec. 6 RCW 39.80.040 and 1981 c 61 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In the procurement of ((architectural and engineering)) public
work consultant services, the agency shall encourage firms engaged in
the lawful practice of their profession to submit annually a statement
of qualifications and performance data. The agency shall evaluate
current statements of qualifications and performance data on file with
the agency, together with those that may be submitted by other firms
regarding the proposed project, and shall conduct discussions with one
or more firms regarding anticipated concepts and the relative utility
of alternative methods of approach for furnishing the required services
and then shall select therefrom, based upon criteria established by the
agency, the firm deemed to be the most highly qualified to provide the
services required for the proposed project. Such agency procedures and
guidelines shall include a plan to insure that minority and women-owned
firms are afforded the maximum practicable opportunity to compete for
and obtain public contracts for services. The level of participation
by minority and women-owned firms shall be consistent with their
general availability within the professional communities involved.
(2) In the procurement of public work consultant planning services
relating to a facility outside of the district's jurisdictional
boundaries, after the district purchases property for the facility, the
port district or districts with responsibility for the future property
development and use must make available to the public in the affected
area information about:
(a) The type and scale of proposed uses on the site;
(b) The type and scale of business and industrial activities the
development is likely to later attract to the site and to the nearby
area;
(c) The general character and scope of impacts on air quality,
noise, water resources, and recreation; and
(d) The expected impacts on local and state transportation
infrastructure, including state highways, local roads, rail, shipping,
and air service. Such information must be made available throughout
both the planning and design phases by means of web pages, office
inspection and copying, one or more property tours, and public meetings
which allow interested citizens to comment to port officials on several
occasions over time as the development plans evolve.

Sec. 7 RCW 39.80.050 and 1981 c 61 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The agency shall negotiate a contract with the most qualified
firm for ((architectural and engineering)) public work consultant
services at a price which the agency determines is fair and reasonable
to the agency. In making its determination, the agency shall take into
account the estimated value of the services to be rendered as well as
the scope, complexity, and professional nature thereof.
(2) If the agency is unable to negotiate a satisfactory contract
with the firm selected at a price the agency determines to be fair and
reasonable, negotiations with that firm shall be formally terminated
and the agency shall select other firms in accordance with RCW
39.80.040 and continue in accordance with this section until an
agreement is reached or the process is terminated.

Sec. 8 RCW 53.08.120 and 2000 c 138 s 210 are each amended to
read as follows:
All material required by a port district may be procured in the
open market or by contract and all public work, as defined in RCW
39.04.010, ordered may be done by contract or day labor. All such
contracts for public work, the estimated cost of which exceeds two
hundred thousand dollars, shall be let at public bidding upon notice
published in a newspaper of general circulation in the district at
least thirteen days before the last date upon which bids will be
received, calling for sealed bids upon the work, plans and
specifications for which shall then be on file in the office of the
commission for public inspection. The same notice may call for bids on
such work or material based upon plans and specifications submitted by
the bidder. The competitive bidding requirements for purchases or
public works may be waived pursuant to RCW 39.04.280 if an exemption
contained within that section applies to the purchase or public work.
However, a port district may let contracts using the small works
roster process under RCW 39.04.155 in lieu of calling for sealed bids.
Whenever possible, the managing official shall invite at least one
proposal from a minority contractor who shall otherwise qualify under
this section.
When awarding such a contract for public work, when utilizing
proposals from the small works roster, the managing official shall give
weight to the contractor submitting the lowest and best proposal, and
whenever it would not violate the public interest, such contracts shall
be distributed equally among contractors, including minority
contractors, on the small works roster.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 53.08 RCW
to read as follows:
A port district shall specifically comply with chapter 39.80 RCW in
the procurement of all architectural, engineering, and other
construction-related services, as those terms are defined in RCW
39.80.020.

Sec. 10 RCW 53.12.270 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 12 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The commission may delegate to the managing official of a port
district such administerial powers and duties of the commission as it
may deem proper for the efficient and proper management of port
district operations. Any such delegation shall be authorized by
appropriate resolution of the commission, which resolution must also
establish guidelines and procedures for the managing official to
follow.
(2) The commission shall establish, by resolution, policies to
comply with RCW 39.04.280 that set forth the conditions by which
competitive bidding requirements for public works contracts may be
waived.

--- END ---