BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.44.030 and 2007 c 387 s 3 and 2007 c 220 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is required to make a report of child abuse or neglect
to the proper law enforcement agency or to the department as provided
in RCW 26.44.040, if:
(a) ((When any)) The practitioner, county coroner or medical
examiner, law enforcement officer, professional school personnel,
registered or licensed nurse, social service counselor, psychologist,
pharmacist, employee of the department of early learning, licensed or
certified child care providers or their employees, employee of the
department, juvenile probation officer, placement and liaison
specialist, responsible living skills program staff, HOPE center staff,
or state family and children's ombudsman or ((any)) volunteer in the
ombudsman's office and has reasonable cause to believe that a child has
suffered abuse or neglect((, he or she shall report such incident, or
cause a report to be made, to the proper law enforcement agency or to
the department as provided in RCW 26.44.040)).
(b) ((When any person, in his or her official supervisory capacity
with a nonprofit or for-profit organization, has reasonable cause to
believe that a child has suffered abuse or neglect caused by a person
over whom he or she regularly exercises supervisory authority, he or
she shall report such incident, or cause a report to be made, to the
proper law enforcement agency, provided that the person alleged to have
caused the abuse or neglect is employed by, contracted by, or
volunteers with the organization and coaches, trains, educates, or
counsels a child or children or regularly has unsupervised access to a
child or children as part of the employment, contract, or voluntary
service. No one shall be required to report under this section when he
or she obtains the information solely as a result of a privileged
communication as provided in RCW 5.60.060.
Nothing in this subsection (1)(b) shall limit a person's duty to
report under (a) of this subsection.
For the purposes of this subsection, the following definitions
apply:
(i) "Official supervisory capacity" means a position, status, or
role created, recognized, or designated by any nonprofit or for-profit
organization, either for financial gain or without financial gain,
whose scope includes, but is not limited to, overseeing, directing, or
managing another person who is employed by, contracted by, or
volunteers with the nonprofit or for-profit organization.
(ii) "Regularly exercises supervisory authority" means to act in
his or her official supervisory capacity on an ongoing or continuing
basis with regards to a particular person.
(c) The reporting requirement also applies to)) The person is an
employee of the department of corrections ((personnel)) who, in the
course of ((their)) his or her employment, observes offenders or the
children with whom the offenders are in contact((. If)) and, as a
result of observations or information received in the course of his or
her employment, ((any department of corrections personnel)) has
reasonable cause to believe that a child has suffered abuse or
neglect((, he or she shall report the incident, or cause a report to be
made, to the proper law enforcement agency or to the department as
provided in RCW 26.44.040)).
(((d) The reporting requirement shall also apply to any)) (c) The
person is an adult who has reasonable cause to believe that a child who
resides with them, has suffered severe abuse, and is able or capable of
making a report. For the purposes of this subsection, "severe abuse"
means any of the following: Any single act of abuse that causes
physical trauma of sufficient severity that, if left untreated, could
cause death; any single act of sexual abuse that causes significant
bleeding, deep bruising, or significant external or internal swelling;
or more than one act of physical abuse, each of which causes bleeding,
deep bruising, significant external or internal swelling, bone
fracture, or unconsciousness.
(((e) The)) (2)(a) A person is required to make a report of child
abuse or neglect to the proper law enforcement agency if the person, in
his or her official supervisory capacity with an organization or
entity, has reasonable cause to believe that a child has suffered abuse
or neglect caused by a person over whom he or she regularly exercises
supervisory authority, provided that the person alleged to have caused
the abuse or neglect is employed by, contracted by, or volunteers with
the organization or entity and coaches, trains, educates, or counsels
a child or children or regularly has unsupervised access to a child or
children as part of the employment, contract, or voluntary service.
(b) A person has reasonable cause to believe a child has suffered
abuse or neglect under this subsection if he or she witnesses or
receives a written or oral report of sexual misconduct by a person over
whom he or she regularly exercises supervisory authority which is
alleged to have caused the abuse or neglect of a child.
(c) No one shall be required to report under this section when he
or she obtains the information solely as a result of a privileged
communication as provided in RCW 5.60.060.
(d) Nothing in this subsection shall limit a person's duty to
report under subsection (1) of this section.
(e) For the purposes of this subsection, the following definitions
apply:
(i) "Official supervisory capacity" means a position, status, or
role created, recognized, or designated by any organization or entity,
either for financial gain or without financial gain, whose scope
includes, but is not limited to, overseeing, directing, or managing
another person who is employed by, contracted by, or volunteers with
the organization or entity.
(ii) "Organization or entity" includes a sole proprietor,
partnership, corporation, limited liability company, trust,
association, financial institution, governmental entity, other than the
federal government, and any other individual or group, engaged in a
trade, occupation, enterprise, governmental function, or similar
activity in this state, however organized and whether organized to
operate at a profit.
(iii) "Regularly exercises supervisory authority" means to act in
his or her official supervisory capacity on an ongoing or continuing
basis with regards to a particular person.
(iv) "Sexual misconduct" means:
(A) Any sexual advance, whether verbal, written, or physical;
(B) Sexual intercourse, as defined in RCW 9A.44.010;
(C) The intentional touching of the sexual or other intimate parts
of a child except to the extent necessary and appropriate to attend to
the hygienic or health needs of the child;
(D) Any activities determined to be grooming behavior for purposes
of establishing a sexual relationship;
(E) Indecent exposure, as defined in RCW 9A.88.010; or
(F) Commission of a criminal sex offense as defined under chapter
9A.44 RCW.
(3) A report under this section must be made at the first
opportunity, but in no case longer than forty-eight hours after there
is reasonable cause to believe that the child has suffered abuse or
neglect. The report must include the identity of the accused if known.
(((2))) (4) The reporting requirement ((of subsection (1) of this
section)) does not apply to the discovery of abuse or neglect that
occurred during childhood if it is discovered after the child has
become an adult. However, if there is reasonable cause to believe
other children are or may be at risk of abuse or neglect by the
accused, ((the reporting requirement of subsection (1) of this section
does apply)) a report must be made.
(((3))) (5) Any other person who has reasonable cause to believe
that a child has suffered abuse or neglect may report such incident to
the proper law enforcement agency or to the department of social and
health services as provided in RCW 26.44.040.
(((4) The department, upon receiving a report of an incident of
alleged abuse or neglect pursuant to this chapter, involving a child
who has died or has had physical injury or injuries inflicted upon him
or her other than by accidental means or who has been subjected to
alleged sexual abuse, shall report such incident to the proper law
enforcement agency. In emergency cases, where the child's welfare is
endangered, the department shall notify the proper law enforcement
agency within twenty-four hours after a report is received by the
department. In all other cases, the department shall notify the law
enforcement agency within seventy-two hours after a report is received
by the department. If the department makes an oral report, a written
report must also be made to the proper law enforcement agency within
five days thereafter.
(5) Any law enforcement agency receiving a report of an incident of
alleged abuse or neglect pursuant to this chapter, involving a child
who has died or has had physical injury or injuries inflicted upon him
or her other than by accidental means, or who has been subjected to
alleged sexual abuse, shall report such incident in writing as provided
in RCW 26.44.040 to the proper county prosecutor or city attorney for
appropriate action whenever the law enforcement agency's investigation
reveals that a crime may have been committed. The law enforcement
agency shall also notify the department of all reports received and the
law enforcement agency's disposition of them. In emergency cases,
where the child's welfare is endangered, the law enforcement agency
shall notify the department within twenty-four hours. In all other
cases, the law enforcement agency shall notify the department within
seventy-two hours after a report is received by the law enforcement
agency.
(6) Any county prosecutor or city attorney receiving a report under
subsection (5) of this section shall notify the victim, any persons the
victim requests, and the local office of the department, of the
decision to charge or decline to charge a crime, within five days of
making the decision.
(7) The department may conduct ongoing case planning and
consultation with those persons or agencies required to report under
this section, with consultants designated by the department, and with
designated representatives of Washington Indian tribes if the client
information exchanged is pertinent to cases currently receiving child
protective services. Upon request, the department shall conduct such
planning and consultation with those persons required to report under
this section if the department determines it is in the best interests
of the child. Information considered privileged by statute and not
directly related to reports required by this section must not be
divulged without a valid written waiver of the privilege.
(8) Any case referred to the department by a physician licensed
under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW on the basis of an expert medical
opinion that child abuse, neglect, or sexual assault has occurred and
that the child's safety will be seriously endangered if returned home,
the department shall file a dependency petition unless a second
licensed physician of the parents' choice believes that such expert
medical opinion is incorrect. If the parents fail to designate a
second physician, the department may make the selection. If a
physician finds that a child has suffered abuse or neglect but that
such abuse or neglect does not constitute imminent danger to the
child's health or safety, and the department agrees with the
physician's assessment, the child may be left in the parents' home
while the department proceeds with reasonable efforts to remedy
parenting deficiencies.
(9) Persons or agencies exchanging information under subsection (7)
of this section shall not further disseminate or release the
information except as authorized by state or federal statute.
Violation of this subsection is a misdemeanor.
(10) Upon receiving a report of alleged abuse or neglect, the
department shall make reasonable efforts to learn the name, address,
and telephone number of each person making a report of abuse or neglect
under this section. The department shall provide assurances of
appropriate confidentiality of the identification of persons reporting
under this section. If the department is unable to learn the
information required under this subsection, the department shall only
investigate cases in which:
(a) The department believes there is a serious threat of
substantial harm to the child;
(b) The report indicates conduct involving a criminal offense that
has, or is about to occur, in which the child is the victim; or
(c) The department has a prior founded report of abuse or neglect
with regard to a member of the household that is within three years of
receipt of the referral.
(11)(a) For reports of alleged abuse or neglect that are accepted
for investigation by the department, the investigation shall be
conducted within time frames established by the department in rule. In
no case shall the investigation extend longer than ninety days from the
date the report is received, unless the investigation is being
conducted under a written protocol pursuant to RCW 26.44.180 and a law
enforcement agency or prosecuting attorney has determined that a longer
investigation period is necessary. At the completion of the
investigation, the department shall make a finding that the report of
child abuse or neglect is founded or unfounded.
(b) If a court in a civil or criminal proceeding, considering the
same facts or circumstances as are contained in the report being
investigated by the department, makes a judicial finding by a
preponderance of the evidence or higher that the subject of the pending
investigation has abused or neglected the child, the department shall
adopt the finding in its investigation.
(12) In conducting an investigation of alleged abuse or neglect,
the department or law enforcement agency:
(a) May interview children. The interviews may be conducted on
school premises, at day-care facilities, at the child's home, or at
other suitable locations outside of the presence of parents. Parental
notification of the interview must occur at the earliest possible point
in the investigation that will not jeopardize the safety or protection
of the child or the course of the investigation. Prior to commencing
the interview the department or law enforcement agency shall determine
whether the child wishes a third party to be present for the interview
and, if so, shall make reasonable efforts to accommodate the child's
wishes. Unless the child objects, the department or law enforcement
agency shall make reasonable efforts to include a third party in any
interview so long as the presence of the third party will not
jeopardize the course of the investigation; and
(b) Shall have access to all relevant records of the child in the
possession of mandated reporters and their employees.
(13) In investigating and responding to allegations of child abuse
and neglect, the department may conduct background checks as authorized
by state and federal law.
(14) The department shall maintain investigation records and
conduct timely and periodic reviews of all founded cases of abuse and
neglect. The department shall maintain a log of screened-out
nonabusive cases.
(15) The department shall use a risk assessment process when
investigating alleged child abuse and neglect referrals. The
department shall present the risk factors at all hearings in which the
placement of a dependent child is an issue. Substance abuse must be a
risk factor. The department shall, within funds appropriated for this
purpose, offer enhanced community-based services to persons who are
determined not to require further state intervention.
(16) Upon receipt of a report of alleged abuse or neglect the law
enforcement agency may arrange to interview the person making the
report and any collateral sources to determine if any malice is
involved in the reporting.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 26.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department, upon receiving a report of an incident of
alleged abuse or neglect pursuant to this chapter, involving a child
who has died or has had physical injury or injuries inflicted upon him
or her other than by accidental means or who has been subjected to
alleged sexual abuse, shall report such incident to the proper law
enforcement agency. In emergency cases, where the child's welfare is
endangered, the department shall notify the proper law enforcement
agency within twenty-four hours after a report is received by the
department. In all other cases, the department shall notify the law
enforcement agency within seventy-two hours after a report is received
by the department. If the department makes an oral report, a written
report must also be made to the proper law enforcement agency within
five days thereafter.
(2) Any law enforcement agency receiving a report of an incident of
alleged abuse or neglect pursuant to this chapter, involving a child
who has died or has had physical injury or injuries inflicted upon him
or her other than by accidental means, or who has been subjected to
alleged sexual abuse, shall report such incident in writing as provided
in RCW 26.44.040 to the proper county prosecutor or city attorney for
appropriate action whenever the law enforcement agency's investigation
reveals that a crime may have been committed. The law enforcement
agency shall also notify the department of all reports received and the
law enforcement agency's disposition of them. In emergency cases,
where the child's welfare is endangered, the law enforcement agency
shall notify the department within twenty-four hours. In all other
cases, the law enforcement agency shall notify the department within
seventy-two hours after a report is received by the law enforcement
agency.
(3) Any county prosecutor or city attorney receiving a report under
subsection (2) of this section shall notify the victim, any persons the
victim requests, and the local office of the department, of the
decision to charge or decline to charge a crime, within five days of
making the decision.
(4) The department may conduct ongoing case planning and
consultation with those persons or agencies required to report under
this section, with consultants designated by the department, and with
designated representatives of Washington Indian tribes if the client
information exchanged is pertinent to cases currently receiving child
protective services. Upon request, the department shall conduct such
planning and consultation with those persons required to report under
this section if the department determines it is in the best interests
of the child. Information considered privileged by statute and not
directly related to reports required by this section must not be
divulged without a valid written waiver of the privilege.
(5) Any case referred to the department by a physician licensed
under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW on the basis of an expert medical
opinion that child abuse, neglect, or sexual assault has occurred and
that the child's safety will be seriously endangered if returned home,
the department shall file a dependency petition unless a second
licensed physician of the parents' choice believes that such expert
medical opinion is incorrect. If the parents fail to designate a
second physician, the department may make the selection. If a
physician finds that a child has suffered abuse or neglect but that
such abuse or neglect does not constitute imminent danger to the
child's health or safety, and the department agrees with the
physician's assessment, the child may be left in the parents' home
while the department proceeds with reasonable efforts to remedy
parenting deficiencies.
(6) Persons or agencies exchanging information under subsection (4)
of this section shall not further disseminate or release the
information except as authorized by state or federal statute.
Violation of this subsection is a misdemeanor.
(7) Upon receiving a report of alleged abuse or neglect, the
department shall make reasonable efforts to learn the name, address,
and telephone number of each person making a report of abuse or neglect
under this section. The department shall provide assurances of
appropriate confidentiality of the identification of persons reporting
under this section. If the department is unable to learn the
information required under this subsection, the department shall only
investigate cases in which:
(a) The department believes there is a serious threat of
substantial harm to the child;
(b) The report indicates conduct involving a criminal offense that
has, or is about to occur, in which the child is the victim; or
(c) The department has a prior founded report of abuse or neglect
with regard to a member of the household that is within three years of
receipt of the referral.
(8)(a) For reports of alleged abuse or neglect that are accepted
for investigation by the department, the investigation shall be
conducted within time frames established by the department in rule. In
no case shall the investigation extend longer than ninety days from the
date the report is received, unless the investigation is being
conducted under a written protocol pursuant to RCW 26.44.180 and a law
enforcement agency or prosecuting attorney has determined that a longer
investigation period is necessary. At the completion of the
investigation, the department shall make a finding that the report of
child abuse or neglect is founded or unfounded.
(b) If a court in a civil or criminal proceeding, considering the
same facts or circumstances as are contained in the report being
investigated by the department, makes a judicial finding by a
preponderance of the evidence or higher that the subject of the pending
investigation has abused or neglected the child, the department shall
adopt the finding in its investigation.
(9) In conducting an investigation of alleged abuse or neglect, the
department or law enforcement agency:
(a) May interview children. The interviews may be conducted on
school premises, at day care facilities, at the child's home, or at
other suitable locations outside of the presence of parents. Parental
notification of the interview must occur at the earliest possible point
in the investigation that will not jeopardize the safety or protection
of the child or the course of the investigation. Prior to commencing
the interview, the department or law enforcement agency shall determine
whether the child wishes a third party to be present for the interview
and, if so, shall make reasonable efforts to accommodate the child's
wishes. Unless the child objects, the department or law enforcement
agency shall make reasonable efforts to include a third party in any
interview so long as the presence of the third party will not
jeopardize the course of the investigation; and
(b) Shall have access to all relevant records of the child in the
possession of mandated reporters and their employees.
(10) In investigating and responding to allegations of child abuse
and neglect, the department may conduct background checks as authorized
by state and federal law.
(11) The department shall maintain investigation records and
conduct timely and periodic reviews of all founded cases of abuse and
neglect. The department shall maintain a log of screened-out
nonabusive cases.
(12) The department shall use a risk assessment process when
investigating alleged child abuse and neglect referrals. The
department shall present the risk factors at all hearings in which the
placement of a dependent child is an issue. Substance abuse must be a
risk factor. The department shall, within funds appropriated for this
purpose, offer enhanced community-based services to persons who are
determined not to require further state intervention.
(13) Upon receipt of a report of alleged abuse or neglect, the law
enforcement agency may arrange to interview the person making the
report and any collateral sources to determine if any malice is
involved in the reporting.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect October 1, 2008.

--- END ---