BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 15.58.070 and 2002 c 274 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All registrations issued by the department expire December 31st
of the following year except that registrations issued by the
department to a registrant who is applying to register an additional
pesticide during the second year of the registrant's registration
period shall expire December 31st of that year.
(2) An application for registration ((shall)) must be accompanied
by a fee of ((two)) three hundred ninety dollars for each pesticide,
except that a registrant who is applying to register an additional
pesticide during the year the registrant's registration expires shall
pay a fee of one hundred ((forty-five)) ninety-five dollars for each
additional pesticide.
(3) Fees ((shall)) must be deposited in the agricultural local fund
to support the activities of the pesticide program within the
department.
(4) Any registration approved by the director and in effect on the
last day of the registration period, for which a renewal application
has been made and the proper fee paid, continues in full force and
effect until the director notifies the applicant that the registration
has been renewed, or otherwise denied in accord with the provision of
RCW 15.58.110.

Sec. 2 RCW 15.58.180 and 1997 c 242 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (4) and (5) of this section,
it is unlawful for any person to act in the capacity of a pesticide
dealer or advertise as or assume to act as a pesticide dealer without
first having obtained an annual license from the director. The license
((shall)) expires on the master license expiration date. A license is
required for each location or outlet located within this state from
which pesticides are distributed. A manufacturer, registrant, or
distributor who has no pesticide dealer outlet licensed within this
state and who distributes ((such)) pesticides directly into this state
((shall)) must obtain a pesticide dealer license for his or her
principal out-of-state location or outlet, but such a licensed out-of-state pesticide dealer is exempt from the pesticide dealer manager
requirements.
(2) Application for a license ((shall)) must be accompanied by a
fee of ((fifty)) sixty-seven dollars and ((shall)) must be made through
the master license system and ((shall)) must include the full name of
the person applying for the license and the name of the individual
within the state designated as the pesticide dealer manager. If the
applicant is a partnership, association, corporation, or organized
group of persons, the full name of each member of the firm or
partnership or the names of the officers of the association or
corporation ((shall)) must be given on the application. The
application ((shall further)) must state the principal business address
of the applicant in the state and elsewhere, the name of a person
domiciled in this state authorized to receive and accept service of
summons of legal notices of all kinds for the applicant, and any other
necessary information prescribed by the director.
(3) It is unlawful for any licensed dealer outlet to operate
without a pesticide dealer manager who has a license of qualification.
((The department shall be notified forthwith of any change in the
pesticide dealer manager designee during the licensing period.))
(4) This section does not apply to (a) a licensed pesticide
applicator who sells pesticides only as an integral part of the
applicator's pesticide application service when ((such)) pesticides are
dispensed only through apparatuses used for ((such)) pesticide
application, or (b) any federal, state, county, or municipal agency
that provides pesticides only for its own programs.
(5) A user of a pesticide may distribute a properly labeled
pesticide to another user who is legally entitled to use that pesticide
without obtaining a pesticide dealer's license if the exclusive purpose
of distributing the pesticide is keeping it from becoming a hazardous
waste as defined in chapter 70.105 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 15.58.200 and 1997 c 242 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The director shall require each pesticide dealer manager to
demonstrate to the director knowledge of pesticide laws and rules;
pesticide hazards; and the safe distribution, use and application, and
disposal of pesticides by satisfactorily passing a written examination
after which the director shall issue a license of qualification.
Application for a license ((shall)) must be accompanied by a fee of
((twenty-five)) thirty-three dollars. The pesticide dealer manager
license ((shall be an annual license expiring)) expires annually on a
date set by rule by the director.

Sec. 4 RCW 15.58.205 and 2003 c 212 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,)) No
individual may perform services as a structural pest inspector or
advertise that they perform services of a structural pest inspector
without obtaining a structural pest inspector license from the
director. The license expires annually on a date set by rule by the
director. Application for a license must be on a form prescribed by
the director and must be accompanied by a fee of ((forty-five))sixty
dollars.
(2) The following are exempt from the application fee requirement
((of subsection (1))) of this section when acting within the
authorities of their existing licenses issued under this chapter
((15.58)) or chapter 17.21 RCW: Licensed pest control consultants;
licensed commercial pesticide applicators and operators; licensed
private-commercial applicators; and licensed demonstration and research
applicators.
(3) The following are exempt from the structural pest inspector
licensing requirement: Individuals inspecting for damage caused by
wood destroying organisms if the inspections are solely for the purpose
of: (a) Repairing or making specific recommendations for the repair of
the damage, or (b) assessing a monetary value for the structure
inspected. Individuals performing wood destroying organism inspections
that incorporate but are not limited to the activities described in (a)
or (b) of this subsection are not exempt from the structural pest
inspector licensing requirement.
(4) ((Persons holding a valid license to act as a structural pest
inspector on July 1, 2003, are exempt from this requirement until
expiration of that license.
(5))) A structural pest inspector license is not valid for
conducting a complete wood destroying organism inspection unless the
inspector owns or is employed by a business with a structural pest
inspection company license.

Sec. 5 RCW 15.58.210 and 2003 c 212 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,)) No
individual may perform services as a pest control consultant without
obtaining a license from the director. The license ((shall)) expires
annually on a date set by rule by the director. Application for a
license ((shall)) must be on a form prescribed by the director and
((shall)) must be accompanied by a fee of ((forty-five)) sixty dollars.
(2) The following are exempt from the licensing requirements ((of
subsection (1))) of this section when acting within the authorities of
their existing licenses issued under chapter 17.21 RCW: Licensed
commercial pesticide applicators and operators; licensed private-commercial applicators; and licensed demonstration and research
applicators. The following are also exempt from the licensing
requirements ((of subsection (1))) of this section: Employees of
federal, state, county, or municipal agencies when acting in their
official governmental capacities; and pesticide dealer managers and
employees working under the direct supervision of the pesticide dealer
manager and only at a licensed pesticide dealer's outlet.

Sec. 6 RCW 15.58.220 and 1997 c 242 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purpose of this section public pest control consultant
means any individual who is employed by a governmental agency or unit
to act as a pest control consultant ((as defined in RCW
15.58.030(28))). No person ((shall)) may act as a public pest control
consultant without first obtaining a license from the director. The
license ((shall)) expires annually on a date set by rule by the
director. Application for a license ((shall)) must be on a form
prescribed by the director and ((shall)) must be accompanied by a fee
of ((twenty-five)) thirty-three dollars. Federal and state employees
whose principal responsibilities are in pesticide research, the
jurisdictional health officer or a duly authorized representative,
public pest control consultants licensed and working in the health
vector field, and public operators licensed under RCW 17.21.220 ((shall
be)) are exempt from this licensing provision.

Sec. 7 RCW 17.21.070 and 1997 c 242 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
It ((shall be)) is unlawful for any person to engage in the
business of applying pesticides to the land of another without a
commercial pesticide applicator license. Application for a commercial
applicator license ((shall)) must be accompanied by a fee of ((one
hundred seventy)) two hundred twenty-six dollars and in addition a fee
of twenty-seven dollars for each apparatus, exclusive of one, used by
the applicant in the application of pesticides((: PROVIDED, That the
provisions of this section shall not apply to any person employed only
to operate any apparatus used for the application of any pesticide, and
in which such person has no financial interest or other control over
such apparatus other than its day to day mechanical operation for the
purpose of applying any pesticide)).

Sec. 8 RCW 17.21.110 and 1997 c 242 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
It ((shall be)) is unlawful for any person to act as an employee of
a commercial pesticide applicator and apply pesticides manually or as
the operator directly in charge of any apparatus which is licensed or
should be licensed under ((the provisions of)) this chapter for the
application of any pesticide, without having obtained a commercial
pesticide operator license from the director. The commercial pesticide
operator license ((shall be)) is in addition to any other license or
permit required by law for the operation or use of any such apparatus.
Application for a commercial operator license ((shall)) must be
accompanied by a fee of ((fifty)) sixty-seven dollars. ((The
provisions of)) This section ((shall)) does not apply to any individual
who is a licensed commercial pesticide applicator.

Sec. 9 RCW 17.21.122 and 1997 c 242 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
It ((shall be)) is unlawful for any person to act as a private-commercial pesticide applicator without having obtained a private-commercial pesticide applicator license from the director. Application
for a private-commercial pesticide applicator license ((shall)) must be
accompanied by a fee of ((twenty-five)) thirty-three dollars.

Sec. 10 RCW 17.21.126 and 2004 c 100 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is unlawful for any person to act as a private applicator,
limited private applicator, or rancher private applicator without first
complying with requirements determined by the director as necessary to
prevent unreasonable adverse effects on the environment, including
injury to the pesticide applicator or other persons, for each specific
pesticide use.
(1) Certification standards to determine the individual's
competency with respect to the use and handling of the pesticide or
class of pesticides for which the private applicator, limited private
applicator, or rancher private applicator is certified ((shall)) must
be relative to hazards of the particular type of application, class of
pesticides, or handling procedure. In determining these standards the
director ((shall)) must take into consideration standards of the EPA
and is authorized to adopt these standards by rule.
(2) Application for a private applicator or a limited private
applicator license((, or the renewal of such licenses under RCW
17.21.132(4), shall)) must be accompanied by a fee of ((twenty-five))
thirty-three dollars. Application for a rancher private applicator
license((, or renewal of such license under RCW 17.21.132(4), shall))
must be accompanied by a fee of ((seventy-five)) one hundred dollars.
Individuals with a valid certified applicator license, pest control
consultant license, or dealer manager license who qualify in the
appropriate statewide or agricultural license categories are exempt
from the private applicator, limited private applicator, or rancher
private applicator fee requirements. However, licensed public
pesticide operators, otherwise exempted from the public pesticide
operator license fee requirement, are not also exempted from the fee
requirements under this subsection.

Sec. 11 RCW 17.21.129 and 1997 c 242 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except as provided in RCW 17.21.203, it is unlawful for a person to
use or supervise the use of any experimental use pesticide or any
restricted use pesticide on small experimental plots for research
purposes when no charge is made for the pesticide and its application
without a demonstration and research applicator's license.
(1) Application for a demonstration and research license ((shall))
must be accompanied by a fee of ((twenty-five)) thirty-three dollars.
(2) Persons licensed ((in accordance with)) under this section are
exempt from the requirements of RCW 17.21.160, 17.21.170, and
17.21.180.

Sec. 12 RCW 17.21.220 and 1997 c 242 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All state agencies, municipal corporations, and public
utilities or any other governmental ((agency shall be)) agencies are
subject to ((the provisions of)) this chapter and its rules ((adopted
thereunder concerning the application of pesticides)).
(2) It ((shall be)) is unlawful for any employee of a state agency,
municipal corporation, public utility, or any other government agency
to use or to supervise the use of any restricted use pesticide, or any
pesticide by means of an apparatus, without having obtained a public
operator license from the director. Application for a public operator
license ((shall)) must be accompanied by a fee of ((twenty-five))
thirty-three dollars. The fee ((shall)) does not apply to public
operators licensed and working in the health vector field. The public
operator license ((shall be)) is valid only when the operator is acting
as an employee of a government agency.
(3) The jurisdictional health officer or his or her duly authorized
representative is exempt from this licensing provision when applying
pesticides that are not restricted use pesticides to control pests
other than weeds.
(4) ((Such)) Agencies, municipal corporations, and public utilities
((shall be)) are subject to legal recourse by any person damaged by
such application of any pesticide, and ((such)) action may be brought
in the county where the damage or some part ((thereof)) of the damage
occurred.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 This act takes effect January 1, 2009.

--- END ---