BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The department of corrections shall
conduct an analysis of the necessary capacity throughout the state to
appropriately confine offenders who violate community custody and
formulate recommendations for future capacity. In conducting its
analysis, the department must consider:
(a) The need to decrease reliance on local correctional facilities
to house violators; and
(b) The costs and benefits of developing a violator treatment
center to provide inpatient treatment, therapies, and counseling.
(2) If the department recommends locating or colocating new
violator facilities, for jurisdictions planning under RCW 36.70A.040,
the department shall work within the local jurisdiction's comprehensive
plan process for identifying and siting an essential public facility
under RCW 36.70A.200. For jurisdictions not planning under RCW
36.70A.040, the department shall apply the local jurisdiction's zoning
or applicable land use code.
(3) The department shall report the results of its analysis to the
governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by November
15, 2008.
(4) To the extent possible within existing funds, the department is
authorized to proceed with the conversion of existing facilities that
are appropriate to house violators.

--- END ---