BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that plants native to
Washington, having evolved and adapted to local conditions over
thousands of years, provide many environmental benefits. Native plants
are resistant to most pests and diseases. Once established, native
plants require neither irrigation nor fertilization, thus helping to
preserve water supplies and minimize damaging chemical runoff into
water bodies. It is thus the intent of the legislature to provide a
sales and use tax exemption to promote the enhanced usage of native
plants and preserve our state's historic botanical legacy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
native horticultural plants by nursery dealers.
(2) The following definitions apply to this section:
(a) "Native horticultural plant" means a horticultural plant, as
defined in RCW 15.13.250, that is native to Washington, as determined
by the department of agriculture.
(b) "Nursery dealer" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
15.13.250.
(3) The department of agriculture shall have the duty of adopting
by rule a list of horticultural plants native to Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use of native horticultural plants.
(2) "Native horticultural plant" has the same meaning as provided
in section 2 of this act.

--- END ---