BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.36.020 and 1999 c 395 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When the injury to any worker is so serious as to require his
or her being taken from the place of injury to a place of treatment,
his or her employer shall, at the expense of the medical aid fund, or
self-insurer, as the case may be, furnish transportation to the nearest
place of proper treatment.
(2) Every worker whose injury results in the loss of one or more
limbs or eyes shall be provided with proper artificial substitutes and
every worker, who suffers an injury to an eye producing an error of
refraction, shall be once provided proper and properly equipped lenses
to correct such error of refraction and his or her disability rating
shall be based upon the loss of sight before correction.
(3) Every worker whose accident results in damage to or destruction
of an artificial limb, eye, or tooth, shall have same repaired or
replaced.
(4) Every worker whose hearing aid or eyeglasses or lenses are
damaged, destroyed, or lost as a result of an industrial accident shall
have the same restored or replaced. The department or self-insurer
shall be liable only for the cost of restoring damaged hearing aids or
eyeglasses to their condition at the time of the accident.
(5)(a) All mechanical appliances necessary in the treatment of an
injured worker, such as braces, belts, casts, and crutches, shall be
provided and all mechanical appliances required as permanent equipment
after treatment has been completed shall continue to be provided or
replaced without regard to the date of injury or date treatment was
completed, notwithstanding any other provision of law.
(b) Injured workers shall be reimbursed for reasonable travel
expenses when travel is required in order to repair, replace, or
otherwise alter prosthetics, orthotics, or similar permanent mechanical
appliances after closure of the claim. This subsection (5)(b) does not
include travel for the repair or replacement of hearing aid devices.
(6) A worker, whose injury is of such short duration as to bring
him or her within the time limit provisions of RCW 51.32.090, shall
nevertheless receive during the omitted period medical, surgical, and
hospital care and service and transportation under the provisions of
this chapter.
(7) Whenever in the sole discretion of the supervisor it is
reasonable and necessary to provide residence modifications necessary
to meet the needs and requirements of the worker who has sustained
catastrophic injury, the department or self-insurer may be ordered to
pay an amount not to exceed the state's average annual wage for one
year as determined under RCW 50.04.355, as now existing or hereafter
amended, toward the cost of such modifications or construction. Such
payment shall only be made for the construction or modification of a
residence in which the injured worker resides. Only one residence of
any worker may be modified or constructed under this subsection,
although the supervisor may order more than one payment for any one
home, up to the maximum amount permitted by this section.
(8)(a) Whenever in the sole discretion of the supervisor it is
reasonable and necessary to modify a motor vehicle owned by a worker
who has become an amputee or becomes paralyzed because of an industrial
injury, the supervisor may order up to fifty percent of the state's
average annual wage for one year, as determined under RCW 50.04.355, to
be paid by the department or self-insurer toward the costs thereof.
(b) In the sole discretion of the supervisor after his or her
review, the amount paid under this subsection may be increased by no
more than four thousand dollars by written order of the supervisor.
(9) The benefits provided by subsections (7) and (8) of this
section are available to any otherwise eligible worker regardless of
the date of industrial injury.

--- END ---