BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.55.092 and 1998 c 16 s 3 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
(1) The regular property tax levy for each taxing district other
than the state may be set at the amount which would be allowed
otherwise under this chapter if the regular property tax levy for the
district for taxes due in prior years beginning with 1986 had been set
at the full amount allowed under this chapter including any levy
authorized under RCW 52.16.160 that would have been imposed but for the
limitation in RCW 52.18.065, applicable upon imposition of the benefit
charge under chapter 52.18 RCW.
(2) A taxing district is required to submit an authorizing
proposition to the voters in order to increase the regular property tax
levy by an amount authorized under this section. The submitted
proposition must be: (a) Approved by a majority of the voters of the
taxing district voting on the proposition; and (b) voted on at an
election held not more than twelve months prior to the date in which
the proposed regular property tax is to be levied.
(3) The purpose of this section is to remove the incentive for a
taxing district to maintain its tax levy at the maximum level permitted
under this chapter, and to protect the future levy capacity of a taxing
district that reduces its tax levy below the level that it otherwise
could impose under this chapter, by removing the adverse consequences
to future levy capacities resulting from such levy reductions.

--- END ---