BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 76.15.005 and 1991 c 179 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Trees and other woody vegetation are a necessary and important
part of community and urban environments. Community and urban forests
have many values and uses including promoting urban livability,
improving public health, sequestering carbon, conserving energy,
reducing air and water pollution and soil erosion, contributing to
property values, attracting business, reducing glare and noise,
providing aesthetic and historical values, providing wood products, and
affording comfort and protection for humans and wildlife.
(2) Well-managed and maintained community and urban forests
minimize catastrophic losses of life, property, and environmental
values due to floods, windstorms, ice storms, wildland fires, and other
natural disasters. Natural disasters, pest and disease infestations,
and lack of protection from human impacts pose significant threats to
the community and urban forests. Urban forests provide multiple
benefits and their loss would result in major financial, social, and
environmental costs to Washington.
(3) As urban and community areas in Washington state grow, the need
to plan for and protect community and urban forests increases. Cities
and communities benefit from assistance in developing and maintaining
community and urban forestry programs that also address future growth.
(((3))) (4) Assistance and encouragement in establishment,
retention, and enhancement of these forests and trees by local
governments, citizens, organizations, and professionals are in the
interest of the state based on the contributions these forests make in
preserving and enhancing the quality of life of Washington's
municipalities and counties while providing opportunities for economic
development.
(5) An inventory and assessment of community and urban forest
conditions enables the department to identify and establish priorities
for actions necessary to preserve and enhance the public investment in
community and urban forest resources.

Sec. 2 RCW 76.15.010 and 2000 c 11 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions
in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Community and urban forest" is that land in and around human
settlements ranging from small communities to metropolitan areas,
occupied or potentially occupied by trees and associated vegetation.
Community and urban forest land may be planted or unplanted, used or
unused, and includes public and private lands, lands along
transportation and utility corridors, and forested watershed lands
within populated areas.
(2) "Community and urban forest assessment" means an analysis of
the community and urban forest inventory to establish the value of
urban forest-related benefits, highlight trends and issues of concern,
identify high priority areas to be addressed, outline strategies for
addressing critical issues and urban landscapes, and identify
opportunities for the planting of additional trees to sustain
Washington's urban and community forests.
(3) "Community and urban forest inventory" means a management tool
designed to gauge the condition, management status, health, and
diversity of a community and urban forest. An inventory may evaluate
individual trees, groups of trees, or canopy cover within community and
urban forests, and must be periodically updated by the department.
(4) "Community and urban forestry" means the planning,
establishment, protection, care, and management of trees and associated
plants individually, in small groups, or under forest conditions within
municipalities and counties.
(((3))) (5) "Department" means the department of natural resources.
(((4))) (6) "Municipality" means a city, town, port district,
public school district, community college district, irrigation
district, weed control district, park district, or other political
subdivision of the state.
(((5))) (7) "Person" means an individual, partnership, private or
public municipal corporation, Indian tribe, state entity, county or
local governmental entity, or association of individuals of whatever
nature.

Sec. 3 RCW 76.15.020 and 1991 c 179 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department ((may)) shall establish and maintain a program
in community and urban forestry to accomplish the purpose stated in RCW
76.15.007. The department may assist municipalities and counties in
establishing and maintaining community and urban forestry programs and
encourage persons to engage in appropriate and improved tree management
and care.
(2) The department ((may)) shall advise, encourage, and assist
municipalities, counties, and other public and private entities in the
development and coordination of policies, programs, and activities for
the promotion and preservation of community and urban forestry.
(3) The department may appoint a committee or council to advise the
department in establishing and carrying out a program in community and
urban forestry.
(4) The department may assist municipal and county tree maintenance
programs by making surplus equipment available on loan where feasible
for community and urban forestry programs and cooperative projects.
(5) The commissioner of public lands shall appoint a technical
advisory committee to advise the department in the development of
uniform criteria for a statewide community and urban forest inventory
and assessment.
(a) The technical advisory committee must include but is not
limited to: Arborists; municipal foresters; educators; consultants;
researchers; public works and utilities professionals; information
technology specialists; and other affiliated professionals.
(b) The criteria for a statewide community and urban forest
inventory may include, but is not limited to: Tree size; species;
location; condition; contribution to canopy cover and volume; available
planting spaces; and economic, social, and monetary value.
(c) The technical advisory committee members must be compensated as
provided in RCW 43.03.250 and must receive reimbursement for travel
expenses as provided by RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Costs associated
with the technical advisory committee may be paid from the general fund
appropriation made available to the department for community and urban
forestry.
(6) The department shall, in collaboration with municipalities and
a statewide organization representing urban and community forestry
programs, develop the implementation plan for the inventory and
assessment of the community and urban forests in Washington state.
(7) The department shall, in collaboration with educational
institutions, municipalities, corporations, state and national service
organizations, and environmental organizations, conduct a statewide
inventory of community and urban forests. Statewide data must be
maintained and periodically updated by the department and made
available to every municipality.
(8) The department shall, in collaboration with a statewide
organization representing urban and community forestry programs,
conduct an urban forest assessment and develop recommendations to the
legislature to improve community and urban forestry in Washington
state. The commissioner of public lands must report progress annually
to the legislature, beginning January 1, 2009.

--- END ---