BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.07.370 and 2007 c 523 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary of state may solicit and accept gifts, grants,
conveyances, bequests, and devises of real or personal property, or
both, in trust or otherwise, and sell, lease, exchange, invest, or
expend these donations or the proceeds, rents, profits, and income from
the donations except as limited by the donor's terms.
(2) Moneys received under this section may be used only for the
following purposes:
(a) Conducting oral histories;
(b) Archival activities;
(c) Washington state library activities; ((and))
(d) Development, construction, and operation of the Washington
state heritage center; and
(e) Donation of Washington state flags.
(3)(a) Moneys received under subsection (2)(a) through (c) of this
section must be deposited in the oral history, state library, and
archives account established in RCW 43.07.380.
(b) Moneys received under subsection (2)(d) of this section must be
deposited in the Washington state heritage center account created in
RCW 43.07.129.
(c) Moneys received under subsection (2)(e) of this section must be
deposited in the Washington state flag account created in section 2 of
this act.
(4) The secretary of state shall adopt rules to govern and protect
the receipt and expenditure of the proceeds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.07 RCW
to read as follows:
The Washington state flag account is created in the custody of the
state treasurer. All moneys received under RCW 43.07.370(2)(e) must be
deposited in the account. Expenditures from the account may be used
only for the purpose of donating Washington state flags to Washington
state military personnel. Only the secretary of state or the secretary
of state's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The
account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but
an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 42.52 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter does not prohibit the secretary of state or the
secretary of state's designee from soliciting and accepting
contributions to the Washington state flag account created in section
2 of this act.

--- END ---