BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that solar electric
generating technologies have advanced significantly in the past decade,
and that solar power is becoming more cost-competitive with other
traditional and renewable generation. The legislature further finds
that there is a public interest in promoting greater industrial and
commercial applications for solar electric generation. To this end the
state should support pilot projects that employ industrial and
commercial structures for solar arrays in order to promote more
efficient and cost-effective solar power production. The legislature
further finds that such distributed solar generation will have
additional benefits in reducing transmission losses from grid-based
service, as well as contributing toward reducing greenhouse gas
emissions from the state's electrical service sector.
Therefore it is the purpose of this act to increase incentives
payments to businesses installing solar power for use on-site, to
prevent increases in property tax valuation from solar power
installation, and to provide additional incentives for solar power
installation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Property equipped with solar energy systems for the purpose of
heating, cooling, or generating electrical energy is exempt from ad
valorem taxation in an amount that equals any positive amount obtained
by subtracting the real market value of the property, as if it were not
equipped with such systems, from the real market value of the property
so equipped.
(2) This section applies to tax years beginning prior to July 1,
2020.
(3) This section does not apply to property used by a light and
power business for the generation of electricity.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.16.110 and 2005 c 300 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Community-based solar energy project" means a project of local
citizens cooperating with a local governmental entity, which is
voluntarily funded, for the installation of photovoltaic systems of
less than one hundred thirty kilowatts on property owned by the
participating governmental entity.
(2) "Customer-generated electricity" means the alternating current
electricity that is generated from a renewable energy system located on
an individual's, businesses', or local government's real property that
is also provided electricity generated by a light and power business.
Except for a community-based solar energy project, a system located on
a leasehold interest does not qualify under this definition.
"Customer-generated electricity" does not include electricity generated
by a light and power business with greater than one thousand megawatt
hours of annual sales or a gas distribution business.
(((2))) (3) "Economic development kilowatt-hour" means the actual
kilowatt-hour measurement of customer-generated electricity multiplied
by the appropriate economic development factor.
(((3))) (4) "Local governmental entity" means any unit of local
government of this state including, but not limited to, counties,
cities, towns, municipal corporations, quasi-municipal corporations,
special purpose districts, and school districts.
(5) "Photovoltaic cell" means a device that converts light directly
into electricity without moving parts.
(((4))) (6) "Renewable energy system" means a solar energy system,
an anaerobic digester as defined in RCW 82.08.900, or a wind generator
used for producing electricity.
(((5))) (7) "Solar energy system" means any device or combination
of devices or elements that rely upon direct sunlight as an energy
source for use in the generation of electricity.
(((6))) (8) "Solar inverter" means the device used to convert
direct current to alternating current in a photovoltaic cell system.
(((7))) (9) "Solar module" means the smallest nondivisible self-contained physical structure housing interconnected photovoltaic cells
and providing a single direct current electrical output.
(((8) "Standards for interconnection to the electric distribution
system" means technical, engineering, operational, safety, and
procedural requirements for interconnection to the electric
distribution system of a light and power business.))

Sec. 4 RCW 82.16.120 and 2007 c 111 s 101 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any individual, business, or local governmental entity, not in
the light and power business or in the gas distribution business, may
apply to the light and power business serving the situs of the system,
each fiscal year beginning on July 1, 2005, for an investment cost
recovery incentive for each kilowatt-hour from a customer-generated
electricity renewable energy system installed on its property that is
not interconnected to the electric distribution system. No incentive
may be paid for kilowatt-hours generated before July 1, 2005, or after
June 30, ((2014)) 2020.
(2) When light and power businesses serving eighty percent of the
total customer load in the state adopt uniform standards for
interconnection to the electric distribution system, any individual,
business, or local governmental entity, not in the light and power
business or in the gas distribution business, may apply to the light
and power business serving the situs of the system, each fiscal year,
for an investment cost recovery incentive for each kilowatt-hour from
a customer-generated electricity renewable energy system installed on
its property that is not interconnected to the electric distribution
system and from a customer-generated electricity renewable energy
system installed on its property that is interconnected to the electric
distribution system. Uniform standards for interconnection to the
electric distribution system means those standards established by light
and power businesses that have ninety percent of total requirements the
same. No incentive may be paid for kilowatt-hours generated before
July 1, 2005, or after June 30, ((2014)) 2020.
(3)(a) Before submitting for the first time the application for the
incentive allowed under subsection (5) of this section, the applicant
shall submit to the department of revenue and to the climate and rural
energy development center at the Washington State University,
established under RCW 28B.30.642, a certification in a form and manner
prescribed by the department that includes, but is not limited to, the
following information:
(i) The name and address of the applicant and location of the
renewable energy system;
(ii) The applicant's tax registration number;
(iii) That the electricity produced by the applicant meets the
definition of "customer-generated electricity" and that the renewable
energy system produces electricity with:
(A) Any solar inverters and solar modules manufactured in
Washington state;
(B) A wind generator powered by blades manufactured in Washington
state;
(C) A solar inverter manufactured in Washington state;
(D) A solar module manufactured in Washington state; or
(E) Solar or wind equipment manufactured outside of Washington
state;
(iv) That the electricity can be transformed or transmitted for
entry into or operation in parallel with electricity transmission and
distribution systems;
(v) The date that the renewable energy system received its final
electrical permit from the applicable local jurisdiction.
(b) Within thirty days of receipt of the certification the
department of revenue shall notify the applicant by mail, or
electronically as provided in RCW 82.32.135, whether the renewable
energy system qualifies for an incentive under this section. The
department may consult with the climate and rural energy development
center to determine eligibility for the incentive. System
certifications and the information contained therein are subject to
disclosure under RCW 82.32.330(3)(m).
(4)(a) By August 1st of each year application for the incentive
shall be made to the light and power business serving the situs of the
system by certification in a form and manner prescribed by the
department that includes, but is not limited to, the following
information:
(i) The name and address of the applicant and location of the
renewable energy system;
(ii) The applicant's tax registration number;
(iii) The date of the notification from the department of revenue
stating that the renewable energy system is eligible for the incentives
under this section;
(iv) A statement of the amount of kilowatt-hours generated by the
renewable energy system in the prior fiscal year.
(b) Within sixty days of receipt of the incentive certification the
light and power business serving the situs of the system shall notify
the applicant in writing whether the incentive payment will be
authorized or denied. The business may consult with the climate and
rural energy development center to determine eligibility for the
incentive payment. Incentive certifications and the information
contained therein are subject to disclosure under RCW 82.32.330(3)(m).
(c)(i) Persons receiving incentive payments shall keep and
preserve, for a period of five years, suitable records as may be
necessary to determine the amount of incentive applied for and
received. Such records shall be open for examination at any time upon
notice by the light and power business that made the payment or by the
department. If upon examination of any records or from other
information obtained by the business or department it appears that an
incentive has been paid in an amount that exceeds the correct amount of
incentive payable, the business may assess against the person for the
amount found to have been paid in excess of the correct amount of
incentive payable and shall add thereto interest on the amount.
Interest shall be assessed in the manner that the department assesses
interest upon delinquent tax under RCW 82.32.050.
(ii) If it appears that the amount of incentive paid is less than
the correct amount of incentive payable the business may authorize
additional payment.
(5) The investment cost recovery incentive may be paid fifteen
cents per economic development kilowatt-hour unless requests exceed the
amount authorized for credit to the participating light and power
business. For the purposes of this section, the rate paid for the
investment cost recovery incentive may be multiplied by the following
factors:
(a) For customer-generated electricity produced using solar modules
manufactured in Washington state, two and four-tenths;
(b) For customer-generated electricity produced using a solar or a
wind generator equipped with an inverter manufactured in Washington
state, one and two-tenths;
(c) For customer-generated electricity produced using an anaerobic
digester, or by other solar equipment or using a wind generator
equipped with blades manufactured in Washington state, one; and
(d) For all other customer-generated electricity produced by wind,
eight-tenths.
(6) No individual, household, business, or local governmental
entity is eligible for incentives provided under subsection (5) of this
section for more than two thousand dollars per year. For the purpose
of calculating the annual incentive limit under this subsection,
community-based solar projects that are located on separate parcels of
property are not to be combined, as each project is individually
eligible for incentives of up to twenty thousand dollars per year per
project.
(7) The investment cost recovery incentive may be paid fifty-four
cents per kilowatt-hour generated by a commercial or industrial
customer consuming at least one-half of the electricity generated in
its commercial or industrial activities at the site of the generation.
No incentive provided under this subsection may exceed twenty thousand
dollars per utility revenue meter per year. A person claiming an
incentive payment under this subsection is not eligible for the
incentive provided under subsection (6) of this section for the same
calendar year.
(8) If requests for the investment cost recovery incentive exceed
the amount of funds available for credit to the participating light and
power business, the incentive payments shall be reduced
proportionately.
(((8))) (9) The climate and rural energy development center at
Washington State University energy program may establish guidelines and
standards for technologies that are identified as Washington
manufactured and therefore most beneficial to the state's environment.
(((9))) (10) The environmental attributes of the renewable energy
system belong to the applicant, and do not transfer to the state or the
light and power business upon receipt of the investment cost recovery
incentive.

Sec. 5 2007 c 522 s 732 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--STATE AGENCY GREEN ENERGY
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,000,000))
$1,500,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,000,000))
$2,500,000

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions
and limitations: The appropriations in this section are provided
solely for the office of financial management to provide grants to
state agencies to purchase green power.
(2) $500,000 of the FY 2009 appropriation is provided solely to the
office of financial management for solar electric demonstration
projects.
(a) The office shall solicit proposals from property owners engaged
in commercial or industrial activities, which will host solar
generation facilities and consume a substantial portion of the
generation on-site, and select for funding one proposal located east of
the crest of the Cascade mountains and one proposal located west of the
crest of the Cascade mountains.
(b) The office shall also solicit proposals from community-based
solar energy projects, as defined in RCW 82.16.110, and select for
funding one proposal located east of the crest of the Cascade mountains
and one proposal located west of the crest of the Cascade mountains.
(c) The office may enter into agreements to share the costs of
solar facility installation and operation, which shall include
provisions for public viewing and education regarding solar electric
generation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the limits and provisions of this section, a credit
is allowed against the tax imposed by this chapter for a taxpayer that
either:
(a) Installs one or more solar energy systems during the taxable
year for commercial or industrial purposes in the taxpayer's trade or
business facility located in this state; or
(b) Receives certification from the department recognizing its
financing of the installation, in a facility located in this state, of
one or more solar energy systems during the taxable year by a third-party organization that is exempt from taxation imposed under this
chapter.
(2) The amount of the credit is equal to ten percent of the
installed cost of the solar energy system. The person who provides or
installs the solar energy system must furnish the taxpayer with an
accounting of the installed cost.
(3) The taxpayer may not cumulate total tax credits under this
section exceeding twenty-five thousand dollars with respect to the same
building in the same year or fifty thousand dollars in total credits in
any year.
(4) If the allowable credit exceeds the taxes otherwise due under
this chapter or if there are no taxes due under this chapter, the
amount of the claim not used to offset taxes under this chapter may be
carried forward for not more than five consecutive taxable years as a
credit against subsequent years' tax liability.
(5) Co-owners of a business, including corporate partners in a
partnership, may each claim only the pro rata share of the credit
allowed under this section based on the ownership interest or financial
investment in the system. The total of the credits allowed all such
owners may not exceed the amount that would have been allowed a sole
owner.
(6) The department must establish a procedure for identifying
projects that qualify for the credit allowed under this section.
(a) To qualify for the credit, a taxpayer must apply in a form
prescribed by the department, including:
(i) The projected date that the installation of the solar energy
system will begin and the projected finish date;
(ii) The location where the solar energy system will be installed;
(iii) The type of solar energy system, its total cost, excluding
financing costs, and the estimated annual performance level; and
(iv) The projected amount of the credit against the tax imposed by
this chapter.
(b) The department must:
(i) Review and evaluate each submitted application;
(ii) Determine within thirty days after receiving the application
whether it meets applicable criteria; and
(iii) Provide initial certification of a project to the applicant.
(c) Upon the completion of each certified installation, the
taxpayer must certify that the installed solar energy system is
operational and provide the total amount of credits to be claimed. The
department must review the installation expenses and issue a credit
certificate to the business.
(7) If at any time the department finds that a person is not
eligible for a credit under this section, the amount of taxes for which
the credit has been claimed are immediately due. The department must
assess interest, but not penalties, on the taxes for which the person
is not eligible. The interest is assessed at the rate provided for
delinquent excise taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW, is retroactive to the
date the credit was taken, and accrues until the taxes for which the
credit has been used are repaid.
(8) As used in this section, "solar energy system" has the same
meaning specified in RCW 82.16.110.
(9) This section expires June 30, 2017.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Section 6 of this act takes effect July 1,
2008.

--- END ---