BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) The citizens of Washington state have consistently expressed
concern with the quality of education offered to the children of the
state, and have demanded meaningful evaluation of schools, districts,
and the educational system as a whole.
(2) Assessment data being gathered through the Washington
assessment of student learning is used both for individual evaluation
of students and overall evaluation of the performance of schools and
districts, obscuring the real meaning of values and trends in that
data.
(3) Efforts to date to improve the quality of education have been
primarily in remediation of individual cases, incurring additional,
recurring costs for such remediation but neither identification of
underlying causes nor improvement of education delivered to all
children.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.655.090 and 1999 c 388 s 301 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) By September 10, 1998, and by September 10th each year
thereafter, the superintendent of public instruction shall report to
schools, school districts, and the legislature on the results of the
Washington assessment of student learning and state-mandated norm-referenced standardized tests.
(2) The reports shall include the assessment results by school and
school district, and include changes over time. For the Washington
assessment of student learning, results shall be reported as follows:
(a) The percentage of students meeting the standards;
(b) The percentage of students performing at each level of the
assessment; and
(c) A learning improvement index that shows changes in student
performance within the different levels of student learning reported on
the Washington assessment of student learning.
(3) The reports shall contain data regarding the different
characteristics of schools, such as poverty levels, percent of English
as a second language students, dropout rates, attendance, percent of
students in special education, and student mobility so that districts
and schools can learn from the improvement efforts of other schools and
districts with similar characteristics.
(4) The reports shall contain student scores on mandated tests by
comparable Washington schools of similar characteristics.
(5) The reports shall contain information on public school choice
options available to students, including vocational education.
(6) The reports shall be posted on the superintendent of public
instruction's internet web site.
(7) To protect the privacy of students, the results of schools and
districts ((that test fewer than ten students in a grade level shall
not be reported)) shall be reported only in aggregation to the level of
the individual school, which may be further subdivided by grade and by
the criteria set forth in subsection (3) of this section. In addition,
in order to ensure that results are reported accurately, the
superintendent of public instruction shall maintain the confidentiality
of statewide data files until the superintendent determines that the
data are complete and accurate. The intent of this subsection is that
the results of an assessment administered under this chapter shall not
within reason be attributable to an individual student.
(8) The superintendent of public instruction shall monitor the
percentage and number of special education and limited English-proficient students exempted from taking the assessments by schools and
school districts to ensure the exemptions are in compliance with
exemption guidelines.

--- END ---