BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares that pets
are important to the citizens of Washington and that consumers of this
state have a right to be protected from unfair or deceptive acts or
practices in the manufacture and sale of pet food. The intent of this
act is to make the knowing manufacture or knowing sale of adulterated
pet food a violation of the state's consumer protection act, which will
subject violators to treble damages.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 15.53 RCW
to read as follows:
Knowingly manufacturing or knowingly selling adulterated pet food
is not reasonable in relation to the development and preservation of
business and is an unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an
unfair method of competition for the purpose of applying the consumer
protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

--- END ---