BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An economic development and diversification tuition incentive
program is created. The higher education coordinating board shall
maintain a list of employers who are certified under section 2 of this
act to participate in the program.
(2) A nonresident student shall pay resident tuition rates
beginning with the first quarter or semester after moving to Washington
if:
(a) The student, student's spouse, or student's parent is employed
by an employer certified by the department of community, trade, and
economic development under section 2 of this act;
(b) The student, student's spouse, or student's parent relocated to
Washington at the request of that certified employer; and
(c) The student signs a letter of intent to establish domicile in
Washington.
(3) A nonresident student who moves to Washington to attend an
institution of higher education before the time that the student's
spouse or student's parent is employed by a qualified employer shall
pay resident tuition beginning with the first semester or quarter after
the spouse or parent moves to Washington if the nonresident student
otherwise qualifies under subsection (2) of this section.
(4) Evidence that the nonresident student has participated in the
program may be used as evidence of domicile under RCW 28B.15.013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Employers who wish to participate in the economic development
and diversification tuition incentive program in section 1 of this act
shall apply to the department of community, trade, and economic
development to be certified. Employers who currently operate in
Washington and must bring new employees from out-of-state and employers
who are relocating or expanding operations in Washington may be
eligible for the program. The department shall certify employers that
qualify for the program based on the following criteria:
(a) Whether the business will have or has a high economic impact in
the region of the state where it is located;
(b) Whether it is a targeted industry of the state or is an
ancillary or support industry for a targeted industry; and
(c) Whether the business will promote highly skilled, high-wage
jobs.
(2) In determining whether to certify an employer under this
section, the department shall also consider the number of anticipated
employees in the program and the anticipated capital investment in the
business.
(3) The department shall transmit the names of certified employers
to the higher education coordinating board quarterly.
(4) The department shall decertify an employer if it finds that the
employer no longer meets the criteria in subsection (1) of this
section.
(5) The department shall adopt rules to implement this section.

--- END ---