BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.394 and 1998 c 338 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to amounts received by a property
management company from ((the owner of)) a property owner for gross
wages and benefits paid directly to or on behalf of on-site personnel
from property management trust accounts that are required to be
maintained under RCW 18.85.310.
(2) As used in this section, "on-site personnel" means a person who
meets all of the following conditions: (a) The person works primarily
on-site at ((the owner's property)) one or more properties managed by
the property management company; (b) the person's duties include
leasing property units, maintaining ((the)) property, collecting rents,
or similar activities; and (c) under a written property management
agreement: (i) The person's compensation is the ultimate obligation of
the property owner and not the property manager; (ii) the property
manager is liable for payment only as agent of the owner; and (iii) the
property manager is the agent of the owner with respect to the on-site
personnel and that all actions, including, but not limited to, hiring,
firing, compensation, and conditions of employment, taken by the
property manager with respect to the on-site personnel are subject to
the approval of the property owner.

--- END ---