BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 57.12.010 and 2007 c 469 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The governing body of a district shall be a board of commissioners
consisting of three members, or five or seven members as provided in
RCW 57.12.015. The board shall annually elect one of its members as
president and another as secretary.
The board shall by resolution adopt rules governing the transaction
of its business and shall adopt an official seal. All proceedings
shall be by resolution recorded in a book kept for that purpose which
shall be a public record.
((A district shall provide by resolution for the payment of
compensation to each of its commissioners at a rate of)) Each
commissioner shall receive ninety dollars for each day or portion
thereof spent in actual attendance at official meetings of the district
commission, or in performance of other official services or duties on
behalf of the district. However, the compensation for each
commissioner shall not exceed eight thousand six hundred forty dollars
per year. In addition, the secretary may be paid a reasonable sum for
clerical services.
Any commissioner may waive all or any portion of his or her
compensation payable under this section as to any month or months
during the commissioner's term of office, by a written waiver filed
with the district at any time after the commissioner's election and
prior to the date on which the compensation would otherwise be paid.
The waiver shall specify the month or period of months for which it is
made.
No commissioner shall be employed full time by the district. A
commissioner shall be reimbursed for reasonable expenses actually
incurred in connection with district business, including subsistence
and lodging while away from the commissioner's place of residence and
mileage for use of a privately-owned vehicle at the mileage rate
authorized in RCW 43.03.060.
The dollar thresholds established in this section must be adjusted
for inflation by the office of financial management every five years,
beginning July 1, 2008, based upon changes in the consumer price index
during that time period. "Consumer price index" means, for any
calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index, for
Washington state, for wage earners and clerical workers, all items,
compiled by the bureau of labor and statistics, United States
department of labor. If the bureau of labor and statistics develops
more than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the
index covering the greatest number of people, covering areas
exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and including all items
shall be used for the adjustments for inflation in this section. The
office of financial management must calculate the new dollar threshold
and transmit it to the office of the code reviser for publication in
the Washington State Register at least one month before the new dollar
threshold is to take effect.
A person holding office as commissioner for two or more special
purpose districts shall receive only that per diem compensation
authorized for one of his or her commissioner positions as compensation
for attending an official meeting or conducting official services or
duties while representing more than one of his or her districts.
However, such commissioner may receive additional per diem compensation
if approved by resolution of all boards of the affected commissions.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.44.050 and 2007 c 469 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
((A district shall provide by resolution for the payment of
compensation to each of its commissioners at a rate of)) Each
commissioner shall receive ninety dollars for each day or portion
thereof spent in actual attendance at official meetings of the district
commission, or in performance of other official services or duties on
behalf of the district, to include meetings of the commission of his or
her own district, or meetings attended by one or more commissioners of
two or more districts called to consider business common to them,
except that the total compensation paid to such commissioner during any
one year shall not exceed eight thousand six hundred forty dollars.
The commissioners may not be compensated for services performed of a
ministerial or professional nature.
Any commissioner may waive all or any portion of his or her
compensation payable under this section as to any month or months
during his or her term of office, by a written waiver filed with the
district as provided in this section. The waiver, to be effective,
must be filed any time after the commissioner's election and prior to
the date on which the compensation would otherwise be paid. The waiver
shall specify the month or period of months for which it is made.
Any district providing group insurance for its employees, covering
them, their immediate family, and dependents, may provide insurance for
its commissioners with the same coverage. Each commissioner shall be
reimbursed for reasonable expenses actually incurred in connection with
such business and meetings, including his or her subsistence and
lodging and travel while away from his or her place of residence. No
resolution shall be adopted without a majority vote of the whole
commission. The commission shall organize by election of its own
members of a president and secretary, shall by resolution adopt rules
governing the transaction of its business and shall adopt an official
seal. All proceedings of the commission shall be by motion or
resolution recorded in a book or books kept for such purpose, which
shall be public records.
The dollar thresholds established in this section must be adjusted
for inflation by the office of financial management every five years,
beginning July 1, 2008, based upon changes in the consumer price index
during that time period. "Consumer price index" means, for any
calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index, for
Washington state, for wage earners and clerical workers, all items,
compiled by the bureau of labor and statistics, United States
department of labor. If the bureau of labor and statistics develops
more than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the
index covering the greatest number of people, covering areas
exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and including all items
shall be used for the adjustments for inflation in this section. The
office of financial management must calculate the new dollar threshold
and transmit it to the office of the code reviser for publication in
the Washington State Register at least one month before the new dollar
threshold is to take effect.
A person holding office as commissioner for two or more special
purpose districts shall receive only that per diem compensation
authorized for one of his or her commissioner positions as compensation
for attending an official meeting or conducting official services or
duties while representing more than one of his or her districts.
However, such commissioner may receive additional per diem compensation
if approved by resolution of all boards of the affected commissions.

--- END ---