BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.320 RCW
to read as follows:
The director of financial institutions or the director's designee
shall:
(1) Disseminate information to the public concerning the laws
regulating financial institutions of this state; and
(2) Provide assistance to members of the public in obtaining
information about financial products.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.320 RCW
to read as follows:
The director of financial institutions or the director's designee
may establish, administer, and implement financial literacy and
education programs, including but not limited to:
(1) Education and outreach programs that assist Washington citizens
of all ages in understanding saving, investing, and budgeting, and
other skills necessary to obtain individual financial independence,
fiscal responsibility, and financial management skills.
(2) Counseling, marketing, and outreach programs regarding
residential mortgage transactions, nontraditional or subprime
mortgages, predatory lending practices, or other financial products or
practices in the marketplace relating to homeownership.
The department may deliver the programs in subsections (1) and (2)
of this section using grants, contracts, or interagency agreements with
state and local governments and other nongovernmental organizations as
necessary. The department may coordinate these programs with ongoing
efforts by other public and private sector entities to maximize the
programs' effectiveness.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.320 RCW
to read as follows:
The director or his or her designee shall convene an interagency
work group to identify current state funded efforts to support
financial literacy, assess whether there are opportunities to create a
centralized location of information regarding these existing state
efforts, and to identify whether there are opportunities for expanding
partnerships with other community entities also providing financial
literacy services. A report of the findings and recommendations of
this interagency work group shall be due to the governor and the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The sum of seven hundred thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2008, from the general fund to the
department of financial institutions for homeownership prepurchase
outreach and education and postpurchase counseling and support.
(2) The sum of eight hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof
as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2009, from the general fund to the department of financial
institutions for homeownership prepurchase outreach and education and
postpurchase counseling and support.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---