BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.44.140 and 1984 c 7 s 60 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to any other special permits authorized by law, special
permits may be issued by the department of transportation for a
quarterly or annual period upon such terms and conditions as it finds
proper for the movement of (1) farm implements used for the cutting or
threshing of mature crops; or (2) other farm implements that may be
identified by rule of the department of transportation. Any farm
implement moved under this section must ((have a gross weight less than
forty-five)) comply with RCW 46.44.091, have a gross weight of less
than sixty-five thousand pounds, and have a total outside width of less
than twenty feet while being moved, and such movement must be
patrolled, flagged, lighted, signed, at a time of day, and otherwise in
accordance with rules hereby authorized to be adopted by the department
of transportation for the control of such movements.
Applications for and permits issued under this section shall
provide for a description of the farm implements to be moved, the
approximate dates of movement, and the routes of movement so far as
they are reasonably known to the applicant at the time of application,
but the permit shall not be limited to these circumstances but shall be
general in its application except as limited by the statutes and rules
adopted by the department of transportation.
A copy of the governing permit shall be carried on the farm
implement being moved during the period of its movement. The
department shall collect a fee as provided in RCW 46.44.0941.
Violation of a term or condition under which a permit was issued,
of a rule adopted by the department of transportation as authorized by
this section, or of a term of this section is a traffic infraction.

--- END ---