BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 85.06.640 and 1941 c 133 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whenever in the judgment of the commissioners of any drainage
district general benefits to the entire district will accrue therefrom,
or the general plan for improvement as adopted by such district will be
more fully or properly carried out thereby, the board of commissioners
of such district is hereby given and granted authority and power to do
the following things:
(1) Straighten, widen, deepen, improve, or alter the course of or
discontinue the use and maintenance of, or abandon any existing drains
or ditches in said district, and when abandoned or discontinued, the
right-of-way may be held or disposed of by said district in the
discretion of the commissioners;
(2) Dig or construct any additional and auxiliary drains or ditches
therein;
(3) Obtain, improve, or alter any existing reservoirs, spillways or
outlets;
(4) Lease, acquire, build, or construct additional, new, or better
reservoirs, spillways, and outlets;
(5) Lease, acquire, erect, build, or construct and operate any
pumping plant and acquire equipment necessary therefor;
(6) Divert, dam, or carry off the waters of any stream or water
endangering or damaging said district and protect against damage or
flood from any waters whatsoever; and
(7) Implement the provisions of a drainage maintenance plan adopted
by the district.
PROVIDED, That in carrying out such powers, said commissioners
shall not be authorized under RCW 85.06.640 through 85.06.700 to tap
new sources of water which have other outlets and do not endanger the
system or property of such district.

--- END ---