BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By January 2009, the department of social and health services
shall create a pilot program to place a full-time domestic violence
expert in a minimum of two division of children and family services
offices. In selecting the offices to participate in the program, the
secretary shall site one in a county with a population of at least one
million and the other in a county with a population of less than two
hundred thousand.
(2) The purpose of the program is to provide domestic violence
safety planning, information, and support to division of children and
family services workers to assist in identifying and responding
effectively to domestic violence in their caseloads.
(3) The department shall use a request for proposal process and
shall select the pilot sites by September 2008. The request for
proposal shall require that the successful bidder have experience
providing domestic violence services and experience working with
families involved with child protective services or child welfare
services.
(4) The domestic violence expert shall provide consultation and
training to child protective services social workers so that they may
increase their knowledge of domestic violence and practice skills for
addressing domestic violence in their caseloads, and provide safe,
effective responses for children and their families experiencing
domestic violence.
(5) Alleged domestic violence shall not be considered in developing
a case plan under chapter 13.34 RCW unless there has been a finding of
domestic violence under chapter 26.44, 26.09, 26.50, or 13.34 RCW.
(6) The domestic violence expert shall not provide case
consultation services or direct advocacy to any family receiving
services from the department.
(7) The department shall select pilot program sites in which the
supervisors who will work with the pilot program in the division of
children and family services offices have formal training and
experience working with families affected by domestic violence and
child maltreatment and who have participated in best practices work
groups for domestic violence issues.
(8) The Washington state institute for public policy shall evaluate
the pilot program to determine the outcomes of the program. The
institute shall evaluate the pilot program by comparing program and
nonprogram sites to determine the following outcomes:
(a) Changes to the rate of being referred back to child protective
services intake for domestic violence related concerns;
(b) Whether there are documented safety assessments that identify
domestic violence safety risk factors for the children and the adult
victim of domestic violence;
(c) Whether there are documented service plans with strategies that
address and mitigate identified domestic violence safety risks;
(d) Whether there is an increase in the ability of the adult
victims of domestic violence to identify safety risks and adverse
impacts of domestic violence on the children; and
(e) Whether there is an increase in the adult domestic violence
victim's access to resources available to them within the community to
increase the safety and security for themselves and the children.
(9)(a) The institute shall use the results of the evaluation to
identify the effectiveness of the program including effectiveness of
training and consultation, changes in social worker practices,
improvements in services to families, barriers to implementing program
services, and service gaps for families affected by domestic violence.
(b) The evaluation shall include recommendations to the department
for improving domestic violence responses in other division of children
and family services community offices of Washington state.
(10) The institute shall report the findings of the program to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2011.
(11) This section expires January 1, 2012.

--- END ---