BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any local transit agency that has received state funding for a
park and ride lot must, to the greatest extent practicable, accommodate
at that lot auto transportation companies regulated under chapter 81.68
RCW and private, nonprofit transportation providers regulated under
chapter 81.66 RCW, that intend to provide or already provide regularly
scheduled service at that lot. The accommodation must be in the form
of an agreement between the applicable local transit agency and private
transit provider regulated under chapter 81.68 or 81.66 RCW. The
agreement must include provisions coordinating arrival and departure
schedules to best provide for the safe and efficient movement of
passengers in the park and ride lot area.
(2) A local transit agency described under subsection (1) of this
section may enter into a cooperative agreement with a taxicab company
regulated under chapter 81.72 RCW in order to accommodate the taxicab
company at the agency's park and ride lot. However, the taxicab
company must agree to provide service with reasonable availability,
subject to schedule coordination provisions as agreed to by the
parties.

--- END ---