BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 34.05.310 and 2004 c 31 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) To meet the intent of providing greater public access to
administrative rule making and to promote consensus among interested
parties, agencies shall solicit comments from the public on a subject
of possible rule making before filing with the code reviser a notice of
proposed rule making under RCW 34.05.320. The agency shall prepare a
statement of inquiry that:
(a) Identifies the specific statute or statutes authorizing the
agency to adopt rules on this subject;
(b) Discusses why rules on this subject may be needed and what they
might accomplish;
(c) Identifies other federal and state agencies that regulate this
subject, and describes the process whereby the agency would coordinate
the contemplated rule with these agencies;
(d) Discusses the process by which the rule might be developed,
including, but not limited to, negotiated rule making, pilot rule
making, or agency study;
(e) Specifies the process by which interested parties can
effectively participate in the decision to adopt a new rule and
formulation of a proposed rule before its publication.
The statement of inquiry for all except pilot projects shall be
filed with the code reviser for publication in the state register at
least thirty days before the date the agency files notice of proposed
rule making under RCW 34.05.320 and the statement, or a summary of the
information contained in that statement, shall be sent to any party
that has requested receipt of the agency's statements of inquiry.
For pilot projects, the statement of inquiry shall be filed with
the code reviser for publication in the Washington State Register at
the time of or up to twenty days before the first public notice
required by RCW 34.05.313(1).
(2) Agencies are encouraged to develop and use new procedures for
reaching agreement among interested parties before publication of
notice and the adoption hearing on a proposed rule. Examples of new
procedures include, but are not limited to:
(a) Negotiated rule making by which representatives of an agency
and of the interests that are affected by a subject of rule making,
including, where appropriate, county and city representatives, seek to
reach consensus on the terms of the proposed rule and on the process by
which it is negotiated; and
(b) Pilot rule making which includes testing the feasibility of
complying with or administering draft new rules or draft amendments to
existing rules through the use of volunteer pilot groups in various
areas and circumstances, as provided in RCW 34.05.313 or as otherwise
provided by the agency.
(3)(a) An agency must make a determination whether negotiated rule
making, pilot rule making, or another process for generating
participation from interested parties prior to development of the rule
is appropriate.
(b) An agency must include a written justification in the rule-making file if an opportunity for interested parties to participate in
the rule-making process prior to publication of the proposed rule has
not been provided.
(4) This section does not apply to:
(a) Emergency rules adopted under RCW 34.05.350;
(b) Rules relating only to internal governmental operations that
are not subject to violation by a nongovernment party;
(c) Rules adopting or incorporating by reference without material
change federal statutes or regulations, Washington state statutes,
rules of other Washington state agencies, shoreline master programs
other than those programs governing shorelines of statewide
significance, or, as referenced by Washington state law, national
consensus codes that generally establish industry standards, if the
material adopted or incorporated regulates the same subject matter and
conduct as the adopting or incorporating rule;
(d) Rules that only correct typographical errors, make address or
name changes, or clarify language of a rule without changing its
effect;
(e) Rules the content of which is explicitly and specifically
dictated by statute;
(f) Rules that set or adjust fees or rates pursuant to legislative
standards; or
(g) Rules that adopt, amend, or repeal:
(i) A procedure, practice, or requirement relating to agency
hearings; or
(ii) A filing or related process requirement for applying to an
agency for a license or permit.

Sec. 2 RCW 34.05.313 and 1995 c 403 s 303 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) During the development of a rule or after its adoption, an
agency may develop methods for measuring or testing the feasibility of
complying with or administering the rule and for identifying simple,
efficient, and economical alternatives for achieving the goal of the
rule. A pilot project shall include public notice, participation by
volunteers who are or will be subject to the rule, a high level of
involvement from agency management, stated and reasonable completion
dates, and a process by which one or more parties may withdraw from the
process or the process may be terminated. Volunteers who agree to test
a rule and attempt to meet the requirements of the draft rule, to
report periodically to the proposing agency on the extent of their
ability to meet the requirements of the draft rule, and to make
recommendations for improving the draft rule shall not be obligated to
comply fully with the rule being tested nor be subject to any
enforcement action or other sanction for failing to comply with the
requirements of the draft rule.
(2) An agency conducting a pilot rule project authorized under
subsection (1) of this section may waive one or more provisions of
agency rules otherwise applicable to participants in such a pilot
project if the agency first determines that such a waiver is in the
public interest and necessary to conduct the project. Such a waiver
may be only for a stated period of time, not to exceed the duration of
the project, as required to be stated in subsection (1) of this
section.
(3) No qualification or requirement relating to the enjoyment of
benefits or privileges conferred by law is established, altered, or
revoked for any participant in a pilot project.
(4) The findings of the pilot project should be widely shared and,
where appropriate, adopted as amendments to the rule.
(((4))) (5) If an agency conducts a pilot rule project in lieu of
meeting the requirements of the regulatory fairness act, chapter 19.85
RCW, the agency shall ensure the following conditions are met:
(a) If over ten small businesses are affected, there shall be at
least ten small businesses in the test group and at least one-half of
the volunteers participating in the pilot test group shall be small
businesses.
(b)(i) If there are at least one hundred businesses affected, the
participation by small businesses in the test group shall be as
follows:
(A) Not less than twenty percent of the small businesses must
employ twenty-six to fifty employees;
(B) Not less than twenty percent of the small businesses must
employ eleven to twenty-six employees; and
(C) Not less than twenty percent of the small businesses must
employ zero to ten employees.
(ii) If there do not exist a sufficient number of small businesses
in each size category set forth in (b)(i) of this subsection willing to
participate in the pilot project to meet the minimum requirements of
that subsection, then the agency must comply with this section to the
maximum extent practicable.
(c) The agency may not terminate the pilot project before
completion.
(d) Before filing the notice of proposed rule making pursuant to
RCW 34.05.320, the agency must prepare a report of the pilot rule
project that includes:
(i) A description of the difficulties small businesses had in
complying with the pilot rule;
(ii) A list of the recommended revisions to the rule to make
compliance with the rule easier or to reduce the cost of compliance
with the rule by the small businesses participating in the pilot rule
project;
(iii) A written statement explaining the options it considered to
resolve each of the difficulties described and a statement explaining
its reasons for not including a recommendation by the pilot test group
to revise the rule; and
(iv) If the agency was unable to meet the requirements set forth in
(b)(i) of this subsection, a written explanation of why it was unable
to do so and the steps the agency took to include small businesses in
the pilot project.

Sec. 3 RCW 34.05.315 and 1989 c 175 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each agency shall maintain a current public rule-making docket.
The rule-making docket shall contain the information specified in
subsections (3) and (4) of this section.
(2) The rule-making docket shall contain a listing of each pending
rule-making proceeding. A rule-making proceeding for a proposed rule
is pending from the time it is commenced by publication of a notice of
proposed rule adoption under RCW 34.05.320 until the proposed rule is
withdrawn under RCW 34.05.335 or is adopted by the agency. A rule-making proceeding for a pilot project is pending from the time it is
commenced by publication of the statement of inquiry under RCW
34.05.310 until the pilot project is withdrawn under RCW 34.05.335 or
is proposed as a rule by the agency.
(3) For each rule-making proceeding, the docket shall indicate all
of the following:
(a) The name and address of agency personnel responsible for the
proposed rule;
(b) The subject of the proposed rule;
(c) A citation to all notices relating to the proceeding that have
been published in the state register under RCW 34.05.320;
(d) The place where written submissions about the proposed rule may
be inspected;
(e) The time during which written submissions will be accepted; and
(f) The current timetable established for the agency proceeding,
including the time and place of any rule-making hearing, the date of
the rule's adoption, filing, publication, and its effective date.
(4) For each pilot project, the docket shall indicate all of the
following:
(a) The name and address of agency personnel responsible for the
pilot project;
(b) The subject of the pilot project;
(c) A citation to all notices relating to the proceeding that have
been published under RCW 34.05.313;
(d) The place where written submissions about the pilot project may
be inspected;
(e) The time during which written submissions will be accepted; and
(f) The current timetable established for the agency proceeding,
including the time and place of any hearing on the pilot project, and
the date of the pilot project's completion.

Sec. 4 RCW 34.05.335 and 1989 c 175 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A proposed rule may be withdrawn by the proposing agency at
any time before adoption. A withdrawn rule may not be adopted unless
it is again proposed in accordance with RCW 34.05.320.
(b) A pilot project may be withdrawn by the proposing agency at any
time before it is proposed as a rule for adoption under RCW 34.05.320.
A withdrawn pilot project may not be continued unless it is again
proposed in accordance with RCW 34.05.310 and 34.05.313.
(2) Before adopting a rule, an agency shall consider the written
and oral submissions, or any memorandum summarizing oral submissions.
(3) Pilot projects not proposed as rules and rules not adopted and
filed with the code reviser within one hundred eighty days after
publication of the text as last proposed in the register shall be
regarded as withdrawn. An agency may not thereafter continue the pilot
project or adopt the proposed rule without refiling ((it)) the pilot
project in accordance with RCW 34.05.310 or refiling the rule in
accordance with RCW 34.05.320. The code reviser shall give notice of
the withdrawal in the register.
(4) An agency may not adopt a rule before the time established in
the published notice, or such later time established on the record or
by publication in the state register.

--- END ---