BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 53.36.020 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 195 s 56 are each
amended to read as follows:
A district may raise revenue by levy of an annual tax not to exceed
forty-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value against the
assessed valuation of the taxable property in such port district for
general port purposes, including the establishment of a capital
improvement fund for future capital improvements, except that any levy
for the payment of the principal and interest of the general bonded
indebtedness of the port district shall be in excess of any levy made
by the port district under the forty-five cents per thousand dollars of
assessed value limitation. The levy shall be made and taxes collected
in the manner provided for the levy and collection of taxes in school
districts of the first class. This section does not apply to a port
district in a county with a population of one million or more.
However, a port district in a county with a population of one million
or more may continue to levy taxes under this section if they are
dedicated to paying the principal or interest on bonds existing as of
January 1, 2008, and are used solely for the purpose of retiring the
bond payments.

Sec. 2 RCW 53.36.080 and 1965 ex.s. c 22 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever such additional levy for dredging, canal construction, or
land leveling or filling purposes shall have been authorized by the
electors of the district at an election, held subsequent to the time of
making the levy for the district for general purposes, in any year,
such levy shall be certified by the port commission in the manner
provided by law for certifying levies for general purposes of the
district, and shall be forthwith spread and extended upon the tax rolls
for the current year, and the taxes so levied and extended shall be
collected in the manner provided by law for the collection of general
taxes. This section does not apply to a port district in a county with
a population of one million or more. However, a port district in a
county with a population of one million or more may continue to levy
taxes under this section if they are dedicated to paying the principal
or interest on bonds existing as of January 1, 2008, and are used
solely for the purpose of retiring the bond payments.

Sec. 3 RCW 53.36.100 and 1994 c 278 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A port district having adopted a comprehensive scheme of harbor
improvements and industrial developments may thereafter raise revenue,
for six years only, and a second six years if the procedures are
followed under subsection (2) of this section, in addition to all other
revenues now authorized by law, by an annual levy not to exceed forty-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value against the assessed
valuation of the taxable property in such port district. In addition,
if voters approve a ballot proposition authorizing additional levies by
a simple majority vote, a port district located in a county bordering
on the Pacific Ocean having adopted a comprehensive scheme of harbor
improvements and industrial developments may impose these levies for a
third six-year period. Said levies shall be used exclusively for the
exercise of the powers granted to port districts under chapter 53.25
RCW except as provided in RCW 53.36.110. The levy of such taxes is
herein authorized notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 84.52.050 and
84.52.043. The revenues derived from levies made under RCW 53.36.100
and 53.36.110 not expended in the year in which the levies are made may
be paid into a fund for future use in carrying out the powers granted
under chapter 53.25 RCW, which fund may be accumulated and carried over
from year to year, with the right to continue to levy the taxes
provided for in RCW 53.36.100 and 53.36.110 for the purposes herein
authorized.
(2) If a port district intends to levy a tax under this section for
one or more years after the first six years these levies were imposed,
the port commission shall publish notice of this intention, in one or
more newspapers of general circulation within the district, by June 1
of the year in which the first levy of the seventh through twelfth year
period is to be made. If within ninety days of the date of publication
a petition is filed with the county auditor containing the signatures
of eight percent of the number of voters registered and voting in the
port district for the office of the governor at the last preceding
gubernatorial election, the county auditor shall canvass the signatures
in the same manner as prescribed in RCW ((29.79.200)) 29A.72.230 and
certify their sufficiency to the port commission within two weeks. The
proposition to make these levies in the seventh through twelfth year
period shall be submitted to the voters of the port district at a
special election, called for this purpose, no later than the date on
which a primary election would be held under RCW ((29.13.070))
29A.04.311. The levies may be made in the seventh through twelfth year
period only if approved by a majority of the voters of the port
district voting on the proposition. This section does not apply to a
port district in a county with a population of one million or more.
However, a port district in a county with a population of one million
or more may continue to levy taxes under this section if they are
dedicated to paying the principal or interest on bonds existing as of
January 1, 2008, and are used solely for the purpose of retiring the
bond payments.

Sec. 4 RCW 84.55.005 and 2007 sp.s. c 1 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Inflation" means the percentage change in the implicit price
deflator for personal consumption expenditures for the United States as
published for the most recent twelve-month period by the bureau of
economic analysis of the federal department of commerce in September of
the year before the taxes are payable;
(2) "Limit factor" means:
(a) For taxing districts with a population of less than ten
thousand in the calendar year prior to the assessment year, one hundred
one percent;
(b) For taxing districts for which a limit factor is authorized
under RCW 84.55.0101, the lesser of the limit factor authorized under
that section or one hundred one percent;
(c) For all other districts, the lesser of one hundred one percent
or one hundred percent plus inflation; and
(3) "Regular property taxes" has the meaning given it in RCW
84.04.140.
(4) For purposes of this chapter, "taxing districts" does not
include a port district in a county with a population of one million or
more.

--- END ---