BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that our primary care
system is severely faltering and the number of people choosing primary
care as a profession is decreasing dramatically. Primary care
providers include family medicine and general internal medicine
physicians, pediatricians, naturopathic physicians, advanced registered
nurse practitioners, and physician assistants. A strong primary care
system has been shown to improve health outcomes and quality and to
reduce overall health system costs. To improve the health and well-being of the people in the state of Washington, enhance the
recruitment, retention, performance, and satisfaction of primary
providers, our primary care system needs to be restructured, improved,
and supported.
The legislature further finds that a patient-centered approach that
can manage chronic diseases, address acute illnesses and provide
effective prevention needs to be in place and the medical home may best
accomplish this goal. It is a place where health care is accessible,
compassionate, and built on evidence-based strategies with a team
approach. Each patient receives medically necessary acute, chronic,
prevention, and wellness services as well as other medically
appropriate dental and behavioral services and other community support
services, all which are tailored to the individual needs of the
patient. Development and maintenance of medical homes require changes
in how primary care providers with medical homes are reimbursed. There
is a critical need to identify reimbursement strategies to
appropriately finance this delivery of care model.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Within funds appropriated for this
purpose, the health care authority shall develop a pilot project
program to provide funding and technical assistance to primary care
providers willing and able to adopt and maintain medical home models,
as defined by the department of social and health services in its
November 2007 report to the legislature concerning implementation of
Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5093 (chapter 5, Laws of 2007). The
health care authority shall seek input on the program development from
experts and interested stakeholders such as the Washington coalition
for primary care.
(2) The program shall be structured to allow adoption of medical
homes in a variety of primary care practice settings throughout the
state and consider differing populations, geographic locations, and
other factors to allow for a broad testing of medical home adoption,
including but not limited to rural communities and areas that are
medically underserved. The program shall include consultation to assist
primary care practices to improve office workflow and other technical
assistance necessary to help assure adoption and use of the latest
techniques in effective and cost-efficient, patient-centered integrated
health care. Selected pilot project sites must agree to submit valid
measures using patient input and health outcome measures, as required
by the health care authority, to determine progress and success and
inform the understanding of best practices. The health care authority
shall consult with the Puget Sound health alliance when selecting
specific measures to be used by pilot project sites.
(3) The program shall provide financial incentives to attract
primary care providers into primary care in the form of signing bonuses
or other incentives for pilot project sites selected under subsection
(2) of this section and, on a case-by-case basis, determine whether a
particular site needs financial assistance to attract a new primary
care provider. The health care authority shall determine the amount of
bonuses as seems appropriate for type of provider, location of pilot,
and other relevant factors. It may also establish participation
requirements for those primary care providers accepting signing
bonuses.
(4) The program shall provide start-up funding for adoption of
health information technology models that have shown promise and can
support medical homes. Funding shall be available to approved selected
pilot project sites under subsection (2) of this section when such
sites also seek to incorporate health information technology into their
practice. These efforts shall be coordinated with the Washington
health information collaborative, the health information infrastructure
advisory board, and other efforts directed by RCW 41.05.035.
(5) The program shall be limited to practices that agree to see a
reasonable number of medicaid and medicare clients, as defined by the
health care authority.
(6) The health care authority may issue competitive contracts with
public and private entities to assist in implementation and technical
assistance provision to pilot project sites authorized under this act.
(7) The health care authority shall issue a report to the health
care committees of legislature on the progress and outcome of the pilot
project program. The report shall include, but not be limited to: (a)
Effectiveness of grant funding and technical assistance in promoting
medical homes and health information technology; (b) identification of
best practices; an assessment of how the pilot sites have affected
health outcomes, quality of care, utilization of services, cost-efficiencies, and patient satisfaction; (c) a comparison of outcomes,
service utilization, cost, and patient satisfaction with a sample
population of enrollees in the state's uniform medical plan who do not
receive services at a pilot site location; (d) an assessment of how the
pilots improve primary care provider satisfaction and recruitment and
retention; and (e) any additional legislative action that would promote
medical home adoption in primary care settings. A progress report
shall be developed by January 1, 2009, with the final report due to the
legislature by December 31, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) To better understand the current primary
care landscape and future needs for primary care providers, the office
of financial management shall conduct a study in collaboration with the
health care authority, the department of health, department of social
and health services medical assistance, the state workforce training
and education coordinating board, and interested stakeholders such as
the Washington coalition for primary care.
(2) The study shall identify existing data sources, and pursue data
collection and analysis to: (a) Evaluate the current supply and scope
of service of primary care providers in the state, (b) identify current
practices that use a medical home model as defined by the department of
social and health services in its November 2007 report to the
legislature concerning implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5093 (chapter 5, Laws of 2007), (c) project the provider supply
necessary for a robust primary care system through medical homes, (d)
identify the barriers and opportunities to increasing use of the
medical home model, and (e) quantify the value of primary care and
medical homes as a cost-efficient means of improving health outcomes,
quality, and patient satisfaction. A report of the study's findings
shall be made to the health care committees of the legislature by July
1, 2009.
(3) As part of the five-year plan to change reimbursement required
under section 1 of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5930
(chapter 259, Laws of 2007), the health care authority and department
of social and health services shall expand its assessment on changing
reimbursement for primary care to support adoption of medical homes to
include medicare, other federal and state payors, and third-party
payors, including health carriers under Title 48 RCW and other self-funded payors. The health care authority shall also collaborate with
the Puget Sound health alliance, should that organization pursue a
project on medical home reimbursement. The goal of the collaboration
is to identify appropriate medical home reimbursement strategies and
provider performance measurements across all payors, and to garner
support among payors to adopt payment strategies that support medical
home adoption and use. The health care authority shall report its
findings to the health care committees of the legislature with its
findings by January 1, 2009, with a recommended timeline for adoption
of payment and provider performance strategies and recommended
legislative changes should be legislative action be necessary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 through 3 of this act expire
December 31, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---