BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 15.44.020 and 2003 c 396 s 24 are each amended to read
as follows:
The dairy products commission shall be composed of not more than
((ten)) nine members. There shall be one member from each district who
shall be a practical producer of dairy products((,)) and one member
shall be a dealer((, and one member shall be a producer who also acts
as a dealer)). The director of agriculture shall be a voting member of
the commission.
As used in this chapter, "director" means the director of
agriculture or his or her authorized representative.

Sec. 2 RCW 15.44.021 and 2003 c 396 s 25 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall appoint the members of the commission.
(2) Candidates for producer member positions on the commission
shall be nominated under RCW 15.44.033.
(3) The director shall cause an advisory vote to be held for the
producer member positions. Advisory ballots shall be mailed to all
affected producers in the district where a vacancy is about to occur
and shall be returned to the director not less than thirty days prior
to the commencement of the term. The advisory ballot shall be
conducted in a manner so that it is a secret ballot. The names of the
two candidates receiving the most votes in the advisory vote shall be
forwarded to the director for potential appointment to the commission.
In the event there are only two candidates nominated for a position, an
advisory vote may not be held and the candidates' names shall be
forwarded to the director for potential appointment. If only one
candidate is nominated for a position, the ((commission shall select a
second candidate whose name will be forwarded to the)) director has the
discretion to appoint or reject the candidate.
(4) Any candidate whose name is forwarded to the director for
potential appointment shall submit to the director a letter stating why
he or she wishes to be appointed to the commission. The director may
select ((either person)) any candidate for the position or may reject
all candidates and request a new advisory vote with nominees selected
by the commission or, if the commission desires, by the director.

Sec. 3 RCW 15.44.030 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 136 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
Each of the producer members of the commission shall:
(1) Be a citizen and resident of this state and the district which
he or she represents; and
(2) Be and for the five years last preceding his or her election
have been actually engaged as an owner or shareholder in producing
dairy products within this state. These qualifications must continue
during each member's term of office.
The dealer member shall be actively engaged as a dealer in dairy
products or employed in a dealer capacity as an officer or employee at
management level in a dairy products organization.

Sec. 4 RCW 15.44.032 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 136 s 3 are each
amended to read as follows:
The regular term of office of each producer member of the
commission shall be three years. Commission members shall be first
nominated and elected in 1966 in the manner set forth in RCW 15.44.033
and shall take office as soon as they are qualified. However,
expiration of the term of the respective commission members first
elected in 1966 shall be as follows:
(1) District I and II on July 1, 1967;
(2) District III and IV on July 1, 1968; and
(3) District V, VI and VII on July 1, 1969.
The respective terms shall end on July 1st of each third year
thereafter. Any vacancies that occur on the commission shall be filled
by appointment by the ((other members of the commission, and such))
director from a list of candidates forwarded to the director by the
commission. If only one name is forwarded, the director has the
discretion to appoint or reject the candidate and, if rejected, request
additional candidates. The appointee shall hold office for the
remainder of the term for which he or she is appointed to fill, so that
commission memberships shall be on a uniform staggered basis.
The term of office of the first dealer appointed by the director
shall expire July 1, 1977((, and the term of office of the first
producer who also acts as a dealer appointed by the director shall
expire on July 1, 1978)). The term of office of each dealer ((and each
producer who also acts as a dealer)) shall be three years or until such
time as a successor is duly appointed. Any vacancy for a dealer ((or
a producer who also acts as a dealer)) shall be forthwith filled by the
director. The director, in making any appointments set forth herein,
may consider lists of nominees supplied ((him)) by dealers or producers
also acting as dealers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 15.44 RCW
to read as follows:
If a commission member fails or refuses to perform his or her
duties due to excessive absence or abandonment of his or her position
or engages in any acts of dishonesty or willful misconduct, the
commission may recommend to the director that the commission member be
removed from his or her position on the commission. Upon receiving
such a recommendation, the director shall review the matter, including
any statement from the commission member who is the subject of the
recommendation, and determine whether adequate cause for removal is
present. If the director finds that adequate cause for removal exists,
the director shall remove the member from his or her commission
position. The position shall then be declared vacant and will be
filled pursuant to the provisions of this chapter for filling
vacancies.

--- END ---