BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.310.200 and 2006 c 263 s 610 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to other powers and duties as provided by law, every
educational service district board shall:
(1) Approve the budgets of the educational service district in
accordance with the procedures provided for in this chapter;
(2) Meet regularly according to the schedule adopted at the
organization meeting and in special session upon the call of the chair
or a majority of the board;
(3) Approve the selection of educational service district personnel
and clerical staff as provided in RCW 28A.310.230;
(4) Fix the amount of and approve the bonds for those educational
service district employees designated by the board as being in need of
bonding;
(5) Keep in the educational service district office a full and
correct transcript of the boundaries of each school district within the
educational service district;
(6) Acquire by borrowing funds or by purchase, lease, devise,
bequest, and gift and otherwise contract for real and personal property
necessary for the operation of the educational service district and to
the execution of the duties of the board and superintendent thereof and
sell, lease, or otherwise dispose of that property not necessary for
district purposes. No real property shall be acquired or alienated
without the prior approval of the superintendent of public instruction
and the acquisition or alienation of all such property shall be subject
to such provisions as the superintendent may establish. When borrowing
funds for the purpose of acquiring property, the educational service
district board shall pledge as collateral the property to be acquired.
Borrowing shall be evidenced by a note or other instrument between the
district and the lender;
(7) Under RCW 28A.310.010, upon the written request of the board of
directors of a local school district or districts served by the
educational service district, the educational service district board of
directors may provide cooperative and informational services not in
conflict with other law that provide for the development and
implementation of programs, activities, services, or practices that
support the education of preschool through twelfth grade students in
the public schools or that support the effective, efficient, or safe
management and operation of the school district or districts served by
the educational service district. In providing cooperative and
informational services to local school districts, each educational
service district shall provide services only to the school districts
within its geographic boundary as determined under RCW 28A.310.020;
(8) Adopt such bylaws and rules for its own operation as it deems
necessary or appropriate; and
(9) Enter into contracts, including contracts with common and
educational service districts and the school for the deaf and the
school for the blind for the joint financing of cooperative service
programs conducted pursuant to RCW 28A.310.180(3), and employ
consultants and legal counsel relating to any of the duties, functions,
and powers of the educational service districts.

--- END ---