BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that equal educational
opportunity is an essential hallmark of a democratic society and is
essential to the health of Washington's economy.
Article IX, section 1 of the state Constitution states that "It is
the paramount duty of the state to make ample provision for the
education of all children residing within its borders, without
distinction or preference on account of race, color, caste, or sex."
Washington state is committed to maintaining an education system that
gives every child the opportunity to succeed.
There is considerable evidence that students of color, in
disproportionate numbers, are not succeeding in meeting learning
standards set by the state, as measured by the Washington assessment of
student learning and other achievement measures. Students who are
struggling to meet standards experience greater barriers to learning if
they are out of the classroom, or out of the school, due to discipline
or truancy. Schools must be able to maintain a safe and orderly
learning environment by imposing discipline when it is appropriate.
Schools must also ensure that each student receives an equal
opportunity to learn. School disciplinary practices, however,
sometimes have a disparate impact on certain students. Consistent
collection and review of disciplinary data is the necessary first step
in eliminating any such disparities. Regular reporting of data on
school discipline and truancy proceedings will aid school districts and
state educational policymakers in understanding how these tools are
being used and improving them.
School districts are currently required to collect and report
various types of information relating to student discipline in order to
comply with federal and state laws. Establishing a single, streamlined
discipline data collection system will reduce the administrative burden
on schools and districts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Each school district shall file an annual report, by August 1st
of each year, with the superintendent of public instruction regarding
disciplinary and placement actions taken during the prior school year.
The report shall classify the types of actions into the following
categories:
(a) Actions in which a student was assigned to in-school
suspension;
(b) Actions in which a student was suspended for a period of ten
days or less;
(c) Actions in which a student was suspended for a period of more
than ten days;
(d) Actions in which a student was expelled;
(e) Actions in which a student was placed in an alternative
educational setting;
(f) Actions in which a student was suspended from riding the bus;
(g) Actions in which a student was emergency expelled; and
(h) Actions in which a student was removed from class.
(2) For each instance of disciplinary or placement action in
subsection (1) of this section, the school district shall collect and
report a summary of the following information:
(a) The category of offense or conduct for which actions were
taken;
(b) The student's age and grade level;
(c) The student's race/ethnicity and gender;
(d) The student's disability status;
(e) The student's eligibility for free or reduced price lunches
under federal guidelines;
(f) The student's eligibility for transitional bilingual
instruction, as defined in RCW 28A.180.030(1);
(g) The position of the person who recommended the disciplinary
action; and
(h) Whether a suspension or expulsion directly affected the
student's academic standing through the loss of credit or lowered
grades.
(3) The data required by this section shall be reported separately
for each school within the district and collected and reported in
compliance with the requirements of 20 U.S.C. Secs. 1232g and 1232h.
(4)(a) The superintendent of public instruction shall conduct a
study for each school year based upon the statistical data filed by
districts in accordance with this section for the purpose of
determining trends in discipline. The superintendent of public
instruction shall also use existing data on school personnel as needed
to establish trends in discipline.
(b) The superintendent of public instruction shall issue a report
on the study for the legislature by December 1st of each year. The
report shall be accessible to the public on the superintendent of
public instruction's report card web site and in such other forms as
will promote easy public access. The report shall include summaries of
the data rather than individual listing of each student's data.
(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize the
public release of personally identifiable information regarding
students.
(5) The superintendent of public instruction shall prepare, and
make available to school districts, recommendations for accumulating
the information required by this section in an electronic database, a
model report for districts to consider in the implementation of this
section, and a model form for reporting information electronically.
The model form shall allow schools to report the information required
by this section in a format that will be sufficient for schools and
districts to comply with discipline data reporting requirements
established by existing state and federal laws. The model form shall
assure that a student is not counted more than once for each suspension
or expulsion and assure an accurate count.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.175.010 and 2005 c 207 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each school district shall account for the educational progress
of each of its students. To achieve this, school districts shall be
required to report annually to the superintendent of public
instruction:
(((1))) (a) For students enrolled in each of a school district's
high school programs:
(((a))) (i) The number of students who graduate in fewer than four
years;
(((b))) (ii) The number of students who graduate in four years;
(((c))) (iii) The number of students who remain in school for more
than four years but who eventually graduate and the number of students
who remain in school for more than four years but do not graduate;
(((d))) (iv) The number of students who transfer to other schools;
(((e))) (v) The number of students in the ninth through twelfth
grade who drop out of school over a four-year period; and
(((f))) (vi) The number of students whose status is unknown((.));
(((2))) (b) For students enrolled in any primary or secondary
school program in the school district:
(i) The number of students who received alternative educational
services, were enrolled in an alternative education program, or earned
academic credit while out of school during a long-term suspension or
expulsion, and the number of these students who did not receive
alternative educational services, enroll in an alternative education
program, or earn academic credit during the long-term suspension or
expulsion;
(ii) An estimate of the number of youth of school age residing
within the district but not attending school on a regular basis,
including homeless youth as defined by 42 U.S.C. Sec. 11434a(2); and
(iii) For any school district providing all or part of an
educational program for juvenile inmates pursuant to chapter 28A.193
RCW, or for juveniles in detention facilities pursuant to chapter
28A.190 RCW, the number of students who earned academic credit while
incarcerated or in detention, and the number incarcerated or in
detention who did not earn academic credit;
(c) Dropout rates of students in each of the grades seven through
twelve((.));
(((3))) (d) Dropout rates for student populations in each of the
grades seven through twelve by:
(((a))) (i) Ethnicity;
(((b))) (ii) Gender;
(((c))) (iii) Socioeconomic status; ((and
(d))) (iv) Disability status((.)); and
(((4))) (v) Eligibility for transitional bilingual instruction as
defined in RCW 28A.180.030(1);
(e) The causes or reasons, or both, attributed to students for
having dropped out of school in grades seven through twelve, including
such categories as moved to another district in Washington, moved out
of state, enrolled in private school, and incarcerated.
(((5))) (2) For purposes of reporting under this section, students
who ceased attending school for the duration of the academic year,
including those deemed disenrolled due to lack of school attendance,
shall be counted as dropouts.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules
under chapter 34.05 RCW to assure uniformity in the information
districts are required to report under subsection((s)) (1) ((through
(4))) of this section. In developing rules, the superintendent of
public instruction shall consult with school districts, including
administrative and counseling personnel, with regard to the methods
through which information is to be collected and reported.
(((6))) (4) In reporting on the causes or reasons, or both,
attributed to students for having dropped out of school, school
building officials shall, to the extent reasonably practical, obtain
such information directly from students. In lieu of obtaining such
information directly from students, building principals and counselors
shall identify the causes or reasons, or both, based on their
professional judgment.
(((7))) (5) The superintendent of public instruction shall report
annually to the legislature the information collected under
subsection((s)) (1) ((through (4))) of this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.225.151 and 1996 c 134 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) As required under subsections (2) and (3) of this section, each
school shall document the actions taken under RCW 28A.225.030 and
report this information to the school district superintendent who shall
compile the data for all the schools in the district and prepare an
annual school district report for each school year and submit the
report to the superintendent of public instruction by August 1st of
each year. The reports shall be made upon forms furnished by the
superintendent of public instruction and shall be transmitted as
determined by the superintendent of public instruction.
(2) The reports under subsection (1) of this section shall include:
(a) The number of enrolled students and the number of unexcused
absences;
(b) Documentation of the steps taken by the school district under
each subsection of RCW 28A.225.020 at the request of the superintendent
of public instruction. Each year, ((by May 1st)) in the annual report
on truancy due to the legislature by December 15th, the superintendent
of public instruction shall ((select ten school districts to submit the
report at the end of the following school year. The ten districts
shall represent different areas of the state and be of varied sizes.
In addition, the superintendent of public instruction shall require any
district that fails to keep appropriate records to submit a full report
to the superintendent of public instruction under this subsection. All
school districts shall document steps taken under RCW 28A.225.020 in
each student's record, and make those records available upon request
consistent with the laws governing student records)) submit a report
indicating whether all school districts have documented steps taken
under RCW 28A.225.020 in each student's record, summarizing the number
of times each district held a conference with parents or guardians to
analyze the causes of the child's absences, and listing actions taken
pursuant to RCW 28A.225.020(1)(c) to eliminate or reduce the child's
absences, including the frequency with which such actions were taken;
(c) The number of enrolled students with ten or more unexcused
absences in a school year or five or more unexcused absences in a month
during a school year;
(d) A description of any programs or schools developed to serve
students who have had five or more unexcused absences in a month or ten
in a year including information about the number of students in the
program or school and the number of unexcused absences of students
during and after participation in the program. The school district
shall also describe any placements in an approved private nonsectarian
school or program or certified program under a court order under RCW
28A.225.090; ((and))
(e) The number of petitions filed by a school district with the
juvenile court;
(f) For each petition filed by a school district with the juvenile
court, the school district shall collect and report a summary of:
(i) The number of times the school district reports additional
unexcused absences to the court pursuant to RCW 28A.225.035(13);
(ii) The number of contempt motions filed by a school district with
the juvenile court;
(iii) Whether the youth named in the petition returned to school
and earned academic credit following the filing of the truancy petition
in court;
(iv) Whether the youth named in the original petition returned to
school and earned academic credit following a contempt finding; and
(v) Whether the youth named in the petition returned to school and
earned academic credit following incarceration for contempt in a
truancy case.
(3) For each category of information required under subsection (2)
of this section, the reports under subsection (1) of this section shall
include information for student populations by:
(a) The students' age and grade level;
(b) The students' race or ethnicity and gender;
(c) The students' disability status;
(d) The students' eligibility for free or reduced price lunches
under federal guidelines; and
(e) The students' eligibility for transitional bilingual
instruction, as defined in RCW 28A.180.030(1);
(4) A report required under this section shall not disclose the
name or other identification of a child or parent.
(((4))) (5) The superintendent of public instruction shall collect
these reports from all school districts and prepare an annual report
for each school year to be submitted to the legislature no later than
December 15th of each year.

--- END ---