BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that exposure to
secondhand smoke is known to cause cancer in humans and that children
are especially vulnerable to its harmful impacts. It is further found
that the number of cases of asthma among children is rising and that
secondhand smoke also contributes to the onset of lung disease. Adults
who drive and smoke in motor vehicles expose children in close
proximity to recognized carcinogens. In order to protect the health
and safety of children, it is necessary to prohibit smoking in motor
vehicles when children are present.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) It is unlawful for a person to smoke a
pipe, cigar, or cigarette in a motor vehicle, whether in motion or at
rest, in which there is a child thirteen years of age or younger.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "To smoke" means to have in one's immediate possession a
lighted pipe, cigar, or cigarette containing tobacco or any other
plant.
(b) "Motor vehicle" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
46.04.320.
(3) A violation of this section is a class 2 civil infraction under
chapter 7.80 RCW.
(4) Enforcement of this section by law enforcement officers may be
accomplished only as a secondary action when a driver of a motor
vehicle has been detained for a suspected violation of Title 46 RCW or
an equivalent local ordinance or some other offense.
(5) Infractions under this section shall not become part of the
driver's record under RCW 46.52.101 and 46.52.120. Additionally, a
finding that a person has committed a civil infraction under this
section shall not be made available to insurance companies or
employers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---