BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.14.0455 and 2006 c 311 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to the provisions in RCW 36.73.065, a transportation
benefit district under chapter 36.73 RCW may fix and impose a sales and
use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The tax
authorized in this section is in addition to any other taxes authorized
by law and shall be collected from those persons who are taxable by the
state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any
taxable event within the boundaries of the district. The rate of tax
shall not exceed two-tenths of one percent of the selling price in the
case of a sales tax, or value of the article used, in the case of a use
tax. The tax may not be imposed for a period exceeding ten years.
This tax may be extended for a period not exceeding ten years with an
affirmative vote of the voters voting at the election. If the
transportation benefit district is located in a county that borders
another state and has a population of more than four hundred thousand,
and a portion of the sales tax is used to fund initial construction on
a highway of statewide significance within the county, the sales tax
may be imposed for more than ten years.
(2) Money received from the tax imposed under this section must be
spent in accordance with the requirements of chapter 36.73 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax imposed and collected under chapters 82.08 and 82.12
RCW, less any credits allowed under chapter 82.14 RCW, on initial
construction for a highway of statewide significance to be constructed
under chapter 36.73 RCW in a county that borders another state and has
a population of more than four hundred thousand, must be transferred to
the highway project to defray the costs or pay debt service on that
project. In the case of a toll project, this transfer or credit must
be used to lower the overall cost of the project and thereby the
corresponding tolls.
(2) This transaction is exempt from the requirements in RCW
43.135.035(4).
(3) Government entities constructing highway projects under chapter
36.73 RCW shall report to the department the amount of state sales or
use tax covered under this section.

--- END ---