BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the distribution
of state real estate excise tax revenues via the city-county assistance
account established in RCW 43.08.290 represents a redistribution of tax
revenues from the more populous cities and counties to the less
populous cities and counties of the state. The legislature finds that
it is appropriate to require voter acknowledgment and approval for the
continuation of these government welfare tax payments to cities and
counties.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.08.290 and 2005 c 450 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The city-county assistance account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from real estate excise tax disbursements
provided under RCW 82.45.060 shall be deposited into the account.
Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes
provided in this section.
(2) Funds deposited in the city-county assistance account shall be
distributed equally to the cities and counties.
(3)(a) Funds distributed to counties shall, to the extent possible,
increase the revenues received under RCW 82.14.030(1) by each county to
the greater of two hundred fifty thousand dollars or:
(i) For a county with an unincorporated population of one hundred
thousand or less, seventy percent of the statewide weighted average per
capita level of sales and use tax revenues collected under RCW
82.14.030(1) for the unincorporated areas of all counties imposing the
sales and use tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1) in the previous
calendar year; and
(ii) For a county with an unincorporated population of more than
one hundred thousand, sixty-five percent of the statewide weighted
average per capita level of sales and use tax revenues collected under
RCW 82.14.030(1) for the unincorporated areas of all counties imposing
the sales and use tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1) in the previous
calendar year.
(b) For each county with an unincorporated population of fifteen
thousand or less, the county shall receive the greater of the amount in
(a) of this subsection or the amount received in local government
assistance provided by section 716, chapter 276, Laws of 2004.
(c) For each county with an unincorporated population of more than
fifteen thousand and less than twenty-two thousand, the county shall
receive in calendar year 2006 and 2007 the greater of the amount
provided in (a) of this subsection or the amount received in local
government assistance provided by section 716, chapter 276, Laws of
2004.
(d) To the extent that revenues are insufficient to fund the
distributions under this subsection, the distributions of all counties
as otherwise determined under this subsection shall be ratably reduced.
(e) To the extent that revenues exceed the amounts needed to fund
the distributions under this subsection, the excess funds shall be
divided ratably based upon unincorporated population among those
counties receiving funds under this subsection and imposing the tax
collected under RCW 82.14.030(2) at the maximum rate.
(4)(a) For each city with a population of five thousand or less
with a per capita assessed property value less than twice the statewide
average per capita assessed property value for all cities for the
calendar year previous to the certification under subsection (6) of
this section, the city shall receive the greater of the following three
amounts:
(i) An amount necessary to increase the revenues collected under
RCW 82.14.030(1) up to fifty-five percent of the statewide weighted
average per capita level of sales and use tax revenues collected under
RCW 82.14.030(1) for all cities imposing the sales and use tax
authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1) in the previous calendar year.
(ii) The amount received in local government assistance provided
for fiscal year 2005 by section 721, chapter 25, Laws of 2003 1st sp.
sess.
(iii) For a city with a per capita assessed property value less
than fifty-five percent of the statewide average per capita assessed
property value for all cities, an amount determined by subtracting the
city's per capita assessed property value from fifty-five percent of
the statewide average per capita assessed property value, dividing that
amount by one thousand, and multiplying the result by the city's
population.
(b) For each city with a population of more than five thousand with
a per capita assessed property value less than the statewide average
per capita assessed property value for all cities for the calendar year
previous to the certification under subsection (6) of this section, the
city shall receive the greater of the following three amounts:
(i) An amount necessary to increase the revenues collected under
RCW 82.14.030(1) up to fifty percent of the statewide weighted average
per capita level of sales and use tax revenues collected under RCW
82.14.030(1) for all cities imposing the sales and use tax authorized
under RCW 82.14.030(1) in the previous calendar year.
(ii) For calendar year 2006 and 2007, the amount received in local
government assistance provided for fiscal year 2005 by section 721,
chapter 25, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess.
(iii) For a city with a per capita assessed property value less
than fifty-five percent of the statewide average per capita assessed
property value for all cities, an amount determined by subtracting the
city's per capita assessed property value from fifty-five percent of
the statewide average per capita assessed property value, dividing that
amount by one thousand, and multiplying the result by the city's
population.
(c) No city may receive an amount greater than one hundred thousand
dollars a year under (a) or (b) of this subsection.
(d) To the extent that revenues are insufficient to fund the
distributions under this subsection, the distributions of all cities as
otherwise determined under this subsection shall be ratably reduced.
(e) To the extent that revenues exceed the amounts needed to fund
the distributions under this subsection, the excess funds shall be
divided ratably based upon population among those cities receiving
funds under this subsection and imposing the tax collected under RCW
82.14.030(2) at the maximum rate.
(f) This subsection only applies to cities incorporated prior to
August 1, 2005.
(5) The two hundred fifty thousand dollar amount in subsection (3)
of this section and the one hundred thousand dollar amount in
subsection (4) of this section shall be increased each year beginning
in calendar year 2006 by inflation as defined in RCW 84.55.005, as
determined by the department of revenue.
(6) Distributions under subsections (3) and (4) of this section
shall be made quarterly beginning on October 1, 2005, based on
population as last determined by the office of financial management.
The department of revenue shall certify the amounts to be distributed
under this section to the state treasurer. The certification shall be
made by October 1, 2005, for the October 1, 2005, distribution and the
January 1, 2006, distribution, based on calendar year 2004 collections.
The certification shall be made by March 1, 2006, for distributions
beginning April 1, 2006, and by March 1st of every year thereafter.
The March 1st certification shall be used for distributions occurring
on April 1st, July 1st, and October 1st of the year of certification
and on January 1st of the year following certification.
(7) After December 31, 2007, no city or county shall receive a
distribution under this section unless (a) the city or county
legislative authority, by resolution or ordinance, has submitted an
authorizing proposition to the voters, and (b) the proposition has been
approved by a majority of persons voting thereon. The ballot title of
the proposition required by this subsection shall be substantially as
follows:

"In 2007, the government of (city or county) received $ . . .
in government welfare tax payments from (the two counties with
the highest real estate excise tax revenues) and the other more
populous counties of Washington state, which amounts to $ . . .
for each resident of (city or county). Without these payments,
the local tax bill for each taxpayer would increase, and/or the
(city or county) services would be reduced. Should (city or
county) be authorized to continue receiving these payments?"

If a city or county otherwise eligible to receive distributions
under this section does not approve the authorizing proposition, the
distribution for that city or county shall be deposited in the public
works assistance account under RCW 43.155.050.
(8) All distributions to local governments from the city-county
assistance account constitute increases in state distributions of
revenue to political subdivisions for purposes of state reimbursement
for the costs of new programs and increases in service levels under RCW
43.135.060, including any claims or litigation pending against the
state on or after January 1, 2005.

--- END ---