BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 66.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) There shall be a license for craft distilleries. The fee is
one hundred dollars per year.
(2) Any craft distillery licensed under this section may sell
spirits of its own production for consumption off the premises, up to
one liter per person per day. Spirits sold under this subsection must
be purchased from the board and sold at the retail price established by
the board. A craft distillery selling spirits under this subsection
must comply with the applicable laws and rules relating to retailers.
(3) Any craft distillery licensed under this section may provide,
free of charge, one-half ounce or less samples of spirits of its own
production to persons on the premises of the distillery. The maximum
total per person per day is two ounces. Every person who participates
in any manner in the service of samples must obtain a class 12 or 13
alcohol server permit. Spirits used for samples must be purchased from
the board.
(4) The board shall adopt rules to implement the alcohol server
permit requirement and may adopt additional rules to implement this
section.
(5) The use of purchased neutral grain spirits shall be prohibited
by a craft distillery unless those neutral grain spirits are made in
Washington state.
(6) Distilling is an agricultural practice.

Sec. 2 RCW 66.04.010 and 2007 c 226 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
In this title, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Alcohol" is that substance known as ethyl alcohol, hydrated
oxide of ethyl, or spirit of wine, which is commonly produced by the
fermentation or distillation of grain, starch, molasses, or sugar, or
other substances including all dilutions and mixtures of this
substance. The term "alcohol" does not include alcohol in the
possession of a manufacturer or distiller of alcohol fuel, as described
in RCW 66.12.130, which is intended to be denatured and used as a fuel
for use in motor vehicles, farm implements, and machines or implements
of husbandry.
(2) "Authorized representative" means a person who:
(a) Is required to have a federal basic permit issued pursuant to
the federal alcohol administration act, 27 U.S.C. Sec. 204;
(b) Has its business located in the United States outside of the
state of Washington;
(c) Acquires ownership of beer or wine for transportation into and
resale in the state of Washington; and which beer or wine is produced
anywhere outside Washington by a brewery or winery which does not hold
a certificate of approval issued by the board; and
(d) Is appointed by the brewery or winery referenced in (c) of this
subsection as its exclusive authorized representative for marketing and
selling its products within the United States in accordance with a
written agreement between the authorized representative and such
brewery or winery pursuant to this title. The board may waive the
requirement for the written agreement of exclusivity in situations
consistent with the normal marketing practices of certain products,
such as classified growths.
(3) "Beer" means any malt beverage, flavored malt beverage, or malt
liquor as these terms are defined in this chapter.
(4) "Beer distributor" means a person who buys beer from a domestic
brewery, microbrewery, beer certificate of approval holder, or beer
importers, or who acquires foreign produced beer from a source outside
of the United States, for the purpose of selling the same pursuant to
this title, or who represents such brewer or brewery as agent.
(5) "Beer importer" means a person or business within Washington
who purchases beer from a beer certificate of approval holder or who
acquires foreign produced beer from a source outside of the United
States for the purpose of selling the same pursuant to this title.
(6) "Brewer" or "brewery" means any person engaged in the business
of manufacturing beer and malt liquor. Brewer includes a brand owner
of malt beverages who holds a brewer's notice with the federal bureau
of alcohol, tobacco, and firearms at a location outside the state and
whose malt beverage is contract-produced by a licensed in-state
brewery, and who may exercise within the state, under a domestic
brewery license, only the privileges of storing, selling to licensed
beer distributors, and exporting beer from the state.
(7) "Board" means the liquor control board, constituted under this
title.
(8) "Club" means an organization of persons, incorporated or
unincorporated, operated solely for fraternal, benevolent, educational,
athletic or social purposes, and not for pecuniary gain.
(9) "Confection" means a preparation of sugar, honey, or other
natural or artificial sweeteners in combination with chocolate, fruits,
nuts, dairy products, or flavorings, in the form of bars, drops, or
pieces.
(10) "Consume" includes the putting of liquor to any use, whether
by drinking or otherwise.
(11) "Contract liquor store" means a business that sells liquor on
behalf of the board through a contract with a contract liquor store
manager.
(12) "Craft distillery" means an establishment that produces within
Washington twenty thousand gallons or less of spirits per year using a
pot still and in which more than fifty percent of the raw materials
used in the production are grown in Washington.
(13) "Dentist" means a practitioner of dentistry duly and regularly
licensed and engaged in the practice of his profession within the state
pursuant to chapter 18.32 RCW.
(((13))) (14) "Distiller" means a person engaged in the business of
distilling spirits.
(((14))) (15) "Domestic brewery" means a place where beer and malt
liquor are manufactured or produced by a brewer within the state.
(((15))) (16) "Domestic winery" means a place where wines are
manufactured or produced within the state of Washington.
(((16))) (17) "Druggist" means any person who holds a valid
certificate and is a registered pharmacist and is duly and regularly
engaged in carrying on the business of pharmaceutical chemistry
pursuant to chapter 18.64 RCW.
(((17))) (18) "Drug store" means a place whose principal business
is, the sale of drugs, medicines and pharmaceutical preparations and
maintains a regular prescription department and employs a registered
pharmacist during all hours the drug store is open.
(((18))) (19) "Employee" means any person employed by the board.
(((19))) (20) "Flavored malt beverage" means:
(a) A malt beverage containing six percent or less alcohol by
volume to which flavoring or other added nonbeverage ingredients are
added that contain distilled spirits of not more than forty-nine
percent of the beverage's overall alcohol content; or
(b) A malt beverage containing more than six percent alcohol by
volume to which flavoring or other added nonbeverage ingredients are
added that contain distilled spirits of not more than one and one-half
percent of the beverage's overall alcohol content.
(((20))) (21) "Fund" means 'liquor revolving fund.'
(((21))) (22) "Hotel" means every building or other structure kept,
used, maintained, advertised or held out to the public to be a place
where food is served and sleeping accommodations are offered for pay to
transient guests, in which twenty or more rooms are used for the
sleeping accommodation of such transient guests and having one or more
dining rooms where meals are served to such transient guests, such
sleeping accommodations and dining rooms being conducted in the same
building and buildings, in connection therewith, and such structure or
structures being provided, in the judgment of the board, with adequate
and sanitary kitchen and dining room equipment and capacity, for
preparing, cooking and serving suitable food for its guests: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That in cities and towns of less than five thousand
population, the board shall have authority to waive the provisions
requiring twenty or more rooms.
(((22))) (23) "Importer" means a person who buys distilled spirits
from a distillery outside the state of Washington and imports such
spirituous liquor into the state for sale to the board or for export.
(((23))) (24) "Imprisonment" means confinement in the county jail.
(((24))) (25) "Liquor" includes the four varieties of liquor herein
defined (alcohol, spirits, wine and beer), and all fermented,
spirituous, vinous, or malt liquor, or combinations thereof, and mixed
liquor, a part of which is fermented, spirituous, vinous or malt
liquor, or otherwise intoxicating; and every liquid or solid or
semisolid or other substance, patented or not, containing alcohol,
spirits, wine or beer, and all drinks or drinkable liquids and all
preparations or mixtures capable of human consumption, and any liquid,
semisolid, solid, or other substance, which contains more than one
percent of alcohol by weight shall be conclusively deemed to be
intoxicating. Liquor does not include confections or food products
that contain one percent or less of alcohol by weight.
(((25))) (26) "Manufacturer" means a person engaged in the
preparation of liquor for sale, in any form whatsoever.
(((26))) (27) "Malt beverage" or "malt liquor" means any beverage
such as beer, ale, lager beer, stout, and porter obtained by the
alcoholic fermentation of an infusion or decoction of pure hops, or
pure extract of hops and pure barley malt or other wholesome grain or
cereal in pure water containing not more than eight percent of alcohol
by weight, and not less than one-half of one percent of alcohol by
volume. For the purposes of this title, any such beverage containing
more than eight percent of alcohol by weight shall be referred to as
"strong beer."
(((27))) (28) "Package" means any container or receptacle used for
holding liquor.
(((28))) (29) "Passenger vessel" means any boat, ship, vessel,
barge, or other floating craft of any kind carrying passengers for
compensation.
(((29))) (30) "Permit" means a permit for the purchase of liquor
under this title.
(((30))) (31) "Person" means an individual, copartnership,
association, or corporation.
(((31))) (32) "Physician" means a medical practitioner duly and
regularly licensed and engaged in the practice of his profession within
the state pursuant to chapter 18.71 RCW.
(((32))) (33) "Prescription" means a memorandum signed by a
physician and given by him to a patient for the obtaining of liquor
pursuant to this title for medicinal purposes.
(((33))) (34) "Public place" includes streets and alleys of
incorporated cities and towns; state or county or township highways or
roads; buildings and grounds used for school purposes; public dance
halls and grounds adjacent thereto; those parts of establishments where
beer may be sold under this title, soft drink establishments, public
buildings, public meeting halls, lobbies, halls and dining rooms of
hotels, restaurants, theatres, stores, garages and filling stations
which are open to and are generally used by the public and to which the
public is permitted to have unrestricted access; railroad trains,
stages, and other public conveyances of all kinds and character, and
the depots and waiting rooms used in conjunction therewith which are
open to unrestricted use and access by the public; publicly owned
bathing beaches, parks, and/or playgrounds; and all other places of
like or similar nature to which the general public has unrestricted
right of access, and which are generally used by the public.
(((34))) (35) "Regulations" means regulations made by the board
under the powers conferred by this title.
(((35))) (36) "Restaurant" means any establishment provided with
special space and accommodations where, in consideration of payment,
food, without lodgings, is habitually furnished to the public, not
including drug stores and soda fountains.
(((36))) (37) "Sale" and "sell" include exchange, barter, and
traffic; and also include the selling or supplying or distributing, by
any means whatsoever, of liquor, or of any liquid known or described as
beer or by any name whatever commonly used to describe malt or brewed
liquor or of wine, by any person to any person; and also include a sale
or selling within the state to a foreign consignee or his agent in the
state. "Sale" and "sell" shall not include the giving, at no charge,
of a reasonable amount of liquor by a person not licensed by the board
to a person not licensed by the board, for personal use only. "Sale"
and "sell" also does not include a raffle authorized under RCW
9.46.0315: PROVIDED, That the nonprofit organization conducting the
raffle has obtained the appropriate permit from the board.
(((37))) (38) "Soda fountain" means a place especially equipped
with apparatus for the purpose of dispensing soft drinks, whether mixed
or otherwise.
(((38))) (39) "Spirits" means any beverage which contains alcohol
obtained by distillation, except flavored malt beverages, but including
wines exceeding twenty-four percent of alcohol by volume.
(((39))) (40) "Store" means a state liquor store established under
this title.
(((40))) (41) "Tavern" means any establishment with special space
and accommodation for sale by the glass and for consumption on the
premises, of beer, as herein defined.
(((41))) (42) "Winery" means a business conducted by any person for
the manufacture of wine for sale, other than a domestic winery.
(((42))) (43)(a) "Wine" means any alcoholic beverage obtained by
fermentation of fruits (grapes, berries, apples, et cetera) or other
agricultural product containing sugar, to which any saccharine
substances may have been added before, during or after fermentation,
and containing not more than twenty-four percent of alcohol by volume,
including sweet wines fortified with wine spirits, such as port,
sherry, muscatel and angelica, not exceeding twenty-four percent of
alcohol by volume and not less than one-half of one percent of alcohol
by volume. For purposes of this title, any beverage containing no more
than fourteen percent of alcohol by volume when bottled or packaged by
the manufacturer shall be referred to as "table wine," and any beverage
containing alcohol in an amount more than fourteen percent by volume
when bottled or packaged by the manufacturer shall be referred to as
"fortified wine." However, "fortified wine" shall not include: (i)
Wines that are both sealed or capped by cork closure and aged two years
or more; and (ii) wines that contain more than fourteen percent alcohol
by volume solely as a result of the natural fermentation process and
that have not been produced with the addition of wine spirits, brandy,
or alcohol.
(b) This subsection shall not be interpreted to require that any
wine be labeled with the designation "table wine" or "fortified wine."
(((43))) (44) "Wine distributor" means a person who buys wine from
a domestic winery, wine certificate of approval holder, or wine
importer, or who acquires foreign produced wine from a source outside
of the United States, for the purpose of selling the same not in
violation of this title, or who represents such vintner or winery as
agent.
(((44))) (45) "Wine importer" means a person or business within
Washington who purchases wine from a wine certificate of approval
holder or who acquires foreign produced wine from a source outside of
the United States for the purpose of selling the same pursuant to this
title.

Sec. 3 RCW 66.04.010 and 2007 c 370 s 10 and 2007 c 226 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
In this title, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Alcohol" is that substance known as ethyl alcohol, hydrated
oxide of ethyl, or spirit of wine, which is commonly produced by the
fermentation or distillation of grain, starch, molasses, or sugar, or
other substances including all dilutions and mixtures of this
substance. The term "alcohol" does not include alcohol in the
possession of a manufacturer or distiller of alcohol fuel, as described
in RCW 66.12.130, which is intended to be denatured and used as a fuel
for use in motor vehicles, farm implements, and machines or implements
of husbandry.
(2) "Authorized representative" means a person who:
(a) Is required to have a federal basic permit issued pursuant to
the federal alcohol administration act, 27 U.S.C. Sec. 204;
(b) Has its business located in the United States outside of the
state of Washington;
(c) Acquires ownership of beer or wine for transportation into and
resale in the state of Washington; and which beer or wine is produced
anywhere outside Washington by a brewery or winery which does not hold
a certificate of approval issued by the board; and
(d) Is appointed by the brewery or winery referenced in (c) of this
subsection as its exclusive authorized representative for marketing and
selling its products within the United States in accordance with a
written agreement between the authorized representative and such
brewery or winery pursuant to this title. The board may waive the
requirement for the written agreement of exclusivity in situations
consistent with the normal marketing practices of certain products,
such as classified growths.
(3) "Beer" means any malt beverage, flavored malt beverage, or malt
liquor as these terms are defined in this chapter.
(4) "Beer distributor" means a person who buys beer from a domestic
brewery, microbrewery, beer certificate of approval holder, or beer
importers, or who acquires foreign produced beer from a source outside
of the United States, for the purpose of selling the same pursuant to
this title, or who represents such brewer or brewery as agent.
(5) "Beer importer" means a person or business within Washington
who purchases beer from a beer certificate of approval holder or who
acquires foreign produced beer from a source outside of the United
States for the purpose of selling the same pursuant to this title.
(6) "Brewer" or "brewery" means any person engaged in the business
of manufacturing beer and malt liquor. Brewer includes a brand owner
of malt beverages who holds a brewer's notice with the federal bureau
of alcohol, tobacco, and firearms at a location outside the state and
whose malt beverage is contract-produced by a licensed in-state
brewery, and who may exercise within the state, under a domestic
brewery license, only the privileges of storing, selling to licensed
beer distributors, and exporting beer from the state.
(7) "Board" means the liquor control board, constituted under this
title.
(8) "Club" means an organization of persons, incorporated or
unincorporated, operated solely for fraternal, benevolent, educational,
athletic or social purposes, and not for pecuniary gain.
(9) "Confection" means a preparation of sugar, honey, or other
natural or artificial sweeteners in combination with chocolate, fruits,
nuts, dairy products, or flavorings, in the form of bars, drops, or
pieces.
(10) "Consume" includes the putting of liquor to any use, whether
by drinking or otherwise.
(11) "Contract liquor store" means a business that sells liquor on
behalf of the board through a contract with a contract liquor store
manager.
(12) "Craft distillery" means an establishment that produces within
Washington twenty thousand gallons or less of spirits per year using a
pot still and in which more than fifty percent of the raw materials
used in the production are grown in Washington.
(13) "Dentist" means a practitioner of dentistry duly and regularly
licensed and engaged in the practice of his profession within the state
pursuant to chapter 18.32 RCW.
(((13))) (14) "Distiller" means a person engaged in the business of
distilling spirits.
(((14))) (15) "Domestic brewery" means a place where beer and malt
liquor are manufactured or produced by a brewer within the state.
(((15))) (16) "Domestic winery" means a place where wines are
manufactured or produced within the state of Washington.
(((16))) (17) "Druggist" means any person who holds a valid
certificate and is a registered pharmacist and is duly and regularly
engaged in carrying on the business of pharmaceutical chemistry
pursuant to chapter 18.64 RCW.
(((17))) (18) "Drug store" means a place whose principal business
is, the sale of drugs, medicines and pharmaceutical preparations and
maintains a regular prescription department and employs a registered
pharmacist during all hours the drug store is open.
(((18))) (19) "Employee" means any person employed by the board.
(((19))) (20) "Flavored malt beverage" means:
(a) A malt beverage containing six percent or less alcohol by
volume to which flavoring or other added nonbeverage ingredients are
added that contain distilled spirits of not more than forty-nine
percent of the beverage's overall alcohol content; or
(b) A malt beverage containing more than six percent alcohol by
volume to which flavoring or other added nonbeverage ingredients are
added that contain distilled spirits of not more than one and one-half
percent of the beverage's overall alcohol content.
(((20))) (21) "Fund" means 'liquor revolving fund.'
(((21))) (22) "Hotel" means buildings, structures, and grounds,
having facilities for preparing, cooking, and serving food, that are
kept, used, maintained, advertised, or held out to the public to be a
place where food is served and sleeping accommodations are offered for
pay to transient guests, in which twenty or more rooms are used for the
sleeping accommodation of such transient guests. The buildings,
structures, and grounds must be located on adjacent property either
owned or leased by the same person or persons.
(((22))) (23) "Importer" means a person who buys distilled spirits
from a distillery outside the state of Washington and imports such
spirituous liquor into the state for sale to the board or for export.
(((23))) (24) "Imprisonment" means confinement in the county jail.
(((24))) (25) "Liquor" includes the four varieties of liquor herein
defined (alcohol, spirits, wine and beer), and all fermented,
spirituous, vinous, or malt liquor, or combinations thereof, and mixed
liquor, a part of which is fermented, spirituous, vinous or malt
liquor, or otherwise intoxicating; and every liquid or solid or
semisolid or other substance, patented or not, containing alcohol,
spirits, wine or beer, and all drinks or drinkable liquids and all
preparations or mixtures capable of human consumption, and any liquid,
semisolid, solid, or other substance, which contains more than one
percent of alcohol by weight shall be conclusively deemed to be
intoxicating. Liquor does not include confections or food products
that contain one percent or less of alcohol by weight.
(((25))) (26) "Manufacturer" means a person engaged in the
preparation of liquor for sale, in any form whatsoever.
(((26))) (27) "Malt beverage" or "malt liquor" means any beverage
such as beer, ale, lager beer, stout, and porter obtained by the
alcoholic fermentation of an infusion or decoction of pure hops, or
pure extract of hops and pure barley malt or other wholesome grain or
cereal in pure water containing not more than eight percent of alcohol
by weight, and not less than one-half of one percent of alcohol by
volume. For the purposes of this title, any such beverage containing
more than eight percent of alcohol by weight shall be referred to as
"strong beer."
(((27))) (28) "Package" means any container or receptacle used for
holding liquor.
(((28))) (29) "Passenger vessel" means any boat, ship, vessel,
barge, or other floating craft of any kind carrying passengers for
compensation.
(((29))) (30) "Permit" means a permit for the purchase of liquor
under this title.
(((30))) (31) "Person" means an individual, copartnership,
association, or corporation.
(((31))) (32) "Physician" means a medical practitioner duly and
regularly licensed and engaged in the practice of his profession within
the state pursuant to chapter 18.71 RCW.
(((32))) (33) "Prescription" means a memorandum signed by a
physician and given by him to a patient for the obtaining of liquor
pursuant to this title for medicinal purposes.
(((33))) (34) "Public place" includes streets and alleys of
incorporated cities and towns; state or county or township highways or
roads; buildings and grounds used for school purposes; public dance
halls and grounds adjacent thereto; those parts of establishments where
beer may be sold under this title, soft drink establishments, public
buildings, public meeting halls, lobbies, halls and dining rooms of
hotels, restaurants, theatres, stores, garages and filling stations
which are open to and are generally used by the public and to which the
public is permitted to have unrestricted access; railroad trains,
stages, and other public conveyances of all kinds and character, and
the depots and waiting rooms used in conjunction therewith which are
open to unrestricted use and access by the public; publicly owned
bathing beaches, parks, and/or playgrounds; and all other places of
like or similar nature to which the general public has unrestricted
right of access, and which are generally used by the public.
(((34))) (35) "Regulations" means regulations made by the board
under the powers conferred by this title.
(((35))) (36) "Restaurant" means any establishment provided with
special space and accommodations where, in consideration of payment,
food, without lodgings, is habitually furnished to the public, not
including drug stores and soda fountains.
(((36))) (37) "Sale" and "sell" include exchange, barter, and
traffic; and also include the selling or supplying or distributing, by
any means whatsoever, of liquor, or of any liquid known or described as
beer or by any name whatever commonly used to describe malt or brewed
liquor or of wine, by any person to any person; and also include a sale
or selling within the state to a foreign consignee or his agent in the
state. "Sale" and "sell" shall not include the giving, at no charge,
of a reasonable amount of liquor by a person not licensed by the board
to a person not licensed by the board, for personal use only. "Sale"
and "sell" also does not include a raffle authorized under RCW
9.46.0315: PROVIDED, That the nonprofit organization conducting the
raffle has obtained the appropriate permit from the board.
(((37))) (38) "Soda fountain" means a place especially equipped
with apparatus for the purpose of dispensing soft drinks, whether mixed
or otherwise.
(((38))) (39) "Spirits" means any beverage which contains alcohol
obtained by distillation, except flavored malt beverages, but including
wines exceeding twenty-four percent of alcohol by volume.
(((39))) (40) "Store" means a state liquor store established under
this title.
(((40))) (41) "Tavern" means any establishment with special space
and accommodation for sale by the glass and for consumption on the
premises, of beer, as herein defined.
(((41))) (42) "Winery" means a business conducted by any person for
the manufacture of wine for sale, other than a domestic winery.
(((42))) (43)(a) "Wine" means any alcoholic beverage obtained by
fermentation of fruits (grapes, berries, apples, et cetera) or other
agricultural product containing sugar, to which any saccharine
substances may have been added before, during or after fermentation,
and containing not more than twenty-four percent of alcohol by volume,
including sweet wines fortified with wine spirits, such as port,
sherry, muscatel and angelica, not exceeding twenty-four percent of
alcohol by volume and not less than one-half of one percent of alcohol
by volume. For purposes of this title, any beverage containing no more
than fourteen percent of alcohol by volume when bottled or packaged by
the manufacturer shall be referred to as "table wine," and any beverage
containing alcohol in an amount more than fourteen percent by volume
when bottled or packaged by the manufacturer shall be referred to as
"fortified wine." However, "fortified wine" shall not include: (i)
Wines that are both sealed or capped by cork closure and aged two years
or more; and (ii) wines that contain more than fourteen percent alcohol
by volume solely as a result of the natural fermentation process and
that have not been produced with the addition of wine spirits, brandy,
or alcohol.
(b) This subsection shall not be interpreted to require that any
wine be labeled with the designation "table wine" or "fortified wine."
(((43))) (44) "Wine distributor" means a person who buys wine from
a domestic winery, wine certificate of approval holder, or wine
importer, or who acquires foreign produced wine from a source outside
of the United States, for the purpose of selling the same not in
violation of this title, or who represents such vintner or winery as
agent.
(((44))) (45) "Wine importer" means a person or business within
Washington who purchases wine from a wine certificate of approval
holder or who acquires foreign produced wine from a source outside of
the United States for the purpose of selling the same pursuant to this
title.

Sec. 4 RCW 66.24.150 and 1997 c 321 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
There shall be a license to manufacturers of liquor, including all
kinds of manufacturers except those licensed as distillers, craft
distilleries, domestic brewers, microbreweries, wineries, and domestic
wineries, authorizing such licensees to manufacture, import, sell, and
export liquor from the state; fee five hundred dollars per annum.

Sec. 5 RCW 66.24.310 and 1997 c 321 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No person shall canvass for, solicit, receive, or take orders
for the purchase or sale of liquor, nor contact any licensees of the
board in goodwill activities, unless such person shall be the
accredited representative of a person, firm, or corporation holding a
certificate of approval issued pursuant to RCW 66.24.270 or 66.24.206,
a beer distributor's license, a microbrewer's license, a domestic
brewer's license, a beer importer's license, a domestic winery license,
a wine importer's license, or a wine distributor's license within the
state of Washington, or the accredited representative of a distiller,
craft distillery, manufacturer, importer, or distributor of spirituous
liquor, or foreign produced beer or wine, and shall have applied for
and received a representative's license: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the
provisions of this section shall not apply to drivers who deliver beer
or wine;
(2) Every representative's license issued under this title shall be
subject to all conditions and restrictions imposed by this title or by
the rules and regulations of the board; the board, for the purpose of
maintaining an orderly market, may limit the number of representative's
licenses issued for representation of specific classes of eligible
employers;
(3) Every application for a representative's license must be
approved by a holder of a certificate of approval issued pursuant to
RCW 66.24.270 or 66.24.206, a licensed beer distributor, a licensed
domestic brewer, a licensed beer importer, a licensed microbrewer, a
licensed domestic winery, a licensed wine importer, a licensed wine
distributor, or by a distiller, craft distillery, manufacturer,
importer, or distributor of spirituous liquor, or foreign produced beer
or wine, as the rules and regulations of the board shall require;
(4) The fee for a representative's license shall be twenty-five
dollars per year;
(5) An accredited representative of a distiller, craft distillery,
manufacturer, importer, or distributor of spirituous liquor may, after
he or she has applied for and received a representative's license,
contact retail licensees of the board only in goodwill activities
pertaining to spirituous liquor products.

Sec. 6 RCW 66.24.520 and 1986 c 214 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
There shall be a grower's license to sell wine made from grapes or
other agricultural products owned at the time of vinification by the
licensee in bulk to holders of domestic wineries', distillers', craft
distilleries', or manufacturers' licenses or for export. The wine
shall be made upon the premises of a domestic winery licensee and is
referred to in this section as grower's wine. A grower's license
authorizes the agricultural product grower to contract for the
manufacturing of wine from the grower's own agricultural product, store
wine in bulk made from agricultural products produced by the holder of
this license, and to sell wine in bulk made from the grower's own
agricultural products to a winery ((or)), distillery, or craft
distillery in the state of Washington or to export in bulk for sale
out-of-state. The annual fee for a grower's license shall be seventy-
five dollars. For the purpose of chapter 66.28 RCW, a grower licensee
shall be deemed a manufacturer.

Sec. 7 RCW 66.28.010 and 2007 c 370 s 2, 2007 c 369 s 1, 2007 c
222 s 3, and 2007 c 217 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1)(a) No manufacturer, importer, distributor, or authorized
representative, or person financially interested, directly or
indirectly, in such business; whether resident or nonresident, shall
have any financial interest, direct or indirect, in any licensed retail
business, unless the retail business is owned by a corporation in which
a manufacturer or importer has no direct stock ownership and there are
no interlocking officers and directors, the retail license is held by
a corporation that is not owned directly or indirectly by a
manufacturer or importer, the sales of liquor are incidental to the
primary activity of operating the property as a hotel, alcoholic
beverages produced by the manufacturer or importer or their
subsidiaries are not sold at the licensed premises, and the board
reviews the ownership and proposed method of operation of all involved
entities and determines that there will not be an unacceptable level of
control or undue influence over the operation or the retail licensee;
nor shall any manufacturer, importer, distributor, or authorized
representative own any of the property upon which such licensed persons
conduct their business; nor shall any such licensed person, under any
arrangement whatsoever, conduct his or her business upon property in
which any manufacturer, importer, distributor, or authorized
representative has any interest unless title to that property is owned
by a corporation in which a manufacturer has no direct stock ownership
and there are no interlocking officers or directors, the retail license
is held by a corporation that is not owned directly or indirectly by
the manufacturer, the sales of liquor are incidental to the primary
activity of operating the property either as a hotel or as an
amphitheater offering live musical and similar live entertainment
activities to the public, alcoholic beverages produced by the
manufacturer or any of its subsidiaries are not sold at the licensed
premises, and the board reviews the ownership and proposed method of
operation of all involved entities and determines that there will not
be an unacceptable level of control or undue influence over the
operation of the retail licensee. Except as provided in subsection (3)
of this section, no manufacturer, importer, distributor, or authorized
representative shall advance moneys or moneys' worth to a licensed
person under an arrangement, nor shall such licensed person receive,
under an arrangement, an advance of moneys or moneys' worth. "Person"
as used in this section only shall not include those state or federally
chartered banks, state or federally chartered savings and loan
associations, state or federally chartered mutual savings banks, or
institutional investors which are not controlled directly or indirectly
by a manufacturer, importer, distributor, or authorized representative
as long as the bank, savings and loan association, or institutional
investor does not influence or attempt to influence the purchasing
practices of the retailer with respect to alcoholic beverages. Except
as otherwise provided in this section, no manufacturer, importer,
distributor, or authorized representative shall be eligible to receive
or hold a retail license under this title, nor shall such manufacturer,
importer, distributor, or authorized representative sell at retail any
liquor as herein defined. A corporation granted an exemption under
this subsection may use debt instruments issued in connection with
financing construction or operations of its facilities.
(b) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a licensed domestic
brewery or microbrewery from being licensed as a retailer pursuant to
chapter 66.24 RCW for the purpose of selling beer or wine at retail on
the brewery premises and at one additional off-site retail only
location and nothing in this section shall prohibit a domestic winery
from being licensed as a retailer pursuant to chapter 66.24 RCW for the
purpose of selling beer or wine at retail on the winery premises. Such
beer and wine so sold at retail shall be subject to the taxes imposed
by RCW 66.24.290 and 66.24.210 and to reporting and bonding
requirements as prescribed by regulations adopted by the board pursuant
to chapter 34.05 RCW, and beer and wine that is not produced by the
brewery or winery shall be purchased from a licensed beer or wine
distributor. Nothing in this section shall prohibit a microbrewery
holding a beer and/or wine restaurant license under RCW 66.24.320 from
holding the same privileges and endorsements attached to the beer
and/or wine restaurant license. Nothing in this section shall prohibit
a licensed craft distillery from selling spirits of its own production
under section 1 of this act.
(c) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a licensed distiller,
domestic brewery, microbrewery, domestic winery, or a lessee of a
licensed domestic brewer, microbrewery, or domestic winery, from being
licensed as a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant pursuant to chapter
66.24 RCW for the purpose of selling liquor at a spirits, beer, and
wine restaurant premises on the property on which the primary
manufacturing facility of the licensed distiller, domestic brewer,
microbrewery, or domestic winery is located or on contiguous property
owned or leased by the licensed distiller, domestic brewer,
microbrewery, or domestic winery as prescribed by rules adopted by the
board pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW. Nothing in this section shall
prohibit a microbrewery holding a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant
license under RCW 66.24.420 from holding the same privileges and
endorsements attached to the spirits, beer, and wine restaurant
license. This section does not prohibit a brewery or microbrewery
holding a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license or a beer and/or
wine license under chapter 66.24 RCW operated on the premises of the
brewery or microbrewery from holding a second retail only license at a
location separate from the premises of the brewery or microbrewery.
(d) Nothing in this section prohibits retail licensees with a
caterer's endorsement issued under RCW 66.24.320 or 66.24.420 from
operating on a domestic winery premises.
(e) Nothing in this section prohibits an organization qualifying
under RCW 66.24.375 formed for the purpose of constructing and
operating a facility to promote Washington wines from holding retail
licenses on the facility property or leasing all or any portion of such
facility property to a retail licensee on the facility property if the
members of the board of directors or officers of the board for the
organization include officers, directors, owners, or employees of a
licensed domestic winery. Financing for the construction of the
facility must include both public and private money.
(f) Nothing in this section prohibits a bona fide charitable
nonprofit society or association registered under section 501(c)(3) of
the internal revenue code, or a local wine industry association
registered under section 501(c)(6) of the internal revenue code as it
exists on July 22, 2007, and having an officer, director, owner, or
employee of a licensed domestic winery or a wine certificate of
approval holder on its board of directors from holding a special
occasion license under RCW 66.24.380.
(g)(i) Nothing in this section prohibits domestic wineries and
retailers licensed under chapter 66.24 RCW from producing, jointly or
together with regional, state, or local wine industry associations,
brochures and materials promoting tourism in Washington state which
contain information regarding retail licensees, domestic wineries, and
their products.
(ii) Nothing in this section prohibits: (A) Domestic wineries,
domestic breweries, microbreweries, and certificate of approval holders
licensed under this chapter from listing on their internet web sites
information related to retailers who sell or promote their products,
including direct links to the retailers' internet web sites; and (B)
retailers licensed under this chapter from listing on their internet
web sites information related to domestic wineries, domestic breweries,
microbreweries, and certificate of approval holders whose products
those retailers sell or promote, including direct links to the domestic
wineries', domestic breweries', microbreweries', and certificate of
approval holders' web sites.
(h) Nothing in this section prohibits the performance of personal
services offered from time to time by a domestic winery or certificate
of approval holder licensed under RCW 66.24.206(1)(a) for or on behalf
of a licensed retail business when the personal services are (i)
conducted at a licensed premises, and (ii) intended to inform, educate,
or enhance customers' knowledge or experience of the manufacturer's
products. The performance of personal services may include
participation and pouring at the premises of a retailer holding a
spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license, a wine and/or beer
restaurant license, or a specialty wine shop license; bottle signings;
and other similar informational or educational activities. A domestic
winery or certificate of approval holder is not obligated to perform
any such personal services, and a retail licensee may not require a
domestic winery or certificate of approval holder to conduct any
personal service as a condition for selling any alcohol to the retail
licensee. Except as provided in RCW 66.28.150, the cost of sampling
may not be borne, directly or indirectly, by any liquor manufacturer,
importer, or distributor. Nothing in this section prohibits domestic
wineries and retail licensees from identifying the wineries on private
labels authorized under RCW 66.24.400, 66.24.425, and 66.24.450.
(i) Until July 1, 2007, nothing in this section prohibits a
nonprofit statewide organization of microbreweries formed for the
purpose of promoting Washington's craft beer industry as a trade
association registered as a 501(c) with the internal revenue service
from holding a special occasion license to conduct up to six beer
festivals.
(j) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a manufacturer,
importer, or distributor from entering into an arrangement with any
holder of a sports/entertainment facility license or an affiliated
business for brand advertising at the licensed facility or promoting
events held at the sports entertainment facility as authorized under
RCW 66.24.570.
(2) Financial interest, direct or indirect, as used in this
section, shall include any interest, whether by stock ownership,
mortgage, lien, or through interlocking directors, or otherwise.
Pursuant to rules promulgated by the board in accordance with chapter
34.05 RCW manufacturers, distributors, and importers may perform, and
retailers may accept the service of building, rotating and restocking
case displays and stock room inventories; rotating and rearranging can
and bottle displays of their own products; provide point of sale
material and brand signs; price case goods of their own brands; and
perform such similar normal business services as the board may by
regulation prescribe.
(3)(a) This section does not prohibit a manufacturer, importer, or
distributor from providing services to a special occasion licensee for:
(i) Installation of draft beer dispensing equipment or advertising,
(ii) advertising, pouring, or dispensing of beer or wine at a beer or
wine tasting exhibition or judging event, or (iii) a special occasion
licensee from receiving any such services as may be provided by a
manufacturer, importer, or distributor. Nothing in this section shall
prohibit a retail licensee, or any person financially interested,
directly or indirectly, in such a retail licensee from having a
financial interest, direct or indirect, in a business which provides,
for a compensation commensurate in value to the services provided,
bottling, canning or other services to a manufacturer, so long as the
retail licensee or person interested therein has no direct financial
interest in or control of said manufacturer.
(b) A person holding contractual rights to payment from selling a
liquor distributor's business and transferring the license shall not be
deemed to have a financial interest under this section if the person
(i) lacks any ownership in or control of the distributor, (ii) is not
employed by the distributor, and (iii) does not influence or attempt to
influence liquor purchases by retail liquor licensees from the
distributor.
(c) The board shall adopt such rules as are deemed necessary to
carry out the purposes and provisions of subsections (1)(g) and (h) and
(3)(a) of this section in accordance with the administrative procedure
act, chapter 34.05 RCW.
(4) A license issued under RCW 66.24.395 does not constitute a
retail license for the purposes of this section.
(5) A public house license issued under RCW 66.24.580 does not
violate the provisions of this section as to a retailer having an
interest directly or indirectly in a liquor-licensed manufacturer.

Sec. 8 RCW 66.28.040 and 2004 c 160 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as permitted by the board under RCW 66.20.010, no domestic
brewery, microbrewery, distributor, distiller, craft distillery,
domestic winery, importer, rectifier, certificate of approval holder,
or other manufacturer of liquor shall, within the state of Washington,
give to any person any liquor; but nothing in this section nor in RCW
66.28.010 shall prevent a domestic brewery, microbrewery, distributor,
domestic winery, distiller, craft distillery, certificate of approval
holder, or importer from furnishing samples of beer, wine, or
spirituous liquor to authorized licensees for the purpose of
negotiating a sale, in accordance with regulations adopted by the
liquor control board, provided that the samples are subject to taxes
imposed by RCW 66.24.290 and 66.24.210, and in the case of spirituous
liquor, any product used for samples must be purchased at retail from
the board; nothing in this section shall prevent the furnishing of
samples of liquor to the board for the purpose of negotiating the sale
of liquor to the state liquor control board; nothing in this section
shall prevent a domestic brewery, microbrewery, domestic winery,
distillery, craft distillery, certificate of approval holder, or
distributor from furnishing beer, wine, or spirituous liquor for
instructional purposes under RCW 66.28.150; nothing in this section
shall prevent a domestic winery, certificate of approval holder, or
distributor from furnishing wine without charge, subject to the taxes
imposed by RCW 66.24.210, to a not-for-profit group organized and
operated solely for the purpose of enology or the study of viticulture
which has been in existence for at least six months and that uses wine
so furnished solely for such educational purposes or a domestic winery,
or an out-of-state certificate of approval holder, from furnishing wine
without charge or a domestic brewery, or an out-of-state certificate of
approval holder, from furnishing beer without charge, subject to the
taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.210 or 66.24.290, to a nonprofit charitable
corporation or association exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3)
of the internal revenue code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3)) for use
consistent with the purpose or purposes entitling it to such exemption;
nothing in this section shall prevent a domestic brewery or
microbrewery from serving beer without charge, on the brewery premises;
nothing in this section shall prevent donations of wine for the
purposes of RCW 66.12.180; ((and)) nothing in this section shall
prevent a domestic winery from serving wine without charge, on the
winery premises; and nothing in this section shall prevent a craft
distillery from serving spirits without charge, on the distillery
premises subject to section 1 of this act.

Sec. 9 RCW 66.28.060 and 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 26 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every distillery and craft distillery licensed under this title
shall make monthly reports to the board pursuant to the regulations.
No such distillery or craft distillery shall make any sale of spirits
within the state of Washington except to the board and except as
provided in section 1 of this act.

Sec. 10 RCW 66.28.150 and 2007 c 217 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
A domestic brewery, microbrewery, domestic winery, distillery,
craft distillery, distributor, certificate of approval holder, or its
licensed agent may, without charge, instruct licensees and their
employees, or conduct courses of instruction for licensees and their
employees, including chefs, on the subject of beer, wine, or spirituous
liquor, including but not limited to, the history, nature, values, and
characteristics of beer, wine, or spirituous liquor, the use of wine
lists, and the methods of presenting, serving, storing, and handling
beer, wine, or spirituous liquor, and what wines go well with different
types of food. The domestic brewery, microbrewery, domestic winery,
distillery, craft distillery, distributor, certificate of approval
holder, or its licensed agent may furnish beer, wine, or spirituous
liquor and such other equipment, materials, and utensils as may be
required for use in connection with the instruction or courses of
instruction. The instruction or courses of instruction may be given at
the premises of the domestic brewery, microbrewery, domestic winery,
distillery, craft distillery, or authorized representative holding a
certificate of approval, at the premises of a retail licensee, or
elsewhere within the state of Washington.

Sec. 11 RCW 66.28.155 and 2004 c 160 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
A domestic brewery, microbrewery, domestic winery, distillery,
craft distillery, distributor, certificate of approval holder, or its
licensed agent may conduct educational activities or provide product
information to the consumer on the licensed premises of a retailer.
Information on the subject of wine, beer, or spirituous liquor,
including but not limited to, the history, nature, quality, and
characteristics of a wine, beer, or spirituous liquor, methods of
harvest, production, storage, handling, and distribution of a wine,
beer, or spirituous liquor, and the general development of the wine,
beer, and spirituous liquor industry may be provided by a domestic
brewery, microbrewery, domestic winery, distillery, craft distillery,
distributor, certificate of approval holder, or its licensed agent to
the public on the licensed premises of a retailer. The retailer
requesting such activity shall attempt to schedule a series of brewery,
winery, authorized representative, ((or)) distillery, craft distillery,
and distributor appearances in an effort to equitably represent the
industries. Nothing in this section permits a domestic brewery,
microbrewery, domestic winery, distillery, craft distillery,
distributor, certificate of approval holder, or its licensed agent to
receive compensation or financial benefit from the educational
activities or product information presented on the licensed premises of
a retailer. The promotional value of such educational activities or
product information shall not be considered advancement of moneys or of
moneys' worth within the meaning of RCW 66.28.010.

Sec. 12 RCW 66.40.140 and 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 88 are each amended
to read as follows:
Whenever a majority of qualified voters voting upon said question
in any such unit shall have voted "Against sale of liquor", the county
auditor shall file with the liquor control board a certificate showing
the result of the canvass at such election; and thereafter, except as
hereinafter provided, it shall not be lawful for a liquor store to be
operated therein nor for licensees to maintain and operate licensed
premises therein except as hereinafter provided:
(1) As to any stores maintained by the board within any such unit
at the time of such licensing, the board shall have a period of thirty
days from and after the date of the canvass of the vote upon such
election to continue operation of its store or stores therein.
(2) As to any premises licensed hereunder within any such unit at
the time of such election, such licensee shall have a period of sixty
days from and after the date of the canvass of the vote upon such
election in which to discontinue operation of its store or stores
therein.
(3) Nothing herein contained shall prevent any distillery, craft
distillery, brewery, rectifying plant or winery or the licensed
operators thereof from selling its manufactured product, manufactured
within such unit, outside the boundaries thereof.
(4) Nothing herein contained shall prevent any person residing in
any unit in which the sale of liquor shall have been forbidden by
popular vote as herein provided, who is otherwise qualified to receive
and hold a permit under this title, from lawfully purchasing without
the unit and transporting into or receiving within the unit, liquor
lawfully purchased by him outside the boundaries of such unit.

Sec. 13 RCW 66.24.210 and 2006 c 302 s 5, 2006 c 101 s 4, and
2006 c 49 s 8 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) There is hereby imposed upon all wines except cider sold to
wine distributors and the Washington state liquor control board, within
the state a tax at the rate of twenty and one-fourth cents per liter.
Any domestic winery or certificate of approval holder acting as a
distributor of its own production shall pay taxes imposed by this
section. There is hereby imposed on all cider sold to wine
distributors and the Washington state liquor control board within the
state a tax at the rate of three and fifty-nine one-hundredths cents
per liter. However, wine sold or shipped in bulk from one winery to
another winery shall not be subject to such tax.
(a) The tax provided for in this section shall be collected by
direct payments based on wine purchased by wine distributors.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, every
person purchasing wine under the provisions of this section shall on or
before the twentieth day of each month report to the board all
purchases during the preceding calendar month in such manner and upon
such forms as may be prescribed by the board, and with such report
shall pay the tax due from the purchases covered by such report unless
the same has previously been paid. Any such purchaser of wine whose
applicable tax payment is not postmarked by the twentieth day following
the month of purchase will be assessed a penalty at the rate of two
percent a month or fraction thereof. The board may require that every
such person shall execute to and file with the board a bond to be
approved by the board, in such amount as the board may fix, securing
the payment of the tax. If any such person fails to pay the tax when
due, the board may forthwith suspend or cancel the license until all
taxes are paid.
(c) Any licensed retailer authorized to purchase wine from a
certificate of approval holder with a direct shipment endorsement or a
domestic winery shall make monthly reports to the liquor control board
on wine purchased during the preceding calendar month in the manner and
upon such forms as may be prescribed by the board.
(2) An additional tax is imposed equal to the rate specified in RCW
82.02.030 multiplied by the tax payable under subsection (1) of this
section. All revenues collected during any month from this additional
tax shall be transferred to the state general fund by the twenty-fifth
day of the following month.
(3) An additional tax is imposed on wines subject to tax under
subsection (1) of this section, at the rate of one-fourth of one cent
per liter for wine sold after June 30, 1987. After June 30, 1996, such
additional tax does not apply to cider. An additional tax of five one-hundredths of one cent per liter is imposed on cider sold after June
30, 1996. All revenues collected under this subsection (3) shall be
disbursed quarterly to the Washington wine commission for use in
carrying out the purposes of chapter 15.88 RCW.
(4) An additional tax is imposed on all wine subject to tax under
subsection (1) of this section. The additional tax is equal to twenty-three and forty-four one-hundredths cents per liter on fortified wine
as defined in RCW 66.04.010(((41))) when bottled or packaged by the
manufacturer, one cent per liter on all other wine except cider, and
eighteen one-hundredths of one cent per liter on cider. All revenues
collected during any month from this additional tax shall be deposited
in the violence reduction and drug enforcement account under RCW
69.50.520 by the twenty-fifth day of the following month.
(5)(a) An additional tax is imposed on all cider subject to tax
under subsection (1) of this section. The additional tax is equal to
two and four one-hundredths cents per liter of cider sold after June
30, 1996, and before July 1, 1997, and is equal to four and seven one-hundredths cents per liter of cider sold after June 30, 1997.
(b) All revenues collected from the additional tax imposed under
this subsection (5) shall be deposited in the health services account
under RCW 43.72.900.
(6) For the purposes of this section, "cider" means table wine that
contains not less than one-half of one percent of alcohol by volume and
not more than seven percent of alcohol by volume and is made from the
normal alcoholic fermentation of the juice of sound, ripe apples or
pears. "Cider" includes, but is not limited to, flavored, sparkling,
or carbonated cider and cider made from condensed apple or pear must.
(7) For the purposes of this section, out-of-state wineries shall
pay taxes under this section on wine sold and shipped directly to
Washington state residents in a manner consistent with the requirements
of a wine distributor under subsections (1) through (4) of this
section, except wineries shall be responsible for the tax and not the
resident purchaser.

Sec. 14 RCW 66.24.481 and 1969 ex.s. c 250 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
No public place or club, or agent, servant or employee thereof,
shall keep or allow to be kept, either by itself, its agent, servant or
employee, or any other person, any liquor in any place maintained or
conducted by such public place or club, nor shall it permit the
drinking of any liquor in any such place, unless the sale of liquor in
said place is authorized by virtue of a valid and subsisting license
issued by the Washington state liquor control board, or the consumption
of liquor in said place is authorized by a special banquet permit
issued by said board. Every person who violates any provision of this
section shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
"Public place," for purposes of this section only, shall mean in
addition to the definition set forth in RCW 66.04.010(((24))), any
place to which admission is charged or in which any pecuniary gain is
realized by the owner or operator of such place in selling or vending
food or soft drinks.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Section 2 of this act expires July 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 Section 3 of this act takes effect July 1,
2008.

--- END ---