BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there are many
working adults in Washington that need additional postsecondary
educational opportunities to further develop their employability. The
legislature further finds that many of these people postpone or call
off their personal educational plans because they are busy working and
raising their families. Because the largest portion of our workforce
over the next thirty years is already employed but in need of skill
development, and because many low-wage, low-skilled, and mid-skilled
individuals cannot take advantage of postsecondary educational
opportunities as they currently exist, the legislature intends to
identify and test additional postsecondary educational opportunities
tailored to make postsecondary education accessible to working adults
through the use of campuses extended to include workplace-based
educational offerings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28C.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To the extent funds are available for this purpose, the board
shall identify and evaluate current national private employer
workplace-based educational programs with distance learning components
provided by public colleges and universities. The evaluation shall
include:
(a) A review of the literature and direct surveys of practitioners
about promising practices and net impact analysis;
(b) An initial determination of feasibility based on targeted
populations served, subject matter, and level of education;
(c) An overview of technological considerations and adult learning
strategies for distribution of learning to employer sites; and
(d) An overview of cost factors, including shared costs or co-investments by public and private partners.
(2) The board shall report the results of the study and evaluation
to appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28C.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To the extent funds are available for this purpose, the board
shall use a matching fund strategy to select and evaluate up to eight
pilot projects operated by Washington institutions of higher education.
By September 2008, the board shall select up to eight institutions of
higher education as defined in RCW 28B.92.030 including at least four
community or technical colleges to develop and offer a pilot project
providing employer workplace-based educational programs with distance
learning components. The board shall convene a task force that
includes representatives from the state board for community and
technical colleges and the higher education coordinating board to
select the participant institutions. At a minimum, the criteria for
selecting the educational institutions shall address:
(a) The ability to demonstrate a capacity to make a commitment of
resources to build and sustain a high quality program;
(b) The ability to readily engage faculty appropriately qualified
to develop and deliver a high quality curriculum;
(c) The ability to demonstrate demand for the proposed program from
a sufficient number of students within its service area to make the
program cost-effective and feasible to operate; and
(d) The identification of available employers under subsection (3)
of this section that demonstrate willingness to host an on-site program
either because they demand the level of education proposed within the
program or because they expect to accrue benefits of improved worker
retention and productivity from employee engagement in higher
education.
(2) Institutions of higher education may submit an application to
become a pilot college under this section. An institution of higher
education selected as a pilot college shall develop the curriculum for
and design and deliver courses. However, the programs developed under
this section are subject to approval by the state board for technical
and community colleges under RCW 28B.50.090 and by the higher education
coordinating board under RCW 28B.76.230.
(3) By September 2008, the board, in cooperation with the state
board for community and technical colleges and the higher education
coordinating board, shall select employers with the ability to offer
employment and workplace-based educational programs with distance
learning components in cooperation with the institutions selected under
subsection (1) of this section. The selection criteria shall address:
(a) Access to educational coursework and educational advice and
support for entry-level and semi-skilled workers, including paid and
unpaid release time, and adequate classroom space that is equipped
appropriately for the selected technological distance learning
methodologies to be used;
(b) On-site promotion and encouragement of worker participation,
including employee orientations, peer support and mentoring,
educational tutoring, and career planning;
(c) Allowance of a reasonable level of worker choice in the type
and level of coursework available;
(d) Commitment to work with college partner to ensure the relevance
of coursework to the skill demands and potential career pathways of the
employer host site and other participating employers; and
(e) Willingness to participate in an evaluation of the pilot to
analyze the net benefit to the employer host site, other employer
partners, the worker-students, and the colleges.
(4) In firms with union representation, the establishment of a
labor-management committee to oversee design and participation shall be
mandatory.
(5) Joint applications from institutions of higher education and
private employers shall be encouraged.
(6) The board shall evaluate the pilot project and report the
outcomes to students and employers by December 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28C.18 RCW
to read as follows:
The board may receive and expend federal funds and private gifts or
grants, which funds must be expended in accordance with any conditions
upon which the funds are contingent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 2 through 4 of this act expire
December 31, 2012.

--- END ---