BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
increase job creation and encourage self-employment in the state by
providing comprehensive assistance, training, and support services to
entrepreneurs and start-up businesses. It is the purpose of this act
to increase the assistance available to small businesses in the state
and provide a coordinated, efficient, responsive, and accountable
system to support small businesses, microenterprises, and
entrepreneurial development.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the limitations in this section, a credit is allowed
against the tax imposed under this chapter for contributions made by a
person to the Washington small business development center created in
RCW 28B.30.530.
(2) The person must make the contribution before claiming a credit
authorized under this section. Credits earned under this section may
be claimed against taxes due for the calendar year in which the
contribution is made. The amount of credit claimed for a reporting
period may not exceed the tax otherwise due under this chapter for that
reporting period. No person may claim more than one hundred thousand
dollars of credit in any calendar year, including credit carried over
from a previous calendar year. No refunds may be granted for any
unused credits.
(3) The maximum credit that may be earned for each calendar year
under this section for a person is limited to the lesser of:
(a) One hundred thousand dollars; or
(b)(i) Through calendar year 2010, an amount equal to one hundred
percent of the contributions made by the person to a program during the
calendar year;
(ii) For calendar years 2011 and 2012, an amount equal to ninety
percent of the contributions made by the person to a program during the
calendar year; and
(iii) For calendar years after 2012, an amount equal to eighty
percent of the contributions made by the person to a program during the
calendar year.
(4) Except as provided under subsection (5) of this section, a tax
credit claimed under this section may not be carried over to another
year.
(5) Any amount of tax credit otherwise allowable under this section
not claimed by the person in any calendar year may be carried over and
claimed against the person's tax liability for the next succeeding
calendar year. Any credit remaining unused in the next succeeding
calendar year may be carried forward and claimed against the person's
tax liability for the second succeeding calendar year; and any credit
not used in that second succeeding calendar year may be carried over
and claimed against the person's tax liability for the third succeeding
calendar year, but may not be carried over for any calendar year
thereafter.
(6) Credits are available on a first in-time basis. The department
shall disallow any credits, or portion thereof, that would cause the
total amount of credits claimed under this section during any calendar
year to exceed nine hundred thousand dollars. If this limitation is
reached, the department shall notify the small business development
center that the annual statewide limit has been met. In addition, the
department shall provide written notice to any person who has claimed
tax credits in excess of the nine hundred thousand dollar limitation in
this subsection. The notice shall indicate the amount of tax due and
shall provide that the tax be paid within thirty days from the date of
such notice. The department shall not assess penalties and interest as
provided in chapter 82.32 RCW on the amount due in the initial notice
if the amount due is paid by the due date specified in the notice, or
any extension thereof.
(7) To claim a credit under this section, a person must
electronically file with the department all returns, forms, and any
other information required by the department, in an electronic format
as provided or approved by the department. Any return, form, or
information required to be filed in an electronic format under this
section is not filed until received by the department in an electronic
format. As used in this subsection, "returns" has the same meaning as
"return" in RCW 82.32.050.
(8) No application is necessary for the tax credit. The person
must keep records necessary for the department to verify eligibility
under this section.
(9) The small business development center shall provide to the
department, upon request, such information needed to verify eligibility
for credit under this section, including information regarding
contributions received by the program.
(10) The department shall not allow any credit under this section
before July 1, 2008.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.30.530 and 1984 c 77 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board of regents of Washington State University shall
establish the Washington State University small business development
center and such satellite offices as the center deems appropriate.
(2) The center shall provide management and technical assistance
including but not limited to training, counseling, and research
services to small businesses throughout the state. The center shall
work with ((public and private community development and economic
assistance agencies and shall work towards the goal of coordinating
activities with such agencies)) the Washington state economic
development commission, the department of community, trade, and
economic development, the workforce training and education coordinating
board, the employment security department, the higher education
coordinating board, and the state board for community and technical
colleges to:
(a) Integrate small business development centers with other state
economic development and workforce development programs;
(b) Facilitate the development of interinstitutional
entrepreneurial education, training, and assistance programs; and
(c) Coordinate services to avoid duplication of services.
(3) The administrator of the center may contract with other public
or private entities for the provision of specialized services.
(4) The small business ((and)) development center may accept and
disburse federal grants or federal matching funds or other funds or
donations from any source when made, granted, or donated to carry out
the center's purposes. Contributions made to the center under section
2 of this act may be used to support satellite offices, increase
assistance available to small and start-up businesses, develop new
assistance programs, and otherwise carry out the requirements and the
purpose of this act.

--- END ---