BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that an elected county
prosecuting attorney functions as both a state officer in pursuing
criminal cases on behalf of the state of Washington, and as a county
officer who acts as civil counsel for the county, and provides services
to school districts and lesser taxing districts by statute.
The elected prosecuting attorney's dual role as a state officer and
a county officer is reflected in various provisions of the state
Constitution and within state statute.
The legislature finds that the responsibilities and decisions
required of the elected prosecuting attorney are essentially the same
in every county within Washington state, from a decision to seek the
death penalty in an aggravated murder case, to the decision not to
prosecute but refer an offender to drug court; from a decision to
pursue child rape charges based solely upon the testimony of the child,
to a decision to divert juvenile offenders out of the justice system.
Therefore, the legislature finds that elected prosecuting attorneys
need to exercise the same level of skill and expertise in the least
populous county as in the most populous county.
The legislature finds that the salary of the elected county
prosecuting attorney should be tied to that of a superior court judge.
This furthers the state's interests and responsibilities under the
state Constitution, and is consistent with the current practice of
several counties in Washington state, the practices of several other
states, and the national district attorneys' association national
standards.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.17.020 and 2001 c 73 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The county legislative authority of each county or a county
commissioner or councilmember salary commission which conforms with RCW
36.17.024 is authorized to establish the salaries of the elected
officials of the county. ((One-half of the salary of each prosecuting
attorney shall be paid by the state.)) The state and county shall
contribute to the costs of the salary of the elected prosecuting
attorney as set forth in subsection (11) of this section. The annual
salary of a county elected official shall not be less than the
following:
(1) In each county with a population of one million or more:
Auditor, clerk, treasurer, sheriff, members of the county legislative
authority, and coroner, eighteen thousand dollars; and assessor,
nineteen thousand dollars((; and prosecuting attorney, thirty thousand
three hundred dollars));
(2) In each county with a population of from two hundred ten
thousand to less than one million: Auditor, seventeen thousand six
hundred dollars; clerk, seventeen thousand six hundred dollars;
treasurer, seventeen thousand six hundred dollars; sheriff, nineteen
thousand five hundred dollars; assessor, seventeen thousand six hundred
dollars; ((prosecuting attorney, twenty-four thousand eight hundred
dollars;)) members of the county legislative authority, nineteen
thousand five hundred dollars; and coroner, seventeen thousand six
hundred dollars;
(3) In each county with a population of from one hundred twenty-five thousand to less than two hundred ten thousand: Auditor, sixteen
thousand dollars; clerk, sixteen thousand dollars; treasurer, sixteen
thousand dollars; sheriff, seventeen thousand six hundred dollars;
assessor, sixteen thousand dollars; ((prosecuting attorney, twenty-four
thousand eight hundred dollars;)) members of the county legislative
authority, seventeen thousand six hundred dollars; and coroner, sixteen
thousand dollars;
(4) In each county with a population of from seventy thousand to
less than one hundred twenty-five thousand: Auditor, fourteen thousand
nine hundred dollars; clerk, fourteen thousand nine hundred dollars;
treasurer, fourteen thousand nine hundred dollars; assessor, fourteen
thousand nine hundred dollars; sheriff, fourteen thousand nine hundred
dollars; ((prosecuting attorney, twenty-three thousand seven hundred
dollars;)) members of the county legislative authority, fourteen
thousand nine hundred dollars; and coroner, fourteen thousand nine
hundred dollars;
(5) In each county with a population of from forty thousand to less
than seventy thousand: Auditor, thirteen thousand eight hundred
dollars; clerk, thirteen thousand eight hundred dollars; treasurer,
thirteen thousand eight hundred dollars; assessor, thirteen thousand
eight hundred dollars; sheriff, thirteen thousand eight hundred
dollars; ((prosecuting attorney, twenty-three thousand seven hundred
dollars;)) members of the county legislative authority, thirteen
thousand eight hundred dollars; and coroner, thirteen thousand eight
hundred dollars;
(6) In each county with a population of from eighteen thousand to
less than forty thousand: Auditor, twelve thousand one hundred
dollars; clerk, twelve thousand one hundred dollars; treasurer, twelve
thousand one hundred dollars; sheriff, twelve thousand one hundred
dollars; assessor, twelve thousand one hundred dollars; ((prosecuting
attorney in such a county in which there is no state university or
college, fourteen thousand three hundred dollars; in such a county in
which there is a state university or college, sixteen thousand five
hundred dollars;)) and members of the county legislative authority,
eleven thousand dollars;
(7) In each county with a population of from twelve thousand to
less than eighteen thousand: Auditor, ten thousand one hundred
dollars; clerk, ten thousand one hundred dollars; treasurer, ten
thousand one hundred dollars; assessor, ten thousand one hundred
dollars; sheriff, eleven thousand two hundred dollars; ((prosecuting
attorney, thirteen thousand two hundred dollars;)) and members of the
county legislative authority, nine thousand four hundred dollars;
(8) In each county with a population of from eight thousand to less
than twelve thousand: Auditor, ten thousand one hundred dollars;
clerk, ten thousand one hundred dollars; treasurer, ten thousand one
hundred dollars; assessor, ten thousand one hundred dollars; sheriff,
eleven thousand two hundred dollars; ((prosecuting attorney, nine
thousand nine hundred dollars;)) and members of the county legislative
authority, seven thousand dollars;
(9) In each county with a population of from five thousand to less
than eight thousand: Auditor, nine thousand one hundred dollars;
clerk, nine thousand one hundred dollars; treasurer, nine thousand one
hundred dollars; assessor, nine thousand one hundred dollars; sheriff,
ten thousand five hundred dollars; ((prosecuting attorney, nine
thousand nine hundred dollars;)) and members of the county legislative
authority, six thousand five hundred dollars;
(10) In each other county: Auditor, nine thousand one hundred
dollars; clerk, nine thousand one hundred dollars; treasurer, nine
thousand one hundred dollars; sheriff, ten thousand five hundred
dollars; assessor, nine thousand one hundred dollars; ((prosecuting
attorney, nine thousand nine hundred dollars;)) and members of the
county legislative authority, six thousand five hundred dollars;
(11) The state of Washington shall contribute an amount equal to
one-half the salary of a superior court judge towards the salary of the
elected prosecuting attorney. Upon receipt of the state contribution,
a county shall continue to contribute towards the salary of the elected
prosecuting attorney in an amount that equals or exceeds that
contributed by the county in 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2008.

--- END ---