BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
2007-09 BIENNIUMGENERAL GOVERNMENT AGENCIES -- OPERATING
Sec. 101 2007 c 518 s 101 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION
Grade Crossing Protective Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($505,000))
$504,000

Sec. 102 2007 c 518 s 103 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE MARINE EMPLOYEES COMMISSION
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($422,000))
$469,000

Sec. 103 2007 c 518 s 104 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($985,000))
$983,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The entire appropriation in this section
is provided solely for road maintenance purposes.

Sec. 104 2007 c 518 s 105 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,358,000))
$1,355,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $351,000 of the motor vehicle account -- state appropriation is
provided solely for costs associated with the motor fuel quality
program.
(2) (($1,007,000)) $1,004,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is provided solely to test the quality of biofuel. The
department must test fuel quality at the biofuel manufacturer,
distributor, and retailer.

Sec. 105 2007 c 518 s 106 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($223,000))
$340,000

((The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The entire appropriation is provided
solely for staffing costs to be dedicated to state transportation
activities. Staff hired to support transportation activities must have
practical experience with complex construction projects.))

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES -- OPERATING
Sec. 201 2007 c 518 s 201 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON TRAFFIC SAFETY COMMISSION
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,609,000))
$2,605,000
Highway Safety Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,880,000))
$15,849,000
School Zone Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,300,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($21,789,000))
$21,754,000

Sec. 202 2007 c 518 s 202 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD
Rural Arterial Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($907,000))
$901,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,075,000))
$2,060,000
County Arterial Preservation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,399,000))
$1,389,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,381,000))
$4,350,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $481,000 of the county arterial
preservation account--state appropriation is provided solely for
continued development and implementation of a maintenance management
system to manage county transportation assets.

Sec. 203 2007 c 518 s 203 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD
Urban Arterial Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,793,000))
$1,780,000
Transportation Improvement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,795,000))
$1,781,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,588,000))
$3,561,000

Sec. 204 2007 c 518 s 204 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE BOARD OF PILOTAGE COMMISSIONERS
Pilotage Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,156,000))
$1,153,000

Sec. 205 2007 c 518 s 206 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,276,000))
$2,269,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $112,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,388,000))
$2,381,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $350,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the commission to conduct a survey of ferry
customers as described in Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2358.
Development and interpretation of the survey must be done with
participation of the joint transportation committee workgroup
established in section 205(1) of this act.
(2) $100,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for a study to identify and evaluate long-term
financing alternatives for the Washington state ferry system. The
study shall incorporate the findings of the initial survey described in
subsection (1) of this section, and shall consider the potential for
state, regional, or local financing options. The commission shall
submit a draft final report of its findings and recommendations to the
transportation committees of the legislature no later than December
2008.
(3) The commission shall conduct a planning grade tolling study
that is based on the recommended policies in the commission's
comprehensive tolling study submitted September 20, 2006.

Sec. 206 2007 c 518 s 207 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE FREIGHT MOBILITY STRATEGIC INVESTMENT BOARD
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($695,000))
$692,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The freight mobility strategic investment board shall, on a
quarterly basis, provide status reports to the office of financial
management and the transportation committees of the legislature on the
delivery of projects funded by this act.
(2) The freight mobility strategic investment board and the
department of transportation shall collaborate to submit a report to
the office of financial management and the transportation committees of
the legislature by September 1, 2008, listing proposed freight highway
and rail projects. The report must describe the analysis used for
selecting such projects, as required by chapter 47.06A RCW for the
board and as required by this act for the department. When developing
its list of proposed freight highway and rail projects, the freight
mobility strategic investment board shall use the priorities identified
in section 309(7)(a) of this act to the greatest extent possible.

Sec. 207 2007 c 518 s 208 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL -- FIELD OPERATIONS BUREAU
State Patrol Highway Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($225,445,000))
$226,149,000
State Patrol Highway Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,602,000
State Patrol Highway Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $410,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($236,457,000))
$237,161,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Washington state patrol officers engaged in off-duty uniformed
employment providing traffic control services to the department of
transportation or other state agencies may use state patrol vehicles
for the purpose of that employment, subject to guidelines adopted by
the chief of the Washington state patrol. The Washington state patrol
shall be reimbursed for the use of the vehicle at the prevailing state
employee rate for mileage and hours of usage, subject to guidelines
developed by the chief of the Washington state patrol.
(2) In addition to the user fees, the patrol shall transfer into
the state patrol nonappropriated airplane revolving account under RCW
43.79.470 no more than the amount of appropriated state patrol highway
account and general fund funding necessary to cover the costs for the
patrol's use of the aircraft. The state patrol highway account and
general fund -- state funds shall be transferred proportionately in
accordance with a cost allocation that differentiates between highway
traffic enforcement services and general policing purposes.
(3) The patrol shall not account for or record locally provided DUI
cost reimbursement payments as expenditure credits to the state patrol
highway account. The patrol shall report the amount of expected
locally provided DUI cost reimbursements to the governor and
transportation committees of the senate and house of representatives by
September 30th of each year.
(4) $1,662,000 of the state patrol highway account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute
House Bill No. 1304 (commercial vehicle enforcement). If Substitute
House Bill No. 1304 is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(5) During the fiscal year 2008, the Washington state patrol shall
continue to perform traffic accident investigations on Thurston, Mason,
and Lewis county roads, and shall work with the counties to transition
the traffic accident investigations on county roads to the counties by
July 1, 2008.
(6) $100,000 of the state patrol highway account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute
House Bill No. 1417 (health benefits for surviving dependents). If
Substitute House Bill No. 1417 is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(7) $3,300,000 of the state patrol highway account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the salaries and benefits
associated with accretion in the number of troopers employed above
1,158 authorized commissioned troopers.

Sec. 208 2007 c 518 s 209 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL -- INVESTIGATIVE SERVICES BUREAU
State Patrol Highway Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,300,000))
$1,570,000

Sec. 209 2007 c 518 s 210 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL -- TECHNICAL SERVICES BUREAU
State Patrol Highway Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($103,157,000))
$103,946,000
State Patrol Highway Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,008,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($105,165,000))
$105,954,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The Washington state patrol shall work with the risk management
division in the office of financial management in compiling the
Washington state patrol's data for establishing the agency's risk
management insurance premiums to the tort claims account. The office
of financial management and the Washington state patrol shall submit a
report to the legislative transportation committees by December 31st of
each year on the number of claims, estimated claims to be paid, method
of calculation, and the adjustment in the premium.
(2) (($12,641,000)) $9,981,000 of the total appropriation is
provided solely for automobile fuel in the 2007-2009 biennium.
(3) (($8,678,000)) $7,461,000 of the total appropriation is
provided solely for the purchase of pursuit vehicles.
(4) (($5,254,000)) $6,328,000 of the total appropriation is
provided solely for vehicle repair and maintenance costs of vehicles
used for highway purposes.
(5) $384,000 of the total appropriation is provided solely for the
purchase of mission vehicles used for highway purposes in the
commercial vehicle and traffic investigation sections of the Washington
state patrol.
(6) The Washington state patrol may submit information technology
related requests for funding only if the patrol has coordinated with
the department of information services as required by section 602 of
this act.

Sec. 210 2007 c 518 s 212 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING
Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,000
Motorcycle Safety Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,905,000))
$3,899,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($843,000))
$831,000
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($141,953,000))
$143,976,000
Highway Safety Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $233,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($79,230,000))
$79,308,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,372,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($117,000))
$1,354,000
Department of Licensing Services Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,540,000))
$4,296,000
Washington State Patrol Highway Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,145,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($232,370,000))
$236,446,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,941,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
1267 (modifying commercial driver's license requirements). If
Substitute House Bill No. 1267 is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse. The department shall
informally report to the legislature by December 1, 2008, with
measurable data indicating the department's progress in meeting its
goal of improving public safety by improving the quality of the
commercial driver's license testing process.
(2) $716,000 of the motorcycle safety education account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill
No. 5273 (modifying motorcycle driver's license endorsement and
education provisions). If Senate Bill No. 5273 is not enacted by June
30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(3) (($8,872,000)) $11,922,000 of the highway safety account--state
appropriation is provided solely for costs associated with the systems
development and issuance of enhanced drivers' licenses and identicards
to facilitate crossing the Canadian border. If Engrossed Substitute
House Bill No. 1289 (relating to the issuance of enhanced drivers'
licenses and identicards) is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse. The department may expend
funds only after acceptance of the enhanced Washington state driver's
license for border crossing purposes by the Canadian and United States
governments. The department may expend funds only after prior written
approval of the director of financial management. Of the amount
provided in this subsection, up to $1,000,000 is for a statewide
educational campaign, which must include coordination with existing
public and private entities, to inform the Washington public of the
benefits of the new enhanced drivers' licenses and identicards.
(4) $91,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation and
$152,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation are
provided solely for contracting with the office of the attorney general
to investigate criminal activity uncovered in the course of the
agency's licensing and regulatory activities. Funding is provided for
the 2008 fiscal year. The department may request funding for the 2009
fiscal year if the request is submitted with measurable data indicating
the department's progress in meeting its goal of increased prosecution
of illegal activity.
(5) $350,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the costs associated with the systems development
of the interface that will allow insurance carriers and their agents
real time, online access to drivers' records. If Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5937 is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(6) $1,145,000 of the state patrol highway account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute
House Bill No. 1304 (modifying commercial motor vehicle carrier
provisions). If Substitute House Bill No. 1304 is not enacted by June
30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(7) The department may submit information technology related
requests for funding only if the department has coordinated with the
department of information services as required by section 602 of this
act.
(8) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department
shall((, working with the legislature, develop a proposal to streamline
title and registration statutes to specifically address apparent
conflicts, fee distribution, and other recommendations by the
department that are revenue neutral and which do not change legislative
policy. The department shall report the results of this review to the
transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2007))
contract with the joint legislative audit and review committee (JLARC)
for the development of a comprehensive cost allocation model to
allocate costs between omnibus and transportation appropriations and
amongst the department's multiple funds. The department shall report
the JLARC findings to the governor and the appropriate committees of
the house and senate by October 1, 2008.

Sec. 211 2007 c 518 s 213 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- TOLL OPERATIONS AND
MAINTENANCE -- PROGRAM B
High-Occupancy Toll Lanes Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,596,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,600,000))
$6,895,000
Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($28,218,000))
$29,930,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($36,414,000))
$39,421,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $5,000,000 of the motor vehicle account--state is provided
solely to provide a reserve for the Tacoma Narrows Bridge project.
This appropriation shall be held in unallotted status until the office
of financial management deems that revenues applicable to the Tacoma
Narrows Bridge project are not sufficient to cover the project's
expenditures.
(2) The department shall solicit private donations to fund
activities related to the opening ceremonies of the Tacoma Narrows
bridge project.

Sec. 212 2007 c 518 s 214 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY -- PROGRAM
C
Transportation Partnership Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,556,000))
$5,892,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($67,613,000))
$70,837,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,096,000
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,192,000))
$9,147,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $363,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,000,000))
$5,337,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($86,820,000))
$92,672,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department shall consult with the office of financial
management and the department of information services to ensure that
(a) the department's current and future system development is
consistent with the overall direction of other key state systems; and
(b) when possible, use or develop common statewide information systems
to encourage coordination and integration of information used by the
department and other state agencies and to avoid duplication.
(2) The department shall provide updated information on six project
milestones for all active projects, funded in part or in whole with
2005 transportation partnership account funds or 2003 nickel account
funds, on a quarterly basis in the transportation executive information
system (TEIS). The department shall also provide updated information
on six project milestones for projects, funded with preexisting funds
and that are agreed to by the legislature, office of financial
management, and the department, on a quarterly basis in TEIS.
(3) (($2,300,000)) $5,000,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is provided solely for preliminary work needed to
transition the department to the state government network. In
collaboration with the department of information services the
department shall complete an inventory of the current network
infrastructure, ((and)) develop an implementation plan for transition
to the state government network, improve security, and initiate
connection to the state government network.
(4) $1,000,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation,
(($4,556,000)) $5,892,000 of the transportation partnership account--state appropriation, and $4,000,000 of the transportation 2003 account
(nickel account)--state appropriation are provided solely for the
department to develop a project management and reporting system which
is a collection of integrated tools for capital construction project
managers to use to perform all the necessary tasks associated with
project management. The department shall integrate commercial off-the-shelf software with existing department systems and enhanced approaches
to data management to provide web-based access for multi-level
reporting and improved business workflows and reporting. Beginning
September 1, 2007, and on a quarterly basis thereafter, the department
shall report to the office of financial management and the
transportation committees of the legislature on the status of the
development and integration of the system. The first report shall
include a detailed work plan for the development and integration of the
system including timelines and budget milestones. At a minimum the
ensuing reports shall indicate the status of the work as it compares to
the work plan, any discrepancies, and proposed adjustments necessary to
bring the project back on schedule or budget if necessary.
(5) The department may submit information technology related
requests for funding only if the department has coordinated with the
department of information services as required by section 602 of this
act.
(6) $1,600,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the critical application assessment implementation
project. The department shall submit a progress report on the critical
application assessment implementation project to the house of
representatives and senate transportation committees on or before
December 1, 2007, and December 1, 2008, with a final report on or
before June 30, 2009.
(7) $893,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided for the continued maintenance and support of the executive
branch transportation executive information system (TEIS).

Sec. 213 2007 c 518 s 215 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- FACILITY MAINTENANCE, OPERATIONS
AND CONSTRUCTION -- PROGRAM D -- OPERATING
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($34,569,000))
$34,530,000

Sec. 214 2007 c 518 s 216 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- AVIATION -- PROGRAM F
Aeronautics Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,889,000))
$7,868,000
Aeronautics Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,150,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $631,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,670,000))
$10,649,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The entire multimodal transportation
account -- state appropriation ((is)) and $400,000 of the aeronautics
account--state appropriation are provided solely for the aviation
planning council as provided for in RCW 47.68.410.

Sec. 215 2007 c 518 s 217 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- PROGRAM DELIVERY MANAGEMENT AND
SUPPORT -- PROGRAM H
Transportation Partnership Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,422,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($50,446,000))
$52,567,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account) -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,422,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($56,040,000))
$58,161,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $2,422,000 of the transportation
partnership account appropriation and $2,422,000 of the transportation
2003 account (nickel account)--state appropriation are provided solely
for consultant contracts and staff to assist the department in the
delivery of the capital construction program by identifying
improvements to program delivery, program management, project controls,
program and project monitoring, forecasting, and reporting. The
((consultants)) department shall work with the department of
information services in the development of the project management and
reporting system.
The consultants shall provide an updated copy of the capital
construction strategic plan to the legislative transportation
committees and to the office of financial management on June 30, 2008,
and each year thereafter.
The department shall coordinate its work with other budget and
performance efforts, including Roadmap, the findings of the critical
applications modernization and integration strategies study, including
proposed next steps, and the priorities of government process.
The department shall report to the transportation committees of the
house of representatives and senate, and the office of financial
management, by December 31, 2007, on the implementation status of
recommended capital budgeting and reporting options. Options must
include: Reporting against legislatively-established project
identification numbers and may include recommendations for reporting
against other appropriate project groupings; measures for reporting
progress, timeliness, and cost which create an incentive for the
department to manage effectively and report its progress in a
transparent manner; and criteria and process for transfers of funds
among projects.

Sec. 216 2007 c 518 s 218 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- ECONOMIC PARTNERSHIPS -- PROGRAM
K
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,151,000))
$1,142,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,451,000))
$1,442,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $300,000 of the multimodal account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the department to hire a consultant to develop a
plan for codevelopment and public-private partnership opportunities at
public ferry terminals.
(2) The department shall conduct an analysis and, if determined to
be feasible, initiate requests for proposals involving the distribution
of alternative fuels along state department of transportation
rights-of-way.

Sec. 217 2007 c 518 s 219 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE -- PROGRAM M
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($321,888,000))
$335,222,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,000,000))
$6,000,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,797,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($329,685,000))
$347,019,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) If portions of the appropriations in this section are required
to fund maintenance work resulting from major disasters not covered by
federal emergency funds such as fire, flooding, and major slides,
supplemental appropriations must be requested to restore state funding
for ongoing maintenance activities.
(2) The department shall request an unanticipated receipt for any
federal moneys received for emergency snow and ice removal and shall
place an equal amount of the motor vehicle account -- state into
unallotted status. This exchange shall not affect the amount of
funding available for snow and ice removal.
(3) The department shall request an unanticipated receipt for any
private or local funds received for reimbursements of third party
damages that are in excess of the motor vehicle account -- private/local
appropriation.
(4) (($1,500,000)) $5,500,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal
appropriation is provided for unanticipated federal funds that may be
received during the 2007-09 biennium. Upon receipt of the funds, the
department shall provide a report on the use of the funds to the
transportation committees of the legislature and the office of
financial management.
(5) Funding is provided for maintenance on the state system to
deliver service level targets as listed in LEAP Transportation Document
2007-C, as developed April 20, 2007. In delivering the program and
aiming for these targets, the department should concentrate on the
following areas:
(a) Eliminating the number of activities delivered in the "f" level
of service at the region level; and
(b) Evaluating, analyzing, and potentially redistributing resources
within and among regions to provide greater consistency in delivering
the program statewide and in achieving overall level of service
targets.
(6) The department may work with the department of corrections to
utilize corrections crews for the purposes of litter pickup on state
highways.
(7) $650,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for increased asphalt costs.
(8) The department shall prepare a comprehensive listing of
maintenance backlogs and related costs and report to the office of
financial management and the transportation committees of the
legislature by December 31, 2008.

Sec. 218 2007 c 518 s 220 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- TRAFFIC OPERATIONS -- PROGRAM Q--OPERATING
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($52,040,000))
$51,968,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,050,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $127,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($54,217,000))
$54,145,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $654,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the department to time state-owned and operated
traffic signals. This funding may also be used to program incident,
emergency, or special event signal timing plans.
(2) $346,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the department to implement a pilot tow truck
incentive program. The department may provide incentive payments to
towing companies that meet clearance goals on accidents that involve
heavy trucks.
(3) $6,800,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for low-cost enhancements. The department shall give
priority to low-cost enhancement projects that improve safety or
provide congestion relief. The department shall prioritize low-cost
enhancement projects on a statewide rather than regional basis. By
January 1, 2008, and January 1, 2009, the department shall provide a
report to the legislature listing all low-cost enhancement projects
prioritized on a statewide rather than regional basis completed in the
prior year.
(4) The department, in consultation with the Washington state
patrol, may conduct a pilot program for the patrol to issue infractions
based on information from automated traffic safety cameras in roadway
construction zones on state highways when workers are present.
(a) In order to ensure adequate time in the 2007-09 biennium to
evaluate the effectiveness of the pilot program, any projects
authorized by the department must be authorized by December 31, 2007.
(b) The department shall use the following guidelines to administer
the program:
(i) Automated traffic safety cameras may only take pictures of the
vehicle and vehicle license plate and only while an infraction is
occurring. The picture must not reveal the face of the driver or of
passengers in the vehicle;
(ii) The department shall plainly mark the locations where the
automated traffic safety cameras are used by placing signs on locations
that clearly indicate to a driver that he or she is entering a roadway
construction zone where traffic laws are enforced by an automated
traffic safety camera;
(iii) Notices of infractions must be mailed to the registered owner
of a vehicle within fourteen days of the infraction occurring;
(iv) The owner of the vehicle is not responsible for the violation
if the owner of the vehicle, within fourteen days of receiving
notification of the violation, mails to the patrol, a declaration under
penalty of perjury, stating that the vehicle involved was, at the time,
stolen or in the care, custody, or control of some person other than
the registered owner, or any other extenuating circumstances;
(v) For purposes of the 2007-09 biennium pilot project, infractions
detected through the use of automated traffic safety cameras are not
part of the registered owner's driving record under RCW 46.52.101 and
46.52.120. Additionally, infractions generated by the use of automated
traffic safety cameras must be processed in the same manner as parking
infractions for the purposes of RCW 3.46.120, 3.50.100, 35.20.220,
46.16.216, and 46.20.270(3). However, the amount of the fine issued
for an infraction generated through the use of an automated traffic
safety camera is one hundred thirty-seven dollars. The court shall
remit thirty-two dollars of the fine to the state treasurer for deposit
into the state patrol highway account;
(vi) If a notice of infraction is sent to the registered owner and
the registered owner is a rental car business, the infraction will be
dismissed against the business if it mails to the patrol, within
fourteen days of receiving the notice, a declaration under penalty of
perjury of the name and known mailing address of the individual driving
or renting the vehicle when the infraction occurred. If the business
is unable to determine who was driving or renting the vehicle at the
time the infraction occurred, the business must sign a declaration
under penalty of perjury to this effect. The declaration must be
mailed to the patrol within fourteen days of receiving the notice of
traffic infraction. Timely mailing of this declaration to the issuing
agency relieves a rental car business of any liability under this
section for the notice of infraction. A declaration form suitable for
this purpose must be included with each automated traffic infraction
notice issued, along with instructions for its completion and use; and
(vii) By June 30, 2009, the department shall provide a report to
the legislature regarding the use, public acceptance, outcomes, and
other relevant issues regarding the pilot project.

Sec. 219 2007 c 518 s 221 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND
SUPPORT -- PROGRAM S
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($28,215,000))
$28,218,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,321,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,223,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($30,789,000))
$30,792,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(((1) The department shall work with staffs from the legislative
evaluation and accountability program committee, the transportation
committees of the legislature, and the office of financial management
on developing a new capital budgeting system to meet identified
information needs.
(2))) $250,000 of the multimodal account--state appropriation is
provided solely for implementing a wounded combat veteran's internship
program, administered by the department. The department shall seek
federal funding to support the continuation of this program.

Sec. 220 2007 c 518 s 222 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA,
AND RESEARCH -- PROGRAM T
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($30,698,000))
$30,731,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,163,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,029,000))
$1,021,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,809,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($53,799,000))
$53,824,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($3,900,000 of the motor vehicle account -- state appropriation
is provided solely for the costs of the regional transportation
investment district (RTID) and department of transportation project
oversight. The department shall provide support from its urban
corridors region to assist in preparing project costs, expenditure
plans, and modeling. The department shall not deduct a management
reserve, nor charge management or overhead fees. These funds,
including those expended since 2003, are provided as a loan to the RTID
and shall be repaid to the state within one year following formation of
the RTID. $2,391,000 of the amount provided under this subsection
shall lapse, effective January 1, 2008, if voters fail to approve
formation of the RTID at the 2007 general election, as determined by
the certification of the election results.)) $2,109,000 of the motor
vehicle account--state appropriation is provided solely for costs
incurred by the department for the 2007 regional transportation
investment district election.
(2) $300,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a transportation demand management
program, developed by the Whatcom council of governments, to further
reduce drive-alone trips and maximize the use of sustainable
transportation choices. The community-based program must focus on all
trips, not only commute trips, by providing education, assistance, and
incentives to four target audiences: (a) Large work sites; (b)
employees of businesses in downtown areas; (c) school children; and (d)
residents of Bellingham.
(3) $320,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation and
$128,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation are
provided solely for development of a freight database to help guide
freight investment decisions and track project effectiveness. The
database will be based on truck movement tracked through geographic
information system technology. TransNow will contribute an additional
$192,000 in federal funds which are not appropriated in the
transportation budget. The department shall work with the freight
mobility strategic investment board to implement this project.
(4) By December 1, 2008, the department shall require confirmation
from jurisdictions that plan under the growth management act, chapter
36.70A RCW, and that receive state transportation funding under this
act, that the jurisdictions have adopted standards for access
permitting on state highways that meet or exceed department standards
in accordance with RCW 47.50.030. The objective of this subsection is
to encourage local governments, through the receipt of state
transportation funding, to adhere to best practices in access control
applicable to development activity significantly impacting state
transportation facilities. By January 1, 2009, the department shall
submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature
detailing the progress of the local jurisdictions in adopting the
highway access permitting standards.
(5) $150,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation is
provided solely for the costs to develop an electronic map-based
computer application that will enable law enforcement officers and
others to more easily locate collisions and other incidents in the
field.
(6) The department shall add a position within the freight systems
division to provide expertise regarding the trucking aspects of the
state's freight system.
(7) The department shall evaluate the feasibility of developing a
freight corridor bypass from Everett to Gold Bar on US 2, including a
connection to SR 522. US 2 is an important freight corridor, and is an
alternative route for I-90. Congestion, safety issues, and flooding
concerns have all contributed to the need for major improvements to the
corridor. The evaluation shall consider the use of toll lanes for the
project. The department must report to the transportation committees
of the legislature by December 1, 2007, on its analysis and
recommendations regarding the benefit of a freight corridor and the
potential use of freight toll lanes to improve safety and congestion in
the corridor.

Sec. 221 2007 c 518 s 223 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- CHARGES FROM OTHER AGENCIES--PROGRAM U
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($66,342,000))
$66,102,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $259,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($67,001,000))
$66,761,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $36,665,000 of the motor vehicle fund -- state appropriation is
provided solely for the liabilities attributable to the department of
transportation. The office of financial management must provide a
detailed accounting of the revenues and expenditures of the self-insurance fund to the transportation committees of the legislature on
December 31st and June 30th of each year.
(2) Payments in this section represent charges from other state
agencies to the department of transportation.
(a) FOR PAYMENT OF OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
DIVISION OF RISK MANAGEMENT FEES . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,520,000
(b) FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE OFFICE OF THE STATE
AUDITOR . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,150,000))
$1,153,000
(c) FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION FACILITIES AND SERVICES AND CONSOLIDATED
MAIL SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,157,000))
$4,859,000
(d) FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF
PERSONNEL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,033,000))
$7,593,000
(e) FOR PAYMENT OF SELF-INSURANCE LIABILITY
PREMIUMS AND ADMINISTRATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,665,000
(f) FOR PAYMENT OF THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION CAPITAL PROJECTS SURCHARGE . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,838,000
(g) FOR ARCHIVES AND RECORDS MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . (($647,000))
$677,000
(h) FOR OFFICE OF MINORITIES AND WOMEN BUSINESS
ENTERPRISES . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,070,000))
$1,042,000
(i) FOR USE OF FINANCIAL SYSTEMS PROVIDED BY
THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . (($930,000))
$966,000
(j) FOR POLICY ASSISTANCE FROM THE DEPARTMENT
OF INFORMATION SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,138,000))
$945,000
(k) FOR LEGAL SERVICE PROVIDED BY THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL'S OFFICE . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,859,000))
$9,045,000
(l) FOR LEGAL SERVICE PROVIDED BY THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL'S OFFICE FOR THE SECOND PHASE OF THE BOLDT
LITIGATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $158,000

Sec. 222 2007 c 518 s 224 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION -- PROGRAM
V
Regional Mobility Grant Program Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($85,202,000))
$85,507,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,582,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($291,000))
$659,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($128,075,000))
$128,748,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $25,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for a grant program for special needs
transportation provided by transit agencies and nonprofit providers of
transportation.
(a) $5,500,000 of the amount provided in this subsection is
provided solely for grants to nonprofit providers of special needs
transportation. Grants for nonprofit providers shall be based on need,
including the availability of other providers of service in the area,
efforts to coordinate trips among providers and riders, and the cost
effectiveness of trips provided.
(b) $19,500,000 of the amount provided in this subsection is
provided solely for grants to transit agencies to transport persons
with special transportation needs. To receive a grant, the transit
agency must have a maintenance of effort for special needs
transportation that is no less than the previous year's maintenance of
effort for special needs transportation. Grants for transit agencies
shall be prorated based on the amount expended for demand response
service and route deviated service in calendar year 2005 as reported in
the "Summary of Public Transportation - 2005" published by the
department of transportation. No transit agency may receive more than
thirty percent of these distributions.
(2) Funds are provided for the rural mobility grant program as
follows:
(a) $8,500,000 of the multimodal transportation account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for grants for those transit systems
serving small cities and rural areas as identified in the Summary of
Public Transportation - 2005 published by the department of
transportation. Noncompetitive grants must be distributed to the
transit systems serving small cities and rural areas in a manner
similar to past disparity equalization programs.
(b) $8,500,000 of the multimodal transportation account -- state
appropriation is provided solely to providers of rural mobility service
in areas not served or underserved by transit agencies through a
competitive grant process.
(3) $8,600,000 of the multimodal transportation account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for a vanpool grant program for: (a)
Public transit agencies to add vanpools; and (b) incentives for
employers to increase employee vanpool use. The grant program for
public transit agencies will cover capital costs only; no operating
costs for public transit agencies are eligible for funding under this
grant program. No additional employees may be hired from the funds
provided in this section for the vanpool grant program, and supplanting
of transit funds currently funding vanpools is not allowed. Additional
criteria for selecting grants must include leveraging funds other than
state funds.
(4) $40,000,000 of the regional mobility grant program account--state appropriation is provided solely for the regional mobility grant
projects identified on the LEAP Transportation Document 2007-B as
developed April 20, 2007. The department shall review all projects
receiving grant awards under this program at least semiannually to
determine whether the projects are making satisfactory progress. Any
project that has been awarded funds, but does not report activity on
the project within one year of the grant award, shall be reviewed by
the department to determine whether the grant should be terminated.
The department shall promptly close out grants when projects have been
completed, and any remaining funds available to the office of transit
mobility shall be used only to fund projects on the LEAP Transportation
Document 2007-B as developed April 20, 2007. The department shall
provide annual status reports on December 15, 2007, and December 15,
2008, to the office of financial management and the transportation
committees of the legislature regarding the projects receiving the
grants.
(5) $17,168,087 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is reappropriated and provided solely for the regional
mobility grant projects identified on the LEAP Transportation Document
2006-D, regional mobility grant program projects as developed March 8,
2006. The department shall continue to review all projects receiving
grant awards under this program at least semiannually to determine
whether the projects are making satisfactory progress. The department
shall promptly close out grants when projects have been completed, and
any remaining funds available to the office of transit mobility shall
be used only to fund projects on the LEAP Transportation Document
2007-B as developed April 20, 2007, or the LEAP Transportation Document
2006-D as developed March 8, 2006.
(6) $200,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the department to study and then
develop pilot programs aimed at addressing commute trip reduction
strategies for K-12 students and for college and university students.
The department shall submit to the legislature by January 1, 2009, a
summary of the program results and recommendations for future student
commute trip reduction strategies. The pilot programs are described as
follows:
(a) The department shall consider approaches, including mobility
education, to reducing and removing traffic congestion in front of
schools by changing travel behavior for elementary, middle, and high
school students and their parents; and
(b) The department shall design a program that includes student
employment options as part of the pilot program applicable to college
and university students.
(7) $2,400,000 of the multimodal account--state appropriation is
provided solely for establishing growth and transportation efficiency
centers (GTEC). Funds are appropriated for one time only. The
department shall provide in its annual report to the legislature an
evaluation of the GTEC concept and recommendations on future funding
levels.
(8) $381,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute
House Bill No. 1694 (reauthorizing the agency council on coordinated
transportation). If Substitute House Bill No. 1694 is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(9) (($136,000)) $504,000 of the multimodal transportation
account--private/local appropriation is provided solely for the
implementation of Senate Bill No. 5084 (updating rail transit safety
plans). If Senate Bill No. 5084 is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(10) $60,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for low-income car ownership programs.
The department shall collaborate with interested regional
transportation planning organizations and metropolitan planning
organizations to determine the effectiveness of the programs at
providing transportation solutions for low-income persons who depend
upon cars to travel to their places of employment.
(11) $1,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for additional funding for the trip
reduction performance program, including telework enhancement projects.
Funds are appropriated for one time only.
(12) $2,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the tri-county connection service
for Island, Skagit, and Whatcom transit agencies.
(13) $135,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for dedicated staff to provide
technical expertise to support the department and the climate advisory
team in the development of climate change strategies.
(14) $225,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the commute trip reduction
program. The department shall work with the commute trip reduction
board to provide grants to car-sharing organizations for the benefit of
their members for the purpose of reducing congestion and improving air
quality.

Sec. 223 2007 c 518 s 225 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- MARINE -- PROGRAM X
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($412,189,000))
$427,954,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,830,000))
$1,914,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($414,019,000))
$429,868,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($79,191,000)) $90,299,000 of the Puget Sound ferry
operations--state appropriation is provided solely for auto ferry
vessel operating fuel in the 2007-2009 biennium.
(2) The Washington state ferries must work with the department's
information technology division to implement an electronic fare system,
including the integration of the regional fare coordination system
(smart card). Each December and June, semiannual updates must be
provided to the transportation committees of the legislature concerning
the status of implementing and completing this project, with updates
concluding the first December after full project implementation.
(3) The Washington state ferries shall continue to provide service
to Sidney, British Columbia.
(4) (($1,830,000)) $1,914,000 of the multimodal transportation
account--state appropriation is provided solely to provide
passenger-only ferry service. The ferry system shall continue
passenger-only ferry service from Vashon Island to Seattle through June
30, 2008. Ferry system management shall continue to implement its
agreement with the inlandboatmen's union of the pacific and the
international organization of masters, mates and pilots providing for
part-time passenger-only work schedules.
(5) $932,000 of the Puget Sound ferries operations account--state
appropriation is provided solely for compliance with department of
ecology rules regarding the transfer of oil on or near state waters.
Funding for compliance with on-board fueling rules is provided for the
2008 fiscal year. The department may request funding for the 2009
fiscal year if the request is submitted with an alternative compliance
plan filed with the department of ecology, as allowed by rule.
(6) $1,116,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account--state
appropriation is provided solely for ferry security operations
necessary to comply with the ferry security plan submitted by the
Washington state ferry system to the United States coast guard. The
department shall track security costs and expenditures. Ferry security
operations costs shall not be included as part of the operational costs
that are used to calculate farebox recovery.
(7) $378,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account--state
appropriation is provided solely to meet the United States coast guard
requirements for appropriate rest hours between shifts for vessel crews
on the Bainbridge to Seattle and Edmonds to Kingston ferry routes.
(8) $694,000 of the Puget Sound ferries operating account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementing Engrossed Substitute
House Bill No. 2358 as follows:
(a) The department shall allow the joint transportation committee
workgroup established in section 205(1) of this act to participate in
the following elements as they are described in Engrossed Substitute
House Bill No. 2358:
(i) Development and implementation of a survey of ferry customers;
(ii) Analysis and reestablishment of vehicle level of service
standards. In reestablishing the standards, consideration shall be
given to whether boat wait is the appropriate measure. The level of
service standard shall be reestablished in conjunction with or after
the survey has been implemented;
(iii) Development of pricing policy proposals. In developing these
policies, the policies, in effect on some routes, of collecting fares
in only one direction shall be evaluated to determine whether one-way
fare pricing best serves the ferry system. The pricing policy
proposals must be developed in conjunction with or after the survey has
been implemented;
(iv) Development of operational strategies. The operational
strategies shall be reestablished in conjunction with the survey or
after the survey has been implemented;
(v) Development of terminal design standards. The terminal design
standards shall be finalized after the provisions of subsections (a)(i)
through (iv) and subsection (b) of this section have been developed and
reviewed by the joint transportation committee; and
(vi) Development of a capital plan. The capital plan shall be
finalized after terminal design standards have been developed by the
department and reviewed by the joint transportation committee.
(b) The department shall develop a ridership demand forecast that
shall be used in the development of a long-range capital plan. If more
than one forecast is developed they must be reconciled.
(c) The department shall update the life cycle cost model to meet
the requirements of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2358 no later
than August 1, 2007.
(d) The department shall develop a cost allocation methodology
proposal to meet the requirements described in Engrossed Substitute
House Bill No. 2358. The proposal shall be completed and presented to
the joint transportation committee no later than August 1, 2007.
(9) $200,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the initial acquisition of
transportation worker identification credentials required by the United
States department of homeland security for unescorted access to secure
areas of ferries and terminals.

Sec. 224 2007 c 518 s 226 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- RAIL -- PROGRAM Y--OPERATING
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($37,034,000))
$37,012,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department shall publish a final long-range plan for Amtrak
Cascades by September 30, 2007. By December 31, 2008, the department
shall submit to the office of financial management and the
transportation committees of the legislature a midrange plan for Amtrak
Cascades that identifies specific steps the department would propose to
achieve additional service beyond current levels.
(2)(a) $29,091,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the Amtrak service contract and
Talgo maintenance contract associated with providing and maintaining
the state-supported passenger rail service. Upon completion of the
rail platform project in the city of Stanwood, the department shall
provide daily Amtrak Cascades service to the city.
(b) The department shall negotiate with Amtrak and Burlington
Northern Santa Fe to adjust the Amtrak Cascades schedule to leave
Bellingham at a significantly earlier hour.
(c) When Amtrak Cascades expands the second roundtrip between
Vancouver, B.C. and Seattle, the department shall negotiate for the
second roundtrip to leave Bellingham southbound no later than 8:30 a.m.
(3) No Amtrak Cascade runs may be eliminated.
(4) $40,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the produce railcar program. The
department is encouraged to implement the produce railcar program by
maximizing private investment.
(5) The department shall begin planning for a third roundtrip
Cascades train between Seattle and Vancouver, B.C. by 2010.

Sec. 225 2007 c 518 s 227 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z--OPERATING
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,630,000))
$8,745,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,567,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,197,000))
$11,312,000

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES -- CAPITAL
Sec. 301 2007 c 518 s 302 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD
Rural Arterial Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $64,000,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,368,000))
$2,370,000
County Arterial Preservation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($32,861,000))
$32,641,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($99,229,000))
$99,011,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: (($2,069,000)) $2,370,000 of the motor
vehicle account--state appropriation may be used for county ((ferries.
The board shall review the requests for county ferry funding in
consideration with other projects funded from the board. If the board
determines these projects are a priority over the projects in the rural
arterial and county arterial preservation grant programs, then they may
provide funding for these requests)) ferry projects as set forth in RCW
47.56.725(4).

Sec. 302 2007 c 518 s 303 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD
Small City Pavement and Sidewalk Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000
Urban Arterial Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($129,600,000))
$128,000,000
Transportation Improvement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($90,643,000))
$87,143,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($224,743,000))
$219,643,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The transportation improvement account -- state appropriation
includes up to $7,143,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized
in RCW 47.26.500.
(2) The urban arterial trust account--state appropriation includes
up to $15,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in
Substitute House Bill No. 2394. If Substitute House Bill No. 2394 is
not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.

Sec. 303 2007 c 518 s 304 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- PROGRAM D (DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS) -- CAPITAL
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,202,000))
$7,157,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $584,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
for statewide administration.
(2) (($750,000)) $803,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is for regional minor projects.
(3) $568,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
for the Olympic region headquarters property payments.
(4) By September 1, 2007, the department shall submit to the
transportation committees of the legislature predesign plans, developed
using the office of financial management's predesign process, for all
facility replacement projects to be proposed in the facilities 2008
budget proposal.
(5) $1,600,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
for site acquisition for the Tri-cities area maintenance facility.
(6) $2,700,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
for site acquisition for the Vancouver light industrial facility.
(7) The department shall work with the office of financial
management and staff of the transportation committees of the
legislature to develop a statewide inventory of all department-owned
surplus property that is suitable for development for department
facilities or that should be sold. By December 1, 2008, the department
shall report to the joint transportation committee on the findings of
this study.
(8) $902,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
for project D399311 as identified in the governor's 2008 supplemental
project list to reimburse the miscellaneous transportation programs
account for expenditures for the proposed Olympic region headquarters
complex that were incurred in the 2005-07 biennium.

Sec. 304 2007 c 518 s 305 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- IMPROVEMENTS -- PROGRAM I
Transportation Partnership Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,226,516,000))
$1,234,581,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($82,045,000))
$82,555,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($404,090,000))
$437,537,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($49,157,000))
$61,115,000
Special Category C Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($29,968,000))
$29,125,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $86,100,000
Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($142,484,000))
$32,277,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account) -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,100,746,000))
$1,137,721,000
Freight Congestion Relief Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000
Freight Mobility Multimodal Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $208,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,075,006,000))
$3,141,219,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire
transportation 2003 account (nickel account) appropriation and the
entire transportation partnership account appropriation are provided
solely for the projects and activities as listed by fund, project, and
amount in ((LEAP Transportation Document 2007-1)) the governor's 2008
supplemental project list, Highway Improvement Program (I) as developed
((April 20, 2007)) December 18, 2007. However, limited transfers of
specific line-item project appropriations may occur between projects
for those amounts listed subject to the conditions and limitations in
section 603 of this act.
(2) The department shall not commence construction on any part of
the state route number 520 bridge replacement and HOV project until a
record of decision has been reached providing reasonable assurance that
project impacts will be avoided, minimized, or mitigated as much as
practicable to protect against further adverse impacts on neighborhood
environmental quality as a result of repairs and improvements made to
the state route 520 bridge and its connecting roadways, and that any
such impacts will be addressed through engineering design choices,
mitigation measures, or a combination of both. The requirements of
this section shall not apply to off-site pontoon construction
supporting the state route number 520 bridge replacement and HOV
project.
(3) Within the amounts provided in this section, (($1,991,000))
$1,895,000 of the transportation partnership account--state
appropriation, (($1,656,000)) $2,147,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation, and (($8,343,000)) $10,331,000 of the
transportation 2003 account (nickel account)--state appropriation are
for project 109040T as identified in the ((LEAP transportation
document)) governor's 2008 supplemental project list in subsection (1)
of this section: I-90/Two Way Transit-Transit and HOV Improvements -Stage 1. Expenditure of the funds on construction is contingent upon
revising the access plan for Mercer Island traffic such that Mercer
Island traffic will have access to the outer roadway high occupancy
vehicle (HOV) lanes during the period of operation of such lanes
following the removal of Mercer Island traffic from the center roadway
and prior to conversion of the outer roadway HOV lanes to high
occupancy toll (HOT) lanes. Sound transit may only have access to the
center lanes when alternative R8A is complete.
(4) The Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account -- state appropriation
includes up to (($131,016,000)) $19,133,000 in proceeds from the sale
of bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843.
(5) The funding described in this section includes (($8,095,541))
$24,575,670 of the transportation 2003 account (nickel account)--state
appropriation, $5,950,001 of the transportation partnership account--state appropriation, and $237,241 of the motor vehicle account--private/local appropriation, which are for the SR 519 project. The
total project is expected to cost no more than $74,400,000 ((including
$11,950,000 in contributions from project partners)).
(6) To promote and support community-specific noise reduction
solutions, the department shall:
(a) Prepare a draft directive that establishes how each community's
priorities and concerns may be identified and addressed in order to
allow consideration of a community's preferred methods of advanced
visual shielding and aesthetic screening, for the purpose of improving
the noise environment of major state roadway projects in locations that
do not meet the criteria for standard noise barriers. The intent is
for these provisions to be supportable by existing project budgets.
The directive shall also include direction on the coordination and
selection of visual and aesthetic options with local communities. The
draft directive shall be provided to the standing transportation
committees of the legislature by January 2008; and
(b) Pilot the draft directive established in (a) of this subsection
in two locations along major state roadways. If practicable, the
department should begin work on the pilot projects while the directive
is being developed. One pilot project shall be located in Clark county
on a significant capacity improvement project. The second pilot
project shall be located in urban King county, which shall be on a
corridor highway project through mixed land use areas that is nearing
or under construction. The department shall provide a written report
to the standing transportation committees of the legislature on the
findings of the Clark county pilot project by January 2009, and the
King county pilot project by January 2010. Based on results of the
pilot projects, the department shall update its design manual,
environmental procedures, or other appropriate documents to incorporate
the directive.
(((8))) (7) If the "Green Highway" provisions of Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1303 (cleaner energy) are enacted, the
department shall erect signs on the interstate highways included in
those provisions noting that these interstates have been designated
"Washington Green Highways."
(((9))) (8) If on the I-405/I-90 to SE 8th Street Widening project
the department finds that there is an alternative investment to
preserve reliable rail accessibility to major manufacturing sites
within the I-405 corridor that are less expensive than replacing the
Wilburton Tunnel, the department may enter into the necessary
agreements to implement that alternative provided that costs remain
within the approved project budget.
(((11))) (9) The department shall apply for surface transportation
program (STP) enhancement funds to be expended in lieu of or in
addition to state funds for eligible costs of projects in Programs I
and P, including, but not limited to, the SR 518, SR 519, SR 520, and
Alaskan Way Viaduct projects.
(((12))) (10) $250,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is provided solely for an inland pacific hub study to
develop an inland corridor for the movement of freight and goods to and
through eastern Washington; and $500,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is provided solely for the SR3/SR16 corridor study
to plan and prioritize state and local improvements needed over the
next 10-20 years to support safety, capacity development, and economic
development within the corridor.
(((13))) (11) The department shall, on a quarterly basis beginning
July 1, 2007, provide to the office of financial management and the
legislature reports providing the status on each active project funded
in part or whole by the transportation 2003 account (nickel account) or
the transportation partnership account. Funding provided at a
programmatic level for transportation partnership account and
transportation 2003 account (nickel account) projects relating to
bridge rail, guard rail, fish passage barrier removal, and roadside
safety projects should be reported on a programmatic basis. Projects
within this programmatic level funding should be completed on a
priority basis and scoped to be completed within the current
programmatic budget. Other projects may be reported on a programmatic
basis. The department shall work with the office of financial
management and the transportation committees of the legislature to
agree on report formatting and elements. Elements shall include, but
not be limited to, project scope, schedule, and costs. The department
shall also provide the information required under this subsection on a
quarterly basis via the transportation executive information systems
(TEIS).
(((14))) (12) The department shall apply for the competitive
portion of federal transit administration funds for eligible transit-related costs of the SR 520 bridge replacement and HOV project. The
federal funds described in this subsection shall not include those
federal transit administration funds distributed by formula.
(((15))) (13) Funding provided by this act for the Alaskan Way
Viaduct project shall not be spent for preliminary engineering, design,
right-of-way acquisition, or construction on the project if completion
of the project would more likely than not reduce the capacity of the
facility. Capacity shall be measured by including the consideration of
the efficient movement of people and goods on the facility.
(((16))) (14) The governor shall convene a collaborative process
involving key leaders to determine the final project design for the
Alaskan Way Viaduct.
(a) The process shall be guided by the following common principles:
Public safety must be maintained; the final project shall meet both
capacity and mobility needs; and taxpayer dollars must be spent
responsibly.
(b) The state's project expenditures shall not exceed
$2,800,000,000.
(c) A final design decision shall be made by December 31, 2008.
(((17))) (15) During the 2007-09 biennium, the department shall
proceed with a series of projects on the Alaskan Way Viaduct that are
common to any design alternative. Those projects include relocation of
two electrical transmission lines, Battery Street tunnel upgrades,
seismic upgrades from Lenora to the Battery Street tunnel, viaduct
removal from Holgate to King Street, and development of transit
enhancements and other improvements to mitigate congestion during
construction.
(((18))) (16) The entire freight congestion relief account--state
appropriation is contingent upon the enactment during the 2007-2009
fiscal biennium of a bill, resulting from the study established in
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5207, that makes available funding to
support project expenditures funded from the freight congestion relief
account created in Substitute Senate Bill No. 5207. If such a funding
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the entire freight congestion
relief account--state appropriation shall lapse.
(((19))) (17) The transportation 2003 account (nickel account)--state appropriation includes up to (($874,610,000)) $872,610,000 in
proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.861.
(((20))) (18) The transportation partnership account--state
appropriation includes up to (($900,000,000)) $902,500,000 in proceeds
from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.873.
(((21))) (19) The special category C account--state appropriation
includes up to (($22,080,000)) $21,497,000 in proceeds from the sale of
bonds authorized in Substitute House Bill No. 2394. If Substitute
House Bill No. 2394 is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((22))) (20) $4,500,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal
appropriation is provided solely for cost increases on the SR
304/Bremerton tunnel project.
(((23) $3,000,000)) (21) $2,071,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is provided solely for initial design and right of
way work on a new southbound SR 509 to eastbound SR 518 freeway-to-freeway elevated ramp.
(((24))) (22) $500,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal
appropriation to the SR 543/I-5 to Canadian border project is provided
solely for retaining wall facia improvements.
(((25) $1,400,000)) (23) $1,334,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation is provided solely for the Westview school noise
wall.
(((26))) (24) $1,600,000 of the motor vehicle account--((federal))
state appropriation is provided solely for two noise walls on SR 161 in
King county.
(((27))) (25) $900,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation and $100,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal
appropriation are provided solely for interchange design and planning
work on US 12 at A street and tank farm road.
(26) The funding described in this section includes $19,938,892 of
the transportation partnership account--state appropriation, $28,623 of
the motor vehicle account--state appropriation, $308,000 of the motor
vehicle account--private/local appropriation, and $2,899,917 of the
motor vehicle account--federal appropriation for the I-5/Columbia river
crossing/Vancouver project. Future funding will include up to
$15,000,000 awarded to Washington and Oregon jointly through the U.S.
department of transportation corridors of the future program in the
2007 federal highway authority discretionary fund allocations.
(27) The department shall study any outstanding issues, including
financial issues that may apply to the I-5/Columbia river
crossing/Vancouver project. The department's efforts must include an
analysis of current bi-state efforts in planning, coordination, and
funding for the project; opportunities for the joining of state and
local government agencies and the private sector in a strong
partnership that contributes to the completion of the project; and
opportunities to work with the congressional delegations of Oregon and
Washington to provide federal funding and other assistance that will
advance this project of national and regional significance.
(28) The department shall conduct a study to determine the
feasibility of administering tolls on the US 395 North Spokane
corridor. The study findings must include the potential revenue that
could be generated by tolling all lanes on the corridor and the
potential revenue and traffic benefits that could be provided by truck-only toll lanes on the corridor. The department shall report its
findings to the governor and the transportation committees of the
legislature by June 1, 2009.

Sec. 305 2007 c 518 s 306 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- PRESERVATION -- PROGRAM P
Transportation Partnership Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($220,164,000))
$181,666,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($71,392,000))
$93,173,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($425,161,000))
$455,379,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,285,000))
$18,138,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account) -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,122,000))
$11,136,000
Puyallup Tribal Settlement Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,000,000))
$12,500,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($748,124,000))
$771,992,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire
transportation 2003 account (nickel account) appropriation and the
entire transportation partnership account appropriation are provided
solely for the projects and activities as listed by fund, project, and
amount in ((LEAP Transportation Document 2007-1)) the governor's 2008
supplemental project list, Highway Preservation Program (P) as
developed ((April 20, 2007)) December 18, 2007. However, limited
transfers of specific line-item project appropriations may occur
between projects for those amounts listed subject to the conditions and
limitations in section 603 of this act.
(2) (($295,000)) $287,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal
appropriation and (($5,000)) $11,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation are provided solely for the department to
((determine the most cost efficient way to)) replace the current Keller
ferry. ((Options reviewed shall not include an expansion of the
current capacity of the Keller ferry.))
(3) (($5,513,000)) $5,308,000 of the transportation partnership
account--state appropriation is provided solely for the purposes of
settling all identified and potential claims from the Lower Elwha
Klallam Tribe related to the construction of a graving dock facility on
the graving dock property. In the matter of Lower Elwha Klallam Tribe
et al v. State et al, Thurston county superior court, cause no.
05-2-01595-8, the Lower Elwha Klallam Tribe and the state of Washington
entered into a settlement agreement that settles all claims related to
graving dock property and associated construction and releases the
state from all claims related to the construction of the graving dock
facilities. The expenditure of this appropriation is contingent on the
conditions and limitations set forth in subsections (a) and (b) of this
subsection.
(a) $2,000,000 of the transportation partnership account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the benefit of the Lower Elwha
Klallam Tribe to be disbursed by the department in accordance with
terms and conditions of the settlement agreement.
(b) (($3,513,000)) $3,309,000 of the transportation partnership
account--state appropriation is provided solely for the department's
remediation work on the graving dock property in accordance with the
terms and conditions of the settlement agreement.
(4) The department shall apply for surface transportation program
(STP) enhancement funds to be expended in lieu of or in addition to
state funds for eligible costs of projects in Programs I and P,
including, but not limited to, the SR 518, SR 519, SR 520, and Alaskan
Way Viaduct projects.
(5) The department shall, on a quarterly basis beginning July 1,
2007, provide to the office of financial management and the legislature
reports providing the status on each active project funded in part or
whole by the transportation 2003 account (nickel account) or the
transportation partnership account. Funding provided at a programmatic
level for transportation partnership account projects relating to
seismic bridges should be reported on a programmatic basis. Projects
within this programmatic level funding should be completed on a
priority basis and scoped to be completed within the current
programmatic budget. Other projects may be reported on a programmatic
basis. The department shall work with the office of financial
management and the transportation committees of the legislature to
agree on report formatting and elements. Elements shall include, but
not be limited to, project scope, schedule, and costs. The department
shall also provide the information required under this subsection on a
quarterly basis via the transportation executive information systems
(TEIS).
(6) The department of transportation shall continue to implement
the lowest life cycle cost planning approach to pavement management
throughout the state to encourage the most effective and efficient use
of pavement preservation funds. Emphasis should be placed on
increasing the number of roads addressed on time and reducing the
number of roads past due.
(7) (($2,604,501)) $4,600,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal
appropriation and (($3,000,000)) $10,358,000 of the motor vehicle
account--state appropriation are for expenditures on damaged state
roads due to flooding, mudslides, rock fall, or other unforeseen
events.
(8) (($9,665)) $188,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation, (($12,652,812)) $28,749,000 of the motor vehicle
account--federal appropriation, and (($138,174,581)) $105,653,000 of
the transportation partnership account--state appropriation are
provided solely for the Hood Canal bridge project.
(9) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes up to
$3,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW
47.10.843.

Sec. 306 2007 c 518 s 307 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- TRAFFIC OPERATIONS -- PROGRAM Q--CAPITAL
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,212,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,951,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $74,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,237,000

((The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The motor vehicle account--state
appropriation includes $8,833,000 provided solely for state matching
funds for federally selected competitive grant or congressional earmark
projects. These moneys shall be placed into reserve status until such
time as federal funds are secured that require a state match.))

Sec. 307 2007 c 518 s 308 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES
CONSTRUCTION -- PROGRAM W
Puget Sound Capital Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($139,139,000))
$114,108,000
Puget Sound Capital Construction Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($66,145,000))
$46,076,000
Puget Sound Capital Construction Account--
Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,100,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account) -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($76,525,000))
$59,469,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($285,909,000))
$223,779,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($6,432,000)) $13,484,000 of the Puget Sound capital
construction account--state appropriation is provided ((solely for
emergency capital costs)) for project 944470A as identified in the
governor's 2008 supplemental project list for the construction of three
marine vessels to replace the aging vessels currently operating on the
Port Townsend-Keystone ferry route. The governor's 2008 supplemental
project list includes a total of $100,000,000 for vessel replacement
and related expenses, incurred over a period of time.
(2) (($16,567,000)) $18,363,000 of the Puget Sound capital
construction account--state appropriation and $4,100,000 of the
multimodal transportation account--state appropriation are provided
solely for the terminal projects listed:
(a) Anacortes ferry terminal - utilities work; right-of-way
purchase for a holding area during construction; and completion of
design and permitting on the terminal building, pick-up and drop-off
sites, and pedestrian and bicycle facilities;
(b) Bainbridge Island ferry terminal - environmental planning and
a traffic signalization project in the vicinity of SR 305 Harborview
drive;
(c) Bremerton ferry terminal - overhead loading control system and
moving the terminal agent's office;
(d) Clinton ferry terminal - septic system replacement;
(e) Edmonds ferry terminal - right-of-way acquisition costs and
federal match requirements;
(f) Friday Harbor ferry terminal - parking resurfacing;
(g) Keystone and Port Townsend ferry terminals - route
environmental planning;
(h) Kingston ferry terminal - transfer span retrofit and overhead
vehicle holding control system modifications;
(i) Mukilteo ferry terminal - right-of-way acquisition,
archeological studies, and environmental planning;
(j) Port Townsend ferry terminal - wingwall replacement;
(k) Seattle ferry terminal - environmental planning, coordination
with local jurisdictions, and coordination with highway projects; and
(l) Vashon Island and Seattle ferry terminals - modify the
passenger-only facilities.
(((4) $76,525,000)) (3) $46,021,000 of the transportation 2003
account (nickel account)--state appropriation and (($50,985,000))
$3,750,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account--((state))
federal appropriation are provided solely for the procurement of
((four)) 144-vehicle auto-passenger ferry vessels.
(((5))) (4) $18,716,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction
account--state appropriation is provided solely for the Eagle Harbor
maintenance facility preservation project. These funds may not be used
for relocating any warehouses not currently on the Eagle Harbor site.
(((6))) (5) The department shall research an asset management
system to improve Washington state ferries' management of capital
assets and the department's ability to estimate future preservation
needs. The department shall report its findings regarding a new asset
management system to the governor and the transportation committees of
the legislature no later than January 15, 2008.
(((7))) (6) The department shall sell the M.V. Chinook and M.V.
Snohomish passenger-only fast ferries as soon as practicable and
deposit the proceeds of the sales into the passenger ferry account
created in RCW 47.60.645. Once the department ceases to provide
passenger-only ferry service, the department shall sell the M.V. Kalama
and M.V. Skagit passenger-only ferries and deposit the proceeds of the
sales into the passenger ferry account created in RCW 47.60.645.
(((8))) (7) The department shall, on a quarterly basis beginning
July 1, 2007, provide to the office of financial management and the
legislature reports providing the status on each project listed in this
section and in the project lists submitted pursuant to this act and on
any additional projects for which the department has expended funds
during the 2007-09 fiscal biennium. Elements shall include, but not be
limited to, project scope, schedule, and costs. The department shall
also provide the information required under this subsection via the
transportation executive information systems (TEIS).
(8) The department of transportation is authorized to sell up to
$30,964,000 in bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843 for vessel and
terminal acquisition, major and minor improvements, and long lead-time
materials acquisition for the Washington state ferries.
(9) The Puget Sound capital construction account--state
appropriation includes up to $17,841,000 in unexpended proceeds from
the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.843.

Sec. 308 2007 c 518 s 309 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- RAIL -- PROGRAM Y -- CAPITAL
Essential Rail Assistance Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Freight Congestion Relief Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000
Transportation Infrastructure Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,500,000))
$3,500,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($154,637,000))
$163,269,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($30,450,000))
$36,512,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,894,000))
$8,210,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($220,981,000))
$236,991,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) Except as provided otherwise in ((subsection (8) of)) this
section, the entire appropriations in this section are provided solely
for the projects and activities as listed by fund, project, and amount
in ((LEAP Transportation Document 2007-1)) the governor's 2008
supplemental project list, Rail Capital Program (Y) as developed
((April 20, 2007)) December 18, 2007. However, limited transfers of
specific line-item project appropriations may occur between projects
for those amounts listed subject to the conditions and limitations in
section 603 of this act.
(b) Within the amounts provided in this section, $2,500,000 of the
transportation infrastructure account--state appropriation is for low-interest loans for rail capital projects through the freight rail
investment bank program. The department shall issue a call for
projects based upon the legislative priorities specified in subsection
(7)(a) of this section. Application must be received by the department
by November 1, 2007. By December 1, 2007, the department shall submit
a prioritized list of recommended projects to the office of financial
management and the transportation committees of the legislature.
(c) Within the amounts provided in this section, $3,335,000 of the
multimodal transportation account--state appropriation is for statewide
- emergent freight rail assistance projects. However, the department
shall perform a cost/benefit analysis of the projects according to the
legislative priorities specified in subsection (7)(a) of this section,
and shall give priority to the following projects: Rail - Tacoma rail
yard switching upgrades ($500,000); Rail - Port of Ephrata spur
rehabilitation ($127,000); Rail - Lewis and Clark rail improvements
($1,100,000); Rail - Port of Grays Harbor rail access improvements
($543,000); Rail - Port of Longview rail loop construction ($291,000);
and Rail - Port of Chehalis ($774,000). If the relative cost of any of
the six projects identified in this subsection (1)(c) is not
substantially less than the public benefits to be derived from the
project, then the department shall not assign the funds to the project,
and instead shall use those funds toward those projects identified by
the department in the attachments to the "Washington State Department
of Transportation FREIGHT RAIL ASSISTANCE FUNDING PROGRAM: 2007-2009
Prioritized Project List and Program Update" dated December 2006 for
which the proportion of public benefits to be gained compared to the
cost of the project is greatest.
(d) Within the amounts provided in this section, $25,000,000 of the
freight congestion relief account--state appropriation is for
modifications to the Stampede Pass rail tunnel to facilitate the
movement of double stacked rail cars. The department shall quantify
and report to the legislature by December 1, 2007, the volume of
freight traffic that would likely be shipped by rail rather than trucks
if the Stampede Pass rail tunnel were modified to accommodate double
stacked rail cars.
(e) Within the amounts provided in this section, (($200,000))
$339,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state appropriation
is for rescoping and completion of a programmatic EIS for the Kelso to
Martin's Bluff - 3rd Mainline and Storage Tracks project. The rescoped
project may include funds that are committed to the project by local or
private funding partners. However, the rescoped project must be
capable of being completed with not more than $49,470,000 in future
state funding. Subject to this funding constraint, the rescoped
project must maximize capacity improvements along the rail mainline.
(f) Within the amounts provided in this section, (($3,600,000))
$5,200,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for work items on the Palouse River
and Coulee City Railroad lines.
(g) Within the amounts provided in this section, $2,218,000 of the
multimodal transportation account--state appropriation is provided
solely for the costs of acquisition of the Palouse River and Coulee
City (PCC) rail line system associated with the memorandum of
understanding (MOU), which was executed between Washington state and
Watco. Total costs associated with the MOU shall not exceed
$10,937,000.
(h) Within the amounts provided in this section, $1,000,000 of the
transportation infrastructure account--state is provided solely for
grants to any intergovernmental entity or local rail district to which
operating rights for the PCC rail line system (including the CW, P&L,
and PV Hooper rail lines) are assigned, provided that the funds are
used only to refurbish the rail lines.
(2) The multimodal transportation account--state appropriation
includes up to (($137,620,000)) $149,966,000 in proceeds from the sale
of bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.867.
(3) The department is directed to seek the use of unprogrammed
federal rail crossing funds to be expended in lieu of or in addition to
state funds for eligible costs of projects in Program Y, including, but
not limited to the "Tacoma -- bypass of Pt. Defiance" project.
(4) If new federal funding for freight or passenger rail is
received, the department shall consult with the transportation
committees of the legislature and the office of financial management
prior to spending the funds on existing or additional projects.
(5) The department shall sell any ancillary property, acquired when
the state purchased the right-of-ways to the PCC rail line system, to
a lessee of the ancillary property who is willing to pay fair market
value for the property. The department shall deposit the proceeds from
the sale of ancillary property into the transportation infrastructure
account.
(6) The entire freight congestion relief account--state
appropriation is contingent upon the enactment during the 2007-2009
fiscal biennium of a bill, resulting from the study established in
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5207, that makes available funding to
support project expenditures funded from the freight congestion relief
account created in Substitute Senate Bill No. 5207. If such a funding
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the entire freight congestion
relief account--state appropriation shall lapse.
(7)(a) The department shall develop and implement the
benefit/impact evaluation methodology recommended in the statewide rail
capacity and needs study finalized in December 2006. The
benefit/impact evaluation methodology shall be developed using the
following priorities, in order of relative importance:
(i) Economic, safety, or environmental advantages of freight
movement by rail compared to alternative modes;
(ii) Self-sustaining economic development that creates family-wage
jobs;
(iii) Preservation of transportation corridors that would otherwise
be lost;
(iv) Increased access to efficient and cost-effective transport to
market for Washington's agricultural and industrial products;
(v) Better integration and cooperation within the regional,
national, and international systems of freight distribution; and
(vi) Mitigation of impacts of increased rail traffic on
communities.
(b) The department shall convene a work group to collaborate on the
development of the benefit/impact analysis method to be used in the
evaluation. The work group must include, at a minimum, the freight
mobility strategic investment board, the department of agriculture, and
representatives from the various users and modes of the state's rail
system.
(c) The department shall use the benefit/impact analysis and
priorities in (a) of this subsection when submitting requests for state
funding for rail projects. The department shall develop a standardized
format for submitting requests for state funding for rail projects that
includes an explanation of the analysis undertaken, and the conclusions
derived from the analysis.
(d) The department and the freight mobility strategic investment
board shall collaborate to submit a report to the office of financial
management and the transportation committees of the legislature by
September 1, 2008, listing proposed freight highway and rail projects.
The report must describe the analysis used for selecting such projects,
as required by this act for the department and as required by chapter
47.06A RCW for the board. When developing its list of proposed freight
highway and rail projects, the freight mobility strategic investment
board shall use the priorities identified in (a) of this subsection to
the greatest extent possible.
(((8) $5,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is reappropriated and provided solely for the costs of
acquisition of the PCC railroad associated with the memorandum of
understanding (MOU), which was executed between Washington state and
Watco. Total costs associated with the MOU shall not exceed
$10,937,000.))

Sec. 309 2007 c 518 s 310 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z--CAPITAL
Highway Infrastructure Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $207,000
Highway Infrastructure Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,602,000
Freight Mobility Investment Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,500,000))
$12,378,000
Freight Congestion Relief Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,720,000
Transportation Partnership Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,906,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,854,000))
$8,560,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($60,150,000))
$60,012,000
Freight Mobility Multimodal Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,100,000
Freight Mobility Multimodal Account--
Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,755,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($33,158,000))
$32,134,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account) -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,706,000))
$2,721,000
Passenger Ferry Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,500,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($193,903,000))
$195,095,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (8) and (9) of this section,
the appropriations in this section are provided solely for the projects
and activities as listed by fund, project, and amount in the governor's
2008 supplemental project list, local programs (Z), as developed
December 18, 2007. However, limited transfers of specific line-item
appropriations may occur between projects for those amounts listed
subject to the conditions and limitations in section 603 of this act.
(2) The department shall, on a quarterly basis, provide status
reports to the legislature on the delivery of projects as outlined in
the project lists incorporated in this section. For projects funded by
new revenue in the 2003 and 2005 transportation packages, reporting
elements shall include, but not be limited to, project scope, schedule,
and costs. Other projects may be reported on a programmatic basis.
The department shall also provide the information required under this
subsection on a quarterly basis via the transportation executive
information system (TEIS).
(((2))) (3) $8,500,000 of the passenger ferry account--state
appropriation is provided solely for near and long-term costs of
operating and capital improvements in a business plan approved by the
governor for passenger ferry service.
(((3))) (4) The department shall seek the use of unprogrammed
federal rail crossing funds to be expended in lieu of or in addition to
state funds for eligible costs of projects in local programs, program
Z capital.
(((4))) (5) The department shall apply for surface transportation
program (STP) enhancement funds to be expended in lieu of or in
addition to state funds for eligible costs of projects in local
programs, program Z capital.
(((5))) (6) Federal funds may be transferred from program Z to
programs I and P and state funds shall be transferred from programs I
and P to program Z to replace those federal funds in a dollar-for-dollar match. Fund transfers authorized under this subsection shall
not affect project prioritization status. Appropriations shall
initially be allotted as appropriated in this act. The department may
not transfer funds as authorized under this subsection without approval
of the office of financial management. The department shall submit a
report on those projects receiving fund transfers to the office of
financial management and the transportation committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2007, and December 1, 2008.
(((6))) (7) The city of Winthrop may utilize a design-build process
for the Winthrop bike path project. Of the amount appropriated in this
section for this project, $500,000 of the multimodal transportation
account--state appropriation is contingent upon the state receiving
from the city of Winthrop $500,000 in federal funds awarded to the city
of Winthrop by its local planning organization.
(((7))) (8) $7,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state appropriation, $7,000,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal
appropriation, and $4,000,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the pedestrian and bicycle safety
program projects and safe routes to schools program projects identified
in the LEAP Transportation Document 2007-A, pedestrian and bicycle
safety program projects and safe routes to schools program projects as
developed April 20, 2007. Projects must be allocated funding based on
order of priority. The department shall review all projects receiving
grant awards under this program at least semiannually to determine
whether the projects are making satisfactory progress. Any project
that has been awarded funds, but does not report activity on the
project within one year of the grant award, shall be reviewed by the
department to determine whether the grant should be terminated. The
department shall promptly close out grants when projects have been
completed, and identify where unused grant funds remain because actual
project costs were lower than estimated in the grant award.
(((8))) (9) Up to a maximum of $5,000,000 of the multimodal
transportation account--state appropriation and up to a maximum of
$2,000,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation are
reappropriated for the pedestrian and bicycle safety program projects
and safe routes to schools program projects identified in the LEAP
transportation document 2006-B, pedestrian and bicycle safety program
projects and safe routes to schools program projects as developed March
8, 2006. Projects must be allocated funding based on order of
priority. The department shall review all projects receiving grant
awards under this program at least semiannually to determine whether
the projects are making satisfactory progress. Any project that has
been awarded funds, but does not report activity on the project within
one year of the grant award, shall be reviewed by the department to
determine whether the grant should be terminated. The department shall
promptly close out grants when projects have been completed, and
identify where unused grant funds remain because actual project costs
were lower than estimated in the grant award.
(((9))) (10) The entire freight congestion relief account--state
appropriation is contingent upon the enactment during the 2007-2009
fiscal biennium of a bill, resulting from the study established in
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5207, that makes available funding to
support project expenditures funded from the freight congestion relief
account created in Substitute Senate Bill No. 5207. If such a funding
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the entire freight congestion
relief account--state appropriation shall lapse.
(((10))) (11) $3,500,000 of the multimodal transportation account--federal appropriation is provided solely for the Museum of Flight
pedestrian bridge safety project.
(((11))) (12) $250,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state appropriation is provided solely for the icicle rail station in
Leavenworth.
(((12))) (13) $1,500,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the Union Gap city road project.
(((13))) (14) $350,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the Saltwater state park bridge
project.
(((14))) (15) $1,000,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the coal creek parkway project.
(((15))) (16) $250,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state appropriation is provided solely for a streetcar feasibility
study in downtown Spokane.
(((16))) (17) $500,000 of the motor vehicle account--((state))
federal appropriation is provided solely for the marine view drive
bridge project in Des Moines.

TRANSFERS AND DISTRIBUTIONS
Sec. 401 2007 c 518 s 401 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING
BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALES DISCOUNTS AND
DEBT TO BE PAID BY MOTOR VEHICLE ACCOUNT AND TRANSPORTATION FUND
REVENUE
Highway Bond Retirement Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($570,030,000))
$531,018,000
Ferry Bond Retirement Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($38,059,000))
$37,380,000
Transportation Improvement Board Bond Retirement
Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($27,749,000))
$26,719,000
Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($19,359,000))
$10,031,000
Transportation Partnership Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,694,000))
$6,519,000
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($986,000))
$454,000
Transportation Improvement Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($68,000))
$59,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,032,000))
$1,230,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,560,000))
$6,014,000
Urban Arterial Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($473,000))
$113,000
Special Category C Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($160,000))
$184,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($671,170,000))
$619,721,000

Sec. 402 2007 c 518 s 402 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING
BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES AND
FISCAL AGENT CHARGES
Transportation Partnership Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,254,000))
$419,000
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($329,000))
$39,000
Transportation Improvement Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,000))
$3,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($130,000))
$57,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,187,000))
$397,000
Urban Arterial Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($38,000))
$7,000
Special Category C Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($53,000))
$13,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,996,000))
$935,000

Sec. 403 2007 c 518 s 403 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING
BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR MVFT BONDS AND TRANSFERS
(1) Motor Vehicle Account -- State Reappropriation:
For transfer to the Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge
Account . . . . . . . . . . . . (($131,016,000))
$19,133,000

The department of transportation is authorized to sell up to
(($131,016,000)) $19,133,000 in bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843 for
the Tacoma Narrows bridge project. Proceeds from the sale of the bonds
shall be deposited into the motor vehicle account. The department of
transportation shall inform the treasurer of the amount to be
deposited.

(2) Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Puget Sound Capital Construction
Account . . . . . . . . . . . . (($131,500,000))
$30,964,000

The department of transportation is authorized to sell up to
(($131,500,000)) $30,964,000 in bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843 for
vessel and terminal acquisition, major and minor improvements, and long
lead-time materials acquisition for the Washington state ferries.

Sec. 404 2007 c 518 s 404 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION
Motor Vehicle Account Appropriation for
motor vehicle fuel tax distributions to cities
and counties . . . . . . . . . . . . (($526,320,000))
$505,353,000

Sec. 405 2007 c 518 s 405 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- TRANSFERS
Motor Vehicle Account -- State
Appropriation: For motor vehicle fuel tax
refunds and statutory transfers . . . . . . . . . . . . (($937,181,000))
$907,837,000

Sec. 406 2007 c 518 s 406 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING -- TRANSFERS
Motor Vehicle Account -- State
Appropriation: For motor vehicle fuel tax
refunds and transfers . . . . . . . . . . . . (($346,657,000))
$335,213,000

Sec. 407 2007 c 518 s 407 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- ADMINISTRATIVE TRANSFERS
(1) Recreational Vehicle Account--State
Appropriation: For transfer to the Motor Vehicle
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,005,000))
$4,505,000
(2) License Plate Technology Account--State
Appropriation: For the Multimodal Transportation
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000
(3) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the High-Occupancy Toll Lanes Operations--
State Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
(4) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Puget Sound Capital Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,000,000))
$40,000,000
(5) Multimodal Transportation Account--State
Appropriation: For transfer to the Puget Sound
Ferry Operations Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($39,000,000))
$62,000,000
(6) Advanced Right-of-Way Revolving Account--State
Appropriation: For transfer to the Motor Vehicle
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000,000
(7) Waste Tire Removal Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Motor Vehicle Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,600,000
(8) ((Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Transportation Partnership
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000
(10))) Multimodal Transportation Account--State
Appropriation: For transfer to the Transportation
Infrastructure Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
(((11))) (9) Highway Safety Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Multimodal Transportation
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,500,000
(10) Multimodal Transportation Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Puget Sound Capital Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,500,000

The transfers identified in this section are subject to the
following conditions and limitations: (((a))) The amount transferred
in subsection (3) of this section may be spent only on "highway
purposes" as that term is construed in Article II, section 40 of the
Washington state Constitution.

COMPENSATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 A new section is added to 2007 c 518
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--STATE EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION.
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . ($6,000)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
legislative agencies in accordance with OFM document 2008-R-02, dated
December 18, 2007.

Sec. 502 2007 c 518 s 501 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
COMPENSATION--NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEES--INSURANCE BENEFITS. The
appropriations for state agencies, are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit
premiums, public employees' benefits board administration, and the
uniform medical plan, shall not exceed $707 per eligible employee for
fiscal year 2008. For fiscal year 2009 the monthly employer funding
rate shall not exceed (($732)) $575 per eligible employee.
(b) In order to achieve the level of funding provided for health
benefits, the public employees' benefits board shall require any or all
of the following: Employee premium copayments, increases in
point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of managed
competition, or make other changes to benefits consistent with RCW
41.05.065.
(c) The health care authority shall deposit any moneys received on
behalf of the uniform medical plan as a result of rebates on
prescription drugs, audits of hospitals, subrogation payments, or any
other moneys recovered as a result of prior uniform medical plan claims
payments, into the public employees' and retirees' insurance account to
be used for insurance benefits. Such receipts shall not be used for
administrative expenditures.
(2) The health care authority, subject to the approval of the
public employees' benefits board, shall provide subsidies for health
benefit premiums to eligible retired or disabled public employees and
school district employees who are eligible for medicare, pursuant to
RCW 41.05.085. From January 1, 2008, through December 31, 2008, the
subsidy shall be $165.31. Starting January 1, 2009, the subsidy shall
be $184.26 per month.

Sec. 503 2007 c 518 s 502 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
COMPENSATION--REPRESENTED EMPLOYEES OUTSIDE SUPER COALITION--INSURANCE
BENEFITS. The appropriations for state agencies, are subject to the
following conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit
premiums, public employees' benefits board administration, and the
uniform medical plan, for represented employees outside the super
coalition under chapter 41.80 RCW, shall not exceed $707 per eligible
employee for fiscal year 2008. For fiscal year 2009 the monthly
employer funding rate shall not exceed (($732)) $575 per eligible
employee.
(b) In order to achieve the level of funding provided for health
benefits, the public employees' benefits board shall require any or all
of the following: Employee premium copayments, increases in
point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of managed
competition, or make other changes to benefits consistent with RCW
41.05.065.
(c) The health care authority shall deposit any moneys received on
behalf of the uniform medical plan as a result of rebates on
prescription drugs, audits of hospitals, subrogation payments, or any
other moneys recovered as a result of prior uniform medical plan claims
payments, into the public employees' and retirees' insurance account to
be used for insurance benefits. Such receipts shall not be used for
administrative expenditures.
(2) The health care authority, subject to the approval of the
public employees' benefits board, shall provide subsidies for health
benefit premiums to eligible retired or disabled public employees and
school district employees who are eligible for medicare, pursuant to
RCW 41.05.085. From January 1, 2008, through December 31, 2008, the
subsidy shall be $165.31. Starting January 1, 2009, the subsidy shall
be $184.26 per month.

Sec. 504 2007 c 518 s 503 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
COMPENSATION--REPRESENTED EMPLOYEES--SUPER COALITION. Collective
bargaining agreements negotiated as part of the super coalition under
chapter 41.80 RCW include employer contributions to health insurance
premiums at 88% of the cost. Funding rates at this level are currently
$707 per month for fiscal year 2008 and (($732)) $575 per month for
fiscal year 2009. The agreements also include a one-time payment of
$756 for each employee who is eligible for insurance for the month of
June, 2007, and is covered by a 2007-2009 collective bargaining
agreement pursuant to chapter 41.80 RCW, as well as continuation of the
salary increases that were negotiated for the twelve-month period
beginning July 1, 2006, and scheduled to terminate June 30, 2007.

MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 2007 c 518 s 713 (uncodified) is repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

(End of bill)

INDEX PAGE #

BOARD OF PILOTAGE COMMISSIONERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
COMPENSATION
NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEES--INSURANCE BENEFITS . . . . . . . . . . . . 58
REPRESENTED EMPLOYEES OUTSIDE--SUPER COALITION INSURANCE BENEFITS . . . . . . . . . . . . 59
REPRESENTED EMPLOYEES--SUPER COALITION . . . . . . . . . . . . 60
COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 3, 31
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
DEPARTMENT OF ARCHEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING . . . . . . . . . . . . 8
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 56
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AVIATION--PROGRAM F . . . . . . . . . . . . 13
CHARGES FROM OTHER AGENCIES--PROGRAM U . . . . . . . . . . . . 22
ECONOMIC PARTNERSHIPS--PROGRAM K . . . . . . . . . . . . 15
FACILITIES--PROGRAM D--OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . 13
HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE--PROGRAM M . . . . . . . . . . . . 16
IMPROVEMENTS--PROGRAM I . . . . . . . . . . . . 33
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY--PROGRAM C . . . . . . . . . . . . 11
LOCAL PROGRAMS--PROGRAM Z--CAPITAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 50
LOCAL PROGRAMS--PROGRAM Z--OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . 31
MARINE--PROGRAM X . . . . . . . . . . . . 28
PRESERVATION--PROGRAM P . . . . . . . . . . . . 40
PROGRAM D (DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS)--CAPITAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 32
PROGRAM DELIVERY MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT--PROGRAM H . . . . . . . . . . . . 14
PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION--PROGRAM V . . . . . . . . . . . . 24
RAIL--PROGRAM Y--CAPITAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 46
RAIL--PROGRAM Y--OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . 30
TOLL OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE--PROGRAM B . . . . . . . . . . . . 10
TRAFFIC OPERATIONS--PROGRAM Q--CAPITAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 43
TRAFFIC OPERATIONS -- PROGRAM Q--OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . 17
TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT--PROGRAM S . . . . . . . . . . . . 19
TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA, AND RESEARCH--PROGRAM T . . . . . . . . . . . . 20
WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTION--PROGRAM W . . . . . . . . . . . . 43
FREIGHT MOBILITY STRATEGIC INVESTMENT BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
MARINE EMPLOYEES COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
STATE EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 58
STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
STATE TREASURER
ADMINISTRATIVE TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 57
BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST . . . . . . . . . . . . 54, 55
STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 56
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 56
TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 4, 32
UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 1
WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
FIELD OPERATIONS BUREAU . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
INVESTIGATIVE SERVICES BUREAU . . . . . . . . . . . . 7
TECHNICAL SERVICES BUREAU . . . . . . . . . . . . 7
WASHINGTON TRAFFIC SAFETY COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
--- END ---