BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter does not apply to amounts derived from the wholesale
sale of bee products by a person who owns or keeps forty-five or more
bee colonies used for pollination and is registered under RCW
15.60.021. For the purposes of this section, "bee products" means
queen bees, packaged bees, honey, pollen, bee's wax, propolis, or other
substances obtained from honey bees. Bee products do not include
manufactured substances or articles.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter does not apply to amounts received by any apiarist
registered under RCW 15.60.021 from providing bee pollination services
using a bee colony owned or kept by the person providing the
pollination services, if the person owns or keeps forty-five or more
bee colonies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to the sale of
pollinating bees to an apiarist registered under RCW 15.60.021 if the
apiarist owns or keeps forty-five or more bee colonies used for
pollination.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use
of pollinating bees by an apiarist registered under RCW 15.60.021 if
the apiarist owns or keeps forty-five or more bee colonies used for
pollination.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect July 1, 2008.

--- END ---