BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature recognizes public
concern about thimerosal and mercury content in vaccines. Mercury
exposure during pregnancy can risk harm to the fetus. It is
particularly urgent that women of child-bearing age be informed of this
risk, both before and during pregnancy, so they may take proper
precautions to protect their own health and that of their future
children. The legislature recognizes that health care providers bear
the burden and potential liability of complying with the law and
preventing pregnant women from mercury vaccine exposure.
(2) The legislature intends to honor and support every patient's
right to know what products and substances they are being exposed to.
Patients may be misled by popular misconceptions that all vaccines are
mercury free. It is imperative that patients be provided with accurate
information about the contents of all vaccines they are offered, so
they may be effective advocates for their own health care.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.95M.115 and 2007 c 268 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2007, a person who is known to be pregnant or
who is under three years of age shall not be vaccinated with a
mercury-containing vaccine or injected with a mercury-containing
product that contains more than 0.5 micrograms of mercury per 0.5
milliliter dose.
(2) ((Notwithstanding)) No person, including those listed in
subsection (1) of this section, may be vaccinated with an influenza
vaccine ((may contain up to 1.0 micrograms)) that contains more than .1
microgram of mercury ((per 0.5 milliliter dose)).
(3) The secretary of the department of health may, upon the
secretary's or local public health officer's declaration of an outbreak
of vaccine-preventable disease or of a shortage of vaccine that
complies with subsection (1) or (2) of this section, suspend the
requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of this section for the
duration of the outbreak or shortage.
(4) A person ((who is known to be pregnant or lactating)) or a
parent or legal guardian of a child under eighteen years of age shall
be informed if the person or child is to be vaccinated or injected with
any ((mercury-containing)) product with added mercury or that contains
more than ((the)) .1 microgram of mercury ((limits per dose in
subsections (1) and (2))). This includes those circumstances described
under subsection (3) of this section.
(a) The disclosure must indicate how much total mercury will be
injected from all vaccines administered during the health care visit
and include a statement of the risks associated with mercury exposure
that is in excess of the environmental protection agency listed mercury
per body kilogram.
(b) The disclosure must also include a statement of the risks of
exposure during pregnancy and inform the patient to notify the health
care provider immediately if she suspects she is pregnant.
(((4))) (5) Health care providers administering vaccines must
provide a vaccine adverse event reporting system report form to every
person or parent or legal guardian of a child under eighteen years of
age vaccinated, for the purpose of reporting any clinically significant
adverse event.
(6) All vaccines and products referenced under this section must
meet food and drug administration licensing requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2008.

--- END ---