BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds:
(a) The sexual abuse of a child is a most serious crime and an act
repugnant to moral instincts;
(b) A pedophile is a person who has fantasies, urges, or behaviors
that involve sexual activity with a child, generally under thirteen
years of age; and
(c) When a person acts on a pedophilic urge, he or she has
committed a criminal act against the most vulnerable segment of our
society, children. Pedophiles have a high rate of recidivism, that is,
they tend to repeat their acts often over time. The main method for
preventing pedophilia is avoiding situations that may promote
pedophilic acts.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature to criminalize conduct that
is intended to provide a person the information necessary to commit a
pedophilic act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 9A.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Every person who knowingly publishes information, including via
the internet, relating to the location of children or a place where
children regularly gather, or the specific time and location in which
a particular child may be found, for the purpose of arousing or
gratifying the sexual desire of any person, is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor. It is a defense to a charge against an internet service
provider or social networking site that the internet service provider
or social networking site had only constructive knowledge and not
actual knowledge.
(2) If a person is convicted of a violation of this section, the
court may order:
(a) The removal of any information relating to the location of a
child, and the destruction or removal of any photograph, motion picture
film, digital image, videotape, or any other recording of an image that
was made by the person and posted on the internet in connection
therewith; and
(b) An internet service provider to permanently remove from its
server any web page containing information relating to the location of
a child, and any photograph, motion picture film, digital image,
videotape, or any other recording of an image of the child.
(3) Nothing in this section shall prevent a parent or guardian of
a child who believes that a web page may be in violation of this
section from seeking an ex parte court order for permanent injunctive
relief to remove that web page.
(4) It is not a defense to prosecution under this section that the
information includes a specific disclaimer of intention to incite a
sexual offense against a minor if it is clear from the overall
character of the communication that its purpose is to promote the
commission of a sexual offense against a minor.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "child" means any person
under thirteen years of age.

--- END ---