BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The purpose of this chapter is to regulate
gifts, grants, and gratuities made by pharmaceutical manufacturing
companies, directly or indirectly, to any person or entity authorized
to prescribe, dispense, or purchase prescription drugs in Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The legislature finds that:
(1) The state of Washington has an interest in maximizing the well-being of its residents and containing health care costs;
(2) There is a strong link between pharmaceutical marketing
activities, health care spending, and the health of Washingtonians;
(3) In 2004, the pharmaceutical industry spent twenty-seven billion
dollars marketing pharmaceuticals in the United States. Over eighty-five percent of these marketing expenditures are directed at the small
percentage of the population that practice medicine. Pharmaceutical
manufacturers spend twice as much on marketing as on research and
development;
(4) Marketing programs are designed to increase sales, income, and
profit. Frequently, progress toward these goals comes at the expense
of evidence-based treatment and sometimes the health of individual
patients;
(5) There is considerable evidence that pharmaceutical marketing
campaigns lead doctors to prescribe drugs based on incomplete and
biased information, particularly for prescribers who lack the time to
perform substantive research assessing whether the messages they are
receiving from pharmaceutical representatives are full and accurate;
(6) A significant portion of prescriber time is spent meeting with
pharmaceutical representatives. According to a survey published in the
New England Journal of Medicine, family practitioners reported the
highest frequency of meetings with representatives, an average of
sixteen times per month. To the extent that this meeting time comes at
the expense of time spent with patients, quality of care is negatively
affected;
(7) The federal food and drug administration requires marketing and
advertising to be fair and balanced; however, the federal food and drug
administration has limited legal ability to enforce this requirement;
(8) Newer drugs on the market do not necessarily provide evidence-based benefits over older drugs but do add costs and as yet unknown
side effects;
(9) Between 1975 and 2000, fifty percent of all drug withdrawals
from the market and "black box warnings" were within the first two
years of the release of the drug. One-fifth of all drugs are subject
to "black box warnings" or withdrawal from the market because of
serious public health concerns. Marketing that results in prescribers
using the newest drugs also results in prescribing drugs that are more
likely to be subject to these warnings and withdrawal;
(10) Nearly one-third of the five-fold increase in spending in the
United States on drugs over the last decade can be attributed to
marketing-induced shifts in doctors' prescribing from existing,
effective, and lower cost, often generic, therapies to new and more
expensive treatments, which often have little or no evidence-based
therapeutic value;
(11) Several studies suggest that drug samples clearly affect
prescribing behavior in favor of the sample, and that the presence of
drug samples may influence physicians to dispense or prescribe drugs
that differ from their preferred drug source;
(12) The pharmaceutical industry increased its spending on direct
marketing to doctors by over two hundred seventy-five percent and
doubled its sales force to over ninety thousand drug representatives.
It is estimated that there is a pharmaceutical sales representative for
every five office-based physicians.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the board of pharmacy.
(2)(a) "Gift, fee, or payment" includes any subsidy or other
economic benefit provided in connection with detailing, promotional, or
other marketing activities by the company directly or through any other
entity at the direction of or with the implied or express knowledge of
the company, including:
(i) Food or entertainment;
(ii) Trips or travel;
(iii) Anything provided for less than market value;
(iv) Medical conferences, continuing medical education, or other
educational or informational programs, materials, and seminars, and
remuneration for promoting or participating in educational or
informational sessions;
(v) Consulting fees or honoraria;
(vi) Product samples, including samples that will be distributed
free of charge to patients; and
(vii) Clinical trials or research, including any compensation or
reimbursement of expenses.
(b) "Gift, fee, or payment" does not include:
(i) Payments made in conjunction with returned merchandise and
overpayments;
(ii) Publications and educational materials;
(iii) Salaries or other benefits paid to its employees;
(iv) Overpayments;
(v) Product rebates and discounts; and
(vi) Other normal course-of-business financial dealings unrelated
to detailing, promotional, or other marketing activities.
(3) "Group purchasing organization" means any group of two or more
hospitals, nursing homes, or other health care organizations that
collectively purchase either directly from a pharmaceutical
manufacturing company or by accessing contracts through another group.
(4) "Health benefit plan administrator" means any person or entity
who manages or administers a private, self-insured health benefit plan
or public employee health benefit plan and any person who manages or
administers health benefit plans for another person, including health
insuring corporations and sickness and accident insurers under contract
to provide managerial and administrative services.
(5)(a) "Marketing" means any of the following activities undertaken
or materials or products made available to prescribers or to their
employees or agents related to the transfer of prescription drugs from
the producer or seller to the consumer or buyer:
(i) Advertising, publicizing, promoting, or selling a prescription
drug;
(ii) Activities undertaken for the purpose of influencing the
market share of a prescription drug or the prescribing patterns of a
prescriber, a detailing visit, or a personal appearance;
(iii) Activities undertaken to evaluate or improve the
effectiveness of a professional detailing sales force; or
(iv) A brochure, media advertisement or announcement, poster, or
free sample of a prescription drug.
(b) "Marketing" does not include pharmacy reimbursement, formulary
compliance, pharmacy file transfers in response to a patient request or
as a result of the sale or purchase of a pharmacy, patient care
management, utilization review by a health care provider or agent of a
health care provider or the patient's health plan or an agent of the
patient's health plan, and health care research.
(6) "Pharmaceutical detailing, promotional, or marketing
activities" means promotional or educational activities by
pharmaceutical marketers directed at physicians, their staff, or other
health care professionals who prescribe, dispense, or administer
prescription drugs.
(7)(a) "Pharmaceutical manufacturer" means an entity that is
engaged in the production, preparation, propagation, compounding,
conversion, or processing of prescription drugs, either directly or
indirectly by extraction from substances of natural origin, or
independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of
extraction and chemical synthesis, or any entity engaged in the
packaging, repackaging, labeling, relabeling, or distribution of
prescription drugs.
(b) "Pharmaceutical manufacturer" does not include pharmacists or
pharmacies licensed under chapter 18.64 RCW or pharmacy operations of
any integrated delivery system undertaken for the benefit of patients
obtaining care through that system.
(8) "Pharmaceutical marketer" means a person, agent, or
representative who, while employed by or under contract to represent a
pharmaceutical manufacturing company, engages in pharmaceutical
detailing, promotional activities, or other marketing of prescription
drugs in this state to any entity or person authorized to prescribe,
dispense, or purchase prescription drugs in this state.
(9) "Pharmacy benefit manager" means a person or business entity
that administers or otherwise assists with prescription drug benefit
services including formulary management, rebates, discounted pharmacy
network, mail service pharmacies, and electronic claims processing.
Such services may be provided on behalf of a health insurer, an
employer-sponsored health benefit plan, or an agency of the state.
(10) "Recipient" means any:
(a) Health care professional licensed under Title 18 RCW who is
authorized to prescribe or dispense prescription drugs or entity that
employs such a professional;
(b) Hospital licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW;
(c) Health benefit plan administrator;
(d) Group purchasing organization or pharmacy benefit manager; or
(e) Other entity authorized to purchase prescription drugs in this
state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Starting January 1, 2009, and annually
thereafter, every pharmaceutical manufacturer shall:
(1) Disclose to the board information on each gift, fee, or payment
made to recipients in the state;
(2) Submit information in a form and manner determined by the
board, including for each expenditure:
(a) The value and nature;
(b) The purpose according to categories specified by the board; and
(c) The recipient, including the recipient's address, credentials,
and institutional affiliation;
(3) Disclose to the board the name and address of the individual
responsible for the company's compliance with the provisions of this
section or, if this information has been previously reported, any
changes to the name or address of the individual responsible for the
company's compliance with the provisions of this section;
(4) Pay a fee, to be set by the board, to support the work of the
board under this chapter.
Pharmaceutical manufacturers that comply with section 5 of this act
are exempt from the reporting requirements under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A pharmaceutical manufacturer that provides
the board with a written report documenting the manufacturer's
compliance with the following requirements is exempt from section 4 of
this act:
(1) A written marketing compliance code that establishes the
practices and standards that govern the marketing and sale of the
pharmaceutical manufacturer's products;
(2) A training program for employees that the pharmaceutical
manufacturer undertakes regularly to train appropriate employees on the
marketing compliance code;
(3) Regular audits to monitor compliance with the marketing
compliance code;
(4) Policies and procedures for investigating instances of
noncompliance with the marketing compliance code;
(5) Effective lines of communication for employees to report
noncompliance, investigate reports of noncompliance, take corrective
actions in response to noncompliance, and report instances of
noncompliance to the department in an appropriate circumstance;
(6) The name and contact information for the pharmaceutical
manufacturer's compliance officer responsible for developing,
operating, and monitoring the marketing compliance code.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The board shall:
(1) Report annually on disclosures made under this chapter to the
legislature and the governor on or before March 1st of each year;
(2) Post specific and easily searchable data on its public internet
site, including:
(a) Amount of each gift;
(b) Date given;
(c) Intended purpose of the gift;
(d) Pharmaceutical manufacturer; and
(e) Recipient identified by drug enforcement agency number or other
unique identifier.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The attorney general may bring an action in
Thurston county superior court for injunctive relief, costs, and
attorneys' fees, and to impose on a pharmaceutical manufacturing
company that fails to comply with this chapter a civil penalty of not
more than ten thousand dollars per violation. Each unlawful failure to
disclose constitutes a separate violation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The board may adopt rules to implement the
provisions of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This chapter may be known and cited as the
prescription drug marketing and disclosure act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 1 through 10 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 69 RCW.

--- END ---