BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that Washington
institutions of higher education currently have the general authority
to regulate conduct and activities on their campuses. The legislature
further finds that, in light of recent violent incidents involving
firearms on or near college campuses, it is important to refine the
institutions' scope of authority. The legislature intends to clarify
its delegation of authority to regulate firearm possession on the
campuses of Washington institutions of higher education.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.41.300 and 2004 c 116 s 1 and 2004 c 16 s 1 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for any person to enter the following places
when he or she knowingly possesses or knowingly has under his or her
control a weapon:
(a) The restricted access areas of a jail, or of a law enforcement
facility, or any place used for the confinement of a person (i)
arrested for, charged with, or convicted of an offense, (ii) held for
extradition or as a material witness, or (iii) otherwise confined
pursuant to an order of a court, except an order under chapter 13.32A
or 13.34 RCW. Restricted access areas do not include common areas of
egress or ingress open to the general public;
(b) Those areas in any building which are used in connection with
court proceedings, including courtrooms, jury rooms, judge's chambers,
offices and areas used to conduct court business, waiting areas, and
corridors adjacent to areas used in connection with court proceedings.
The restricted areas do not include common areas of ingress and egress
to the building that is used in connection with court proceedings, when
it is possible to protect court areas without restricting ingress and
egress to the building. The restricted areas shall be the minimum
necessary to fulfill the objective of this subsection (1)(b).
In addition, the local legislative authority shall provide either
a stationary locked box sufficient in size for pistols and key to a
weapon owner for weapon storage, or shall designate an official to
receive weapons for safekeeping, during the owner's visit to restricted
areas of the building. The locked box or designated official shall be
located within the same building used in connection with court
proceedings. The local legislative authority shall be liable for any
negligence causing damage to or loss of a weapon either placed in a
locked box or left with an official during the owner's visit to
restricted areas of the building.
The local judicial authority shall designate and clearly mark those
areas where weapons are prohibited, and shall post notices at each
entrance to the building of the prohibition against weapons in the
restricted areas;
(c) The restricted access areas of a public mental health facility
certified by the department of social and health services for inpatient
hospital care and state institutions for the care of the mentally ill,
excluding those facilities solely for evaluation and treatment.
Restricted access areas do not include common areas of egress and
ingress open to the general public;
(d) That portion of an establishment classified by the state liquor
control board as off-limits to persons under twenty-one years of age;
or
(e) The restricted access areas of a commercial service airport
designated in the airport security plan approved by the federal
transportation security administration, including passenger screening
checkpoints at or beyond the point at which a passenger initiates the
screening process. These areas do not include airport drives, general
parking areas and walkways, and shops and areas of the terminal that
are outside the screening checkpoints and that are normally open to
unscreened passengers or visitors to the airport. Any restricted
access area shall be clearly indicated by prominent signs indicating
that firearms and other weapons are prohibited in the area.
(2) Institutions of higher education, as defined in RCW
28B.10.016(4), may adopt rules:
(a) Restricting or prohibiting the discharge of firearms in any
institutionally owned or controlled lands, buildings, or facilities; or
(b) Restricting or prohibiting the possession of firearms in any
institutionally owned or controlled lands, buildings, or facilities.
(3) Cities, towns, counties, and other municipalities may enact
laws and ordinances:
(a) Restricting the discharge of firearms in any portion of their
respective jurisdictions where there is a reasonable likelihood that
humans, domestic animals, or property will be jeopardized. Such laws
and ordinances shall not abridge the right of the individual guaranteed
by Article I, section 24 of the state Constitution to bear arms in
defense of self or others; and
(b) Restricting the possession of firearms in any stadium or
convention center, operated by a city, town, county, or other
municipality, except that such restrictions shall not apply to:
(i) Any pistol in the possession of a person licensed under RCW
9.41.070 or exempt from the licensing requirement by RCW 9.41.060; or
(ii) Any showing, demonstration, or lecture involving the
exhibition of firearms.
(((3))) (4)(a) Cities, towns, and counties may enact ordinances
restricting the areas in their respective jurisdictions in which
firearms may be sold, but, except as provided in (b) of this
subsection, a business selling firearms may not be treated more
restrictively than other businesses located within the same zone. An
ordinance requiring the cessation of business within a zone shall not
have a shorter grandfather period for businesses selling firearms than
for any other businesses within the zone.
(b) Cities, towns, and counties may restrict the location of a
business selling firearms to not less than five hundred feet from
primary or secondary school grounds, if the business has a storefront,
has hours during which it is open for business, and posts
advertisements or signs observable to passersby that firearms are
available for sale. A business selling firearms that exists as of the
date a restriction is enacted under this subsection (((3))) (4)(b)
shall be grandfathered according to existing law.
(((4))) (5) Violations of local ordinances adopted under subsection
(2) or (3) of this section must have the same penalty as provided for
by state law.
(((5))) (6) The perimeter of the premises of any specific location
covered by subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall be posted at
reasonable intervals to alert the public as to the existence of any law
restricting the possession of firearms on the premises.
(((6))) (7) Subsection (1) or (2) of this section does not apply
to:
(a) A person engaged in military activities sponsored by the
federal or state governments, while engaged in official duties;
(b) Law enforcement personnel, except that subsection (1)(b) of
this section does apply to a law enforcement officer who is present at
a courthouse building as a party to an action under chapter 10.14,
10.99, or 26.50 RCW, or an action under Title 26 RCW where any party
has alleged the existence of domestic violence as defined in RCW
26.50.010; or
(c) Security personnel while engaged in official duties.
(((7))) (8) Subsection (1)(a) of this section does not apply to a
person licensed pursuant to RCW 9.41.070 who, upon entering the place
or facility, directly and promptly proceeds to the administrator of the
facility or the administrator's designee and obtains written permission
to possess the firearm while on the premises or checks his or her
firearm. The person may reclaim the firearms upon leaving but must
immediately and directly depart from the place or facility.
(((8))) (9) Subsection (1)(c) of this section does not apply to any
administrator or employee of the facility or to any person who, upon
entering the place or facility, directly and promptly proceeds to the
administrator of the facility or the administrator's designee and
obtains written permission to possess the firearm while on the
premises.
(((9))) (10) Subsection (1)(d) of this section does not apply to
the proprietor of the premises or his or her employees while engaged in
their employment.
(((10))) (11) Any person violating subsection (1) of this section
is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
(((11))) (12) "Weapon" as used in this section means any firearm,
explosive as defined in RCW 70.74.010, or instrument or weapon listed
in RCW 9.41.250.

--- END ---