BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 13.34 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A relative of a dependent child may petition the juvenile court
for reasonable visitation with the child if:
(a) The child has been found to be a dependent child under this
chapter;
(b) The parental rights of both of the child's parents have been
terminated;
(c) The child is in the custody of the department or another public
or private agency; and
(d) The child has not been adopted and is not in a preadoptive home
or other permanent placement at the time the petition for visitation is
filed.
(2) The court shall give prior notice for any proceeding under this
section, or cause prior notice to be given, to the department or public
or private agency having custody of the child, the child's attorney or
guardian ad litem if applicable, and the child. The court shall also
order the custodial agency to give prior notice of any hearing to the
child's current foster parent, relative caregiver, guardian or
custodian, and the child's tribe, if applicable.
(3) The juvenile court may grant the petition for visitation if it
finds that the requirements of subsection (1) of this section have been
met, and that unsupervised visitation between the child and the
relative does not present a risk to the child's safety or well-being
and that the visitation is in the best interests of the child. In
determining the best interests of the child the court shall consider,
but is not limited to, the following:
(a) The love, affection, and strength of the relationship between
the child and the relative;
(b) The length and quality of the prior relationship between the
child and the relative;
(c) Any criminal convictions for or founded history of abuse or
neglect of a child by the relative;
(d) Whether the visitation will present a risk to the child's
health, welfare, or safety;
(e) The child's reasonable preference, if the court considers the
child to be of sufficient age to express a preference;
(f) Any other factor relevant to the child's best interest.
(4) The visitation order may be modified at any time upon a showing
that the visitation poses a risk to the child's safety or well-being.
The visitation order shall state that visitation will automatically
terminate upon the child's placement in a preadoptive home, if the
child is adopted, or if there is a subsequent founded abuse or neglect
allegation against the relative.
(5) The granting of the petition under this section does not grant
the relative the right to participate in the dependency action and does
not grant any rights to the relative not otherwise specified in the
visitation order.
(6) This section is retroactive and applies to any eligible
dependent child at the time of the filing of the petition for
visitation, regardless of the date parental rights were terminated.
(7) For the purpose of this section, "relative" means a relative as
defined in RCW 74.15.020(2)(a), except parents.
(8) This section is intended to provide an additional procedure by
which a relative may request visitation with a dependent child. It is
not intended to impair or alter the ability a court currently has to
order visitation with a relative under the dependency statutes.

Sec. 2 RCW 26.09.405 and 2000 c 21 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provisions of RCW 26.09.405 through 26.09.560 and the
chapter 21, Laws of 2000 amendments to RCW 26.09.260, 26.10.190, and
26.26.160 apply to a court order regarding residential time or
visitation with a child issued:
(a) After June 8, 2000; and
(b) Before June 8, 2000, if the existing court order does not
expressly govern relocation of the child.
(2) To the extent that a provision of RCW 26.09.405 through
26.09.560 and the chapter 21, Laws of 2000 amendments to RCW 26.09.260,
26.10.190, and 26.26.160 conflicts with the express terms of a court
order existing prior to June 8, 2000, then RCW 26.09.405 through
26.09.560 and the chapter 21, Laws of 2000 amendments to RCW 26.09.260,
26.10.190, and 26.26.160 do not apply to those terms of that order
governing relocation of the child.
(3) The provisions of RCW 26.09.405 through 26.09.560 do not apply
to visitation orders entered in dependency proceedings as provided in
section 1 of this act.

--- END ---