BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) While significant efforts to reduce the
rate of climate change are underway in the state and throughout the
nation, significant adverse impacts are likely inevitable over the
course of the twenty-first century. Therefore it is in the public
interest for Washington state to be actively working to both mitigate
the effects of climate change as well as to prepare for the impacts
that cannot be avoided. While the legislature in chapter 307, Laws of
2007, has adopted goals for reducing emissions of climate change gases,
and work is underway to establish a comprehensive program to achieve
these goals, there is not yet a comprehensive program to coordinate the
research and information being compiled on localized impacts of climate
change, and to assist local and state entities and the public generally
in preparing for and adapting to such impacts.
(2) It is the purpose of this chapter to authorize a study that
will recommend the elements of such a comprehensive program of climate
change research, preparation, and adaptation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(2) "Institute" means the joint institute for the study of the
atmosphere and ocean, within the University of Washington.
(3) "Work groups" means preparation and adaptation working groups
created under executive order 07-02 and other participants who may be
added under section 4 of this act. All members of work groups must
live in the state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Not later than November 1, 2008, the
department shall prepare a report and deliver it to the governor and
the climate-related policy and fiscal committees of the senate and
house of representatives. The report must contain the department's
recommendations for the creation of a comprehensive climate change
research, preparation, and adaptation program.
(2) The department shall develop the report required in subsection
(1) of this section using the work groups efforts on public health,
agriculture, the coast line, forestry, and infrastructure as a
foundation, and include recommendations for specific steps to prepare
for impacts to water resources and management, flood response,
protection of ecosystems, and biodiversity, including the protection of
threatened or endangered species and species of economic importance to
the state.
(3) The report must include recommendations for at least the
following:
(a) Criteria to establish state-funded research priorities;
(b) Methods to ensure data and information systems will be most
effective for and accessible to relevant planning jurisdictions and the
public generally;
(c) Delivering technical and financial assistance to and
integrating data and analyses into state and local programs and
planning;
(d) Funding that may be needed by local, regional, state, and other
planning jurisdictions to incorporate climate change into their
planning processes, including requirements for such integration when
receiving state funding;
(e) The range of time horizons and geographic scales to be
addressed in climate impact research and analysis;
(f) Phasing in implementation of the program in the 2009-2011
biennium, including funding and legislation necessary to implement each
component of this initial phase; and
(g) Any specific projects or pilot projects that the work groups
and the institute have identified to ensure the state is adequately
prepared for the impacts of climate change and the necessary funding
for those projects or pilot projects.
(4) In developing the report required under subsection (1) of this
section, the department shall, in consultation with the institute, use
the comprehensive state climate change assessment prepared under
section 404, chapter 348, Laws of 2007, and the reports prepared by the
work groups. The department shall make both reports and the report
required under subsection (1) of this section available to the public
and ensure they are available on the department's web site or otherwise
widely disseminated.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 In preparing the report required under
section 3 of this act, the department shall consider if other private,
public, or tribal interests who may be impacted by the recommendations
of the report or by the specific impacts of climate change being
considered by the work groups are represented and shall invite those
interests to participate. The department shall include in its report
a list of interests represented in the work groups and which interests
were invited but did not participate. In order to allow for broad
participation by all areas of the state, the department shall hold as
many meetings as possible by teleconference, video conference, or other
means that do not require travel. In the event that meetings are held
so that interested parties may attend in person, the meetings shall
alternate between eastern and western Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The office of Washington state
climatologist is created within the University of Washington.
(2) The office of Washington state climatologist consists of the
director of the office, who is the state climatologist, and appropriate
staff and administrative support as necessary to carry out the powers
and duties of the office as enumerated in this section.
(3) The director of the office must be appointed by the president
of the University of Washington.
(4) The office of Washington state climatologist has the following
powers and duties:
(a) To serve as a credible and expert source of climate and weather
information for state and local decision makers and agencies working on
drought, flooding, climate change, and other related issues;
(b) To gather and disseminate, and where practicable archive, in
the most cost-effective manner possible, all climate and weather
information that is or could be of value to policy and decision makers
in the state;
(c) To act as the representative of the state in all climatological
and meteorological matters, both within and outside of the state, when
requested by the legislative or executive branches of the state
government;
(d) To prepare, publish, and disseminate climate summaries for
those individuals, agencies, and organizations whose activities are
related to the welfare of the state and are affected by climate and
weather;
(e) To supply critical information for drought preparedness and
emergency response as needed to implement the state's drought
contingency response plan maintained by the department under RCW
43.83B.410, and to serve as a member of the state's drought water
supply and emergency response committees as may be formed in response
to a drought event;
(f) To conduct and report on studies of climate and weather
phenomena of significant socioeconomic importance to the state; and
(g) To evaluate the significance of natural and man-made changes in
important features of the climate affecting the state, and to report
this information to those agencies and organizations in the state who
are likely to be affected by these changes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Sections 1 through 5 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.
(2) If chapter --- ([House] [Senate] Bill No. ---), Laws of 2008
becomes law and is codified as a new chapter in Title 43 RCW, sections
1 through 5 of this act shall be codified in the same new chapter in
Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---