BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends that new passenger
cars, light duty trucks, and medium duty passenger vehicles for sale in
Washington display clear and easy to understand information disclosing
the new vehicle's greenhouse gas emissions. Further, the legislature
intends that disclosure of such emissions serves as a means of
educating consumers, other motorists, and the general public about the
sources of greenhouse gas, their impact, available options, and in
particular the role and contribution of automobiles and other motor
vehicles.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.120A
RCW to read as follows:
(1) No model year 2010 or subsequent model year new passenger car,
light duty truck, or medium duty passenger vehicle may be sold in
Washington unless there is securely and conspicuously affixed in a
clearly visible location a label on which the manufacturer clearly
discloses comparative greenhouse gas emissions for that new vehicle.
(2) The label required by this section should include a greenhouse
gas index or rating system that contains quantitative and graphical
information presented in a continuous, easy-to-read scale that compares
the greenhouse gas emissions from the vehicle with the average
projected greenhouse gas emissions from all passenger cars, light duty
trucks, and medium duty passenger vehicles of the same model year. For
reference purposes, the index or rating system should also identify the
greenhouse gas emissions from the vehicle model of that same model year
that has the lowest greenhouse gas emissions.
(3) The index or rating system included in the label under
subsection (2) of this section shall be updated as necessary to ensure
that the differences in greenhouse gas emissions among vehicles are
readily apparent to the consumer.
(4) An automobile manufacturer may apply to the department of
ecology for approval of an alternative to the disclosure labeling
requirement that is at least as effective in providing notification and
disclosure of the vehicle's greenhouse gas emissions as is the labeling
required by this section.
(5) A label that complies with the requirements of the California
greenhouse gas vehicle labeling program shall be deemed to meet the
requirements of this section and any rules adopted under this section.
(6) The department of ecology may adopt such rules as are necessary
to implement this section.
(7) The department of ecology shall provide a status report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature on or before December 1,
2008, (a) outlining its approach and progress toward implementing a
greenhouse gas vehicle emissions disclosure labeling program for
Washington, (b) providing an update on the status of California's
greenhouse gas vehicle labeling program, and (c) making recommendations
as necessary for legislation to meet the intent and purpose of chapter
. . ., Laws of 2008 (this act) by the 2010 model year.

--- END ---