BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the arts can
teach much about every culture through its literature, visual arts,
music, dance, and drama. Throughout history people have recorded their
struggles, their dreams, and their lives in works of art. Many people
recognize that to be truly well-educated, one must not only learn to
appreciate the arts but must have rich opportunities to actively
participate in creative work. The ability to think and work creatively
are increasingly important skills for the twenty-first century
workforce, and students learn these skills through meaningful work in
the arts.
The legislature further finds that the arts can bring every
academic subject to life and that the integration of the arts with the
fuller academic curriculum, including reading, mathematics, science,
and social studies, can enrich student experiences, enhance student
engagement, extend student learning, and deepen student understanding
of all the academic content areas. The legislature intends to provide
resources to expand and improve arts instruction and arts integration
in our schools and transform the teaching, learning, and school
environments in Washington through the use of the arts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Within the amounts specifically appropriated for this purpose,
beginning with the 2012-13 school year and each school year thereafter,
the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall distribute
a per student allocation to school districts based on the number of
full-time equivalent students. This funding is intended to allow
school districts to institute and sustain arts instruction, arts-infused curriculum, and related arts programs and projects in public
schools, which could include professional development for classroom
teachers, specialist teachers, and principals in order to continue the
curriculum, programs, and projects in the future. Curriculum,
programs, and projects funded by school districts with their per
student allocation provided in this section shall be developed in
alignment with the state essential academic learning requirements in
the arts, and shall assist students to make connections within and
across the arts to other disciplines, to learn about other cultures,
and to strengthen communities through the use of the arts.
(2) To the maximum extent possible, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction and school districts shall
acknowledge the Washington state lottery as the source of funding for
the arts programs funded from the per student allocations. This
acknowledgement may include public meetings, brochures, advertising,
and press releases.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.79 RCW
to read as follows:
The school arts programs account is created in the state treasury.
Receipts from the state lottery, as provided in RCW 67.70.240(6) must
be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the account may be used
only for providing per student distributions to school districts in
accordance with section 2 of this act. Moneys in the account may be
spent only after appropriation.

Sec. 4 RCW 67.70.240 and 2001 c 3 s 4 are each amended to read as
follows:
The moneys in the state lottery account shall be used only:
(1) For the payment of prizes to the holders of winning lottery
tickets or shares;
(2) For purposes of making deposits into the reserve account
created by RCW 67.70.250 and into the lottery administrative account
created by RCW 67.70.260;
(3) For purposes of making deposits into the education construction
fund and student achievement fund created in RCW 43.135.045. For the
transition period from July 1, 2001, until and including June 30, 2002,
fifty percent of the moneys not otherwise obligated under this section
shall be placed in the student achievement fund and fifty percent of
these moneys shall be placed in the education construction fund. On
and after July 1, 2002, until June 30, 2004, seventy-five percent of
these moneys shall be placed in the student achievement fund and
twenty-five percent shall be placed in the education construction fund.
On and after July 1, 2004, all deposits not otherwise obligated under
this section shall be placed in the education construction fund.
Moneys in the state lottery account deposited in the education
construction fund and the student achievement fund are included in
"general state revenues" under RCW 39.42.070;
(4) For distribution to a county for the purpose of paying the
principal and interest payments on bonds issued by the county to
construct a baseball stadium, as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including
reasonably necessary preconstruction costs. Three million dollars
shall be distributed under this subsection during calendar year 1996.
During subsequent years, such distributions shall equal the prior
year's distributions increased by four percent. Distributions under
this subsection shall cease when the bonds issued for the construction
of the baseball stadium are retired, but not more than twenty years
after the tax under RCW 82.14.0485 is first imposed;
(5) For distribution to the stadium and exhibition center account,
created in RCW 43.99N.060. Subject to the conditions of RCW
43.99N.070, six million dollars shall be distributed under this
subsection during the calendar year 1998. During subsequent years,
such distribution shall equal the prior year's distributions increased
by four percent. No distribution may be made under this subsection
after December 31, 1999, unless the conditions for issuance of the
bonds under RCW 43.99N.020(2) are met. Distributions under this
subsection shall cease when the bonds are retired, but not later than
December 31, 2020;
(6) For distribution to the school arts programs account as created
in section 3 of this act. The distributions in subsection (4) of this
section, upon the earlier of retirement of the baseball stadium bonds
or twenty years after the tax under RCW 82.14.0485 is first imposed,
shall be distributed for the purposes of and subject to the conditions
of sections 2 and 3 of this act;
(7) For the purchase and promotion of lottery games and game-related services; and
(((7))) (8) For the payment of agent compensation.
The office of financial management shall require the allotment of
all expenses paid from the account and shall report to the ways and
means committees of the senate and house of representatives any changes
in the allotments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
By December 1, 2012, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall submit a report to the appropriate policy and fiscal
committees of the legislature. The report shall include information on
the amounts of per student allocations from section 2 of this act to
school districts for art programs, summary information on how school
districts utilized the per student allocations, and the impact of the
programs and activities resulting from these allocations on student
outcomes.

--- END ---