BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2007 c 523 s 5, 2007 c 357 s 21, and
2007 c 214 s 14 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the foster care scholarship endowment fund, the foster care
endowed scholarship trust fund, the students with dependents grant
account, the basic health plan self-insurance reserve account, the
contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined
fund drive account, the commemorative works account, the Washington
international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the developmental
disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account, the fair fund,
the family leave insurance account, the fruit and vegetable inspection
account, the future teachers conditional scholarship account, the
gambling revolving fund, the game farm alternative account, the GET
ready for math and science scholarship account, the grain inspection
revolving fund, the juvenile accountability incentive account, the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' plan 2 expense fund, the local
tourism promotion account, the produce railcar pool account, the
regional transportation investment district account, the rural
rehabilitation account, the stadium and exhibition center account, the
youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance revolving fund, the
sulfur dioxide abatement account, the children's trust fund, the
Washington horse racing commission Washington bred owners' bonus fund
account, the Washington horse racing commission class C purse fund
account, the individual development account program account, the
Washington horse racing commission operating account (earnings from the
Washington horse racing commission operating account must be credited
to the Washington horse racing commission class C purse fund account),
the life sciences discovery fund, the Washington state heritage center
account, and the reading achievement account. However, the earnings to
be distributed shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right of way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2008.

--- END ---