BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An insurer shall pay the proceeds of any benefits under a
policy of group life insurance insuring the life of any person who was
a resident of this state at the time of death. The proceeds must be
paid not more than thirty days after the insurer has received
satisfactory proof of death of the insured. If the proceeds are not
paid within the thirty-day period, the insurer shall also pay interest
on the proceeds from the date of death of the insured to the date when
the proceeds are paid.
(2) The interest required under subsection (1) of this section
accrues commencing on the date of death at the rate then paid by the
insurer on other withdrawable policy proceeds left with the company or
eight percent, whichever is greater.
(3) Benefits payable that have not been tendered to the beneficiary
within ninety days of the receipt of proof of death accrue interest,
commencing on the ninety-first day, at the rate under subsection (2) of
this section plus three percent.

--- END ---