BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.14.020 and 1986 c 296 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to other provisions of this chapter, each authorized
insurer except title insurers shall on or before the first day of March
of each year pay to the state treasurer through the commissioner's
office a tax on premiums. Except as provided in subsection (2) of this
section, such tax shall be in the amount of two percent of all
premiums, excluding amounts returned to or the amount of reductions in
premiums allowed to holders of industrial life policies for payment of
premiums directly to an office of the insurer, collected or received by
the insurer under RCW 48.14.090 during the preceding calendar year
other than ocean marine and foreign trade insurances, after deducting
premiums paid to policyholders as returned premiums, upon risks or
property resident, situated, or to be performed in this state. For tax
purposes, the reporting of premiums shall be on a written basis or on
a paid-for basis consistent with the basis required by the annual
statement. For the purposes of this section the consideration received
by an insurer for the granting of an annuity shall not be deemed to be
a premium.
(2) In the case of insurers which require the payment by their
policyholders at the inception of their policies of the entire premium
thereon in the form of premiums or premium deposits which are the same
in amount, based on the character of the risks, regardless of the
length of term for which such policies are written, such tax shall be
in the amount of two percent of the gross amount of such premiums and
premium deposits upon policies on risks resident, located, or to be
performed in this state, in force as of the thirty-first day of
December next preceding, less the unused or unabsorbed portion of such
premiums and premium deposits computed at the average rate thereof
actually paid or credited to policyholders or applied in part payment
of any renewal premiums or premium deposits on one-year policies
expiring during such year.
(3) Each authorized insurer shall with respect to all ocean marine
and foreign trade insurance contracts written within this state during
the preceding calendar year, on or before the first day of March of
each year pay to the state treasurer through the commissioner's office
a tax of ninety-five one-hundredths of one percent on its gross
underwriting profit. Such gross underwriting profit shall be
ascertained by deducting from the net premiums (i.e., gross premiums
less all return premiums and premiums for reinsurance) on such ocean
marine and foreign trade insurance contracts the net losses paid (i.e.,
gross losses paid less salvage and recoveries on reinsurance ceded)
during such calendar year under such contracts. In the case of
insurers issuing participating contracts, such gross underwriting
profit shall not include, for computation of the tax prescribed by this
subsection, the amounts refunded, or paid as participation dividends,
by such insurers to the holders of such contracts.
(4) The state does hereby preempt the field of imposing excise or
privilege taxes upon insurers or their agents, other than title
insurers, and no county, city, town or other municipal subdivision
shall have the right to impose any such taxes upon such insurers or
their agents.
(5) If an authorized insurer collects or receives any such premiums
on account of policies in force in this state which were originally
issued by another insurer and which other insurer is not authorized to
transact insurance in this state on its own account, such collecting
insurer shall be liable for and shall pay the tax on such premiums.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.14.090 and 1963 c 195 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
In determining the amount of direct premium taxable in this state,
all such premiums written, procured, or received in this state shall be
deemed written upon risks or property resident, situated, or to be
performed in this state except such premiums as are properly allocated
or apportioned and reported as taxable premiums of any other state or
states. For tax purposes, the reporting of premiums shall be on a
written basis or on a paid-for basis consistent with the basis required
by the annual statement.

--- END ---