BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.68.380 and 1995 c 153 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The aviation division of the department is responsible for the
conduct and management of all aerial search and rescue within the
state. This includes search and rescue efforts involving aircraft and
airships. The division is also responsible for search and rescue
activities involving electronic emergency signaling devices such as
emergency locater transmitters (ELT's) and emergency position
indicating radio beacons (EPIRB's).
(2) An act or omission by any person registered with the aviation
division of the department for the purpose of engaging in aerial search
and rescue activities, while engaged in such activities, shall not
impose any liability on the department or the person for civil damages
resulting from the act or omission. However, the immunity provided
under this subsection shall not apply to an act or omission that
constitutes gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct. For the
purpose of this subsection, "aerial search and rescue activities"
includes, but is not limited to, training and training-related
activities, but does not include appropriate search and rescue
activities conducted under the authority of RCW 38.52.400.

--- END ---