BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 50.20.090 and 1988 c 83 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An individual shall be disqualified for benefits for any week
with respect to which the commissioner finds that the individual's
unemployment is((:
(a))) due to a strike at the factory, establishment, or other
premises at which the individual is or was last employed((; or
(b) Due to a lockout by his or her employer who is a member of a
multi-employer bargaining unit and who has locked out the employees at
the factory, establishment, or other premises at which the individual
is or was last employed after one member of the multi-employer
bargaining unit has been struck by its employees as a result of the
multi-employer bargaining process)).
(2) Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply if it is shown
to the satisfaction of the commissioner that:
(a) The individual is not participating in or financing or directly
interested in the strike ((or lockout)) that caused the individual's
unemployment; and
(b) The individual does not belong to a grade or class of workers
of which, immediately before the commencement of the strike ((or
lockout)), there were members employed at the premises at which the
strike ((or lockout)) occurs, any of whom are participating in or
financing or directly interested in the strike ((or lockout)):
PROVIDED, That if in any case separate branches of work which are
commonly conducted as separate businesses in separate premises are
conducted in separate departments of the same premises, each such
department shall, for the purpose of this ((subdivision)) subsection,
be deemed to be a separate factory, establishment, or other premises.
(3) Any disqualification imposed under this section shall end when
the strike ((or lockout)) is terminated.

--- END ---