BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.10.569 and 1990 c 288 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each institution of higher education with a commissioned police
force shall report to the Washington association of sheriffs and police
chiefs or its successor agency, on a monthly basis, crime statistics
for the Washington state uniform crime report, in the format required
by the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, or its
successor agency. Institutions of higher education which do not have
commissioned police forces shall report crime statistics through
appropriate local law enforcement agencies.
(2) Each institution of higher education shall publish and
distribute a report which shall be updated annually and which shall
include the crime statistics as reported under subsection (1) of this
section for the most recent three-year period. Upon request, the
institution shall provide the report to every person who submits an
application for admission to either a main or branch campus, and to
each new employee at the time of employment. In its acknowledgment of
receipt of the formal application for admission, the institution shall
notify the applicant of the availability of such information. The
information also shall be provided on an annual basis to all students
and employees. Institutions with more than one campus shall provide
the required information on a campus-by-campus basis.
(3)(a) Within existing resources, each institution of higher
education shall ((provide to every new student and new employee)) make
available to all students, faculty, and staff, and upon request to
other interested persons, ((information which follows the general
categories for safety policies and procedures outlined in this section.
Such categories shall, at a minimum, include)) a campus safety plan
that includes, at a minimum, the following:
(i) Data regarding:
(A) Campus enrollments((,));
(B) Campus nonstudent workforce profile((,)); and
(C) The number ((and duties)) of campus security personnel((,));
(ii) Policies, procedures, and programs related to:
(A) Preventing and responding to violence and other campus
emergencies;
(B) Setting the weapons policy on campus;
(C) Controlled substances as defined in RCW 64.44.010; and
(D) Governing student privacy;
(iii) Information about:
(A) Sexual assault, domestic violence, and stalking, including
contact information for campus and community victim advocates,
information on where to view or receive campus policies on complaints,
and the name and contact information of the individual or office to
whom students and employees may direct complaints of sexual assault,
stalking, or domestic violence; and
(B) Sexual harassment, including contact information for campus and
community victim advocates, information on where to view or receive
campus policies on complaints, and the name and contact information of
the individual or office to whom students and employees may direct
complaints of sexual harassment;
(iv) Descriptions of:
(A) Mutual assistance arrangements with state and local police((,
sexual assault and domestic violence and policies on controlled
substances));
(B) Methods and options that persons with disabilities or special
needs have to access services and programs;
(C) Escort and transportation services that provide for individual
security;
(D) Mental health and counseling services available to students,
faculty, and staff;
(E) Procedures for communicating with students, faculty, staff, the
public, and the media, during and following natural and nonnatural
emergencies.
((Information)) (b) The campus safety plan shall include, for the
most recent academic year ((also shall include)):
(i) A description of ((any)) programs and services offered by ((an
institution's student affairs or services department, and by student
government organizations regarding)) the institution and
student-sponsored organizations that provide for crime prevention and
counseling((, including a directory)). The description must include a
listing of the available services ((and appropriate telephone numbers
and physical locations of these services. In addition)), the service
locations, and how the services may be contacted; and
(ii) For institutions maintaining student housing facilities
((shall include)), information detailing security policies and programs
for those facilities.
(c)(i) Institutions with a main campus and one or more branch
campuses shall provide the information on a campus-by-campus basis.
((In the case of)) (ii) Community and technical colleges((,
colleges)) shall provide such information ((to)) for the main campuses
only, and shall provide reasonable alternative information ((at)) for
any off-campus centers and ((other)) affiliated college sites enrolling
((less)) fewer than one hundred students.
(4)(a) Each institution shall enter into memoranda of understanding
that set forth responsibilities for the various local jurisdictions in
the event of a campus emergency.
(b) Each institution shall enter into mutual aid agreements with
local jurisdictions regarding the shared use of equipment and
technology in the event of a campus emergency.
(c) Memoranda of understanding and mutual aid agreements shall be
updated and included in campus safety plans.
(5)(a) Each institution shall establish a task force ((which shall
annually)) that examines campus security and safety issues at least
annually. ((The task force shall review the report published and
distributed pursuant to this section in order to ensure the accuracy
and effectiveness of the report, and make any suggestions for
improvement. This)) Each task force shall include representation from
the institution's administration, faculty, staff, recognized student
organizations, and police or security organization.
(b) Each task force shall review the safety plan published and
distributed under this section for its respective institution, in order
to ensure its accuracy and effectiveness and to make any suggestions
for improvement.
(6) The president of each institution shall designate a specific
individual responsible for monitoring and coordinating the
institution's compliance with this section and shall ensure that
contact information for this individual is made available to all
students, faculty, and staff.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each institution of higher education shall take the following
actions:
(a) By October 30, 2008, submit a self-study assessing its ability
to facilitate the safety of students, faculty, staff, administration,
and visitors on each campus, including an evaluation of the
effectiveness of these measures, an assessment of the institution's
ability to disseminate information in a timely and efficient manner to
students, faculty, and staff, an evaluation of the institution's
ability to provide an appropriate level of mental health services, and
an action plan and timelines describing plans to maximize program
effectiveness for the next two biennia. Four-year institutions shall
submit their studies to the higher education coordinating board.
Community and technical colleges shall submit their studies to the
state board for community and technical colleges.
(b) By October 30th of each even-numbered year, beginning in 2010,
each institution shall submit an update to its plan, including an
assessment of the results of activities undertaken under any previous
plan to address unmet safety issues, and additional activities, or
modifications of current activities, to be undertaken to address
remaining safety issues at the institution.
(2) The higher education coordinating board and the state board for
community and technical colleges shall report biennially, beginning
December 31, 2010, to the governor and the higher education committees
of the house of representatives and the senate on:
(a) The efforts of each institution and the extent to which it has
complied with RCW 28B.10.569 and subsection (1)(b) of this section; and
(b) Recommendations on measures to assist institutions to ensure
and enhance campus safety.

--- END ---