BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 2.36.065 and 1993 c 408 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
It shall be the duty of the judges of the superior court to ensure
continued random selection of the master jury list and jury panels,
which shall be done ((without)) with regard to whether a person's name
originally appeared on the list of registered voters, or on the list of
licensed drivers and identicard holders, or both. If a person's name
originally appeared on the list of registered voters, or on the list of
licensed drivers and identicard holders, or both, then his or her name
shall not appear again on the master jury list until each and every
registered voter, licensed driver, and identicard holder who resides in
the county has been summoned for jury service. The judges shall review
the process from time to time and shall cause to be kept on file with
the county clerk a description of the jury selection process. Any
person who desires may inspect this description in said office.
Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as requiring uniform
equipment or method throughout the state, so long as fair and random
selection of the master jury list and jury panels is achieved.

Sec. 2 RCW 2.36.093 and 1992 c 93 s 3 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) At such time as the judge or judges of any court of any county
shall deem that the public business requires a jury term to be held,
the judge or judges shall direct that a jury panel be selected and
summoned to serve for the ensuing jury term or terms.
(2) A person who has been summoned for jury service shall not be
summoned to serve again as a juror until all persons listed on the
master jury list have been summoned for service.
(3) The court shall establish the length and number of jury terms
in a consecutive twelve-month period, and shall establish the time of
juror service consistent with the provisions of RCW 2.36.010.

--- END ---