BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 2.36.150 and 2006 c 372 s 903 are each amended to read
as follows:
Jurors shall receive for each day's attendance, besides mileage at
the rate determined under RCW 43.03.060, the following expense
payments:
(1) Grand jurors may receive up to ((twenty-five)) sixty-five
dollars but in no case less than ((ten)) fifty dollars;
(2) Petit jurors may receive up to ((twenty-five)) sixty-five
dollars but in no case less than ((ten)) fifty dollars;
(3) Coroner's jurors may receive up to ((twenty-five)) sixty-five
dollars but in no case less than ((ten)) fifty dollars;
(4) District court jurors may receive up to ((twenty-five))
sixty-five dollars but in no case less than ((ten)) fifty dollars((:
PROVIDED, That));
(5) The state shall fully reimburse the county for the juror
compensation required under this section.
However, a person excused from jury service at his or her own
request shall be allowed not more than a per diem and such mileage, if
any, as to the court shall seem just and equitable under all
circumstances((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That)). The state shall fully
reimburse the county in which trial is held for all jury fees and
witness fees related to criminal cases which result from incidents
occurring within an adult or juvenile correctional institution((:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That the expense payments paid to jurors shall be
determined by the county legislative authority and shall be uniformly
applied within the county)).
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2007, jurors participating in
pilot projects in superior, district, and municipal courts may receive
juror fees of up to sixty-two dollars for each day of attendance in
addition to mileage reimbursement at the rate determined under RCW
43.03.060.

Sec. 2 RCW 3.50.135 and 1984 c 258 s 126 are each amended to read
as follows:
In all civil cases, the plaintiff or defendant may demand a jury,
which shall consist of six citizens of the state who shall be impaneled
and sworn as in cases before district courts, or the trial may be by a
judge of the municipal court: PROVIDED, That no jury trial may be held
on a proceeding involving a traffic infraction. A party requesting a
jury shall pay to the court a fee which shall be the same as that for
a jury in district court. If more than one party requests a jury, only
one jury fee shall be collected by the court. The fee shall be
apportioned among the requesting parties. Each juror may receive up to
((twenty-five)) sixty-five dollars but in no case less than ((ten))
fifty dollars for each day in attendance upon the municipal court, and
in addition thereto shall receive mileage at the rate determined under
RCW 43.03.060((: PROVIDED, That the compensation paid jurors shall be
determined by the legislative authority of the city and shall be
uniformly applied)). The state shall fully reimburse the city for the
juror compensation required under this section. Jury trials shall be
allowed in all criminal cases unless waived by the defendant.

Sec. 3 RCW 35.20.090 and 1987 c 202 s 195 are each amended to
read as follows:
In all civil cases and criminal cases where jurisdiction is
concurrent with district courts as provided in RCW 35.20.250, within
the jurisdiction of the municipal court, the plaintiff or defendant may
demand a jury, which shall consist of six citizens of the state who
shall be impaneled and sworn as in cases before district courts, or the
trial may be by a judge of the municipal court: PROVIDED, That no jury
trial may be held on a proceeding involving a traffic infraction. A
defendant requesting a jury shall pay to the court a fee which shall be
the same as that for a jury in district court. Where there is more
than one defendant in an action and one or more of them requests a
jury, only one jury fee shall be collected by the court. Each juror
may receive up to ((twenty-five)) sixty-five dollars but in no case
less than ((ten)) fifty dollars for each day in attendance upon the
municipal court, and in addition thereto shall receive mileage at the
rate determined under RCW 43.03.060((: PROVIDED, That the compensation
paid jurors shall be determined by the legislative authority of the
city and shall be uniformly applied)). The state shall fully reimburse
the city for the juror compensation required under this section. Trial
by jury shall be allowed in criminal cases involving violations of city
ordinances commencing January 1, 1972, unless such incorporated city
affected by this chapter has made provision therefor prior to January
1, 1972.

--- END ---