BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.09.260 and 2000 c 21 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (4), (5), (6), (8),
and (10) of this section, the court shall not modify a prior custody
decree or a parenting plan unless it finds, upon the basis of facts
that have arisen since the prior decree or plan or that were unknown to
the court at the time of the prior decree or plan, that a substantial
change has occurred in the circumstances of the child or the nonmoving
party and that the modification is in the best interest of the child
and is necessary to serve the best interests of the child.
(2) In applying these standards, the court shall retain the
residential schedule established by the decree or parenting plan
unless:
(a) The parents agree to the modification;
(b) The child has been integrated into the family of the petitioner
with the consent of the other parent in substantial deviation from the
parenting plan;
(c) The child's present environment is detrimental to the child's
physical, mental, or emotional health and the harm likely to be caused
by a change of environment is outweighed by the advantage of a change
to the child; or
(d) The court has found the nonmoving parent in contempt of court
at least twice within three years because the parent failed to comply
with the residential time provisions in the court-ordered parenting
plan, or the parent has been convicted of custodial interference in the
first or second degree under RCW 9A.40.060 or 9A.40.070.
(3) A conviction of custodial interference in the first or second
degree under RCW 9A.40.060 or 9A.40.070 shall constitute a substantial
change of circumstances for the purposes of this section.
(4) The court may reduce or restrict contact between the child and
the parent with whom the child does not reside a majority of the time
if it finds that the reduction or restriction would serve and protect
the best interests of the child using the criteria in RCW 26.09.191.
(5) The court may order adjustments to the residential aspects of
a parenting plan upon a showing of a substantial change in
circumstances of either parent or of the child, and without
consideration of the factors set forth in subsection (2) of this
section, if the proposed modification is only a minor modification in
the residential schedule that does not change the residence the child
is scheduled to reside in the majority of the time and:
(a) Does not exceed twenty-four full days in a calendar year; or
(b) Is based on a change of residence of the parent with whom the
child does not reside the majority of the time or an involuntary change
in work schedule by a parent which makes the residential schedule in
the parenting plan impractical to follow; or
(c) Does not result in a schedule that exceeds ninety overnights
per year in total, if the court finds that, at the time the petition
for modification is filed, the decree of dissolution or parenting plan
does not provide reasonable time with the parent with whom the child
does not reside a majority of the time, and further, the court finds
that it is in the best interests of the child to increase residential
time with the parent in excess of the residential time period in (a) of
this subsection. However, any motion under this subsection (5)(c) is
subject to the factors established in subsection (2) of this section if
the party bringing the petition has previously been granted a
modification under this same subsection within twenty-four months of
the current motion. Relief granted under this section shall not be the
sole basis for adjusting or modifying child support.
(6) The court may order adjustments to the residential aspects of
a parenting plan pursuant to a proceeding to permit or restrain a
relocation of the child. The person objecting to the relocation of the
child or the relocating person's proposed revised residential schedule
may file a petition to modify the parenting plan, including a change of
the residence in which the child resides the majority of the time,
without a showing of adequate cause other than the proposed relocation
itself. A hearing to determine adequate cause for modification shall
not be required so long as the request for relocation of the child is
being pursued. In making a determination of a modification pursuant to
relocation of the child, the court shall first determine whether to
permit or restrain the relocation of the child using the procedures and
standards provided in RCW 26.09.405 through 26.09.560. Following that
determination, the court shall determine what modification pursuant to
relocation should be made, if any, to the parenting plan or custody
order or visitation order.
(7) A parent with whom the child does not reside a majority of the
time and whose residential time with the child is subject to
limitations pursuant to RCW 26.09.191 (2) or (3) may not seek expansion
of residential time under subsection (5)(c) of this section unless that
parent demonstrates a substantial change in circumstances specifically
related to the basis for the limitation.
(8) If a parent with whom the child does not reside a majority of
the time voluntarily fails to exercise residential time for an extended
period, that is, one year or longer, the court upon proper motion may
make adjustments to the parenting plan in keeping with the best
interests of the minor child.
(9) A parent with whom the child does not reside a majority of the
time who is required by the existing parenting plan to complete
evaluations, treatment, parenting, or other classes may not seek
expansion of residential time under subsection (5)(c) of this section
unless that parent has fully complied with such requirements.
(10) The court may order adjustments to any of the nonresidential
aspects of a parenting plan upon a showing of a substantial change of
circumstances of either parent or of a child, and the adjustment is in
the best interest of the child. Adjustments ordered under this section
may be made without consideration of the factors set forth in
subsection (2) of this section.
(11)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, any court-ordered modification of a prior custody decree or parenting plan, based
solely on (i) the military service of a parent who is an active or
reserve member of any branch of the armed forces of the United States,
including the national guard, coast guard, and the armed forces
reserves, deployed outside the United States; or (ii) the federal
military service of a parent who is a member of a state national guard
or a member of a military reserve component, shall be temporary and
shall revert back to the prior custody decree or parenting plan at the
end of the deployment outside the United States or the federal military
service.
(b) A parent identified in (a) of this subsection may agree to a
modification of a child custody decree or a parenting plan that
continues past the end of the deployment outside the United States or
the federal military service.
(12) If the court finds that a motion to modify a prior decree or
parenting plan has been brought in bad faith, the court shall assess
the attorney's fees and court costs of the nonmoving parent against the
moving party.

--- END ---