BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) In the past two decades, Washington state has implemented
legislative initiatives to improve access to quality, affordable health
care in the state.
(a) The blue ribbon commission on health care costs and access
resulting in the passage of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No.
5930, that, among other actions, directed state agencies to integrate
prevention, chronic care management, and the medical home concept into
state purchased health care programs;
(b) The movement toward evidence-based health care purchasing for
state health care programs, including the prescription drug program and
its preferred drug list, the health technology assessment program, the
use of medical evidence to evaluate medical necessity under state
medical assistance programs and the direction provided in Engrossed
Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5930 relating to aligning payment
with evidence-based care; and
(c) The development of patient safety initiatives, including health
care facility reporting of adverse medical events and hospital-acquired
infection reporting.
(2) Despite these initiatives, the cost of health care has
continued to increase at a disproportionately high rate.
(3) Affordability is key to accessing health care, as evidenced by
the fact that more than half of the uninsured people in Washington
state are in low-income families, and low-wage workers are far more
likely to be uninsured than those with higher incomes. These
increasing costs are placing quality care beyond the reach of a growing
number of Washington citizens and contributing to health care
expenditures that strain the resources of individuals, businesses, and
public programs.
(4) Efforts by public and private purchasers to control
expenditures, and the stress these efforts place on the stability of
the health care workforce and viability of health care facilities,
threaten to reduce access to quality care for all residents of the
state.
(5) Prompt action is crucial to prevent further deterioration of
the health and well-being of Washingtonians.
(6) Addressing an issue of this importance and magnitude demands
the full engagement of concerned Washingtonians in a reasoned
examination of options to improve access to quality, affordable health
care.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The Washington citizens' work group on
health care is established.
(1) The governor shall appoint nine citizen members who may
include, but are not limited to, representatives from business, labor,
health care providers and consumer groups, and persons with expertise
in health care financing and health care ethics. In addition, eight
legislators from the health care committees of the house and senate
shall be appointed to the work group, with two members from each
caucus, in each house. The leadership of each caucus shall appoint
their members. The work group shall actively engage Washingtonians in
a bipartisan and public process to examine a number of options for
improving access to quality, affordable health care and review the
economic analysis of several health care reform proposals, as provided
in section 3 of this act.
(2) To engage Washingtonians in a process to examine options for
improving access to quality, affordable health care, the work group
shall:
(a) Seek to maximize participation of Washingtonians by conducting
meetings in regions of the state that include participation of health
care stakeholders and the health care industry, as well as interested
residents;
(b) Provide information to Washingtonians on ongoing trends or
issues that affect affordability, access, quality, and efficiency;
(c) Present information and seek public input about the health care
proposals described in section 3 of this act, including any findings
from the economic analysis of the proposals;
(d) Communicate its efforts through a variety of methods,
including:
(i) Concise information describing underlying health care issues,
the health care proposals under review, and principles guiding the
evaluation of those proposals;
(ii) A web site that announces meeting times and locations,
provides detailed information on the health care proposals under
review, and provides opportunities for public input; and
(iii) Public notification of meetings.
(3) The economic analysis of health care reform proposals provided
in section 3 of this act shall be conducted by an independent entity.
To the extent that any proposal has recent extensive analysis
available, the independent entity shall review and make use of the
available analysis. Each evaluation shall address the impact of
implementation of the proposal on:
(a) The number of Washingtonians covered and number remaining
uninsured;
(b) The scope of coverage available to persons covered under the
proposal;
(c) The impact on affordability of health care to individuals,
businesses, and government;
(d) The redistribution of amounts currently spent by individuals,
businesses, and government on health, as well as any savings;
(e) Administrative efficiencies and resulting savings;
(f) The impact on hospital charity care; and
(g) The extent to which each proposal promotes:
(i) Improved health outcomes;
(ii) Prevention and early intervention;
(iii) Chronic care management;
(iv) Services based on empirical evidence;
(v) Incentives to use effective and necessary services;
(vi) Disincentives to discourage use of marginally effective or
inappropriate services; and
(vii) A medical home.
(4) By December 1, 2008, the work group shall report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature on the work group's findings,
including:
(a) A summary of the work group's activities, including meetings
held, number of people in attendance, and number of contacts from the
public;
(b) A summary of public input, including feedback on funding
options;
(c) The results of the work group's review of the proposals. In
reviewing the proposals, the work group shall evaluate the extent to
which each proposal:
(i) Provides a medical home for every family;
(ii) Provides health care that Washington families can afford;
(iii) Promotes improved health outcomes, in part through a more
efficient delivery system;
(iv) Requires that individuals, employers, and government share in
financing the proposal; and
(v) Enables Washington families to choose their provider and health
network, and have the option of retaining their current provider;
(d) A summary of the work group's conclusions; and
(e) Recommendations related to the work group's review of the
proposals and any suggestions on the funding options, including
suggestions for the adoption of any health care proposal during the
2009 session of the legislature.
(5) The work group may seek other funds including private
contributions and in-kind donations for activities described under
subsection (2) of this section.
(6) This section expires June 30, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The work group shall present information
and seek public input about, direct the economic analysis of, and
review the following health care proposals:
(a) A proposal, similar to Proposed Second Substitute Senate Bill
No. 6030 (2008), permitting carriers to offer health plans with reduced
requirements;
(b) A proposal to establish a health insurance exchange or
connector, similar to Senate Bill No. 6574 (2008) and to the federal
employee health benefit plan;
(c) A proposal, as described in Senate Bill No. 6603 (2008), to
provide a guaranteed benefit plan for all Washingtonians covering
annual catastrophic health expenses and basic preventive care;
(d) A proposal, as described in Senate Bill No. 6221 (2008), to
cover all Washingtonians with a comprehensive, standardized benefit
package purchased through a competitive procurement process or a fee-for-service option, funded through a payroll assessment applied to
employers and employees; and
(e) A proposal to establish a single payer health care system,
similar to an approach described in Senate Bill No. 5756 (2007) and to
the health care system in Canada.
(2) In addition to the proposals described in subsection (1) of
this section, the work group may develop its own proposal or proposals.
The work group may seek additional information from sponsors of the
proposals described in subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Consistent with funds appropriated
specifically for this purpose, the health care authority shall contract
with an independent nonpartisan entity with national expertise in
communicating health care cost, quality, and access research from all
perspectives, and expertise in health economics and actuarial science.
The independent contractor shall direct the economic analysis of a
variety of health care reform proposals. An independent contractor may
also be selected to schedule and conduct the work group meetings and
other activities to enable the work group to complete its
responsibilities in a timely and effective manner. The health care
authority may issue a sole source contract with consultants already
providing similar services to the state if doing so will expedite the
work without compromising quality or increasing cost.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---