BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The sum of six million dollars is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2008, from the general
fund to the office of financial management for expenditure into the
homeless families services fund for the purpose of replenishing the
Washington families fund to match private donations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---