BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The department of fish and wildlife must
work with appropriate commercial fishers and commercial fishing
associations to consider ways to facilitate the commercial harvest of
Puget Sound salmon in a manner that conserves the resource, maintains
the economic well-being of the fishing industry, promotes orderly
fisheries, and enhances and improves commercial fishing in the state in
accordance with the intent of RCW 77.04.012. These discussions must
consider the impacts of economic changes that impact commercial
fisheries over time, and keep in mind the well-being of all aspects of
the Puget Sound commercial salmon industry. These discussions are
meant to address current issues within the commercial fishing industry,
and will not affect noncommercial fisheries or fishing interests. The
department of fish and wildlife must provide a summary of these
discussions, recommendations, and outcomes to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by November 1, 2008.
(2) The department of fish and wildlife must carry out the
requirements of this section within existing funds.
(3) This section expires December 31, 2008.

--- END ---