BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 LABELING. (1) All producers, growers, and
shippers of beef, pork, poultry, or lamb in this state shall label each
individual portion, piece, or package of beef, pork, poultry, or lamb
in a conspicuous place as legibly, indelibly, and permanently as the
nature of the commodity will permit, in a manner that indicates to an
ultimate purchaser that the product was produced in Washington.
(2) Muscle cuts and ground beef, pork, poultry, or lamb, including
any package that contains any blending of foreign and domestic product,
that is produced in any country other than the United States and
offered for retail sale in Washington must be labeled with a placard in
a manner that indicates to an ultimate purchaser the country of origin.
(3) If one of the products listed in subsection (2) of this section
is unlabeled and the retail vendor is unable to determine its country
of origin, the product must be labeled with a placard as "country of
origin unknown."
(4) All retail vendors engaged in the business of selling products
that are labeled or identified as to country of origin are prohibited
from willfully or knowingly removing the labels or identifying marks.
(5) A placard is not required for prepared foods for immediate sale
or ready to eat.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Department" means the department of agriculture.
(2) "Knowingly" means, with respect to conduct or to a circumstance
described by an offense, that the person is aware of the person's own
conduct or that the circumstance exists. A person acts knowingly with
respect to the result of conduct described by a statute defining an
offense when the person is aware that it is highly probable that the
result will be caused by the person's conduct. When knowledge of the
existence of a particular fact is an element of an offense, knowledge
is established if a person is aware of a high probability of its
existence.
(3) "Label" means a display of written, printed, or graphic matter
on the immediate container of an article. "Immediate container" does
not include package liners.
(4) "Labeling" means labels and other written, printed, or graphic
matter: (a) On an article or its containers or wrappers; or (b)
accompanying the article.
(5) "Package" means a container or wrapping in which a consumer
commodity is enclosed for use in the delivery or display of that
consumer commodity to retail purchasers. "Package" does not include:
(a) Shipping containers or wrappings used solely for the transportation
of a consumer commodity in bulk or in quantity to manufacturers,
packers, or processors or to wholesale or retail distributors; or (b)
shipping containers or outer wrappings used by retailers to ship or
deliver a commodity to retail customers if the containers and wrappings
bear no printed matter pertaining to a particular commodity.
(6) "Person" means an individual, partnership, corporation,
company, society, or association.
(7) "Placard" means a nonpermanent sign used to display or describe
food items for sale in a food service establishment or retail meat
establishment.
(8) "Purposely" means, with respect to a result or to conduct
described by a statute defining an offense, that it is the person's
conscious object to engage in that conduct or to cause that result.
When a particular purpose is an element of an offense, the element is
established although the purpose is conditional, unless the condition
negates the harm or evil sought to be prevented by the law defining the
offense.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 PENALTIES. (1) A person engaged in the
business of retail vending of muscle cuts and ground beef, pork,
poultry, or lamb who knowingly or purposely offers those products for
sale without ensuring that the products are clearly labeled as to the
country of origin, as provided in section 1(2) of this act, is subject
to the penalties in this subsection.
(a) For a first offense, a vendor shall be fined an amount not to
exceed one hundred dollars;
(b) For a second offense, a vendor shall be fined an amount not to
exceed two hundred fifty dollars; and
(c) For a third or subsequent offense, a vendor shall be fined an
amount not to exceed five hundred dollars.
(2) A person engaged in the business of retail vending of beef,
pork, poultry, or lamb who knowingly removes any labels or identifying
marks from beef, pork, poultry, or lamb that is labeled as to the
country of origin is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall
be fined an amount not to exceed five hundred dollars or be imprisoned
in the county jail for a term not to exceed six months, or both.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 RULE-MAKING AUTHORITY. (1) The department
may adopt rules to implement and enforce this chapter. The rules
adopted by the department may include but are not limited to:
(a) Statements that delineate the difference between imported and
unimported raw agricultural commodities for the purpose of this
chapter;
(b) The preferred labeling or placarding method for each commodity
type identified in this chapter; and
(c) Other rules that the department considers necessary to enforce
this chapter.
(2) The rules adopted to implement this chapter may not unduly
restrict a person from conducting business.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 CONFLICT WITH FEDERAL REQUIREMENTS. If any
provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance
is held invalid due to a conflict with federal law, the conflicting
part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict,
and such holding does not affect the operation of the remainder of this
act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 SHORT TITLE. This chapter may be known and
cited as the country of origin labeling act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 CAPTIONS NOT LAW. Captions used in this
chapter are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 SEVERABILITY. If any provision of this act
or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 16 RCW.

--- END ---