BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that it is the state's
policy to maintain the highest quality and reliability of drinking
water supplies to all citizens of the state. Small water systems may
face greater challenges in this regard because of declining quality in
water sources, catastrophic events such as flooding that impair water
sources, the age of the system's infrastructure, saltwater intrusion
into water sources, inadequate rate base for conducting necessary
improvements, and other challenges. In response to these needs, the
water system acquisition and rehabilitation program was created through
biennial budget law, and through the current biennium has a total of
nine million seven-hundred fifty thousand dollars toward assisting
dozens of water systems to improve the quality of water supply service
to thousands of customers.
It is the purpose of this act to establish an ongoing water system
acquisition and rehabilitation program, to direct a review of the
program to date, and to provide for recommendations for strengthening
the program and increasing the financial assistance available under the
program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.119A
RCW to read as follows:
Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this
specific purpose, the department shall provide financial assistance
through a water system acquisition and rehabilitation program, hereby
created. The program shall be jointly administered with the public
works board and the department of community, trade, and economic
development. The agencies shall adopt guidelines for the program using
as a model the procedures and criteria of the drinking water revolving
loan program authorized under RCW 70.119A.170. All financing provided
through the program must be in the form of grants that partially cover
project costs. The maximum grant to any eligible entity may not exceed
twenty-five percent of the funds allocated to the appropriation in any
fiscal year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The department of health, in
consultation with the public works board, shall prepare a report on the
water system acquisition and rehabilitation program in section 2 of
this act and make recommendations regarding strengthening the program
and increasing the financial assistance provided through the program.
(2) The report shall:
(a) Identify the state's policies and objectives regarding water
system management, operation, and regulation, including
regionalization, satellite management, and prevention of the
proliferation of small water systems; and
(b) Review the program's projects initiated and completed to date,
and other state funding assistance for water system acquisition and
rehabilitation.
(3) The report shall also review and make recommendations on the
following:
(a) Funding levels and funding sources;
(b) The form of assistance provided, whether grants or loans;
(c) Funding cycles, including an annual or open cycle;
(d) Eligibility of group B systems for assistance;
(e) Consideration of benefits other than public health or water
quality benefits, such as economic benefits;
(f) Activities that may be funded beyond acquisition,
preconstruction design, and construction, including the cost to
agencies to operate the program;
(g) The project priority setting process and relative priority for
funding projects for systems that serve few residential customers;
(h) Requiring installation of service meters in funded projects;
(i) Eligibility for grants of municipalities that have not owned
and operated a group A water system for at least five years;
(j) Allowing an eligible purveyor that has already acquired a
failing water system to be eligible for grants to cover any outstanding
costs of the rehabilitation of the failing water system;
(k) Tiering of project priorities to provide the highest priority
to assisting systems with a high public health risk; and
(l) Consideration of the system's rate base and the ability of the
households on the system to afford rate increases to fund a portion of
the necessary system rehabilitation.
(4) The report shall include a survey of estimated water system
acquisition and rehabilitation program funding needs, based on existing
informal survey information from local governments, the utilities and
transportation commission, and purveyors.
(5) The report shall be provided to the fiscal and water policy
committees of the senate and house of representatives not later than
January 1, 2009.

--- END ---