BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 38.40 RCW
to read as follows:
The military department active state service account is created in
the state treasury. Moneys may be placed in the account from
legislative appropriations and transfers, federal appropriations, or
any other lawful source. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for
claims and expenses for the organized militia called into active state
service to perform duties under RCW 38.08.040 that are not paid under
RCW 38.24.010 from nonappropriated funds, including but not limited to
claims and expenses arising from anticipated planning, training,
exercises, and other administrative duties that are not of an emergency
nature.

Sec. 2 RCW 38.24.010 and 2005 c 9 s 2 are each amended to read as
follows:
All bills, claims and demands for military purposes shall be
certified or verified and audited in the manner prescribed by
regulations promulgated by the governor and shall be paid by the state
treasurer from funds available for that purpose. In all cases where
the organized militia, or any part of the organized militia, is called
into ((the)) active state service ((of the state)) to perform duties
under RCW 38.08.040, except for anticipated planning, training,
exercises, and other administrative duties that are not of an emergent
nature, warrants for allowed pay and expenses for such services or
compensation for injuries or death shall be drawn upon the general fund
of the state treasury and paid out of any moneys in said fund not
otherwise appropriated. All such warrants shall be the obligation of
the state and shall bear interest at the legal rate from the date of
their presentation for payment. Claims and expenses for organized
militia in active state service under RCW 38.08.040 that are not paid
under this section may be paid under section 1 of this act.

--- END ---