BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Beginning July 1, 2008, the state parks
and recreation commission and the department of fish and wildlife shall
establish a pilot program to allow small scale prospecting and mining,
as defined in RCW 77.55.011, on ocean beaches. The pilot program must
be conducted from July 1, 2008, through July 1, 2010.
(2) The state parks and recreation commission, in consultation with
the department of fish and wildlife, shall establish at least three
demonstration areas in appropriate beach areas in the Washington state
seashore conservation area established for recreational use and
enjoyment of the public by RCW 79A.05.605. The demonstration areas
must be located between the southern border of Cape Disappointment
state park and the southern border of the Quinault Indian reservation,
and must allow small scale mineral prospecting for purposes of the
pilot program. Each demonstration area must be:
(a) Located in separate areas along the coast;
(b) Located in an area suitable for small scale prospecting as
determined by the state parks and recreation commission in consultation
with persons interested in small scale prospecting and mining; and
(c) Located in areas having minimal potential for damage to the
beach environment, birds, shellfish, other beach marine life, fish
habitat, and other recreational use.
(3) The department of fish and wildlife shall use existing
authority under chapter 77.55 RCW to issue individual hydraulic project
approval permits for small scale prospecting within the demonstration
areas established under subsection (2) of this section. The permits
must require that small scale prospecting and mining activities occur,
to the greatest extent possible, on the beach to minimize the removal
of sand from the area.
(4) The department of fish and wildlife shall monitor the
compliance of small scale prospecting and mining activities with the
permits issued for participation in the pilot program.
(5) By October 1, 2010, the department of fish and wildlife shall
report its findings and recommendations regarding small scale
prospecting and mining on ocean beaches to the state parks and
recreation commission. The department of fish and wildlife shall
consider public input prior to finalizing their findings and
recommendations.
(6) The state parks and recreation commission and the department of
fish and wildlife shall report their findings and recommendations on
the potential impacts and the activity of small scale prospecting and
mining on ocean beaches to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2010.

Sec. 2 RCW 79A.05.165 and 2007 c 441 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every person is guilty of a misdemeanor who:
(a) Cuts, breaks, injures, destroys, takes, or removes any tree,
shrub, timber, plant, or natural object in any park or parkway except
as authorized in section 1 of this act or in accordance with such rules
as the commission may prescribe; or
(b) Kills, or pursues with intent to kill, any bird or animal in
any park or parkway except in accordance with a research pass, permit,
or other approval issued by the commission, pursuant to rule, for
scientific research purposes; or
(c) Takes any fish from the waters of any park or parkway, except
in conformity with such general rules as the commission may prescribe;
or
(d) Willfully mutilates, injures, defaces, or destroys any
guidepost, notice, tablet, fence, inclosure, or work for the protection
or ornamentation of any park or parkway; or
(e) Lights any fire upon any park or parkway, except in such places
as the commission has authorized, or willfully or carelessly permits
any fire which he or she has lighted or which is under his or her
charge, to spread or extend to or burn any of the shrubbery, trees,
timber, ornaments, or improvements upon any park or parkway, or leaves
any campfire which he or she has lighted or which has been left in his
or her charge, unattended by a competent person, without extinguishing
it; or
(f) Places within any park or parkway or affixes to any object
therein contained, without a written license from the commission, any
word, character, or device designed to advertise any business,
profession, article, thing, exhibition, matter, or event.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, a person who
violates any rule adopted, promulgated, or issued by the commission
pursuant to the provisions of this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor.
(b) The commission may specify by rule, when not inconsistent with
applicable statutes, that violation of the rule is an infraction under
chapter 7.84 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act expires December 1, 2010.

--- END ---