BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.20.120 and 2005 c 314 s 306 and 2005 c 61 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
An applicant for a new or renewed driver's license must
successfully pass a driver licensing examination, conducted in English,
to qualify for a driver's license. The department shall give
examinations at places and times reasonably available to the people of
this state.
(1) Waiver. The department may waive:
(a) All or any part of the examination of any person applying for
the renewal of a driver's license unless the department determines that
the applicant is not qualified to hold a driver's license under this
title; or
(b) All or any part of the examination involving operating a motor
vehicle if the applicant:
(i) Surrenders a valid driver's license issued by the person's
previous home state; or
(ii) Provides for verification a valid driver's license issued by
a foreign driver licensing jurisdiction with which the department has
an informal agreement under RCW 46.20.125; and
(iii) Is otherwise qualified to be licensed.
(2) Fee. Each applicant for a new license must pay an examination
fee of twenty dollars.
(a) The examination fee is in addition to the fee charged for
issuance of the license.
(b) "New license" means a license issued to a driver:
(i) Who has not been previously licensed in this state; or
(ii) Whose last previous Washington license has been expired for
more than five years.
(3) An application for driver's license renewal may be submitted by
means of:
(a) Personal appearance before the department; or
(b) Mail or electronic commerce, if permitted by rule of the
department and if the applicant did not renew his or her license by
mail or by electronic commerce when it last expired. However, the
department may accept an application for renewal of a driver's license
submitted by means of mail or electronic commerce only if specific
authority and funding is provided for this purpose by June 30, 2004, in
the omnibus transportation appropriations act.
(4) A person whose license expired or will expire while he or she
is living outside the state, may:
(a) Apply to the department to extend the validity of his or her
license for no more than twelve months. If the person establishes to
the department's satisfaction that he or she is unable to return to
Washington before the date his or her license expires, the department
shall extend the person's license. The department may grant
consecutive extensions, but in no event may the cumulative total of
extensions exceed twelve months. An extension granted under this
section does not change the expiration date of the license for purposes
of RCW 46.20.181. The department shall charge a fee of five dollars
for each license extension;
(b) Apply to the department to renew his or her license by mail or,
if permitted by rule of the department, by electronic commerce even if
subsection (3)(b) of this section would not otherwise allow renewal by
that means. If the person establishes to the department's satisfaction
that he or she is unable to return to Washington within twelve months
of the date that his or her license expires, the department shall renew
the person's license by mail or, if permitted by rule of the
department, by electronic commerce.
(5) If a qualified person submits an application for renewal under
subsection (3)(b) or (4)(b) of this section, he or she is not required
to pass an examination nor provide an updated photograph. A license
renewed by mail or by electronic commerce that does not include a
photograph of the licensee must be labeled "not valid for
identification purposes."

Sec. 2 RCW 46.20.130 and 2006 c 190 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall prescribe the content of the driver
licensing examination and the manner of conducting the examination,
which shall include but is not limited to:
(a) A test of the applicant's eyesight and ability to see,
understand, and follow highway signs regulating, warning, and directing
traffic;
(b) A test, conducted in English, of the applicant's knowledge of
traffic laws and ability to understand and follow the directives of
lawful authority, orally or graphically, that regulate, warn, and
direct traffic in accordance with the traffic laws of this state;
(c) An actual demonstration of the applicant's ability to operate
a motor vehicle without jeopardizing the safety of persons or property.
If the applicant is deaf or hearing impaired, the applicant may be
accompanied by an interpreter to assist the applicant during the
demonstration. The interpreter will be of the applicant's choosing
from a list provided by the department of licensing; and
(d) Such further examination as the director deems necessary:
(i) To determine whether any facts exist that would bar the
issuance of a vehicle operator's license under chapters 46.20, 46.21,
and 46.29 RCW; and
(ii) To determine the applicant's fitness to operate a motor
vehicle safely on the highways.
(2) If the applicant desires to drive a motorcycle or a motor-driven cycle he or she must qualify for a motorcycle endorsement under
RCW 46.20.500 through 46.20.515.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.20.305 and 1999 c 351 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department, having good cause to believe that a licensed
driver is incompetent or otherwise not qualified to be licensed may
upon notice require him or her to submit to an examination.
(2) The department shall require a driver reported under RCW
46.52.070 (2) and (3) to submit to an examination. The examination
must be completed no later than one hundred twenty days after the
accident report required under RCW 46.52.070(2) is received by the
department unless the department, at the request of the operator,
extends the time for examination.
(3) The department may in addition to an examination under this
section require such person to obtain a certificate showing his or her
condition signed by a licensed physician or other proper authority
designated by the department.
(4) Upon the conclusion of an examination under this section the
department shall take driver improvement action as may be appropriate
and may suspend or revoke the license of such person or permit him or
her to retain such license, or may issue a license subject to
restrictions as permitted under RCW 46.20.041. The department may
suspend or revoke the license of such person who refuses or neglects to
submit to such examination.
(5) The department may require payment of a fee by a person subject
to examination under this section. The department shall set the fee in
an amount that is sufficient to cover the additional cost of
administering examinations required by this section.
(6) Examinations under this section must comply with the
requirements of RCW 46.20.130.

--- END ---