BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 54.04.082 and 2002 c 72 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the awarding of a contract to purchase any item, or items of
the same kind of materials, equipment, or supplies in an amount
exceeding ten thousand dollars, but less than fifty thousand dollars,
in any calendar month, exclusive of sales tax, the commission may, in
lieu of the procedure described in RCW 54.04.070 and 54.04.080
requiring public notice to invite sealed proposals for such materials,
equipment, or supplies, pursuant to commission resolution use the
process provided in RCW 39.04.190. Waiver of the deposit or bid bond
required under RCW 54.04.080 may be authorized by the commission in
securing such bid quotations.

--- END ---