BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 54.04.070 and 2002 c 72 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any item, or items of the same kind of materials, equipment, or
supplies purchased, the estimated cost of which is in excess of ten
thousand dollars, exclusive of sales tax shall be by contract:
PROVIDED, That a district may make purchases of the same kind of items
of materials, equipment and supplies not exceeding five thousand
dollars in any calendar month without a contract, purchasing any excess
thereof over five thousand dollars by contract. Any work ordered by a
district commission, the estimated cost of which is in excess of ten
thousand dollars exclusive of sales tax, shall be by contract, except
that a district commission may have its own regularly employed
personnel perform work which is an accepted industry practice under
prudent utility management without a contract. Prudent utility
management means performing work with regularly employed personnel
utilizing material of a worth not exceeding ((fifty)) two hundred
thousand dollars in value without a contract: PROVIDED, That such
limit on the value of material being utilized in work being performed
by regularly employed personnel shall not include the value of
individual items of equipment purchased or acquired and used as one
unit of a project. Before awarding such a contract, the commission
shall publish a notice once or more in a newspaper of general
circulation in the district at least thirteen days before the last date
upon which bids will be received, inviting sealed proposals for the
work or materials; plans and specifications of which shall at the time
of the publication be on file at the office of the district subject to
public inspection. Any published notice ordering work to be performed
for the district shall be mailed at the time of publication to any
established trade association which files a written request with the
district to receive such notices. The commission may at the same time
and as part of the same notice, invite tenders for the work or
materials upon plans and specifications to be submitted by the bidders.
All contract projects equal to or in excess of one hundred thousand
dollars shall be let by competitive bidding unless the public utility
district lets contracts using the small works roster process under RCW
39.04.155.
Whenever equipment or materials required by a district are held by
a governmental agency and are available for sale but such agency is
unwilling to submit a proposal, the commission may ascertain the price
of such items and file a statement of such price supported by the sworn
affidavit of one member of the commission and may consider such price
as a bid without a deposit or bond.
The commission may waive the competitive bidding requirements of
this section pursuant to RCW 39.04.280 if an exemption contained within
that section applies to the purchase or public work.

--- END ---