BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that interwatershed
water rights transfers pose a threat to the economic and social welfare
of rural communities. Because it is increasingly difficult for water
users to acquire new water rights, transfers are indeed a valuable and
necessary water management tool. However, the permanent transfer of
water rights away from Washington's rural communities has serious
economic and social impacts. Although a rural water rights holder
receives compensation for transferring water rights outside of a
watershed, third parties such as laborers and supporting businesses
suffer. The loss of water rights also reduces land use options and
property values, resulting in a shrinking revenue base for rural local
governments. Finally, the loss of water rights can permanently change
the character of agricultural land and the surrounding rural community.
Therefore, the legislature intends to protect rural communities from
the permanent and harmful impacts of interwatershed water rights
transfers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The department of ecology must work
diligently with appropriate legislators, stakeholders, representatives
of appropriate tribal interests, and local governments within water
resource inventory areas 43, 49, 50, 51, 52, 53, 54, 55, 57, 58, 59,
60, 61, and 62 to assess the impacts of interwatershed transfers and
existing water sources, including snowpack and potential new water
sources, in order to protect the economic and social welfare of rural
communities. The department of ecology must submit a report, including
detailed legislative and policy recommendations, to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by November 1, 2008.

--- END ---