BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that large state
correctional facilities impose costs on small local governments and
communities. These costs are generally not incurred by governments and
communities with a large population base. Programs and services
affected by these additional costs include, but may not be limited to:
Criminal justice activities, including local law enforcement, local
jails, prosecutors, public defense, and the courts; school districts;
hospital districts and other junior taxing districts; transportation
infrastructure and services; and social services.
It is the intent of the legislature to authorize local governments
in small counties experiencing impacts associated with large
correctional institutions to mitigate the impacts of these institutions
by imposing additional sales and use taxes and that the revenue from
these taxes will be used to mitigate the impacts of the correctional
institutions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of a qualifying county may impose a
sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The
tax is in addition to other taxes authorized by this chapter and shall
be collected from those persons who are taxable by the state under
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event
within the county. The rate of tax may not exceed 0.09 percent of the
selling price in the case of a sales tax or value of the article used
in the case of a use tax.
(2) The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section shall be
deducted from the amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or
paid over to the department under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The
department shall determine which counties qualify to impose taxes under
this section and shall perform the collection of such taxes on behalf
of the county at no cost to the county.
(3)(a) Moneys collected under this section shall be used for impact
mitigation associated with large state correctional institutions on the
county, cities, towns, school districts, and other affected junior
taxing districts.
(b) If the correctional institution is located within an
incorporated city, the moneys collected under this section shall be
distributed as follows:
(i) Forty percent shall be paid to the city in which the
correctional institution is located;
(ii) Twenty percent shall be paid to the school district in which
the correctional institution is located; and
(iii) Forty percent shall be paid to the county to be distributed
as authorized by the county legislative authority.
(c) If the correctional institution is located within an
unincorporated area of the county, the moneys collected under this
section shall be distributed as follows:
(i) Twenty percent shall be paid to the school district in which
the correctional institution is located; and
(ii) Eighty percent shall be paid to the county to be distributed
as authorized by the county legislative authority.
(4) No tax may be collected under this section before July 1, 2009.
(5) For purposes of this section, "qualifying county" means a
county with a population, as determined by the office of financial
management for the distribution of selected state revenues, of less
than one hundred thousand persons, and containing a Washington state
correctional institution with an average daily population of more than
eight hundred offenders with a custody level designation of medium or
higher, as determined by the department of corrections for the prior
fiscal year.

--- END ---