BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.35.005 and 2001 c 217 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Financial information" means any of the following information
identifiable to the individual that concerns the amount and conditions
of an individual's assets, liabilities, or credit:
(a) Account numbers and balances;
(b) Transactional information concerning an account; and
(c) Codes, passwords, social security numbers, tax identification
numbers, driver's license or permit numbers, state identicard numbers
issued by the department of licensing, and other information held for
the purpose of account access or transaction initiation.
(2) "Financial information repository" means a person engaged in
the business of providing services to customers who have a credit,
deposit, trust, stock, or other financial account or relationship with
the person.
(3) "Means of identification" means information or an item that is
not describing finances or credit but is personal to or identifiable
with an individual or other person, including: A current or former
name of the person, telephone number, an electronic address, or
identifier of the individual or a member of his or her family,
including the ancestor of the person; information relating to a change
in name, address, telephone number, or electronic address or identifier
of the individual or his or her family; a social security, driver's
license, or tax identification number of the individual or a member of
his or her family; and other information that could be used to identify
the person, including unique biometric data.
(4) "Person" ((means a person as defined in RCW 9A.04.110))
includes any natural person, corporation, joint stock association,
partnership, limited liability company, unincorporated association, or
entity existing or registered under chapter 18.100 RCW or Title 23,
23B, 24, or 25 RCW.
(5) "Victim" means a person whose means of identification or
financial information has been used or transferred with the intent to
commit, or to aid or abet, any unlawful activity.

--- END ---