BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares that it
is the policy of the state of Washington to use tolling to provide a
source of transportation funding and to encourage effective use of the
transportation system.
The legislature intends that the policy framework created by this
act will guide subsequent legislation and decisions regarding the
tolling of specific facilities and corridors. For each state-owned
facility or corridor, the legislature intends that it will authorize
the budget and finance plan. Specific issues that may be addressed in
the finance plan and budget authorization legislation include the
amount of financing required for a facility or corridor, the budget for
any construction and operations financed by tolling, whether and how
variable pricing will be applied, and the timing of tolling.
The legislature also intends that while the transportation
commission, as the toll-setting authority, may set toll rates for
facilities, corridors, or systems thereof, the legislature reserves the
authority to impose tolls on any state transportation route or
facility. Similarly, local or quasi-local entities that retain the
power to impose tolls may do so as long as the effect of those tolls on
the state highway system is consistent with the policy guidelines
detailed in this act. If the imposition of tolls could have an impact
on state facilities, the state tolling authority must review and
approve such tolls.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This subchapter applies only to all state
toll bridges and other state toll facilities, excluding the Washington
state ferries, first authorized within this state after July 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this subchapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise:
(1) "Tolling authority" means the governing body that is legally
empowered to review and adjust toll rates. Unless otherwise delegated,
the transportation commission is the tolling authority for all state
highways.
(2) "Eligible toll facility" or "eligible toll facilities" means
portions of the state highway system specifically identified by the
legislature including, but not limited to, transportation corridors,
bridges, crossings, interchanges, on-ramps, off-ramps, approaches,
bistate facilities, and interconnections between highways.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Unless otherwise delegated, only the
legislature may authorize the imposition of tolls on eligible toll
facilities.
(2) All revenue from an eligible toll facility must be used only to
construct, improve, preserve, maintain, manage, or operate the eligible
toll facility on or in which the revenue is collected. Expenditures of
toll revenues are subject to appropriation and must be made only:
(a) To cover the operating costs of the eligible toll facility,
including necessary maintenance, preservation, administration, and toll
enforcement by public law enforcement within the boundaries of the
facility;
(b) To meet obligations for the repayment of debt and interest on
the eligible toll facilities, and any other associated financing costs
including, but not limited to, required reserves and insurance;
(c) To meet any other obligations to provide funding contributions
for any projects or operations on the eligible toll facilities; or
(d) For any other improvements to the eligible toll facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Any proposal for the establishment of
eligible toll facilities shall consider the following policy
guidelines:
(1) Overall direction. Washington should use tolling to encourage
effective use of the transportation system and provide a source of
transportation funding.
(2) When to use tolling. Tolling should be used when it can be
demonstrated to contribute a significant portion of the cost of a
project that cannot be funded solely with existing sources or optimize
the performance of the transportation system. Such tolling should, in
all cases, be fairly and equitably applied in the context of the
statewide transportation system and not have significant adverse
impacts through the diversion of traffic to other routes that cannot
otherwise be reasonably mitigated. Such tolling should also consider
relevant social equity, environmental, and economic issues.
(3) Use of toll revenue. All revenue from an eligible toll
facility must be used only to improve, preserve, manage, or operate the
eligible toll facility on or in which the revenue is collected.
Additionally, toll revenue should provide for and encourage the
inclusion of recycled and reclaimed construction materials.
(4) Setting toll rates. Toll rates, which may include variable
pricing, must be set to meet anticipated funding obligations. To the
extent possible, the toll rates should be set to optimize system
performance, recognizing necessary trade-offs to generate revenue.
(5) Duration of toll collection. Because transportation
infrastructure projects have costs and benefits that extend well beyond
those paid for by initial construction funding, tolls on future toll
facilities should remain in place to fund additional capacity, capital
rehabilitation, maintenance, management, and operations, and to
optimize performance of the system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) A tolling advisory committee may be
created at the direction of the tolling authority for any eligible toll
facilities. The tolling authority shall appoint nine members to the
committee, all of whom must be permanent residents of the affected
project area as defined for each project. Members of the committee
shall serve without receiving compensation.
(2) The tolling advisory committee shall serve in an advisory
capacity to the tolling authority on all matters related to the
imposition of tolls including, but not limited to: (a) The feasibility
of providing discounts; (b) the trade-off of lower tolls versus the
early retirement of debt; and (c) consideration of variable or time of
day pricing.
(3) In setting toll rates, the tolling authority shall consider
recommendations of the tolling advisory committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) Unless these powers are otherwise
delegated by the legislature, the transportation commission is the
tolling authority for the state. The tolling authority shall:
(a) Set toll rates, establish appropriate exemptions, if any, and
make adjustments as conditions warrant on eligible toll facilities;
(b) Review toll collection policies, toll operations policies, and
toll revenue expenditures on the eligible toll facilities and report
annually on this review to the legislature.
(2) The tolling authority, in determining toll rates, shall
consider the policy guidelines established in section 5 of this act.
(3) Unless otherwise directed by the legislature, in setting and
periodically adjusting toll rates, the tolling authority must ensure
that toll rates will generate revenue sufficient to:
(a) Meet the operating costs of the eligible toll facilities,
including necessary maintenance, preservation, administration, and toll
enforcement by public law enforcement;
(b) Meet obligations for the repayment of debt and interest on the
eligible toll facilities, and any other associated financing costs
including, but not limited to, required reserves, minimum debt coverage
or other appropriate contingency funding, and insurance; and
(c) Meet any other obligations of the tolling authority to provide
its proportionate share of funding contributions for any projects or
operations of the eligible toll facilities.
(4) The established toll rates may include variable pricing, and
should be set to optimize system performance, recognizing necessary
trade-offs to generate revenue for the purposes specified in subsection
(3) of this section. Tolls may vary for type of vehicle, time of day,
traffic conditions, or other factors designed to improve performance of
the system.

Sec. 8 RCW 47.56.030 and 2002 c 114 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as permitted under chapter 47.29 or 47.46 RCW:
(a) Unless otherwise delegated, and subject to section 4 of this
act, the department of transportation shall have full charge of the
planning, analysis, and construction of all toll bridges and other toll
facilities including the Washington state ferries, and the operation
and maintenance thereof.
(b) The transportation commission shall determine and establish the
tolls and charges thereon((, and shall perform all duties and exercise
all powers relating to the financing, refinancing, and fiscal
management of all toll bridges and other toll facilities including the
Washington state ferries, and bonded indebtedness in the manner
provided by law)).
(c) Unless otherwise delegated, and subject to section 4 of this
act, the department shall have full charge of planning, analysis, and
design of all toll facilities. The department may conduct the
planning, analysis, and design of toll facilities as necessary to
support the legislature's consideration of toll authorization.
(d) The department shall utilize and administer toll collection
systems that are simple, unified, and interoperable. To the extent
practicable, the department shall avoid the use of toll booths. The
department shall set the statewide standards and protocols for all toll
facilities within the state, including those authorized by local
authorities.
(e) Except as provided in this section, the department shall
proceed with the construction of such toll bridges and other facilities
and the approaches thereto by contract in the manner of state highway
construction immediately upon there being made available funds for such
work and shall prosecute such work to completion as rapidly as
practicable. The department is authorized to negotiate contracts for
any amount without bid under (((d)(i))) (e)(i) and (ii) of this
subsection:
(i) Emergency contracts, in order to make repairs to ferries or
ferry terminal facilities or removal of such facilities whenever
continued use of ferries or ferry terminal facilities constitutes a
real or immediate danger to the traveling public or precludes prudent
use of such ferries or facilities; and
(ii) Single source contracts for vessel dry dockings, when there is
clearly and legitimately only one available bidder to conduct dry dock-related work for a specific class or classes of vessels. The contracts
may be entered into for a single vessel dry docking or for multiple
vessel dry dockings for a period not to exceed two years.
(2) The department shall proceed with the procurement of materials,
supplies, services, and equipment needed for the support, maintenance,
and use of a ferry, ferry terminal, or other facility operated by
Washington state ferries, in accordance with chapter 43.19 RCW except
as follows:
(a) ((Except as provided in (d) of this subsection,)) When the
secretary of the department of transportation determines in writing
that the use of invitation for bid is either not practicable or not
advantageous to the state and it may be necessary to make competitive
evaluations, including technical or performance evaluations among
acceptable proposals to complete the contract award, a contract may be
entered into by use of a competitive sealed proposals method, and a
formal request for proposals solicitation. Such formal request for
proposals solicitation shall include a functional description of the
needs and requirements of the state and the significant factors.
(b) When purchases are made through a formal request for proposals
solicitation the contract shall be awarded to the responsible proposer
whose competitive sealed proposal is determined in writing to be the
most advantageous to the state taking into consideration price and
other evaluation factors set forth in the request for proposals. No
significant factors may be used in evaluating a proposal that are not
specified in the request for proposals. Factors that may be considered
in evaluating proposals include but are not limited to: Price;
maintainability; reliability; commonality; performance levels; life
cycle cost if applicable under this section; cost of transportation or
delivery; delivery schedule offered; installation cost; cost of spare
parts; availability of parts and service offered; and the following:
(i) The ability, capacity, and skill of the proposer to perform the
contract or provide the service required;
(ii) The character, integrity, reputation, judgment, experience,
and efficiency of the proposer;
(iii) Whether the proposer can perform the contract within the time
specified;
(iv) The quality of performance of previous contracts or services;
(v) The previous and existing compliance by the proposer with laws
relating to the contract or services;
(vi) Objective, measurable criteria defined in the request for
proposal. These criteria may include but are not limited to items such
as discounts, delivery costs, maintenance services costs, installation
costs, and transportation costs; and
(vii) Such other information as may be secured having a bearing on
the decision to award the contract.
(c) When purchases are made through a request for proposal process,
proposals received shall be evaluated based on the evaluation factors
set forth in the request for proposal. When issuing a request for
proposal for the procurement of propulsion equipment or systems that
include an engine, the request for proposal must specify the use of a
life cycle cost analysis that includes an evaluation of fuel
efficiency. When a life cycle cost analysis is used, the life cycle
cost of a proposal shall be given at least the same relative importance
as the initial price element specified in the request of proposal
documents. The department may reject any and all proposals received.
If the proposals are not rejected, the award shall be made to the
proposer whose proposal is most advantageous to the department,
considering price and the other evaluation factors set forth in the
request for proposal.
(((d) If the department is procuring large equipment or systems
(e.g., electrical, propulsion) needed for the support, maintenance, and
use of a ferry operated by Washington state ferries, the department
shall proceed with a formal request for proposal solicitation under
this subsection (2) without a determination of necessity by the
secretary.))

Sec. 9 RCW 47.56.040 and 1984 c 7 s 248 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department is empowered, in accordance with the provisions of
this chapter, to provide for the establishment and construction of toll
bridges upon any public highways of this state together with approaches
thereto wherever it is considered necessary or advantageous and
practicable for crossing any stream, body of water, gulch, navigable
water, swamp, or other topographical formation whether that formation
is within this state or constitutes a boundary between this state and
an adjoining state or country. ((The necessity or advantage and
practicability of any such toll bridge shall be determined by the
department, and the feasibility of financing any toll bridge in the
manner provided by this chapter shall be a primary consideration and
determined according to the best judgment of the department.)) For the
purpose of obtaining information for the consideration of the
department upon the construction of any toll bridge or any other
matters pertaining thereto, any cognizant officer or employee of the
state shall, upon the request of the department, make reasonable
examination, investigation, survey, or reconnaissance for the
determination of material facts pertaining thereto and report this to
the department. The cost of any such examination, investigation,
survey, or reconnaissance shall be borne by the department or office
conducting these activities from the funds provided for that department
or office for its usual functions.

Sec. 10 RCW 47.56.070 and 1977 ex.s. c 151 s 67 are each amended
to read as follows:
The department of transportation may, ((with the approval of the
transportation commission)) in accordance with this chapter, provide
for the ((establishment,)) construction((,)) and operation of toll
tunnels, toll roads, and other facilities necessary for their
construction and connection with public highways of the state. It may
cause surveys to be made to determine the propriety of their
((establishment,)) construction((,)) and operation, and may acquire
rights-of-way and other facilities necessary to carry out the
provisions hereof; and may issue, sell, and redeem bonds, and deposit
and expend them; secure and remit financial and other assistance in the
construction thereof; carry insurance thereon; and handle any other
matters pertaining thereto, all of which shall be conducted in the same
manner and under the same procedure as provided for the
((establishing,)) constructing, operating, and maintaining of toll
bridges by the department, insofar as reasonably consistent and
applicable. ((No toll facility, toll bridge, toll road, or toll
tunnel, shall be combined with any other toll facility for the purpose
of financing unless such facilities form a continuous project, to the
end that each such facility or project be self-liquidating and self-sustaining.))

Sec. 11 RCW 47.56.076 and 2006 c 311 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon approval of a majority of the voters within its boundaries
voting on the ballot proposition, ((and with the approval of the state
transportation commission or its successor statewide tolling
authority,)) a regional transportation investment district may
authorize vehicle tolls on a local or regional arterial or a state or
federal highway within the boundaries of the district. The department
shall administer the collection of vehicle tolls authorized on
designated facilities unless otherwise specified in law or by contract,
and the commission or its successor statewide tolling authority shall
set and impose the tolls in amounts sufficient to implement the
regional transportation investment plan under RCW 36.120.020.
(2) Consistent with section 4 of this act, vehicle tolls must first
be authorized by the legislature if the tolls are imposed on a state
route.
(3) Consistent with section 7 of this act, vehicle tolls, including
any change in an existing toll rate, must first be reviewed and
approved by the tolling authority designated in section 7 of this act
if the tolls, or change in toll rate, would have a significant impact,
as determined by the tolling authority, on the operation of any state
facility.

Sec. 12 RCW 47.56.078 and 2005 c 336 s 25 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to the provisions under chapter 36.73 RCW, a
transportation benefit district may authorize vehicle tolls on state
routes or federal highways, city streets, or county roads, within the
boundaries of the district, unless otherwise prohibited by law. The
department of transportation shall administer the collection of vehicle
tolls authorized on state routes or federal highways, unless otherwise
specified in law or by contract, and the state transportation
commission, or its successor, may approve, set, and impose the tolls in
amounts sufficient to implement the district's transportation
improvement finance plan. The district shall administer the collection
of vehicle tolls authorized on city streets or county roads, and shall
set and impose the tolls, only with approval of the transportation
commission, in amounts sufficient to implement the district's
transportation improvement plan. Tolls may vary for type of vehicle,
for time of day, for traffic conditions, and/or other factors designed
to improve performance of the facility or the transportation network.
(2) Consistent with section 4 of this act, vehicle tolls must first
be authorized by the legislature if the tolls are imposed on a state
route.
(3) Consistent with section 7 of this act, vehicle tolls, including
any change in an existing toll rate, must first be reviewed and
approved by the tolling authority designated in section 7 of this act
if the tolls, or change in toll rate, would have a significant impact,
as determined by the tolling authority, on the operation of any state
facility.

Sec. 13 RCW 47.56.120 and 1977 ex.s. c 151 s 70 are each amended
to read as follows:
In the event that ((the transportation commission should determine
that)) any toll bridge should be constructed, all cost thereof
including right-of-way, survey, and engineering shall be paid out of
any funds available for payment of the cost of such toll bridge under
this chapter.

Sec. 14 RCW 47.56.240 and 1984 c 7 s 265 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as otherwise provided in section 7 of this act, the
commission is hereby empowered to fix the rates of toll and other
charges for all toll bridges built under the terms of this chapter.
Toll charges so fixed may be changed from time to time as conditions
warrant. The commission, in establishing toll charges, shall give due
consideration to the cost of operating and maintaining such toll bridge
or toll bridges including the cost of insurance, and to the amount
required annually to meet the redemption of bonds and interest payments
on them. The tolls and charges shall be at all times fixed at rates to
yield annual revenue equal to annual operating and maintenance expenses
including insurance costs and all redemption payments and interest
charges of the bonds issued for any particular toll bridge or toll
bridges as the bonds become due. The bond redemption and interest
payments constitute a first direct ((and exclusive)) charge and lien on
all such tolls and other revenues and interest thereon. Sinking funds
created therefrom received from the use and operation of the toll
bridge or toll bridges, and such tolls and revenues together with the
interest earned thereon shall constitute a trust fund for the security
and payment of such bonds and shall not be used or pledged for any
other purpose as long as any of these bonds are outstanding and unpaid.

Sec. 15 RCW 35.74.050 and 1965 c 7 s 35.74.050 are each amended
to read as follows:
A city or town may build and maintain toll bridges and charge and
collect tolls thereon, and to that end may provide a system and elect
or appoint persons to operate the same, or the said bridges may be made
free, as it may elect.
Consistent with section 7 of this act, any toll proposed under this
section, including any change in an existing toll rate, must first be
reviewed and approved by the tolling authority designated in section 7
of this act if the toll, or change in toll rate, would have a
significant impact, as determined by the tolling authority, on the
operation of any state facility.

Sec. 16 RCW 36.120.050 and 2006 c 311 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A regional transportation investment district planning
committee may, as part of a regional transportation investment plan,
recommend the imposition or authorization of some or all of the
following revenue sources, which a regional transportation investment
district may impose or authorize upon approval of the voters as
provided in this chapter:
(a) A regional sales and use tax, as specified in RCW 82.14.430, of
up to 0.1 percent of the selling price, in the case of a sales tax, or
value of the article used, in the case of a use tax, upon the
occurrence of any taxable event in the regional transportation
investment district;
(b) A local option vehicle license fee, as specified under RCW
82.80.100, of up to one hundred dollars per vehicle registered in the
district. As used in this subsection, "vehicle" means motor vehicle as
defined in RCW 46.04.320. Certain classes of vehicles, as defined
under chapter 46.04 RCW, may be exempted from this fee;
(c) A parking tax under RCW 82.80.030;
(d) A local motor vehicle excise tax under RCW 81.100.060;
(e) A local option fuel tax under RCW 82.80.120;
(f) An employer excise tax under RCW 81.100.030; and
(g) Vehicle tolls on new or reconstructed local or regional
arterials or state ((or federal highways)) routes within the boundaries
of the district, if the following conditions are met:
(i) ((Any such toll must be approved by the state transportation
commission or its successor statewide tolling authority;
(ii))) Consistent with section 4 of this act, the vehicle toll must
first be authorized by the legislature if the toll is imposed on a
state route;
(ii) Consistent with section 7 of this act, the vehicle toll,
including any change in an existing toll rate, must first be reviewed
and approved by the tolling authority designated in section 7 of this
act if the toll, or change in toll rate, would have a significant
impact, as determined by the tolling authority, on the operation of any
state facility;
(iii) The regional transportation investment plan must identify the
facilities that may be tolled; and
(((iii))) (iv) Unless otherwise specified by law, the department
shall administer the collection of vehicle tolls on designated
facilities, and the state transportation commission, or its successor,
shall be the tolling authority, and shall act in accordance with
section 7 of this act.
(2) Taxes, fees, and tolls may not be imposed or authorized without
an affirmative vote of the majority of the voters within the boundaries
of the district voting on a ballot proposition as set forth in RCW
36.120.070. Revenues from these taxes and fees may be used only to
implement the plan as set forth in this chapter. A district may
contract with the state department of revenue or other appropriate
entities for administration and collection of any of the taxes or fees
authorized in this section.
(3) Existing statewide motor vehicle fuel and special fuel taxes,
at the distribution rates in effect on January 1, 2001, are not
intended to be altered by this chapter.

Sec. 17 RCW 36.73.040 and 2005 c 336 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A transportation benefit district is a quasi-municipal
corporation, an independent taxing "authority" within the meaning of
Article VII, section 1 of the state Constitution, and a "taxing
district" within the meaning of Article VII, section 2 of the state
Constitution.
(2) A transportation benefit district constitutes a body corporate
and possesses all the usual powers of a corporation for public purposes
as well as all other powers that may now or hereafter be specifically
conferred by statute, including, but not limited to, the authority to
hire employees, staff, and services, to enter into contracts, to
acquire, hold, and dispose of real and personal property, and to sue
and be sued. Public works contract limits applicable to the
jurisdiction that established the district apply to the district.
(3) To carry out the purposes of this chapter, and subject to the
provisions of RCW 36.73.065, a district is authorized to impose the
following taxes, fees, charges, and tolls:
(a) A sales and use tax in accordance with RCW 82.14.0455;
(b) A vehicle fee in accordance with RCW 82.80.140;
(c) A fee or charge in accordance with RCW 36.73.120. However, if
a county or city within the district area is levying a fee or charge
for a transportation improvement, the fee or charge shall be credited
against the amount of the fee or charge imposed by the district.
Developments consisting of less than twenty residences are exempt from
the fee or charge under RCW 36.73.120; and
(d) Vehicle tolls on state routes ((or federal highways)), city
streets, or county roads, within the boundaries of the district, unless
otherwise prohibited by law. However, consistent with section 4 of
this act, the vehicle toll must first be authorized by the legislature
if the toll is imposed on a state route. The department of
transportation shall administer the collection of vehicle tolls
authorized on state routes ((or federal highways)), unless otherwise
specified in law or by contract, and the state transportation
commission, or its successor, may approve, set, and impose the tolls in
amounts sufficient to implement the district's transportation
improvement finance plan. The district shall administer the collection
of vehicle tolls authorized on city streets or county roads, and shall
set and impose((, only with approval of the transportation commission,
or its successor,)) the tolls in amounts sufficient to implement the
district's transportation improvement plan. However, consistent with
section 7 of this act, the vehicle toll, including any change in an
existing toll rate, must first be reviewed and approved by the tolling
authority designated in section 7 of this act if the toll, or change in
toll rate, would have a significant impact, as determined by the
tolling authority, on the operation of any state facility.

Sec. 18 RCW 47.29.060 and 2005 c 317 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to the limitations in this section, the department may,
in connection with the evaluation of eligible projects, consider any
financing mechanisms identified under subsections (3) through (5) of
this section or any other lawful source, either integrated as part of
a project proposal or as a separate, stand-alone proposal to finance a
project. Financing may be considered for all or part of a proposed
project. A project may be financed in whole or in part with:
(a) The proceeds of grant anticipation revenue bonds authorized by
23 U.S.C. Sec. 122 and applicable state law. Legislative authorization
and appropriation is required in order to use this source of financing;
(b) Grants, loans, loan guarantees, lines of credit, revolving
lines of credit, or other financing arrangements available under the
Transportation Infrastructure Finance and Innovation Act under 23
U.S.C. Sec. 181 et seq., or any other applicable federal law;
(c) Infrastructure loans or assistance from the state
infrastructure bank established by RCW 82.44.195;
(d) Federal, state, or local revenues, subject to appropriation by
the applicable legislative authority;
(e) User fees, tolls, fares, lease proceeds, rents, gross or net
receipts from sales, proceeds from the sale of development rights,
franchise fees, or any other lawful form of consideration. However,
projects financed by tolls or equivalent funding sources must first be
authorized by the legislature under section 4 of this act.
(2) As security for the payment of financing described in this
section, the revenues from the project may be pledged, but no such
pledge of revenues constitutes in any manner or to any extent a general
obligation of the state. Any financing described in this section may
be structured on a senior, parity, or subordinate basis to any other
financing.
(3) For any transportation project developed under this chapter
that is owned, leased, used, or operated by the state, as a public
facility, if indebtedness is issued, it must be issued by the state
treasurer for the transportation project.
(4) For other public projects defined in RCW 47.29.050(2) that are
developed in conjunction with a transportation project, financing
necessary to develop, construct, or operate the public project must be
approved by the state finance committee or by the governing board of a
public benefit corporation as provided in the federal Internal Revenue
Code section 63-20;
(5) For projects that are developed in conjunction with a
transportation project but are not themselves a public facility or
public project, any lawful means of financing may be used.

Sec. 19 RCW 47.58.030 and 1984 c 7 s 290 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as otherwise provided in section 7 of this act, the
secretary shall have full charge of the construction of all such
improvements and reconstruction work and the construction of any
additional bridge, including approaches and connecting highways, that
may be authorized under this chapter and the operation of such bridge
or bridges, as well as the collection of tolls and other charges for
services and facilities thereby afforded. The schedule of charges for
the services and facilities shall be fixed and revised from time to
time by the commission so that the tolls and revenues collected will
yield annual revenue and income sufficient, after payment or allowance
for all operating, maintenance, and repair expenses, to pay the
interest on all revenue bonds outstanding under the provisions of this
chapter for account of the project and to create a sinking fund for the
retirement of the revenue bonds at or prior to maturity. The charges
shall be continued until all such bonds and interest thereon and unpaid
advancements, if any, have been paid.

Sec. 20 RCW 47.60.010 and 1984 c 18 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department is authorized to acquire by lease, charter,
contract, purchase, condemnation, or construction, and partly by any or
all of such means, and to thereafter operate, improve, and extend, a
system of ferries on and crossing Puget Sound and any of its tributary
waters and connections thereof, and connecting with the public streets
and highways in the state. The system of ferries shall include such
boats, vessels, wharves, docks, approaches, landings, franchises,
licenses, and appurtenances as shall be determined by the department to
be necessary or desirable for efficient operation of the ferry system
and best serve the public. Subject to section 4 of this act, the
department may in like manner acquire by purchase, condemnation, or
construction and include in the ferry system such toll bridges,
approaches, and connecting roadways as may be deemed by the department
advantageous in channeling traffic to points served by the ferry
system. In addition to the powers of acquisition granted by this
section, the department is empowered to enter into any contracts,
agreements, or leases with any person, firm, or corporation and to
thereby provide, on such terms and conditions as it shall determine,
for the operation of any ferry or ferries or system thereof, whether
acquired by the department or not.
The authority of the department to sell and lease back any state
ferry, for federal tax purposes only, as authorized by 26 U.S.C., Sec.
168(f)(8) is confirmed. Legal title and all incidents of legal title
to any ferry sold and leased back (except for the federal tax benefits
attributable to the ownership thereof) shall remain in the state of
Washington.

Sec. 21 RCW 53.34.010 and 1984 c 7 s 365 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to all other powers granted to port districts, any such
district may, with the consent of the department of transportation,
acquire by condemnation, purchase, lease, or gift, and may construct,
reconstruct, maintain, operate, furnish, equip, improve, better, add
to, extend, and lease to others in whole or in part and sell in whole
or in part any one or more of the following port projects, within or
without or partially within and partially without the corporate limits
of the district whenever the commission of the district determines that
any one or more of such projects are necessary for or convenient to the
movement of commercial freight and passenger traffic a part of which
traffic moves to, from, or through the territory of the district:
(1) Toll bridges;
(2) Tunnels under or upon the beds of any river, stream, or other
body of water, or through mountain ranges.
In connection with the acquisition or construction of any one or
more of such projects the port districts may, with the consent of the
state department of transportation, further acquire or construct,
maintain, operate, or improve limited or unlimited access highway
approaches of such length as the commission of such district deems
advisable to provide means of interconnection of the facilities with
public highways and of ingress and egress to any such project,
including plazas and toll booths, and to construct and maintain under,
along, over, or across any such project telephone, telegraph, or
electric transmission wires and cables, fuel lines, gas transmission
lines or mains, water transmission lines or mains, and other mechanical
equipment not inconsistent with the appropriate use of the project, all
for the purpose of obtaining revenues for the payment of the cost of
the project.
Consistent with section 7 of this act, any toll, including any
change in an existing toll rate, proposed under this section must first
be reviewed and approved by the tolling authority designated in section
7 of this act if the toll, or change in toll rate, would have a
significant impact, as determined by the tolling authority, on the
operation of any state facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 47.56.0761 (Regional transportation investment district -- Tolls on Lake Washington bridges) and 2006 c 311 s 20; and
(2) RCW 47.56.080 (Construction of toll bridges and issuance of
bonds authorized) and 1977 ex.s. c 151 s 68 & 1961 c 13 s 47.56.080.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 Sections 1 through 7 of this act are each
added to chapter 47.56 RCW under the subchapter heading "toll
facilities created after July 1, 2008."

--- END ---