BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.29A RCW
to read as follows:
All leasehold interests used by a nonprofit organization
established for the sole mission of organizing, sponsoring, or
conducting an annual festival or fair dedicated to folk, ethnic, and
traditional arts, including performing arts are exempt from tax under
this chapter. "Organizing, sponsoring, or conducting," for purposes of
this section, means activities necessary to obtain artists and vendors
for a festival, archiving of festival performances, sales of
memorabilia related to the festival or festival performances, and
other, related activities, but only if the funds derived by the
organization from these activities are used solely for the support and
enhancement of the mission of the organization.

--- END ---