BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Recent tragic events have demonstrated the
need to find ways to make legal protections for domestic violence
victims more accessible. On March 6, 2007, Rebecca Jane Griego, an
employee at the University of Washington, had obtained a temporary
protection order against the man who eventually shot her and then
himself in a murder-suicide on April 2, 2007. However, because her
stalker had evaded the police and service of process, Ms. Griego had to
return to court numerous times and did not have the opportunity to have
a hearing for a permanent protection order. Under current court rules,
which vary by court, if a process server fails to serve process after
an unspecified number of times, process may be served by publication or
by mail. Establishing greater uniformity in the service of process of
petitions for orders for protection or modifications of protection
orders in domestic violence cases may help to protect the safety of
future domestic violence victims.

Sec. 2 RCW 26.50.050 and 1995 c 246 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon receipt of the petition, the court shall order a hearing which
shall be held not later than fourteen days from the date of the order.
The court may schedule a hearing by telephone pursuant to local court
rule, to reasonably accommodate a disability, or in exceptional
circumstances to protect a petitioner from further acts of domestic
violence. The court shall require assurances of the petitioner's
identity before conducting a telephonic hearing. Except as provided in
RCW 26.50.085 and 26.50.123, personal service shall be made upon the
respondent not less than five court days prior to the hearing. If
timely personal service cannot be made, the court shall set a new
hearing date and shall either require an additional attempt((s)) at
obtaining personal service or permit service by publication as provided
in RCW 26.50.085 or service by mail as provided in RCW 26.50.123. The
court shall not require more than two attempts at obtaining personal
service and shall permit service by publication or by mail unless the
petitioner requests additional time to attempt personal service. If
the court permits service by publication or by mail, the court shall
set the hearing date not later than twenty-four days from the date of
the order. The court may issue an ex parte order for protection
pending the hearing as provided in RCW 26.50.070, 26.50.085, and
26.50.123.

Sec. 3 RCW 26.50.130 and 1984 c 263 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon application with notice to all parties and after a
hearing, the court may modify the terms of an existing order for
protection.
(2) Except as provided in RCW 26.50.085 and 26.50.123, personal
service shall be made upon the nonmoving party not less than five court
days prior to the hearing to modify.
(a) If timely personal service cannot be made, the court shall set
a new hearing date and shall either require an additional attempt at
obtaining personal service or permit service by publication as provided
in RCW 26.50.085 or service by mail as provided in RCW 26.50.123.
(b) The court shall not require more than two attempts at obtaining
personal service and shall permit service by publication or by mail
unless the moving party requests additional time to attempt personal
service.
(c) If the court permits service by publication or by mail, the
court shall set the hearing date not later than twenty-four days from
the date of the order permitting service by publication or by mail.
(3) In any situation where an order is terminated or modified
before its expiration date, the clerk of the court shall forward on or
before the next judicial day a true copy of the modified order or the
termination order to the appropriate law enforcement agency specified
in the modified or termination order. Upon receipt of the order, the
law enforcement agency shall promptly enter it in the law enforcement
information system.

--- END ---