BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The health care authority and the
department of social and health services shall, by September 1, 2008,
develop a five-year plan to change the way dental care is delivered and
reimbursed within their health care programs to:
(a) Reward quality dental outcomes rather than simply paying for
the receipt of particular services or procedures;
(b) Pay for care that reflects patient preference and is of proven
value;
(c) Require the use of evidence-based standards of care where
available;
(d) Tie provider rate increases to measurable improvements in
access to quality care;
(e) Direct enrollees to quality care systems; and
(f) Better support primary prevention and provide a dental care
provider to all enrollees through reimbursement policies that create
incentives for enrollees to enter and remain in a dental practice. The
plan must examine and make use of successful models like the access to
baby and child dentistry program.
(2) In developing any component of the plan that links payment to
dental care provider performance, the authority and the department
shall work in collaboration with the department of health, dental
carriers, local public health jurisdictions, dentists, community health
centers, and other health care providers, the Puget Sound health
alliance, and other purchasers.
(3) The plan shall also include a design for a public awareness
campaign using public service announcements and other outreach efforts
that may be recommended.
(4) The plan shall (a) identify any existing barriers and
opportunities to support implementation, including needed changes to
state or federal law; (b) identify the goals the plan is intended to
achieve and how progress toward goals will be measured; and (c) be
submitted to the governor and the legislature upon completion. The
health care authority and the department of social and health services
shall report to the legislature by September 1, 2008. Any component of
the plan that links payment to dental care provider performance must be
submitted to the legislature for consideration prior to implementation
by the health care authority or the department of social and health
services.

--- END ---