BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the citizens of
Washington deserve primary care physicians that they can trust and rely
upon for their health and illness care.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1)(a) The work group on primary care
medical practice is established, with members as provided in this
subsection:
(i) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from each
caucus of the senate.
(ii) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one
member from each caucus of the house of representatives.
(iii) The director of the health care authority shall appoint:
(A) Four persons representing primary care physicians practicing in
the state, one of whom practices in a rural county, as defined in RCW
82.14.370;
(B) One member representing community clinics;
(C) Two members representing health plans, including one
representing a fee-for-service provider and one representing a managed
care provider; and
(D) One member representing the health care authority.
(b) The health care authority representative shall chair the work
group.
(2) The work group shall examine ways to recruit and retain primary
care physicians in the state, including, but not limited to, such
strategies as:
(a) Providing greater reimbursement rates for primary care
physicians;
(b) Ensuring that all patients have access to and know how to use
a nurse consultant;
(c) Encouraging female patients to have a mammogram on the
evidence-based recommended schedule;
(d) Effectively implementing strategies designed to reduce
patients' use of nonemergent emergency room care;
(e) Communicating with patients through electronic means; and
(f) Effectively managing blood sugar levels of patients with
diabetes.
(3) The work group may consult with individuals from the public and
private sector or ask such persons to establish an advisory committee.
Members of the advisory committee are not entitled to expense
reimbursement.
(4) The work group shall use legislative facilities, and staff
support shall be provided by senate committee services and the house of
representatives office of program research.
(5) Legislative members of the work group shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative
members, except those representing an employer or organization, are
entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(6) The expenses of the work group shall be paid jointly by the
senate and the house of representatives. Work group expenditures are
subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee
and the house executive rules committee, or their successor committees.
(7) The work group shall report its findings and recommendations to
the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2008.
(8) The work group shall report its findings and recommendations to
the office of financial management by December 1, 2008, for
consideration in the office of financial management's study of the
primary care system, pursuant to Substitute Senate Bill No. 6282
(2008).
(9) This section expires December 31, 2008.

--- END ---