BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that Planned
Parenthood and the Oregon state board of pharmacy have reached an
agreement after careful, thoughtful, and skilled negotiations on how to
ensure that patients receive their prescription drugs in a reasonable
and timely manner while respecting the religious and moral beliefs of
health care providers. We applaud their efforts. The patients and
providers in Washington will benefit greatly from a similar compromise.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.64 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature recognizes that every pharmacist and pharmacy
possesses a fundamental right to exercise the pharmacist's or
pharmacy's religious beliefs and conscience. The legislature further
recognizes that in developing public policy, conflicting religious and
moral beliefs must be respected. Therefore, while recognizing the
right of conscientious objection to participating in specific health
services, the state also recognizes the right of patients to receive
health services.
(2)(a) No individual licensed pharmacist or pharmacy may be
required by law or contract in any circumstances to participate in the
provision of a specific service if the pharmacist or pharmacy objects
to so doing for reason of conscience or religion. No person may be
discriminated against in employment or professional privileges because
of such objection.
(b) The provisions of this section are not intended to result in
interference with a patient's right to receive approved and lawfully
prescribed medications and information or drugs and devices approved by
the United States food and drug administration for restricted or
over-the-counter distribution by pharmacies in a timely and
professional manner and that the patients are not burdened by the
pharmacist's individual beliefs.
(3) Each pharmacist or pharmacy shall:
(a) Adopt a written policy and procedures that address the issues
of pharmacists' moral, ethical, and professional responsibilities and,
if appropriate, allowing the pharmacist to exercise his or her choice
to not participate, and at the same time not interfere with a patient's
right to receive appropriate and lawfully prescribed or
over-the-counter drug therapy or drugs and devices approved by the
United States food and drug administration for restricted or
over-the-counter distribution by pharmacies. These policies may
include dispensing of drugs and devices by another pharmacist on site
or arranging for the prescription to be dispensed by a pharmacist at
another site;
(b) Provide a written notice to patients listing services that the
pharmacist or pharmacy refuses to dispense for reason of conscience or
religion;
(c) Provide written information describing how an enrollee may
directly access services in an expeditious manner; and
(d) Ensure that enrollees refused services under this section have
prompt access to the information developed pursuant to (c) of this
subsection.
(4) The board shall establish a mechanism or mechanisms to
recognize the right of pharmacists and pharmacies to exercise religious
beliefs and conscience while ensuring patients timely access to
services and to assure prompt payment to service providers.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.64.005 and 1990 c 83 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board shall:
(1) Regulate the practice of pharmacy and enforce all laws placed
under its jurisdiction;
(2) Prepare or determine the nature of, and supervise the grading
of, examinations for applicants for pharmacists' licenses;
(3) Establish the qualifications for licensure of pharmacists or
pharmacy interns;
(4) Conduct hearings for the revocation or suspension of licenses,
permits, registrations, certificates, or any other authority to
practice granted by the board, which hearings may also be conducted by
an administrative law judge appointed under chapter 34.12 RCW;
(5) Issue subpoenas and administer oaths in connection with any
hearing, or disciplinary proceeding held under this chapter or any
other chapter assigned to the board;
(6) Assist the regularly constituted enforcement agencies of this
state in enforcing all laws pertaining to drugs, controlled substances,
and the practice of pharmacy, or any other laws or rules under its
jurisdiction;
(7) ((Promulgate)) Adopt rules for the dispensing, distribution,
wholesaling, and manufacturing of drugs and devices and the practice of
pharmacy for the protection and promotion of the public health, safety,
and welfare. Violation of any such rules shall constitute grounds for
refusal, suspension, or revocation of licenses or any other authority
to practice issued by the board. However, it shall not be a violation
for a pharmacist or pharmacy to exercise the pharmacist's or pharmacy's
fundamental right to exercise religious beliefs or conscience when
choosing to not dispense drugs, devices, medication, or information;
(8) Adopt rules that allow a pharmacist to exercise his or her
choice not to dispense a restricted or over-the-counter drug or device
while accommodating the needs of the patient. Rules and policies must
require any objecting pharmacist to inform the pharmacist in charge in
advance so that the pharmacist in charge can reasonably accommodate
that objection before a patient presents a prescription or makes a
request for drugs or devices approved by the United States food and
drug administration for restricted and over-the-counter distribution by
pharmacies;
(9) Adopt rules establishing and governing continuing education
requirements for pharmacists and other licensees applying for renewal
of licenses under this chapter;
(((9))) (10) Be immune, collectively and individually, from suit in
any action, civil or criminal, based upon any disciplinary proceedings
or other official acts performed as members of such board. Such
immunity shall apply to employees of the department when acting in the
course of disciplinary proceedings;
(((10))) (11) Suggest strategies for preventing, reducing, and
eliminating drug misuse, diversion, and abuse, including professional
and public education, and treatment of persons misusing and abusing
drugs;
(((11))) (12) Conduct or encourage educational programs to be
conducted to prevent the misuse, diversion, and abuse of drugs for
health care practitioners and licensed or certified health care
facilities;
(((12))) (13) Monitor trends of drug misuse, diversion, and abuse
and make periodic reports to disciplinary boards of licensed health
care practitioners and education, treatment, and appropriate law
enforcement agencies regarding these trends;
(((13))) (14) Enter into written agreements with all other state
and federal agencies with any responsibility for controlling drug
misuse, diversion, or abuse and with health maintenance organizations,
health care service contractors, and health care providers to assist
and promote coordination of agencies responsible for ensuring
compliance with controlled substances laws and to monitor observance of
these laws and cooperation between these agencies. The department of
social and health services, the department of labor and industries, and
any other state agency including licensure disciplinary boards, shall
refer all apparent instances of over-prescribing by practitioners and
all apparent instances of legend drug overuse to the department. The
department shall also encourage such referral by health maintenance
organizations, health service contractors, and health care providers.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.64.160 and 1993 c 367 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to the grounds under RCW 18.130.170 and 18.130.180, the
board of pharmacy may take disciplinary action against the license of
any pharmacist or intern upon proof that:
(1) His or her license was procured through fraud,
misrepresentation, or deceit;
(2) In the event that a pharmacist is determined by a court of
competent jurisdiction to be mentally incompetent, the pharmacist shall
automatically have his or her license suspended by the board upon the
entry of the judgment, regardless of the pendency of an appeal;
(3) He or she has knowingly violated or permitted the violation of
any provision of any state or federal law, rule, or regulation
governing the possession, use, distribution, or dispensing of drugs,
including, but not limited to, the violation of any provision of this
chapter, Title 69 RCW, or rule or regulation of the board. However,
the board shall not adopt any rule that infringes in any way on a
pharmacist's or pharmacy's fundamental legal right to exercise the
pharmacist's or pharmacy's religious beliefs with regard to dispensing
lawfully prescribed or over-the-counter drug therapy, drugs, devices,
medication, or information;
(4) He or she has knowingly allowed any unlicensed person to take
charge of a pharmacy or engage in the practice of pharmacy, except a
pharmacy intern or pharmacy assistant acting as authorized in this
chapter or chapter 18.64A RCW in the presence of and under the
immediate supervision of a licensed pharmacist;
(5) He or she has compounded, dispensed, or caused the compounding
or dispensing of any drug or device which contains more or less than
the equivalent quantity of ingredient or ingredients specified by the
person who prescribed such drug or device: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That
nothing herein shall be construed to prevent the pharmacist from
exercising professional judgment in the preparation or providing of
such drugs or devices.

Sec. 5 RCW 18.130.180 and 1995 c 336 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following conduct, acts, or conditions constitute
unprofessional conduct for any license holder or applicant under the
jurisdiction of this chapter:
(1) The commission of any act involving moral turpitude,
dishonesty, or corruption relating to the practice of the person's
profession, whether the act constitutes a crime or not. If the act
constitutes a crime, conviction in a criminal proceeding is not a
condition precedent to disciplinary action. Upon such a conviction,
however, the judgment and sentence is conclusive evidence at the
ensuing disciplinary hearing of the guilt of the license holder or
applicant of the crime described in the indictment or information, and
of the person's violation of the statute on which it is based. For the
purposes of this section, conviction includes all instances in which a
plea of guilty or nolo contendere is the basis for the conviction and
all proceedings in which the sentence has been deferred or suspended.
Nothing in this section abrogates rights guaranteed under chapter 9.96A
RCW;
(2) Misrepresentation or concealment of a material fact in
obtaining a license or in reinstatement thereof;
(3) All advertising which is false, fraudulent, or misleading;
(4) Incompetence, negligence, or malpractice which results in
injury to a patient or which creates an unreasonable risk that a
patient may be harmed. The use of a nontraditional treatment by itself
shall not constitute unprofessional conduct, provided that it does not
result in injury to a patient or create an unreasonable risk that a
patient may be harmed;
(5) Suspension, revocation, or restriction of the individual's
license to practice any health care profession by competent authority
in any state, federal, or foreign jurisdiction, a certified copy of the
order, stipulation, or agreement being conclusive evidence of the
revocation, suspension, or restriction;
(6) The possession, use, prescription for use, or distribution of
controlled substances or legend drugs in any way other than for
legitimate or therapeutic purposes, diversion of controlled substances
or legend drugs, the violation of any drug law, or prescribing
controlled substances for oneself;
(7) Violation of any state or federal statute or administrative
rule regulating the profession in question, including any statute or
rule defining or establishing standards of patient care or professional
conduct or practice;
(8) Failure to cooperate with the disciplining authority by:
(a) Not furnishing any papers or documents;
(b) Not furnishing in writing a full and complete explanation
covering the matter contained in the complaint filed with the
disciplining authority;
(c) Not responding to subpoenas issued by the disciplining
authority, whether or not the recipient of the subpoena is the accused
in the proceeding; or
(d) Not providing reasonable and timely access for authorized
representatives of the disciplining authority seeking to perform
practice reviews at facilities utilized by the license holder;
(9) Failure to comply with an order issued by the disciplining
authority or a stipulation for informal disposition entered into with
the disciplining authority;
(10) Aiding or abetting an unlicensed person to practice when a
license is required;
(11) Violations of rules established by any health agency;
(12) Practice beyond the scope of practice as defined by law or
rule;
(13) Misrepresentation or fraud in any aspect of the conduct of the
business or profession;
(14) Failure to adequately supervise auxiliary staff to the extent
that the consumer's health or safety is at risk;
(15) Engaging in a profession involving contact with the public
while suffering from a contagious or infectious disease involving
serious risk to public health;
(16) Promotion for personal gain of any unnecessary or
inefficacious drug, device, treatment, procedure, or service;
(17) Conviction of any gross misdemeanor or felony relating to the
practice of the person's profession. For the purposes of this
subsection, conviction includes all instances in which a plea of guilty
or nolo contendere is the basis for conviction and all proceedings in
which the sentence has been deferred or suspended. Nothing in this
section abrogates rights guaranteed under chapter 9.96A RCW;
(18) The procuring, or aiding or abetting in procuring, a criminal
abortion;
(19) The offering, undertaking, or agreeing to cure or treat
disease by a secret method, procedure, treatment, or medicine, or the
treating, operating, or prescribing for any health condition by a
method, means, or procedure which the licensee refuses to divulge upon
demand of the disciplining authority;
(20) The willful betrayal of a practitioner-patient privilege as
recognized by law;
(21) Violation of chapter 19.68 RCW;
(22) Interference with an investigation or disciplinary proceeding
by willful misrepresentation of facts before the disciplining authority
or its authorized representative, or by the use of threats or
harassment against any patient or witness to prevent them from
providing evidence in a disciplinary proceeding or any other legal
action, or by the use of financial inducements to any patient or
witness to prevent or attempt to prevent him or her from providing
evidence in a disciplinary proceeding;
(23) Current misuse of:
(a) Alcohol;
(b) Controlled substances; or
(c) Legend drugs;
(24) Abuse of a client or patient or sexual contact with a client
or patient;
(25) Acceptance of more than a nominal gratuity, hospitality, or
subsidy offered by a representative or vendor of medical or health-related products or services intended for patients, in contemplation of
a sale or for use in research publishable in professional journals,
where a conflict of interest is presented, as defined by rules of the
disciplining authority, in consultation with the department, based on
recognized professional ethical standards;
(26) Interference with a patient's right to receive expeditious,
professional prescription services and information on drugs and devices
approved by the United States food and drug administration for
restricted distribution by pharmacies. The legal fundamental right by
pharmacists or pharmacies to exercise the pharmacist's or pharmacy's
religious beliefs and conscience and to choose whether or not to
participate in activities the pharmacist or pharmacy finds morally or
ethically objectionable, including but not limited to the dispensing of
a drug, medication, information, or device, does not constitute
unprofessional conduct; provided that accommodation has been offered
and it does not result in injury to a patient or create an unreasonable
risk that a patient will be harmed; and provided further that
accommodation does not include permission to lecture the patient;
(27) Lecturing by a pharmacist to a patient about the pharmacist's
moral or religious beliefs, violating the patient's privacy, or
destroying, confiscating, or otherwise tampering with the patient's
prescription.

--- END ---