BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.850 and 2005 c 282 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A sentencing guidelines commission is established as an agency
of state government.
(2) The legislature finds that the commission, having accomplished
its original statutory directive to implement this chapter, and having
expertise in sentencing practice and policies, shall:
(a) Evaluate state sentencing policy, to include whether the
sentencing ranges and standards are consistent with and further:
(i) The purposes of this chapter as defined in RCW 9.94A.010; and
(ii) The intent of the legislature to emphasize confinement for the
violent offender and alternatives to confinement for the nonviolent
offender.
The commission shall provide the governor and the legislature with
its evaluation and recommendations under this subsection not later than
December 1, 1996, and every two years thereafter;
(b) Recommend to the legislature revisions or modifications to the
standard sentence ranges, state sentencing policy, prosecuting
standards, and other standards. If implementation of the revisions or
modifications would result in exceeding the capacity of correctional
facilities, then the commission shall accompany its recommendation with
an additional list of standard sentence ranges which are consistent
with correction capacity;
(c) Study the existing criminal code and from time to time make
recommendations to the legislature for modification;
(d)(i) Serve as a clearinghouse and information center for the
collection, preparation, analysis, and dissemination of information on
state and local adult and juvenile sentencing practices; (ii) develop
and maintain a computerized adult and juvenile sentencing information
system by individual superior court judge consisting of offender,
offense, history, and sentence information entered from judgment and
sentence forms for all adult felons; and (iii) conduct ongoing research
regarding adult and juvenile sentencing guidelines, use of total
confinement and alternatives to total confinement, plea bargaining, and
other matters relating to the improvement of the adult criminal justice
system and the juvenile justice system;
(e) Assume the powers and duties of the juvenile disposition
standards commission after June 30, 1996;
(f) Evaluate the effectiveness of existing disposition standards
and related statutes in implementing policies set forth in RCW
13.40.010 generally, specifically review the guidelines relating to the
confinement of minor and first-time offenders as well as the use of
diversion, and review the application of current and proposed juvenile
sentencing standards and guidelines for potential adverse impacts on
the sentencing outcomes of racial and ethnic minority youth;
(g) Solicit the comments and suggestions of the juvenile justice
community concerning disposition standards, and make recommendations to
the legislature regarding revisions or modifications of the standards.
The evaluations shall be submitted to the legislature on December 1 of
each odd-numbered year. The department of social and health services
shall provide the commission with available data concerning the
implementation of the disposition standards and related statutes and
their effect on the performance of the department's responsibilities
relating to juvenile offenders, and with recommendations for
modification of the disposition standards. The administrative office
of the courts shall provide the commission with available data on
diversion, including the use of youth court programs, and dispositions
of juvenile offenders under chapter 13.40 RCW; and
(h) Not later than December 1, 1997, and at least every two years
thereafter, based on available information, report to the governor and
the legislature on:
(i) Racial disproportionality in juvenile and adult sentencing,
and, if available, the impact that diversions, such as youth courts,
have on racial disproportionality in juvenile prosecution,
adjudication, and sentencing;
(ii) The capacity of state and local juvenile and adult facilities
and resources; and
(iii) Recidivism information on adult and juvenile offenders.
(3) Each of the commission's recommended standard sentence ranges
shall include one or more of the following: Total confinement, partial
confinement, community supervision, community restitution, and a fine.
(4) The standard sentence ranges of total and partial confinement
under this chapter, except as provided in RCW 9.94A.517, are subject to
the following limitations:
(a) If the maximum term in the range is one year or less, the
minimum term in the range shall be no less than one-third of the
maximum term in the range, except that if the maximum term in the range
is ninety days or less, the minimum term may be less than one-third of
the maximum;
(b) If the maximum term in the range is greater than one year, the
minimum term in the range shall be no less than seventy-five percent of
the maximum term in the range, except that for murder in the second
degree in seriousness level XIV under RCW 9.94A.510, the minimum term
in the range shall be no less than fifty percent of the maximum term in
the range; and
(c) The maximum term of confinement in a range may not exceed the
statutory maximum for the crime as provided in RCW 9A.20.021.
(5)(a) Not later than December 31, 1999, the commission shall
propose to the legislature the initial community custody ranges to be
included in sentences under RCW 9.94A.715 for crimes committed on or
after July 1, 2000. Not later than December 31 of each year, the
commission may propose modifications to the ranges. The ranges shall
be based on the principles in RCW 9.94A.010, and shall take into
account the funds available to the department for community custody.
The minimum term in each range shall not be less than one-half of the
maximum term.
(b) The legislature may, by enactment of a legislative bill, adopt
or modify the community custody ranges proposed by the commission. If
the legislature fails to adopt or modify the initial ranges in its next
regular session after they are proposed, the proposed ranges shall take
effect without legislative approval for crimes committed on or after
July 1, 2000.
(c) When the commission proposes modifications to ranges pursuant
to this subsection, the legislature may, by enactment of a bill, adopt
or modify the ranges proposed by the commission for crimes committed on
or after July 1 of the year after they were proposed. Unless the
legislature adopts or modifies the commission's proposal in its next
regular session, the proposed ranges shall not take effect.
(6) The commission shall review existing Revised Code of Washington
statutes of limitation for all sex offenses as defined in RCW
9.94A.030, for both civil and criminal proceedings. Not later than
December 31, 2008, the commission shall report to the legislature on
any recommendations for changes to the existing statutes of limitation
for any sex offense.
(7) The commission shall exercise its duties under this section in
conformity with chapter 34.05 RCW.

--- END ---