BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 In Washington, the legislature and the
courts share the responsibility for enacting rules of evidence. The
court's authority for enacting rules of evidence arises from a
statutory delegation of that responsibility to the court and from
Article IV, section 1 of the state Constitution. State v. Fields, 85
Wn.2d 126, 129, 530 P.2d 284 (1975).
The legislature's authority for enacting rules of evidence arises
from the Washington supreme court's prior classification of such rules
as substantive law. See State v. Sears, 4 Wn.2d 200, 215, 103 P.2d 337
(1940) (the legislature has the power to enact laws which create rules
of evidence); State v. Pavelich, 153 Wash. 379, 279 P. 1102 (1929)
("rules of evidence are substantiative law"). The Washington supreme
court's recognition of the legislature's power in this area is
consistent with decisions from other jurisdictions that have comparable
provisions to the Washington state Constitution. See, e.g., State v.
Lewis, 67 Mont. 447, 216 P. 337, 339 (1923) ("there can be no doubt
respecting the general power of the Legislature to prescribe rules of
evidence to be observed in judicial tribunals, it being restricted only
by constitutional limitations and guaranties"); Mont. Const. Art. VIII,
§ 1 (1889). Prior to 1979, the only codified rules of evidence in
Washington could be found in legislatively enacted statutes.
Our current rules of evidence were drafted by a judicial council
task force that was appointed by the Honorable Charles F. Stafford in
February of 1976. The task force membership included representatives
of both the legislature and judiciary. One of the issues considered by
the task force was the mode of adoption of a system of rules of
evidence. The ultimate conclusion was that court rules would be
preferable in terms of the relatively simple procedure of promulgation
and amendment. L. Orland, Chairman's Introduction to the Washington
Rules of Evidence, reproduced in 5 K. Tegland, Wash. Prac., Evidence
Law and Practice, at v-xi (2nd ed. 1982). The task force, however,
never expressed a belief that the legislature lacked the authority or
power to adopt the rules by statute.
It is now apparent that with respect to substantive rules of
evidence related to criminal proceedings, the legislative process is
better suited to address concerns raised by the general public than is
the court rule process. Nonlawyer advocates of vulnerable adults and
children, crime victims, the falsely accused, treatment professionals,
and other concerned citizens are all represented in the legislative
process. The rule-making procedure adopted by the Washington supreme
court presents less opportunity for nonlawyer participation. See
generally Rules of General Application 9. The court rule process is,
however, well-suited to address matters of procedure, because on
procedural matters, input is needed primarily from lawyers.
The legislature, consistent with its responsibility for defining
crimes and for establishing penalties for violations of criminal laws,
enacted rules related to the admission of evidence in criminal
prosecutions for sex offenses. See, e.g., RCW 9A.44.020 (rape shield
law); RCW 9A.44.120 (child hearsay rule). The Washington supreme court
upheld these laws as a proper exercise of legislative authority. See
generally State v. Ryan, 103 Wn.2d 165, 178, 691 P.2d 197 (1984)
(upholding the legislature's enactment of a child hearsay statute);
State v. Hudlow, 99 Wn.2d 1, 659 P.2d 514 (1983) (upholding the
legislature's enactment of a rape shield statute).
The legislature finds that in sex crime cases generally, and in
child molestation cases in particular, the offense often is committed
surreptitiously, in the absence of any independent witnesses. In
addition, because of the unusually aberrant and pathological nature of
the crime of child molestation, prior acts of similar misconduct, as
opposed to other types of misconduct, are deemed to be highly probative
because they tend to establish a motive or explanation for an otherwise
inexplicably horrible crime, and may also assist the jury in assessing
the probability that a defendant has been falsely accused of such
shocking behavior.
Adult-victim sexual assault cases are also distinctive, and often
turn on difficult credibility determinations. Alleged consent by the
victim is rarely an issue in prosecutions for other violent crimes, but
the defendant in a rape case often contends that the victim engaged in
consensual sex and then falsely accused him. Knowledge that the
defendant has committed rapes on other occasions is frequently critical
in assessing the relative plausibility of these claims and accurately
deciding cases that would otherwise become unresolvable swearing
matches.
These findings resulted in the adoption of rules 413 through 415 of
the Federal Rules of Evidence as part of the Violent Crime Control and
Law Enforcement Act of 1994. P.L. 103-322, 108 Stat. 1796. See 140
Cong. Rec. S12990, daily ed. Sept 20, 1994 (remarks of Senator Robert
Dole); 140 Cong. Rec. H8991, daily ed., August 21, 1994 (remarks of
Representative Molinari). The practical effect of the new federal
rules of evidence was to put evidence of uncharged offenses in sexual
assault and child molestation cases on the same footing as other types
of relevant evidence that are not subject to a special exclusionary
rule.
Since 1994, eight states enacted similar rules to protect the
public from rapists and child molesters. See Arizona Evidence Rule
404(c); Cal. Evid. Code § 1108; Fla. Stat. § 90.404(2)(b); 725 Ill.
Comp. Stat. Ann. 5/115-7.3; Iowa Code § 701.11; La. Code Evid. Ann.
Art. 412.2; Ore. Evid. Code Rule 404(4); Tex. Code Crim. Proc. Art.
38.37. Courts have found the federal rules and the similar state
statutes and rules to be constitutional as applied. Even a court from
a jurisdiction whose constitution places the sole authority to adopt
evidence rules with the judiciary has, as a matter of comity, approved
a similar statutory exception to their judicially adopted Evidence Rule
404. See State v. McCoy, 682 N.W.2d 153, 159-160 (Minn. 2004).
The legislature adopts this exception to Evidence Rule 404(b) to
ensure that juries receive the necessary evidence to reach a just and
fair verdict.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 10.58 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In a criminal action in which the defendant is accused of a sex
offense, evidence of the defendant's commission of another sex offense
or sex offenses is admissible, notwithstanding Evidence Rule 404(b),
if the evidence is not inadmissible pursuant to Evidence Rule 403.
(2) In a case in which the state intends to offer evidence under
this rule, the attorney for the state shall disclose the evidence to
the defendant, including statements of witnesses or a summary of the
substance of any testimony that is expected to be offered, at least
fifteen days before the scheduled date of trial or at such later time
as the court may allow for good cause.
(3) This section shall not be construed to limit the admission or
consideration of evidence under any other evidence rule.
(4) For purposes of this section, "sex offense" means:
(a) Any offense defined as a sex offense by RCW 9.94A.030;
(b) Any violation under RCW 9A.44.096 (sexual misconduct with a
minor in the second degree);
(c) Any violation under RCW 9.68A.090 (communication with a minor
for immoral purposes);
(d) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense involving
behavior that under the laws of this state would be defined as a sex
offense under this subsection; and
(e) Any gross misdemeanor that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a
criminal attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to
commit an offense that is classified as a sex offense under RCW
9.94A.030 or this subsection.
(5) For purposes of this section, uncharged conduct is included in
the definition of "sex offense."
(6) For purposes of this section, "defendant" includes a juvenile
offender as defined by RCW 13.40.020.
(7) When evaluating whether evidence of the defendant's commission
of another sexual offense or offenses should be excluded pursuant to
Evidence Rule 403, the trial judge shall consider the following
factors:
(a) The similarity of the prior acts to the acts charged;
(b) The closeness in time of the prior acts to the acts charged;
(c) The frequency of the prior acts;
(d) The presence or lack of intervening circumstances;
(e) The necessity of the evidence beyond the testimonies already
offered at trial; and
(f) Other facts and circumstances.
(8) The inflammatory potential inherent in the sexual nature of
prior sex offenses cannot be considered in evaluating the admissibility
of evidence under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Section 2 of this act is based upon
Federal Rules of Evidence Rules 413 and 414, and federal appellate
court cases construing those rules.
(2) Section 2 of this act applies to any case that is tried on or
after its adoption.

Sec. 4 RCW 2.04.200 and 1925 ex.s. c 118 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
When and as the rules of courts herein authorized shall be
promulgated all laws in conflict therewith shall be and become of no
further force or effect unless the law in conflict expressly states an
intent to supersede a rule of court.

--- END ---