BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The commissioner shall require carriers to report such data as
the commissioner may determine are necessary for the evaluation of:
(a) The impact of the sale of association health plans on the
overall health care marketplace of this state; and
(b) The impact of association health plans that use claims data or
health factors in setting rates for small groups that are included in
an association health plan.
(2) The data may include, but need not be limited to, the
following:
(a) The number of persons residing in Washington who receive health
benefit coverage through each association health plan underwritten or
administered by the carrier, and whether the association health plan
uses claims data or health factors in setting rates for small groups
included in the plan;
(b) Demographic information regarding the persons covered in
association health plans and in small group plans;
(c) The average claims experience of persons covered by the
carrier's association health plans and by its small group plans;
(d) Eligibility requirements, underwriting criteria, and coverage
standards, including but not limited to association membership
requirements, health questions, if any, asked or used for the purpose
of considering eligibility or cost of coverage, and a description of
any other standard for eligibility or qualification for enrollment or
coverage;
(e) The methodology used by the carrier to determine the cost of
coverage for each association health plan; and
(f) Such other data as the commissioner may reasonably require.
(3) The carriers shall electronically submit the information
described in subsections (1) and (2) of this section in a format and
according to instructions prescribed by the commissioner.
(4)(a) Data, information, and documents provided by the carrier
pursuant to this section are exempt from public inspection and copying
under chapters 42.17 and 42.56 RCW, to the extent that they contain
actuarial formula, statistics, and assumptions submitted in support of
setting rates for the association health plans. The data, information,
and documents may be provided in their entirety for analysis as
required in section 2 of this act.
(b) The commissioner is authorized to use documents, materials, or
other information obtained pursuant to this section in the furtherance
of any regulatory activities, reports to the legislature, or legal
actions brought as a part of the commissioner's official duties.
(5) For purposes of this section, "association health plan" means
a health plan purchased through an association or through a member-governed group formed specifically for the purpose of purchasing health
care.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 By December 15, 2008, and one year
thereafter, the joint legislative audit and review committee shall
obtain data as described in section 1 of this act, from the office of
the insurance commissioner, and report to the legislature on
association health plans and any impact they may have on the small
group insurance market in Washington state, including:
(1) Enrollment, affordability, premiums charged, and selection
trends in the association plans market;
(2) Changes in enrollment, affordability, premiums charged, and
financial viability of small group plans;
(3) Any shifts of covered populations between small group and
association plans;
(4) Any adverse selection into either small group or association
plans; and
(5) Other measures of emerging trends in the small group and
association plan health insurance markets.

--- END ---