BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) There is created the Saint Edward
seminary building future uses assessment committee. The purpose of the
committee is solely to conduct an assessment of and make
recommendations regarding the future uses of the seminary building at
Saint Edward state park, consistent with the criteria and procedures
provided in this section.
(2) The committee is composed of the following members:
(a) A representative of the state parks and recreation commission,
selected by the director of parks and recreation;
(b) A representative of the city of Kenmore, selected by the city;
(c) A representative of King county, selected by the county;
(d) A member having experience and expertise in major building
rehabilitation and reuse projects, selected by the governor;
(e) A member representing historic preservation interests, selected
by the King county executive;
(f) The chair of the new Saint Edward citizen advisory committee,
created following authorization by the state parks and recreation
commission at its September 2007 meeting;
(g) A member representing neighborhoods surrounding Saint Edward
state park, selected by the governor; and
(h) A representative of the governor, selected by the governor.
(3) The governor's representative serves as chair of the committee.
The governor may solicit and consider recommendations from interested
citizens and organizations in making the selections.
(4) The state parks and recreation commission shall provide staff
to the committee to assist in carrying out the committee's
responsibilities under this section. The parks and recreation
commission shall also make available previous assessments, reports, and
proposals regarding future uses of the seminary building, and cooperate
with the committee in all respects in fulfilling the requirements of
this section.
(5) The chair shall convene the committee by July 1, 2008, and
schedule meetings periodically as necessary to meet the deadlines
established in this section. The committee may enter contracts to
assist in the preparation of the assessment required under this
section.
(6) The committee shall prepare an assessment of the Saint Edward
seminary building that includes:
(a) A summary of the current condition of the building and
immediate grounds;
(b) A summary of the previous proposals submitted to the state
parks and recreation commission for future uses of the building, as
well as proposals developed by the commission;
(c) Identification of potential future uses for institutional,
residential, commercial, or mixed uses, including an identification of
projected capital and operating funds needed for the identified
alternative uses;
(d) Opportunities to bring private capital and expertise to the
building uses through public and private partnerships or other
arrangements;
(e) An assessment of road, parking, utility, and other
infrastructure improvements necessary to serve the seminary building
and other public uses of the state parks, including identification of
cost-sharing opportunities with Bastyr University for improvements that
would serve both the state park and the university;
(f) An assessment of how proposed uses of the seminary building may
impact current park uses;
(g) An assessment of whether the seminary building and immediate
grounds may be administered by another state agency or local government
more suitable to operating large scale uses in buildings; and
(h) An assessment of whether the seminary building and immediate
grounds and facilities should be sold.
(7) In conducting the assessment and developing recommendations,
the committee should be guided by the following criteria:
(a) The assessment should be limited to the seminary building and
immediate grounds and facilities necessary for a successful reuse of
the building;
(b) The proposed uses of the building should be consistent with the
management plan previously approved by the parks and recreation
commission for the remaining areas of the state park, and to the extent
practicable should be consistent with state parks use principles for
the seminary building;
(c) The proposed uses should preserve the historic features of the
building while employing recognized adaptive reuse techniques for
historic structures, whether preservation, rehabilitation, restoration,
or reconstruction;
(d) The proposed uses of the building must be compatible with
public park uses of the state park and meet the requirements
established when federal funds were provided for the acquisition of the
park; and
(e) The future uses of the building should be substantially self-supporting, and necessary improvements and rehabilitation should be
integrated with the future uses in a manner that may attract
substantial nonstate funding.
(8) The assessment must be provided to the governor, the parks and
recreation commission, and the fiscal and policy committees of the
senate and house of representatives by November 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The sum of seventy-five thousand dollars, or
as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2009, from the general fund to the state parks and
recreation commission for the purposes of this act.

--- END ---