BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.215.060 and 2007 c 400 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The Washington community learning center program is
established. The program shall be administered by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction. The purposes of the program
include:
(a) Supporting the creation or expansion of community learning
centers that provide students with tutoring and educational enrichment
when school is not in session;
(b) Providing training and professional development for community
learning center program staff;
(c) Increasing public awareness of the availability and benefits of
after-school programs; and
(d) Supporting statewide after-school intermediary organizations in
their efforts to provide leadership, coordination, technical
assistance, professional development, advocacy, and programmatic
support to the Washington community learning center programs and after-school programs throughout the state.
(2)(a) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the office
of the superintendent of public instruction may provide community
learning center grants to any public or private organization that meets
the eligibility criteria of the federal twenty-first century community
learning centers program.
(b) Priority may be given to grant requests submitted jointly by
one or more schools or school districts and one or more community-based
organizations or other nonschool partners.
(c) Priority may also be given to grant requests for after-school
programs focusing on improving mathematics achievement, particularly
for middle and junior high school students.
(d) Priority shall be given to grant requests that:
(i) Focus on improving reading and mathematics proficiency for
students who attend schools that have been identified as being in need
of improvement under section 1116 of Title I of the federal no child
left behind act of 2001; and
(ii) Include a public/private partnership agreement or proposal for
how to provide free transportation for those students in need that are
involved in the program.
(3) Community learning center grant funds may be used to carry out
a broad array of out-of-school activities that support and enhance
academic achievement. The activities may include but need not be
limited to:
(a) Remedial and academic enrichment;
(b) Mathematics, reading, and science education;
(c) Arts and music education;
(d) Entrepreneurial education;
(e) Community service;
(f) Tutoring and mentoring programs;
(g) Programs enhancing the language skills and academic achievement
of limited English proficient students;
(h) Recreational and athletic activities;
(i) Telecommunications and technology education;
(j) Programs that promote parental involvement and family literacy;
(k) Drug and violence prevention, counseling, and character
education programs; and
(l) Programs that assist students who have been truant, suspended,
or expelled, to improve their academic achievement.
(4) Each community learning center grant may be made for a maximum
of five years. Each grant recipient shall report annually to the
office of the superintendent of public instruction on what
transportation services are being used to assist students in accessing
the program and how those services are being funded. Based on this
information, the office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall compile a list of transportation service options being used and
make that list available to all after-school program providers that
were eligible for the community learning center program grants.
(5) To the extent that funding is available for this purpose, the
office of the superintendent of public instruction may provide grants
or other support for the training and professional development of
community learning center staff, the activities of intermediary after-school organizations, and efforts to increase public awareness of the
availability and benefits of after-school programs.
(6) Schools or school districts that receive a community learning
center grant under this section may seek approval from the office of
the superintendent of public instruction for flexibility to use a
portion of their state transportation funds for the costs of
transporting students to and from the community learning center
program.
(7) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
evaluate program outcomes and report to the governor and the education
committees of the legislature on the outcomes of the grants and make
recommendations related to program modification, sustainability, and
possible expansion. An interim report is due November 1, 2008. A
final report is due December 1, 2009.

--- END ---