BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.15.621 and 2007 c 450 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that active military and naval veterans,
reserve military and naval veterans, and national guard members called
to active duty have served their country and have risked their lives to
defend the lives of all Americans and the freedoms that define and
distinguish our nation. The legislature intends to honor active
military and naval veterans, reserve military and naval veterans, and
national guard members who have served on active military or naval duty
for the public service they have provided to this country.
(2) Subject to the limitations in RCW 28B.15.910, the governing
boards of the state universities, the regional universities, The
Evergreen State College, and the community colleges, may waive all or
a portion of tuition and fees for an eligible veteran or national guard
member.
(3) The governing boards of the state universities, the regional
universities, The Evergreen State College, and the community colleges,
may waive all or a portion of tuition and fees for a military or naval
veteran who is a Washington domiciliary, but who did not serve on
foreign soil or in international waters or in another location in
support of those serving on foreign soil or in international waters and
who does not qualify as an eligible veteran or national guard member
under subsection (8) of this section. However, there shall be no state
general fund support for waivers granted under this subsection.
(4) Subject to the conditions in subsection (5) of this section and
the limitations in RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards of the state
universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State College,
and the community colleges, shall waive all tuition and fees for the
following persons:
(a) A child and the spouse or surviving spouse of an eligible
veteran or national guard member who became totally disabled, as
defined in RCW 28B.15.385 ((while engaged)), as a result of serving in
active federal military or naval service, or who is determined by the
federal government to be a prisoner of war or missing in action; and
(b) A child and the surviving spouse of an eligible veteran or
national guard member who lost his or her life ((while engaged)) as a
result of serving in active federal military or naval service.
(5) The conditions in this subsection (5) apply to waivers under
subsection (4) of this section.
(a) A child must be a Washington domiciliary between the age of
seventeen and twenty-six to be eligible for the tuition waiver. A
child's marital status does not affect eligibility.
(b)(i) A surviving spouse must be a Washington domiciliary.
(ii) Except as provided in (b)(iii) of this subsection, a surviving
spouse has ten years from the date of the death, total disability ((as
defined in RCW 28B.15.385)), or federal determination of prisoner of
war or missing in action status of the eligible veteran or national
guard member to receive ((the)) benefits under the waiver. Upon
remarriage, the surviving spouse is ineligible for the waiver of all
tuition and fees.
(iii) If a death results from total disability, the surviving
spouse has ten years from the date of death in which to receive
benefits under the waiver.
(c) Each recipient's continued participation is subject to the
school's satisfactory progress policy.
(d) Tuition waivers for graduate students are not required for
those who qualify under subsection (4) of this section but are
encouraged.
(e) Recipients who receive a waiver under subsection (4) of this
section may attend full-time or part-time. Total credits earned using
the waiver may not exceed two hundred quarter credits, or the
equivalent of semester credits.
(6) Required waivers of all tuition and fees under subsection (4)
of this section shall not affect permissive waivers of tuition and fees
under subsection (3) of this section.
(7) Private vocational schools and private higher education
institutions are encouraged to provide waivers consistent with the
terms in subsections (2) through (5) of this section.
(8) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Eligible veteran or national guard member" means a Washington
domiciliary who was an active or reserve member of the United States
military or naval forces, or a national guard member called to active
duty, who served in active federal service, under either Title 10 or
Title 32 of the United States Code, in a war or conflict fought on
foreign soil or in international waters or in another location in
support of those serving on foreign soil or in international waters,
and if discharged from service, has received an honorable discharge.
(b) "Totally disabled" means a person who has been determined to be
one hundred percent disabled by the federal department of veterans
affairs.
(c) "Washington domiciliary" means a person whose true, fixed, and
permanent house and place of habitation is the state of Washington.
"Washington domiciliary" includes a person who is residing in rental
housing or residing in base housing. In ascertaining whether a child
or surviving spouse is domiciled in the state of Washington, public
institutions of higher education shall, to the fullest extent possible,
rely upon the standards provided in RCW 28B.15.013.
(9) As used in subsection (4) of this section, "fees" includes all
assessments for costs incurred as a condition to a student's full
participation in coursework and related activities at an institution of
higher education.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.15.385 and 2007 c 450 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purposes of RCW 28B.15.380((,)) and 28B.15.520((, and
28B.15.621)), the phrase "totally disabled" means a person who has
become totally and permanently disabled for life by bodily injury or
disease, and is thereby prevented from performing any occupation or
gainful pursuit.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.15.910 and 2007 c 522 s 948 and 2007 c 450 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) For the purpose of providing state general fund support to
public institutions of higher education, except for revenue waived
under programs listed in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, and
unless otherwise expressly provided in the omnibus state appropriations
act, the total amount of operating fees revenue waived, exempted, or
reduced by a state university, a regional university, The Evergreen
State College, or the community colleges as a whole, shall not exceed
the percentage of total gross authorized operating fees revenue in this
subsection. As used in this section, "gross authorized operating fees
revenue" means the estimated gross operating fees revenue as estimated
under RCW 82.33.020 or as revised by the office of financial
management, before granting any waivers. This limitation applies to
all tuition waiver programs established before or after July 1, 1992.
(a) University of Washington 21 percent
(b) Washington State University 20 percent
(c) Eastern Washington University 11 percent
(d) Central Washington University 10 percent
(e) Western Washington University 10 percent
(f) The Evergreen State College 10 percent
(g) Community colleges as a whole 35 percent
(2) The limitations in subsection (1) of this section apply to
waivers, exemptions, or reductions in operating fees contained in the
following:
(a) RCW 28B.15.014;
(b) RCW 28B.15.100;
(c) RCW 28B.15.225;
(d) RCW 28B.15.380;
(e) RCW 28B.15.520;
(f) RCW 28B.15.526;
(g) RCW 28B.15.527;
(h) RCW 28B.15.543;
(i) RCW 28B.15.545;
(j) RCW 28B.15.555;
(k) RCW 28B.15.556;
(l) RCW 28B.15.615;
(m) RCW 28B.15.621 (2) and (4);
(n) RCW 28B.15.730;
(o) RCW 28B.15.740;
(p) RCW 28B.15.750;
(q) RCW 28B.15.756;
(r) RCW 28B.50.259; and
(s) RCW 28B.70.050.
(3) The limitations in subsection (1) of this section do not apply
to waivers, exemptions, or reductions in services and activities fees
contained in the following:
(a) RCW 28B.15.522;
(b) RCW 28B.15.540;
(c) RCW 28B.15.558; and
(d) RCW 28B.15.621(3) ((and (4))).
(4) The total amount of operating fees revenue waived, exempted, or
reduced by institutions of higher education participating in the
western interstate commission for higher education western
undergraduate exchange program under RCW 28B.15.544 shall not exceed
the percentage of total gross authorized operating fees revenue in this
subsection.
(a) Washington State University 1 percent
(b) Eastern Washington University 3 percent
(c) Central Washington University 3 percent
(5) The institutions of higher education will participate in
outreach activities to increase the number of veterans who receive
tuition waivers. Colleges and universities shall revise the
application for admissions so that all applicants shall have the
opportunity to advise the institution that they are veterans who need
assistance. If a person indicates on the application for admissions
that the person is a veteran who is in need of assistance, then the
institution of higher education shall ask the person whether they have
any funds disbursed in accordance with the Montgomery GI Bill available
to them. Each institution shall encourage veterans to utilize funds
available to them in accordance with the Montgomery GI Bill prior to
providing the veteran a tuition waiver.

--- END ---