BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.250.010 and 2005 c 322 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A radio communications service company, as defined in RCW
80.04.010, or any direct or indirect affiliate or agent of a provider,
or any person in the business of compiling, marketing, or selling the
phone number associated with radio communications service of any
subscriber for commercial purposes, shall not include the phone number
associated with radio communications service of any subscriber for
inclusion in any directory of any form, nor shall it sell the contents
of any directory database, without first obtaining the express, opt-in
consent of that subscriber. The subscriber's consent must be obtained
either in writing or electronically, and a ((receipt)) confirmation of
consent must be provided to the subscriber either by United States mail
or electronically. The consent shall be a separate document or located
on a separate screen or web page that has the sole purpose of
authorizing ((a radio communications service company)) the person or
provider to include the subscriber's phone number associated with radio
communications service in a publicly available directory assistance
database. In obtaining the subscriber's consent, the person or
provider shall unambiguously disclose that, by consenting, the
subscriber agrees to have the subscriber's phone number sold or
licensed as part of a list of subscribers and that the phone number may
be included in a publicly available directory assistance database. The
person or provider must also disclose that by consenting to be included
in the directory, the subscriber may incur additional charges for
receiving unsolicited calls or text messages.
(2) A subscriber who provides express consent pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section may revoke that consent at any time.
((A radio communications service company)) The person or provider shall
comply with the subscriber's request to opt out within a reasonable
period of time, not to exceed sixty days.
(3) A subscriber shall not be charged for opting not to be listed
in the directory.
(4) This section does not apply to the provision of telephone
numbers, for the purposes indicated, to:
(a) Any law enforcement agency, fire protection agency, public
health agency, public environmental health agency, city or county
emergency services planning agency, or private for-profit corporation
operating under contract with, and at the direction of, one or more of
these agencies, for the exclusive purpose of responding to a 911 call
or communicating an imminent threat to life or property. Information
or records provided to a private for-profit corporation pursuant to (b)
of this subsection shall be held in confidence by that corporation and
by any individual employed by or associated with that corporation.
Such information or records shall not be open to examination for any
purpose not directly connected with the administration of the services
specified in this subsection;
(b) A lawful process issued under state or federal law;
(c) A telecommunications company providing service between service
areas for the provision of telephone services to the subscriber between
service areas, or to third parties for the limited purpose of providing
billing services;
(d) A telecommunications company to effectuate a customer's request
to transfer the customer's assigned telephone number from the
customer's existing provider of telecommunications services to a new
provider of telecommunications services;
(e) The utilities and transportation commission pursuant to its
jurisdiction and control over telecommunications companies; and
(f) A sales agent to provide the subscriber's cell phone numbers to
the cellular provider for the limited purpose of billing and customer
service.
(5) Every knowing violation of this section is punishable by a fine
of up to fifty thousand dollars for each violation.
(6) The attorney general may bring actions to enforce compliance
with this section. For the first violation by any company or
organization of this section, the attorney general may notify the
company with a letter of warning that the section has been violated.
(7) No telecommunications company, nor any official or employee of
a telecommunications company, shall be subject to criminal or civil
liability for the release of customer information as authorized by this
section.

--- END ---