BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes the important
role that librarians and library programs play in contributing to the
goals of education reform that were begun in 1993. Education reform is
based on the premise that every Washington student be provided the
opportunity to access an educational program that will give him or her
the fundamental tools necessary to compete in whatever career path he
or she chooses beyond high school and be successful.
The legislature further recognizes that school libraries and school
library media programs are critical components of those educational
programs. Students in all schools, regardless of size, should have
access to these instructional resources and services in order to fully
benefit from their classroom instruction. While the legislature
created the basic education finance task force last year to develop
recommendations for how to fund core educational services, the
legislature finds that, as school districts across the state continue
to cut library services, there is a heightened sense of urgency for a
short-term bridge of funding to enable districts to maintain critical
instructional resources.
It is therefore the intent of the legislature to provide additional
funding in the 2008 legislative session to help school districts keep
their library doors open and accessible for their students while also
encouraging the basic education finance task force to consider the
crucial role of highly qualified certificated staff in its
deliberations over how to fund the K-12 educational system and
ultimately achieve the goals of education reform.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The funding provided by this section
shall be used to augment current funding for librarian programs
provided through basic education and other existing funding mechanisms
and shall not be used to supplant any existing state, federal, or local
funding used for library staff or programs. In order to receive
allocations under this section, school districts must agree that to the
maximum extent possible they will ensure that library programs and
services are equitably provided throughout the district. In order to
receive an allocation under this section, class II school districts, as
defined in RCW 28A.300.065, shall also agree to provide daily operation
of school library services in all schools of the district, exclusive of
schools without library facilities. The office of the superintendent
of public instruction shall adopt rules to implement these
requirements.
(2) For the 2008-09 school year, every school district shall
receive an allocation of twelve dollars per full-time equivalent
student to maintain and improve library materials, collections, and
services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---