BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 19.146 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A mortgage broker has a fiduciary relationship with the
borrower, and each mortgage broker is subject to all requirements for
fiduciaries otherwise applicable under state law. A mortgage broker's
fiduciary duties include, but are not limited to, the following:
(a) A mortgage broker must act in the borrower's best interest and
in the utmost good faith toward the borrower, and shall not compromise
a borrower's right or interest in favor of another's right or interest,
including a right or interest of the mortgage broker. A mortgage
broker shall not accept, provide, or charge any undisclosed
compensation or realize any undisclosed remuneration that inures to the
benefit of the mortgage broker on an expenditure made for the borrower;
(b) A mortgage broker must carry out all lawful instructions
provided by the borrower;
(c) A mortgage broker must disclose to the borrower all material
facts of which the mortgage broker has knowledge that might reasonably
affect the borrower's rights, interests, or ability to receive the
borrower's intended benefit from the residential mortgage loan;
(d) A mortgage broker must use reasonable care in performing
duties; and
(e) A mortgage broker must provide an accounting to the borrower
for all money and property received from the borrower.
(2) A mortgage broker may contract for or collect a fee for
services rendered if the fee is disclosed to the borrower in advance of
the provision of those services.

--- END ---