BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.86.090 and 2007 c 66 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person who is injured in his or her business or property by a
violation of RCW 19.86.020, 19.86.030, 19.86.040, 19.86.050, or
19.86.060, or any person so injured because he or she refuses to accede
to a proposal for an arrangement which, if consummated, would be in
violation of RCW 19.86.030, 19.86.040, 19.86.050, or 19.86.060, may
bring a civil action in ((the)) superior or district court to enjoin
further violations, to recover the actual damages sustained by him or
her, or both, together with the costs of the suit, including a
reasonable attorney's fee((, and)). In addition, the court may ((in
its discretion, increase the award of damages to an amount not to
exceed three times the actual damages sustained: PROVIDED, That such
increased damage award for violation of RCW 19.86.020 may not exceed
ten thousand dollars: PROVIDED FURTHER, That such person may bring a
civil action in the district court to recover his or her actual
damages, except for damages which exceed the amount specified in RCW
3.66.020, and the costs of the suit, including reasonable attorney's
fees. The district court may, in its discretion, increase the award of
damages to an amount not more than three times the actual damages
sustained, but such increased damage award shall not exceed the amount
specified in RCW 3.66.020)) award damages of up to fifty thousand
dollars against the defendant for each violation of this chapter to
advance the interests of this chapter. For the purpose of this
section, "person" ((shall)) includes the counties, municipalities, and
all political subdivisions of this state, and the attorney general on
behalf of the state of Washington.
Whenever the state of Washington is injured, directly or
indirectly, by reason of a violation of RCW 19.86.030, 19.86.040,
19.86.050, or 19.86.060, it may sue therefor in the superior court to
recover the actual damages sustained by it, whether direct or indirect,
((and to recover)) the costs of the suit, including a reasonable
attorney's fee, as well as other damages allowed under this section
that the trier of fact determines to be just.

--- END ---