BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 59.18.030 and 1998 c 276 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Distressed property" means real property that is (a) the
primary residence of the owner and (b) in foreclosure or in danger of
foreclosure.
(2) "Distressed property conveyance" means a transaction in which:
A foreclosed homeowner transfers an interest in the distressed property
to a distressed property purchaser; the distressed property purchaser
allows the foreclosed homeowner to occupy the distressed property; and
the distressed property purchaser or a person acting in participation
with the distressed property purchaser conveys or promises to convey
the distressed property to the foreclosed homeowner or provides the
foreclosed homeowner with an option to purchase the distressed property
at a later date.
(3) "Distressed property purchaser" means any person who acquires
an interest in distressed property under a distressed property
conveyance. "Distressed property purchaser" includes a person who acts
in joint venture or joint enterprise with one or more distressed
property purchasers in a distressed property conveyance. A federal or
state chartered bank, savings bank, thrift, or credit union is not a
distressed property purchaser.
(4) "Dwelling unit" is a structure or that part of a structure
which is used as a home, residence, or sleeping place by one person or
by two or more persons maintaining a common household, including but
not limited to single family residences and units of multiplexes,
apartment buildings, and mobile homes.
(((2))) (5) "Foreclosed homeowner" means an owner of distressed
property.
(6) "In danger of foreclosure" means any of the following:
(a) The homeowner has defaulted on the mortgage and, under the
terms of the mortgage, the mortgagee has the right to accelerate full
payment of the mortgage and repossess, sell, or cause to be sold the
property;
(b) The homeowner is at least thirty days delinquent on any loan
that is secured by the property; or
(c) The homeowner has a good faith belief that he or she is likely
to default on the mortgage within the upcoming four months due to a
lack of funds, and the homeowner has reported this belief to:
(i) The mortgagee;
(ii) A person licensed or required to be licensed under chapter
19.134 RCW;
(iii) A person licensed or required to be licensed under chapter
19.146 RCW;
(iv) A person licensed or required to be licensed under chapter
18.85 RCW;
(v) An attorney-at-law;
(vi) A mortgage counselor or other credit counselor licensed or
certified by any federal, state, or local agency; or
(vii) Any other party to a distressed property conveyance.
(7) "Landlord" means the owner, lessor, or sublessor of the
dwelling unit or the property of which it is a part, and in addition
means any person designated as representative of the landlord.
(((3))) (8) "Mortgage" is used in the general sense and includes
all instruments, including deeds of trust, that are used to secure an
obligation by an interest in real property.
(9) "Person" means an individual, group of individuals,
corporation, government, or governmental agency, business trust,
estate, trust, partnership, or association, two or more persons having
a joint or common interest, or any other legal or commercial entity.
(((4))) (10) "Owner" means one or more persons, jointly or
severally, in whom is vested:
(a) All or any part of the legal title to property; or
(b) All or part of the beneficial ownership, and a right to present
use and enjoyment of the property.
(((5))) (11) "Premises" means a dwelling unit, appurtenances
thereto, grounds, and facilities held out for the use of tenants
generally and any other area or facility which is held out for use by
the tenant.
(((6))) (12) "Rental agreement" means all agreements which
establish or modify the terms, conditions, rules, regulations, or any
other provisions concerning the use and occupancy of a dwelling unit.
(((7))) (13) A "single family residence" is a structure maintained
and used as a single dwelling unit. Notwithstanding that a dwelling
unit shares one or more walls with another dwelling unit, it shall be
deemed a single family residence if it has direct access to a street
and shares neither heating facilities nor hot water equipment, nor any
other essential facility or service, with any other dwelling unit.
(((8))) (14) A "tenant" is any person who is entitled to occupy a
dwelling unit primarily for living or dwelling purposes under a rental
agreement.
(((9))) (15) "Reasonable attorney's fees", where authorized in this
chapter, means an amount to be determined including the following
factors: The time and labor required, the novelty and difficulty of
the questions involved, the skill requisite to perform the legal
service properly, the fee customarily charged in the locality for
similar legal services, the amount involved and the results obtained,
and the experience, reputation and ability of the lawyer or lawyers
performing the services.
(((10))) (16) "Gang" means a group that: (a) Consists of three or
more persons; (b) has identifiable leadership or an identifiable name,
sign, or symbol; and (c) on an ongoing basis, regularly conspires and
acts in concert mainly for criminal purposes.
(((11))) (17) "Gang-related activity" means any activity that
occurs within the gang or advances a gang purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 59.18 RCW
to read as follows:
In an unlawful detainer action involving a distressed property:
(1) The plaintiff shall disclose to the court whether the defendant
previously held title to the distressed property, and explain how the
plaintiff came to acquire title;
(2) A defendant who previously held title to the distressed
property shall not be required to escrow any money pending trial when
a material question of fact exists as to whether the plaintiff acquired
title from the defendant directly or indirectly through a distressed
property conveyance;
(3) There must be both an automatic stay of the action and a
consolidation of the action with a pending or subsequent quiet title
action when a defendant claims that the plaintiff acquired title to the
distressed property through a distressed property conveyance.

--- END ---