BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 64.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any construction professional involved in the construction of
improvements upon real property intended for residential use has a
duty, which may not be waived, to exercise reasonable care in the
construction of the improvement.
(2) If a breach of the duty imposed under subsection (1) of this
section results in damage to any portion of the real property, the
current owner of the real property has a right to recover damages
independent of any contract right.
(3) This section does not apply to condominiums subject to chapter
64.34 RCW.

--- END ---