BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 In 2005, the legislature created the caring
for Washington individuals with autism task force. The task force was
directed to study and make recommendations to the legislature regarding
the growing incidence of autism and ways to improve the delivery and
coordination of autism services in the state. One of the essential
first step recommendations made in the final report was to establish a
minimum of one trained autism technical assistance specialist in each
of the nine educational service districts in order to provide support
to teachers and staff.
The legislature recognizes that lack of teachers and mentors
trained in autism strategies in the school district creates great
difficulty in implementing autism programs and strategies. There is an
urgent need to begin providing system-wide improvements to help provide
services to children with autism and their parents as well as to all
children with learning disabilities and their teachers. Hiring outside
consultants with expertise is costly to school districts as are the
consequences of actions brought by parents against the districts
because they are seeking appropriate services. Creating a position
with a built-in partnership and a liaison with birth-to-three services
and throughout the lifespan helps to establish common goals and
objectives. It is therefore the intent of the legislature to begin the
process of building a statewide position of an autism spectrum disorder
specialist within each educational service district region to provide
meaningful collaboration at the local level of school districts with
state agencies that is recognized as supportive of both professionals
and families.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.630
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A pilot program for implementing a statewide position of an
autism spectrum disorder specialist within each educational service
district is established. The program shall be administered by the
participating educational service districts. The autism spectrum
disorder specialist in each educational service district shall at a
minimum:
(a) Provide ongoing leadership, expertise, training, and
consultative services to school districts, birth-to-three agencies,
early intervention agencies, and other identified entities that support
or necessitate the use, identification, and implementation of research-based practices;
(b) Develop infrastructure to facilitate increasing school
districts, birth-to-three agencies, early intervention agencies, and
other identified entities the capacity to serve children ages birth to
twenty-one years with autism and other related disorders;
(c) Collaborate with the autism outreach project to identify
statewide training needs and current gaps, and develop training modules
to address identified gaps and present trainings within each
educational service district, including ongoing collaboration with the
University of Washington, the infant and early childhood conference,
and other training providers to avoid duplication of offerings;
(d) Participate in local efforts to gather demographic data
regarding children with autism. Report data gathered to the autism
task force identification/tracking subcommittee and the office of the
superintendent of public instruction autism outreach project;
(e) Continue to remain current in autism strategies, causation,
incidence and prevalence, curricula, methodologies, legal references,
and implications surrounding educational service and supports for
students with autism and other related disorders; and
(f) Conform to the principles, values, and mission of each
educational service district.
(2) In establishing this program, the legislature shall start with
two pilot programs in two separate educational service districts. One
pilot shall be in eastern Washington and one shall be in western
Washington.
(a) One of the pilot sites shall be an educational service district
with a special education cooperative that has a history of coordinated
community involvement and is already providing services for children
with autism and other learning disabilities similar to the autism
education coordinator in educational service district 105 who provides
training to educators on autism spectrum disorders and education
strategies; provides consultation to school districts on specific
students; serves as a liaison to a birth-to-three agency and school
districts; and provides other services as requested.
(b) In addition to the requirements of subsection (1) of this
section, the pilot educational service district established under
subsection (2)(a) of this section shall also provide technical
assistance to the second pilot site in developing its program.
(3) The two pilot sites shall work together to submit a single
report to the legislature by December 2010, on how to best expand the
program to all nine educational service districts, including the
staffing levels needed to provide adequate services and any recommended
changes to the program requirements.

--- END ---