BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds:
(1) College and university faculty members are subject specialists
with extensive experience in teaching and learning assessment, as well
as their specialized fields;
(2) College and university faculty members are frontline service
providers who conduct research to discover new technologies and produce
knowledge, design courses and curricula, assess students' development,
train teachers, supervise student research, and pursue grants and
funding for programs and projects at their institutions; their efforts
can affect the health, economy, and social well-being of the state, and
assist in the production of cultural and artistic achievements that
benefit citizens throughout the state;
(3) College and university faculty members participate in the
fundamental missions of their institutions by designing and monitoring
programs, including standards, curricula, and degree requirements, at
the level of department, school or college, and for the college or
university as a whole;
(4) The boards of regents and trustees of Washington's universities
and colleges are charged with the establishment of their institutions'
entrance requirements, schools, colleges, departments, and degree
requirements, and assess the outcomes of the use of state funds;
(5) Faculty bring an important, long-range perspective and
experience to board deliberations made by state institutions of higher
education; and
(6) RCW 28B.10.520 stipulates that "Each member of a board of
regents or board of trustees of a university or other state institution
of higher education, before entering upon his duties, shall take and
subscribe an oath to discharge faithfully and honestly his duties and
to perform strictly and impartially the same to the best of his
ability, such oath to be filed with the secretary of state."

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.20.100 and 2006 c 78 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The governance of the University of Washington shall be vested
in a board of regents to consist of ((ten)) eleven members, one of whom
shall be a student and, beginning with the first appointment after the
effective date of this section, one of whom shall be a full-time or
emeritus member of the faculty of the university at the time of
appointment. The governor shall select the student member from a list
of candidates, of at least three and not more than five, submitted by
the governing body of the associated students. The governor shall
select the faculty member from a list of candidates, of at least three
and not more than five, submitted by the governing body of the
university faculty. They shall be appointed by the governor with the
consent of the senate, and, except for the student member, shall hold
their offices for a term of six years from the first day of October and
until their successors shall be appointed and qualified. The student
member shall hold his or her office for a term of one year from the
first day of July until the first day of July of the following year or
until his or her successor is appointed and qualified, whichever is
later. The student member shall be a full-time student in good
standing at the university at the time of appointment.
(2) Six members of said board shall constitute a quorum for the
transaction of business. In the case of a vacancy, or when an
appointment is made after the date of the expiration of a term, the
governor shall fill the vacancy for the remainder of the term of the
regent whose office has become vacant or expired.
(3) Except for the term of the student member, no more than the
terms of two members will expire simultaneously on the last day of
September in any one year.
(4) A student appointed under this section shall excuse himself or
herself from participation or voting on matters relating to the hiring,
discipline, or tenure of faculty members and personnel.
(5) In accordance with the ethics in public service act, chapter
42.52 RCW, all public employees may "resolve conflicts of interest by
disclosing any interest that may be in conflict with his or her
official duties and abstaining from participation in any discussions or
actions on any issue where the interest may be affected."

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.30.100 and 2006 c 78 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The governance of Washington State University shall be vested
in a board of regents to consist of ((ten)) eleven members one of whom
shall be a student and, beginning with the first appointment after the
effective date of this section, one of whom shall be a full-time or
emeritus member of the faculty of the university at the time of
appointment. The governor shall select the student member from a list
of candidates, of at least three and not more than five, submitted by
the governing body of the associated students. The governor shall
select the faculty member from a list of candidates, of at least three
and not more than five, submitted by the governing body of the
university faculty. They shall be appointed by the governor, by and
with the consent of the senate and, except for the student member,
shall hold their offices for a term of six years from the first day of
October and until their successors are appointed and qualified. The
student member shall hold his or her office for a term of one year from
the first day of July until the first day of July of the following year
or until his or her successor is appointed and qualified, whichever is
later. The student member shall be a full-time student in good
standing at the university at the time of appointment.
(2) Six members of said board shall constitute a quorum for the
transaction of business. In the case of a vacancy or when an
appointment is made after the date of the expiration of a term, the
governor shall fill the vacancy for the remainder of the term of the
regent whose office has become vacant or expired.
(3) Except for the term of the student member, no more than the
terms of two members will expire simultaneously on the last day of
September in any one year.
(4) Each regent shall, before entering upon the discharge of his
respective duties as such, execute a good and sufficient bond to the
state of Washington, with two or more sufficient sureties, residents of
the state, or with a surety company licensed to do business within the
state, in the penal sum of not less than five thousand dollars,
conditioned for the faithful performance of his duties as such regent:
PROVIDED, That the university shall pay any fees incurred for any such
bonds for their board members.
(5) A student appointed under this section shall excuse himself or
herself from participation or voting on matters relating to the hiring,
discipline, or tenure of faculty members and personnel.
(6) In accordance with the ethics in public service act, chapter
42.52 RCW, all public employees may "resolve conflicts of interest by
disclosing any interest that may be in conflict with his or her
official duties and abstaining from participation in any discussions or
actions on any issue where the interest may be affected."

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.35.100 and 2006 c 78 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The governance of each of the regional universities shall be
vested in a board of trustees consisting of ((eight)) nine members, one
of whom shall be a student and, beginning with the first appointment
after the effective date of this section, one of whom shall be a full-time or emeritus member of the faculty of the university at the time of
appointment. The governor shall select the student member from a list
of candidates, of at least three and not more than five, submitted by
the governing body of the associated students. The governor shall
select the faculty member from a list of candidates, of at least three
and not more than five, submitted by the governing body of the
university faculty. They shall be appointed by the governor with the
consent of the senate and, except for the student member, shall hold
their offices for a term of six years from the first day of October and
until their successors are appointed and qualified. The student member
shall hold his or her office for a term of one year from the first day
of July and until the first day of July of the following year or until
his or her successor is appointed and qualified, whichever is later.
The student member shall be a full-time student in good standing at the
respective university at the time of appointment.
(2) Five members of the board constitute a quorum for the
transaction of business. In case of a vacancy, or when an appointment
is made after the date of expiration of the term, the governor shall
fill the vacancy for the remainder of the term of the trustee whose
office has become vacant or expired.
(3) Except for the term of the student member, no more than the
terms of two members will expire simultaneously on the last day of
September in any one year.
(4) A student appointed under this section shall excuse himself or
herself from participation or voting on matters relating to the hiring,
discipline, or tenure of faculty members and personnel.
(5) In accordance with the ethics in public service act, chapter
42.52 RCW, all public employees may "resolve conflicts of interest by
disclosing any interest that may be in conflict with his or her
official duties and abstaining from participation in any discussions or
actions on any issue where the interest may be affected."

Sec. 5 RCW 28B.40.100 and 2006 c 78 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The governance of The Evergreen State College shall be vested
in a board of trustees consisting of ((eight)) nine members, one of
whom shall be a student and, beginning with the first appointment after
the effective date of this section, one of whom shall be a full-time or
emeritus member of the faculty of the college at the time of
appointment. The governor shall select the student member from a list
of candidates, of at least three and not more than five, submitted by
the student body. The governor shall select the faculty member from a
list of candidates, of at least three and not more than five, submitted
by the college faculty. They shall be appointed by the governor with
the consent of the senate and, except for the student member, shall
hold their offices for a term of six years from the first day of
October and until their successors are appointed and qualified. The
student member shall hold his or her office for a term of one year from
the first day of July and until the first day of July of the following
year or until his or her successor is appointed and qualified,
whichever is later. The student member shall be a full-time student in
good standing at the college at the time of appointment.
(2) Five members of the board constitute a quorum for the
transaction of business. In case of a vacancy, or when an appointment
is made after the date of expiration of the term, the governor shall
fill the vacancy for the remainder of the term of the trustee whose
office has become vacant or expired.
(3) Except for the term of the student member, no more than the
terms of two members will expire simultaneously on the last day of
September in any one year.
(4) A student appointed under this section shall excuse himself or
herself from participation or voting on matters relating to the hiring,
discipline, or tenure of faculty members and personnel.
(5) In accordance with the ethics in public service act, chapter
42.52 RCW, all public employees may "resolve conflicts of interest by
disclosing any interest that may be in conflict with his or her
official duties and abstaining from participation in any discussions or
actions on any issue where the interest may be affected."

--- END ---