BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.45.020 and 2005 c 258 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The University of Washington is responsible for ensuring the
expansion of baccalaureate and graduate educational programs in the
((central)) Puget Sound area under rules or guidelines adopted by the
higher education coordinating board and in accordance with
proportionality agreements emphasizing access for transfer students
developed with the state board for community and technical colleges.
The University of Washington shall meet that responsibility through the
operation of at least ((two)) three branch campuses. One branch campus
shall be located in the Tacoma area. Another branch campus shall be
((collocated)) colocated with Cascadia Community College in the
Bothell-Woodinville area. Another branch campus shall be located in
Everett.
(2) At the University of Washington Tacoma, a top priority is
expansion of upper division capacity for transfer students and graduate
capacity and programs. Beginning in the fall of 2006, the campus may
offer lower division courses linked to specific majors in fields not
addressed at local community colleges. The campus shall admit lower
division students through coadmission or coenrollment agreements with
a community college, or through direct transfer for students who have
accumulated approximately one year of transferable college credits. In
addition to offering lower division courses linked to specific majors
as addressed ((above)) in this subsection, the campus may also directly
admit freshmen and sophomores gradually and deliberately in accordance
with the campus plan submitted to the higher education coordinating
board in 2004.
(3) At the University of Washington Bothell, a top priority is
expansion of upper division capacity for transfer students and graduate
capacity and programs. The campus shall also seek additional
opportunities to collaborate with and maximize its ((collocation
[colocation])) colocation with Cascadia Community College. Beginning
in the fall of 2006, the campus may offer lower division courses linked
to specific majors in fields not addressed at local community colleges.
The campus may admit lower division students through coadmission or
coenrollment agreements with a community college, or through direct
transfer for students who have accumulated approximately one year of
transferable college credits. In addition to offering lower division
courses linked to specific majors as addressed ((above)) in this
subsection, the campus may also directly admit freshmen and sophomores
gradually and deliberately in accordance with the campus plan submitted
to the higher education coordinating board in 2004.
(4) At the University of Washington North Sound, a top priority is
expansion of upper division capacity for transfer students and graduate
capacity and programs in science, nursing, teacher education,
technology, engineering, and mathematics. Beginning in the fall of
2009, the campus may offer lower division courses linked to specific
majors in fields not addressed at local community colleges. The campus
shall admit lower division students through coadmission or coenrollment
agreements with a community college, or through direct transfer for
students who have accumulated approximately one year of transferable
college credits. In addition to offering lower division courses linked
to specific majors as addressed in this subsection, the campus may also
directly admit freshmen and sophomores gradually and deliberately in
accordance with the campus plan submitted to the higher education
coordinating board in 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 When developing the capital plan for the
University of Washington North Sound, the higher education coordinating
board shall balance the overall capital needs of all of the state's
institutions of higher education. The capital plan for the University
of Washington North Sound should be developed in a manner that is
consistent with the overall capital facilities plan and the strategic
master plan.

--- END ---