BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The higher education coordinating board,
in consultation with the state board for community and technical
colleges, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the
workforce training and education coordinating board, and the council of
presidents, shall contract with a private vendor to create a three to
five-year marketing plan to increase student interest in high employer-demand programs of study and to increase public awareness of high
employer-demand programs of study. The marketing program shall target
unlikely college students in middle school or high school with a focus
on low-income and underrepresented communities, likely college students
in middle school and high school, adult learners, parents, and
educators.
(2) The private vendor shall be selected based upon the proven
ability to provide:
(a) Creative planning for educational advertising;
(b) Production of successful advertisement campaigns;
(c) Production of collateral materials;
(d) Opinion research for the evaluation of advertising campaigns;
and
(e) Web site creation.
(3) As used in this section, "high employer-demand program of
study" means an apprenticeship, or undergraduate or graduate
certificate or degree program in which the number of students prepared
for employment per year from in-state institutions of higher education
is substantially less than the number of projected job openings per
year in that field, statewide or in a substate region.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The sum of seven hundred thousand dollars,
or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2009, from the general fund to the higher
education coordinating board for the purposes of this act.

--- END ---