BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.15.100 and 2003 c 232 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in section 2 of this act, the governing
boards of the state universities, the regional universities, The
Evergreen State College, and the community colleges shall charge to and
collect from each of the students registering at the particular
institution for any quarter or semester such tuition fees and services
and activities fees, and other fees as such board shall in its
discretion determine. The total of all fees shall be rounded to the
nearest whole dollar amount: PROVIDED, That such tuition fees shall be
established in accordance with RCW 28B.15.067.
(2) Part-time students shall be charged tuition and services and
activities fees proportionate to full-time student rates established
for residents and nonresidents: PROVIDED, That except for students
registered at community colleges, students registered for fewer than
two credit hours shall be charged tuition and services and activities
fees at the rate established for two credit hours: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That, subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, residents of Idaho
or Oregon who are enrolled in community college district number twenty
for six or fewer credits during any quarter or semester may be exempted
from payment of all or a portion of the nonresident tuition fees
differential upon a declaration by the higher education coordinating
board that it finds Washington residents from the community college
district are afforded substantially equivalent treatment by such other
states.
(3) Full-time students registered for more than eighteen credit
hours shall be charged an additional operating fee for each credit hour
in excess of eighteen hours at the applicable established per credit
hour tuition fee rate for part-time students: PROVIDED, That, subject
to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards of the state
universities and the community colleges may exempt all or a portion of
the additional charge, for students who are registered exclusively in
first professional programs in medicine, dental medicine, veterinary
medicine, doctor of pharmacy, or law, or who are registered exclusively
in required courses in vocational preparatory programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.15 RCW
to read as follows:
A student at a state university, regional university, The Evergreen
State College, or community college shall be exempt from tuition fees
for the first two academic years after initial enrollment if the
student:
(1) Is a resident student as defined in RCW 28B.15.012 at the time
of initial registration at the institution;
(2) Registers at the institution within eight months after meeting
high school graduation requirements in accordance with state board of
education rules or receiving a certificate of educational competence
under the rules established by the state board of education under RCW
28A.305.190; and
(3) Continues to make satisfactory academic progress toward a
degree or certification.

--- END ---