BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the resident
population of orca whales in Washington waters (Orcinus orca), commonly
referred to as the southern residents, are enormously significant to
the state. These highly social, intelligent, and playful marine
mammals, which the legislature designated as the official marine mammal
of the state of Washington, serve as a symbol of the Pacific Northwest
and illustrate the biological diversity and rich natural heritage that
all Washington citizens and its visitors enjoy.
However, the legislature also finds that the southern resident
orcas are currently in a serious decline. Southern residents
experienced an almost twenty percent decline between 1996 and 2001.
The federal government listed this orca population as depleted in 2003,
and as an endangered species in 2005. The federal government has
identified impacts from vessels as a significant threat to these marine
mammals.
In 2006, after listing the southern resident orcas as endangered,
the federal government designated critical orca habitat and released a
proposed recovery plan for the southern resident orcas. The federal
government has initiated the process to adopt orca conservation rules,
but this process may be lengthy. Additionally, although existing whale
and wildlife viewing guidelines are an excellent educational resource,
these guidelines are voluntary measures that cannot be enforced.
Therefore, the legislature intends to protect southern resident
orca whales from impacts from vessels, and to educate the public on how
to reduce the risk of disturbing these important marine mammals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, it is
unlawful to:
(a) Approach, by any means, within three hundred feet of a southern
resident orca whale (Orcinus orca);
(b) Cause a vessel or other object to approach within three hundred
feet of a southern resident orca whale;
(c) Intercept a southern resident orca whale. A person intercepts
a southern resident orca whale when that person places a vessel or
allows a vessel to remain in the path of a whale and the whale
approaches within three hundred feet of that vessel;
(d) Fail to disengage the transmission of a vessel that is within
three hundred feet of a southern resident orca whale, for which the
vessel operator is strictly liable; or
(e) Feed a southern resident orca whale, for which any person
feeding a southern resident orca whale is strictly liable.
(2) A person is exempt from subsection (1) of this section where:
(a) A reasonably prudent person in that person's position would
determine that compliance with the requirements of subsection (1) of
this section will threaten the safety of the vessel, the vessel's crew
or passengers, or is not feasible due to vessel design limitations, or
because the vessel is restricted in its ability to maneuver due to
wind, current, tide, or weather;
(b) That person is lawfully participating in a commercial fishery
and is engaged in actively setting, retrieving, or closely tending
commercial fishing gear;
(c) That person is acting in the course of official duty for a
state, federal, tribal, or local government agency; or
(d) That person is acting pursuant to and consistent with
authorization from a state or federal government agency.
(3) For the purpose of this section, "vessel" means every
description of watercraft on the water, including a seaplane, capable
of being used as a means of transportation on the water.
(4) A violation of this section is a natural resource infraction
punishable under chapter 7.84 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The legislature encourages the state's law
enforcement agencies to utilize existing statutes and regulations to
protect southern resident orca whales from impacts from vessels,
including the vessel operation and enforcement standards contained in
chapter 79A.60 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The department and the state parks and recreation commission shall
disseminate information about section 2 of this act, whale and wildlife
viewing guidelines, and other responsible wildlife viewing messages to
educate Washington's citizens on how to reduce the risk of disturbing
southern resident orca whales. The department and the state parks and
recreation commission must, at minimum, disseminate this information on
their internet sites and through appropriate agency publications,
brochures, and other information sources. The department and the state
parks and recreation commission shall also attempt to reach the state's
boating community by coordinating with appropriate state and
nongovernmental entities to provide this information at marinas, boat
shows, boat dealers, during boating safety training courses, and in
conjunction with vessel registration or licensing.

--- END ---