BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.46.100 and 2002 c 114 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission shall fix the rates of toll and other charges
for all toll bridges built under this chapter that are financed
primarily by bonds issued by the state. Subject to RCW 47.46.090, the
commission may impose and modify toll charges from time to time as
conditions warrant.
(2) In establishing toll charges, the commission shall give due
consideration to any required costs for operating and maintaining the
toll bridge or toll bridges, including the cost of insurance, and to
any amount required by law to meet the redemption of bonds and interest
payments on them.
(3) The toll charges must be imposed in amounts sufficient to:
(a) Provide annual revenue sufficient to provide for annual
operating and maintenance expenses, except as provided in RCW 47.56.165
and 47.56.245;
(b) Make payments required under RCW 47.56.165 and 47.46.140,
including insurance costs and the payment of principal and interest on
bonds issued for any particular toll bridge or toll bridges; and
(c) Repay the motor vehicle fund under RCW 47.46.110, 47.56.165,
and 47.46.140.
(4) The bond principal and interest payments, including repayment
of the motor vehicle fund for amounts transferred from that fund to
provide for such principal and interest payments, constitute a first
direct and exclusive charge and lien on all tolls and other revenues
from the toll bridge concerned, subject to operating and maintenance
expenses.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.46.110 and 2002 c 114 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission shall retain toll charges on any existing and
future facilities constructed under this chapter and financed primarily
by bonds issued by the state until:
(a) All costs of investigation, financing, acquisition of property,
and construction advanced from the motor vehicle fund have been fully
repaid, except as provided in subsection (2)(b) of this section;
(b) Obligations incurred in constructing that facility have been
fully paid; and
(c) The motor vehicle fund is fully repaid under RCW 47.46.140.
(2) This section does not:
(a) Prohibit the use of toll revenues to fund maintenance,
operations, or management of facilities constructed under this chapter,
except as prohibited by RCW 47.56.165 and 47.56.245;
(b) Require repayment of funds specifically appropriated as a
nonreimbursable state financial contribution to a project.
(3) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (2)(a) of this
section, upon satisfaction of the conditions enumerated in subsection
(1) of this section:
(a) The facility must be operated as a toll-free facility; and
(b) The operation, maintenance, upkeep, and repair of the facility
must be paid from funds appropriated for the use of the department for
the construction and maintenance of the primary state highways of the
state of Washington.

Sec. 3 RCW 47.56.165 and 2006 c 17 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
A special account to be known as the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge
account is created in the motor vehicle fund in the state treasury.
(1) Deposits to the account must include:
(a) All proceeds of bonds issued for construction of the Tacoma
Narrows public-private initiative project, including any capitalized
interest;
(b) All of the toll charges and other revenues received from the
operation of the Tacoma Narrows bridge as a toll facility, to be
deposited at least monthly;
(c) Any interest that may be earned from the deposit or investment
of those revenues;
(d) Notwithstanding RCW 47.12.063, proceeds from the sale of any
surplus real property acquired for the purpose of building the second
Tacoma Narrows bridge; and
(e) All liquidated damages collected under any contract involving
the construction of the second Tacoma Narrows bridge.
(2) Proceeds of bonds shall be used consistent with RCW 47.46.130,
including the reimbursement of expenses and fees incurred under
agreements entered into under RCW 47.46.040 as required by those
agreements.
(3) Toll charges, other revenues, and interest may be used to:
(a) Pay any required costs of financing, operation, maintenance,
and management and necessary repairs of the facility; and
(b) Repay amounts to the motor vehicle fund as required under RCW
47.46.140.
(4) Toll charges, other revenues, and interest may not be used to
pay for law enforcement, roadside assistance, emergency management
services, or any other public services the state would be obligated to
provide to the facility area even in the absence of a second Tacoma
Narrows bridge.
(5) When repaying the motor vehicle fund under RCW 47.46.140, the
state treasurer shall transfer funds from the Tacoma Narrows toll
bridge account to the motor vehicle fund on or before each debt service
date for bonds issued for the Tacoma Narrows public-private initiative
project in an amount sufficient to repay the motor vehicle fund for
amounts transferred from that fund to the highway bond retirement fund
to provide for any bond principal and interest due on that date. The
state treasurer may establish subaccounts for the purpose of
segregating toll charges, bond sale proceeds, and other revenues.

--- END ---