BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Fifty percent of the tax collected under RCW 82.08.020(1) by
sellers in public parks during new events shall be distributed to the
governmental entity that owns the park. As used in this section, "new
event" means a festival, promotion, or other event that is not
substantially identical to an event held in the park before the
effective date of this section.
(2) Money distributed under this section may be used only as
additional resources for the support of public parks and may not be
used to supplant other sources of funding for those purposes. Money
distributed under this section may not be used to purchase real estate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect January 1, 2009.

--- END ---