BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.225.090 and 2002 c 175 s 29 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A court may order a child subject to a petition under RCW
28A.225.035 to do one or more of the following:
(a) Attend the child's current school, and set forth minimum
attendance requirements, including suspensions;
(b) If there is space available and the program can provide
educational services appropriate for the child, order the child to
attend another public school, an alternative education program, center,
a skill center, dropout prevention program, or another public
educational program;
(c) Attend a private nonsectarian school or program including an
education center. Before ordering a child to attend an approved or
certified private nonsectarian school or program, the court shall: (i)
Consider the public and private programs available; (ii) find that
placement is in the best interest of the child; and (iii) find that the
private school or program is willing to accept the child and will not
charge any fees in addition to those established by contract with the
student's school district. If the court orders the child to enroll in
a private school or program, the child's school district shall contract
with the school or program to provide educational services for the
child. The school district shall not be required to contract for a
weekly rate that exceeds the state general apportionment dollars
calculated on a weekly basis generated by the child and received by the
district. A school district shall not be required to enter into a
contract that is longer than the remainder of the school year. A
school district shall not be required to enter into or continue a
contract if the child is no longer enrolled in the district;
(d) Be referred to a community truancy board, if available; or
(e) Submit to testing for the use of controlled substances or
alcohol based on a determination that such testing is appropriate to
the circumstances and behavior of the child and will facilitate the
child's compliance with the mandatory attendance law and, if any test
ordered under this subsection indicates the use of controlled
substances or alcohol, order the minor to abstain from the unlawful
consumption of controlled substances or alcohol and adhere to the
recommendations of the drug assessment at no expense to the school.
(2) If the child fails to comply with the court order, the court
may order the child to be subject to detention, as provided in RCW
7.21.030(2)(e), or may impose alternatives to detention such as
community restitution. Failure by a child to comply with an order
issued under this subsection shall not be subject to detention for a
period greater than that permitted pursuant to a civil contempt
proceeding against a child under chapter 13.32A RCW.
(3) Any parent violating any of the provisions of either RCW
28A.225.010, 28A.225.015, or 28A.225.080 shall be fined not more than
twenty-five dollars for each day of unexcused absence from school. The
court shall remit fifty percent of the fine collected under this
section to the child's school district. It shall be a defense for a
parent charged with violating RCW 28A.225.010 to show that he or she
exercised reasonable diligence in attempting to cause a child in his or
her custody to attend school or that the child's school did not perform
its duties as required in RCW 28A.225.020. The court may order the
parent to provide community restitution instead of imposing a fine.
Any fine imposed pursuant to this section may be suspended upon the
condition that a parent charged with violating RCW 28A.225.010 shall
participate with the school and the child in a supervised plan for the
child's attendance at school or upon condition that the parent attend
a conference or conferences scheduled by a school for the purpose of
analyzing the causes of a child's absence.
(4) If a child continues to be truant after entering into a court-approved order with the truancy board under RCW 28A.225.035, the
juvenile court shall find the child in contempt, and the court may
order the child to be subject to detention, as provided in RCW
7.21.030(2)(e), or may impose alternatives to detention such as
meaningful community restitution. Failure by a child to comply with an
order issued under this subsection may not subject a child to detention
for a period greater than that permitted under a civil contempt
proceeding against a child under chapter 13.32A RCW.
(5) Subsections (1), (2), and (4) of this section shall not apply
to a six or seven year-old child required to attend public school under
RCW 28A.225.015.

--- END ---