BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71.09.092 and 1995 c 216 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Before the court may enter an order directing the conditional
release of a person committed under this chapter to a less restrictive
alternative, it must find the following: (((1)))
(a) The person will be treated by a treatment provider who is
qualified to provide such treatment in the state of Washington under
chapter 18.155 RCW; (((2)))
(b) The treatment provider has presented a specific course of
treatment and has agreed to assume responsibility for such treatment
and will report progress to the court on a regular basis, and will
report violations immediately to the court, the prosecutor, the
supervising community corrections officer, and the superintendent of
the special commitment center; (((3)))
(c) Housing exists that is sufficiently secure to protect the
community, and the person or agency providing housing to the
conditionally released person has agreed in writing to accept the
person, to provide the level of security required by the court, and
immediately to report to the court, the prosecutor, the supervising
community corrections officer, and the superintendent of the special
commitment center if the person leaves the housing to which he or she
has been assigned without authorization; (((4)))
(d) The person is willing to comply with the treatment provider and
all requirements imposed by the treatment provider and by the court;
and (((5)))
(e) The person is willing to comply with supervision requirements
imposed by the department of corrections.
(2) In approving a treatment provider as provided in subsection (1)
of this section, the court shall give due deference to the provider
recommended by the department.

--- END ---