BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature has enacted various laws
which require state and local government to supervise criminal
offenders and other persons in the community after their release from
correctional or treatment facilities. One purpose of these laws is to
provide oversight of problem behavior through intermittent contact with
the hope that the oversight will help reduce the problem behavior.
Another purpose of these laws is to reduce populations in public
institutions in order to save public funds and use those funds for more
important programs.
(2) Community supervision of offenders and others carries a high
inherent risk that those persons might reoffend or engage in behaviors
which harm others while under supervision. This risk cannot be
eliminated or easily mitigated because community supervision is
noncustodial and involves only intermittent contact with the persons
under supervision and because human behavior is difficult to predict.
(3) The legislature finds that broad liability for injuries caused
by offenders, and others who are being supervised in the community, is
not in the public interest. This liability causes expensive claim and
legal costs and creates false expectations among members of the public
concerning the reasons for community supervision programs and what
those programs can be realistically expected to achieve. Moreover,
broad liability for community supervision programs strongly discourages
programs which the legislature views as desirable to promote overall
public welfare and reduce the cost of confinement in correctional and
treatment facilities.
(4) Therefore, the legislature finds that it is in the public
interest to limit the liability of state and local government for
injuries caused by released offenders and other persons who are being
supervised in the community or who are on a community-based treatment
monitoring program. The legislature intends to limit both the class of
supervised persons for whom state and local government can be held
liable and the circumstances under which liability can be imposed.
This act shall be liberally construed to accomplish the purposes of
this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 For purposes of sections 3 through 7 of this
act, "offender" or "offender being supervised in the community"
includes anyone on community supervision, community placement,
community custody, postrelease supervision, parole, probation, pretrial
supervision, posttrial supervision pending the outcome of an appeal of
a conviction, work release, or furlough.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The state, local governments, and their
agencies, officers, and employees, shall not be held liable for
injuries to persons or property caused by any juvenile under the
jurisdiction of the department of social and health services pursuant
to Title 13 RCW or anyone subject to a commitment order under chapter
10.77, 70.96A, 71.05, 71.09, or 71.34 RCW, and conditionally released
or on a less restrictive alternative.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The state, local governments, and their
agencies, officers, and employees, shall not be held liable for damages
or injuries to persons or property caused by offenders who are being
supervised in the community due to a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor
conviction, or due to a charge or conviction of a nonviolent offense or
any charge or conviction for a property crime or crime of dishonesty.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The state, its agencies, officers, and
employees, shall be liable under the provisions of section 6 of this
act only for damages and injuries to persons caused by offenders under
the department of corrections' jurisdiction who are classified in the
two highest risk categories identified through the risk assessment done
by the department of corrections pursuant to RCW 9.94A.500 and
9.94A.501.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Liability for injuries or deaths caused
by offenders on supervision in the community may be imposed on the
state, local governments, their agencies, officers, or employees only
pursuant to the provisions of this section and subject to the
limitations of sections 4 and 5 of this act. The state, local
governments, and/or their agencies, officers, or employees may be found
liable for personal injuries or deaths caused by offenders other than
those identified in section 4 or 5 of this act only if the supervising
officer failed to exercise reasonable care in supervising the offender
and each of the following elements is present:
(a) The injury-causing conduct of the offender is criminal;
(b) The criminal act resulting in the injury or death is
substantially identical to the criminal conduct resulting in the
conviction for which the offender is being supervised;
(c) The offender has violated a crime-related prohibition of
supervision;
(d) The supervising agency or employee knew of the violation of the
crime-related prohibition; and
(e) The offender would have been incarcerated on the date of the
conduct resulting in personal injury or death if the violation of the
crime-related prohibition had been reported to a judicial or
quasi-judicial entity with the authority to incarcerate the offender.
(2) For purposes of this section, crime-related prohibitions shall
not include reporting requirements, employment or educational
requirements, requirements to pay legal financial obligations,
residency requirements, geographical restrictions on travel, a
condition to obey all laws, curfews, or any standard conditions
applicable to all offenders or a class of offenders under the
jurisdiction of the supervising agency. Evidence of the violation of
any of the aforementioned conditions, or sanctions that may be imposed
as the result of such violations, shall not be admissible in any civil
trial seeking to impose liability on a governmental agency or employee
as the result of a personal injury or death caused by an offender being
supervised in the community. Any immunity applicable to a past or
present officer or employee shall be applicable to the employing
governmental agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Nothing in this section shall be construed
to diminish any immunity or defense that may otherwise be applicable to
the governmental entity and/or its past or present employees
supervising authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 2 through 7 of this act are each
added to chapter 4.24 RCW.

--- END ---