BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided under subsection (2) of this section, a city
or town shall not enact, enforce, or maintain an ordinance, development
regulation, zoning regulation, or official control, policy, or
administrative practice that prohibits the hobby of collecting and
restoring motor vehicles, including any of the following:
(a) Repairing or modifying motor vehicles that are undergoing
restoration; or
(b) Maintaining motor vehicles as a source of parts for motor
vehicles undergoing restoration.
(2) This section does not prohibit a city or town from enacting,
enforcing, or maintaining an ordinance, development regulation, zoning
regulation, or official control, policy, or administrative practice
that:
(a) Regulates noise, advertising, traffic, hours of operation, or
other conditions that may accompany the use of property under
subsection (1) of this section; or
(b) Requires parts, motor vehicles, or activities under subsection
(1) of this section to be screened from view by fencing, vegetation, or
other means.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35.63 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided under subsection (2) of this section, a city
shall not enact, enforce, or maintain an ordinance, development
regulation, zoning regulation, or official control, policy, or
administrative practice that prohibits the hobby of collecting and
restoring motor vehicles, including any of the following:
(a) Repairing or modifying motor vehicles that are undergoing
restoration; or
(b) Maintaining motor vehicles as a source of parts for motor
vehicles undergoing restoration.
(2) This section does not prohibit a city from enacting, enforcing,
or maintaining an ordinance, development regulation, zoning regulation,
or official control, policy, or administrative practice that:
(a) Regulates noise, advertising, traffic, hours of operation, or
other conditions that may accompany the use of property under
subsection (1) of this section; or
(b) Requires parts, motor vehicles, or activities under subsection
(1) of this section to be screened from view by fencing, vegetation, or
other means.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 35A.63 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided under subsection (2) of this section, a city
shall not enact, enforce, or maintain an ordinance, development
regulation, zoning regulation, or official control, policy, or
administrative practice that prohibits the hobby of collecting and
restoring motor vehicles, including any of the following:
(a) Repairing or modifying motor vehicles that are undergoing
restoration; or
(b) Maintaining motor vehicles as a source of parts for motor
vehicles undergoing restoration.
(2) This section does not prohibit a city from enacting, enforcing,
or maintaining an ordinance, development regulation, zoning regulation,
or official control, policy, or administrative practice that:
(a) Regulates noise, advertising, traffic, hours of operation, or
other conditions that may accompany the use of property under
subsection (1) of this section; or
(b) Requires parts, motor vehicles, or activities under subsection
(1) of this section to be screened from view by fencing, vegetation, or
other means.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 36.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided under subsection (2) of this section, a
county shall not enact, enforce, or maintain an ordinance, development
regulation, zoning regulation, or official control, policy, or
administrative practice that prohibits the hobby of collecting and
restoring motor vehicles, including any of the following:
(a) Repairing or modifying motor vehicles that are undergoing
restoration; or
(b) Maintaining motor vehicles as a source of parts for motor
vehicles undergoing restoration.
(2) This section does not prohibit a county from enacting,
enforcing, or maintaining an ordinance, development regulation, zoning
regulation, or official control, policy, or administrative practice
that:
(a) Regulates noise, advertising, traffic, hours of operation, or
other conditions that may accompany the use of property under
subsection (1) of this section; or
(b) Requires parts, motor vehicles, or activities under subsection
(1) of this section to be screened from view by fencing, vegetation, or
other means.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided under subsection (2) of this section, a
county shall not enact, enforce, or maintain an ordinance, development
regulation, zoning regulation, or official control, policy, or
administrative practice that prohibits the hobby of collecting and
restoring motor vehicles, including any of the following:
(a) Repairing or modifying motor vehicles that are undergoing
restoration; or
(b) Maintaining motor vehicles as a source of parts for motor
vehicles undergoing restoration.
(2) This section does not prohibit a county from enacting,
enforcing, or maintaining an ordinance, development regulation, zoning
regulation, or official control, policy, or administrative practice
that:
(a) Regulates noise, advertising, traffic, hours of operation, or
other conditions that may accompany the use of property under
subsection (1) of this section; or
(b) Requires parts, motor vehicles, or activities under subsection
(1) of this section to be screened from view by fencing, vegetation, or
other means.

--- END ---