BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person is liable for the cost incurred by the state, local
municipality, or public agency that rescues that person from flood
waters on a highway if:
(a) The rescue was necessary because the person who was rescued
intentionally ignored warning signs; and
(b) By the person obeying warning signs, the need for the rescue
would have been avoided.
(2) A person shall not be liable for the costs associated with his
or her rescue if:
(a) His or her failure to heed the warning signs was due to a
life-threatening emergency; or
(b) Under the circumstances, a reasonable person would have ignored
the warning signs.

--- END ---