BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to create a program
in civic education to be taught in conjunction with basic skills
education. This program is designed to facilitate successful
reintegration into the community following release.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) As a component of basic skills education, the department shall
create, by rule, a program to provide offenders who are United States
citizens with the opportunity to participate in programs designed to
educate offenders on American citizenship and civil rights. The
program shall include, but not be limited to, the following topics:
(a) Responsible citizenship;
(b) Rights lost to felony offenders and restoration, including gun
ownership and possession;
(c) Voting laws and felony voting rights restoration;
(d) Legal financial obligations;
(e) Sex offender registration and community notification; and
(f) Civic participation, including participation in local, state,
and federal government processes, school boards, neighborhood
organizations, and nonprofit or volunteer organizations.
(2) Upon satisfactory completion of a program, the department shall
issue a certificate of completion to an offender.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall provide to offenders, before release into the
community, information regarding community service providers that
provide educational services and other assistance programs to
offenders.

--- END ---