BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Animal" means a dog or cat of any age.
(2) "Pet breeder" means any person, business, or other entity that
breeds animals for direct or indirect sale to the public.
(3) "Pet dealer" means any person, business, or other entity,
including pet breeder, that sells more than twenty animals or three
litters, whichever is greater, in a twelve-month period. "Pet dealer"
does not include animal control agencies, humane societies, or other
bona fide nonprofit organizations performing the functions of humane
societies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Every pet dealer shall, at the time of
sale, deliver to the purchaser of each animal a written statement
containing the following information:
(a) The date of the animal's birth, if known;
(b) The breeder's name or business name and mailing address, if
known. If not known, the pet dealer must provide the name and address
of the person who sold or gave the animal to the pet dealer;
(c) The date the pet dealer received the animal, if not bred by the
pet dealer;
(d) The breed, sex, and color of the animal, and identifying marks
existing at the time of sale. If the animal is from a United States
department of agriculture licensed source, the statement shall contain
the individual identifying tag, band, tattoo, or color number for that
animal. If the breed is unknown or mixed, this fact shall be stated;
(e) A record of any inoculations and parasite or worming treatments
administered to the animal, to the extent known, including dates of
administration and the type of vaccine or worming treatment;
(f) A record of any diagnosis from a licensed veterinarian, and a
record of any treatment or medication received by the animal while in
the possession of the pet dealer, whether provided by a licensed
veterinarian or by the pet dealer, and either of the following:
(i) A statement, signed by the pet dealer and purchaser at the time
of sale that:
(A) The animal has no known disease or illness;
(B) The animal has no known congenital or hereditary condition that
adversely affects the health of the animal at the time of sale, or that
is likely to adversely affect the health of the animal in the future;
or
(ii) A statement disclosing any known health problems.
(2) If the animal is being sold as registerable, every pet dealer
shall, within one hundred twenty days of sale, deliver to the purchaser
of each animal a written statement containing the names and
registration numbers of the sire and dam, and the litter number.
(3) The written statements required by this section shall be signed
by both the pet dealer, certifying the accuracy of the statement, and
by the purchaser acknowledging receipt of the statement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A pet dealer shall maintain a written record
on the health, status, and disposition of each animal for three years
which includes the current year and the past two years. The record
shall include all of the information that the dealer is required to
disclose under section 2 of this act, including a list of the names and
addresses of persons from whom animals are received and to whom animals
are sold, whether there were complaints by a purchaser regarding the
health of the animal, whether the animal was returned, and, if so, the
reason given for that return. All animal transactions shall be listed
on the records and these records shall be made available upon request,
to any agency responsible for enforcement of chapter 16.52 RCW as
defined in RCW 16.52.015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) A purchaser is entitled to a remedy from
a pet dealer under this section if, after the purchase of an animal
from the pet dealer, one of the following occurs:
(a) Within fifteen days after the purchase of the animal, a
licensed veterinarian of the purchaser's choosing states in writing
that the animal suffers or has died from an illness, disease, or other
defect adversely affecting the animal's health that existed in the
animal on or before delivery to the purchaser. Intestinal or external
parasites shall not be considered to adversely affect an animal's
health unless their presence makes the animal clinically ill.
(b) Within eighteen months after the purchase of the animal, a
licensed veterinarian of the purchaser's choosing states in writing
that the animal possesses or has died from a congenital or hereditary
condition adversely affecting the health of the animal or that required
hospitalization or nonelective surgical procedures.
(2) A purchaser entitled to a remedy under this section may elect
one of the following remedies:
(a) Return the animal to the pet dealer for a full refund of the
purchase price, including sales tax, and reimbursement for reasonable
veterinary fees for diagnosis and treatment in an amount not to exceed
the original purchase price of the animal;
(b) Exchange the animal for another one of the purchaser's choice
having comparable value, including sales tax, providing the replacement
animal is available, and receive reimbursement for reasonable
veterinary fees for diagnosis and treatment in an amount not to exceed
the original purchase price of the animal; or
(c) Retain the animal and receive reimbursement for reasonable
veterinary fees for diagnosis and treatment in the amount not to exceed
one hundred fifty percent of the original purchase price of the animal,
including sales tax.
(3) If the animal has died, the purchaser may obtain either a
refund for the purchase price of the animal, including sales tax, or a
replacement animal of comparable value, including sales tax, plus
reimbursement for reasonable veterinary fees for diagnosis and
treatment in an amount not to exceed the original purchase price of the
animal, including sales tax.
(4) For the purposes of this section, the veterinary fees shall be
deemed reasonable if the services rendered are appropriate for the
diagnosis and treatment of the illness or congenital or hereditary
condition made by the veterinarian, and the cost of such services is
comparable to that charged for similar services by other licensed
veterinarians in proximity to the treating veterinarian. A veterinary
fee shall be presumed reasonable in the absence of evidence to the
contrary.
(5) Refunds and payment of reimbursable expenses pursuant to this
section shall be made by the pet dealer to the purchaser not later than
ten business days following receipt of the veterinarian's statement
required by section 5 of this act, except in cases in which the
entitlement to a remedy is contested.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 To obtain the remedies provided for in
section 4 of this act, the purchaser shall substantially comply with
all of the following requirements:
(1) Notify the pet dealer as soon as practicable, but in no case
more than five business days after the diagnosis by a licensed
veterinarian of a health problem, including a congenital or hereditary
condition, for which a remedy is requested. The notice shall include
the name and telephone number of the veterinarian providing the
diagnosis;
(2) In the case of illness or disease, provide a written statement
from a licensed veterinarian within five business days of diagnosis
stating that the animal is clinically ill, suffers from a congenital or
hereditary condition, or has symptoms of a contagious infectious
disease that existed on or before delivery to the purchaser and that
adversely affects the health of the animal;
(3) The veterinarian's statement required under this section shall
include all of the following:
(a) The purchaser's name and address;
(b) The date or dates on which the animal was examined;
(c) The breed and age of the animal, if known;
(d) A verification that the veterinarian examined the animal;
(e) A statement that the animal has or had an illness or condition
subject to a remedy under section 4 of this act;
(f) The precise findings of the examination or necropsy, including
laboratory results or copies of laboratory reports;
(4) If a reimbursement for reasonable veterinary expenses is being
requested, the veterinarian's statement shall be accompanied by an
itemized bill of fees appropriate for the diagnosis and treatment of
the illness or congenital or hereditary condition.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 No refund, replacement, or reimbursement of
veterinary fees shall be made under any of the following conditions:
(1) The illness or death resulted from maltreatment or neglect or
from an injury sustained or an illness contracted subsequent to the
delivery of the animal to the purchaser.
(2) The purchaser failed to carry out the recommended treatment
prescribed by the examining veterinarian who made the initial
diagnosis. However, this subsection does not apply if the cost for
such treatment, together with the veterinarian's fee for diagnosis,
would exceed the purchase price of the animal.
(3) The illness, disease, or condition was disclosed in writing at
the time of sale under section 2 of this act.
(4) The purchaser fails to return to the pet dealer all documents
previously provided to the purchaser for the purpose of registering the
animal in cases where the animal is being returned to the pet dealer
for refund or replacement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) In the event that a pet dealer disputes
a purchaser's entitlement to a remedy under this chapter, the pet
dealer may, except in the case of the animal's death, have the animal
examined by a licensed veterinarian designated by the pet dealer. The
cost of such examination shall be borne by the pet dealer. A written
statement of the findings of the pet dealer's chosen veterinarian shall
be provided to the purchaser.
(2) If, following examination of the animal by the pet dealer's
chosen veterinarian, the purchaser and the pet dealer are unable to
reach an agreement within ten business days, the purchaser may initiate
an action in a court of competent jurisdiction to resolve the dispute,
or the parties may submit to binding arbitration if mutually agreed
upon by the parties in writing. Any court having jurisdiction in a
damages or trespass action for the amount in controversy has
jurisdiction under this chapter.
(3) The purchaser and pet dealer in any such legal action have the
right to collect reasonable attorneys' fees and court costs if the
opposing party acts in bad faith in seeking or denying the requested
remedy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) Every pet dealer shall post in a
conspicuous location a notice stating that purchasers of animals have
specific rights under law and that a written statement of the rights is
available upon request by any interested party. The notice shall be in
one hundred-point type and read as follows:

"Purchasers of animals from this pet dealer are entitled to specific
rights under the law. Purchasers must be provided a written copy of
the rights at the time of sale. Prospective purchasers may receive a
copy of the rights from this pet dealer upon request."

(2) Every pet dealer shall, at the time of sale or upon the request
of a prospective purchaser, provide a written notice of rights under
this chapter. The notice shall be signed by the purchaser and the pet
dealer at the time of sale acknowledging receipt.
(3) Every pet dealer of an animal sold with the representation that
the animal is registered or registrable with a registry shall, in
addition to the notices in this section, provide the purchaser a
written notice, signed by the purchaser and the pet dealer at the time
of sale, which reads as follows:

"A pedigree or a registration does not assure proper breeding
condition, health, quality, or claims to lineage."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A violation of this chapter shall constitute
an unfair or deceptive trade practice affecting the public interest
under chapter 19.86 RCW. All public and private remedies provided
under that chapter shall be available to enforce this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) Nothing in this chapter shall limit the
rights or remedies that are otherwise available to a consumer under any
other law, nor shall this chapter in any way limit the pet dealer and
the purchaser from agreeing between themselves upon additional terms
and conditions that are not consistent with this chapter. No waiver of
rights under this chapter shall be effective.
(2) Nothing in this chapter shall limit prosecution for violation
of any criminal statute or of any other law.
(3) Nothing in this chapter shall preclude the imposition of
punitive damages otherwise available at law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 1 through 10 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

--- END ---