BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 64.34.440 and 1992 c 220 s 25 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A declarant of a conversion condominium, and any dealer who
intends to offer units in such a condominium, shall give each of the
residential tenants and any residential subtenant in possession of a
portion of a conversion condominium notice of the conversion and
provide those persons with the public offering statement no later than
((ninety)) one hundred eighty days before the tenants and any subtenant
in possession are required to vacate. The notice must:
(i) Set forth generally the rights of tenants and subtenants under
this section ((and shall));
(ii) Be delivered pursuant to notice requirements set forth in RCW
59.12.040; and
(iii) Expressly state whether there is a county or city relocation
assistance program for tenants or subtenants of conversion condominiums
in the jurisdiction in which the property is located. If the county or
city does have a relocation assistance program, the following must also
be included in the notice:
(A) A summary of the terms and conditions under which relocation
assistance is paid; and
(B) Contact information for the city or county relocation
assistance program, which must include, at a minimum, a telephone
number of the city or county department that administers the relocation
assistance program for conversion condominiums.
(b) No tenant or subtenant may be required to vacate upon less than
((ninety)) one hundred eighty days' notice, except by reason of
nonpayment of rent, waste, conduct that disturbs other tenants'
peaceful enjoyment of the premises, or act of unlawful detainer as
defined in RCW 59.12.030, and the terms of the tenancy may not be
altered during that period except as provided in (c) of this
subsection.
(c) At the declarant's option, the declarant may provide all
tenants in a single building with an option to terminate their lease or
rental agreements without cause or consequence after providing the
declarant with thirty days' notice. In such case, tenants continue to
have access to relocation assistance under subsection (6)(e) of this
section.
(d) Nothing in this subsection shall be deemed to waive or repeal
RCW 59.18.200(2). Failure to give notice as required by this section
is a defense to an action for possession.
(2) For sixty days after delivery or mailing of the notice
described in subsection (1) of this section, the person required to
give the notice shall offer to convey each unit or proposed unit
occupied for residential use to the tenant who leases that unit. If a
tenant fails to purchase the unit during that sixty-day period, the
offeror may offer to dispose of an interest in that unit during the
following one hundred eighty days at a price or on terms more favorable
to the offeree than the price or terms offered to the tenant only if:
(a) Such offeror, by written notice mailed to the tenant's last known
address, offers to sell an interest in that unit at the more favorable
price and terms, and (b) such tenant fails to accept such offer in
writing within ten days following the mailing of the offer to the
tenant. This subsection does not apply to any unit in a conversion
condominium if that unit will be restricted exclusively to
nonresidential use or the boundaries of the converted unit do not
substantially conform to the dimensions of the residential unit before
conversion.
(3) If a seller, in violation of subsection (2) of this section,
conveys a unit to a purchaser for value who has no knowledge of the
violation, recording of the deed conveying the unit extinguishes any
right a tenant may have to purchase that unit but does not affect the
right of a tenant to recover damages from the seller for a violation of
subsection (2) of this section.
(4) If a notice of conversion specifies a date by which a unit or
proposed unit must be vacated and otherwise complies with the
provisions of this chapter and chapter 59.18 RCW, the notice also
constitutes a notice to vacate specified by that statute.
(5) Nothing in this section permits termination of a lease by a
declarant in violation of its terms.
(6) Notwithstanding RCW 64.34.050(1), a city or county may by
appropriate ordinance require with respect to any conversion
condominium within the jurisdiction of such city or county that:
(a) In addition to the statement required by RCW 64.34.415(1)(a),
the public offering statement shall contain a copy of the written
inspection report prepared by the appropriate department of such city
or county, which report shall list any violations of the housing code
or other governmental regulation, which code or regulation is
applicable regardless of whether the real property is owned as a
condominium or in some other form of ownership; said inspection shall
be made within forty-five days of the declarant's written request
therefor and said report shall be issued within fourteen days of said
inspection being made. Such inspection may not be required with
respect to any building for which a final certificate of occupancy has
been issued by the city or county within the preceding twenty-four
months; and any fee imposed for the making of such inspection may not
exceed the fee that would be imposed for the making of such an
inspection for a purpose other than complying with this subsection
(6)(a);
(b) Prior to the conveyance of any residential unit within a
conversion condominium, other than a conveyance to a declarant or
affiliate of a declarant: (i) All violations disclosed in the
inspection report provided for in (a) of this subsection, and not
otherwise waived by such city or county, shall be repaired, and (ii) a
certification shall be obtained from such city or county that such
repairs have been made, which certification shall be based on a
reinspection to be made within seven days of the declarant's written
request therefor and which certification shall be issued within seven
days of said reinspection being made;
(c) The repairs required to be made under (b) of this subsection
shall be warranted by the declarant against defects due to workmanship
or materials for a period of one year following the completion of such
repairs;
(d) Prior to the conveyance of any residential unit within a
conversion condominium, other than a conveyance to a declarant or
affiliate of a declarant: (i) The declarant shall establish and
maintain, during the one-year warranty period provided under (c) of
this subsection, an account containing a sum equal to ten percent of
the actual cost of making the repairs required under (b) of this
subsection; (ii) during the one-year warranty period, the funds in such
account shall be used exclusively for paying the actual cost of making
repairs required, or for otherwise satisfying claims made, under such
warranty; (iii) following the expiration of the one-year warranty
period, any funds remaining in such account shall be immediately
disbursed to the declarant; and (iv) the declarant shall notify in
writing the association and such city or county as to the location of
such account and any disbursements therefrom; ((and))
(e) A declarant or dealer shall pay relocation assistance ((not to
exceed five hundred dollars per unit shall be paid)), in an amount to
be determined pursuant to the city or county ordinance, but does not
exceed either three times the average monthly rent in the city or
county, or three times the highest monthly rent in effect for the
tenant's unit under the applicable lease or rental agreement, at any
time after the date that is one hundred eighty days before the date of
the notice described in subsection (1) of this section, to tenants and
subtenants:
(i) Who do not elect ((not)) to purchase a unit ((and));
(ii) Who are in lawful occupancy for residential purposes of a
unit; and
(iii) Whose ((monthly)) annual household income from all sources,
on the date of the notice described in subsection (1) of this section,
was less than an amount equal to eighty percent of (((i))):
(A) The ((monthly)) annual median family income ((for comparably
sized households)) in the standard metropolitan statistical area, or if
so provided by ordinance in a subarea, as ((defined and established))
estimated by the United States department of housing and urban
development, and as adjusted for family size according to the method
used for income limits by the United States department of housing and
urban development, in which the condominium is located((,)); or
(((ii)))
(B) If the condominium is not within a ((standard)) metropolitan
statistical area, the ((monthly)) annual median family income ((for
comparably sized households)) in the state of Washington, as ((defined
and determined by said department)) estimated by the United States
department of housing and urban development, and as adjusted for family
size according to the method used for income limits by the United
States department of housing and urban development.
The household size of a unit shall be based on the number of
persons actually in lawful occupancy of the unit. The tenant or
subtenant actually in lawful occupancy of the unit shall be entitled to
the relocation assistance. The requirement for relocation assistance
under this subsection is authorized whether or not the relocation
assistance may be considered a tax. The declarant shall provide to the
city or county a copy of the notice required under subsection (1)(a) of
this section at the same time the notice is provided to the tenants or
subtenants. The declarant shall also provide other notices and
documentation that the city or county may require by ordinance or rule
to administer the relocation assistance requirement and verify
compliance under this section. Relocation assistance shall be paid on
or before the date the tenant or subtenant vacates and shall be in
addition to any damage deposit or other compensation or refund to which
the tenant is otherwise entitled. Unpaid rent or other amounts owed by
the tenant or subtenant to the landlord may be offset against the
relocation assistance;
(f) The amount of relocation assistance may be adjusted annually by
the percentage amount of change in the housing component of the
consumer price index for all United States cities, as published by the
bureau of labor statistics, United States department of labor;
(g) Except as authorized under (h) of this subsection, a declarant
and any dealer shall not perform or cause any construction, remodeling,
or repairs to any interior or exterior portion of an occupied building
that is to be converted to a condominium during the one hundred eighty-day notice period provided for in subsection (1) of this section unless
all residential tenants and residential subtenants who have elected not
to purchase a unit and who are in lawful occupancy in the building have
vacated the premises. For the purposes of this subsection:
(i) "Construction, remodeling, or repairs" means the work that is
done for the purpose of converting the condominium, not work that is
done to maintain minimum health and safety requirements for the
existing tenants or subtenants or work that is requested by the
existing tenants or subtenants;
(ii) "Occupied building" means a stand-alone structure occupied by
tenants and does not include other stand-alone buildings located on the
property or detached common area facilities;
(h)(i) A declarant and any dealer may begin specific limited
construction, remodeling, or repair activities as described under
(h)(i)(A), (B), and (C) of this subsection to interior or exterior
portions of an occupied building during the one hundred eighty-day
notice period only if all tenants and subtenants have either vacated
the premises or have provided to the declarant or dealer signed waivers
documenting their consent to the specific limited construction,
remodeling, or repair activities that consist of:
(A) The repair or remodel of vacant units to be used as model
units, if the repair or remodel is limited to one model for each unit
type in the building;
(B) The repair or remodel of a vacant unit or common area for use
as a sales office; and
(C) Other repairs as the local ordinance may permit.
(ii) The work performed under this subsection (6)(h) must not
violate the tenant's or subtenant's rights of quiet enjoyment during
the one hundred eighty-day notice period; and
(i) All tenants must be provided with the option to terminate their
lease or rental agreement without cause or consequence after providing
the declarant with thirty days' notice under any of the following
circumstances:
(i) The tenant receives a one hundred eighty-day notice as provided
for in subsection (1) of this section;
(ii) The declarant or dealer has publicly recorded, filed
documents, or applied for permits with the local jurisdiction
pertaining to and specifically referencing a conversion of the
development to condominiums; or
(iii) The declarant has announced in writing the conversion of the
development to condominiums.
If a tenant exercises his or her right to terminate a lease under
this subsection (6)(i), the tenant must: Be discharged from the
payment of rent for any period of time following the date the lease
terminates; be entitled to a pro rata refund of any prepaid rent for
any period of time following the date the lease terminates; and
continue to have access to relocation assistance under (e) of this
subsection. Reprisal or retaliatory action as defined under RCW
59.18.240 is prohibited against any tenant exercising his or her right
to terminate a lease or rental agreement under this subsection (6)(i).
(7) Violations of any city or county ordinance adopted as
authorized by subsection (6) of this section shall give rise to such
remedies, penalties, and causes of action which may be lawfully imposed
by such city or county. Such violations shall not invalidate the
creation of the condominium or the conveyance of any interest therein.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.02.020 and 2006 c 149 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except only as expressly provided in chapters 67.28 and 82.14 RCW,
the state preempts the field of imposing taxes upon retail sales of
tangible personal property, the use of tangible personal property,
parimutuel wagering authorized pursuant to RCW 67.16.060, conveyances,
and cigarettes, and no county, town, or other municipal subdivision
shall have the right to impose taxes of that nature. Except as
provided in RCW 64.34.440 and 82.02.050 through 82.02.090, no county,
city, town, or other municipal corporation shall impose any tax, fee,
or charge, either direct or indirect, on the construction or
reconstruction of residential buildings, commercial buildings,
industrial buildings, or on any other building or building space or
appurtenance thereto, or on the development, subdivision,
classification, or reclassification of land. However, this section
does not preclude dedications of land or easements within the proposed
development or plat which the county, city, town, or other municipal
corporation can demonstrate are reasonably necessary as a direct result
of the proposed development or plat to which the dedication of land or
easement is to apply.
This section does not prohibit voluntary agreements with counties,
cities, towns, or other municipal corporations that allow a payment in
lieu of a dedication of land or to mitigate a direct impact that has
been identified as a consequence of a proposed development,
subdivision, or plat. A local government shall not use such voluntary
agreements for local off-site transportation improvements within the
geographic boundaries of the area or areas covered by an adopted
transportation program authorized by chapter 39.92 RCW. Any such
voluntary agreement is subject to the following provisions:
(1) The payment shall be held in a reserve account and may only be
expended to fund a capital improvement agreed upon by the parties to
mitigate the identified, direct impact;
(2) The payment shall be expended in all cases within five years of
collection; and
(3) Any payment not so expended shall be refunded with interest to
be calculated from the original date the deposit was received by the
county and at the same rate applied to tax refunds pursuant to RCW
84.69.100; however, if the payment is not expended within five years
due to delay attributable to the developer, the payment shall be
refunded without interest.
No county, city, town, or other municipal corporation shall require
any payment as part of such a voluntary agreement which the county,
city, town, or other municipal corporation cannot establish is
reasonably necessary as a direct result of the proposed development or
plat.
Nothing in this section prohibits cities, towns, counties, or other
municipal corporations from collecting reasonable fees from an
applicant for a permit or other governmental approval to cover the cost
to the city, town, county, or other municipal corporation of processing
applications, inspecting and reviewing plans, or preparing detailed
statements required by chapter 43.21C RCW.
This section does not limit the existing authority of any county,
city, town, or other municipal corporation to impose special
assessments on property specifically benefitted thereby in the manner
prescribed by law.
Nothing in this section prohibits counties, cities, or towns from
imposing or permits counties, cities, or towns to impose water, sewer,
natural gas, drainage utility, and drainage system charges: PROVIDED,
That no such charge shall exceed the proportionate share of such
utility or system's capital costs which the county, city, or town can
demonstrate are attributable to the property being charged: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That these provisions shall not be interpreted to expand or
contract any existing authority of counties, cities, or towns to impose
such charges.
Nothing in this section prohibits a transportation benefit district
from imposing fees or charges authorized in RCW 36.73.120 nor prohibits
the legislative authority of a county, city, or town from approving the
imposition of such fees within a transportation benefit district.
Nothing in this section prohibits counties, cities, or towns from
imposing transportation impact fees authorized pursuant to chapter
39.92 RCW.
Nothing in this section prohibits counties, cities, or towns from
requiring property owners to provide relocation assistance to tenants
under RCW 59.18.440 and 59.18.450, or 64.34.440.
Nothing in this section limits the authority of counties, cities,
or towns to implement programs consistent with RCW 36.70A.540, nor to
enforce agreements made pursuant to such programs.
This section does not apply to special purpose districts formed and
acting pursuant to Titles 54, 57, or 87 RCW, nor is the authority
conferred by these titles affected.

Sec. 3 RCW 64.34.050 and 1989 c 43 s 1-106 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A zoning, subdivision, building code, or other real property
law, ordinance, or regulation may not prohibit the condominium form of
ownership or impose any requirement upon a condominium which it would
not impose upon a physically identical development under a different
form of ownership. Otherwise, no provision of this chapter invalidates
or modifies any provision of any zoning, subdivision, building code, or
other real property use law, ordinance, or regulation.
(2) This section shall not prohibit a county legislative authority
from requiring the review and approval of declarations and amendments
thereto and termination agreements executed pursuant to RCW
64.34.268(2) by the county assessor solely for the purpose of
allocating the assessed value and property taxes. The review by the
assessor shall be done in a reasonable and timely manner.
(3) Notwithstanding this section, local ordinances adopted pursuant
to RCW 64.34.440 are permitted.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act does not apply to any conversion
condominiums for which a notice required under RCW 64.34.440(1) has
been delivered before the effective date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect August 1, 2008.

--- END ---