BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.16.040 and 2005 c 206 s 1, 2005 c 151 s 5, and 2005
c 102 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Except as otherwise provided by law, an employee in a state liquor
store or contract liquor store may sell liquor to any person of legal
age to purchase alcoholic beverages and may also sell to holders of
permits such liquor as may be purchased under such permits.
Where there may be a question of a person's right to purchase
liquor by reason of age, such person shall be required to present any
one of the following officially issued cards of identification which
shows his/her correct age and bears his/her signature and photograph:
(1) Driver's license, instruction permit or identification card of
any state or province of Canada, or "identicard" issued by the
Washington state department of licensing pursuant to RCW 46.20.117.
(2) United States armed forces identification card issued to active
duty, reserve, and retired personnel and the personnel's dependents,
which may include an imbedded, digital signature in lieu of a visible
signature.
(3) Passport.
(4) Merchant Marine identification card issued by the United States
Coast Guard.
(5) Enrollment card issued by the governing authority of a
federally recognized Indian tribe located in Washington, if the
enrollment card incorporates security features comparable to those
implemented by the department of licensing for Washington drivers'
licenses. At least ninety days prior to implementation of an
enrollment card under this subsection, the appropriate tribal authority
shall give notice to the board. The board shall publish and
communicate to licensees regarding the implementation of each new
enrollment card.
(6) United States permanent resident card.
The board may adopt such regulations as it deems proper covering
the cards of identification listed in this section.
No liquor sold under this section shall be delivered until the
purchaser has paid for the liquor in cash, except as allowed under RCW
66.16.041. The use of a personal credit card does not rely upon the
credit of the state as prohibited by Article VIII, section 5 of the
state Constitution.

--- END ---