BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.121.185 and 2007 c 466 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
To recognize the focus on home visitation services, ((the
Washington council for the prevention of child abuse and neglect is
hereby renamed)) the children's trust of Washington is hereby renamed
the council for children and families. ((All references to the
Washington council for the prevention of child abuse and neglect in the
Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to mean the children's
trust of Washington.))

Sec. 2 RCW 43.121.180 and 2007 c 466 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Within available funds, the ((children's trust of Washington))
council for children and families shall fund evidence-based and
research-based home visitation programs for improving parenting skills
and outcomes for children. Home visitation programs must be voluntary
and must address the needs of families to alleviate the effect on child
development of factors such as poverty, single parenthood, parental
unemployment or underemployment, parental disability, or parental lack
of high school diploma, which research shows are risk factors for child
abuse and neglect and poor educational outcomes.
(2) The ((children's trust of Washington)) council for children and
families shall develop a plan with the department of social and health
services, the department of health, the department of early learning,
and the family policy council to coordinate or consolidate home
visitation services for children and families and report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2007, with
their recommendations for implementation of the plan.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.121.020 and 2007 c 144 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is established in the executive office of the governor a
((Washington council for the prevention of child abuse and neglect))
council for children and families subject to the jurisdiction of the
governor.
(2) The council shall be composed of the chairperson and fourteen
other members as follows:
(a) The chairperson and six other members shall be appointed by the
governor and shall be selected for their interest and expertise in the
prevention of child abuse. A minimum of four designees by the governor
shall not be affiliated with governmental agencies. The appointments
shall be made on a geographic basis to assure statewide representation.
Members appointed by the governor shall serve for three-year terms.
Vacancies shall be filled for any unexpired term by appointment in the
same manner as the original appointments were made.
(b) The secretary of social and health services or the secretary's
designee, the superintendent of public instruction or the
superintendent's designee, the director of the department of early
learning or the director's designee, and the secretary of the
department of health or the secretary's designee shall serve as voting
members of the council.
(c) In addition to the members of the council, four members of the
legislature shall serve as nonvoting, ex officio members of the
council, one from each political caucus of the house of representatives
to be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives and one
from each political caucus of the senate to be appointed by the
president of the senate.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.121.015 and 1988 c 278 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, the following terms have the meanings
indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Child" means an unmarried person who is under eighteen years
of age.
(2) "Council" means the ((Washington council for the prevention of
child abuse and neglect)) council for children and families.
(3) "Primary prevention" of child abuse and neglect means any
effort designed to inhibit or preclude the initial occurrence of child
abuse and neglect, both by the promotion of positive parenting and
family interaction, and the remediation of factors linked to causes of
child maltreatment.
(4) "Secondary prevention" means services and programs that
identify and assist families under such stress that abuse or neglect is
likely or families display symptoms associated with child abuse or
neglect.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.15.020 and 2006 c 317 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The lieutenant governor serves as president of the senate and is
responsible for making appointments to, and serving on, the committees
and boards as set forth in this section.
(1) The lieutenant governor serves on the following boards and
committees:
(a) Capitol furnishings preservation committee, RCW 27.48.040;
(b) Washington higher education facilities authority, RCW
28B.07.030;
(c) Productivity board, also known as the employee involvement and
recognition board, RCW 41.60.015;
(d) State finance committee, RCW 43.33.010;
(e) State capitol committee, RCW 43.34.010;
(f) Washington health care facilities authority, RCW 70.37.030;
(g) State medal of merit nominating committee, RCW 1.40.020;
(h) Medal of valor committee, RCW 1.60.020; and
(i) Association of Washington generals, RCW 43.15.030.
(2) The lieutenant governor, and when serving as president of the
senate, appoints members to the following boards and committees:
(a) Organized crime advisory board, RCW 43.43.858;
(b) Civil legal aid oversight committee, RCW 2.53.010;
(c) Office of public defense advisory committee, RCW 2.70.030;
(d) Washington state gambling commission, RCW 9.46.040;
(e) Sentencing guidelines commission, RCW 9.94A.860;
(f) State building code council, RCW 19.27.070;
(g) Women's history consortium board of advisors, RCW 27.34.365;
(h) Financial literacy public-private partnership, RCW 28A.300.450;
(i) Joint administrative rules review committee, RCW 34.05.610;
(j) Capital projects advisory review board, RCW ((39.10.800))
39.10.220;
(k) Select committee on pension policy, RCW 41.04.276;
(l) Legislative ethics board, RCW 42.52.310;
(m) Washington citizens' commission on salaries, RCW 43.03.305;
(n) Oral history advisory committee, RCW 43.07.230;
(o) State council on aging, RCW 43.20A.685;
(p) State investment board, RCW 43.33A.020;
(q) Capitol campus design advisory committee, RCW 43.34.080;
(r) Washington state arts commission, RCW 43.46.015;
(s) Information services board, RCW 43.105.032;
(t) K-20 educational network board, RCW 43.105.800;
(u) Municipal research council, RCW 43.110.010;
(v) ((Washington council for the prevention of child abuse and
neglect)) Council for children and families, RCW 43.121.020;
(w) PNWER-Net working subgroup under chapter 43.147 RCW;
(x) Community economic revitalization board, RCW 43.160.030;
(y) Washington economic development finance authority, RCW
43.163.020;
(z) Tourism development advisory committee, RCW 43.330.095;
(aa) Life sciences discovery fund authority, RCW 43.350.020;
(bb) Legislative children's oversight committee, RCW 44.04.220;
(cc) Joint legislative audit and review committee, RCW 44.28.010;
(dd) Joint committee on energy supply and energy conservation, RCW
44.39.015;
(ee) Legislative evaluation and accountability program committee,
RCW 44.48.010;
(ff) Agency council on coordinated transportation, RCW 47.06B.020;
(gg) Manufactured housing task force, RCW 59.22.090;
(hh) Washington horse racing commission, RCW 67.16.014;
(ii) Correctional industries board of directors, RCW 72.09.080;
(jj) Joint committee on veterans' and military affairs, RCW
73.04.150;
(kk) Washington state parks centennial advisory committee, RCW
79A.75.010;
(ll) Puget Sound council, RCW 90.71.030;
(mm) Joint legislative committee on water supply during drought,
RCW 90.86.020;
(nn) Statute law committee, RCW 1.08.001; and
(oo) Joint legislative oversight committee on trade policy, RCW
44.55.020.

--- END ---