BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that Washington
statutes governing the issuance of drivers' licenses, instruction
permits, and identicards are subject to fraud by individuals who seek
to obtain a driver's license, instruction permit, or identicard using
a false identity. In order to prevent criminals and terrorists from
obtaining a Washington state driver's license, permit, or identicard
using a false identity, the legislature has determined that, in
addition to current proof of identity requirements, applicants for a
Washington state driver's license, permit, or identicard should
demonstrate that the applicant's presence in the United States is
authorized under federal law, either by demonstrating United States
citizenship or by showing legal immigration status. The legislature
further finds that the department of licensing should be explicitly
authorized to verify social security numbers of applicants for a
Washington state driver's license, permit, or identicard, and that
current Washington statutes could be interpreted as forbidding the
department of licensing from verifying social security numbers with the
federal government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act may be known and cited as the
driver's license security act of 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to the proof of identity requirements under RCW
46.20.035, the department shall require every applicant for an original
driver's license, instruction permit, or identicard to submit
satisfactory proof that the applicant's presence in the United States
is authorized under federal law.
(2) The department shall not issue an original driver's license,
instruction permit, or identicard to an applicant who has not presented
to the department, with an application, valid documentary evidence that
the applicant is either a citizen of the United States, a legal
permanent resident of the United States, or a conditional resident
alien of the United States.
(a) Any applicant unable to fulfill the requirements of RCW
26.23.150 must provide:
(i) A valid, unexpired nonimmigrant visa or nonimmigrant visa
status for entry into the United States;
(ii) A pending or approved application for asylum in the United
States;
(iii) A pending or approved application for refugee status in the
United States;
(iv) A pending or approved application for temporary protected
status in the United States;
(v) Approved deferred action status; or
(vi) A pending application for adjustment of status to legal
permanent residence status or conditional resident status.
(b) A driver's license, instruction permit, or identicard issued
under (a) of this subsection:
(i) Is valid only during the period of time of the applicant's
authorized stay in the United States or, if there is no definite end to
the period of authorized stay, a period of one year;
(ii) Must clearly indicate that it is temporary and state the date
that it expires; and
(iii) May be renewed only upon presentation of valid documentary
evidence that the status by which the applicant qualified for the
temporary driver's license, instruction permit, or identicard has been
extended by the United States immigration and naturalization service or
the bureau of citizenship and immigration services of the department of
homeland security.
(3) On November 1, 2008, and on November 1st of each subsequent
year, the department shall submit a report to the governor and the
legislature detailing the costs of verifying the citizenship or legal
residency of applicants for drivers' licenses, instruction permits, and
identicards, in order for the state to request reimbursement from the
federal government.
(4) The inability to obtain a driver's license, instruction permit,
or identicard under this section does not abrogate or diminish in any
respect the legal requirement of every driver in this state to obey the
motor vehicle laws of this state, including laws with respect to
licensing, motor vehicle registration, and financial responsibility.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.20.091 and 2000 c 115 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Application. In order to apply for a driver's license or
instruction permit the applicant must provide his or her:
(a) Name of record, as established by documentation required under
RCW 46.20.035;
(b) Date of birth, as established by satisfactory evidence of age;
(c) Sex;
(d) Washington residence address;
(e) Description;
(f) Driving licensing history, including:
(i) Whether the applicant has ever been licensed as a driver or
chauffeur and, if so, (A) when and by what state or country; (B)
whether the license has ever been suspended or revoked; and (C) the
date of and reason for the suspension or revocation; or
(ii) Whether the applicant's application to another state or
country for a driver's license has ever been refused and, if so, the
date of and reason for the refusal; ((and))
(g) Residency status, by presenting valid documentary evidence that
he or she is a citizen of the United States, a legal permanent resident
of the United States, or a conditional resident alien of the United
States; and
(h) Any additional information required by the department.
(2) Sworn statement. An application for an instruction permit or
for an original driver's license must be made upon a form provided by
the department. The form must include a section for the applicant to
indicate whether he or she has received driver training and, if so,
where. The identifying documentation verifying the name of record must
be accompanied by the applicant's written statement that it is valid.
The information provided on the form must be sworn to and signed by the
applicant before a person authorized to administer oaths. An applicant
who makes a false statement on an application for a driver's license or
instruction permit is guilty of false swearing, a gross misdemeanor,
under RCW 9A.72.040.
(3) Driving records from other jurisdictions. If a person
previously licensed in another jurisdiction applies for a Washington
driver's license, the department shall request a copy of the
applicant's driver's record from the other jurisdiction. The driving
record from the other jurisdiction becomes a part of the driver's
record in this state.
(4) Driving records to other jurisdictions. If another
jurisdiction requests a copy of a person's Washington driver's record,
the department shall provide a copy of the record. The department
shall forward the record without charge if the other jurisdiction
extends the same privilege to the state of Washington. Otherwise the
department shall charge a reasonable fee for transmittal of the record.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.20.117 and 2005 c 314 s 305 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Issuance. The department shall issue an identicard, containing
a picture, if the applicant:
(a) Does not hold a valid Washington driver's license;
(b) Proves his or her identity as required by RCW 46.20.035;
((and))
(c) Proves his or her residency status by presenting valid
documentary evidence that he or she is a citizen of the United States,
a legal permanent resident of the United States, or a conditional
resident alien of the United States; and
(d) Pays the required fee. The fee is twenty dollars unless an
applicant is a recipient of continuing public assistance grants under
Title 74 RCW, who is referred in writing by the secretary of social and
health services. For those persons the fee must be the actual cost of
production of the identicard.
(2) Design and term. The identicard must:
(a) Be distinctly designed so that it will not be confused with the
official driver's license; and
(b) Expire on the fifth anniversary of the applicant's birthdate
after issuance.
(3) Renewal. An application for identicard renewal may be
submitted by means of:
(a) Personal appearance before the department; or
(b) Mail or electronic commerce, if permitted by rule of the
department and if the applicant did not renew his or her identicard by
mail or by electronic commerce when it last expired. However, the
department may accept an application for renewal of an identicard
submitted by means of mail or electronic commerce only if specific
authority and funding is provided for this purpose by June 30, 2004, in
the omnibus transportation appropriations act.
An identicard may not be renewed by mail or by electronic commerce
unless the renewal issued by the department includes a photograph of
the identicard holder.
(4) Cancellation. The department may cancel an identicard if the
holder of the identicard used the card or allowed others to use the
card in violation of RCW 46.20.0921.

--- END ---