BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.55.0101 and 2007 sp. s. c 1 s 2 (House Bill No.
2416) are each amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon a finding of substantial need, the legislative authority
of a taxing district other than the state may provide for the use of a
limit factor under this chapter of one hundred one percent or less,
unless provided otherwise in subsection (2) of this section. In
districts with legislative authorities of four members or less, two-thirds of the members must approve an ordinance or resolution under
this section. In districts with more than four members, a majority
plus one vote must approve an ordinance or resolution under this
section. The new limit factor shall be effective for taxes collected
in the following year only.
(2) A taxing district imposing a permanent levy under RCW
84.52.069, as of, or after the effective date of this act, may provide
for the use of a limit factor under this chapter of one hundred six
percent or less.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The secretary of state shall submit this act
to the people for their adoption and ratification, or rejection, at the
next general election to be held in this state, in accordance with
Article II, section 1 of the state Constitution and the laws adopted to
facilitate its operation.

--- END ---