BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
preserve and promote a safe and beneficial learning environment for all
students while also balancing each student's right to be free from
unreasonable use of physical force, including mechanical or chemical
restraint. The legislature recognizes that a truly beneficial learning
environment is dependent on the quality of the interaction between
staff, students, and parents and is fostered through the development of
a sense of community within the school. The legislature acknowledges
that school district boards of directors may find it necessary to
employ school security personnel or to rely upon school resource
officers in order to preserve a safe and beneficial learning
environment within certain schools. The legislature finds that the
establishment of appropriate student discipline policies, security
models, and training requirements, which stress techniques meant to
diffuse anger, de-escalate conflict, and reduce violent behavior within
the school, will help to further a quality learning environment where
all students are treated with dignity and respect. The legislature
further finds that use of physical force, including mechanical or
chemical restraint as an intervention in the school environment should
be used only in emergency situations after other less intensive
alternatives have failed or have been deemed inappropriate and, if
used, should only be used by appropriately trained personnel.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.600
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Chemical restraint" means the use of force or physical
intervention to control a student or limit a student's freedom of
movement through the use of pepper spray or the administration of any
medication for the purpose of restraining the student.
(b) "Mechanical restraint" means the use of force or physical
intervention to control a student or limit a student's freedom of
movement through the use of a mechanical device including, but not
limited to, metal handcuffs, plastic ties, ankle restraints, leather
cuffs, other hospital-type restraints, tasers, or batons.
(c) "School resource officer" means a commissioned law enforcement
officer, or person with the equivalent training from the criminal
justice training commission but who is not commissioned, who provides
security and law enforcement services at one or more public schools
under the direction of a school administrator.
(d) "School security officer" means a person other than a school
resource officer who provides security services at one or more public
schools under the direction of a school administrator.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the use
of mechanical or chemical restraint in the public schools is
prohibited.
(3) This section does not prohibit:
(a) The use of mechanical or chemical restraint when such use is
permitted or required by and is consistent with a student's 504 plan or
individualized education plan;
(b) The right of any individual to report to appropriate
authorities a crime committed by a student or other individual; or
(c) Commissioned law enforcement officers, school resource
officers, or judicial authorities from exercising their authority or
executing their responsibilities, including the physical detainment of
a student or other person.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The Washington state school directors'
association shall mediate and facilitate a school disciplinary action
task force to review and make recommendations on the development of a
model policy regarding the use of physical force in schools. For the
purpose of the task force review, physical force shall, at a minimum,
include the use of physical or bodily restraint as well as mechanical
and chemical restraint devices.
(2) The task force shall be chaired by a member of the Washington
state school directors' association and shall consist of twelve
additional members. The members shall be appointed as provided in this
subsection.
(a) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from each
of the two largest caucuses of the senate. The speaker of the house of
representatives shall appoint one member from each of the two largest
caucuses of the house of representatives.
(b) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall
appoint one member.
(c) The Washington state parent teacher association shall appoint
one member.
(d) The superintendent of public instruction shall select a member
of the school safety advisory committee to serve as a member of the
task force.
(e) The Washington state school directors' association shall
appoint the remaining five members of the task force from organizations
that express interest in participating on the task force and that have
a history of involvement with school disciplinary action. One of the
appointments shall be a representative of an organization representing
the minority community that has been actively involved in monitoring
the issue of school disciplinary action. One of the appointments shall
be a representative of a civil rights organization that has been
actively involved in monitoring the issue of school disciplinary
action. For the remaining three appointments, the association shall
strive to appoint members who are representative of a wide range of
viewpoints and backgrounds, including representation from community
members and public education stakeholders.
(3) The Washington state school directors' association and the
senate committee services and the house of representatives office of
program research staff from the education committees of the legislature
shall staff the task force.
(4) In developing recommendations, the task force shall review a
representative sampling of discipline policies used in other states and
those used by school districts in Washington. The task force shall, at
a minimum, develop recommendations on the following issues:
(a) A description and recommendation on the methods of physical
force that should be authorized at the school and under what
conditions, including definitions of relevant terms. The
recommendations shall, at a minimum, distinguish when each of the types
of physical force, including mechanical or chemical restraint, should
and should not be used, who should and should not be authorized to use
each type of physical force, and recommendations for when de-escalation
tactics should be used;
(b) Recommendations for training requirements for those authorized
to use each of the types of physical force as well as training
recommendations for de-escalation tactics;
(c) Recommendations on incident reporting requirements and the
follow-up procedures to be used whenever there is a use of physical
force by school personnel, including, at a minimum, written reporting
requirements, the timeline of the reporting requirements, and whether
there should be annual reporting to the office of the superintendent of
public instruction of additional data on disciplinary action, including
physical force; and
(d) Recommendations on procedures for notification to parents or
guardians.
(5) The task force shall submit a report with recommendations to
the education committees of the legislature by November 2008.

--- END ---