BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.80.010 and 2000 c 107 s 88 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter((:
(1) "Case areas" means those areas of the Western district of
Washington and in the adjacent offshore waters which are within the
jurisdiction of the state of Washington, as defined in United States of
America et al. v. State of Washington et al., Civil No. 9213, United
States District Court for Western District of Washington, February 12,
1974, and in Sohappy v. Smith, 302 F. Supp. 899 (D. Oregon, 1969), as
amended, affirmed, and remanded 529 F. 2d 570 (9th Cir., 1976), or an
area in which fishing rights are affected by court decision in a manner
consistent with the above-mentioned decisions;
(2))), "program" means the program established under RCW 77.80.010
through 77.80.060.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.80.020 and 1984 c 67 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department may purchase commercial fishing vessels and
appurtenant gear, and the current state commercial fishing licenses,
delivery permits, and charter boat licenses if the license or permit
holder was substantially restricted in fishing as a result of
compliance with United States of America et al. v. State of Washington
et al., Civil No. 9213, United States District Court for Western
District of Washington, February 12, 1974, and Sohappy v. Smith, 302 F.
Supp. 899 (D. Oregon, 1969), as amended, affirmed, and remanded 529 F.
2d 570 (9th Cir., 1976). The department may also make such purchases
if the license or permit holder was substantially restricted in fishing
as a result of compliance with United States of America et al. v.
State of Washington et al., 873 F.Supp. 1422 (W.D. Wash. 1994) as
affirmed in part, reversed in part, and remanded 157 F.3d 630 (9th
Cir., 1998).
The department shall not purchase a vessel without also purchasing
all current Washington commercial fishing licenses and delivery permits
and charter boat licenses issued to the vessel or its owner. The
department may purchase current licenses and delivery permits without
purchasing the vessel.

--- END ---