BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares that it
is the policy of the state of Washington to encourage the safe and
efficient use of the roads by all citizens, regardless of mode of
transportation. In furtherance of this policy, the legislature further
finds and declares that driver training programs should enhance the
driver training curriculum in order to emphasize the importance of
safely sharing the road with bicyclists and pedestrians.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act may be known and cited as the
Matthew "Tatsuo" Nakata act.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.82.420 and 2007 c 97 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The advisory committee shall consult with the department in the
development and maintenance of a basic minimum required curriculum and
the department shall furnish to each qualifying applicant for an
instructor's license or a driver training school license a copy of such
curriculum.
(2) In addition to information on the safe, lawful, and responsible
operation of motor vehicles on the state's highways, the basic minimum
required curriculum shall include information on:
(a) Intermediate driver's license issuance, passenger and driving
restrictions and sanctions for violating the restrictions, and the
effect of traffic violations and collisions on the driving privileges;
(b) The effects of alcohol and drug use on motor vehicle operators,
including information on drug and alcohol related traffic injury and
mortality rates in the state of Washington and the current penalties
for driving under the influence of drugs or alcohol; ((and))
(c) Motorcycle awareness, approved by the director, to ensure new
operators of motor vehicles have been instructed in the importance of
safely sharing the road with motorcyclists;
(d) Bicycle safety, to ensure that operators of motor vehicles have
been instructed in the importance of safely sharing the road with
bicyclists; and
(e) Pedestrian safety, to ensure that operators of motor vehicles
have been instructed in the importance of safely sharing the road with
pedestrians.
(3) Should the director be presented with acceptable proof that any
licensed instructor or driver training school is not showing proper
diligence in teaching such basic minimum curriculum as required, the
instructor or school shall be required to appear before the advisory
committee and show cause why the license of the instructor or school
should not be revoked for such negligence. If the committee does not
accept such reasons as may be offered, the director may revoke the
license of the instructor or school, or both.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.220
RCW to read as follows:
The superintendent of public instruction shall require that
information on driving safely among bicyclists and pedestrians,
approved by the director of the department of licensing, be included in
instructional material used in traffic safety education courses, to
ensure that new operators of motor vehicles have been instructed in
safely sharing the road with bicyclists and pedestrians.

--- END ---