BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall provide coverage under this chapter for
smoking cessation counseling services, as well as prescription and
nonprescription agents when used to promote smoking cessation, so long
as such agents otherwise meet the definition of "covered outpatient
drug" in 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396r-8(k). No prior authorization is required
for coverage of counseling services or smoking cessation medications.
However, the department may initiate an individualized inquiry and
determine and implement by rule appropriate coverage limitations as may
be required to discourage waste or address instances of fraud or abuse
by a person receiving services under this chapter.

--- END ---