BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.32.460 and 2006 c 15 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A small game hunting license is required to hunt for all
classified wild animals and wild birds, except big game. A small game
license also allows the holder to hunt for unclassified wildlife.
(a) The fee for this license is thirty dollars for residents, one
hundred fifty dollars for nonresidents, and fifteen dollars for youth
and resident seniors.
(b) The fee for this license if purchased in conjunction with a big
game combination license package is sixteen dollars for residents,
eighty dollars for nonresidents, and eight dollars for youth and
resident seniors.
(c) The fee for a three-consecutive-day small game license is fifty
dollars for nonresidents.
(2) In addition to a small game license, a turkey tag is required
to hunt for turkey.
(a) The fee for a primary turkey tag is fourteen dollars for
residents ((and)), forty dollars for nonresidents, and nine dollars for
resident seniors. A primary turkey tag will, on request, be issued to
the purchaser of a youth small game license at no charge.
(b) The fee for each additional turkey tag is fourteen dollars for
residents, sixty dollars for nonresidents, and nine dollars for youth
and resident seniors.
(c) All moneys received from turkey tags must be deposited in the
state wildlife account. One-third of the moneys received from turkey
tags must be appropriated solely for the purposes of turkey management.
An additional one-third of the moneys received from turkey tags must be
appropriated solely for upland game bird management. Moneys received
from turkey tags may not supplant existing funds provided for these
purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect January 1, 2009.

--- END ---