BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.57.020 and 2002 c 363 s 2 and 2002 c 218 s 25 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) A public facilities district is authorized to acquire,
construct, own, remodel, maintain, equip, reequip, repair, finance, and
operate one or more regional centers. For purposes of this chapter,
"regional center" means a convention, conference, or special events
center, or any combination of facilities, and related parking
facilities, serving a regional population constructed, improved, or
rehabilitated after July 25, 1999, at a cost of at least ten million
dollars, including debt service. "Regional center" also includes an
existing convention, conference, or special events center, and related
parking facilities, serving a regional population, that is improved or
rehabilitated after July 25, 1999, where the costs of improvement or
rehabilitation are at least ten million dollars, including debt
service. A "special events center" is a facility, available to the
public, used for community events, sporting events, trade shows, and
artistic, musical, theatrical, or other cultural exhibitions,
presentations, or performances. A regional center is conclusively
presumed to serve a regional population if state and local government
investment in the construction, improvement, or rehabilitation of the
regional center is equal to or greater than ten million dollars.
(2) A public facilities district may enter into contracts with any
city or town for the purpose of exercising any powers of a community
renewal agency under chapter 35.81 RCW.
(3) A public facilities district may impose charges and fees for
the use of its facilities, and may accept and expend or use gifts,
grants, and donations for the purpose of a regional center.
(4) A public facilities district may impose charges, fees, and
taxes authorized in RCW 35.57.040, and use revenues derived therefrom
for the purpose of paying principal and interest payments on bonds
issued by the public facilities district to construct a regional
center.
(5) Notwithstanding the establishment of a career, civil, or merit
service system, a public facilities district may contract with a public
or private entity for the operation or management of its public
facilities.
(6) A public facilities district is authorized to use the
supplemental alternative public works contracting procedures set forth
in chapter 39.10 RCW in connection with the design, construction,
reconstruction, remodel, or alteration of any regional center.
(7) A city or town in conjunction with any special agency,
authority, or other district established by a county or any other
governmental agency is authorized to use the supplemental alternative
public works contracting procedures set forth in chapter 39.10 RCW in
connection with the design, construction, reconstruction, remodel, or
alteration of any regional center funded in whole or in part by a
public facilities district.
(8) A public facilities district is subject to the competitive
solicitation requirements established in RCW 39.29.011 for personal
service contracts not otherwise governed by the requirements in chapter
39.80 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.100.030 and 2003 c 376 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A public facilities district is authorized to acquire,
construct, own, remodel, maintain, equip, reequip, repair, and operate
(a) sports facilities, entertainment facilities, convention facilities,
or regional centers as defined in RCW 35.57.020, and (b) for districts
formed after January 1, 2000, recreational facilities other than ski
areas, together with contiguous parking facilities. The taxes that are
provided for in this chapter may only be imposed for these purposes.
(2) A public facilities district may enter into agreements under
chapter 39.34 RCW for the joint provision and operation of such
facilities and may enter into contracts under chapter 39.34 RCW where
any party to the contract provides and operates such facilities for the
other party or parties to the contract.
(3) Notwithstanding the establishment of a career, civil, or merit
service system, a public facilities district may contract with a public
or private entity for the operation or management of its public
facilities.
(4) A public facilities district is authorized to use the
supplemental alternative public works contracting procedures set forth
in chapter 39.10 RCW in connection with the design, construction,
reconstruction, remodel, or alteration of any of its public facilities.
(5) A public facilities district may impose charges and fees for
the use of its facilities, and may accept and expend or use gifts,
grants, and donations.
(6) A public facilities district is subject to the competitive
solicitation requirements established in RCW 39.29.011 for personal
service contracts not otherwise governed by the requirements in chapter
39.80 RCW.

--- END ---