BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The Washington state institute for
public policy shall conduct an analysis of local practices regarding
compulsory school attendance and truancy for children required to
attend school under chapter 28A.225 RCW. The Washington state
institute for public policy shall:
(a) Survey a geographically representative sample of school
districts' actual expenditures in fiscal years 2005, 2006, 2007, and
2008 to comply with RCW 28A.225.020, 28A.225.025, and 28A.225.030, as
articulated by the school districts. Expenditures surveyed should
include, but are not limited to: Expenditures related to the truancy
petition process; case management; service of process and filing fees;
mailing costs; truancy intervention or prevention programs and other
direct services to children and parents; truancy boards;
administration, staffing, and data tracking; and other costs identified
by the school district associated with statutory compliance;
(b) Conduct a comprehensive analysis and evaluation of evidence-based, research-based, promising, and consensus-based truancy
intervention and prevention programs. For the purposes of the study,
truancy programs include, but are not limited to, those that are
specifically intended to reduce the likelihood of children being truant
and increase the likelihood of children remaining in school;
(c) Survey, by school district, the truancy prevention and
intervention programs and services currently available and report gaps,
if any, in the availability and accessibility of those programs and
services throughout the state's school districts;
(d) Analyze the extent to which Washington's current programs are
evidence-based, research-based, promising, or consensus-based programs;
and
(e) Survey, by school district, the definitions of "absence" and
"unexcused absence" used by the school district.
(2) In conducting its analysis in subsection (1) of this section,
the Washington state institute for public policy may consult with
employees and data systems of the office of the superintendent of
public instruction and any educational service district or school
district in Washington. The office of the superintendent of public
instruction, each educational service district, and each school
district shall cooperate with the Washington state institute for public
policy to the extent necessary, including providing access to necessary
data and administrative data systems.
(3) The Washington state institute for public policy shall also
survey a geographically representative sample of the courts' actual
expenditures in fiscal years 2005, 2006, 2007, and 2008 to comply with
RCW 28A.225.020, 28A.225.025, and 28A.225.030, as articulated by the
courts surveyed. The survey should include, but is not limited to,
expenditures related to:
(a) Court intake and filings, including court clerks and truancy
facilitators;
(b) Court hearings, including probation officers, judicial
officers, prosecutors, and defense attorneys; and
(c) Other costs identified by the courts associated with statutory
compliance.
(4) The Washington state institute for public policy shall also
include, in its analysis, the frequency of the use of contempt
proceedings across the state and whether there are any barriers to the
use of contempt proceedings.
(5) In conducting its analysis in subsection (3) of this section,
the Washington state institute for public policy may consult with
employees and data systems of the administrative office of the courts.
The administrative office of the courts shall cooperate with the
Washington state institute for public policy to the extent necessary,
including providing access to necessary data and administrative data
systems.
(6) The Washington state institute for public policy shall report
to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature with
the results of the study by December 31, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The sum of fifty-five thousand dollars, or
as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2009, from the general fund to the Washington
state institute for public policy for the purposes of this act.

--- END ---