BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.15.310 and 1985 c 390 s 22 are each amended to
read as follows:
Within thirty-five days from the date of collection thereof, all
building fees shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the
Washington State University bond retirement fund, one-half or such
larger portion as may be necessary to prevent a default in the payments
required to be made out of such bond retirement fund; the remainder
thereof to the Washington State University building account.
The sum so credited to the Washington State University building
account shall be expended by the board of regents for buildings,
equipment, or maintenance on the campus of Washington State University
as may be deemed most advisable and for the best interests of the
university, except for any sums transferred as authorized by law.
Expenditures so made shall be accounted for in accordance with existing
law ((and shall not be expended until appropriated by the
legislature)).
The sum so credited to the Washington State University bond
retirement fund shall be used to pay and secure the payment of the
principal of and interest on building bonds issued by the university,
except for any sums which may be transferred out of such fund as
authorized by law.

--- END ---