BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.03.040 and 1993 c 462 s 45 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No later than sixty days after completion of each examination,
the commissioner shall make a full written report of each examination
made by him or her containing only facts ascertained from the accounts,
records, and documents examined and from the sworn testimony of
individuals, and such conclusions and recommendations as may reasonably
be warranted from such facts.
(2) The report shall be certified by the commissioner or by his or
her examiner in charge of the examination, and shall be filed in the
commissioner's office subject to subsection (3) of this section.
(3) The commissioner shall furnish a copy of the examination report
to the person examined not less than ten days and, unless the time is
extended by the commissioner, not more than thirty days prior to the
filing of the report for public inspection in the commissioner's
office. If such person so requests in writing within such period, the
commissioner shall hold a hearing to consider objections of such person
to the report as proposed, and shall not so file the report until after
such hearing and until after any modifications in the report deemed
necessary by the commissioner have been made.
(4) Within thirty days of the end of the period described in
subsection (3) of this section, unless extended by order of the
commissioner, the commissioner shall consider the report, together with
any written submissions or rebuttals and any relevant portions of the
examiner's workpapers and enter an order:
(a) Adopting the examination report as filed or with modification
or corrections. If the examination report reveals that the company is
operating in violation of any law, rule, or order of the commissioner,
the commissioner may order the company to take any action the
commissioner considers necessary and appropriate to cure that
violation;
(b) Rejecting the examination report with directions to the
examiners to reopen the examination for purposes of obtaining
additional data, documentation, or information, and refiling under this
section; or
(c) Calling for an investigatory hearing with no less than twenty
days' notice to the company for purposes of obtaining additional
documentation, data, information, and testimony.
(5) All orders entered under subsection (4) of this section must be
accompanied by findings and conclusions resulting from the
commissioner's consideration and review of the examination report,
relevant examiner workpapers, and any written submissions or rebuttals.
Such an order is considered a final administrative decision and may be
appealed under the Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW, and
must be served upon the company by certified mail or certifiable
electronic means, together with a copy of the adopted examination
report. A copy of the adopted examination report must be sent by
certified mail or certifiable electronic means to each director at the
director's residence address or to a personal e-mail account.
(6)(a) Upon the adoption of the examination report under subsection
(4) of this section, the commissioner shall continue to hold the
content of the examination report as private and confidential
information for a period of five days except that the order may be
disclosed to the person examined. Thereafter, the commissioner may
open the report for public inspection so long as no court of competent
jurisdiction has stayed its publication.
(b) Nothing in this title prohibits the commissioner from
disclosing the content of an examination report, preliminary
examination report or results, or any matter relating thereto, to the
insurance department of any other state or country, or to law
enforcement officials of this or any other state or agency of the
federal government at any time, so long as the agency or office
receiving the report or matters relating thereto agrees in writing to
hold it confidential and in a manner consistent with this chapter.
(c) If the commissioner determines that regulatory action is
appropriate as a result of any examination, he or she may initiate any
proceedings or actions as provided by law.
(d) Nothing contained in this section requires the commissioner to
disclose any information or records that would indicate or show the
existence or content of any investigation or activity of a criminal
justice agency.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.37.060 and 2007 c 82 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When the commissioner determines that other market conduct
actions identified in RCW 48.37.040(4)(a) have not sufficiently
addressed issues raised concerning company activities in Washington
state, the commissioner has the discretion to conduct market conduct
examinations in accordance with the NAIC market conduct uniform
examination procedures and the NAIC market regulation handbook.
(2)(a) In lieu of an examination of an insurer licensed in this
state, the commissioner shall accept an examination report of another
state, unless the commissioner determines that the other state does not
have laws substantially similar to those of this state, or does not
have a market oversight system that is comparable to the market conduct
oversight system set forth in this law.
(b) The commissioner's determination under (a) of this subsection
is discretionary with the commissioner and is not subject to appeal.
(c) If the insurer to be examined is part of an insurance holding
company system, the commissioner may also seek to simultaneously
examine any affiliates of the insurer under common control and
management which are licensed to write the same lines of business in
this state.
(3) Before commencement of a market conduct examination, market
conduct oversight personnel shall prepare a work plan consisting of the
following:
(a) The name and address of the insurer being examined;
(b) The name and contact information of the examiner-in-charge;
(c) The name of all market conduct oversight personnel initially
assigned to the market conduct examination;
(d) The justification for the examination;
(e) The scope of the examination;
(f) The date the examination is scheduled to begin;
(g) Notice of any noninsurance department personnel who will assist
in the examination;
(h) A time estimate for the examination;
(i) A budget for the examination if the cost of the examination is
billed to the insurer; and
(j) An identification of factors that will be included in the
billing if the cost of the examination is billed to the insurer.
(4)(a) Within ten days of the receipt of the information contained
in subsection (3) of this section, insurers may request the
commissioner's discretionary review of any alleged conflict of
interest, pursuant to RCW 48.37.090(2), of market conduct oversight
personnel and noninsurance department personnel assigned to a market
conduct examination. The request for review shall specifically
describe the alleged conflict of interest in the proposed assignment of
any person to the examination.
(b) Within five business days of receiving a request for
discretionary review of any alleged conflict of interest in the
proposed assignment of any person to a market conduct examination, the
commissioner or designee shall notify the insurer of any action
regarding the assignment of personnel to a market conduct examination
based on the insurer's allegation of conflict of interest.
(5) Market conduct examinations shall, to the extent feasible, use
desk examinations and data requests before an on-site examination.
(6) Market conduct examinations shall be conducted in accordance
with the provisions set forth in the NAIC market regulation handbook
and the NAIC market conduct uniform examinations procedures, subject to
the precedence of the provisions of chapter 82, Laws of 2007.
(7) The commissioner shall use the NAIC standard data request.
(8) Announcement of the examination shall be sent to the insurer
and posted on the NAIC's examination tracking system as soon as
possible but in no case later than sixty days before the estimated
commencement of the examination, except where the ((exam
[examination])) examination is conducted in response to extraordinary
circumstances as described in RCW 48.37.050(2)(a). The announcement
sent to the insurer shall contain the examination work plan and a
request for the insurer to name its examination coordinator.
(9) If an examination is expanded significantly beyond the original
reasons provided to the insurer in the notice of the examination
required by subsection (3) of this section, the commissioner shall
provide written notice to the insurer, explaining the expansion and
reasons for the expansion. The commissioner shall provide a revised
work plan if the expansion results in significant changes to the items
presented in the original work plan required by subsection (3) of this
section.
(10) The commissioner shall conduct a preexamination conference
with the insurer examination coordinator and key personnel to clarify
expectations at least thirty days before commencement of the
examination, unless otherwise agreed by the insurer and the
commissioner.
(11) Before the conclusion of the field work for market conduct
examination, the examiner-in-charge shall review examination findings
to date with insurer personnel and schedule an exit conference with the
insurer, in accordance with procedures in the NAIC market regulation
handbook.
(12)(a) No later than sixty days after completion of each market
conduct examination, the commissioner shall make a full written report
of each market conduct examination containing only facts ascertained
from the accounts, records, and documents examined and from the sworn
testimony of individuals, and such conclusions and recommendations as
may reasonably be warranted from such facts.
(b) The report shall be certified by the commissioner or by the
examiner-in-charge of the examination, and shall be filed in the
commissioner's office subject to (c) of this subsection.
(c) The commissioner shall furnish a copy of the market conduct
examination report to the person examined not less than ten days and,
unless the time is extended by the commissioner, not more than thirty
days prior to the filing of the report for public inspection in the
commissioner's office. If the person so requests in writing within
such period, the commissioner shall hold a hearing to consider
objections of such person to the report as proposed, and shall not so
file the report until after such hearing and until after any
modifications in the report deemed necessary by the commissioner have
been made.
(d) Within thirty days of the end of the period described in (c) of
this subsection, unless extended by order of the commissioner, the
commissioner shall consider the report, together with any written
submissions or rebuttals and any relevant portions of the examiner's
work papers and enter an order:
(i) Adopting the market conduct examination report as filed or with
modification or corrections. If the market conduct examination report
reveals that the company is operating in violation of any law, rule, or
order of the commissioner, the commissioner may order the company to
take any action the commissioner considers necessary and appropriate to
cure that violation;
(ii) Rejecting the market conduct examination report with
directions to the examiners to reopen the examination for purposes of
obtaining additional data, documentation, or information, and refiling
under this subsection; or
(iii) Calling for an investigatory hearing with no less than twenty
days' notice to the company for purposes of obtaining additional
documentation, data, information, and testimony.
(e) All orders entered under (d) of this subsection must be
accompanied by findings and conclusions resulting from the
commissioner's consideration and review of the market conduct
examination report, relevant examiner work papers, and any written
submissions or rebuttals. The order is considered a final
administrative decision and may be appealed under the administrative
procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, and must be served upon the company
by certified mail or certifiable electronic means, together with a copy
of the adopted examination report. A copy of the adopted examination
report must be sent by certified mail or certifiable electronic means
to each director at the director's residential address or to a personal
e-mail account.
(f)(i) Upon the adoption of the market conduct examination report
under (d) of this subsection, the commissioner shall continue to hold
the content of the examination report as private and confidential
information for a period of five days except that the order may be
disclosed to the person examined. Thereafter, the commissioner may
open the report for public inspection so long as no court of competent
jurisdiction has stayed its publication.
(ii) If the commissioner determines that regulatory action is
appropriate as a result of any market conduct examination, he or she
may initiate any proceedings or actions as provided by law.
(iii) Nothing contained in this subsection requires the
commissioner to disclose any information or records that would indicate
or show the existence or content of any investigation or activity of a
criminal justice agency.
(g) The insurer's response shall be included in the commissioner's
order adopting the final report as an exhibit to the order. The
insurer is not obligated to submit a response.
(13) The commissioner may withhold from public inspection any
examination or investigation report for so long as he or she deems it
advisable.
(14)(a) Market conduct examinations within this state of any
insurer domiciled or having its home offices in this state, other than
a title insurer, made by the commissioner or the commissioner's
examiners and employees shall, except as to fees, mileage, and expense
incurred as to witnesses, be at the expense of the state.
(b) Every other examination, whatsoever, or any part of the market
conduct examination of any person domiciled or having its home offices
in this state requiring travel and services outside this state, shall
be made by the commissioner or by examiners designated by the
commissioner and shall be at the expense of the person examined; but a
domestic insurer shall not be liable for the compensation of examiners
employed by the commissioner for such services outside this state.
(c) When making a market conduct examination under this chapter,
the commissioner may contract, in accordance with applicable state
contracting procedures, for qualified attorneys, appraisers,
independent certified public accountants, contract actuaries, and other
similar individuals who are independently practicing their professions,
even though those persons may from time to time be similarly employed
or retained by persons subject to examination under this chapter, as
examiners as the commissioner deems necessary for the efficient conduct
of a particular examination. The compensation and per diem allowances
paid to such contract persons shall be reasonable in the market and
time incurred, shall not exceed one hundred twenty-five percent of the
compensation and per diem allowances for examiners set forth in the
guidelines adopted by the national association of insurance
commissioners, unless the commissioner demonstrates that one hundred
twenty-five percent is inadequate under the circumstances of the
examination, and subject to the provisions of (a) of this subsection.
(d)(i) The person examined and liable shall reimburse the state
upon presentation of an itemized statement thereof, for the actual
travel expenses of the commissioner's examiners, their reasonable
living expenses allowance, and their per diem compensation, including
salary and the employer's cost of employee benefits, at a reasonable
rate approved by the commissioner, incurred on account of the
examination. Per diem, salary, and expenses for employees examining
insurers domiciled outside the state of Washington shall be established
by the commissioner on the basis of the national association of
insurance commissioner's recommended salary and expense schedule for
zone examiners, or the salary schedule established by the director of
the Washington department of personnel and the expense schedule
established by the office of financial management, whichever is higher.
A domestic title insurer shall pay the examination expense and costs to
the commissioner as itemized and billed by the commissioner.
(ii) The commissioner or the commissioner's examiners shall not
receive or accept any additional emolument on account of any
examination.
(iii) Market conduct examination fees subject to being reimbursed
by an insurer shall be itemized and bills shall be provided to the
insurer on a monthly basis for review prior to submission for payment,
or as otherwise provided by state law.
(e) Nothing contained in this chapter limits the commissioner's
authority to terminate or suspend any examination in order to pursue
other legal or regulatory action under the insurance laws of this
state. Findings of fact and conclusions made pursuant to any
examination are prima facie evidence in any legal or regulatory action.
(f) The commissioner shall maintain active management and oversight
of market conduct examination costs, including costs associated with
the commissioner's own examiners, and with retaining qualified contract
examiners necessary to perform an examination. Any agreement with a
contract examiner shall:
(i) Clearly identify the types of functions to be subject to
outsourcing;
(ii) Provide specific timelines for completion of the outsourced
review;
(iii) Require disclosure to the insurer of contract examiners'
recommendations;
(iv) Establish and use a dispute resolution or arbitration
mechanism to resolve conflicts with insurers regarding examination
fees; and
(v) Require disclosure of the terms of the contracts with the
outside consultants that will be used, specifically the fees and/or
hourly rates that can be charged.
(g) The commissioner, or the commissioner's designee, shall review
and affirmatively endorse detailed billings from the qualified contract
examiner before the detailed billings are sent to the insurer.

--- END ---