BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.15.100 and 2006 c 265 s 403 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each agency shall make application for a license or renewal of
license to the department of social and health services on forms
prescribed by the department. A licensed agency having foster-family
homes under its supervision may make application for a license on
behalf of any such foster-family home. Such a foster home license
shall cease to be valid when the home is no longer under the
supervision of that agency. Upon receipt of such application, the
department shall either grant or deny a license within ninety days
unless the application is for licensure as a foster-family home, in
which case RCW 74.15.040 shall govern. A license shall be granted if
the agency meets the minimum requirements set forth in chapter 74.15
RCW and RCW 74.13.031 and the departmental requirements consistent
herewith, except that an initial license may be issued as provided in
RCW 74.15.120. Licenses provided for in chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW
74.13.031 shall be issued for a period of three years. The licensee,
however, shall advise the secretary of any material change in
circumstances which might constitute grounds for reclassification of
license as to category. The license issued under this chapter is not
transferable and applies only to the licensee ((and the)). The license
shall be limited to a particular location which shall be stated ((in))
on the ((application)) license. For licensed foster-family homes
having an acceptable history of child care, the license may remain in
effect for ((two weeks)) thirty days after a move, except that this
will apply only if the family remains intact. Licensees must notify
their licensor before moving to a new location and may request a
continuation of the license at the new location. At the request of the
licensee, the department shall, within thirty days following a foster-family home licensee's move to a new location, amend the license to
reflect the new location, provided the new location and the licensee
meet minimum licensing standards.

--- END ---