BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.185.030 and 1993 c 260 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to meeting the minimum requirements to obtain a
license as a bail bond agent, a qualified agent must meet the following
additional requirements to obtain a bail bond agency license:
(a) Pass an examination determined by the director to measure the
person's knowledge and competence in the bail bond agency business; or
(b) Have had at least three years' experience as a manager,
supervisor, or administrator in the bail bond business or a related
field in Washington state as determined by the director. A year's
experience means not less than two thousand hours of actual compensated
work performed before the filing of an application. An applicant shall
substantiate the experience by written certifications from previous
employers. If the applicant is unable to supply written certifications
from previous employers, applicants may offer written certifications
from persons other than employers who, based on personal knowledge, can
substantiate the employment; and
(c) Pay any additional fees as established by the director.
(2) An agency license issued under this section may not be assigned
or transferred without prior written approval of the director.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.185.060 and 1993 c 260 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall adopt rules establishing prelicense training
and testing requirements for bail bond agents, which shall include ((a
minimum of)) no less than four hours of classes. The director may
establish, by rule, continuing education requirements for bail bond
agents.
(2) The director ((shall)) or the director's designee, with the
advice of law enforcement agencies and associations, the criminal
justice training commission, prosecutors' associations, or such other
entities as may be appropriate, shall consult with representatives of
the bail bond industry and associations before adopting or amending the
prelicensing training or continuing education requirements of this
section.
(3) The director may appoint an advisory committee consisting of
representatives from the bail bond industry and a consumer to assist in
the development of rules to implement and administer this chapter.
(((4) A bail bond agent need not fulfill the prelicensing training
requirements of this chapter if he or she, within sixty days prior to
July 1, 1994, provides proof to the director that he or she previously
has met the training requirements of this chapter or has been employed
as a bail bond agent for at least eighteen consecutive months
immediately prior to the date of application.))

Sec. 3 RCW 18.185.090 and 2004 c 186 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A bail bond agency shall notify the director within thirty days
after the death or termination of employment of any employee who is a
licensed bail bond agent.
(2) A bail bond agency shall notify the director within seventy-two
hours upon receipt of information affecting a licensed bail bond
agent's continuing eligibility to hold a license under the provisions
of this chapter.
(3) A bail bond agent or bail bond recovery agent shall notify the
director within seventy-two hours upon receipt of information affecting
the bail bond recovery agent's continuing eligibility to hold a bail
bond recovery agent's license under the provisions of this chapter.
(4) A bail bond recovery agent shall notify the director within ten
business days following a forced entry for the purpose of apprehending
a fugitive criminal defendant, whether planned or unplanned. The
notification under this subsection must include information required by
rule of the director.
(5) A ((bail bond agent or)) bail bond recovery agent shall notify
the local law enforcement agency whenever the bail bond recovery agent
discharges his or her firearm while on duty, other than on a supervised
firearms range. The notification must be made within ten business days
of the date the firearm is discharged.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.185.110 and 2007 c 256 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to the unprofessional conduct described in RCW
18.235.130, the following conduct, acts, or conditions constitute
unprofessional conduct:
(1) Violating any of the provisions of this chapter or the rules
adopted under this chapter;
(2) Failing to meet the qualifications set forth in RCW 18.185.020,
18.185.030, and 18.185.250;
(3) Knowingly committing, or being a party to, any material fraud,
misrepresentation, concealment, conspiracy, collusion, trick, scheme,
or device whereby any other person lawfully relies upon the word,
representation, or conduct of the licensee. However, this subsection
(3) does not prevent a bail bond recovery agent from using any pretext
to locate or apprehend a fugitive criminal defendant or gain any
information regarding the fugitive;
(4) Assigning or transferring any license issued pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter, except as provided in RCW 18.185.030 or
18.185.250;
(5) Conversion of any money or contract, deed, note, mortgage, or
other evidence of title, to his or her own use or to the use of his or
her principal or of any other person, when delivered to him or her in
trust or on condition, in violation of the trust or before the
happening of the condition; and failure to return any money or
contract, deed, note, mortgage, or other evidence of title within
thirty days after the owner is entitled to possession, and makes demand
for possession, shall be prima facie evidence of conversion;
(6) Failing to keep records, maintain a trust account, or return
collateral or security, as required by RCW 18.185.100;
(7) Any conduct in a bail bond transaction which demonstrates bad
faith, dishonesty, or untrustworthiness;
(8) Violation of an order to cease and desist that is issued by the
director under chapter 18.235 RCW;
(9) Wearing, displaying, holding, or using badges not approved by
the department;
(10) Making any statement that would reasonably cause another
person to believe that the bail bond recovery agent is a sworn peace
officer;
(11) Failing to carry a copy of the contract or to present a copy
of the contract as required under RCW 18.185.270(1);
(12) Using the services of an unlicensed bail bond recovery agent
or using the services of a bail bond recovery agent without issuing the
proper contract;
(13) Misrepresenting or knowingly making a material misstatement or
omission in the application for a license;
(14) Using the services of a person performing the functions of a
bail bond recovery agent who has not been licensed by the department as
required by this chapter; ((or))
(15) Performing the functions of a bail bond recovery agent without
being both (a) licensed under this chapter or supervised by a licensed
bail bond recovery agent under RCW 18.185.290; and (b) under contract
with a bail bond agent;
(16) Performing the functions of a bail bond recovery agent without
exercising due care to protect the safety of persons other than the
defendant and the property of persons other than the defendant; or
(17) Using a dog in the apprehension of a fugitive criminal
defendant.

Sec. 5 RCW 18.185.250 and 2004 c 186 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
An applicant must meet the following requirements to obtain a bail
bond recovery agent license:
(1) Submit a fully completed application that includes proper
identification on a form prescribed by the director;
(2) Pass an examination determined by the director to measure his
or her knowledge and competence in the bail recovery business;
(3) Be at least twenty-one years old;
(4) Be a citizen or legal resident alien of the United States;
(5) Not have been convicted of a crime in any jurisdiction, if the
director determines that the applicant's particular crime directly
relates to a capacity to perform the duties of a bail bond recovery
agent, and that the license should be withheld to protect the citizens
of Washington state. The director shall make the director's
determination to withhold a license because of previous convictions
notwithstanding the restoration of employment rights act, chapter 9.96A
RCW;
(6) Not have had certification as a peace officer revoked or denied
under chapter 43.101 RCW, unless certification has subsequently been
reinstated under RCW 43.101.115;
(7) Submit a receipt showing payment for a background check through
the Washington state patrol and the federal bureau of investigation;
(((7))) (8) Have a current firearms certificate issued by the
commission if carrying a firearm in the performance of his or her
duties as a bail bond recovery agent;
(((8))) (9)(a) Have a current license or equivalent permit to carry
a concealed pistol ((if carrying a firearm in the performance of his or
her duties as a bail bond recovery agent));
(b) A resident alien must provide a copy of his or her alien
firearm license ((if carrying a firearm in the performance of his or
her duties as a bail bond recovery agent)); and
(((9))) (10)(a) Pay the required nonrefundable fee for each
application for a bail bond recovery agent license;
(b) A bail bond agent or qualified agent who wishes to perform the
duties of a bail bond recovery agent must first obtain a bail bond
recovery agent endorsement to his or her bail bond agent or agency
license in order to act as a bail bond recovery agent, and pay the
required nonrefundable fee for each application for a bail bond
recovery agent endorsement.

Sec. 6 RCW 18.185.260 and 2004 c 186 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall adopt rules establishing prelicense training
and testing requirements for bail bond recovery agents, which shall
include ((a minimum of four)) no less than thirty-two hours of field
operations classes. The director may establish, by rule, continuing
education and recertification requirements for bail bond recovery
agents.
(2) The director ((shall)) or the director's designee, with the
advice of law enforcement agencies and associations, the criminal
justice training commission, prosecutors' associations, or such other
entities as may be appropriate, shall consult with representatives of
the bail bond industry and associations before adopting or amending the
prelicensing training ((or continuing education requirements of this
section.
(3) A bail bond recovery agent need not fulfill the prelicensing
training requirements of this chapter if he or she, within sixty days
prior to July 1, 2005, provides proof to the director that he or she
previously has met the training requirements of this chapter.
(4) The director, or the director's designee, with the advice of
representatives of the bail bond industry and associations, law
enforcement agencies and associations, and prosecutors' associations,
shall adopt rules establishing prelicense training and)), testing, and
continuing education and recertification requirements of this section
and shall establish minimum exam standards necessary for a bail bond
recovery agent to qualify for licensure or endorsement.
(((5))) (3) The standards ((shall be)) must include, but are not
limited to, the following:
(a) A minimum level of education or experience appropriate for
performing the duties of a bail bond recovery agent;
(b) A minimum level of knowledge in relevant areas of criminal and
civil law;
(c) A minimum level of knowledge regarding the appropriate use of
force and different degrees of the use of force; and
(d) Adequate training of the use of firearms from the criminal
justice training commission ((or)), from an instructor who has been
trained or certified by the criminal justice training ((center))
commission, or from another entity approved by the director.
(((6))) (4) The legislature does not intend, and nothing in this
chapter shall be construed to restrict or limit in any way the powers
of bail bond agents as recognized in and derived from the United States
supreme court case of Taylor v. Taintor, 16 Wall. 366 (1872).

Sec. 7 RCW 18.185.280 and 2004 c 186 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person may not perform the functions of a bail bond recovery
agent unless the person is licensed by the department under this
chapter.
(2) A bail bond agent may contract with a person to perform the
functions of a bail bond recovery agent. Before contracting with the
bail bond recovery agent, the bail bond agent must check the license
issued by the department under this chapter. The requirements
established by the department under this chapter do not prevent the
bail bond agent from imposing additional requirements that the bail
bond agent considers appropriate.
(3) A contract entered into under this chapter is authority for the
person to perform the functions of a bail bond recovery agent as
specifically authorized by the contract and in accordance with
applicable law. A contract entered into by a bail bond agent with a
bail bond recovery agent is not transferable by the bail bond recovery
agent to another bail bond recovery agent.
(4) Whenever a person licensed by the department as a bail bond
recovery agent is engaged in the performance of the person's duties as
a bail bond recovery agent, the person must carry a copy of the
license.
(5) A license or endorsement issued by the department under this
chapter is valid from the date the license or endorsement is issued
until its expiration date unless it is suspended or revoked by the
department prior to its expiration date.
(6) ((No person may perform the functions of a bail bond recovery
agent after December 31, 2005, unless the person has first complied
with the provisions of this chapter.
(7))) Nothing in this chapter is meant to prevent a bail bond agent
from contacting a fugitive criminal defendant for the purpose of
requesting the surrender of the fugitive, or from accepting the
voluntary surrender of the fugitive.

Sec. 8 RCW 18.185.300 and 2004 c 186 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Before a bail bond recovery agent may apprehend a person
subject to a bail bond in a planned forced entry, the bail bond
recovery agent must:
(a) Have reasonable cause to believe that the defendant is inside
the dwelling, building, or other structure where the planned forced
entry is expected to occur; and
(b) Notify an appropriate law enforcement agency in the local
jurisdiction in which the apprehension is expected to occur.
Notification must include, at a minimum: The name of the defendant;
the address, or the approximate location if the address is
undeterminable, of the dwelling, building, or other structure where the
planned forced entry is expected to occur; the name of the bail bond
recovery agent; the name of the contracting bail bond agent; and the
alleged offense or conduct the defendant committed that resulted in the
issuance of a bail bond.
(2) During the actual planned forced entry, a bail bond recovery
agent:
(a) Shall wear a shirt, vest, or other garment with the words "BAIL
BOND RECOVERY AGENT," "BAIL ENFORCEMENT," or "BAIL ENFORCEMENT AGENT"
displayed in at least two-inch-high reflective print letters across the
front and back of the garment and in a contrasting color to that of the
garment; and
(b) May display a badge approved by the department with the words
"BAIL BOND RECOVERY AGENT," "BAIL ENFORCEMENT," or "BAIL ENFORCEMENT
AGENT" prominently displayed.
(3) Any law enforcement officer who assists in or is in attendance
during a planned forced entry is immune from civil action for damages
arising out of actions taken by the bail bond recovery agent or agents
conducting the forced entry.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The department of licensing is directed to
convene a work group to evaluate the availability of the requisite
surety bonds on the current market and the issue of requiring bail bond
agents and bail recovery agents to provide proof of financial
responsibility in order to obtain a license from the department.
Members shall include representatives of the following: The bail bond
industry and associations, local law enforcement, prosecuting
attorneys, and criminal defense attorneys. The work group shall
evaluate and make recommendations regarding whether, in order to be
licensed in this state, bail bond agents and bail recovery agents
should be required to provide proof of liability insurance, a surety
bond, or other similar types of financial responsibility protecting
persons who may suffer legal damages as a result of the operations of
bail bond agents and bail recovery agents. The department of licensing
shall report back to the legislature on its findings and
recommendations of the work group on or before January 1, 2009.

--- END ---