BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.400.320 and 1990 c 33 s 383 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The school district board of directors shall immediately
terminate the employment of any classified employee who has contact
with children during the course of his or her employment upon a guilty
plea or conviction of:
(a) Any felony crime involving the physical neglect of a child
under chapter 9A.42 RCW, the physical injury or death of a child under
chapter 9A.32 or 9A.36 RCW (except motor vehicle violations under
chapter 46.61 RCW), sexual exploitation of a child under chapter 9.68A
RCW, sexual offenses under chapter 9A.44 RCW ((where a minor is the
victim)), promoting prostitution of a minor under chapter 9A.88 RCW,
the sale or purchase of a minor child under RCW 9A.64.030, or violation
of similar laws of another jurisdiction; or
(b) Sexual misconduct with a minor in the second degree under RCW
9A.44.096 or custodial sexual misconduct in the second degree under RCW
9A.44.170.
(2) The employee shall have a right of appeal under chapter 28A.645
RCW including any right of appeal under a collective bargaining
agreement.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.400.330 and 1989 c 320 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The school district board of directors shall include in any
contract for services with an entity or individual other than an
employee of the school district a provision requiring the contractor to
prohibit any employee of the contractor from working at a public school
who has contact with children at a public school during the course of
his or her employment and who has pled guilty to or been convicted of:
(a) Any felony crime involving the physical neglect of a child
under chapter 9A.42 RCW, the physical injury or death of a child under
chapter 9A.32 or 9A.36 RCW (except motor vehicle violations under
chapter 46.61 RCW), sexual exploitation of a child under chapter 9.68A
RCW, sexual offenses under chapter 9A.44 RCW ((where a minor is the
victim)), promoting prostitution of a minor under chapter 9A.88 RCW,
the sale or purchase of a minor child under RCW 9A.64.030, or violation
of similar laws of another jurisdiction; or
(b) Sexual misconduct with a minor in the second degree under RCW
9A.44.096 or custodial sexual misconduct in the second degree under RCW
9A.44.170.
(2) The contract shall also contain a provision that any failure to
comply with this section shall be grounds for the school district
immediately terminating the contract.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.405.470 and 1990 c 33 s 405 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The school district shall immediately terminate the employment
of any person whose certificate or permit authorized under chapter
28A.405 or 28A.410 RCW is subject to revocation under RCW
28A.410.090(((2))) (3) upon a guilty plea or conviction of:
(a) Any felony crime involving the physical neglect of a child
under chapter 9A.42 RCW, the physical injury or death of a child under
chapter 9A.32 or 9A.36 RCW (except motor vehicle violations under
chapter 46.61 RCW), sexual exploitation of a child under chapter 9.68A
RCW, sexual offenses under chapter 9A.44 RCW ((where a minor is the
victim)), promoting prostitution of a minor under chapter 9A.88 RCW,
the sale or purchase of a minor child under RCW 9A.64.030, or violation
of similar laws of another jurisdiction; or
(b) Sexual misconduct with a minor in the second degree under RCW
9A.44.096 or custodial sexual misconduct in the second degree under RCW
9A.44.170.
(2) Employment shall remain terminated unless the employee
successfully prevails on appeal.
(3) This section shall only apply to employees holding a
certificate or permit who have contact with children during the course
of their employment.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.410.090 and 2005 c 461 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any certificate or permit authorized under the provisions of
this chapter, chapter 28A.405 RCW, or rules promulgated thereunder may
be revoked or suspended by the authority authorized to grant the same
based upon a criminal records report authorized by law, or upon the
complaint of any school district superintendent, educational service
district superintendent, or private school administrator for
immorality, violation of written contract, unprofessional conduct,
intemperance, or crime against the law of the state.
If the superintendent of public instruction has reasonable cause to
believe that an alleged violation of this chapter or rules adopted
under it has occurred based on a written complaint alleging physical
abuse or sexual misconduct by a certificated school employee filed by
a parent or another person, but no complaint has been forwarded to the
superintendent by a school district superintendent, educational service
district superintendent, or private school administrator, and that a
school district superintendent, educational service district
superintendent, or private school administrator has sufficient notice
of the alleged violation and opportunity to file a complaint, the
superintendent of public instruction may cause an investigation to be
made of the alleged violation, together with such other matters that
may be disclosed in the course of the investigation related to
certificated personnel.
(2) A parent or another person may file a written complaint with
the superintendent of public instruction alleging physical abuse or
sexual misconduct by a certificated school employee if:
(a) The parent or other person has already filed a written
complaint with the educational service district superintendent
concerning that employee;
(b) The educational service district superintendent has not caused
an investigation of the allegations and has not forwarded the complaint
to the superintendent of public instruction for investigation; and
(c) The written complaint states the grounds and factual basis upon
which the parent or other person believes an investigation should be
conducted.
(3)(a) Any such certificate or permit authorized under this chapter
or chapter 28A.405 RCW shall be revoked by the authority authorized to
grant the certificate upon a guilty plea or the conviction of:
(i) Any felony crime involving the physical neglect of a child
under chapter 9A.42 RCW, the physical injury or death of a child under
chapter 9A.32 or 9A.36 RCW (excepting motor vehicle violations under
chapter 46.61 RCW), sexual exploitation of a child under chapter 9.68A
RCW, sexual offenses under chapter 9A.44 RCW ((where a minor is the
victim)), promoting prostitution of a minor under chapter 9A.88 RCW,
the sale or purchase of a minor child under RCW 9A.64.030, or violation
of similar laws of another jurisdiction; or
(ii) Sexual misconduct with a minor in the second degree under RCW
9A.44.096 or custodial sexual misconduct in the second degree under RCW
9A.44.170.
(b) The person whose certificate is in question shall be given an
opportunity to be heard.
(c) Mandatory permanent revocation upon a guilty plea or the
conviction of felony crimes specified under this subsection shall apply
to such convictions or guilty pleas which occur after July 23, 1989.
Revocation of any certificate or permit authorized under this chapter
or chapter 28A.405 RCW for a guilty plea or criminal conviction
occurring prior to July 23, 1989, shall be subject to the provisions of
subsection (1) of this section.
(4)(a) Any such certificate or permit authorized under this chapter
or chapter 28A.405 RCW shall be suspended or revoked, according to the
provisions of this subsection, by the authority authorized to grant the
certificate upon a finding that an employee has engaged in an
unauthorized use of school equipment to intentionally access material
depicting sexually explicit conduct or has intentionally possessed on
school grounds any material depicting sexually explicit conduct; except
for material used in conjunction with established curriculum. A first
time violation of this subsection shall result in either suspension or
revocation of the employee's certificate or permit as determined by the
office of the superintendent of public instruction. A second violation
shall result in a mandatory revocation of the certificate or permit.
(b) In all cases under this subsection (4), the person whose
certificate is in question shall be given an opportunity to be heard
and has the right to appeal as established in RCW 28A.410.100.
Certificates or permits shall be suspended or revoked under this
subsection only if findings are made on or after July 24, 2005. For
the purposes of this subsection, "sexually explicit conduct" has the
same definition as provided in RCW 9.68A.011.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.410.110 and 1990 c 33 s 410 are each amended to
read as follows:
In case any certificate or permit authorized under this chapter or
chapter 28A.405 RCW is revoked, the holder shall not be eligible to
receive another certificate or permit for a period of twelve months
after the date of revocation. However, ((if the)) a certificate or
permit authorized under this chapter or chapter 28A.405 RCW shall not
be reinstated if it was revoked because of a guilty plea or the
conviction of:
(1) A felony crime involving the physical neglect of a child under
chapter 9A.42 RCW, the physical injury or death of a child under
chapter 9A.32 or 9A.36 RCW (except motor vehicle violations under
chapter 46.61 RCW), sexual exploitation of a child under chapter 9.68A
RCW, sexual offenses under chapter 9A.44 RCW ((where a minor is the
victim)), promoting prostitution of a minor under chapter 9A.88 RCW,
the sale or purchase of a minor child under RCW 9A.64.030, or violation
of similar laws of another jurisdiction((, the certificate or permit
shall not be reinstated)); or
(2) Sexual misconduct with a minor in the second degree under RCW
9A.44.096 or custodial sexual misconduct in the second degree under RCW
9A.44.170.

--- END ---