BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.111.010 and 1996 c 158 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds all of the following:
(a) The disability and death of children and infants resulting from
injuries sustained in cribs ((accidents)) or from other unsafe
children's products are a serious threat to the public health, welfare,
and safety of the people of this state.
(b) Children and infants are an especially vulnerable class of
people which makes the recent numerous recalls regarding children's
products, including cribs, particularly alarming.
(c) The design and construction of a baby or portable crib must
ensure that it is safe to leave an infant unattended for extended
periods of time. A parent or caregiver has a right to believe that the
crib in use is a safe place to leave an infant. A parent or caregiver
should also expect that other children's products they use are safe for
their intended use.
(d) ((Over thirteen)) Almost ten thousand infants are injured in
unsafe cribs every year. Over sixty thousand children under the age of
four are rushed to the emergency room due to injuries from nursery
products, and another two hundred thousand children are rushed to the
emergency room due to toy injuries.
(e) ((In the past decade, six hundred twenty-two infants died (a
rate of sixty-two infants each year) from injuries sustained in unsafe
cribs)) Approximately sixty-one children die each year from unsafe
children's products, of which twenty-one are infants who die from
injuries sustained from unsafe cribs.
(f) The United States consumer product safety commission estimates
that the cost to society resulting from injuries and death due to
unsafe ((cribs is two hundred thirty-five million)) children's products
exceeds five billion dollars per year.
(g) Secondhand, hand-me-down, and heirloom cribs pose a special
problem((. There were four million infants born in this country last
year, but only one million new cribs sold. As many as)) given that
three out of four infants are placed in secondhand, hand-me-down, or
heirloom cribs.
(h) ((Most injuries and deaths occur in secondhand, hand-me-down,
or heirloom cribs.
(i))) Existing state and federal legislation is inadequate to deal
with ((this)) these hazards.
(((j))) (i) Prohibiting the remanufacture, retrofit, sale,
contracting to sell or resell, leasing, or subletting of unsafe
((cribs, particularly unsafe secondhand, hand-me-down, or heirloom
cribs,)) children's products will prevent injuries and deaths caused by
((cribs)) children's products.
(2) The purpose of this chapter is to prevent the occurrence of
injuries and deaths to infants as a result of unsafe ((cribs))
children's products by making it illegal to remanufacture, retrofit,
sell, contract to sell or resell, lease, sublet, or otherwise place in
the stream of commerce, after ((June 6, 1996)) January 1, 2009, any
unsafe children's product including, but not limited to, a full-size or
nonfull-size crib that is unsafe for any infant using the crib.
(3) It is the intent of the legislature to encourage public and
private collaboration in disseminating materials relative to the safety
of ((baby cribs)) children's products to parents, child care providers,
and those who would be likely to place unsafe ((cribs)) children's
products in the stream of commerce. The legislature also intends that
informational materials regarding ((baby crib safety)) children's
products and sleep safety information be available to consumers through
the department of health.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.111.020 and 1996 c 158 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) (("Infant" means any person less than thirty-five inches tall
and less than three years of age.
(2))) "Children's product" means a product including, but not
limited to, a full-size crib, nonfull-size crib, toddler bed, bed, car
seat, high chair, booster chair, hook-on chair, bath seat, gate or
other enclosure for confining a child or infant, play yard, stationary
activity center, carrier, stroller, walker, swing, or toy or play
equipment that meets the following criteria:
(a) The product is designed or intended for the care of, or use by,
any child under the age of twelve; and
(b) The product is designed or intended to come into contact with
the child while the product is used.
(c) A product is not a "children's product" under this chapter if:
(i) It can be used for the care of, or use by, a child under the
age of twelve, but it is designed or intended for use by the general
population or segments of the general population and not solely or
primarily for the care of, or use by, a child; or
(ii) It is a medication, drug, or food, or is intended to be
ingested.
(2) "Commercial dealer" means any person who deals in children's
products or who otherwise by one's occupation holds oneself out as
having knowledge or skills peculiar to children's products, or any
person who is in the business of remanufacturing, retrofitting,
selling, leasing, subletting, or otherwise placing in the stream of
commerce children's products.
(3) "Crib" means a bed or containment designed to accommodate an
infant.
(((3))) (4) "Distributor" and "wholesaler" means any person, other
than a manufacturer or retailer, who sells or resells or otherwise
places into the stream of commerce a children's product.
(5) "End consumer" means a person who purchases a children's
product for any purpose other than resale.
(6) "First seller" means any retailer selling a children's product
that has not been used or has not been previously owned. A first
seller does not include an entity such as a secondhand or resale store.
(7) "Full-size crib" means a full-size crib as defined in Section
1508.3 of Title 16 of the Code of Federal Regulations regarding the
requirements for full-size cribs.
(((4))) (8) "Importer" means any person who brings into this
country and places into the stream of commerce a children's product.
(9) "Infant" means any person less than thirty-five inches tall and
less than three years of age.
(10) "Manufacturer" means any person who makes any part of a
children's product that is placed into the stream of commerce.
(11) "Nonfull-size crib" means a nonfull-size crib as defined in
Section 1509.2(b) of Title 16 of the Code of the Federal Regulations
regarding the requirements for nonfull-size cribs.
(((5))) (12) "Person" means any natural person, firm, corporation,
limited liability company, association, or agent or employee thereof.
(((6) "Commercial user" means any person who deals in full-size or
nonfull-size cribs of the kind governed by this chapter or who
otherwise by one's occupation holds oneself out as having knowledge or
skill peculiar to the full-size or nonfull-size cribs governed by this
chapter, including child care facilities and family child care homes
licensed by the department of social and health services under chapter
74.15 RCW, or any person who is in the business of remanufacturing,
retrofitting, selling, leasing, subletting, or otherwise placing in the
stream of commerce full-size or nonfull-size cribs.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.111 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A commercial dealer, manufacturer, importer, distributor,
wholesaler, or retailer may not manufacture, remanufacture, retrofit,
distribute, sell at wholesale or retail, contract to sell or resell,
lease, or sublet, advertise or otherwise place in the stream of
commerce a children's product that is unsafe.
(2) A children's product is deemed to be unsafe under this chapter
only if it meets any of the following criteria:
(a) It does not conform to all federal laws and regulations setting
forth standards for the children's product;
(b) It has been recalled for any reason or in cooperation with an
agency of the federal government or the product's manufacturer,
wholesaler, distributor, or importer, and the recall has not been
rescinded; or
(c) An agency of the federal government or the product's
manufacturer, wholesaler, distributor, or importer has issued a warning
that a specific product's intended use constitutes a safety hazard and
the warning has not been rescinded.
(3) A commercial dealer, manufacturer, importer, distributor,
wholesaler, or retailer who willfully and knowingly violates this
section is guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine not exceeding
one thousand dollars.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.111.030 and 2003 c 53 s 361 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((No)) A commercial ((user)) dealer, manufacturer, importer,
distributor, wholesaler, or retailer may not remanufacture, retrofit,
sell, contract to sell or resell, lease, sublet, or otherwise place in
the stream of commerce((, on or after June 6, 1996,)) a full-size or
nonfull-size crib that is unsafe for any infant using the crib.
(2) A crib is presumed to be unsafe pursuant to this chapter if it
does not conform to all of the following:
(a) Part 1508 (commencing with Section 1508.1) of Title 16 of the
Code of Federal Regulations;
(b) Part 1509 (commencing with Section 1509.1) of Title 16 of the
Code of Federal Regulations;
(c) Part 1303 (commencing with Section 1303.1) of Title 16 of the
Code of Federal Regulations;
(d) ((American Society for Testing Materials Voluntary Standards
F966-90)) ASTM F966;
(e) ((American Society for Testing Materials Voluntary Standards
F1169.88)) ASTM F1169;
(f) Any regulations that are adopted in order to amend or
supplement the regulations described in (a) through (e) of this
subsection.
(3) Cribs that are unsafe or fail to perform as expected pursuant
to subsection (2) of this section include, but are not limited to,
cribs that have any of the following dangerous features or
characteristics:
(a) Corner posts that extend more than one-sixteenth of an inch;
(b) Spaces between side slats more than two and three-eighths
inches;
(c) Mattress support than can be easily dislodged from any point of
the crib. A mattress segment can be easily dislodged if it cannot
withstand at least a twenty-five pound upward force from underneath the
crib;
(d) Cutout designs on the end panels;
(e) Rail height dimensions that do not conform to the following:
(i) The height of the rail and end panel as measured from the top
of the rail or panel in its lowest position to the top of the mattress
support in its highest position is at least nine inches;
(ii) The height of the rail and end panel as measured from the top
of the rail or panel in its highest position to the top of the mattress
support in its lowest position is at least twenty-six inches;
(f) Any screws, bolts, or hardware that are loose and not secured;
(g) Sharp edges, points, or rough surfaces, or any wood surfaces
that are not smooth and free from splinters, splits, or cracks;
(h) Nonfull-size cribs with tears in mesh or fabric sides.
(4) ((On or after January 1, 1997,)) Any commercial ((user))
dealer, manufacturer, importer, distributor, wholesaler, or retailer
who willfully and knowingly violates this section is guilty of a
misdemeanor, punishable by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars.
((Hotels, motels, and similar transient lodging, child care facilities,
and family child care homes are not subject to this section until
January 1, 1999.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 70.111 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If a manufacturer, importer, wholesaler, or distributor of
children's products has placed into the stream of commerce in
Washington a children's product for which a recall or warning has
subsequently been issued by either a manufacturer, importer,
wholesaler, or distributor, or by a federal agency, the manufacturer,
importer, wholesaler, or distributor must initiate the following steps
within twenty-four hours after issuing or receiving the recall or
warning:
(a) Contact all of its commercial customers, other than end
consumers, to whom it sold, leased, sublet, or transferred that
particular children's product in Washington. This contact must include
providing the recall notice or warning and must be made to the person
designated by the retailer for that product;
(b) If the manufacturer, importer, wholesaler, or distributor
maintains a web site, it must place on the home page, or the first
entry point, of its web site a link to recall or warning information
that contains the specific recall notice or warning that was issued for
the product in question. The recall or warning information must
include a description of the product, the reason for the recall or
warning, a picture of the product, and instructions on how to
participate in the recall or warning. The information must include
only the product recall information and not sales or marketing
information on that product or any other product, excluding return and
exchange policies. The recall or warning information must allow
persons to participate in the recall through the web site of the
manufacturer, importer, wholesaler, or distributor; and
(c) If the manufacturer, importer, wholesaler, or distributor sold
directly to a noncommercial consumer, and the consumer provided either
a shipping address or e-mail address at the time of sale, the
manufacturer, importer, wholesaler, or distributor must send a notice
of the recall or warning to the consumer at either address provided.
The notice must include a description of the product, the reason for
the recall or warning, and instructions on how to participate in the
recall or warning. The notice must include only the product recall
information and not sales or marketing information on that product or
any other product, excluding return and exchange policies.
(2) If a retailer receives notice of a recall or warning regarding
a children's product from a manufacturer, importer, wholesaler, or
distributor or, in the case of an involuntary recall, from a federal
agency, and if the retailer at any time offered the product for sale in
Washington, then the retailer must:
(a) Within seven business days after receiving the recall or
warning from the manufacturer, importer, wholesaler, or distributor by
a person designated by the retailer, the retailer must remove the
children's product from the shelves of its stores or program its
registers to ensure that the item cannot be sold.
(b) If the children's product was sold through the retailer's web
site, then within seven business days after receipt of the recall or
warning by the person designated by the retailer, the retailer must
remove the children's product from the web site or remove the ability
of a consumer to purchase the children's product through the web site.
(c) Within seven business days after receipt of the recall or
warning by the person designated by the retailer from a manufacturer,
importer, wholesaler, or distributor, or from a federal agency in the
case of an involuntary recall, the retailer must post in a prominent
location in each retail store the recall or warning notice. This
notice must remain posted for ninety days.
(d) If the children's product for which a recall or warning was
issued was sold on the retailer's web site, the retailer must within
seven business days post on the home page, or the first entry point, of
its web site a link to recall or warning information that contains the
specific recall notice or warning that was issued for the product in
question. The recall or warning information must include a description
of the product, the reason for the recall or warning, a picture of the
product if one was provided, and instructions on how to participate in
the recall or warning. The information must include only the product
recall information and not sales or marketing information on that
product or any other product, excluding return and exchange policies.
(3) Within five business days after a recalled children's product
is placed on the department of health's comprehensive list maintained
under section 10 of this act, a retailer who is not a first seller must
comply with subsection (2) of this section, except that the retailer
has five business days to comply with subsections (1)(a) and (2)(b) of
this section.
(4) A manufacturer, importer, wholesaler, or distributor who is
also a retailer must comply with subsections (1) and (2) of this
section, except that a manufacturer, importer, wholesaler, or
distributor who is also a retailer must, within twenty-four hours after
issuing or receiving the recall or warning, post on the home page, or
first entry point, of its web site a link to recall or warning
information that contains the specific recall notice or warning that
was issued for the product in question.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 43.215 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A child day care center or family day care provider shall not
use or have on the premises an unsafe children's product as described
in sections 3 and 4 of this act. This subsection does not apply to an
antique or collectible children's product if it is not used by or
accessible to any child in the child care facility or home.
(2) The department of early learning shall notify child care
providers of, on an ongoing basis, this section and chapter 70.111 RCW
and the list of unsafe children's products provided and maintained by
the department of health.
(3) Child care providers must place in prominent locations
regularly visited by parents a written notification of the existence of
the comprehensive list of unsafe children's products available on the
internet.
(4) The department of early learning shall adopt rules to carry out
this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 70.111 RCW
to read as follows:
A violation of this chapter constitutes an unfair or deceptive
trade practice affecting the public interest under chapter 19.86 RCW.
All private and public remedies provided under chapter 19.86 RCW are
available to enforce this chapter.

Sec. 8 RCW 70.111.060 and 1996 c 158 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person may maintain an action against any commercial ((user))
dealer, manufacturer, importer, distributor, wholesaler, or retailer
who violates RCW 70.111.030 or section 3 of this act to enjoin the
remanufacture, retrofit, sale, contract to sell, contract to resell,
lease, or subletting of a ((full-size or nonfull-size crib)) children's
product that is unsafe for any infant or child using the ((crib))
children's product, and for reasonable attorneys' fees and costs.
((This section does not apply to hotels, motels, and similar transient
lodging, child care facilities, and family child care homes until
January 1, 1999.))

Sec. 9 RCW 70.111.900 and 1996 c 158 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
This chapter may be known and cited as the ((infant crib))
children's product safety act.

Sec. 10 RCW 43.70.660 and 2001 c 257 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature authorizes the secretary to establish and
maintain a product safety education campaign to promote greater
awareness of products designed to be used by infants and children((,
excluding toys,)) that:
(a) Are recalled by the United States consumer products safety
commission;
(b) Do not meet federal safety regulations and voluntary safety
standards; or
(c) Are unsafe or illegal to place into the stream of commerce
under ((the infant crib safety act,)) chapter 70.111 RCW.
(2) As part of the product safety education campaign, the
department shall make a comprehensive list available to the public at
no cost and post it on the internet. The internet posting must provide
a link to http://www.recalls.gov or its successor web site and must
otherwise make available a link to the specific recall notice or
warning concerning the children's product that has been recalled or for
which a warning has been issued. The department must also review and
update these links on a regular basis.
(3) The department shall make reasonable efforts to ensure that
this infant and children product safety education campaign reaches the
target population. The target population for this campaign includes,
but is not limited to, parents, foster parents and other caregivers,
child care providers, consignment and resale stores selling infant and
child products, and charitable and governmental entities serving
infants, children, and families.
(((3))) (4) The secretary may utilize a combination of methods to
achieve this outreach and education goal, including but not limited to
print and electronic media. The secretary may operate the campaign or
may contract with a vendor.
(((4))) (5) The department shall coordinate this infant and
children product safety education campaign with child-serving entities
including, but not limited to, hospitals, birthing centers, midwives,
pediatricians, obstetricians, family practice physicians, governmental
and private entities serving infants, children, and families, and
relevant manufacturers.
(((5))) (6) The department shall coordinate with other agencies and
entities to eliminate duplication of effort in disseminating infant and
children consumer product safety information.
(((6))) (7) The department may receive funding for this infant and
children product safety education effort from federal, state, and local
governmental entities, child-serving foundations, or other private
sources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 RCW 70.111.040 (Exemption) and 1996 c 158
s 5 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 This act takes effect January 1, 2009.

--- END ---