BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When a fire or public safety incident involving a commercial
vessel occurs on navigable waters of the state, within or outside of
the territorial limits of any fire protection district as established
by chapter 52.02 RCW, a city or town as defined by RCW 35.103.020, or
a regional fire protection service authority as established by chapter
52.26 RCW, and marine rescue and firefighting services are provided,
with or without a contract to do so, the responding fire protection
agency may recover from the person or vessel receiving the marine
rescue and firefighting services the following:
(a) The contract or reasonable value of the use, including repairs
and depreciation, of the apparatus and equipment used;
(b) The cost of fire protection personnel engaged to provide marine
rescue and firefighting services as a result of the fire or public
safety incident; and
(c) All other costs reasonably incurred in providing the marine
rescue and firefighting services as a result of the fire or public
safety incident.
(2) As used in this section "navigable waters of the state" has the
same meaning as in RCW 88.46.010(11).
(3) As used in this section "commercial vessel" means a "covered
vessel" as defined in RCW 88.46.010(5).
(4) This section does not preempt or limit the cost recovery rights
and remedies available to a fire protection agency by other state or
federal law.

--- END ---