BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature acknowledges that the
borrower, who receives the services of a mortgage broker in financing
a mortgage on the borrower's primary residence, is entitled to know the
total costs of his or her loan at the earliest time possible during the
loan process. This knowledge will allow the borrower to compare all
possible sources of financing for the source that best meets the
borrower's needs and willingness to pay.
The payment of a yield spread premium is customarily made from the
lender to the mortgage broker, outside of the escrow closing process.
Because of this industry practice, the cost of the yield spread premium
often is neither subject to a calculation that is relevant to the
buyer's costs nor otherwise readily discernable in any meaningful way.
The relationship among the borrower, mortgage broker, and lender is
sufficient to support the legislature's finding that the yield spread
premium is a cost paid by the borrower for purposes of this act. This
is because it is the borrower's repayment of the loan at an interest
rate higher than par that gives value to the loan and consequently to
the lender. That value is the yield spread premium, which is paid by
the lender back to the mortgage broker, at least in part, for the
mortgage broker's service to the lender in facilitating that above-par
loan.
Federal law, including the real estate settlement procedures act,
allows a state to provide more protection to the borrower, so long as
those protections are consistent with federal law. Since the yield
spread premium is a cost paid by the borrower, that cost shall be
reflected as such at the earliest time possible during the financing
process.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.146.030 and 2006 c 19 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Within three business days following receipt of a loan
application or any moneys from a borrower, a mortgage broker or loan
originator on behalf of the mortgage broker shall provide to each
borrower a full written disclosure containing an itemization and
explanation of all fees and costs that the borrower is required to pay
in connection with obtaining a residential mortgage loan, and
specifying the fee or fees which inure to the benefit of the mortgage
broker and other such disclosures as may be required by rule. A good
faith estimate of a fee or cost shall be provided if the exact amount
of the fee or cost is not determinable. This subsection ((shall not be
construed to)) requires disclosure of the distribution or breakdown of
loan fees, discount, or points between the mortgage broker and any
lender or investor.
(2) The written disclosure shall contain the following information:
(a) The annual percentage rate, finance charge, amount financed,
total amount of all payments, number of payments, amount of each
payment, amount of points or prepaid interest and the conditions and
terms under which any loan terms may change between the time of
disclosure and closing of the loan; and if a variable rate, the
circumstances under which the rate may increase, any limitation on the
increase, the effect of an increase, and an example of the payment
terms resulting from an increase. Disclosure in compliance with the
requirements of the truth-in-lending act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1601 and
Regulation Z, 12 C.F.R. Sec. 226, as now or hereafter amended, shall be
deemed to comply with the disclosure requirements of this subsection;
(b) The itemized costs of any credit report, appraisal, title
report, title insurance policy, mortgage insurance, escrow fee,
property tax, insurance, structural or pest inspection, and any other
third-party provider's costs associated with the residential mortgage
loan. Disclosure through good faith estimates of settlement services
and special information booklets in compliance with the requirements of
the real estate settlement procedures act, 12 U.S.C. Sec. 2601, and
Regulation X, 24 C.F.R. Sec. 3500, as now or hereafter amended, shall
be deemed to comply with the disclosure requirements of this
subsection;
(c) If applicable, the cost, terms, duration, and conditions of a
lock-in agreement and whether a lock-in agreement has been entered, and
whether the lock-in agreement is guaranteed by the mortgage broker or
lender, and if a lock-in agreement has not been entered, disclosure in
a form acceptable to the director that the disclosed interest rate and
terms are subject to change;
(d) A statement that if the borrower is unable to obtain a loan for
any reason, the mortgage broker must, within five days of a written
request by the borrower, give copies of any appraisal, title report, or
credit report paid for by the borrower to the borrower, and transmit
the appraisal, title report, or credit report to any other mortgage
broker or lender to whom the borrower directs the documents to be sent;
(e) Whether and under what conditions any lock-in fees are
refundable to the borrower; and
(f) A statement providing that moneys paid by the borrower to the
mortgage broker for third-party provider services are held in a trust
account and any moneys remaining after payment to third-party providers
will be refunded.
(3)(a) In addition to any other written disclosure requirements in
this section, the mortgage broker or loan originator must make a
written disclosure of the following:
(i) The full transaction costs that will be incurred by the
borrower if the mortgage broker receives a yield spread premium from
the lender. Such transaction costs shall include, but are not limited
to:
(A) A higher annual percentage rate;
(B) A variable or adjustable interest rate;
(C) A prepayment penalty; or
(D) A balloon payment; and
(ii) The estimated yield spread premium, which shall be expressed
as an exact dollar figure, not as a range of dollar figures.
(b) The written disclosure required by this subsection (3) shall
also include amortization schedules that illustrate: (i) The payments
and complete costs of a loan if the mortgage broker receives a yield
spread premium; and (ii) the payments and complete cost of a loan if
the mortgage broker does not receive a yield spread premium. The
department shall provide by rule an amortization schedule template,
which satisfies this disclosure requirement.
(c) The disclosures required by this subsection (3) must appear on
the good faith estimate and on any closing documents.
(4) If subsequent to the written disclosure being provided under
this section, a mortgage broker or loan originator enters into a lock-in agreement with a borrower or represents to the borrower that the
borrower has entered into a lock-in agreement, then no less than three
business days thereafter including Saturdays, the mortgage broker or
loan originator shall deliver or send by first-class mail to the
borrower a written confirmation of the terms of the lock-in agreement,
which shall include a copy of the disclosure made under subsection
(2)(c) of this section.
(((4))) (5) A mortgage broker or loan originator on behalf of a
mortgage broker shall not charge any fee that inures to the benefit of
the mortgage broker if it exceeds the fee disclosed on the written
disclosure pursuant to this section, unless (a) the need to charge the
fee was not reasonably foreseeable at the time the written disclosure
was provided and (b) the mortgage broker or loan originator on behalf
of a mortgage broker has provided to the borrower, no less than three
business days prior to the signing of the loan closing documents, a
clear written explanation of the fee and the reason for charging a fee
exceeding that which was previously disclosed. However, if the
borrower's closing costs on the final settlement statement, excluding
prepaid escrowed costs of ownership as defined by rule, does not exceed
the total closing costs in the most recent good faith estimate,
excluding prepaid escrowed costs of ownership as defined by rule, no
other disclosures shall be required by this subsection.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.146.070 and 2006 c 19 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise permitted by this section, a mortgage
broker shall not receive a fee, commission, or compensation of any kind
in connection with the preparation, negotiation, and brokering of a
residential mortgage loan unless a borrower actually obtains a loan
from a lender on the terms and conditions agreed upon by the borrower
and mortgage broker. A loan originator may not accept a fee,
commission, or compensation of any kind from borrowers in connection
with the preparation, negotiation, and brokering of a residential
mortgage loan.
(2) A mortgage broker may:
(a) If the mortgage broker has obtained for the borrower a written
commitment from a lender for a loan on the terms and conditions agreed
upon by the borrower and the mortgage broker, and the borrower fails to
close on the loan through no fault of the mortgage broker, charge a fee
not to exceed three hundred dollars for services rendered, preparation
of documents, or transfer of documents in the borrower's file which
were prepared or paid for by the borrower if the fee is not otherwise
prohibited by the Truth-in-Lending Act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1601, and
Regulation Z, 12 C.F.R. Sec. 226, as now or hereafter amended; or
(b) Solicit or receive fees for third party provider goods or
services in advance. Fees for any goods or services not provided must
be refunded to the borrower and the mortgage broker may not charge more
for the goods and services than the actual costs of the goods or
services charged by the third party provider.
(3) A loan originator may not solicit or receive fees for a third-party provider of goods or services except that a loan originator may
transfer funds from a borrower to a licensed mortgage broker, exempt
mortgage broker, or third-party provider, if the loan originator does
not deposit, hold, retain, or use the funds for any purpose other than
the payment of bona fide fees to third-party providers.
(4)(a) Any yield spread premium or equivalent compensation or gain
paid between a mortgage broker and a lender prior to or after closing
of a residential mortgage loan must be refunded directly to the
borrower, if the amount of compensation is greater than the original
good faith estimate provided under RCW 19.146.030 or a reasonable
redisclosure.
(b) The department shall declare by rule what constitutes a
reasonable redisclosure for the purposes of this subsection (4).
(c) For purposes of this subsection (4), "original good faith
estimate" means either:
(i) A good faith estimate that the borrower received at least
thirty days prior to closing, if the borrower made the initial
application more than thirty days prior to closing; or
(ii) A good faith estimate that the borrower received within the
time frame required by RCW 19.146.030, if the borrower made the initial
application for a loan less than thirty days prior to closing.

Sec. 4 RCW 19.146.010 and 2006 c 19 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Affiliate" means any person who directly or indirectly through
one or more intermediaries, controls, or is controlled by, or is under
common control with another person.
(2) "Application" means the same as in Regulation X, Real Estate
Settlement Procedures, 24 C.F.R. Sec. 3500.
(3) "Borrower" means any person who consults with or retains a
mortgage broker or loan originator in an effort to obtain or seek
advice or information on obtaining or applying to obtain a residential
mortgage loan for himself, herself, or persons including himself or
herself, regardless of whether the person actually obtains such a loan.
(4) "Computer loan information systems" or "CLI system" means a
real estate mortgage financing information system that facilitates the
provision of information to consumers by a mortgage broker, loan
originator, lender, real estate agent, or other person regarding
interest rates and other loan terms available from different lenders.
(5) "Department" means the department of financial institutions.
(6) "Designated broker" means a natural person designated as the
person responsible for activities of the licensed mortgage broker in
conducting the business of a mortgage broker under this chapter and who
meets the experience and examination requirements set forth in RCW
19.146.210(1)(e).
(7) "Director" means the director of financial institutions.
(8) "Employee" means an individual who has an employment
relationship with a mortgage broker, and the individual is treated as
an employee by the mortgage broker for purposes of compliance with
federal income tax laws.
(9) "Independent contractor" or "person who independently
contracts" means any person that expressly or impliedly contracts to
perform mortgage brokering services for another and that with respect
to its manner or means of performing the services is not subject to the
other's right of control, and that is not treated as an employee by the
other for purposes of compliance with federal income tax laws.
(10) "Loan originator" means a natural person who (a) takes a
residential mortgage loan application for a mortgage broker, or (b)
offers or negotiates terms of a mortgage loan, for direct or indirect
compensation or gain, or in the expectation of direct or indirect
compensation or gain. "Loan originator" also includes a person who
holds themselves out to the public as able to perform any of these
activities. "Loan originator" does not mean persons performing purely
administrative or clerical tasks for a mortgage broker. For the
purposes of this subsection, "administrative or clerical tasks" means
the receipt, collection, and distribution of information common for the
processing of a loan in the mortgage industry and communication with a
borrower to obtain information necessary for the processing of a loan.
A person who holds himself or herself out to the public as able to
obtain a loan is not performing administrative or clerical tasks.
(11) "Lock-in agreement" means an agreement with a borrower made by
a mortgage broker or loan originator, in which the mortgage broker or
loan originator agrees that, for a period of time, a specific interest
rate or other financing terms will be the rate or terms at which it
will make a loan available to that borrower.
(12) "Mortgage broker" means any person who for compensation or
gain, or in the expectation of compensation or gain (a) makes a
residential mortgage loan or assists a person in obtaining or applying
to obtain a residential mortgage loan or (b) holds himself or herself
out as being able to make a residential mortgage loan or assist a
person in obtaining or applying to obtain a residential mortgage loan.
(13) "Person" means a natural person, corporation, company, limited
liability corporation, partnership, or association.
(14) "Principal" means any person who controls, directly or
indirectly through one or more intermediaries, or alone or in concert
with others, a ten percent or greater interest in a partnership,
company, association, or corporation, and the owner of a sole
proprietorship.
(15) "Residential mortgage loan" means any loan primarily for
personal, family, or household use secured by a mortgage or deed of
trust on residential real estate upon which is constructed or intended
to be constructed a single family dwelling or multiple family dwelling
of four or less units.
(16) "Third-party provider" means any person other than a mortgage
broker or lender who provides goods or services to the mortgage broker
in connection with the preparation of the borrower's loan and includes,
but is not limited to, credit reporting agencies, title companies,
appraisers, structural and pest inspectors, or escrow companies.
(17) "Yield spread premium" means a direct payment by the lender to
the mortgage broker that is based on the difference between the
interest rate at which the broker originates the residential mortgage
loan and the wholesale par rate for which the borrower qualifies.

Sec. 5 RCW 31.04.102 and 2002 c 346 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For all loans made by a licensee that are not secured by a lien
on real property, the licensee must make disclosures in compliance with
the truth in lending act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1601 and regulation Z, 12
C.F.R. Sec. [Part] 226, and all other applicable federal laws and
regulations.
(2) For all loans made by a licensee that are secured by a lien on
real property, the licensee shall provide to each borrower within three
business days following receipt of a loan application a written
disclosure containing an itemized estimation and explanation of all
fees and costs that the borrower is required to pay in connection with
obtaining a loan from the licensee. A good faith estimate of a fee or
cost shall be provided if the exact amount of the fee or cost is not
available when the disclosure is provided. Disclosure in a form which
complies with the requirements of the truth in lending act, 15 U.S.C.
Sec. 1601 and regulation Z, 12 C.F.R. Sec. [Part] 226, the real estate
settlement procedures act and regulation X, 24 C.F.R. Sec. 3500, and
all other applicable federal laws and regulations, as now or hereafter
amended, shall be deemed to constitute compliance with this disclosure
requirement. Each licensee shall comply with all other applicable
federal and state laws and regulations, including the disclosures
required by chapter 19.146 RCW.
(3) In addition, for all loans made by the licensee that are
secured by a lien on real property, the licensee must provide to the
borrower an estimate of the annual percentage rate on the loan and a
disclosure of whether or not the loan contains a prepayment penalty
within three days of receipt of a loan application. The annual
percentage rate must be calculated in compliance with the truth in
lending act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1601 and regulation Z, 12 C.F.R. Sec.
[Part] 226. If a licensee provides the borrower with a disclosure in
compliance with the requirements of the truth in lending act within
three business days of receipt of a loan application, then the licensee
has complied with this subsection. If the director determines that the
federal government has required a disclosure that substantially meets
the objectives of this subsection, then the director may make a
determination by rule that compliance with this federal disclosure
requirement constitutes compliance with this subsection.

--- END ---