BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.150.510 and 2000 c 88 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
In order to effectively serve students who are ((under the
jurisdiction of the juvenile justice system as)) dependent pursuant to
chapter 13.34 RCW, education records shall be ((released upon))
transmitted to the department of social and health services within two
school days after receiving the request ((to)) from the department ((of
social and health services)) provided that the department ((of social
and health services)) certifies that it will not disclose to any other
party the education records without prior written consent of the parent
or student unless authorized to disclose the records under state law.
The department of social and health services is authorized to disclose
education records it obtains pursuant to this section to a foster
parent, guardian, or other entity authorized by the department ((of
social and health services)) to provide residential care to the
student.

--- END ---