BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to:
(1) Establish a board of trustees responsible for the adoption of
actuarial standards to be applied to the plan;
(2) Direct the board to zealously manage the trust funds for the
benefit of the members and beneficiaries of the plan, including
exercising a preference for enhancing plan benefits rather than
decreasing contribution rates;
(3) Exercise fiduciary responsibility in the oversight of those
pension management functions assigned to the board;
(4) Provide effective monitoring of the plan by providing an annual
report to the legislature, to the members and beneficiaries of the
plan, and to the public;
(5) Establish contribution rates for employees and the state of
Washington that will guaranty viability of the plan, subject to the
limitations provided for in this chapter;
(6) Require the department of retirement systems to provide staff
and resources for the board; and
(7) Enable the board to retain professional and technical advisors
as necessary for the fulfillment of their statutory responsibilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Member" has the same meaning as that provided in RCW 43.43.120
and also includes separated vested members of the plan who are not
currently receiving benefits.
(2) "Plan" means the Washington state patrol retirement system
established under chapter 43.43 RCW.
(3) "Actuary" means the actuary employed by the board of trustees.
(4) "State actuary" means the actuary employed under chapter 44.44
RCW.
(5) "Board" or "board of trustees" means the Washington state
patrol retirement system board of trustees.
(6) "Board member" means a member of the Washington state patrol
retirement system board of trustees.
(7) "Department" means the department of retirement systems.
(8) "Enrolled actuary" means an actuary who is enrolled under the
employee retirement income security act of 1974 (Subtitle C of Title
III) and who is a member of the society of actuaries or the American
academy of actuaries.
(9) "Trust" means the assets of the Washington state patrol
retirement system.
(10) "Benefits" means the age or service or combination thereof
required for retirement, the level of service benefits, survivorship
benefits, payment options including a deferred retirement option plan,
average final compensation, postretirement cost-of-living adjustments,
including health care and the elements of compensation. "Benefits"
does not include the classifications of employment eligible to
participate in the plan.
(11) "Actuarially sound" means the plan is sufficiently funded to
meet its projected liabilities and to defray the reasonable expenses of
its operation based upon commonly accepted, sound actuarial principles.
(12) "Beneficiary" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
43.43.120.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A nine member board of trustees is
hereby created. Representation on the board is as follows:
(a) Two active members of the plan appointed by the Washington
state patrol troopers association;
(b) One active member of the plan appointed by the chief of the
Washington state patrol;
(c) One retired member of the plan appointed by the Washington
state patrol troopers association;
(d) One member appointed by the director of financial management;
(e) Two members of the house of representatives transportation
committee, one appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives
and one appointed by the leader of the largest minority caucus of the
house of representatives; and
(f) Two members of the senate transportation committee, one
appointed by the senate majority leader and one appointed by the leader
of the largest minority caucus of the senate.
(2) The initial retirement system board members shall serve
staggered terms of four and two years, respectively. Thereafter,
retirement system board members serve terms of four years. Board
members may be reappointed to succeeding terms without limitation.
Board members shall serve until their successors are appointed and
seated.
(3) In the event of a vacancy on the board, the vacancy shall be
filled in the same manner as prescribed for an initial appointment.
(4) If a board member appointed under subsection (1)(a) of this
section is promoted to the rank of lieutenant or higher, he or she
ceases to be a board member and subsection (3) of this section applies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The board of trustees has the following
powers and duties and shall:
(a) Adopt actuarial tables, assumptions, and cost methodologies in
consultation with the state actuary. The state actuary shall utilize
the aggregate actuarial cost method, or other recognized actuarial cost
method based on a level percentage of payroll, as that term is employed
by the American academy of actuaries. The board may employ an
independent actuary to evaluate or supplement the state actuary's work
for the board. If the independent actuary and the state actuary cannot
agree, they shall appoint a third, independent enrolled actuary who
shall review the calculations of the actuary retained by the board and
the state actuary. Thereafter, contributions shall be based on the
methodology most closely following that of the third actuary;
(b) Recommend to the legislature changes in statutes governing
benefits or administration of the system. The governor shall submit a
request for legislation necessary to implement the changes recommended
by the board under this subsection. Requests for legislation may not
be submitted to the legislature by the governor unless the requests:
(i) Have been submitted to the director of financial management by
October 1st before the legislative session at which the requests are to
be considered; and
(ii) Have been certified by the director of financial management as
being feasible financially for the state;
(c) Retain professional and technical advisors necessary for the
accomplishment of its duties;
(d) Consult with the department for the purpose of improving
benefit administration and member services;
(e) Provide an annual report to the governor and the legislature
setting forth the actuarial funding status of the plan and making
recommendations for improvements in those aspects of retirement
administration directed by the legislature or administered by the
department;
(f) Establish uniform administrative rules and operating policies
in the manner prescribed by law;
(g) Engage administrative staff and acquire office space in
conjunction with the department. The department shall provide funding
from its budget for these purposes:
(i) The board, in consultation with the department, shall hire an
executive director who serves at the pleasure of the board;
(ii) The executive director shall hire staff into positions
authorized by the board;
(h) Publish on an annual basis a schedule of benefits together with
a summary of the benefits as established by the legislature which shall
constitute the official plan document;
(i) Be the fiduciary of the plan and discharge the board's duties
solely in the interest of the members and beneficiaries of the plan;
and
(j) Render final decisions under chapter 34.05 RCW on adjudicative
proceedings arising out of the administration of the plan.
(2) Meetings of the board of trustees shall be conducted as
follows:
(a) All board meetings are open to the public, preceded by timely
public notice;
(b) All actions of the board shall be taken in open public session,
except for those matters which may be considered in executive session
as provided under chapter 42.17 RCW;
(c) The board shall retain minutes of each meeting setting forth
the names of those board members present and absent, and their voting
record on any voted issue; and
(d) The board may establish, with the assistance of the department,
an internet web site providing for interactive communication with state
government, members and beneficiaries of the plan, and the public.
(3) A quorum of the board is five board members. All board actions
require five concurring votes.
(4) The decisions of the board shall be made in good faith and are
final, binding, and conclusive on all parties. The decisions of the
board shall be subject to judicial review as provided by law.
(5) The board shall prepare and submit an annual budget consistent
with the requirements of chapter 43.88 RCW to the department. The
department shall include the board's budget in its budget submittal
under chapter 43.88 RCW. Board members and staff shall be reimbursed
for travel and education expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060. The board shall make an annual report to the governor,
legislature, and state auditor setting forth a summary of the costs and
expenditures of the plan for the preceding year. The board shall also
retain the services of an independent, certified public accountant who
shall annually audit the expenses of the fund and whose report shall be
included in the board's annual report.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The board of trustees shall establish
contributions and set economic assumptions. The cost of the benefits
as defined in this plan shall be funded on a sound actuarial basis in
accordance with the actuarial standards adopted by the board.
(2) The board shall manage the trust in a manner that maintains
reasonable contributions and administrative costs. Providing
additional benefits to members and beneficiaries is the board's
priority.

Sec. 6 RCW 44.44.040 and 2003 c 295 s 4 and 2003 c 92 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The office of the state actuary shall have the following powers and
duties:
(1) Perform all actuarial services for the department of retirement
systems, including all studies required by law.
(2) Advise the legislature and the governor regarding pension
benefit provisions, and funding policies and investment policies of the
state investment board.
(3) Consult with the legislature and the governor concerning
determination of actuarial assumptions used by the department of
retirement systems.
(4) Prepare a report, to be known as the actuarial fiscal note, on
each pension bill introduced in the legislature which briefly explains
the financial impact of the bill. The actuarial fiscal note shall
include: (a) The statutorily required contribution for the biennium
and the following twenty-five years; (b) the biennial cost of the
increased benefits if these exceed the required contribution; and (c)
any change in the present value of the unfunded accrued benefits. An
actuarial fiscal note shall also be prepared for all amendments which
are offered in committee or on the floor of the house of
representatives or the senate to any pension bill. However, a majority
of the members present may suspend the requirement for an actuarial
fiscal note for amendments offered on the floor of the house of
representatives or the senate.
(5) Provide such actuarial services to the legislature as may be
requested from time to time.
(6) Provide staff and assistance to the committee established under
RCW 41.04.276.
(7) Provide actuarial assistance to the law enforcement officers'
and firefighters' plan 2 retirement board as provided in chapter 2,
Laws of 2003. Reimbursement for services shall be made to the state
actuary under RCW 39.34.130 and section 5(5), chapter 2, Laws of 2003.
(8) Provide actuarial assistance to the Washington state patrol
retirement system board of trustees under sections 4 and 5 of this act.

Sec. 7 RCW 41.45.050 and 2004 c 242 s 38 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Employers of members of the public employees' retirement
system, the teachers' retirement system, the school employees'
retirement system, and the public safety employees' retirement
system((, and the Washington state patrol retirement system)) shall
make contributions to those systems based on the rates established in
RCW 41.45.060 and 41.45.070.
(2) The state shall make contributions to the law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2 based on the rates
established in RCW 41.45.060 and 41.45.070. The state treasurer shall
transfer the required contributions each month on the basis of salary
data provided by the department.
(3) The department shall bill employers, and the state shall make
contributions to the law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
retirement system plan 2, using the combined rates established in RCW
41.45.060 and 41.45.070 regardless of the level of appropriation
provided in the biennial budget. Any member of an affected retirement
system may, by mandamus or other appropriate proceeding, require the
transfer and payment of funds as directed in this section.
(4) The contributions received for the public employees' retirement
system shall be allocated between the public employees' retirement
system plan 1 fund and the public employees' retirement system combined
plan 2 and plan 3 fund as follows: The contributions necessary to
fully fund the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and
plan 3 employer contribution shall first be deposited in the public
employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 fund. All
remaining public employees' retirement system employer contributions
shall be deposited in the public employees' retirement system plan 1
fund.
(5) The contributions received for the teachers' retirement system
shall be allocated between the plan 1 fund and the combined plan 2 and
plan 3 fund as follows: The contributions necessary to fully fund the
combined plan 2 and plan 3 employer contribution shall first be
deposited in the combined plan 2 and plan 3 fund. All remaining
teachers' retirement system employer contributions shall be deposited
in the plan 1 fund.
(6) The contributions received for the school employees' retirement
system shall be allocated between the public employees' retirement
system plan 1 fund and the school employees' retirement system combined
plan 2 and plan 3 fund as follows: The contributions necessary to
fully fund the combined plan 2 and plan 3 employer contribution shall
first be deposited in the combined plan 2 and plan 3 fund. All
remaining school employees' retirement system employer contributions
shall be deposited in the public employees' retirement system plan 1
fund.
(7) The contributions received for the law enforcement officers'
and firefighters' retirement system plan 2 shall be deposited in the
law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2
fund.
(8) The contributions received for the public safety employees'
retirement system shall be allocated between the public employees'
retirement system plan 1 fund and the public safety employees'
retirement system plan 2 fund as follows: The contributions necessary
to fully fund the plan 2 employer contribution shall first be deposited
in the plan 2 fund. All remaining public safety employees' retirement
system employer contributions shall be deposited in the public
employees' retirement system plan 1 fund.
(9) The employer of the members of the Washington state patrol
retirement system shall make contributions to that system based on the
rates established under section 5 of this act regardless of the level
of appropriation provided in the biennial budget. The contributions
received for the Washington state patrol retirement system shall be
deposited in the Washington state patrol retirement fund.

Sec. 8 RCW 41.45.060 and 2007 c 280 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state actuary shall provide preliminary actuarial valuation
results based on the economic assumptions and asset value smoothing
technique included in RCW 41.45.035 or adopted under RCW 41.45.030 or
41.45.035.
(2) Not later than July 31, 2008, and every two years thereafter,
consistent with the economic assumptions and asset value smoothing
technique included in RCW 41.45.035 or adopted under RCW 41.45.030 or
41.45.035, the council shall adopt and may make changes to:
(a) A basic state contribution rate for the law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1;
(b) Basic employer contribution rates for the public employees'
retirement system((,)) and the teachers' retirement system((, and the
Washington state patrol retirement system)); and
(c) Basic employer contribution rates for the school employees'
retirement system and the public safety employees' retirement system
for funding both those systems and the public employees' retirement
system plan 1.
The council may adopt annual rate changes for any plan for any
rate-setting period. The contribution rates adopted by the council
shall be subject to revision by the legislature.
(3) The employer and state contribution rates adopted by the
council shall be the level percentages of pay that are needed:
(a) To fully amortize the total costs of the public employees'
retirement system plan 1, the teachers' retirement system plan 1, and
the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan
1 not later than June 30, 2024; and
(b) To fully fund the public employees' retirement system plans 2
and 3, the teachers' retirement system plans 2 and 3, the public safety
employees' retirement system plan 2, and the school employees'
retirement system plans 2 and 3 in accordance with RCW 41.45.061,
41.45.067, and this section.
(4) The aggregate actuarial cost method shall be used to calculate
a combined plan 2 and 3 employer contribution rate ((and a Washington
state patrol retirement system contribution rate)).
(5) The council shall immediately notify the directors of the
office of financial management and department of retirement systems of
the state and employer contribution rates adopted. The rates shall be
effective for the ensuing biennial period, subject to any legislative
modifications.
(6) The director shall collect those rates adopted by the council.
The rates established in RCW 41.45.062, or by the council, shall be
subject to revision by the legislature.
(7) The state actuary shall prepare final actuarial valuation
results based on the economic assumptions, asset value smoothing
technique, and contribution rates included in or adopted under RCW
41.45.030, 41.45.035, and this section.

Sec. 9 RCW 41.45.030 and 2007 c 280 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Beginning September 1, 2007, and every two years thereafter,
the state actuary shall:
(a) Submit to the council information regarding the experience and
financial condition of each state retirement system, and make
recommendations regarding the long-term economic assumptions set forth
in RCW 41.45.035. The council shall review this and such other
information as it may require; and
(b) Submit to the Washington state patrol retirement system board
information regarding the experience and financial condition of each
state retirement system, and make recommendations regarding the long-term economic growth assumptions under RCW 41.45.035.
(2)(a) By October 31, 2007, and every two years thereafter((,)):
(i) The council, by affirmative vote of four councilmembers, may
adopt changes to the long-term economic assumptions established in RCW
41.45.035. Any changes adopted by the council shall be subject to
revision by the legislature; and
(ii) The Washington state patrol retirement system board shall
consider and may adopt changes to the long-term economic assumptions
under RCW 41.45.035.
(b) The council and the Washington state patrol retirement system
board shall consult with the economic and revenue forecast supervisor
and the executive director of the state investment board, and shall
consider long-term historical averages, in reviewing possible changes
to the economic assumptions.
(3) The assumptions and the asset value smoothing technique
established in RCW 41.45.035, as modified in the future by the council
or legislature, shall be used by the state actuary in conducting all
actuarial studies of the state retirement systems, including actuarial
fiscal notes under RCW 44.44.040. The assumptions shall also be used
for the administration of benefits under the retirement plans listed in
RCW 41.45.020, pursuant to timelines and conditions established by
department rules.

Sec. 10 RCW 41.45.070 and 2007 c 491 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In addition to the basic employer contribution rate established
in RCW 41.45.060 ((or 41.45.054)), the department shall also charge
employers of public employees' retirement system, teachers' retirement
system, school employees' retirement system, public safety employees'
retirement system, or Washington state patrol retirement system members
an additional supplemental rate to pay for the cost of additional
benefits, if any, granted to members of those systems. Except as
provided in subsections (6), (7), and (9) of this section, the
supplemental contribution rates required by this section shall be
calculated by the state actuary and shall be charged regardless of
language to the contrary contained in the statute which authorizes
additional benefits.
(2) In addition to the basic member, employer, and state
contribution rate established in RCW 41.45.0604 for the law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2, the department
shall also establish supplemental rates to pay for the cost of
additional benefits, if any, granted to members of the law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2. Except as
provided in subsection (6) of this section, these supplemental rates
shall be calculated by the actuary retained by the law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' board and the state actuary through the
process provided in RCW 41.26.720(1)(a) and the state treasurer shall
transfer the additional required contributions regardless of language
to the contrary contained in the statute which authorizes the
additional benefits.
(3) The supplemental rate charged under this section to fund
benefit increases provided to active members of the public employees'
retirement system plan 1, the teachers' retirement system plan 1, and
Washington state patrol retirement system, shall be calculated as the
level percentage of all members' pay needed to fund the cost of the
benefit not later than June 30, 2024.
(4) The supplemental rate charged under this section to fund
benefit increases provided to active and retired members of the public
employees' retirement system plan 2 and plan 3, the teachers'
retirement system plan 2 and plan 3, the public safety employees'
retirement system plan 2, or the school employees' retirement system
plan 2 and plan 3 shall be calculated as the level percentage of all
members' pay needed to fund the cost of the benefit, as calculated
under RCW 41.45.060, 41.45.061, or 41.45.067.
(5) The supplemental rate charged under this section to fund
postretirement adjustments which are provided on a nonautomatic basis
to current retirees shall be calculated as the percentage of pay needed
to fund the adjustments as they are paid to the retirees. The
supplemental rate charged under this section to fund automatic
postretirement adjustments for active or retired members of the public
employees' retirement system plan 1 and the teachers' retirement system
plan 1 shall be calculated as the level percentage of pay needed to
fund the cost of the automatic adjustments not later than June 30,
2024.
(6) A supplemental rate shall not be charged to pay for the cost of
additional benefits granted to members pursuant to chapter 340, Laws of
1998.
(7) A supplemental rate shall not be charged to pay for the cost of
additional benefits granted to members pursuant to chapter 41.31A RCW;
section 309, chapter 341, Laws of 1998; or section 701, chapter 341,
Laws of 1998.
(8) A supplemental rate shall not be charged to pay for the cost of
additional benefits granted to members and survivors pursuant to
chapter 94, Laws of 2006.
(9) A supplemental rate shall not be charged to pay for the cost of
the additional benefits granted to members of the teachers' retirement
system and the school employees' retirement system plans 2 and 3 in
sections 2, 4, 6, and 8, chapter 491, Laws of 2007 until September 1,
2008. A supplemental rate shall not be charged to pay for the cost of
the additional benefits granted to members of the public employees'
retirement system plans 2 and 3 under sections 9 and 10, chapter 491,
Laws of 2007 until July 1, 2008.
(10) In addition to the basic member and employer contribution
rates established in section 5 of this act for the Washington state
patrol retirement system, the board shall also establish supplemental
rates to pay for the cost of additional benefits, if any, granted to
members of the Washington state patrol retirement system. Except as
provided in subsection (8) of this section, these supplemental rates
shall be calculated by the actuary retained by the Washington state
patrol retirement system board and the state actuary through the
process provided in section 4 of this act and the state treasurer shall
transfer the additional required contributions regardless of language
to the contrary contained in the statute which authorizes the
additional benefits.

Sec. 11 RCW 41.04.281 and 2003 c 295 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The select committee on pension policy has the following powers and
duties:
(1) Study pension issues, develop pension policies for public
employees in state retirement systems, other than the Washington state
patrol retirement system, and make recommendations to the legislature;
(2) Study the financial condition of the state pension systems,
develop funding policies, and make recommendations to the legislature;
(3) Consult with the chair and vice-chair on appointing members to
the state actuary appointment committee upon the convening of the state
actuary appointment committee established under RCW 44.44.013; and
(4) Receive the results of the actuarial audits of the actuarial
valuations and experience studies administered by the pension funding
council pursuant to RCW 41.45.110. The select committee on pension
policy shall study and make recommendations on changes to assumptions
or contribution rates to the pension funding council prior to adoption
of changes under RCW 41.45.030, 41.45.035, or 41.45.060.

Sec. 12 RCW 41.04.278 and 2006 c 309 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The select committee on pension policy may form three function-specific subcommittees, as set forth under subsection (2) of this
section, from the members under RCW 41.04.276(1) (a) through (e), as
follows:
(a) A public safety subcommittee with one member from each group
under RCW 41.04.276(1) (a) through (e);
(b) An education subcommittee with one member from each group under
RCW 41.04.276(1) (a) through (e); and
(c) A state and local government subcommittee, with one retiree
member under RCW 41.04.276(1)(d) and two members from each group under
RCW 41.04.276(1) (a) through (c) and (e).
The retiree members may serve on more than one subcommittee to
ensure representation on each subcommittee.
(2)(a) The public safety subcommittee shall focus on pension issues
affecting public safety employees who are members of the law
enforcement officers' and firefighters'((,)) and public safety
employees'((, and Washington state patrol)) retirement systems.
(b) The education subcommittee shall focus on pension issues
affecting educational employees who are members of the public
employees', teachers', and school employees' retirement systems.
(c) The state and local government subcommittee shall focus on
pension issues affecting state and local government employees who are
members of the public employees' retirement system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 The select committee on pension policy
established in RCW 41.04.276 and the pension funding council created in
RCW 41.45.100 has no applicability or authority over matters relating
to this plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Assets of the plan shall be managed by the
state investment board as provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 Sections 1 through 5 and 13 through 15 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 This act takes effect July 1, 2008.

--- END ---