BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.56.020 and 2006 c 8 s 106 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature intends to establish an adverse health events
and incident notification and reporting system that is designed to
facilitate quality improvement in the health care system, improve
patient safety, assist the public in making informed health care
choices, and decrease medical errors in a nonpunitive manner. The
notification and reporting system shall not be designed to punish
errors by health care practitioners or health care facility employees.
(2) ((Each medical facility shall notify the department of health
regarding the occurrence of any adverse event and file a subsequent
report as provided in this section. Notification must be submitted to
the department within forty-eight hours of confirmation by the medical
facility that an adverse event has occurred. A subsequent report must
be submitted to the department within forty-five days after
confirmation by the medical facility that an adverse event has
occurred.)) When a medical facility confirms that an adverse event has
occurred, it shall submit to the department of health:
(a) Notification of the event, with the date, type of adverse
event, and any additional contextual information the facility chooses
to provide, within forty-eight hours; and
(b) A report regarding the event within forty-five days.
The notification and report shall be submitted to the department
using the internet-based system established under RCW 70.56.040(2). A
medical facility may amend the notification or report within sixty days
of the submission.
(3) The notification and report shall be filed in a format
specified by the department after consultation with medical facilities
and the independent entity. The format shall identify the facility,
but shall not include any identifying information for any of the health
care professionals, facility employees, or patients involved. This
provision does not modify the duty of a hospital to make a report to
the department of health or a disciplinary authority if a licensed
practitioner has committed unprofessional conduct as defined in RCW
18.130.180.
(4) As part of the report filed under subsection (2)(b) of this
section, the medical facility must conduct a root cause analysis of the
event, describe the corrective action plan that will be implemented
consistent with the findings of the analysis, or provide an explanation
of any reasons for not taking corrective action. The department shall
adopt rules, in consultation with medical facilities and the
independent entity, related to the form and content of the root cause
analysis and corrective action plan. In developing the rules,
consideration shall be given to existing standards for root cause
analysis or corrective action plans adopted by the joint commission on
accreditation of health facilities and other national or governmental
entities.
(5) If, in the course of investigating a complaint received from an
employee of a medical facility, the department determines that the
facility has not ((reported)) provided notification of an adverse event
or undertaken efforts to investigate the occurrence of an adverse
event, the department shall direct the facility to ((report)) provide
notification or to undertake an investigation of the event.
(6) The protections of RCW 43.70.075 apply to ((reports))
notifications of adverse events that are submitted in good faith by
employees of medical facilities.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.56.040 and 2006 c 8 s 108 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall contract with a qualified, independent
entity to receive notifications and reports of adverse events and
incidents, and carry out the activities specified in this section. In
establishing qualifications for, and choosing the independent entity,
the department shall strongly consider the patient safety organization
criteria included in the federal patient safety and quality improvement
act of 2005, P.L. 109-41, and any regulations adopted to implement this
chapter.
(2) The independent entity shall:
(a) In collaboration with the department of health, establish an
internet-based system for medical facilities and the health care
workers of a medical facility to submit notifications and reports of
adverse events and incidents, which shall be accessible twenty-four
hours a day, seven days a week. The system shall be a portal to report
both adverse events and incidents, and notifications and reports of
adverse events shall be immediately transmitted to the department. The
system shall be a secure system that protects the confidentiality of
personal health information and provider and facility specific
information submitted in notifications and reports, including
appropriate encryption and an accurate means of authenticating the
((identify [identity])) identity of users of the system. When the
system becomes operational, medical facilities shall submit all
notifications and reports by means of the system;
(b) Collect, analyze, and evaluate data regarding notifications and
reports of adverse events and incidents, including the identification
of performance indicators and patterns in frequency or severity at
certain medical facilities or in certain regions of the state;
(c) Develop recommendations for changes in health care practices
and procedures, which may be instituted for the purpose of reducing the
number or severity of adverse events and incidents;
(d) Directly advise reporting medical facilities of immediate
changes that can be instituted to reduce adverse events or incidents;
(e) Issue recommendations to medical facilities on a
facility-specific or on a statewide basis regarding changes, trends,
and improvements in health care practices and procedures for the
purpose of reducing the number and severity of adverse events or
incidents. Prior to issuing recommendations, consideration shall be
given to the following factors: Expectation of improved quality of
care, implementation feasibility, other relevant implementation
practices, and the cost impact to patients, payers, and medical
facilities. Statewide recommendations shall be issued to medical
facilities on a continuing basis and shall be published and posted on
a publicly accessible web site. The recommendations made to medical
facilities under this section shall not be considered mandatory for
licensure purposes unless they are adopted by the department as rules
pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW; and
(f) Monitor implementation of reporting systems addressing adverse
events or their equivalent in other states and make recommendations to
the governor and the legislature as necessary for modifications to this
chapter to keep the system as nearly consistent as possible with
similar systems in other states.
(3)(a) The independent entity shall report no later than January 1,
2008, and annually thereafter to the governor and the legislature on
the activities under this chapter in the preceding year. The report
shall include:
(((a))) (i) The number of adverse events and incidents reported by
medical facilities, in the aggregate, on a geographical basis, and
((their outcomes)) a summary of actions taken by facilities in response
to the adverse events or incidents;
(((b))) (ii) In the aggregate, the information derived from the
data collected, including any recognized trends concerning patient
safety; ((and
(c))) (iii) Recommendations for statutory or regulatory changes
that may help improve patient safety in the state; and
(iv) Information, presented in the aggregate, to inform and educate
consumers and providers, on best practices and prevention tools that
medical facilities are implementing to prevent adverse events as well
as other patient safety initiatives medical facilities are undertaking
to promote patient safety.
(b) The annual report shall be made available for public inspection
and shall be posted on the department's and the independent entity's
web site.
(4) The independent entity shall conduct all activities under this
section in a manner that preserves the confidentiality of facilities,
documents, materials, or information made confidential by RCW
70.56.050.
(5) Medical facilities and health care workers may ((report))
provide notification of incidents to the independent entity. The
((report)) notification shall be filed in a format specified by the
independent entity, after consultation with the department and medical
facilities, and shall identify the facility but shall not include any
identifying information for any of the health care professionals,
facility employees, or patients involved. This provision does not
modify the duty of a hospital to make a report to the department or a
disciplinary authority if a licensed practitioner has committed
unprofessional conduct as defined in RCW 18.130.180. The protections
of RCW 43.70.075 apply to ((reports)) notifications of incidents that
are submitted in good faith by employees of medical facilities.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.56.050 and 2006 c 8 s 110 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) When ((a notification or report of an adverse event or
incident under RCW 70.56.020 or 70.56.040)) notification of an adverse
event under RCW 70.56.020(2)(a) or of an incident under RCW
70.56.040(5), or a report regarding an adverse event under RCW
70.56.020(2)(b) is made by or through a coordinated quality improvement
program under RCW 43.70.510 or 70.41.200, or by a peer review committee
under RCW 4.24.250, information and documents, including complaints and
incident reports, created specifically for and collected and maintained
by a quality improvement committee for the purpose of preparing a
notification ((or report)) of an adverse event or incident((, and)) or
a report regarding an adverse event, the ((notification or)) report
itself, and the notification of an incident, shall be subject to the
confidentiality protections of those laws and RCW ((42.17.310(1)(hh)
and)) 42.56.360(1)(c).
(b) The notification of an adverse event under RCW 70.56.020(2)(a),
shall be subject to public disclosure and not exempt from disclosure
under chapter 42.56 RCW. Any public disclosure of an adverse event
notification must include any contextual information the medical
facility chose to provide under RCW 70.56.020(2)(a).
(2)(a) When ((a notification or report of an adverse event or
incident made by a health care worker under RCW 70.56.020 or
70.56.040)) notification of an adverse event under RCW 70.56.020(2)(a)
or of an incident under RCW 70.56.040(5), or a report regarding an
adverse event under RCW 70.56.020(2)(b), made by a health care worker
uses information and documents, including complaints and incident
reports, created specifically for and collected and maintained by a
quality improvement committee under RCW 43.70.510 or 70.41.200 or a
peer review committee under RCW 4.24.250, ((the)) a notification ((or))
of an incident, the report itself, and the information or documents
used for the purpose of preparing ((the)) notifications or the report,
shall be subject to the confidentiality protections of those laws and
RCW ((42.17.310(1)(hh) and)) 42.56.360(1)(c).
(b) The notification of an adverse event under RCW 70.56.020(2)(a)
shall be subject to public disclosure and not exempt from disclosure
under chapter 42.56 RCW. Any public disclosure of an adverse event
notification must include any contextual information the medical
facility chose to provide under RCW 70.56.020(2)(a).

Sec. 4 RCW 42.56.360 and 2007 c 261 s 4 and 2007 c 259 s 49 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The following health care information is exempt from disclosure
under this chapter:
(a) Information obtained by the board of pharmacy as provided in
RCW 69.45.090;
(b) Information obtained by the board of pharmacy or the department
of health and its representatives as provided in RCW 69.41.044,
69.41.280, and 18.64.420;
(c) Information and documents created specifically for, and
collected and maintained by a quality improvement committee under RCW
43.70.510 or 70.41.200, or by a peer review committee under RCW
4.24.250, or by a quality assurance committee pursuant to RCW 74.42.640
or 18.20.390, or by a hospital, as defined in RCW 43.70.056, for
reporting of health care-associated infections under RCW 43.70.056,
((and notifications or reports of adverse events or incidents made
under RCW 70.56.020 or 70.56.040,)) a notification of an incident under
RCW 70.56.040(5), and reports regarding adverse events under RCW
70.56.020(2)(b), regardless of which agency is in possession of the
information and documents;
(d)(i) Proprietary financial and commercial information that the
submitting entity, with review by the department of health,
specifically identifies at the time it is submitted and that is
provided to or obtained by the department of health in connection with
an application for, or the supervision of, an antitrust exemption
sought by the submitting entity under RCW 43.72.310;
(ii) If a request for such information is received, the submitting
entity must be notified of the request. Within ten business days of
receipt of the notice, the submitting entity shall provide a written
statement of the continuing need for confidentiality, which shall be
provided to the requester. Upon receipt of such notice, the department
of health shall continue to treat information designated under this
subsection (1)(d) as exempt from disclosure;
(iii) If the requester initiates an action to compel disclosure
under this chapter, the submitting entity must be joined as a party to
demonstrate the continuing need for confidentiality;
(e) Records of the entity obtained in an action under RCW 18.71.300
through 18.71.340;
(f) Except for published statistical compilations and reports
relating to the infant mortality review studies that do not identify
individual cases and sources of information, any records or documents
obtained, prepared, or maintained by the local health department for
the purposes of an infant mortality review conducted by the department
of health under RCW 70.05.170;
(g) Complaints filed under chapter 18.130 RCW after July 27, 1997,
to the extent provided in RCW 18.130.095(1); and
(h) Information obtained by the department of health under chapter
70.225 RCW.
(2) Chapter 70.02 RCW applies to public inspection and copying of
health care information of patients.

Sec. 5 RCW 42.56.360 and 2007 c 273 s 25, 2007 c 261 s 4, and
2007 c 259 s 49 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The following health care information is exempt from disclosure
under this chapter:
(a) Information obtained by the board of pharmacy as provided in
RCW 69.45.090;
(b) Information obtained by the board of pharmacy or the department
of health and its representatives as provided in RCW 69.41.044,
69.41.280, and 18.64.420;
(c) Information and documents created specifically for, and
collected and maintained by a quality improvement committee under RCW
43.70.510, 70.230.080, or 70.41.200, or by a peer review committee
under RCW 4.24.250, or by a quality assurance committee pursuant to RCW
74.42.640 or 18.20.390, or by a hospital, as defined in RCW 43.70.056,
for reporting of health care-associated infections under RCW 43.70.056,
((and notifications or reports of adverse events or incidents made
under RCW 70.56.020 or 70.56.040,)) a notification of an incident under
RCW 70.56.040(5), and reports regarding adverse events under RCW
70.56.020(2)(b), regardless of which agency is in possession of the
information and documents;
(d)(i) Proprietary financial and commercial information that the
submitting entity, with review by the department of health,
specifically identifies at the time it is submitted and that is
provided to or obtained by the department of health in connection with
an application for, or the supervision of, an antitrust exemption
sought by the submitting entity under RCW 43.72.310;
(ii) If a request for such information is received, the submitting
entity must be notified of the request. Within ten business days of
receipt of the notice, the submitting entity shall provide a written
statement of the continuing need for confidentiality, which shall be
provided to the requester. Upon receipt of such notice, the department
of health shall continue to treat information designated under this
subsection (1)(d) as exempt from disclosure;
(iii) If the requester initiates an action to compel disclosure
under this chapter, the submitting entity must be joined as a party to
demonstrate the continuing need for confidentiality;
(e) Records of the entity obtained in an action under RCW 18.71.300
through 18.71.340;
(f) Except for published statistical compilations and reports
relating to the infant mortality review studies that do not identify
individual cases and sources of information, any records or documents
obtained, prepared, or maintained by the local health department for
the purposes of an infant mortality review conducted by the department
of health under RCW 70.05.170;
(g) Complaints filed under chapter 18.130 RCW after July 27, 1997,
to the extent provided in RCW 18.130.095(1); and
(h) Information obtained by the department of health under chapter
70.225 RCW.
(2) Chapter 70.02 RCW applies to public inspection and copying of
health care information of patients.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Section 4 of this act expires July 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Section 5 of this act takes effect July 1,
2009.

--- END ---