BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 67.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The commission shall conduct a raffle game to be known as
WINaBRAIN. The price for a WINaBRAIN ticket is two dollars per ticket.
After one hundred thousand WINaBRAIN tickets are sold, the commission
must conduct a drawing to determine the winners of the WINaBRAIN
raffle. Winning tickets must be awarded prizes as follows: The first
four tickets drawn must be awarded twenty-five thousand dollars to be
used pursuant to subsection (2) of this section; and the next ten
thousand five hundred tickets drawn must be awarded a WINaBRAIN ticket
for the next raffle drawing.
(2) The twenty-five thousand dollar prize will be awarded as units
in the guaranteed education tuition program and the winner of the prize
must designate an account holder and a student beneficiary for the
guaranteed education tuition account.
(3) The commission must adopt rules to implement this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 67.70.100 and 1997 c 111 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except under subsections (2) and (3) of this section, no right
of any person to a prize drawn is assignable, except that payment of
any prize drawn may be paid to the estate of a deceased prize winner,
and except that any person pursuant to an appropriate judicial order
may be paid the prize to which the winner is entitled.
(2)(a) The payment of all or part of the remainder of an annuity
may be assigned to another person, pursuant to a voluntary assignment
of the right to receive future annual prize payments, if the assignment
is made pursuant to an appropriate judicial order of the Thurston
county superior court or the superior court of the county in which the
prize winner resides, if the winner is a resident of Washington state.
If the prize winner is not a resident of Washington state, the winner
must seek an appropriate order from the Thurston county superior court.
(b) If there is a voluntary assignment under (a) of this
subsection, a copy of the petition for an order under (a) of this
subsection and all notices of any hearing in the matter shall be served
on the attorney general no later than ten days before any hearing or
entry of any order.
(c) The court receiving the petition may issue an order approving
the assignment and directing the director to pay to the assignee the
remainder or portion of an annuity so assigned upon finding that all of
the following conditions have been met:
(i) The assignment has been memorialized in writing and executed by
the assignor and is subject to Washington law;
(ii) The assignor provides a sworn declaration to the court
attesting to the facts that the assignor has had the opportunity to be
represented by independent legal counsel in connection with the
assignment, has received independent financial and tax advice
concerning the effects of the assignment, and is of sound mind and not
acting under duress, and the court makes findings determining so;
(iii) The assignee has provided a one-page written disclosure
statement that sets forth in bold-face type, fourteen point or larger,
the payments being assigned by amount and payment dates, the purchase
price, or loan amount being paid; the interest rate or rate of discount
to present value, assuming monthly compounding and funding on the
contract date; and the amount, if any, of any origination or closing
fees that will be charged to the lottery winner. The disclosure
statement must also advise the winner that the winner should consult
with and rely upon the advice of his or her own independent legal or
financial advisors regarding the potential federal and state tax
consequences of the transaction; and
(iv) The proposed assignment does not and will not include or cover
payments or portions of payments subject to offsets pursuant to RCW
67.70.255 unless appropriate provision is made in the order to satisfy
the obligations giving rise to the offset.
(d) The commission may intervene as of right in any proceeding
under this section but shall not be deemed an indispensable or
necessary party.
(3) The winner of a WINaBRAIN raffle must designate the account
holder and the student beneficiary for the guaranteed education tuition
account established under section 1 of this act.
(4) The director will not pay the assignee an amount in excess of
the annual payment entitled to the assignor.
(((4))) (5) The commission may adopt rules pertaining to the
assignment of prizes under this section, including recovery of actual
costs incurred by the commission. The recovery of actual costs shall
be deducted from the initial annuity payment made to the assignee.
(((5))) (6) No voluntary assignment under this section is effective
unless and until the national office of the federal internal revenue
service provides a ruling that declares that the voluntary assignment
of prizes will not affect the federal income tax treatment of prize
winners who do not assign their prizes. If at any time the federal
internal revenue service or a court of competent jurisdiction provides
a determination letter, revenue ruling, other public ruling of the
internal revenue service or published decision to any state lottery or
state lottery prize winner declaring that the voluntary assignment of
prizes will effect the federal income tax treatment of prize winners
who do not assign their prizes, the director shall immediately file a
copy of that letter, ruling, or published decision with the secretary
of state. No further voluntary assignments may be allowed after the
date the ruling, letter, or published decision is filed.
(((6))) (7) The occurrence of any event described in subsection
(((5))) (6) of this section does not render invalid or ineffective
assignments validly made and approved pursuant to an appropriate
judicial order before the occurrence of any such event.
(((7))) (8) The requirement for a disclosure statement in
subsection (2)(c)(iii) of this section does not apply to any assignment
agreement executed before April 21, 1997.
(((8))) (9) The commission and the director shall be discharged of
all further liability upon payment of a prize pursuant to this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 67.70.240 and 2001 c 3 s 4 (Initiative Measure No.
728, approved November 7, 2000) are each amended to read as follows:
The moneys in the state lottery account shall be used only:
(1) For the payment of prizes to the holders of winning lottery
tickets or shares, including the purchase of units in the guaranteed
education tuition program pursuant to section 1 of this act;
(2) For purposes of making deposits into the reserve account
created by RCW 67.70.250 and into the lottery administrative account
created by RCW 67.70.260;
(3) For purposes of making deposits into the education construction
fund and student achievement fund created in RCW 43.135.045. For the
transition period from July 1, 2001, until and including June 30, 2002,
fifty percent of the moneys not otherwise obligated under this section
shall be placed in the student achievement fund and fifty percent of
these moneys shall be placed in the education construction fund. On
and after July 1, 2002, until June 30, 2004, seventy-five percent of
these moneys shall be placed in the student achievement fund and
twenty-five percent shall be placed in the education construction fund.
On and after July 1, 2004, all deposits not otherwise obligated under
this section shall be placed in the education construction fund.
Moneys in the state lottery account deposited in the education
construction fund and the student achievement fund are included in
"general state revenues" under RCW 39.42.070;
(4) For distribution to a county for the purpose of paying the
principal and interest payments on bonds issued by the county to
construct a baseball stadium, as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including
reasonably necessary preconstruction costs. Three million dollars
shall be distributed under this subsection during calendar year 1996.
During subsequent years, such distributions shall equal the prior
year's distributions increased by four percent. Distributions under
this subsection shall cease when the bonds issued for the construction
of the baseball stadium are retired, but not more than twenty years
after the tax under RCW 82.14.0485 is first imposed;
(5) For distribution to the stadium and exhibition center account,
created in RCW 43.99N.060. Subject to the conditions of RCW
43.99N.070, six million dollars shall be distributed under this
subsection during the calendar year 1998. During subsequent years,
such distribution shall equal the prior year's distributions increased
by four percent. No distribution may be made under this subsection
after December 31, 1999, unless the conditions for issuance of the
bonds under RCW 43.99N.020(2) are met. Distributions under this
subsection shall cease when the bonds are retired, but not later than
December 31, 2020;
(6) For the purchase and promotion of lottery games and game-related services; and
(7) For the payment of agent compensation.
The office of financial management shall require the allotment of
all expenses paid from the account and shall report to the ways and
means committees of the senate and house of representatives any changes
in the allotments.

--- END ---