BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 For the purpose of providing state funds for
federally matched flood hazard mitigation and other projects throughout
the Chehalis river basin, the state finance committee is authorized to
issue general obligation bonds of the state of Washington in the sum of
fifty million dollars, or as much thereof as may be required, to
finance the projects and all costs incidental thereto. Bonds
authorized in this section may be sold at such price as the state
finance committee shall determine. No bonds authorized in this section
may be offered for sale without prior legislative appropriation of the
net proceeds of the sale of the bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The proceeds from the sale of the bonds
authorized in section 1 of this act shall be deposited in the state
building construction account created by RCW 43.83.020. If the state
finance committee deems it necessary to issue taxable bonds in order to
comply with federal internal revenue service rules and regulations
pertaining to the use of nontaxable bond proceeds, the proceeds of such
taxable bonds shall be transferred to the state taxable building
construction account in lieu of any deposits otherwise provided by this
section. The state treasurer shall submit written notice to the
director of financial management if it is determined that any such
transfer to the state taxable building construction account is
necessary. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. These proceeds shall be used exclusively for the
purposes specified in section 1 of this act and for the payment of
expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of the bonds. These
proceeds shall be administered by the office of financial management
subject to legislative appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The debt-limit general fund bond
retirement account shall be used for the payment of the principal of
and interest on the bonds authorized in section 1 of this act.
(2) The state finance committee shall, on or before June 30th of
each year, certify to the state treasurer the amount needed in the
ensuing twelve months to meet the bond retirement and interest
requirements. On each date on which any interest or principal and
interest payment is due the state treasurer shall withdraw from any
general state revenues received in the state treasury and deposit in
the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account an amount equal to
the amount certified by the state finance committee to be due on the
payment date.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Bonds issued under section 1 of this act
shall state that they are a general obligation of the state of
Washington, shall pledge the full faith and credit of the state to the
payment of the principal thereof and the interest thereon, and shall
contain an unconditional promise to pay the principal and interest as
the same shall become due.
(2) The owner and holder of each of the bonds or the trustee for
the owner and holder of any of the bonds may by mandamus or other
appropriate proceeding require the transfer and payment of funds as
directed in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The legislature may provide additional means
for raising moneys for the payment of the principal of and interest on
the bonds authorized in section 1 of this act, and section 3 of this
act shall not be deemed to provide an exclusive method for the payment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The bonds authorized in section 1 of this
act shall be a legal investment for all state funds or funds under
state control and for all funds of any other public body.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---