BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) A supplemental capital budget is hereby
adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth in this act, the
several dollar amounts hereinafter specified, or so much thereof as
shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby
appropriated and authorized to be incurred for capital projects during
the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending
June 30, 2009, out of the several funds specified in this act.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this act
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Fiscal year 2008" or "FY 2008" means the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2008.
(b) "Fiscal year 2009" or "FY 2009" means the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2009.
(c) "Lapse" or "revert" means the amount shall return to an
unappropriated status.
(d) "Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only
for the specified purpose.
Unless otherwise specifically authorized in this act, any portion
of an amount provided solely for a specified purpose that is not
expended subject to the specified conditions and limitations to fulfill
the specified purpose shall lapse.

PART 1
GENERAL GOVERNMENT
Sec. 1001 2007 c 520 s 1020 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Housing Assistance, Weatherization, and Affordable Housing
(06-4-851)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $7,800,000 of the reappropriation from the Washington housing
trust account is provided solely for the backlog, as defined by the
department, of projects determined by the department to be eligible
under chapter 43.185 or 43.185A RCW.
(2) $4,500,000 of the reappropriation from the Washington housing
trust account is provided solely for weatherization administered
through the energy matchmakers program.
(3) $850,000 of the reappropriation from the Washington housing
trust account is provided solely to promote development of safe and
affordable housing units for persons eligible for services from the
division of developmental disabilities within the department of social
and health services.
(4) $500,000 of the reappropriation from the Washington housing
trust account is provided solely for shelters, transitional housing, or
other housing facilities for victims of domestic violence.
(5) $3,000,000 of the reappropriation from the Washington housing
trust account is provided solely for farm worker housing projects and
programs to meet the full spectrum of housing needs of Washington's
farm workers and their families. The department shall work with
stakeholders representing a diversity of farm worker housing interests
to develop a strategic plan in implementing this provision.
(6) $200,000 of the reappropriation from the Washington housing
trust account is provided solely for the implementation and management
of a manufactured/mobile home landlord-tenant ombudsman conflict
resolution program by the office of mobile home affairs as generally
described in section 3, chapter 429, Laws of 2005. The office of
mobile home affairs shall also determine the number of complaints made
to the department since May of 2005 that, in the best estimate of the
department, do in fact present violations of chapter 59.20 RCW and
shall produce a summary of the number and types of complaints. The
office of mobile home affairs shall also continue to maintain and
update a database with information about all mobile home parks and
manufactured housing communities. The office of mobile home affairs
shall provide a report regarding the activities and results of the
program to the appropriate committees of the house of representatives
and the senate by December 31, 2007.
(7) $150,000 of the appropriation from the Washington housing trust
account is provided solely for a program to assist individuals and
communities in the home-buying process, including, but not limited to:
Homebuyer education classes, credit and budget counseling, financial
literacy training, and down payment assistance programs. The department
shall contract with a nonprofit organization as defined under section
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code or similar successor provision
that has experience and expertise in addressing language access
barriers in the home-buying process to implement this program.
(8) The reappropriation in this section must be included in the
calculation of annual funds available for determining the
administrative costs of the department, which shall not exceed five
percent of the annual funds available for the housing assistance
program and the affordable housing program as authorized under RCW
43.185.050 and 43.185A.030.

Reappropriation:
Washington Housing Trust Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,502,000
((Homeless Families Services Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,502,000))
$16,502,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $499,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($21,001,000))
$17,001,000

Sec. 1002 2007 c 520 s 1030 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Drinking Water Assistance Program (07-4-004)

Appropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,200,000))
$10,800,000
Drinking Water Assistance Repayment Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,100,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($28,300,000))
$31,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $155,400,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($183,700,000))
$187,300,000

Sec. 1003 2007 c 520 s 1031 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Housing Assistance, Weatherization, and Affordable Housing
(07-4-009)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $9,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for
weatherization administered through the energy matchmakers program.
(2) $5,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely to promote
development of safe and affordable housing units for persons eligible
for services from the division of developmental disabilities within the
department of social and health services.
(3) $2,500,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for grants
to nonprofit organizations and public housing authorities for revolving
loan, self-help housing programs for low and moderate income families.
(4) $1,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for
shelters, transitional housing, or other housing facilities for victims
of domestic violence.
(5) $14,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for
facilities housing low-income migrant, seasonal, or temporary
farmworkers. The operation of the facilities built under this section
shall be in compliance with 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1342. The department shall
work with the farmworker housing advisory committee to prioritize
funding of projects to the areas of highest need. Funding may also be
provided, to the extent qualified projects are submitted, for health
and safety projects. Any of this appropriation that is not obligated
by June 30, 2009, shall be added to the amount appropriated for the
general pool of projects.
(6) $5,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the
development of emergency shelters and transitional housing
opportunities for homeless families with children.
(7) $4,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the
development of farm infrastructure improvements. Any of this
appropriation that is not obligated by June 30, 2009, shall be added to
the amount appropriated for the general pool of projects.
(8) $1,500,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the
development of housing for low-income or homeless Native Americans.
The department shall work with Native American tribes, not-for–profit
organizations with experience in serving Native American populations,
and Native American housing development organizations to prioritize
projects located in the areas of highest identified need.
(9) $4,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for loans
and grants to eligible organizations to purchase manufactured/mobile
home communities with the intent of preserving the communities for
affordable housing.
(10) The appropriation in this section shall not be used for the
administrative costs of the department. The amount of the
appropriation shall be included in the calculation of annual funds
available for determining the administrative costs authorized under RCW
43.185.050.
(11) Within available funding provided in this section, the
department shall prepare an inventory of housing assistance programs.
The inventory shall include all state funded programs, the housing
finance commission programs, all programs funded by local governments
and housing authorities, including a description of expenditures from
fees and taxes specifically authorized by state law for housing
assistance and homeless programs, all property tax and sales tax
provisions that are intended to support housing assistance programs,
and all federally funded housing assistance programs provided in the
state. The inventory shall include a description of the program,
biennial appropriation and expenditure levels since the 1999-2001
biennium through the 2007-2009 biennium, a description of eligibility
criteria and the amount of benefit provided per unit or per family, and
the number of units or families assisted. The department shall
coordinate with the joint legislative audit and review committee to
reduce duplicative efforts that may be required by legislation.
(12) Up to $10,000,000 of the appropriation is provided for the
creation and development of low-income housing within areas declared
disasters by the governor after November 2007.
(13) Up to $3,000,000 of the appropriation is provided for a pilot
program for affordable housing. Under the pilot program, the
department shall develop a rolling process for eligible organizations,
as defined in RCW 43.185A.040, to apply for short-term loans for
earnest money to acquire property for "affordable housing" for "low-income households" as those terms are defined in RCW 43.185A.010.

Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($130,000,000))
$180,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $560,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($690,000,000))
$740,000,000

Sec. 1004 2007 c 520 s 1035 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Rural Washington Loan Fund (07-4-008)

Appropriation:
Rural Washington Loan Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,127,000))
$2,027,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,508,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,635,000))
$18,535,000

Sec. 1005 2007 c 520 s 1041 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Local and Community Projects (08-4-001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of
this section, the department shall not expend the appropriations in
this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have
been either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount
sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project
that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the
legislature.
(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate
that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years,
either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement shall
not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or
appropriations whose sole purpose is to purchase real property that
does not include a construction or renovation component.
(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with
Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter
39.35D RCW.
(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and
shall not be advanced under any circumstances.
(5) Projects funded in this section must be held by the recipient
for a minimum of ten years and used for the same purpose or purposes
intended by the legislature as required in RCW 43.63A.125(2)(c).
(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned
and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay
state prevailing wages.
(7) The appropriation provided in this section for the bridge for
kids project shall not be released until the department obtains a
report from the project sponsor updating the cost of the project and
the current fund raising plan.
(8) Funding for preconstruction activities for the Camas and
Washougal community and recreation center is contingent on voter
approval of a metropolitan park district.
(9) The appropriation provided in this section for the Fox theater
shall be provided only under an agreement that the theater shall retain
its current name as the Fox theater.
(10) The appropriation in this section for the life support and
emergency medical services infrastructure build-out project is provided
solely for emergency medical services and medical care infrastructure
consistent with the adopted mission, goals, and capital plan of the
501(c)(3) life support.
(11) The port of Grays Harbor project is a loan that is subject to
the provisions of chapter 171, Laws of 2006.
(12) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Project Name Amount

800 MhZ interoperability public safety communication $1,000,000
Aberdeen union gospel mission $562,000
Arts west playhouse and gallery $150,000
Ashford cultural center and mountaineering museum $800,000
Asian counseling/referral services $2,000,000
Aviation high school $275,000
Ballard corners park $125,000
Beaver mitigation of Little Spokane river $75,000
Benton City food bank $200,000
Bethel community center $1,000,000
Blueberry park improvements $5,000
Bothell crossroads/state route 522 realignment - land
acquisition and preconstruction activities $7,000,000
Bowen field $500,000
Bremerton downtown economic revitalization projects $5,000,000
Bridge for kids $500,000
Burbank water improvement $1,621,000
Burien town square $1,600,000
Camp kilworth land acquisition - Federal Way $1,100,000
Cannon house $750,000
Chambers creek pedestrian bridge (($1,000,000))
$2,400,000
Chehalis middle school track improvement $350,000
Chehalis veterans wall of honor security enclosure $25,000
Chelan county public utility district monitor
domestic water system $800,000
Children's hospital $2,500,000
Cities of Camas and Washougal community/recreation
center preconstruction activities $500,000
City of Everett - senior center expansion and upgrade $400,000
City of Everett minor league baseball - aquasox $433,000
City of Kent event center $3,000,000
City of Mount Vernon downtown and waterfront
flood control $1,000,000
City of Puyallup riverwalk trail project $600,000
City of Tacoma minor league baseball - rainiers $2,500,000
City of Yakima minor league baseball $594,000
Civil war cemetery near volunteer park $5,000
Columbia Springs environmental learning center
preconstruction or construction activities $200,000
Confluence project $500,000
Counter balance park $100,000
Coupeville covered play area $113,000
Covered bridge park land acquisition (Grays river) $90,000
Cowlitz drug treatment center $580,000
Darrington water system improvements $100,000
Dawson place child advocacy center land
acquisition and renovation $650,000
Daybreak star in Discovery park $300,000
Dining car historic preservation $50,000
Discovery park - Fort Lawton $700,000
Duwamish education center $2,000,000
Duwamish longhouse $275,000
Eatonville family park $200,000
Evergreen school district health and biosciences academy $1,000,000
Federal Way little league field lighting $50,000
Ferndale boys and girls club - urgent needs
and preconstruction activities $200,000
Fish lake trail $1,000,000
Fort Dent sewer $450,000
Foss waterway $1,000,000
Fox theater $2,000,000
Friends of hidden river preconstruction activities $675,000
Garfield county agricultural history museum $75,000
Goodwill of Tacoma $1,500,000
Granite Falls museum $30,000
High Point neighborhood center in West Seattle $1,000,000
Highline school district noise mitigation $3,500,000
Hill ward building removal $550,000
Innovative services northwest $1,900,000
Institute for community leadership $700,000
Jewish federation of greater Seattle $900,000
Kent alliance center $500,000
Kirkland public safety campus land acquisition
and preconstruction activities $750,000
Kitsap SEED $1,100,000
Klickitat law enforcement firing range $20,000
Kruckeberg botanical garden $150,000
Lake Stevens civic center $800,000
Lake Stevens senior center $200,000
Lake Waughop/department of ecology aquatic weeds $50,000
Library connection at greenbridge $200,000
Life support and emergency medical services
infrastructure build-out $2,700,000
Lions club renovation $160,000
Long lake nutrient reduction $300,000
Loon lake wood waste removal pilot study $350,000
Lucy Lopez center land acquisition $750,000
Maple Valley lake wilderness lodge and conference center $1,500,000
Maple Valley legacy site planning and
infrastructure development $3,000,000
McCaw hall $2,000,000
McDonald park $150,000
Mercer slough environmental center $1,500,000
Mill creek senior center $150,000
Mirabeau Point children's universal park $800,000
Mobius (($800,000))
$2,000,000
Monroe rotary field $700,000
Morning star cultural center $300,000
Mountains to sound - SR18/I90 interchange $500,000
New hope farms $85,000
Nisei veterans committee $250,000
NORCOM public safety communication $750,000
Nordic heritage museum $1,500,000
Northwest African American museum $650,000
Northwest harvest $3,000,000
Northwest stream center $300,000
Oak Harbor dredging preconstruction activities $59,000
Oak Harbor veterans memorial $50,000
Okanogan Valley equestrian and cultural heritage center $4,000,000
Palouse street safety improvements $210,000
Performing arts center eastside $2,000,000
Perry technical institute hanger $250,000
Pike Place market $1,070,000
Port of Benton transloader (railex) $1,000,000
Port of Grays Harbor $2,500,000
Port of Walla Walla wine incubator $500,000
Poulsbo marine science center floating classroom $100,000
Prime time repairs (terminally ill children) $300,000
Puyallup town square $200,000
Rainier lifelong learning center $200,000
Richland Babe Ruth field complex $1,000,000
Seatac World War I memorial plaza $200,000
Seattle art museum $1,250,000
Seattle children's play garden $332,000
Seattle Chinese garden $500,000
Shoreline YMCA $800,000
Simon youth foundation resource center $150,000
Skagit recreation and event center $1,000,000
Snoqualmie railway history preconstruction activities $600,000
Somerset village - Snohomish Y $200,000
South Tacoma community center $700,000
Spokane county minor league baseball - Indians $2,000,000
Spokane Valley community center and foodbank $260,000
Spokane YWCA/YMCA joint project $2,500,000
Springwood youth center $500,000
SR 395/court street pedestrian overpass $400,000
Suquamish inviting house construction $1,000,000
Tacoma narrows bridge lights $1,500,000
Tonasket viewing platform $100,000
Tanbara clinic - East Tacoma community $850,000
The Northwest maritime center $2,250,000
The Tri Cities minor league baseball $666,000
Thurston county small business incubator $750,000
Tokeland/North Cove water tank for fire $10,000
Town square grid - drexler drive $750,000
Tukwila southcenter parkway infrastructure $4,000,000
Turning point domestic violence shelter $700,000
University Place town square $1,000,000
VaHalla hall $750,000
Vancouver national historic reserve $750,000
Vernetta Smith Chehalis timberland library $500,000
Waitsburg flood control feasibility report $29,000
Walla Walla county health center annex $100,000
White Center heights park $500,000
White Salmon water improvement $1,500,000
Willapa harbor community center $300,000
William Factory small business incubator $500,000
Wing-It productions historic theater $20,000
Washington State University/Shoreline Community
College zero energy house $200,000
Yakima domestic violence shelter $200,000
Yakima downtown futures initiative phase 3 $1,000,000
YMCA of Snohomish county: Ebey Island project $2,200,000
Total (($132,619,000))
$135,879,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($132,619,000))
$135,879,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($132,619,000))
$135,879,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1006 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Tenino Waste Water Treatment Facility and Collection System
(08-1-003)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for the replacement of the city of Tenino's septic
systems such that this funding will reduce the financial impact to the
monthly fees of its users.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,400,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1007 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Longview Regional Water Treatment Plant Dredging (08-1-001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for the emergency dredging of the Cowlitz river to
prevent sandbars from obstructing the intake facility necessary for the
city of Longview to obtain water.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1008 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Quincy Water Treatment System (08-1-002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely to increase the capacity of the water treatment
facility in the city of Quincy.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000,000

Sec. 1009 2007 c 520 s 1050 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Oversight of State Facilities (08-2-855)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is this section is
provided solely for the office of financial management to strengthen
its oversight role in state facility analysis and decision making as
generally described in chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 2366),
Laws of 2007.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,015,000))
$1,419,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,015,000))
$1,419,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1010 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL
Child Care Facility: Improvements (08-2-002)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000

Sec. 1011 2007 c 520 s 1066 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (08-1-015)

Appropriation:
Capitol Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,715,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,456,000))
$1,682,000
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,634,000
General Administration Service Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,386,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,191,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,365,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($28,556,000))
$28,782,000

Sec. 1012 2007 c 520 s 1073 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
Oversight of State Facilities (08-2-853)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is this section is
provided solely for the department of general administration to assist
the office of financial management with the development of six-year
facility plans as generally described in chapter . . . (Substitute
House Bill No. 2366), Laws of 2007.

Appropriation:
General Administration Services Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $345,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $264,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($345,000))
$609,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1013 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
Option to Purchase Washington State Patrol Academy Land (08-2-001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1014 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
Infrastructure Relocation (08-2-028)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1015 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
Campus Monuments Repair and Restoration (09-1-003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $288,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $208,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $496,000

Sec. 1016 2007 c 520 s 1075 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION SERVICES
Wheeler Block Development--Department of Information Services,
State Patrol, and General Office (08-2-950)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Planning funds are provided solely to
lease/develop state office buildings and facilities for the department
of information services on the "Wheeler block" of the east capitol
campus. The office buildings shall be constructed and financed so that
agencies' occupancy costs per gross square foot or per employee will
not exceed 110 percent of comparable private market rental rates per
gross square foot or per employee. The comparable general office space
rate shall be calculated based on recent Thurston county leases of new
space of at least 100,000 rentable square feet adjusted for known
escalation clauses, expected inflation, and differences in the level of
service provided by the comparable leases as determined by the
department in consultation with the department of general
administration. In addition to the department of information services,
state agency tenants shall include the state patrol and general office
facilities for small agencies and offices. The department shall design
and operate the general office facilities for small agencies and
offices as a demonstration of the efficiencies gained from the
integration of office space and telecommunications and computer
technology. The demonstration project shall provide office space,
furniture, and telecommunications and computer technology as a single
package. The facility shall be designed so that small agencies and
offices can move in and out of the facility without the typical moving
expenses that result from individual agency ownership of furniture and
technology. The facility for small agencies and offices shall also
provide for staffing and space efficiencies resulting from central
reception, and support services and spaces. The department of general
administration shall coordinate with state agency tenants of the
existing general administration building that will not be relocated to
the new facilities of the "Wheeler block" for occupancy of state-owned
or existing leased facilities ((vacated by the state patrol or the
department of information services)) within Thurston county prior to
relocation to new or not currently state-owned or leased facilities.
The department shall consider alternatives for backfilling vacated
state patrol or department of information services leased facilities
when possible.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

(End of part)

PART 2
HUMAN SERVICES
Sec. 2001 2007 c 520 s 2007 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES
Fircrest School - Health and Safety Improvements (06-1-852)

Reappropriation:
((Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000))
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $372,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($350,000))
$378,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2002 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES
Naselle Youth Camp: Land Acquisition (08-1-218)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $240,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $240,000

Sec. 2003 2007 c 520 s 2029 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES
Special Commitment Center Medium Management Housing Addition
(08-2-505)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is for the evaluation of design
alternatives to meet programmatic needs and to add residential space to
existing facilities by remodeling existing residential space and
converting existing program space to residential space for additional
beds.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,000,000))
$1,275,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,000,000))
$1,275,000

Sec. 2004 2007 c 520 s 2042 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Public Health Laboratory Addition (08-2-003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,184,000))
$2,012,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,984,000))
$8,156,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,168,000

Sec. 2005 2007 c 520 s 2045 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Drinking Water Assistance Program (06-4-001)

Reappropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,588,000
Appropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . (($54,300,000))
$66,474,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,086,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $99,360,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($179,334,000))
$191,508,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2006 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
Walla Walla Nursing Facility (08-2-008)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $125,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,850,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,975,000

Sec. 2007 2007 c 520 s 2054 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Coyote Ridge Corrections Center: Design and Construct Medium
Security Facility (98-2-011)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($155,459,000))
$143,039,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,449,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($244,608,000))
$232,188,000

Sec. 2008 2007 c 520 s 2056 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington State Penitentiary: North Close Security Compound
(04-2-005)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,482,000))
$23,489,000

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $763,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $130,276,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($140,758,000))
$154,528,000

Sec. 2009 2007 c 520 s 2058 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Clallam Bay Corrections Center: Replace Support Building Roof
(06-1-044)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,930,000))
$3,580,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $822,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,752,000))
$4,402,000

Sec. 2010 2007 c 520 s 2075 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington State Penitentiary: Replace Correctional Industry Roof
(06-1-023)

Reappropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,619,000))
$856,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,338,000))
$1,101,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,957,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $494,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,451,000))
$2,451,000

(End of part)

PART 3
NATURAL RESOURCES
Sec. 3001 2007 c 520 s 3001 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Supply Facilities (74-2-006)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $300,000 of funds redirected from
completed or cancelled projects is provided solely for capital expenses
associated with a groundwater study of the upper Kittitas.
Reappropriation:
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities)--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,756,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,543,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,299,000

Sec. 3002 2007 c 520 s 3019 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
State Drought Preparedness (05-4-009)

Reappropriation:
State Drought Preparedness--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,464,000))
$1,287,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,865,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,329,000))
$7,152,000

Sec. 3003 2007 c 520 s 3036 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Centennial Clean Water Program (08-4-010)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Up to $10,000,000 of the state building construction account--state appropriation is for the extended grant payment to Spokane for
the Spokane-Rathdrum Prairie aquifer.
(2) $5,000,000 of the state building construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely for water quality grants for hardship
communities with a population of less than 5,000. The department shall
give priority consideration to: (a) Communities subject to a
regulatory order from the department of ecology for noncompliance with
water quality rules; (b) projects for which design work has been
completed; and (c) projects with a local match from reasonable water
quality rates and charges.
(3) $2,000,000 of the state building construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the Adams and Lincoln counties
ground water mapping project. The project shall submit a report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature describing the dynamic
relationship between groundwater and surface water in the region. The
report shall be submitted by January 1, 2009.
(4) $2,100,000 of the state toxics control account appropriation is
provided solely for wastewater and clean water improvement projects at
Illahee state park, Fort Flagler state park, and Larrabee state park.
(5)(a) $18,505,000 of the state building construction account--state appropriation is provided solely for the following projects:

Project Amount
City of Carnation waste water treatment system $3,000,000
Mansfield waste water treatment upgrade $960,000
Rock Island waste water treatment system $870,000
Enumclaw waste water treatment system $750,000
Snohomish waste water treatment system $4,925,000
Freeland sewer district $1,000,000
Clark county regional sewer cooperative $4,000,000
Town of Warden waste water $3,000,000

(b) The appropriation for entities that are listed in (a) of this
subsection shall not affect the entities' eligibility for centennial
fund hardship assistance and shall be excluded from any financial
hardship calculation that would have the effect of reducing other
moneys for which the entity is currently contracted and eligible under
WAC 173-95A-030(8), as it existed on the effective date of this
section.
(c) The appropriation to the city of Carnation is for payment to
King county for the county connection charge and other eligible costs.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($49,225,000))
$37,621,000
Water Quality Capital Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,550,000))
$5,417,000
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,100,000))
$15,837,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,875,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $178,400,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $237,275,000

Sec. 3004 2007 c 520 s 3037 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Cleanup Toxic Sites in Puget Sound (08-4-005)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is provided solely for the clean
up of contaminated sites that lie adjacent to and are within one-half
mile of Puget Sound. Clean ups shall include orphan and abandoned
sites that pose a threat to Puget Sound with the highest priority sites
being cleaned up first. The department shall provide the Puget Sound
partnership, as created by chapter . . . (Engrossed Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5372), Laws of 2007, the opportunity to review and provide
comment on proposed projects and activities recommended for funding.
This review shall be consistent with the funding schedule for the
program.

Appropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,000,000))
$6,767,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,820,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($22,820,000))
$25,587,000

Sec. 3005 2007 c 520 s 3043 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Rebuild East Wall of Ecology Headquarters (08-1-002)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($100,000))
$10,957,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($100,000))
$10,957,000

Sec. 3006 2007 c 520 s 3045 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Reduce Health Risks from Toxic Diesel Pollution (08-4-024)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($4,840,000)) $5,380,000 of the appropriation is provided
solely for school bus diesel retrofits for local school districts.
(2) (($2,330,000)) $4,830,000 of the appropriation is provided
solely for emission reduction projects for local governments to
retrofit public sector diesel engines to allow public sector fleets to
reduce their emissions.

Appropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,170,000))
$10,210,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,170,000))
$10,210,000

Sec. 3007 2007 c 520 s 3046 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Remedial Action Grants (08-4-008)

Appropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($84,475,000))
$93,875,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $180,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($264,475,000))
$273,875,000

Sec. 3008 2007 c 520 s 3048 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Safe Soils Remediation Grants (08-4-009)

Appropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,000,000))
$4,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,000,000))
$8,500,000

Sec. 3009 2007 c 520 s 3050 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Skykomish Cleanup (08-4-020)

Appropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
Clean Up Settlement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,000,000))
$10,000,000

Sec. 3010 2007 c 520 s 3060 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
Facility Preservation - Facilities (06-1-004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,000,000))
$4,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,419,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,419,000))
$9,119,000

Sec. 3011 2007 c 520 s 3072 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
Puget Sound Wastewater (06-1-851)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,100,000))
$5,814,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,095,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,195,000))
$6,909,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3012 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
Saint Edward State Park: Seminary Building Preservation (08-1-010)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is intended to complete
phase one of the 2007 historic structures report for the civil work
required for adequate drainage of rain and site water. The commission
shall provide a completed cost estimate to the office of financial
management for approval before receiving an allotment for construction.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,200,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,400,000

Sec. 3013 2007 c 520 s 3087 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (08-1-001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,000,000))
$8,800,000
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3014 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
Ocean City Comfort Station--Fire Damage Repair (08-1-043)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $181,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $181,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3015 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
Fort Flagler: Parkwide Sewage Treatment System (08-1-044)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,773,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,773,000

Sec. 3016 2007 c 520 s 3102 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION
Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (00-2-001)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $166,000
Salmon Recovery Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,175,000))
$575,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,341,000))
$741,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,284,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($101,625,000))
$101,025,000

Sec. 3017 2007 c 520 s 3155 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Practice Incentive Payment Loan Program (08-4-004)

Appropriation:
Conservation Assistance Revolving Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,000,000))
$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,000,000))
$3,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3018 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Livestock Nutrient Program (08-4-001)

Appropriation:
Water Quality Capital Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Sec. 3019 2007 c 520 s 3179 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Statewide Fencing Renovation and Replacement (08-1-009)

The appropriation is this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the
replacement of elk fencing lost in the 2005 school fire in the Wooten
wildlife area. The department shall contract with another state agency
to construct the fence.
(2) $331,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the
replacement of a barbed wire fence that was destroyed in the Rockpile
creek fire of July 2007.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,100,000))
$2,431,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,100,000))
$2,431,000

Sec. 3020 2007 c 520 s 3187 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Combined State Agency Aviation Facility (08-1-950)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is provided solely for predesign
and design of a single, consolidated aviation facility at the Olympia
airport to house the fixed wing operations of the Washington state
patrol, the department of natural resources, and the department of fish
and wildlife, and the rotary operations of the department of natural
resources.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,000))
$101,000
Wildlife Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($23,000))
$113,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,608,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,631,000))
$1,721,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3021 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Okanogan-Similkameen Land Acquisition (08-2-023)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Sec. 3022 2007 c 520 s 3211 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Combined State Agency Aviation Facility (08-1-952)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is provided solely for predesign
and design of a single, consolidated aviation facility at the Olympia
airport to house the fixed wing operations of the Washington state
patrol, the department of natural resources, and the department of fish
and wildlife, and the rotary operations of the department of natural
resources.

Appropriation:
Forest Development Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000
Resource Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($23,000))
$555,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($54,000))
$586,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,783,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,837,000))
$4,369,000

(End of part)

PART 4
TRANSPORTATION
Sec. 4001 2007 c 520 s 4004 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
Combined State Agency Aviation Facility (08-2-951)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is provided solely for predesign
and design of a single, consolidated aviation facility at the Olympia
airport to house the fixed wing operations of the Washington state
patrol, the department of natural resources, and the department of fish
and wildlife, and the rotary operations of the department of natural
resources.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,000))
$376,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $813,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($825,000))
$1,189,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4002 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
Seattle Crime Lab Expansion (09-2-102)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,439,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,439,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4003 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
Culvert Replacements (08-1-001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,350,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,350,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4004 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
Centralia-Chehalis Flood Control (08-1-002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is provided solely for the
department to provide flood protection for Centralia, Chehalis, and
Interstate 5 by representing the state as the nonfederal sponsor of the
United States army corps of engineers flood control project authorized
for this area. The department will prepare the necessary agreements to
ensure an active partnership with the county, the cities, the army
corps of engineers, and others as needed.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000

(End of part)

PART 5
EDUCATION
Sec. 5001 2007 c 520 s 5008 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
School Construction Assistance Grants (08-4-200)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) For state assistance grants for purposes of calculating square
foot eligibility, kindergarten student headcount shall not be reduced
by fifty percent.
(2) The legislature has made a commitment to phase in all-day
kindergarten programs beginning with the 2007-08 school year. However,
the legislature finds that one potential barrier to successful
expansion of all-day kindergarten programs may be a lack of facilities
that meet the requirements of an all-day kindergarten program. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation
with the school facilities citizen advisory panel, shall examine
alternatives for addressing school facilities needs for all-day
kindergarten programs, including adapting existing unused space,
creating innovative public-private partnerships and partnerships with
early learning providers, shifting the location of current programs
within a district or a school, and temporary, limited use of portables.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall submit a
report to the capital budget committee of the house of representatives
and the ways and means committee of the senate by September 1, 2007,
with recommendations on preferred alternatives and an analysis of the
feasibility and cost of implementing the alternatives.

Appropriation:
((State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $109,521,000))
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($770,658,000))
$736,222,000
Common School Reimbursable Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $180,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($880,359,000))
$736,402,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,500,725,000))
$3,495,689,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,381,084,000))
$4,232,091,000

Sec. 5002 2007 c 520 s 5010 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
Vocational Skills Centers (08-4-300)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $9,362,000 from this appropriation is provided solely for minor
capital projects at all of the state's skills centers ranked with a
"severity score" of 40 points or more.
(2) $24,400,000 from this appropriation is provided solely for the
design and construction of the Skagit Valley vocational skills center.
(3) $16,366,000 from this appropriation is provided solely for the
design and construction of the Yakima Valley technical skills center.
(4) $23,161,000 from this appropriation is provided solely for the
design and construction of the Sno-Isle skills center.
(5) $1,118,000 from this appropriation is provided solely for the
design and construction of the Clark county skills center.
(6) $300,000 from this appropriation is provided solely for the
completion of the new market skills center project and to address storm
water issues.
(7) $927,000 from this appropriation is provided solely for the
predesign and design of the Grant County Moses Lake school district
skills center.
(8) $550,000 from this appropriation is provided solely for the
predesign and design of the northeast vocational area cooperative
skills center co-located with the Lake Washington technical college.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($74,707,000))
$76,184,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $83,984,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($158,691,000))
$160,168,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5003 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
Aviation High School (08-1-002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for the design costs for a new facility at Aviation
high school, to include space that would be colocated at the museum of
flight on east marginal way.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5004 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
Greenbridge Early Learning Center (08-1-003)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for the Puget Sound education district for building the
center for the thrive-by-five program.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5005 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Campus Safety (08-2-008)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $4,500,000 of the appropriation is provided solely to connect
and set up communications over the campus fiber optic network and to
the University of Washington police department dispatch center.
(2) $195,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for an outdoor
public alert system on the main campus.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,695,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,695,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5006 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Tacoma - Land Acquisition (09-2-003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5007 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Campus Safety (08-1-002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,021,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for alarm
upgrades that allow students and staff to hear warnings in the event of
an emergency by adding voice capability to the existing alarm system on
the Pullman campus.
(2) $200,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for outdoor
public alert systems on branch campuses.
(3) $579,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the
installation of key-card access control technology on the doors of key
classroom and research facilities on the Pullman campus.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5008 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Campus Safety (08-1-008)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
the installation of security cameras and monitors to allow first
responders a real-time view inside a classroom or building in the event
of an emergency.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $306,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $306,000

Sec. 5009 2007 c 520 s 5086 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Dean Hall Renovation (06-1-004)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $1,300,000 of the appropriation is
provided solely for furnishings and equipment.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $924,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($23,200,000))
$24,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,276,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($25,400,000))
$26,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5010 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Campus Safety (08-2-008)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
infrastructure upgrades to the university's campus and equipment for
first responders.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $225,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $225,000

Sec. 5011 2007 c 520 s 5100 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Daniel J. Evans Building - Modernization (04-2-006)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $1,983,000 of the appropriation is
provided solely to finish renovation of the library building by
addressing issues of the aging infrastructure (mechanical, electrical,
life safety, circulation, energy efficiency, security, building
efficiency, etc.), while incorporating programmatic needs of the
institution.

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,250,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,983,000
Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($44,750,000))
$46,733,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5012 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Campus Safety (08-2-001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $150,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the
preparation of detailed campus maps of the facilities for use by campus
police and other first-responders in the event of an emergency. The
campus mapping project must be administered by the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs.
(2) $50,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for updating
the campus alarm systems.
(3) $250,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for
infrastructure upgrades to allow for the centralized lock-down of
individual buildings or classrooms in the event of an emergency.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,000
Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,000

Sec. 5013 2007 c 520 s 5128 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY
Pacific - Lewis and Clark Station Camp Park Project (02-S-001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $1,935,000 of the appropriation is
provided solely to redesign the highway alignment of state route 101
that bisects the new park.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $666,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,935,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,885,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,551,000))
$4,486,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5014 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY
Olympia - State Capitol Museum: Building Preservation (08-1-002)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $207,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $207,000

Sec. 5015 2007 c 520 s 5255 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Minor Works - Preservation - Repairs and Minor Improvements
(08-1-001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $1,663,000 of the appropriation is
provided solely for emergency repairs to the L building at Bellevue
Community College. Repairs include water leaks, mold, and other
related damage.

Appropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,663,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,663,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($86,000,000))
$87,663,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5016 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Yakima Valley Community College - Skills Center (08-2-852)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5017 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Campus Safety (08-2-001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,746,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the
preparation of detailed campus maps of each community and technical
college's facilities for use by first-responders in the event of an
emergency. The facilities mapping project must be administered by the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs.
(2) $2,200,000 of the appropriation is provided solely to ensure
that each floor of each community and technical college facility has
up-to-date sirens or voice-capable alarms.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,946,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,946,000

(End of part)

PART 6
MISCELLANEOUS AND SUPPLEMENTAL PROVISIONS
Sec. 6001 2007 c 520 s 6013 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
ACQUISITION OF PROPERTIES AND FACILITIES THROUGH FINANCIAL CONTRACTS.
The following agencies may enter into financial contracts, paid from
any funds of an agency, appropriated or nonappropriated, for the
purposes indicated and in not more than the principal amounts
indicated, plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW. When securing properties under this section,
agencies shall use the most economical financial contract option
available, including long-term leases, lease-purchase agreements,
lease-development with option to purchase agreements or financial
contracts using certificates of participation. Expenditures made by an
agency for one of the indicated purposes before the issue date of the
authorized financial contract and any certificates of participation
therein are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of the financial
contract and any certificates of participation therein to the extent
provided in the agency's financing plan approved by the state finance
committee.
State agencies may enter into agreements with the department of
general administration and the state treasurer's office to develop
requests to the legislature for acquisition of properties and
facilities through financial contracts. The agreements may include
charges for services rendered.
Those noninstructional facilities of higher education institutions
authorized in this section to enter into financial contracts are not
eligible for state funded maintenance and operations. Instructional
space that is available for regularly scheduled classes for academic
transfer, basic skills, and workforce training programs may be eligible
for state funded maintenance and operations.
(1) Washington state patrol: Enter into a financing contract for
up to $1,360,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant
to chapter 39.94 RCW to replace the dormitory facility at the
Washington state patrol fire training academy in North Bend,
Washington.
(2) Department of general administration: Enter into a financing
contract for up to $685,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for the preservation of the
transportation building.
(3) Department of corrections: Enter into a financing contract for
up to $17,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to provide additional work release beds.
(4) Parks and recreation commission: Enter into a financing
contract in an amount not to exceed $2,000,000 plus financing expenses
and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to develop Cama
Beach state park.
(5) Community and technical colleges:
(a) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Green River
Community College for up to $20,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase Kent
Station phase 2.
(b) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Tacoma Community
College for up to $3,600,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct an early childhood
education and learning center.
(c) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Walla Walla
Community College for up to $1,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase up to 40
acres of land.
(d) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Columbia Basin
College for up to $300,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to develop an academic support
and achievement center.
(e) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Wenatchee Valley
College for up to $3,347,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to develop a 72 bed student
housing facility.
(f) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of North Seattle
Community College for up to $23,579,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to develop an
employment resource center.
(g) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Seattle Central
Community College for up to $3,100,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase property
adjacent the main campus.
(6) Evergreen State College: Enter into a financing contract for
up to $16,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for the college activities building
renovation.
(7) Washington state convention and trade center: Enter into a
financing contract for up to $58,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase and
renovate the museum condominium unit located adjacent to the state
convention center. The purchase price shall not exceed fair market
value. A purchase agreement with the owner of the unit on the
effective date of this section shall include the following
requirements: (a) Upon completion of the purchase of the property, the
seller shall retain $5,750,000 of the sale proceeds in a restricted
investment account, reserving such funds for capital costs associated
with development of its principal heritage center to be located within
the city of Seattle. Principal and accrued earnings in such an account
shall be available for expenditure by the seller when the seller or the
city of Seattle has executed a construction contract for either a new
facility or improvements to an existing structure to serve as the
principal heritage center to be operated by the seller within the city;
and (b) in the event that the conditions of (a) of this subsection are
not met by June 30, 2017, the entire amount in the restricted account
shall be transferred to the state general fund and shall represent a
recovery of the state's contribution towards the development of the
museum. In the event of such a transfer, the rightful ownership of the
property by the Washington state convention and trade center shall not
be impaired.
(8) Department of information services: Enter into a financing
contract for an amount approved by the office of financial management
for costs and financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW to lease develop or lease purchase a state general
office building and facilities for the department of information
services on the state-owned property called "the Wheeler block" in
Olympia. The office buildings shall be constructed and financed so
that agencies occupancy costs per gross square foot or per employee
will not exceed 110 percent of comparable private market rental rates
per gross square foot or per employee. The comparable general office
space rate shall be calculated based on recent Thurston county leases
of new space of at least 100,000 rentable square feet adjusted for
known escalation clauses, expected inflation, and differences in the
level of service provided by the comparable leases as determined by the
department in consultation with the department of general
administration. In addition to the department of information services,
state agency tenants shall include the consolidation of state patrol
offices and general office facilities for small agencies and offices.
The department of information services shall design and operate the
general office facilities for small agencies and offices as a
demonstration of the efficiencies gained from the integration of office
space and telecommunications and computer technology. The
demonstration project shall provide office space, furniture,
telecommunications, and computer technology as a single package. The
facility shall be designed so that small agencies and offices can move
in and out of the facility without the typical moving expenses that
result from individual agency ownership of furniture and technology.
The facility for small agencies and offices shall also provide for
staffing and space efficiencies resulting from central reception,
support services, and spaces. The office of financial management shall
certify to the state treasurer: (a) The project description and dollar
amount; and (b) that all requirements of this subsection (8) have been
met. Should the department of information services choose to use a
financing contract that does not provide for the issuance of
certificates of participation, the financing contract shall be subject
to approval by the state finance committee as required by RCW
39.94.010. In approving a financing contract not providing for the use
of certificates of participation, the state finance committee should be
reasonably certain that the contract is excluded from the computation
of indebtedness, particularly that the contract is not backed by the
full faith and credit of the state and the legislature is expressly not
obligated to appropriate funds to make payments. For purposes of this
section, "financing contract" includes but is not limited to a
certificate of participation and tax exempt financing similar to that
authorized in RCW 47.79.140.
(9) Office of the secretary of state: Enter into a financing
contract for up to $112,942,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct the heritage
center. The heritage center is one part of a combined facility of the
heritage center and executive office building, authorized in subsection
(10) of this section. The authorization for financing under this
subsection (9) shall lapse unless chapter ... (Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5882, providing funding for the heritage building project), Laws of
2007 is enacted by June 30, 2007.
(10) Department of general administration: Enter into a financing
contract for up to $75,863,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct the executive
office building. The executive office building is one part of a
combined facility of the executive office building and the heritage
center authorized in subsection (9) of this section. The authorization
for financing under this subsection (10) shall lapse unless chapter ...
(Substitute Senate Bill No. 5882, providing funding for the heritage
building project), Laws of 2007 is enacted by June 30, 2007.

Sec. 6002 2007 c 520 s 6032 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER--TRANSFERS
Education Construction Account: For transfer to
the Common School Construction, an amount
not to exceed . . . . . . . . . . . . $138,200,000

Education Savings Account: For transfer to the
Common School Construction Account, an
amount not to exceed . . . . . . . . . . . . (($43,400,000))
$80,443,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6003 Part headings in this act are not any
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6004 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6005 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

(End of Part)

INDEX PAGE #

CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 40
COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM . . . . . . . . . . . . 43
DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 21
DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY . . . . . . . . . . . . 23
DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE . . . . . . . . . . . . 31
DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 15
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH . . . . . . . . . . . . 20
DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 17
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES . . . . . . . . . . . . 32
DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL . . . . . . . . . . . . 15
DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 19
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 34
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 21
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 40
INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 29
OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 14
STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 30
STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 27
STATE TREASURER--TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 49
SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 36
THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE . . . . . . . . . . . . 41
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON . . . . . . . . . . . . 38
WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY . . . . . . . . . . . . 42
WASHINGTON STATE PATROL . . . . . . . . . . . . 34
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 39
--- END ---