BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.99T.020 and 2007 c 521 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The proceeds from the sale of the bonds authorized in RCW
43.99T.010 shall be deposited in the state building construction
account created by RCW 43.83.020. The proceeds shall be transferred as
follows:
(1) One billion six hundred ((ninety-three)) fifty-three million
dollars to remain in the state building construction account created by
RCW 43.83.020;
(2) Thirty-six million dollars to the outdoor recreation account
created by RCW 79A.25.060;
(3) Thirty-six million dollars to the habitat conservation account
created by RCW 79A.15.020;
(4) Nineteen million dollars to the riparian protection account
created by RCW 79A.15.120;
(5) Nine million dollars to the farmlands preservation account
created by RCW 79A.15.130;
(6) One hundred ((forty)) eighty million dollars to the state
taxable building construction account. All receipts from taxable bond
issues are to be deposited into the account. If the state finance
committee deems it necessary to issue more than the amount specified in
this subsection (6) as taxable bonds in order to comply with federal
internal revenue service rules and regulations pertaining to the use of
nontaxable bond proceeds, the proceeds of such additional taxable bonds
shall be transferred to the state taxable building construction account
in lieu of any transfer otherwise provided by this section. The state
treasurer shall submit written notice to the director of financial
management if it is determined that any such additional transfer to the
state taxable building construction account is necessary. Moneys in
the account may be spent only after appropriation.
These proceeds shall be used exclusively for the purposes specified
in this section and for the payment of expenses incurred in the
issuance and sale of the bonds issued for the purposes of this section,
and shall be administered by the office of financial management subject
to legislative appropriation.

--- END ---