BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.32.470 and 2007 c 442 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A personal use saltwater, freshwater, combination, temporary,
or family fishing weekend license is required for all persons fifteen
years of age or older to fish for or possess fish taken for personal
use from state waters or offshore waters.
(2) The fees for annual personal use saltwater, freshwater, or
combination licenses are as follows:
(a) A combination license allows the holder to fish for or possess
fish, shellfish, and seaweed from state waters or offshore waters. The
fee for this license is thirty-six dollars for residents, seventy-two
dollars for nonresidents, and five dollars for youth. There is an
additional fifty-cent surcharge for this license, to be deposited in
the rockfish research account created (([in])) in RCW 77.12.702.
(b) A saltwater license allows the holder to fish for or possess
fish taken from saltwater areas. The fee for this license is eighteen
dollars for residents, thirty-six dollars for nonresidents, and five
dollars for resident seniors. There is an additional fifty-cent
surcharge for this license, to be deposited in the rockfish research
account created (([in])) in RCW 77.12.702.
(c) A freshwater license allows the holder to fish for, take, or
possess food fish or game fish species in all freshwater areas. The
fee for this license is twenty dollars for residents, forty dollars for
nonresidents, and five dollars for resident seniors.
(3)(a) A temporary combination fishing license is valid for one to
five consecutive days and allows the holder to fish for or possess
fish, shellfish, and seaweed taken from state waters or offshore
waters. The fee for this temporary fishing license is:
(i) One day - Seven dollars for residents and fourteen dollars for
nonresidents;
(ii) Two days - Ten dollars for residents and twenty dollars for
nonresidents;
(iii) Three days - Thirteen dollars for residents and twenty-six
dollars for nonresidents;
(iv) Four days - Fifteen dollars for residents and thirty dollars
for nonresidents; and
(v) Five days - Seventeen dollars for residents and thirty-four
dollars for nonresidents.
(b) The fee for a charter stamp is seven dollars for a one-day
temporary combination fishing license for residents and nonresidents
for use on a charter boat as defined in RCW 77.65.150.
(c) A transaction fee to support the automated licensing system
will be taken from the amounts set forth in this subsection for
temporary licenses.
(d) Except for active duty military personnel serving in any branch
of the United States armed forces, the temporary combination fishing
license is not valid on game fish species for an eight-consecutive-day
period beginning on the opening day of the lowland lake fishing season.
(e) The temporary combination fishing license fee for active duty
military personnel serving in any branch of the United States armed
forces is the resident rate as set forth in (a) of this subsection.
Active duty military personnel must provide a valid military
identification card at the time of purchase of the temporary license to
qualify for the resident rate.
(f) There is an additional fifty-cent surcharge on the temporary
combination fishing license and the associated charter stamp, to be
deposited in the rockfish research account created in RCW 77.12.702.
(4) A family fishing weekend license allows for a maximum of six
anglers: One resident and five youth; two residents and four youth; or
one resident, one nonresident, and four youth. This license allows the
holders to fish for or possess fish taken from state waters or offshore
waters. The fee for this license is twenty dollars. This license is
only valid during periods as specified by rule of the department.
(5) The commission may adopt rules to create and sell combination
licenses for all hunting and fishing activities at or below a fee equal
to the total cost of the individual license contained within any
combination.

--- END ---