BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A majority of students in Washington do not
have the opportunity to study any language other than English until
they are in middle school, or more often, in high school. Educational
systems of other nations, some of which are much less economically
developed than the United States, begin second language study in the
early elementary grades. Washington's economy is tied to world
marketplace. In order to develop a greater sense of the world's
culture and geography, ways for students at all levels to be provided
the opportunity to develop fluency in a second language should be
explored.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A task force is created to conduct an
inventory of world language programs, curricula, supplementary
materials, and professional development initiatives currently used in
Washington. The task force shall make recommendations to establish the
system to support Washington students to learn a world language. At a
minimum, the task force shall identify strategies to address the
following three critical needs:
(a) Creating a supply of qualified language teachers;
(b) Increasing the number and quality of school programs; and
(c) Developing appropriate curriculum, materials, and assessments,
including technology-based delivery systems.
(2) Members of the task force shall include representatives from
the office of the superintendent of public instruction, professional
educator standards board, higher education, the Washington state school
directors' association, the Washington education association, the
association of Washington school principals, and world language
nonprofit organizations.
(3) The task force shall report its findings to appropriate
committees of the legislature by January 1, 2010.

--- END ---