BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The state of Washington promotes improving
medical services to persons with developmental disabilities. Subject
to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose,
medical students and faculty at the University of Washington and the
Pacific Northwest University of Health Sciences, nursing students and
faculty at schools of nursing within the state of Washington, and
special and technical care students and faculty at technical schools
within the state of Washington may apply for incentive grants to
support research and training projects focused upon improvement of
services to persons with developmental disabilities. The grant program
shall be administered by the department of social and health services.
By December 1, 2008, the department shall report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature. The report shall include information
regarding incentive grants awarded under this section, as well as any
other efforts or progress in expanding or improving training for
students in treating individuals with developmental disabilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If specific funding for the purposes of
section 1 of this act, referencing section 1 of this act by bill or
chapter number and section number, is not provided by June 30, 2008, in
the omnibus appropriations act, section 1 of this act is null and void.

--- END ---