BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 31.04.025 and 2001 c 81 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each loan made to a resident of this state by a licensee is subject
to the authority and restrictions of this chapter, unless such loan is
made under the authority of ((another license issued pursuant to a law
of this state or under other authority of a law of this state)) chapter
63.14 RCW. This chapter shall not apply to any person doing business
under and as permitted by any law of this state or of the United States
relating to banks, savings banks, trust companies, savings and loan or
building and loan associations, or credit unions, nor to any
pawnbroking business lawfully transacted under and as permitted by any
law of this state regulating pawnbrokers, nor to any loan of credit
made pursuant to a credit card plan.

Sec. 2 RCW 31.04.035 and 1991 c 208 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
No person may engage in the business of making secured or unsecured
loans of money, credit, or things in action ((at interest rates
authorized by this chapter)) without first obtaining and maintaining a
license in accordance with this chapter.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.146.010 and 2006 c 19 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Affiliate" means any person who directly or indirectly through
one or more intermediaries, controls, or is controlled by, or is under
common control with another person.
(2) "Application" means the same as in Regulation X, Real Estate
Settlement Procedures, 24 C.F.R. Sec. 3500.
(3) "Borrower" means any person who consults with or retains a
mortgage broker or loan originator in an effort to obtain or seek
advice or information on obtaining or applying to obtain a residential
mortgage loan for himself, herself, or persons including himself or
herself, regardless of whether the person actually obtains such a loan.
(4) "Computer loan information systems" or "CLI system" means a
real estate mortgage financing information system that facilitates the
provision of information to consumers by a mortgage broker, loan
originator, lender, real estate agent, or other person regarding
interest rates and other loan terms available from different lenders.
(5) "Department" means the department of financial institutions.
(6) "Designated broker" means a natural person designated as the
person responsible for activities of the licensed mortgage broker in
conducting the business of a mortgage broker under this chapter and who
meets the experience and examination requirements set forth in RCW
19.146.210(1)(e).
(7) "Director" means the director of financial institutions.
(8) "Employee" means an individual who has an employment
relationship with a mortgage broker, and the individual is treated as
an employee by the mortgage broker for purposes of compliance with
federal income tax laws.
(9) "Independent contractor" or "person who independently
contracts" means any person that expressly or impliedly contracts to
perform mortgage brokering services for another and that with respect
to its manner or means of performing the services is not subject to the
other's right of control, and that is not treated as an employee by the
other for purposes of compliance with federal income tax laws.
(10) "Loan originator" means a natural person who (a) takes a
residential mortgage loan application for a mortgage broker, or (b)
offers or negotiates terms of a mortgage loan, for direct or indirect
compensation or gain, or in the expectation of direct or indirect
compensation or gain. "Loan originator" also includes a person who
holds themselves out to the public as able to perform any of these
activities. "Loan originator" does not mean persons performing purely
administrative or clerical tasks for a mortgage broker. For the
purposes of this subsection, "administrative or clerical tasks" means
the receipt, collection, and distribution of information common for the
processing of a loan in the mortgage industry and communication with a
borrower to obtain information necessary for the processing of a loan.
A person who holds himself or herself out to the public as able to
obtain a loan is not performing administrative or clerical tasks.
(11) "Lock-in agreement" means an agreement with a borrower made by
a mortgage broker or loan originator, in which the mortgage broker or
loan originator agrees that, for a period of time, a specific interest
rate or other financing terms will be the rate or terms at which it
will make a loan available to that borrower.
(12) "Mortgage broker" means any person who for compensation or
gain, or in the expectation of compensation or gain (a) ((makes a
residential mortgage loan or)) assists a person in obtaining or
applying to obtain a residential mortgage loan or (b) holds himself or
herself out as being able to ((make a residential mortgage loan or))
assist a person in obtaining or applying to obtain a residential
mortgage loan.
(13) "Person" means a natural person, corporation, company, limited
liability corporation, partnership, or association.
(14) "Principal" means any person who controls, directly or
indirectly through one or more intermediaries, or alone or in concert
with others, a ten percent or greater interest in a partnership,
company, association, or corporation, and the owner of a sole
proprietorship.
(15) "Residential mortgage loan" means any loan primarily for
personal, family, or household use secured by a mortgage or deed of
trust on residential real estate upon which is constructed or intended
to be constructed a single family dwelling or multiple family dwelling
of four or less units.
(16) "Third-party provider" means any person other than a mortgage
broker or lender who provides goods or services to the mortgage broker
in connection with the preparation of the borrower's loan and includes,
but is not limited to, credit reporting agencies, title companies,
appraisers, structural and pest inspectors, or escrow companies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 RCW 31.04.005 (Finding -- Purpose) and 1991 c
208 s 1 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---