BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.58.185 and 2005 c 34 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((In the case of an appeal involving)) A panel of three board
members, at least one and not more than two of whom shall be members of
the pollution control hearings board, may hear and decide petitions for
review involving any of the following:
(a) A single-family residence or appurtenance to a single-family
residence, including a dock or pier designed to serve a single-family
residence((, or of appeals involving));
(b) A joint use dock or pier designed to serve multiple single-family residences. For the purposes of this subsection, a joint use
dock or pier does not include a marina or any commercial facility;
(c) A penalty of fifteen thousand dollars or less((, the request
for review may be heard by a panel of three board members, at least one
and not more than two of whom shall be members of the pollution control
hearings board)).
(2) Two members of the three must agree to issue a final decision
of the board.
(((2))) (3) The board shall define by rule alternative processes to
expedite appeals, including those ((involving a single-family residence
or appurtenance to a single-family residence, including a dock or pier
designed to serve a single-family residence, or involving a penalty of
fifteen thousand dollars or less)) heard by three-member panels. These
alternatives may include: Mediation, upon agreement of all parties;
submission of testimony by affidavit; or other forms that may lead to
less formal and faster resolution of appeals.

--- END ---