BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.14.370 and 2007 c 478 s 1 and 2007 c 250 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) The legislative authority of a rural county may impose a
sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The
tax is in addition to other taxes authorized by law and shall be
collected from those persons who are taxable by the state under
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event
within the county. The rate of tax shall ((not exceed 0.09 percent
of)) be applied to the selling price in the case of a sales tax or
value of the article used in the case of a use tax and may not exceed
the rates in (b) of this subsection, except that for rural counties
with population densities between sixty and one hundred persons per
square mile, the rate shall not exceed 0.04 percent before January 1,
2000.
(b)(i) For a rural county with a total population of twenty-five
thousand persons or more, the rate of tax may not exceed 0.09 percent;
(ii) For a rural county with a total population between fifteen
thousand and twenty-four thousand nine hundred ninety-nine persons, the
rate of tax may not exceed 0.11 percent;
(iii) For a rural county with a total population between ten
thousand and fourteen thousand nine hundred ninety-nine persons, the
rate of tax may not exceed 0.25 percent; and
(iv) For a rural county with a total population under ten thousand
persons, the rate of tax may not exceed 0.65 percent.
(c) For purposes of this subsection (1), county total population is
determined by RCW 36.13.100.
(2) The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section shall be
deducted from the amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or
paid over to the department of revenue under chapter 82.08 or 82.12
RCW. The department of revenue shall perform the collection of such
taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the county.
(3)(a) Moneys collected under this section shall only be used to
finance public facilities serving economic development purposes in
rural counties and finance personnel in economic development offices.
The public facility must be listed as an item in the officially adopted
county overall economic development plan, or the economic development
section of the county's comprehensive plan, or the comprehensive plan
of a city or town located within the county for those counties planning
under RCW 36.70A.040. For those counties that do not have an adopted
overall economic development plan and do not plan under the growth
management act, the public facility must be listed in the county's
capital facilities plan or the capital facilities plan of a city or
town located within the county.
(b) In implementing this section, the county shall consult with
cities, towns, and port districts located within the county and the
associate development organization serving the county to ensure that
the expenditure meets the goals of chapter 130, Laws of 2004 and the
requirements of (a) of this subsection. Each county collecting money
under this section shall report, as follows, to the office of the state
auditor, within one hundred fifty days after the close of each fiscal
year: (i) A list of new projects begun during the fiscal year, showing
that the county has used the funds for those projects consistent with
the goals of chapter 130, Laws of 2004 and the requirements of (a) of
this subsection; and (ii) expenditures during the fiscal year on
projects begun in a previous year. Any projects financed prior to June
10, 2004, from the proceeds of obligations to which the tax imposed
under subsection (1) of this section has been pledged shall not be
deemed to be new projects under this subsection. No new projects
funded with money collected under this section may be for justice
system facilities.
(c) The definitions in this section apply throughout this section.
(i) "Public facilities" means bridges, roads, domestic and
industrial water facilities, sanitary sewer facilities, earth
stabilization, storm sewer facilities, railroad, electricity, natural
gas, buildings, structures, telecommunications infrastructure,
transportation infrastructure, or commercial infrastructure, and port
facilities in the state of Washington.
(ii) "Economic development purposes" means those purposes which
facilitate the creation or retention of businesses and jobs in a
county.
(iii) "Economic development office" means an office of a county,
port districts, or an associate development organization as defined in
RCW 43.330.010, which promotes economic development purposes within the
county.
(4) No tax may be collected under this section before July 1, 1998.
No tax may be collected under this section by a county more than
((twenty-five)) thirty-five years after the date that a tax is first
imposed under this section.
(5) For purposes of this section, "rural county" means a county
with a population density of less than one hundred persons per square
mile or a county smaller than two hundred twenty-five square miles as
determined by the office of financial management and published each
year by the department for the period July 1st to June 30th.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect August 1, 2008.

--- END ---