BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The intent of this act is to provide
assistance to low-income homeowners with the burden of property taxes.
Property taxes can be a barrier to homeownership, especially to the
low-income segment of our society. This act will help these
individuals enter into homeownership.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The definitions in RCW 84.36.383 apply to this section.
(2) A person may receive state assistance in the form of a payment
that is based on the amount of excess and regular real property taxes
levied for collection in 2008, in accordance with the following:
(a) The property taxes must have been imposed upon a residence that
was occupied by the person claiming the assistance as a principal place
of residence as of January 1, 2008.
(b) The person claiming the assistance must have owned, at the time
of filing, in fee, as a life estate, or by contract purchase, the
residence on which the property taxes have been imposed or if the
person claiming the assistance lives in a cooperative housing
association, corporation, or partnership, such person must own a share
representing the unit or portion of the structure in which he or she
resides. For purposes of this subsection, a residence owned by a
marital community or owned by cotenants shall be deemed to be owned by
each spouse or cotenant, and any lease for life shall be deemed a life
estate.
(c) The person must have a combined disposable income, as defined
in RCW 84.36.383, which is less than the statewide median income as
calculated for calendar year 2007.
(d) The amount of assistance is equal to ten percent of the amount
of excess and regular real property taxes levied for collection in
2008.
(e) The person claiming the assistance must file a claim with the
department in a form and manner prescribed by the department prior to
September 1, 2008.
(3) If the department determines a claim for assistance is valid,
the department shall pay the claim only from moneys appropriated for
purposes of this section.
(4) A person signing a false claim with the intent to defraud or
obtain a payment in excess of the amount to which the person is
entitled is guilty of the offense of perjury under chapter 9.72 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The sum of one hundred seventy million
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2009, from the general fund to the
department of revenue for the purpose of paying claims under section 2
of this act.

--- END ---