BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.36.111 and 2004 c 271 s 128 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every ballot for a single combination of issues, offices, and
candidates shall be uniform within a precinct and shall identify the
type of primary or election, the county, and the date of the primary or
election, and the ballot or voting device shall contain instructions on
the proper method of recording a vote, including write-in votes. Each
position, together with the names of the candidates for that office,
shall be clearly separated from other offices or positions in the same
jurisdiction. The offices in each jurisdiction shall be clearly
separated from each other. No paper ballot or ballot card may be
marked in any way that would permit the identification of the person
who voted that ballot.
(2) No paper ballot or ballot card may contain any encrypted or
unencrypted bar code or other unique identifying mark, except as
specifically authorized by this subsection. A ballot may contain a
randomly assigned unique identifying mark solely for auditing and vote
reconciliation purposes, or to determine if a particular ballot has
been previously counted. The unique identifying mark shall not be
associated at any time with an individual voter, a voter's address, or
a voter's registration number.

--- END ---