BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes many children in
state care have suffered physical, mental, and emotional abuse and
neglect, resulting in an inability to trust or develop healthy
relationships with others, a condition referred to as reactive
attachment disorder.
It is the intent of this act to create a single county pilot
project that will deliver a comprehensive and integrated approach to
the assessment, diagnosis, and treatment of reactive attachment
disorder. The goal of the pilot project is to develop an intake tool
and evidence-based intervention services to permit early recognition
and treatment of children with reactive attachment disorder served by
the children and family services division of the department of social
and health services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The department shall institute a pilot
program providing the services required by this act. The pilot program
shall be conducted within the confines of Clark county. The contracted
service provider shall be a provider currently providing services to
children served by the department within that county.
For purposes of this act, "department" means the children and
family services division of the department of social and health
services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The department and the provider selected
under the terms of subsection (2) of this section shall meet with
experts in the field of reactive attachment disorder to develop an
intake tool for assessment of reactive attachment disorder in children.
The experts, at a minimum, shall include a representative from the
University of Washington's attachment disorder clinic and the
University of Washington evidence-based institute.
(2) The department shall contract with a provider to implement the
intake tool for screening and assessing reactive attachment disorder in
children who are placed in out-of-home care or otherwise serviced by
the department.
(3) The intake tool shall be developed no later than September 1,
2008.
(4) Once the intake tool is developed, the department shall screen
all children expected to remain in foster care for thirty days or more
and shall work with the contracted provider to implement the screening
tool. During the pilot period, the department shall refer children
under age nine with significant scores on the screening tool to the
provider selected under this section for further assessment and
treatment of reactive attachment disorder.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Additional children may be referred by
the department for screening based upon available resources.
(2) The department and the provider selected under this act shall
meet with experts in the assessment, diagnosis, and treatment of
reactive attachment disorder in developing treatment options that are
evidence-based and have been demonstrated to be effective in treating
reactive attachment disorder. The experts, at a minimum, shall include
the University of Washington's attachment disorder clinic and the
University of Washington evidence-based institute. In addition to the
services in subsection (1) of this section, the provider shall provide
training developed in subsection (2) of this section to enable the
intake tool to be effectively and properly utilized by appropriate
department personnel.
(3) The department shall pay for the screening services provided to
a child under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The department shall contract with the
provider selected in section 3 of this act for the provision of
integrated and evidence-based intervention services for children
diagnosed with reactive attachment disorder.
(2) In addition to services in subsection (1) of this section, the
provider shall provide training identified in section 4 of this act to
enable the intervention services to be effectively and properly
utilized by appropriate department personnel.
(3) The department shall pay for the intervention services provided
to a child under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The joint legislative audit and review
committee shall conduct a study of the pilot program. The study shall
evaluate the effectiveness of the intake tool and treatment service
model provided in the pilot program. The committee shall provide a
report and recommendations to the legislature no later than December 1,
2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The department shall operate the pilot
program required by sections 1 through 5 of this act within the funds
specifically appropriated therefor. If the costs of the pilot exceeds
the appropriation, the department shall adjust the age specified in
section 3(4) of this act to conform with the appropriation and shall
promptly notify the fiscal committees of the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) Sections 1 through 5 of this act expire
June 30, 2010.
(2) Section 6 of this act expires December 1, 2010.

--- END ---