BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.16 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter does not apply to amounts received from the
transportation of grain by a motor-propelled vehicle. For the purposes
of this section, "grain" means all cereal crops except for corn.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2008.

--- END ---