BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
Fifty percent of the test items on the mathematics portion of the
Washington assessment of student learning shall be short answer or
multiple choice questions that measure computation and application of
mathematics formulas that show that the student has the basic
mathematics skills for the appropriate grade level as opposed to
extended response questions.

--- END ---