BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 2007 c 354 s 12 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction and the workforce
training and education coordinating board shall jointly convene and
staff an advisory committee to identify career and technical education
curricula that will assist in preparing students for the state
assessment system and provide the opportunity to obtain a certificate
of academic achievement.
(2) The advisory committee shall consist of the following nine
members:
(a) Four members of the legislature, with two members each
appointed by the respective caucuses of the house of representatives
and the senate;
(b) One representative from the career and technical education
section of the office of the superintendent of public instruction;
(c) One member appointed by the workforce training and education
coordinating board; and
(d) Three members appointed by the superintendent of public
instruction and the workforce training and education coordinating board
based on recommendations from the career and technical education
community.
(3) The advisory committee shall appoint a chair from among the
nonlegislative members.
(4) Legislative members of the advisory committee shall be
reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120.
Nonlegislative members, except those representing an employer or
organization, are entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(5) By January 15, 2008, the advisory committee shall provide an
initial report to the governor and the legislature and, if necessary,
a work plan with additional reporting deadlines((, which shall not
extend beyond December 15, 2008)). By December 2009, the advisory
committee shall report to the governor and the legislature with an
evaluation of the status of the recommendations made in the initial
report and any additional recommendations the advisory committee finds
necessary to accomplish the goals of the initial report.

--- END ---