BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.34 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department may conduct a vulnerable adult fatality review
in the event of a death of a vulnerable adult when the department has
reason to believe that the death of the vulnerable adult may be related
to the abuse, abandonment, exploitation, or neglect of the vulnerable
adult, or may be related to the vulnerable adult's self-neglect, and
the vulnerable adult was:
(a) Receiving home and community-based services in his or her own
home, described under chapters 74.39 and 74.39A RCW within sixty days
preceding his or her death; or
(b) Living in his or her own home and was the subject of a referral
under chapter 74.34 RCW received by the department within twelve months
preceding his or her death.
(2) All files, reports, records, communications, and working papers
used or developed for purposes of a fatality review are confidential
and not subject to disclosure pursuant to RCW 74.34.095.
(3) The department may adopt rules to implement this section.

--- END ---