BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The director shall develop, by rule, a program for the loan of
city costs associated with the appeal of a critical areas ordinance
under chapter 36.70A RCW. The one-time per appeal loan is for cities
with a population under thirty thousand and is limited to an appeal
from a decision of a growth management hearings board to a superior
court. The program is also subject to the following limitations:
(a) The loan amount may not exceed one hundred thousand dollars;
(b) The loan must be repaid within ten years and is subject to an
interest rate of four percent; and
(c) Loan repayment does not begin until the superior court renders
its decision.
(2) The director shall report to the legislature in November 2013
on the use of the loan program. The report must include (a) who uses
the program, (b) the amounts of the loans awarded, (c) the frequency of
the award of attorneys' fees under section 4 of this act, (d) the
sufficiency and distribution of the filing fee, and (e) any other
program information the director considers appropriate.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70A.290 and 1997 c 429 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All requests for review to a growth management hearings board
shall be initiated by filing (a) a petition that includes a detailed
statement of issues presented for resolution by the board, and (b) a
four hundred dollar filing fee. One hundred dollars of the filing fee
is for the operation of the board. Three hundred dollars of the filing
fee is for deposit into the growth management appeals legal assistance
account created under section 3 of this act. The board shall render
written decisions articulating the basis for its holdings. The board
shall not issue advisory opinions on issues not presented to the board
in the statement of issues, as modified by any prehearing order.
(2) Any individual, by reason of financial hardship, may request
the filing fee be waived as set forth in this subsection. The fee may
be waived by the board upon a showing of direct impact by the board's
decision and acceptance by the board of an affidavit regarding
financial hardship.
(3) All petitions relating to whether or not an adopted
comprehensive plan, development regulation, or permanent amendment
thereto, is in compliance with the goals and requirements of this
chapter or chapter 90.58 or 43.21C RCW must be filed within sixty days
after publication by the legislative bodies of the county or city.
(a) Except as provided in (c) of this subsection, the date of
publication for a city shall be the date the city publishes the
ordinance, or summary of the ordinance, adopting the comprehensive plan
or development regulations, or amendment thereto, as is required to be
published.
(b) Promptly after adoption, a county shall publish a notice that
it has adopted the comprehensive plan or development regulations, or
amendment thereto.
Except as provided in (c) of this subsection, for purposes of this
section the date of publication for a county shall be the date the
county publishes the notice that it has adopted the comprehensive plan
or development regulations, or amendment thereto.
(c) For local governments planning under RCW 36.70A.040, promptly
after approval or disapproval of a local government's shoreline master
program or amendment thereto by the department of ecology as provided
in RCW 90.58.090, the local government shall publish a notice that the
shoreline master program or amendment thereto has been approved or
disapproved by the department of ecology. For purposes of this
section, the date of publication for the adoption or amendment of a
shoreline master program is the date the local government publishes
notice that the shoreline master program or amendment thereto has been
approved or disapproved by the department of ecology.
(((3))) (4) Unless the board dismisses the petition as frivolous or
finds that the person filing the petition lacks standing, or the
parties have filed an agreement to have the case heard in superior
court as provided in RCW 36.70A.295, the board shall, within ten days
of receipt of the petition, set a time for hearing the matter.
(((4))) (5) The board shall base its decision on the record
developed by the city, county, or the state and supplemented with
additional evidence if the board determines that such additional
evidence would be necessary or of substantial assistance to the board
in reaching its decision.
(((5))) (6) The board, shall consolidate, when appropriate, all
petitions involving the review of the same comprehensive plan or the
same development regulation or regulations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW
to read as follows:
The growth management appeals legal assistance account is created
in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from the fee
imposed under RCW 36.70A.290 and the repayment of loans under section
1 of this act must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from
the account may be used only for the program under section 1 of this
act. Only the director of community, trade, and economic development
or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account.
The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW,
but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When a court declares that an appeal regarding a critical areas
ordinance is frivolous and the city has followed all the requirements
regarding public notices and meetings necessary for the development of
that ordinance, the city may sue the complainant and receive up to
twice its attorneys' fees.
(2) When a city receives attorneys' fees under subsection (1) of
this section, one-half of the award must be deposited into the growth
management appeals legal assistance account created in section 3 of
this act.

--- END ---