BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act is intended to allow the small
forest landowner office to begin the process of calculating the
compensation that may be offered to a small forest landowner who is
participating in the forest riparian easement program shortly after
receipt of the landowner's application. Timing the compensation
calculation with the receipt of the application, as opposed to
initiating the compensation determination upon the appropriation of
distributable funds, allows the small forest landowner office to both
capture the actual value of the unharvested timber at the time that the
forest practices operation was conducted, and allows the small forest
landowner office to more accurately estimate for the legislature the
budget needs of the forest riparian easement program.
This act is also intended to ensure that family forest landowners,
for whom the forest riparian easement program was initially designed,
are compensated under the program before all other qualifying
landowners.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 To implement the intent of this act:
(1) The small forest landowner office shall, by the end of the
2007-2009 fiscal biennium, use any funding specifically made available
to it for these purposes from the state's capital construction budget
to complete the compensation estimates for forest riparian easement
applications received by the small forest landowner office prior to the
effective date of this section.
(2) The forest practices board shall initiate and complete a rule-making procedure to remove the requirement for the small forest
landowner office to send a landowner a notice of compensation within
sixty days of completion of the requisite timber cruise.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2009.

Sec. 3 RCW 76.13.120 and 2004 c 102 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that the state should acquire easements
along riparian and other sensitive aquatic areas from small forest
landowners willing to sell or donate such easements to the state
provided that the state will not be required to acquire such easements
if they are subject to unacceptable liabilities. The legislature
therefore establishes a forestry riparian easement program.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section and RCW 76.13.100 and 76.13.110 unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(a) "Forestry riparian easement" means an easement covering
qualifying timber granted voluntarily to the state by a small forest
landowner.
(b) "Qualifying timber" means: (i) Those trees covered by a forest
practices application that the small forest landowner is required to
leave unharvested under the rules adopted under RCW 76.09.055 and
76.09.370 or that is made uneconomic to harvest by those rules, and for
which the small landowner is willing to grant the state a forestry
riparian easement; and (ii) those trees covered by a forest practices
application that a small forest landowner who is eligible for the
exemption provided in RCW 76.13.130 before June 5, 2006, voluntarily
leaves unharvested, to the extent that the landowner would have been
required to leave those trees unharvested under the rules adopted under
RCW 76.09.370, if the landowner was not eligible for the exemption
provided in RCW 76.13.130; but not (iii) those trees covered by a
forest practices application with a proposal to convert to a use other
than commercial timber production. "Qualifying timber" is timber
within or bordering a commercially reasonable harvest unit as
determined under rules adopted by the forest practices board, or timber
for which an approved forest practices application for timber harvest
cannot be obtained because of restrictions under the forest practices
rules, including restrictions on harvesting in riparian areas and
restrictions on harvesting on unstable slopes.
(c) "Small forest landowner" means a landowner meeting all of the
following characteristics: (i) A forest landowner as defined in RCW
76.09.020 whose interest in the land and timber is in fee or who has
rights to the timber to be included in the forestry riparian easement
that extend at least fifty years from the date the forest practices
application associated with the easement is submitted; (ii) an entity
that has harvested from its own lands in this state during the three
years prior to the year of application an average timber volume that
would qualify the owner as a small harvester under RCW 84.33.035; and
(iii) an entity that certifies at the time of application that it does
not expect to harvest from its own lands more than the volume allowed
by RCW 84.33.035 during the ten years following application. If a
landowner's prior three-year average harvest exceeds the limit of RCW
84.33.035, or the landowner expects to exceed this limit during the ten
years following application, and that landowner establishes to the
department of natural resources' reasonable satisfaction that the
harvest limits were or will be exceeded to raise funds to pay estate
taxes or equally compelling and unexpected obligations such as court-ordered judgments or extraordinary medical expenses, the landowner
shall be deemed to be a small forest landowner.
For purposes of determining whether a person qualifies as a small
forest landowner, the small forest landowner office, created in RCW
76.13.110, shall evaluate the landowner under this definition, pursuant
to RCW 76.13.160, as of the date that the forest practices application
is submitted or the date the landowner notifies the department that the
harvest is to begin with which the forestry riparian easement is
associated. A small forest landowner can include an individual,
partnership, corporate, or other nongovernmental legal entity. If a
landowner grants timber rights to another entity for less than five
years, the landowner may still qualify as a small forest landowner
under this section. If a landowner is unable to obtain an approved
forest practices application for timber harvest for any of his or her
land because of restrictions under the forest practices rules, the
landowner may still qualify as a small forest landowner under this
section.
(d) "Completion of harvest" means that the trees have been
harvested from an area and that further entry into that area by
mechanized logging or slash treating equipment is not expected.
(3) The department of natural resources is authorized and directed
to accept and hold in the name of the state of Washington forestry
riparian easements granted by small forest landowners covering
qualifying timber and to pay compensation to such landowners in
accordance with subsections (6) and (7) of this section. The
department of natural resources may not transfer the easements to any
entity other than another state agency.
(4) Forestry riparian easements shall be effective for fifty years
from the date the forest practices application associated with the
qualifying timber is submitted to the department of natural resources,
unless the easement is terminated earlier by the department of natural
resources voluntarily, based on a determination that termination is in
the best interest of the state, or under the terms of a termination
clause in the easement.
(5) Forestry riparian easements shall be restrictive only, and
shall preserve all lawful uses of the easement premises by the
landowner that are consistent with the terms of the easement and the
requirement to protect riparian functions during the term of the
easement, subject to the restriction that the leave trees required by
the rules to be left on the easement premises may not be cut during the
term of the easement. No right of public access to or across, or any
public use of the easement premises is created by this statute or by
the easement. Forestry riparian easements shall not be deemed to
trigger the compensating tax of or otherwise disqualify land from being
taxed under chapter 84.33 or 84.34 RCW.
(6)(a) Upon application ((of)) from a small forest landowner for a
riparian easement that is associated with a forest practices
application and the landowner's marking of the qualifying timber on the
qualifying lands, the small forest landowner office shall determine the
compensation to be offered to the small forest landowner as provided
for in this section.
(b) The small forest landowner office shall also determine the
compensation to be offered to a small forest landowner for qualifying
timber for which an approved forest practices application for timber
harvest cannot be obtained because of restrictions under the forest
practices rules.
(c) The legislature recognizes that there is not readily available
market transaction evidence of value for easements of this nature, and
thus establishes the ((following)) methodology contained in this
section to ascertain the value for forestry riparian easements. Values
so determined shall not be considered competent evidence of value for
any other purpose.
(d) The small forest landowner office shall establish the volume of
the qualifying timber. Based on that volume and using data obtained or
maintained by the department of revenue under RCW 84.33.074 and
84.33.091, the small forest landowner office shall attempt to determine
the fair market value of the qualifying timber as of the date the
forest practices application associated with the qualifying timber was
submitted or the date the landowner notifies the department that the
harvest is to begin. Removal of any qualifying timber before the
expiration of the easement must be in accordance with the forest
practices rules and the terms of the easement. There shall be no
reduction in compensation for reentry.
(e) Small forest landowners who are not nonprofit organizations or
municipalities, municipal corporations, or special districts have
priority for payment under this section.
(f) The small forest landowner office shall initiate the process
for determining the compensation amount as soon as possible after
receipt of an application. No duty to present an actual offer for
compensation exists until appropriations allow.
(7) Except as provided in subsection (8) of this section, the small
forest landowner office shall, subject to available funding, offer
compensation to the small forest landowner in the amount of fifty
percent of the value determined in subsection (6) of this section, plus
the compliance and reimbursement costs as determined in accordance with
RCW 76.13.140. If the landowner accepts the offer for qualifying
timber that will be harvested pursuant to an approved forest practices
application, the department of natural resources shall pay the
compensation promptly upon (a) completion of harvest in the area
covered by the forestry riparian easement; (b) verification that there
has been compliance with the rules requiring leave trees in the
easement area; and (c) execution and delivery of the easement to the
department of natural resources. If the landowner accepts the offer
for qualifying timber for which an approved forest practices
application for timber harvest cannot be obtained because of
restrictions under the forest practices rules, the department of
natural resources shall pay the compensation promptly upon (i)
verification that there has been compliance with the rules requiring
leave trees in the easement area; and (ii) execution and delivery of
the easement to the department of natural resources. Upon donation or
payment of compensation, the department of natural resources may record
the easement.
(8) For approved forest practices applications where the regulatory
impact is greater than the average percentage impact for all small
landowners as determined by the department of natural resources
analysis under the regulatory fairness act, chapter 19.85 RCW, the
compensation offered will be increased to one hundred percent for that
portion of the regulatory impact that is in excess of the average.
Regulatory impact includes trees left in buffers, special management
zones, and those rendered uneconomic to harvest by these rules. A
separate average or high impact regulatory threshold shall be
established for western and eastern Washington. Criteria for these
measurements and payments shall be established by the small forest
landowner office.
(9) The forest practices board shall adopt rules under the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, to implement the
forestry riparian easement program, including the following:
(a) A standard version or versions of all documents necessary or
advisable to create the forestry riparian easements as provided for in
this section;
(b) Standards for descriptions of the easement premises with a
degree of precision that is reasonable in relation to the values
involved;
(c) Methods and standards for cruises and valuation of forestry
riparian easements for purposes of establishing the compensation. The
department of natural resources shall perform the timber cruises of
forestry riparian easements required under this chapter and chapter
76.09 RCW. Any rules concerning the methods and standards for
valuations of forestry riparian easements shall apply only to the
department of natural resources, small forest landowners, and the small
forest landowner office;
(d) A method to determine that a forest practices application
involves a commercially reasonable harvest, and adopt criteria for
entering into a forest riparian easement where a commercially
reasonable harvest is not possible or a forest practices application
that has been submitted cannot be approved because of restrictions
under the forest practices rules;
(e) A method to address blowdown of qualified timber falling
outside the easement premises;
(f) A formula for sharing of proceeds in relation to the
acquisition of qualified timber covered by an easement through the
exercise or threats of eminent domain by a federal or state agency with
eminent domain authority, based on the present value of the department
of natural resources' and the landowner's relative interests in the
qualified timber;
(g) High impact regulatory thresholds;
(h) A method to determine timber that is qualifying timber because
it is rendered uneconomic to harvest by the rules adopted under RCW
76.09.055 and 76.09.370; and
(i) A method for internal department of natural resources review of
small forest landowner office compensation decisions under subsection
(7) of this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 76.13.140 and 2002 c 120 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In order to assist small forest landowners to remain
economically viable, the legislature intends that the small forest
landowners be able to net fifty percent of the value of the trees left
in the buffer areas.
(2) The amount of compensation offered in RCW 76.13.120 shall also
include the compliance costs for participation in the riparian easement
program. For purposes of this section, "compliance costs" includes the
cost of preparing and recording the easement, and any business and
occupation tax and real estate excise tax imposed because of entering
into the easement.
(3) The office may contract with private consultants that the
office finds qualified to perform timber cruises of forestry riparian
easements or to lay out streamside buffers and comply with other forest
and fish regulatory requirements related to the forest riparian
easement program.
(4) Once a contract has been executed for the forestry riparian
easement program, the department shall reimburse small forest
landowners for the actual costs incurred for laying out the streamside
buffers ((and)), marking the qualifying timber ((once a contract has
been executed for the forestry riparian easement program)), and hiring
a qualified expert to complete required studies or reports as part of
the forest practices application upon which the easement application is
based. Reimbursement is subject to the work being acceptable to the
department. The small forest landowner office shall determine how the
reimbursement costs will be calculated.

--- END ---