BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Chain food establishment" means any one of at least ten food
establishments within the United States doing business under the same
name and collectively having at least one million dollars in gross
annual sales and offering for sale substantially the same menu items,
regardless of whether the food establishments are subject to the same
ownership or type of ownership.
(2) "Condiment" means a sauce or seasoning including but not
limited to ketchup, mustard, hot sauce, tartar sauce, and similar items
offered for general use with or without charge.
(3) "Department" means the department of health.
(4) "Standard menu item" means food offered for sale for more than
sixty days per year, except for foods offered in a salad bar, buffet
line, cafeteria service or similar self-serve arrangement, and
condiments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Each chain food establishment shall make
nutrition labeling of food available to consumers for all standard menu
items as required by this section. The nutrition labeling of food must
include, but not be limited to, the total number of calories and
nutrients as follows, per standard menu item, as usually prepared and
offered for sale:
(a) Total number of calories;
(b) Total number of grams of trans fat;
(c) Total number of grams of saturated fat;
(d) Total number of grams of carbohydrate; and
(e) Total number of milligrams of sodium.
(2) Each chain food establishment that provides a menu shall
provide the nutrition labeling of food required under subsection (1) of
this section next to each standard menu item on the menu in a size and
typeface similar to other information about each standard menu item.
The menu must include, in a clear and conspicuous manner, the following
statement: "Recommended limits for a two thousand calorie daily diet
are twenty grams of saturated fat and two thousand three hundred
milligrams of sodium." Each chain food establishment offering standard
menu items containing artificial trans fat shall amend the statement to
include the following language: "Eating artificial trans fat increases
risk of heart disease."
(3) Each chain food establishment that uses a menu board shall post
on the menu board the total number of calories per standard menu item
in a size and typeface similar to other information on the menu board
about the item. This type of chain food establishment shall make the
other nutrition labeling of food required under subsection (1) of this
section and the statement under subsection (2) of this section
available on printed menus, pamphlets, brochures, posters, or similar
documents that are plainly visible to consumers at the point of
ordering.
(4) Nothing in this section precludes chain food establishments
from providing additional nutrition labeling of food voluntarily.
(5) The department may allow chain food establishments to provide
nutrition labeling of food in a format that, in the discretion of the
department, provides substantially equivalent notice to consumers, at
the point of ordering, of nutrition information as is required by
subsection (2) or (3) of this section.
(6) Chain food establishments shall perform or obtain the required
calorie and nutrient analysis using reasonable bases, including
nutrient databases, cookbooks, or other analyses that ensure the
accuracy of the nutrition labeling. Chain food establishment owners or
operators shall provide to the department, if requested, information
documenting the accuracy of the nutrition labeling provided to
consumers. A nutrition label is not in compliance with this section if
it bears, for calories or any nutrient for which labeling is required
under subsection (1) of this section, a total number value that is more
than twenty percent lower or higher than nutrient analysis shows as the
content of the menu item.
(7) The nutrition labeling of food required under subsection (1) of
this section may be presented with a disclaimer stating that there may
be variations in nutrition content across servings, based on slight
variations in overall serving size or quantity of ingredients, or based
on special ordering.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The department is authorized to adopt rules
as necessary to implement and provide for enforcement of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---