BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.71 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The commission shall conduct a medical quality assurance
commission pilot project to evaluate the effect of granting the
commission additional authority over budget development, spending, and
staffing. The pilot project shall begin July 1, 2008, and conclude
June 30, 2011.
(2) The pilot project shall include the following provisions:
(a) That the secretary shall employ an executive director who is
approved by the commission and exempt from the provisions of the civil
service law, chapter 41.06 RCW, and serves at the pleasure of the
commission;
(b) That the executive director performs all administrative duties
of the commission, including managing employees assigned by the
secretary to the commission, preparing an annual budget, and any other
duties delegated to the executive director by the commission;
(c) That the secretary shall employ and assign investigators with
medical expertise, as required to enable the commission to accomplish
its duties and responsibilities. The secretary shall consult with the
executive director when making primary staffing assignments on a long-term basis to foster the development and maintenance of staff
expertise. To ensure continuity and best practices, the secretary
shall regularly evaluate staff assignments and workload distribution;
(d) Consistent with the budget and accounting act:
(i) With regard to budget for the remainder of the 2007-2009
biennium, the commission has authority to spend the funds allotted with
respect to its professions, physicians regulated under this chapter,
and physician assistants regulated under chapter 18.71A RCW; and
(ii) Beginning with the 2009-2011 biennium, the commission is
responsible for proposing its own biennial budget which the secretary
must submit to the office of financial management;
(e) That, prior to adopting credentialing fees under RCW 43.70.250,
the secretary shall consult with the commission to determine the
appropriate fees for the individual professions, consistent with RCW
43.70.250;
(f) That the commission shall annually negotiate with the secretary
to develop performance-based expectations, including identification of
key performance measures. The performance expectations should focus on
consistent, timely regulation of health care professionals.
(3) By December 15, 2012, the secretary and the commission shall
report to the governor and the legislature on the results of the pilot
project. The report shall:
(a) Compare the effectiveness of licensing and disciplinary
activities of the commission during the pilot project with the
licensing and disciplinary activities of the commission prior to the
pilot project;
(b) Compare the effectiveness of licensing and disciplinary
activities of the commission during the pilot project with the
disciplinary activities of other disciplining authorities during the
same time period as the pilot project;
(c) Compare the efficiency of the commission with respect to the
timeliness and personnel resources during the pilot project to the
efficiency of the commission prior to the pilot project and the
efficiency of other disciplining authorities during the same period as
the pilot project;
(d) Compare the budgetary activity of the commission during the
pilot project to the budgetary activity of the commission prior to the
pilot project and to the budgetary activity of other disciplining
authorities during the same period as the pilot project;
(e) Evaluate the commission's ability to meet the key performance
measures identified in subsection (2)(f) of this section in comparison
to other disciplining authorities; and
(f) Review summaries of national research and data regarding
regulatory effectiveness and patient safety.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.71.0191 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 326 are each amended
to read as follows:
Except as provided in section 1 of this act for the duration of the
pilot project, the secretary of the department of health shall appoint,
from a list of three names supplied by the commission, an executive
director who shall act to carry out the provisions of this chapter.
The secretary shall also employ such additional staff including
administrative assistants, investigators, and clerical staff as are
required to enable the commission to accomplish its duties and
responsibilities. The executive director is exempt from the provisions
of the civil service law, chapter 41.06 RCW, as now or hereafter
amended.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.70.240 and 1998 c 245 s 73 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary and each of the professional licensing and
disciplinary boards or commissions under the administration of the
department shall enter into written operating agreements on
administrative procedures with input from the regulated profession and
the public. The intent of these agreements is to provide a process for
the department to consult each board or commission on administrative
matters and to ensure that the administration and staff functions
effectively enable each board or commission to fulfill its statutory
responsibilities. The agreements shall include, but not be limited to,
the following provisions:
(1) Administrative activities supporting the board's policies,
goals, and objectives;
(2) Development and review of the agency budget as it relates to
the board; ((and))
(3) Board related personnel issues; and
(4) Other issues as provided in section 1 of this act, pertaining
to the medical quality assurance commission pilot project for the
duration of that project.
The agreements shall be reviewed and revised in like manner if
appropriate at the beginning of each fiscal year, and at other times
upon written request by the secretary or the board.

--- END ---