BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.23.070 and 1994 c 154 s 121 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No municipal officer may use his or her position to secure
special privileges or exemptions for himself, herself, or others.
(2) No municipal officer may, directly or indirectly, give or
receive or agree to receive any compensation, gift, reward, or gratuity
from a source except the employing municipality, for a matter connected
with or related to the officer's services as such an officer unless
otherwise provided for by law. Gift does not include any item valued
at twenty dollars or less that cannot reasonably be presumed to
influence the vote, action, or judgment of the municipal officer or be
considered as part of a reward for action or inaction.
(3) No municipal officer may accept employment or engage in
business or professional activity that the officer might reasonably
expect would require or induce him or her by reason of his or her
official position to disclose confidential information acquired by
reason of his or her official position.
(4) No municipal officer may disclose confidential information
gained by reason of the officer's position, nor may the officer
otherwise use such information for his or her personal gain or benefit.

--- END ---