BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that a viable
manufacturing industry is critical to providing the state economy with
family-wage jobs and improving the quality of life for workers and
communities. To perform in the emerging global marketplace, Washington
manufacturers must master new technologies, streamline production
processes, improve quality assurance, expand environmental compliance,
and enhance methods of work organization. Only through innovation and
modernization techniques, reflecting the specific needs and
capabilities of the individual firms, can Washington manufacturers both
compete successfully in the market of the future and pay good living
wages.
Most small and midsize manufacturers do not have the resources that
will allow them to easily access innovation and modernization technical
assistance and the skills training needed to make them globally
competitive. Because of the statewide public benefit to be gained from
increasing the availability of innovation and modernization services,
it is the intent of the legislature to create a new mechanism in a
manner that reduces the up-front costs of these services for small and
midsize manufacturing firms. It is further the intent of the
legislature that Washington state increase its support for the federal
manufacturing extension partnership program, to expand the delivery of
innovation and modernization services to small and midsize Washington
manufacturers, and to leverage federal funding and private resources
devoted to such efforts.
The successful implementation of innovation and modernization
services will enable a manufacturing firm to reduce costs, increase
sales, become more profitable, and ultimately expand job opportunities
for Washington citizens.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the community economic revitalization board.
(2) "Costs of extension services" and "extension service costs"
mean the direct costs experienced under a contract with a qualified
manufacturing extension partnership affiliate for modernization
extension services, including but not limited to amounts in the
contract for costs of consulting, instruction, materials, equipment,
rental of class space, marketing, and overhead.
(3) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(4) "Director" means the director of the department of community,
trade, and economic development.
(5) "Innovation and modernization extension voucher" and "voucher"
mean an instrument issued to a successful applicant from the board,
verifying that funds from the manufacturing innovation and
modernization account will be forwarded to the qualified manufacturing
extension partnership affiliate selected by the participant and will
cover identified costs of extension services.
(6) "Innovation and modernization extension services" and "service"
mean a service funded under this chapter and performed by a qualified
manufacturing extension partnership affiliate. The services may
include but are not limited to strategic planning, continuous
improvement, business development, six sigma, quality improvement,
environmental health and safety, lean processes, energy management,
innovation and product development, human resources and training,
supply chain management, and project management.
(7) "Outreach services" means those activities performed by an
affiliate to either assess the technical assistance needs of Washington
manufacturers or increase manufacturers' awareness of the opportunities
and benefits of implementing cutting edge technology, techniques, and
best practices. "Outreach services" includes but is not limited to
salaries of outreach staff, needs assessments, client follow-up, public
educational events, manufacturing orientated trade shows, electronic
communications, newsletters, advertising, direct mail efforts, and
contacting business organizations for names of manufacturers who might
need assistance.
(8) "Program" means the Washington manufacturing innovation and
modernization extension service program created in section 3 of this
act.
(9) "Program participant" and "participant" mean an applicant for
assistance under the program that has received a voucher or a small
manufacturer receiving services through an industry association or
cluster association that has received a voucher.
(10) "Qualified manufacturing extension partnership affiliate" and
"affiliate" mean a private nonprofit organization established under RCW
24.50.010 or other organization that is eligible or certified to
receive federal matching funds from the national institute of standards
and technology manufacturing extension partnership program of the
United States department of commerce, and that has entered into an
agreement with the board that it will pay for its proportionate share
of the board's costs for administering the program created in section
3 of this act.
(11) "Small manufacturer" means a private employer whose primary
business is adding value to a product through a manufacturing process
and employs one hundred or fewer employees within Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The Washington manufacturing innovation
and modernization extension service program is created to provide
assistance to small manufacturers located in the state of Washington.
The program shall be administered by the board.
(2)(a) Application to receive assistance under this program must be
made to the board in a form and manner specified by the board.
Successful applicants will receive an innovation and modernization
extension voucher from the board to cover the costs of extension
services performed by a qualified manufacturing extension partnership
affiliate. An applicant may not receive a voucher or vouchers of over
two hundred thousand dollars per calendar year. The board shall only
allocate up to sixty percent of available funding during the first year
of a biennium.
(b) Applicants must:
(i) Have a valid agreement with a qualified manufacturing extension
partnership affiliate to engage in innovation and modernization
extension services;
(ii) Agree to: (A) Make a contribution to the manufacturing
innovation and modernization account created in section 5 of this act,
in an amount equal to twenty-five percent of the amount of the
innovation and modernization extension voucher, upon completion of the
innovation and modernization extension service; and (B) make monthly or
quarterly contributions over the subsequent eighteen months, as
specified in their agreement with the affiliate, to the manufacturing
innovation and modernization account created in section 5 of this act
in an amount equal to eighty percent of the amount of the innovation
and modernization extension voucher;
(iii) Be a small manufacturer or an industry association or cluster
association at the time the applicant entered into an agreement with a
qualified manufacturing extension partnership affiliate; and
(iv) If a small manufacturer, ensure that the number of employees
the applicant has in the state during the calendar year following the
completion of the program will be equal to or greater than the number
of employees the applicant had in the state in the calendar year
preceding the start of the program.
(3) The director may solicit and receive gifts, grants, funds,
fees, and endowments, in trust or otherwise, from tribal, local,
federal, or other governmental entities, as well as private sources,
for the purpose of providing funding for the innovation and
modernization extension services and outreach services specified in
this chapter. All revenue solicited and received by the department
pursuant to this subsection must be deposited into the manufacturing
innovation and modernization account created in section 5 of this act.
(4) The board may adopt rules to implement this section.
(5) Any qualified manufacturing extension partnership affiliate
receiving funding under this program is required to submit a copy of
its annual independent federal audit to the board within three months
of its issuance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This chapter, being necessary for the
welfare of the state and its inhabitants, shall be liberally construed
to effect its purposes. Insofar as the provisions of this chapter are
inconsistent with the provisions of any general or special law, or
parts thereof, the provisions of this chapter shall be controlling.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The manufacturing innovation and
modernization account is created in the custody of the state treasurer.
Only the director may authorize expenditures from the account and no
appropriation is required for expenditures.
(2) The money in the account must be used solely for funding
activities of the Washington manufacturing innovation and modernization
extension services program created in section 3 of this act.
(3) Annually, the director shall award an amount, not to exceed one
hundred thousand dollars per year, from the innovation and
manufacturing modernization account to qualified manufacturing
extension partnership affiliates for the purpose of conducting outreach
services; however, beginning in fiscal year 2013, the outreach award is
subject to a fifty percent match of private funds.
(4) When an affiliate submits an innovation and modernization
extension voucher for payment, the director shall make a payment to the
qualified manufacturing extension partnership affiliate chosen by the
program participant in an amount equal to the full costs of extension
services.
(5) All payments by a program participant in the Washington
manufacturing innovation and modernization extension services program
created in section 3 of this act shall be deposited into the
manufacturing innovation and modernization account. The deposit of
payments under this section from a program participant cease when the
department specifies that the program participant has met the monetary
contribution obligations of the program.
(6) All revenue solicited and received under the provisions of
section 3(3) of this act shall be deposited into the manufacturing
innovation and modernization account.
(7) The legislature intends that all payments from the
manufacturing innovation and modernization account made to qualified
manufacturing extension partnership affiliates will be eligible as the
state match in an affiliate's application for federal matching funds
under the manufacturing extension partnership program of the United
States department of commerce's national institute of standards and
technology.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---