BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that Floyd Jones has
played a vital role in efforts to preserve and protect Livingston bay,
which sits on the northeast side of Camano island. Vast numbers of
migrating waterfowl rely on Livingston bay for winter habitat.
Livingston bay is part of the greater Skagit-Stillaguamish delta, which
provides wintering areas for significant populations of birds such as
Wrangell island snow geese, trumpeter and tundra swans, winter raptors,
and falcon species. Additionally, Livingston bay's tidelands serve as
habitat for juvenile salmon, adult salmon, and bull trout, and provide
spawning areas for Pacific sand lance and surf smelt. Among his many
other community activities on Camano island, generous donations from
Floyd Jones have furthered efforts to preserve and protect Livingston
bay in perpetuity, benefiting this precious water body, its fish and
wildlife, and all the people of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.126 RCW
to read as follows:
Livingston bay, which sits on the northeast side of Camano island,
is hereby renamed the "Floyd Jones flyway."

--- END ---