BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the practice of
Washington's county assessors is to identify real estate by tax parcel
number. The legislature intends to clarify existing law such that for
written real estate purchase-and-sale agreements and option-to-purchase
agreements of undivided tax parcels, the assessor's tax parcel number
and the county location of the real estate may be used instead of a
legal description.

Sec. 2 RCW 64.04.010 and 1929 c 33 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every conveyance of real estate, or any interest therein, and every
contract creating or evidencing any encumbrance upon real estate, shall
be by deed: PROVIDED, That:
(1) When real estate, or any interest therein, is held in trust,
the terms and conditions of which trust are of record, and the
instrument creating such trust authorizes the issuance of certificates
or written evidence of any interest in said real estate under said
trust, and authorizes the transfer of such certificates or evidence of
interest by assignment by the holder thereof by a simple writing or by
endorsement on the back of such certificate or evidence of interest or
delivery thereof to the vendee, such transfer shall be valid, and all
such assignments or transfers hereby authorized and heretofore made in
accordance with the provisions of this section are hereby declared to
be legal and valid; and
(2) A written agreement for the purchase and sale or option to
purchase real estate need not contain a legal description of the real
estate, if the subject of the agreement is one or more undivided tax
parcels and the agreement includes the name of the county in which the
real estate is situated and the assessor's tax parcel identification
number or numbers. Nothing in this section affects the description of
condominium units as set forth in RCW 64.34.212.

--- END ---