BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that conserving energy
in publicly owned buildings not only benefits Washington's overall
supply of energy, but also contributes to meeting the state's
greenhouse gas reduction goals. The legislature further finds that
taxpayers are the direct beneficiaries of energy and water conservation
in publicly owned buildings and reducing the cost of performance-based
energy contracts is a means by which municipalities can achieve even
greater levels of energy and water conservation. Although
municipalities and the state have been using energy savings performance
contracts since the mid-1980's, it is only since 2002 that the entire
scope of the contract has been subject to the sales and use tax.
Therefore, the legislature declares that it is the policy of the
state to exempt performance contracts from the sales and use tax.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to performance-based contracted energy equipment and services and energy management
systems.
(2) A person taking the exemption under this section must keep
records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this
section. This exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department. The seller shall retain a copy of the certificate for
the seller's files.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Energy equipment and services" has the same meaning provided
in RCW 39.35A.020.
(b) "Energy management system" has the same meaning provided in RCW
39.35.030.
(c) "Performance-based contract" has the same meaning provided in
RCW 39.35A.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by this chapter does not apply to performance-based contracted energy equipment and services and energy management
systems.
(2) A person taking the exemption under this section must keep
records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this
section. This exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department. The seller shall retain a copy of the certificate for
the seller's files.
(3) The definitions in section 2 of this act apply to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect July 1, 2008.

--- END ---