BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that Washington
has long been a national and international leader on energy
conservation and environmental stewardship, including air quality
protection, renewable energy development and generation, emission
standards for fossil-fuel based energy generation, energy efficiency
programs, natural resource conservation, vehicle emission standards,
and the use of biofuels. Washington is also unique among most states
in that in addition to its commitment to reduce greenhouse gas
emissions, it has established goals to grow the clean energy sector and
reduce its use of imported fuels.
(2) The legislature further finds that Washington should continue
its leadership on climate change policy by creating accountability for
achieving the emission reductions established in section 3 of this act,
participating in the design of a regional multisector market-based
system to help achieve those emission reductions, and ensuring the
state has a well trained workforce for our clean energy future.
(3) It is the intent of the legislature that:
(a) The regional multisector market-based system designed as a
result of this act will: (i) Limit and reduce emissions of greenhouse
gas consistent with the emission reductions established in section 3 of
this act; (ii) minimize the potential to export pollution, jobs, and
economic opportunities; and (iii) reduce emissions at the lowest
overall cost to the economy, consumers, and businesses;
(b) The regional multisector market-based system will become
effective by January 1, 2012, after authority is provided to the
department for its implementation. By acting now, Washington
businesses and citizens will have adequate time and opportunities to be
well positioned to take advantage of the low-carbon economy and to make
necessary investments in low-carbon technology;
(c) The regional multisector market-based system recognize
Washington's unique emissions portfolio, the opportunities presented by
Washington's abundant forest resources and agriculture land, the
state's leadership in the actions it has already undertaken that have
reduced its generation of greenhouse gas emissions, and that entities
receive appropriate credit for early voluntary reductions actions to
reduce greenhouse gases; and
(d) If any revenues that accrue to the state are created by the
multisector market-based system, they will be used to further the
state's efforts to achieve the goals established in section 3 of this
act, address the impacts of global warming on affected habitats,
species, and communities, and increase investment in the clean energy
economy particularly for communities and workers that have suffered
from heavy job losses and chronic unemployment and underemployment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Carbon dioxide equivalents" has the same meaning as defined in
RCW 80.70.010.
(2) "Climate advisory team" means the stakeholder group formed in
response to executive order 07-02.
(3) "Climate impacts group" means the University of Washington's
climate impacts group.
(4) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(5) "Direct emissions" means emissions from sources of emissions,
including stationary combustion sources, mobile combustion emissions,
process emissions, and fugitive emissions.
(6) "Director" means the director of the department.
(7) "Downstream" means the point where greenhouse gases are
emitted.
(8) "Greenhouse gas" and "greenhouse gas emissions" have the same
meaning as "greenhouse gases" as defined in RCW 80.80.010.
(9) "Indirect emissions" means emissions associated with the
purchase of electricity, heating, cooling, or steam.
(10) "Motor vehicle" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
46.04.320.
(11) "Person" means an individual, partnership, franchise holder,
association, corporation, a state, a city, a county, or any subdivision
or instrumentality of a state.
(12) "Program" means the department's climate change program.
(13) "Total greenhouse gas emissions" means all direct emissions
and all indirect emissions.
(14) "Upstream" means the point where products that will result in
greenhouse gas emissions are produced or come into the state.
(15) "Western climate initiative" means the collaboration of
states, Canadian provinces, Mexican states, and tribes to design a
multisector market-based mechanism as directed under the western
regional climate action initiative signed by the governor on February
22, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1)(a) The department shall develop and
implement a program to limit greenhouse gas emissions to achieve the
following emission reductions for Washington state:
(i) By 2020, reduce overall greenhouse gas emissions in the state
to 1990 levels;
(ii) By 2035, reduce overall greenhouse gas emissions in the state
to twenty-five percent below 1990 levels;
(iii) By 2050, the state will do its part to reach global climate
stabilization levels by reducing overall emissions to fifty percent
below 1990 levels, or seventy percent below the state's expected
emissions that year.
(b) Consistent with this directive, the department shall take the
following actions:
(i) Develop and implement a system for monitoring and reporting
greenhouse gas emissions as required under RCW 70.94.151; and
(ii) Track progress toward meeting the emission reductions
established in this subsection, including the results from policies
currently in effect that have been previously adopted by the state and
policies adopted in the future, and report on that progress.
(2) By December 31st of each even-numbered year beginning in 2010,
the department and the department of community, trade, and economic
development shall report to the governor and the appropriate committees
of the senate and house of representatives the total greenhouse gas
emissions for the preceding two years, and totals in each major source
sector. The department shall ensure that the reporting rules adopted
under section 4 of this act allow it to develop a comprehensive
inventory of emissions of greenhouse gases from all significant sectors
of the Washington economy.
(3)(a) The director shall develop, in coordination with the western
climate initiative, a design for a regional multisector market-based
system to limit and reduce emissions of greenhouse gas consistent with
the emission reductions established in subsection (1) of this section.
(b) By December 1, 2008, the director and the director of the
department of community, trade, and economic development shall deliver
to the legislature specific recommendations for implementing the
preferred design of a regional multisector market-based system,
including how the intent of the legislature expressed in section 1(3)
(a) and (c) of this act have been addressed. These recommendations
must include:
(i) Proposed legislation, necessary funding, and the schedule
necessary to implement the preferred design by January 1, 2012;
(ii) Any changes determined necessary to the reporting requirements
established under RCW 70.94.151; and
(iii) Actions that the state should take to prevent manipulation of
the multisector market-based system designed under this section.
(4) In developing the design, the department shall provide
opportunity for public review and comment.
(5) In addition to the program design requirements of subsection
(1) of this section, the department shall design for legislative
consideration a program to achieve the greenhouse gas emissions
reductions required in this section through measures that:
(a) Provide a direct price signal applied at the level of the first
possession of fossil fuels in the state;
(b) Offer predictability as to the cost to reduce emissions on a
per emissions unit basis;
(c) Employ existing institutions, mechanisms, and emissions data to
simplify implementation and administration;
(d) Could be implemented with a similar regional or national
program were such a regional or national program to be authorized;
(e) Prevent manipulation of commodity prices by purchasers of
fossil fuels;
(f) Apply broadly to all sectors of the economy that directly
consume fossil fuels, as well as include the carbon emissions embedded
within products imported into and consumed within the state; and
(g) May be implemented in ways that are integrated with the program
developed under subsection (1) of this section.
(6) In addition to the information required under subsection (3)(b)
of this section, the director and the director of the department of
community, trade, and economic development shall submit the following
to the legislature by December 1, 2008:
(a) Information on progress to date in achieving the requirements
of this act;
(b) The final recommendations of the climate advisory team,
including recommended most promising actions to reduce greenhouse gas
emissions or otherwise respond to climate change. These
recommendations must include strategies to adopt a low-carbon fuel
standard, to meet and exceed the renewable fuel standards in RCW
19.112.110 and 19.112.120, and recommendations to increase the use of
clean technology vehicles such as plug-in hybrid electric vehicles,
zero emission vehicles, and other clean vehicle technologies;
(c) A request for additional resources and statutory authority
needed to limit and reduce emissions of greenhouse gas consistent with
this act including implementation of the most promising recommendations
of the climate advisory team;
(d) Recommendations on how local governments could be included in
the multisector market-based system designed under subsection (3) of
this section; and
(e) Recommendations developed in consultation with the department
of natural resources as appropriate for policies or programs that may
be part of the regional multisector market-based system designed under
subsection (3) of this section, to account for, in a way that
contributes to achieving the goals of this section:
(i) Forestry and agricultural practices that remove atmospheric
carbon dioxide on a renewable and recurring basis and sequester it in
forests, forest products, and agricultural soils; and
(ii) The production and use of energy derived from renewable and
recurring biomass sources.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.94.151 and 2005 c 138 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board of any activated authority or the department, may
classify air contaminant sources, by ordinance, resolution, rule or
regulation, which in its judgment may cause or contribute to air
pollution, according to levels and types of emissions and other
characteristics which cause or contribute to air pollution, and may
require registration or reporting or both for any such class or
classes. Classifications made pursuant to this section may be for
application to the area of jurisdiction of such authority, or the state
as a whole or to any designated area within the jurisdiction, and shall
be made with special reference to effects on health, economic and
social factors, and physical effects on property. In the case of
greenhouse gas emissions as defined in section 2 of this act, the
department shall adopt rules requiring reporting of those emissions.
The rules must require that emissions from fossil fuels and those from
fuels from biomass are reported separately.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, any
person operating or responsible for the operation of air contaminant
sources of any class for which the ordinances, resolutions, rules or
regulations of the department or board of the authority, require
registration ((and)) or reporting shall register therewith and make
reports containing information as may be required by such department or
board concerning location, size and height of contaminant outlets,
processes employed, nature of the contaminant emission and such other
information as is relevant to air pollution and available or reasonably
capable of being assembled. For greenhouse gas emissions as defined in
section 2 of this act, the department shall determine by rule whether
an air contaminant source must register with and report to the
department. The department or board may require that such registration
or reporting be accompanied by a fee, and may determine the amount of
such fee for such class or classes: PROVIDED, That the amount of the
fee shall only be to compensate for the costs of administering such
registration or reporting program which shall be defined as initial
registration and annual or other periodic reports from the source owner
providing information directly related to air pollution registration,
on-site inspections necessary to verify compliance with registration
requirements, data storage and retrieval systems necessary for support
of the registration program, emission inventory reports and emission
reduction credits computed from information provided by sources
pursuant to registration program requirements, staff review, including
engineering or other reliable analysis for accuracy and currentness, of
information provided by sources pursuant to registration program
requirements, clerical and other office support provided in direct
furtherance of the registration program, and administrative support
provided in directly carrying out the registration program: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That any such registration made with either the board or the
department shall preclude a further registration and reporting with any
other board or the department, except for greenhouse gas emissions as
defined in section 2 of this act, which must be reported as required
under subsection (5) of this section.
All registration program and reporting fees collected by the
department shall be deposited in the air pollution control account.
All registration program fees collected by the local air authorities
shall be deposited in their respective treasuries.
(3) If a registration or report has been filed for a grain
warehouse or grain elevator as required under this section,
registration, reporting, or a registration program fee shall not, after
January 1, 1997, again be required under this section for the warehouse
or elevator unless the capacity of the warehouse or elevator as listed
as part of the license issued for the facility has been increased since
the date the registration or reporting was last made. If the capacity
of the warehouse or elevator listed as part of the license is
increased, any registration or reporting required for the warehouse or
elevator under this section must be made by the date the warehouse or
elevator receives grain from the first harvest season that occurs after
the increase in its capacity is listed in the license.
This subsection does not apply to a grain warehouse or grain
elevator if the warehouse or elevator handles more than ten million
bushels of grain annually.
(4) For the purposes of subsection (3) of this section:
(a) A "grain warehouse" or "grain elevator" is an establishment
classified in standard industrial classification (SIC) code 5153 for
wholesale trade for which a license is required and includes, but is
not limited to, such a licensed facility that also conducts cleaning
operations for grain;
(b) A "license" is a license issued by the department of
agriculture licensing a facility as a grain warehouse or grain elevator
under chapter 22.09 RCW or a license issued by the federal government
licensing a facility as a grain warehouse or grain elevator for
purposes similar to those of licensure for the facility under chapter
22.09 RCW; and
(c) "Grain" means a grain or a pulse.
(5)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the department
shall, under the authority granted in subsection (1) of this section,
adopt rules requiring annual reporting of total greenhouse gas
emissions by any person who operates or is responsible for: (i)
Operation of on-road motor vehicles that emit at least twenty-five
hundred metric tons of greenhouse gas annually in the state to report
the greenhouse gas emissions generated from or emitted by those on-road
motor vehicles; or (ii) operations that emit at least ten thousand
metric tons of greenhouse gas annually in the state. In calculating
greenhouse gas emissions for purposes of determining whether or not
reporting is required, only direct emissions shall be included. The
greenhouse gas emissions must be reported as carbon dioxide
equivalents. The rules must require that persons report 2009 emissions
starting in 2010. The rules must establish an annual reporting
schedule that takes into account the time needed to allow the person
reporting their greenhouse gas emissions to gather the information
needed and to verify the emissions being reported. However, in no
event may reports be submitted later than October 31st of the year in
which the report is due. The department may phase in the reporting
requirements for operations under (a)(ii) of this subsection until the
reporting threshold is met, which must be met by January 1, 2012. The
department may from time to time amend the rules to include other
persons that emit less than the annual greenhouse gas emission levels
set out in this subsection if necessary to comply with any federal
reporting requirements for greenhouse gas emissions. In its rules, the
department may also include reporting of emissions within the threshold
established in (a)(ii) of this subsection resulting from upstream and
downstream sources.
(b) In its rules, the department may defer the reporting
requirement under (a) of this subsection for emissions associated with
interstate commercial aircraft, rail, or marine vessels until (i) there
is a federal requirement to report these emissions; or (ii) the
department finds that there is a generally accepted reporting protocol
for determining interstate emissions from these sources.
(c) The department shall share any reporting information reported
to it with the local air authority in which the person reporting under
the rules adopted by the department operates.
(d) Persons required to report under (a) of this subsection who
fail to report or pay the fee are subject to enforcement penalties
under this chapter. The department shall enforce the reporting rule
requirements unless it approves a local air authority's request to
enforce the requirements for persons operating within the authority's
jurisdiction.
(e) The energy facility site evaluation council shall,
simultaneously with the department, adopt rules that impose the same
greenhouse gas reporting requirements in site certifications on persons
operating or responsible for the operation of a facility permitted by
the energy facility site evaluation council. The department shall
share any information reported to it from facilities permitted by the
energy facility site evaluation council with the council, including
notice of a facility that has failed to report as required. The energy
facility site evaluation council shall contract with the department to
monitor the reporting requirements adopted under this section.
(f) In developing its rules, the department shall, with the
assistance of the department of transportation, identify a mechanism to
report an aggregate estimate of the annual greenhouse gas emissions
generated from or emitted by otherwise unreported on-road motor
vehicles.
(g) The inclusion or failure to include any person, classes of
persons, or types of greenhouse gas emissions into the department's
rules for reporting under this section does not indicate whether such
a person or category is appropriate for inclusion in the multisector
market-based system designed under section 3 of this act.
(h) Should the federal government adopt rules governing the
reporting of greenhouse gases, the department shall propose amendments
to its rules, as necessary, to ensure administrative consistency with
the federal rules and to ensure duplicate reporting is not required.
Nothing in this section requires the department to increase the
reporting threshold established in (a) of this subsection or otherwise
requires the department's rules be identical to the federal rules in
scope.
(i) The definitions in section 2 of this act apply throughout this
subsection (5) unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

Sec. 5 RCW 70.94.161 and 1993 c 252 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department of ecology, or board of an authority, shall require
renewable permits for the operation of air contaminant sources subject
to the following conditions and limitations:
(1) Permits shall be issued for a term of five years. A permit may
be modified or amended during its term at the request of the permittee,
or for any reason allowed by the federal clean air act. The rules
adopted pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall include rules
for permit amendments and modifications. The terms and conditions of
a permit shall remain in effect after the permit itself expires if the
permittee submits a timely and complete application for permit renewal.
(2)(a) Rules establishing the elements for a statewide operating
permit program and the process for permit application and renewal
consistent with federal requirements shall be established by the
department by January 1, 1993. The rules shall provide that every
proposed permit must be reviewed prior to issuance by a professional
engineer or staff under the direct supervision of a professional
engineer in the employ of the permitting authority. The permit program
established by these rules shall be administered by the department and
delegated local air authorities. Rules developed under this subsection
shall not preclude a delegated local air authority from including in a
permit its own more stringent emission standards and operating
restrictions.
(b) The board of any local air pollution control authority may
apply to the department of ecology for a delegation order authorizing
the local authority to administer the operating permit program for
sources under that authority's jurisdiction. The department shall, by
order, approve such delegation, if the department finds that the local
authority has the technical and financial resources, to discharge the
responsibilities of a permitting authority under the federal clean air
act. A delegation request shall include adequate information about the
local authority's resources to enable the department to make the
findings required by this subsection((; provided)). However, any
delegation order issued under this subsection shall take effect ninety
days after the environmental protection agency authorizes the local
authority to issue operating permits under the federal clean air act.
(c) Except for the authority granted the energy facility site
evaluation council to issue permits for the new construction,
reconstruction, or enlargement or operation of new energy facilities
under chapter 80.50 RCW, the department may exercise the authority, as
delegated by the environmental protection agency, to administer Title
IV of the federal clean air act as amended and to delegate such
administration to local authorities as applicable pursuant to (b) of
this subsection.
(3) In establishing technical standards, defined in RCW 70.94.030,
the permitting authority shall consider and, if found to be
appropriate, give credit for waste reduction within the process.
(4) Operating permits shall apply to all sources (a) where required
by the federal clean air act, and (b) for any source that may cause or
contribute to air pollution in such quantity as to create a threat to
the public health or welfare. Subsection (b) of this subsection is not
intended to apply to small businesses except when both of the following
limitations are satisfied: (i) The source is in an area exceeding or
threatening to exceed federal or state air quality standards; and (ii)
the department provides a reasonable justification that requiring a
source to have a permit is necessary to meet a federal or state air
quality standard, or to prevent exceeding a standard in an area
threatening to exceed the standard. For purposes of this subsection
"areas threatening to exceed air quality standards" shall mean areas
projected by the department to exceed such standards within five years.
Prior to identifying threatened areas the department shall hold a
public hearing or hearings within the proposed areas.
(5) Sources operated by government agencies are not exempt under
this section.
(6) Within one hundred eighty days after the United States
environmental protection agency approves the state operating permit
program, a person required to have a permit shall submit to the
permitting authority a compliance plan and permit application, signed
by a responsible official, certifying the accuracy of the information
submitted. Until permits are issued, existing sources shall be allowed
to operate under presently applicable standards and conditions provided
that such sources submit complete and timely permit applications.
(7) All draft permits shall be subject to public notice and
comment. The rules adopted pursuant to subsection (2) of this section
shall specify procedures for public notice and comment. Such
procedures shall provide the permitting agency with an opportunity to
respond to comments received from interested parties prior to the time
that the proposed permit is submitted to the environmental protection
agency for review pursuant to section 505(a) of the federal clean air
act. In the event that the environmental protection agency objects to
a proposed permit pursuant to section 505(b) of the federal clean air
act, the permitting authority shall not issue the permit, unless the
permittee consents to the changes required by the environmental
protection agency.
(8) The procedures contained in chapter 43.21B RCW shall apply to
permit appeals. The pollution control hearings board may stay the
effectiveness of any permit issued under this section during the
pendency of an appeal filed by the permittee, if the permittee
demonstrates that compliance with the permit during the pendency of the
appeal would require significant expenditures that would not be
necessary in the event that the permittee prevailed on the merits of
the appeal.
(9) After the effective date of any permit program promulgated
under this section, it shall be unlawful for any person to: (a)
Operate a permitted source in violation of any requirement of a permit
issued under this section; or (b) fail to submit a permit application
at the time required by rules adopted under subsection (2) of this
section.
(10) Each air operating permit shall state the origin of and
specific legal authority for each requirement included therein. Every
requirement in an operating permit shall be based upon the most
stringent of the following requirements:
(a) The federal clean air act and rules implementing that act,
including provision of the approved state implementation plan;
(b) This chapter and rules adopted thereunder;
(c) In permits issued by a local air pollution control authority,
the requirements of any order or regulation adopted by that authority;
(d) Chapter 70.98 RCW and rules adopted thereunder; and
(e) Chapter 80.50 RCW and rules adopted thereunder.
(11) Consistent with the provisions of the federal clean air act,
the permitting authority may issue general permits covering categories
of permitted sources, and temporary permits authorizing emissions from
similar operations at multiple temporary locations.
(12) Permit program sources within the territorial jurisdiction of
an authority delegated the operating permit program shall file their
permit applications with that authority, except that permit
applications for sources regulated on a statewide basis pursuant to RCW
70.94.395 shall be filed with the department. Permit program sources
outside the territorial jurisdiction of a delegated authority shall
file their applications with the department. Permit program sources
subject to chapter 80.50 RCW shall, irrespective of their location,
file their applications with the energy facility site evaluation
council.
(13) When issuing operating permits to coal fired electric
generating plants, the permitting authority shall establish
requirements consistent with Title IV of the federal clean air act.
(14)(a) The department and the local air authorities are authorized
to assess and to collect, and each source emitting one hundred tons or
more per year of a regulated pollutant shall pay an interim assessment
to fund the development of the operating permit program during fiscal
year 1994.
(b) The department shall conduct a workload analysis and prepare an
operating permit program development budget for fiscal year 1994. The
department shall allocate among all sources emitting one hundred tons
or more per year of a regulated pollutant during calendar year 1992 the
costs identified in its program development budget according to a
three-tiered model, with each of the three tiers being equally
weighted, based upon:
(i) The number of sources;
(ii) The complexity of sources; and
(iii) The size of sources, as measured by the quantity of each
regulated pollutant emitted by the source.
(c) Each local authority and the department shall collect from
sources under their respective jurisdictions the interim fee determined
by the department and shall remit the fee to the department.
(d) Each local authority may, in addition, allocate its fiscal year
1994 operating permit program development costs among the sources under
its jurisdiction emitting one hundred tons or more per year of a
regulated pollutant during calendar year 1992 and may collect an
interim fee from these sources. A fee assessed pursuant to this
subsection (14)(d) shall be collected at the same time as the fee
assessed pursuant to (c) of this subsection.
(e) The fees assessed to a source under this subsection shall be
limited to the first seven thousand five hundred tons for each
regulated pollutant per year.
(15)(a) The department shall determine the persons liable for the
fee imposed by subsection (14) of this section, compute the fee, and
provide by November 1 ((of)), 1993, the identity of the fee payer with
the computation of the fee to each local authority and to the
department of revenue for collection. The department of revenue shall
collect the fee computed by the department from the fee payers under
the jurisdiction of the department. The administrative, collection,
and penalty provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW shall apply to the
collection of the fee by the department of revenue. The department
shall provide technical assistance to the department of revenue for
decisions made by the department of revenue pursuant to RCW 82.32.160
and 82.32.170. All interim fees collected by the department of revenue
on behalf of the department and all interim fees collected by local
authorities on behalf of the department shall be deposited in the air
operating permit account. The interim fees collected by the local air
authorities to cover their permit program development costs under
subsection (14)(d) of this section shall be deposited in the dedicated
accounts of their respective treasuries.
(b) All fees identified in this section shall be due and payable on
March 1 ((of)), 1994, except that the local air pollution control
authorities may adopt by rule an earlier date on which fees are to be
due and payable. The section 5, chapter 252, Laws of 1993 amendments
to RCW 70.94.161 do not have the effect of terminating, or in any way
modifying, any liability, civil or criminal, incurred pursuant to the
provisions of RCW 70.94.161 (15) and (17) as they existed prior to July
25, 1993.
(16) For sources or source categories not required to obtain
permits under subsection (4) of this section, the department or local
authority may establish by rule control technology requirements. If
control technology rule revisions are made by the department or local
authority under this subsection, the department or local authority
shall consider the remaining useful life of control equipment
previously installed on existing sources before requiring technology
changes. The department or any local air authority may issue a general
permit, as authorized under the federal clean air act, for such
sources.
(17) Except in the case of greenhouse gas emissions as defined in
section 2 of this act, RCW 70.94.151 shall not apply to any permit
program source after the effective date of United States environmental
protection agency approval of the state operating permit program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Within eighteen months of the next and each
successive global or national assessment of climate change science, the
department shall consult with the climate impacts group at the
University of Washington regarding the science on human-caused climate
change and provide a report to the legislature summarizing that science
and make recommendations regarding whether the greenhouse gas emissions
reductions required under section 3 of this act need to be updated.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To support the implementation of RCW 47.04.280 and
47.01.078(4), the department shall adopt broad statewide goals to
reduce annual per capita vehicle miles traveled by 2050 consistent with
the stated goals of executive order 07-02. Consistent with these
goals, the department shall:
(a) Work with the climate advisory team and develop recommendations
to:
(i) Decrease the annual per capita vehicle miles traveled by
eighteen percent by 2020;
(ii) Decrease the annual per capita vehicle miles traveled by
thirty percent by 2035; and
(iii) Decrease the annual per capita vehicle miles traveled by
fifty percent by 2050; and
(b) Include in those recommendations a set of tools and best
practices to assist state, regional, and local entities in making
progress towards the recommendations established in this subsection.
(3) The climate advisory team process must:
(a) Provide for participation from regional transportation planning
organizations, the Washington state transit association, the Puget
Sound clean air agency, and at least one major private employer that
participates in the commute trip reduction program;
(b) Identify current strategies to reduce vehicle miles traveled in
the state as well as successful strategies in other jurisdictions that
may be applicable in the state; and
(c) Identify potential new revenue options for local and regional
governments to authorize to finance vehicle miles traveled reduction
efforts.
(4) The definitions in section 2 of this act apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature establishes the clean energy jobs growth
initiative in support of a clean energy sector jobs goal of, by 2020,
increasing the number of clean energy sector jobs to twenty-five
thousand from the eight thousand four hundred jobs the state had in
2004. The department, in consultation with the University of
Washington business and economic development center, shall: Analyze
the current opportunities for and participation in the clean energy
economy by minority and women-owned business enterprises in Washington;
identify existing barriers to their successful participation in the
clean energy economy; and develop strategies with specific policy
recommendations to improve their successful participation in the clean
energy economy. The research may be informed by the research of the
Puget Sound regional council prosperity partnership, as well as other
entities. The department shall report to the appropriate committees of
the house of representatives and the senate on their research,
analysis, and recommendations by December 1, 2008.
(2) The legislature directs the employment security department, in
consultation with the department, the state workforce training and
education coordinating board, and the Washington State University
extension energy program to conduct a survey of employers to estimate
the number of clean energy firms in existing Washington state
industries. The survey must also provide wage and employment estimates
for clean energy sectors. After completing the survey, the employment
security department must analyze the current labor market and projected
job growth in clean energy sectors, the wage and benefits ranges of
jobs within clean energy sectors, and the education and training
requirements of entry-level and incumbent workers within those sectors.
Based on this research, the department, in consultation with the
employment security department, and taking into account the
requirements and goals of chapters 80.80 and 19.285 RCW and other state
clean energy and energy efficiency policies, shall propose which
industries will be considered high-demand green industries, based on
current and projected job creation and their strategic importance to
the development of the state's clean energy economy, and which jobs
within those industries will be considered high-wage occupations and
occupations that are part of career pathways to the same, based on
family-sustaining wage and benefits ranges. These designations, and
the results of the employment security department's broader labor
market research, shall inform the planning and strategic direction of
the selected industry skill panels under subsection (3) of this
section, where timely and relevant, and the selection by the state
board for community and technical colleges of recipients of green
collar job training account grants under subsection (4) of this
section.
(3) The state workforce training and education coordinating board
shall create and pilot green energy industry skill panels and
distribute grants to the panels on a competitive basis. The green
energy industry skill panels consist of business representatives from
industry sectors related to clean energy, labor unions representing
workers in those industries or labor affiliates administering
state-approved, joint apprenticeship programs or labor-management
partnership programs that train workers for these industries, employer
associations, educational institutions, and local workforce investment
boards within the region that the panels propose to operate, and other
key stakeholders as determined by the applicant. Any of these
stakeholder organizations are eligible to receive a grant and serve as
the intermediary that convenes and leads the panel. Panel applicants
must provide labor market and industry analysis that demonstrates high
demand, or demand of strategic importance to the development of the
state's clean energy economy as identified in subsection (2) of this
section, for high-wage occupations, or occupations that are part of
career pathways to the same, within the relevant industry sector. The
panel shall:
(a) Conduct labor market and industry analyses, in consultation
with the employment security department, and drawing on the findings of
its research when available;
(b) Plan strategies to meet the recruitment and training needs of
the industry; and
(c) Leverage and align other public and private funding sources.
(4)(a) The green collar job training account is created in the
state treasury. All receipts from appropriations directed to the
account must be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the
account may be used only for the purpose of training workers for
high-wage occupations or occupations that are part of career pathways
to the same in high-demand industries related to clean energy. The
state board for community and technical colleges, in consultation with
the state workforce training and education coordinating board, and
informed by the labor market research of the employment security
department and the green energy industry skill panels, may authorize
expenditures from the account. The state board for community and
technical colleges will distribute grants from the account on a
competitive basis. Applicants eligible to receive these grants may be
any organization or a partnership of organizations that has
demonstrated expertise in:
(i) Implementing effective education and training programs that
meet industry demand; and
(ii) Recruiting and supporting, to successful completion of those
training programs carried out under these grants, the target
populations of workers under (c) of this subsection.
(b) In awarding grants from the green collar job training account,
the state board for community and technical colleges shall give
priority to applicants that demonstrate the ability to:
(i) Use labor market and industry analysis developed by the
employment security department and green energy industry skill panels
under subsection (3) of this section in the design and delivery of the
relevant education and training program, and otherwise utilize
strategies developed by green energy industry skill panels;
(ii) Leverage and align existing public programs and resources and
private resources, toward the goal of recruiting, supporting,
educating, and training target populations of workers under (c) of this
subsection;
(iii) Work collaboratively with other relevant stakeholders in the
regional economy;
(iv) Link adult basic and remedial education, where necessary, with
occupation skills training;
(v) Involve employers and, where applicable, labor unions in the
determination of relevant skills and competencies and, where relevant,
the validation of career pathways; and
(vi) Ensure that supportive services, where necessary, are
integrated with education and training, and delivered by organizations
with direct access to and experience with targeted population of
workers identified under (c) of this subsection.
(c) Target populations of workers include:
(i) Low-income adults and youth in families under two hundred
percent of the federal poverty guidelines or a locally defined
self-sufficiency standard;
(ii) Entry-level or incumbent workers in high-demand green
industries who are in, or are preparing for, high-wage occupations;
(iii) Dislocated workers in declining industries who may be
retrained for high-wage occupations in high-demand green industries; or
(iv) Adults and youth eligible to participate in the opportunity
grant program pursuant to RCW 28B.50.271.
(d) Allowable uses of these grant funds, which should be used when
other public or private funds are insufficient or unavailable, may
include:
(i) Tuition assistance and the purchase of either books or
work-related supplies and tools, or both;
(ii) Curriculum development;
(iii) Outreach, recruitment, career guidance, counseling, and case
management services;
(iv) Occupational skills training, on-the-job training, customized
training, and classroom training;
(v) Basic skills, literacy, general education development
certificate, English as a second language, and preapprenticeship
training;
(vi) Transitional jobs strategies; and
(vii) Support services, including income support, child care,
transportation, and related services.
(e) Training and education programs identified within high-demand
green industries or high-wage occupations and occupations that are part
of career pathways within high-demand green industries are eligible to
participate in the opportunity grant program under RCW 28B.50.271.
(5) Beginning in 2010, the state workforce training and education
coordinating board shall conduct an evaluation of the job training
program established in subsection (4) of this section. The evaluation
shall include, but not be limited to, measures of employment, earnings,
and skill attainment for participants in the program. The workforce
training and education coordinating board shall report the findings of
the evaluation to the governor and the relevant policy committees of
the legislature by December 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Except where explicitly stated otherwise,
nothing in this act alters or limits any authorities of the department
as they existed prior to of the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 RCW 80.80.020 (Greenhouse gases emissions
reduction -- Clean energy economy -- Goals -- Reports) and 2007 c 307 s 3 are
each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Sections 1 through 3, 6, 9, and 10 of this
act constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---