BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.285 and 2005 c 369 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
operating contests of chance; as to such persons, the amount of tax
with respect to the business of operating contests of chance is equal
to the gross income of the business derived from contests of chance
multiplied by the rate of 1.5 percent.
(2) ((An additional tax is imposed on those persons subject to tax
in subsection (1) of this section. The amount of the additional tax
with respect to the business of operating contests of chance is equal
to the gross income of the business derived from contests of chance
multiplied by the rate of 0.1 percent through June 30, 2006, and 0.13
percent thereafter. The money collected under this subsection (2)))
From the tax imposed in subsection (1) of this section, an amount equal
to 0.13 percent of the business's gross income shall be deposited in
the problem gambling account created in RCW 43.20A.892. This
subsection does not apply to businesses operating contests of chance
when the gross income from the operation of contests of chance is less
than fifty thousand dollars per year.
(3) For the purpose of this section, "contests of chance" means any
contests, games, gaming schemes, or gaming devices, other than the
state lottery as defined in RCW 67.70.010, in which the outcome depends
in a material degree upon an element of chance, notwithstanding that
skill of the contestants may also be a factor in the outcome. The term
includes social card games, bingo, raffle, and punchboard games, and
pull-tabs as defined in chapter 9.46 RCW. The term does not include
race meets for the conduct of which a license must be secured from the
Washington horse racing commission, or "amusement game" as defined in
RCW 9.46.0201.
(4) "Gross income of the business" does not include the monetary
value or actual cost of any prizes that are awarded, amounts paid to
players for winning wagers, accrual of prizes for progressive jackpot
contests, or repayment of amounts used to seed guaranteed progressive
jackpot prizes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 RCW 82.04.286 (Tax on horse races) and 2005
c 369 s 6 are each repealed.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.04.350 and 2005 c 369 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Except as provided in RCW 82.04.286(1),)) This chapter shall not
apply to any person in respect to the business of conducting race meets
for the conduct of which a license must be secured from the horse
racing commission.

Sec. 4 RCW 67.16.105 and 2004 c 246 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Licensees of race meets that are nonprofit in nature and are of
ten days or less shall be exempt from payment of a parimutuel tax.
(2) Licensees that do not fall under subsection (1) of this section
shall withhold and pay to the commission daily for each authorized day
of parimutuel wagering the following applicable percentage of all daily
gross receipts from its in-state parimutuel machines:
(a) If the gross receipts of all its in-state parimutuel machines
are more than fifty million dollars in the previous calendar year, the
licensee shall withhold and pay to the commission daily 1.30 percent of
the daily gross receipts; and
(b) If the gross receipts of all its in-state parimutuel machines
are fifty million dollars or less in the previous calendar year, the
licensee shall withhold and pay to the commission daily 1.803 percent
of the daily gross receipts.
(3) In addition to those amounts in subsection (2) of this section,
a licensee shall forward one-tenth of one percent of the daily gross
receipts of all its in-state parimutuel machines to the commission for
payment to those nonprofit race meets as set forth in RCW 67.16.130 and
subsection (1) of this section, but said percentage shall not be
charged against the licensee. Payments to nonprofit race meets under
this subsection shall be distributed on a pro rata per-race-day basis
and used only for purses at race tracks that have been operating under
RCW 67.16.130 and subsection (1) of this section for the five
consecutive years immediately preceding the year of payment. The
commission shall transfer funds generated under subsection (2) of this
section equal to the difference between:
(a)(i) Funds collected under this subsection (3);
(ii) Interest earned from the Washington horse racing commission
operating account created in RCW 67.16.280; and
(iii) Fines imposed by the board of stewards in a calendar year;
and
(b) Three hundred thousand dollars;
and distribute that amount under this subsection (3).
(4) Beginning July 1, 1999, at the conclusion of each authorized
race meet, the commission shall calculate the mathematical average
daily gross receipts of parimutuel wagering that is conducted only at
the physical location of the live race meet at those race meets of
licensees with gross receipts of all their in-state parimutuel machines
of more than fifty million dollars. Such calculation shall include
only the gross parimutuel receipts from wagering occurring on live
racing dates, including live racing receipts and receipts derived from
one simulcast race card that is conducted only at the physical location
of the live racing meet, which, for the purposes of this subsection, is
"the handle." If the calculation exceeds eight hundred eighty-six
thousand dollars, the licensee shall within ten days of receipt of
written notification by the commission forward to the commission a sum
equal to the product obtained by multiplying 0.6 percent by the handle.
Sums collected by the commission under this subsection shall be
forwarded on the next business day following receipt thereof to the
state treasurer to be deposited in the fair fund created in RCW
15.76.115.
(5) From the amounts imposed under subsection (2)(a) and (b) of
this section, an amount equal to 0.13 percent of the licensee's daily
gross receipts shall be deposited in the problem gambling account
created in RCW 43.20A.892.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.04.261 and 2007 c 54 s 7 and 2007 c 48 s 4 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) ((In addition to the taxes imposed under RCW 82.04.260(12), a
surcharge is imposed on those persons who are subject to any of the
taxes imposed under RCW 82.04.260(12). Except as otherwise provided in
this section, the surcharge is)) From the tax imposed under RCW
82.04.260(12), an amount equal to ((0.052)) 0.0052 percent of the
business's gross income shall be deposited into the forest and fish
support account created in RCW 76.09.405. ((The surcharge is added to
the rates provided in RCW 82.04.260(12) (a), (b), (c), and (d).)) The
((surcharge)) deposit and this section expire July 1, 2024.
(2) ((All receipts from the surcharge imposed under this section
shall be deposited into the forest and fish support account created in
RCW 76.09.405.
(3)))(a) The ((surcharge imposed)) deposit required under this
section shall be suspended if:
(i) ((Receipts from the surcharge)) Deposits total at least eight
million dollars during any fiscal biennium; or
(ii) The office of financial management certifies to the department
that the federal government has appropriated at least two million
dollars for participation in forest and fish report-related activities
by federally recognized Indian tribes located within the geographical
boundaries of the state of Washington for any federal fiscal year.
(b)(i) The suspension of the ((surcharge)) deposit under (a)(i) of
this subsection (((3))) (2) shall take effect on the first day of the
calendar month that is at least thirty days after the end of the month
during which the department determines that receipts from the
((surcharge)) deposit total at least eight million dollars during the
fiscal biennium. The ((surcharge)) deposit shall be ((imposed))
required again at the beginning of the following fiscal biennium.
(ii) The suspension of the ((surcharge)) deposit under (a)(ii) of
this subsection (((3))) (2) shall take effect on the later of the first
day of October of any federal fiscal year for which the federal
government appropriates at least two million dollars for participation
in forest and fish report-related activities by federally recognized
Indian tribes located within the geographical boundaries of the state
of Washington, or the first day of a calendar month that is at least
thirty days following the date that the office of financial management
makes a certification to the department under subsection (5) of this
section. The ((surcharge)) deposit shall be ((imposed)) required again
on the first day of the following July.
(((4))) (3)(a) If, by October 1st of any federal fiscal year, the
office of financial management certifies to the department that the
federal government has appropriated funds for participation in forest
and fish report-related activities by federally recognized Indian
tribes located within the geographical boundaries of the state of
Washington but the amount of the appropriation is less than two million
dollars, the department shall adjust the ((surcharge)) deposit in
accordance with this subsection.
(b) The department shall adjust the ((surcharge)) deposit by an
amount that the department estimates will cause the amount of funds
deposited into the forest and fish support account for the state fiscal
year that begins July 1st and that includes the beginning of the
federal fiscal year for which the federal appropriation is made, to be
reduced by twice the amount of the federal appropriation for
participation in forest and fish report-related activities by federally
recognized Indian tribes located within the geographical boundaries of
the state of Washington.
(c) Any adjustment in the ((surcharge)) deposit shall take effect
at the beginning of a calendar month that is at least thirty days after
the date that the office of financial management makes the
certification under subsection (5) of this section.
(d) The ((surcharge)) deposit shall be ((imposed)) required again
at the rate provided in subsection (1) of this section on the first day
of the following state fiscal year unless the ((surcharge)) deposit is
suspended under subsection (((3))) (2) of this section or adjusted for
that fiscal year under this subsection.
(((e) Adjustments of the amount of the surcharge by the department
are final and shall not be used to challenge the validity of the
surcharge imposed under this section.
(f) The department shall provide timely notice to affected
taxpayers of the suspension of the surcharge or an adjustment of the
surcharge.))
(4) A suspension or adjustment of the deposit required under
subsection (1) of this section may not result in a reduction of the
rate imposed under RCW 82.04.260(12). During any period of suspension
or adjustment, revenues shall be deposited in the general fund.
(5) The office of financial management shall make the certification
to the department as to the status of federal appropriations for tribal
participation in forest and fish report-related activities.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.32.045 and 2006 c 256 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, payments of the
taxes imposed under chapters 82.04, 82.08, 82.12, 82.14, and 82.16 RCW,
along with reports and returns on forms prescribed by the department,
are due monthly within twenty-five days after the end of the month in
which the taxable activities occur.
(2) The department of revenue may relieve any taxpayer or class of
taxpayers from the obligation of remitting monthly and may require the
return to cover other longer reporting periods, but in no event may
returns be filed for a period greater than one year. For these
taxpayers, tax payments are due on or before the last day of the month
next succeeding the end of the period covered by the return.
(3) The department of revenue may also require verified annual
returns from any taxpayer, setting forth such additional information as
it may deem necessary to correctly determine tax liability.
(4) Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the
department may relieve any person of the requirement to file returns if
the following conditions are met:
(a) The person's value of products, gross proceeds of sales, or
gross income of the business, from all business activities taxable
under chapter 82.04 RCW, is less ((than twenty-eight thousand dollars))
per year than the maximum credit under RCW 82.04.4451 for a year
divided by the tax rate for other business services under RCW
82.04.290(2);
(b) The person's gross income of the business from all activities
taxable under chapter 82.16 RCW is less than twenty-four thousand
dollars per year; and
(c) The person is not required to collect or pay to the department
of revenue any other tax or fee which the department is authorized to
collect.

Sec. 7 RCW 82.04.4451 and 1997 c 238 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed against the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter, as
provided in this section. The maximum credit for a taxpayer for a
reporting period is thirty-five dollars multiplied by the number of
months in the reporting period, as determined under RCW 82.32.045.
(2) When the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter is
equal to or less than the maximum credit, a credit is allowed equal to
the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter.
(3) When the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter exceeds
the maximum credit, a reduced credit is allowed equal to twice the
maximum credit, minus the tax otherwise due under this chapter, but not
less than zero.
(4) The department may prepare a tax credit table consisting of tax
ranges using increments of no more than five dollars and a
corresponding tax credit to be applied to those tax ranges. The table
shall be prepared in such a manner that no taxpayer will owe a greater
amount of tax by using the table than would be owed by performing the
calculation under subsections (1) through (3) of this section. A table
prepared by the department under this subsection shall be used by all
taxpayers in taking the credit provided in this section.
(5) Beginning in calendar year 2009, the department shall increase
the monthly dollar amount under subsection (1) of this section in use
for that calendar year by the consumer price index. If any increase
under this subsection is not a multiple of one dollar, the increase
must be rounded to the next lowest multiple of one dollar. The monthly
amount determined under this subsection must be used for reporting
periods in the next calendar year.
(6) "Consumer price index" means the consumer price index compiled
by the bureau of labor statistics, United States department of labor
for the state of Washington. If the bureau of labor statistics
develops more than one consumer price index for areas within the state,
the index covering the greatest number of people, covering areas
exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and including all items
must be used as the consumer price index in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act takes effect January 1, 2009.

--- END ---