BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.56.020 and 2007 c 105 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The county treasurer shall be the receiver and collector of all
taxes extended upon the tax rolls of the county, whether levied for
state, county, school, bridge, road, municipal or other purposes, and
also of all fines, forfeitures or penalties received by any person or
officer for the use of his or her county. No treasurer shall accept
tax payments or issue receipts for the same until the treasurer has
completed the tax roll for the current year's collection and provided
notification of the completion of the roll. Notification may be
accomplished electronically, by posting a notice in the office, or
through other written communication as determined by the treasurer.
All taxes upon real and personal property made payable by the
provisions of this title shall be due and payable to the treasurer on
or before the thirtieth day of April and, except as provided in this
section, shall be delinquent after that date.
(2) Each tax statement must be mailed to the property owner, in
addition to any lien holders or taxpayers.
(3) Each tax statement shall include a notice that checks for
payment of taxes may be made payable to "Treasurer of . . . . . .
County" or other appropriate office, but tax statements shall not
include any suggestion that checks may be made payable to the name of
the individual holding the office of treasurer nor any other
individual.
(((3))) (4) When the total amount of tax or special assessments on
personal property or on any lot, block or tract of real property
payable by one person is fifty dollars or more, and if one-half of such
tax be paid on or before the thirtieth day of April, the remainder of
such tax shall be due and payable on or before the thirty-first day of
October following and shall be delinquent after that date.
(((4))) (5) When the total amount of tax or special assessments on
any lot, block or tract of real property or on any mobile home payable
by one person is fifty dollars or more, and if one-half of such tax be
paid after the thirtieth day of April but before the thirty-first day
of October, together with the applicable interest and penalty on the
full amount of tax payable for that year, the remainder of such tax
shall be due and payable on or before the thirty-first day of October
following and shall be delinquent after that date.
(((5))) (6) Delinquent taxes under this section are subject to
interest at the rate of twelve percent per annum computed on a monthly
basis on the full year amount of tax unpaid from the date of
delinquency until paid. Interest shall be calculated at the rate in
effect at the time of payment of the tax, regardless of when the taxes
were first delinquent. In addition, delinquent taxes under this
section are subject to penalties as follows:
(a) A penalty of three percent of the full year amount of tax
unpaid shall be assessed on the tax delinquent on June 1st of the year
in which the tax is due.
(b) An additional penalty of eight percent shall be assessed on the
amount of tax delinquent on December 1st of the year in which the tax
is due.
(((6))) (7) Subsection (((5))) (6) of this section notwithstanding,
no interest or penalties may be assessed during any period of armed
conflict on delinquent taxes imposed on the personal residences owned
by active duty military personnel who are participating as part of one
of the branches of the military involved in the conflict and assigned
to a duty station outside the territorial boundaries of the United
States.
(((7))) (8) For purposes of this chapter, "interest" means both
interest and penalties.
(((8))) (9) All collections of interest on delinquent taxes shall
be credited to the county current expense fund; but the cost of
foreclosure and sale of real property, and the fees and costs of
distraint and sale of personal property, for delinquent taxes, shall,
when collected, be credited to the operation and maintenance fund of
the county treasurer prosecuting the foreclosure or distraint or sale;
and shall be used by the county treasurer as a revolving fund to defray
the cost of further foreclosure, distraint and sale for delinquent
taxes without regard to budget limitations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 84.40 RCW
to read as follows:
If an assessor provides notice of assessed values to taxpayers, the
assessor must provide for the upcoming tax year, plus the three
previous years, the following information: (1) The assessed value; (2)
the rate of tax; and (3) the aggregate tax amount. Such amounts must
be shown as a dollar amount by year. The notice must include a
statement that information for the upcoming tax year will be based on
an assumption that the combined levy of the taxing districts will
increase one percent, and will not include any voter-approved property
tax increases occurring after the notice is sent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 84.56 RCW
to read as follows:
Each tax statement must show for the current tax year, plus the
previous three tax years: (1) The amount levied by each district; (2)
the assessed value; (3) the rate of tax; and (4) the aggregate tax
amount. Such amounts must be shown as a dollar amount by year. In
addition, for subsection (4) of this section, the statement must show
the net change from year to year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act applies to taxes levied for
collection in 2009 and thereafter.

--- END ---