BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Identity theft is an epidemic in Washington
state. Washington consistently ranks among the top ten states for
citizen victimization by identity theft.
It is rare that the crime of identity theft does not involve
multiple crimes, such as burglary, drug crimes, and fraud. About two-thirds of identity theft criminals are habitual offenders who have
prior convictions. Perpetrators of identity theft do not
geographically contain themselves, often infiltrating numerous counties
in search of citizens, merchants, and financial institutions to
victimize.
It is essential to establish a central clearinghouse where all
types of information related to identity theft can be deposited,
analyzed, and disseminated to law enforcement and prosecutors. A
central identity theft clearinghouse will increase multijurisdictional
investigative and prosecuting efforts, including greater access to and
use of analysts.
In 2002, local, state, and federal law enforcement agencies in
Washington joined together to develop a new system of intelligence
sharing. The key component of the system is the Washington joint
analytical center (WAJAC), a centralized fusion center serving as a
single point of intelligence collection. Regional intelligence groups
located throughout the state provide a link to line level personnel and
homeland security partners. The purpose of WAJAC is to investigate
crimes with the goal of preventing acts of terrorism.
It is the intent of the legislature to create and locate a central
identity theft clearinghouse with WAJAC. This colocation will enhance
the missions of both entities as a result of their ability to share and
coordinate pertinent information and thus maximize the efforts of law
enforcement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 36.28A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall
establish the Washington identity theft analysis center (WITAC) and
shall choose a location for the center.
(2) The purpose of WITAC is to fuse or combine, in one place,
information from divergent sources concerning identity theft in order
to facilitate the analysis of such information and dissemination to
appropriate law enforcement with the goal of bringing the perpetrators
of identity theft crimes to justice.
(a) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall
develop operational linkages between WITAC and the Washington joint
analytical center for the purpose of sharing information to the extent
allowable under the law.
The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall
select the WITAC manager.
(b) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall
have authority to initiate and terminate the hiring of employees for
WITAC as well as seek nominations for individuals from county and city
jurisdictions to be part of WITAC staff.
(3) WITAC is directed to create and maintain a web site accessible
to law enforcement, prosecutors, and the department of licensing.
(a) Subject to chapter 10.97 RCW, the web site shall be a central
repository of information pertaining to identity theft arrests and
convictions.
(b) Each local law enforcement agency shall transmit its identity
theft incident reports to WITAC.
(c) Information pertaining to identity theft may be contributed by
private parties; however, data shall not be accessible by or
disclosable to private parties.
(4)(a) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs
shall provide WITAC with staff not to exceed ten employees, and
resources, within funds appropriated for this purpose, and may solicit
and accept the temporary loan of law enforcement officers and other
personnel as provided in (b) of this subsection.
(b) Law enforcement agencies may assign officers or other
knowledgeable personnel to WITAC for a minimum term of two years, and
WITAC shall train the officers or other personnel as analysts. The
salaries of the local law enforcement officers or other personnel shall
be paid by the state while so employed.

Sec. 3 RCW 42.56.240 and 2005 c 274 s 404 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following investigative, law enforcement, and crime victim
information is exempt from public inspection and copying under this
chapter:
(1) Specific intelligence information and specific investigative
records compiled by investigative, law enforcement, and penology
agencies, and state agencies vested with the responsibility to
discipline members of any profession, the nondisclosure of which is
essential to effective law enforcement or for the protection of any
person's right to privacy;
(2) Information revealing the identity of persons who are witnesses
to or victims of crime or who file complaints with investigative, law
enforcement, or penology agencies, other than the commission, if
disclosure would endanger any person's life, physical safety, or
property. If at the time a complaint is filed the complainant, victim,
or witness indicates a desire for disclosure or nondisclosure, such
desire shall govern. However, all complaints filed with the commission
about any elected official or candidate for public office must be made
in writing and signed by the complainant under oath;
(3) Any records of investigative reports prepared by any state,
county, municipal, or other law enforcement agency pertaining to sex
offenses contained in chapter 9A.44 RCW or sexually violent offenses as
defined in RCW 71.09.020, which have been transferred to the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs for permanent electronic
retention and retrieval pursuant to RCW 40.14.070(2)(b);
(4) License applications under RCW 9.41.070; copies of license
applications or information on the applications may be released to law
enforcement or corrections agencies; ((and))
(5) Information revealing the identity of child victims of sexual
assault who are under age eighteen. Identifying information means the
child victim's name, address, location, photograph, and in cases in
which the child victim is a relative or stepchild of the alleged
perpetrator, identification of the relationship between the child and
the alleged perpetrator; and
(6) Information maintained by the Washington identity theft
analysis center for the web site created under section 2(3) of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The sum of . . . . . . . . dollars, or as
much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2009, from the general fund to the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs to be used for the purposes
of section 2 of this act.

--- END ---