BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.330.250 and 2005 c 427 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The economic development strategic reserve account is created
in the state treasury to be used only for the purposes of this section.
(2) One-third of the amount deposited in the account annually shall
be reserved for and expended on the staffing and operational costs of
the economic development commission created in chapter 43.162 RCW.
(3) Only the governor, with the recommendation of the director of
the department of community, trade, and economic development and the
economic development commission, may authorize expenditures from the
nonreserved funds in the account.
(((3) Expenditures from the account shall be made in an amount
sufficient to fund a minimum of one staff position for the economic
development commission and to cover any other operational costs of the
commission.))
(4) Expenditures from the account may be made to prevent closure of
a business or facility, to prevent relocation of a business or facility
in the state to a location outside the state, or to recruit a business
or facility to the state. Expenditures may be authorized for:
(a) Workforce development;
(b) Public infrastructure needed to support or sustain the
operations of the business or facility; and
(c) Other lawfully provided assistance, including, but not limited
to, technical assistance, environmental analysis, relocation
assistance, and planning assistance. Funding may be provided for such
assistance only when it is in the public interest and may only be
provided under a contractual arrangement ensuring that the state will
receive appropriate consideration, such as an assurance of job creation
or retention.
(5) The nonreserved funds shall not be expended from the account
unless:
(a) The circumstances are such that time does not permit the
director of the department of community, trade, and economic
development or the business or facility to secure funding from other
state sources;
(b) The business or facility produces or will produce significant
long-term economic benefits to the state, a region of the state, or a
particular community in the state;
(c) The business or facility does not require continuing state
support;
(d) The expenditure will result in new jobs, job retention, or
higher incomes for citizens of the state;
(e) The expenditure will not supplant private investment; and
(f) The expenditure is accompanied by private investment.
(6) No more than three million dollars per year may be expended
from the account for the purpose of assisting an individual business or
facility pursuant to the authority specified in this section.
(7) If the account balance in the strategic reserve account exceeds
fifteen million dollars at any time, the amount in excess of fifteen
million dollars shall be transferred to the education construction
account.

--- END ---