BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The purpose of this act is to provide
eligible cities additional incentives for economic development in order
to: Assist with the costs of infrastructure necessary to create or
retain jobs within an eligible city; reduce the deficit between job
growth and population growth; reduce carbon footprints; increase
density and reduce urban sprawl consistent with adopted plans; and
reduce future transportation costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A city that imposes a local tax on
public and private utilities may impose an additional tax, at a rate of
up to one percent, on all utility services within the city limits of
the city, if that city has a population of twenty-five thousand persons
or more, and is located in a county with a projected job growth rate
that is ten percent lower than the projected population growth rate
according to the adopted regional growth strategy of the Puget Sound
regional council.
(2) Revenue from the tax authorized under subsection (1) of this
section may be used by an eligible city solely for the purpose of
construction, reconstruction, financing, refinancing, design,
operation, and maintenance of public infrastructure necessary for
economic development projects, which create or retain businesses and
family wage jobs in the eligible city.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Eligible city" means a city that has imposed the tax provided
for in section 2 of this act.
(b) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(c) "Economic development infrastructure project" means a project
within an eligible city that develops public infrastructure that
facilitates the creation or retention of businesses and family wage
jobs.
(2)(a) If an eligible city applies for a competitive loan or grant
for a project with the transportation improvement board, the community
and economic revitalization board, the public works trust fund, or the
local infrastructure financing tool, the city is entitled to receive
additional points, worth a minimum of ten percent of the total score,
which must be added to the project's score in the application review
process as provided in RCW 47.26.160, 43.160.060, 43.155.070, and
39.102.040.
(b)(i) An eligible city may apply for a refund of taxes on public
economic development infrastructure projects for the amount of the
state portion of sales and use taxes levied and collected under
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW. Application must be made to the
department in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The
application must contain information required by the department,
necessary to determine whether the project for which the refund is
sought is an economic development infrastructure project. The
department must approve the application within sixty days if it meets
the requirements of this chapter. No more than two million dollars in
refunds shall be given to each eligible city in any calendar year.
(ii) Applications and any other information received by the
department under this section are not confidential and are subject to
disclosure. Chapter 82.32 RCW applies to the administration of this
section.
(iii) An eligible city may retain the proceeds of the state sales
and use tax refund provided for in this section and combine this
revenue with (A) the proceeds of one or more additional economic
development infrastructure projects for which the refund has been
granted; (B) revenue from the tax authorized in section 2 of this act;
and (C) other revenue sources available to the eligible city for the
purposes of constructing economic development infrastructure projects.

Sec. 4 RCW 47.26.160 and 1995 c 269 s 2607 are each amended to
read as follows:
The transportation improvement board shall:
(1) Adopt rules necessary to implement the provisions of chapter
47.66 RCW and this chapter relating to the allocation of funds;
(2) Adopt reasonably uniform design standards for city and county
arterials;
(3) Use a scoring system in evaluating applications for the
allocation of funds and the board shall assign additional points, worth
ten percent of the total score, which must be added to the project's
final score, for cities that are eligible cities under section 3 of
this act.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.160.060 and 2007 c 231 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board is authorized to make direct loans to political
subdivisions of the state and to federally recognized Indian tribes for
the purposes of assisting the political subdivisions and federally
recognized Indian tribes in financing the cost of public facilities,
including development of land and improvements for public facilities,
project-specific environmental, capital facilities, land use,
permitting, feasibility, and marketing studies and plans; project
design, site planning, and analysis; project debt and revenue impact
analysis; as well as the construction, rehabilitation, alteration,
expansion, or improvement of the facilities. A grant may also be
authorized for purposes designated in this chapter, but only when, and
to the extent that, a loan is not reasonably possible, given the
limited resources of the political subdivision or the federally
recognized Indian tribe and the finding by the board that financial
circumstances require grant assistance to enable the project to move
forward. However, at least ten percent of all financial assistance
provided by the board in any biennium shall consist of grants to
political subdivisions and federally recognized Indian tribes.
Application for funds shall be made in the form and manner as the
board may prescribe. In making grants or loans the board shall conform
to the following requirements:
(1) The board shall not provide financial assistance:
(a) For a project the primary purpose of which is to facilitate or
promote a retail shopping development or expansion.
(b) For any project that evidence exists would result in a
development or expansion that would displace existing jobs in any other
community in the state.
(c) For the acquisition of real property, including buildings and
other fixtures which are a part of real property.
(d) For a project the primary purpose of which is to facilitate or
promote gambling.
(2) The board shall only provide financial assistance:
(a) For those projects which would result in specific private
developments or expansions (i) in manufacturing, production, food
processing, assembly, warehousing, advanced technology, research and
development, and industrial distribution; (ii) for processing
recyclable materials or for facilities that support recycling,
including processes not currently provided in the state, including but
not limited to, de-inking facilities, mixed waste paper, plastics, yard
waste, and problem-waste processing; (iii) for manufacturing facilities
that rely significantly on recyclable materials, including but not
limited to waste tires and mixed waste paper; (iv) which support the
relocation of businesses from nondistressed urban areas to rural
counties or rural natural resources impact areas; or (v) which
substantially support the trading of goods or services outside of the
state's borders.
(b) For projects which it finds will improve the opportunities for
the successful maintenance, establishment, or expansion of industrial
or commercial plants or will otherwise assist in the creation or
retention of long-term economic opportunities.
(c) When the application includes convincing evidence that a
specific private development or expansion is ready to occur and will
occur only if the public facility improvement is made.
(3) The board shall prioritize each proposed project according to:
(a) The relative benefits provided to the community by the jobs the
project would create, not just the total number of jobs it would create
after the project is completed and according to the unemployment rate
in the area in which the jobs would be located;
(b) The rate of return of the state's investment, that includes the
expected increase in state and local tax revenues associated with the
project; and
(c) Whether the applicant has developed and adhered to guidelines
regarding its permitting process for those applying for development
permits consistent with section 1(2), chapter 231, Laws of 2007.
(4) In assigning priority to a project as required under subsection
(3) of this section, the board shall use a scoring system and, for
cities that are eligible cities under section 3 of this act, assign
additional points, worth ten percent of the total score, which must be
added to the project's score in the application review process.
(5) A responsible official of the political subdivision or the
federally recognized Indian tribe shall be present during board
deliberations and provide information that the board requests.
Before any financial assistance application is approved, the
political subdivision or the federally recognized Indian tribe seeking
the assistance must demonstrate to the community economic
revitalization board that no other timely source of funding is
available to it at costs reasonably similar to financing available from
the community economic revitalization board.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.155.070 and 2007 c 341 s 24 and 2007 c 231 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) To qualify for loans or pledges under this chapter the board
must determine that a local government meets all of the following
conditions:
(a) The city or county must be imposing a tax under chapter 82.46
RCW at a rate of at least one-quarter of one percent;
(b) The local government must have developed a capital facility
plan; and
(c) The local government must be using all local revenue sources
which are reasonably available for funding public works, taking into
consideration local employment and economic factors.
(2) Except where necessary to address a public health need or
substantial environmental degradation, a county, city, or town planning
under RCW 36.70A.040 must have adopted a comprehensive plan, including
a capital facilities plan element, and development regulations as
required by RCW 36.70A.040. This subsection does not require any
county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 to adopt a
comprehensive plan or development regulations before requesting or
receiving a loan or loan guarantee under this chapter if such request
is made before the expiration of the time periods specified in RCW
36.70A.040. A county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040
which has not adopted a comprehensive plan and development regulations
within the time periods specified in RCW 36.70A.040 is not prohibited
from receiving a loan or loan guarantee under this chapter if the
comprehensive plan and development regulations are adopted as required
by RCW 36.70A.040 before submitting a request for a loan or loan
guarantee.
(3) In considering awarding loans for public facilities to special
districts requesting funding for a proposed facility located in a
county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040, the board shall
consider whether the county, city, or town planning under RCW
36.70A.040 in whose planning jurisdiction the proposed facility is
located has adopted a comprehensive plan and development regulations as
required by RCW 36.70A.040.
(4) The board shall develop a priority process for public works
projects as provided in this section. The intent of the priority
process is to maximize the value of public works projects accomplished
with assistance under this chapter. The board shall attempt to assure
a geographical balance in assigning priorities to projects. The board
shall consider at least the following factors in assigning a priority
to a project:
(a) Whether the local government receiving assistance has
experienced severe fiscal distress resulting from natural disaster or
emergency public works needs;
(b) Except as otherwise conditioned by RCW 43.155.110, whether the
entity receiving assistance is a Puget Sound partner, as defined in RCW
90.71.010;
(c) Whether the project is referenced in the action agenda
developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310;
(d) Whether the project is critical in nature and would affect the
health and safety of a great number of citizens;
(e) Whether the applicant has developed and adhered to guidelines
regarding its permitting process for those applying for development
permits consistent with section 1(2), chapter 231, Laws of 2007;
(f) The cost of the project compared to the size of the local
government and amount of loan money available;
(g) The number of communities served by or funding the project;
(h) Whether the project is located in an area of high unemployment,
compared to the average state unemployment;
(i) Whether the project is the acquisition, expansion, improvement,
or renovation by a local government of a public water system that is in
violation of health and safety standards, including the cost of
extending existing service to such a system;
(j) The relative benefit of the project to the community,
considering the present level of economic activity in the community and
the existing local capacity to increase local economic activity in
communities that have low economic growth; and
(k) Other criteria that the board considers advisable.
(5) In assigning priority to a project as required under subsection
(4) of this section, the board shall use a scoring system and, for
cities that are eligible cities under section 3 of this act, assign
additional points, worth ten percent of the total score, which must be
added to the project's score in the application review process.
(6) Existing debt or financial obligations of local governments
shall not be refinanced under this chapter. Each local government
applicant shall provide documentation of attempts to secure additional
local or other sources of funding for each public works project for
which financial assistance is sought under this chapter.
(((6))) (7) Before November 1st of each year, the board shall
develop and submit to the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate
and house of representatives a description of the loans made under RCW
43.155.065, 43.155.068, and subsection (((9))) (10) of this section
during the preceding fiscal year and a prioritized list of projects
which are recommended for funding by the legislature, including one
copy to the staff of each of the committees. The list shall include,
but not be limited to, a description of each project and recommended
financing, the terms and conditions of the loan or financial guarantee,
the local government jurisdiction and unemployment rate, demonstration
of the jurisdiction's critical need for the project and documentation
of local funds being used to finance the public works project. The
list shall also include measures of fiscal capacity for each
jurisdiction recommended for financial assistance, compared to
authorized limits and state averages, including local government sales
taxes; real estate excise taxes; property taxes; and charges for or
taxes on sewerage, water, garbage, and other utilities.
(((7))) (8) The board shall not sign contracts or otherwise
financially obligate funds from the public works assistance account
before the legislature has appropriated funds for a specific list of
public works projects. The legislature may remove projects from the
list recommended by the board. The legislature shall not change the
order of the priorities recommended for funding by the board.
(((8))) (9) Subsection (((7))) (8) of this section does not apply
to loans made under RCW 43.155.065, 43.155.068, and subsection (((9)))
(10) of this section.
(((9))) (10) Loans made for the purpose of capital facilities plans
shall be exempted from subsection (((7))) (8) of this section.
(((10))) (11) To qualify for loans or pledges for solid waste or
recycling facilities under this chapter, a city or county must
demonstrate that the solid waste or recycling facility is consistent
with and necessary to implement the comprehensive solid waste
management plan adopted by the city or county under chapter 70.95 RCW.
(((11))) (12) After January 1, 2010, any project designed to
address the effects of storm water or wastewater on Puget Sound may be
funded under this section only if the project is not in conflict with
the action agenda developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW
90.71.310.

Sec. 7 RCW 39.102.040 and 2007 c 229 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Prior to applying to the board to use local infrastructure
financing, a sponsoring local government shall:
(a) Designate a revenue development area within the limitations in
RCW 39.102.060;
(b) Certify that the conditions in RCW 39.102.070 are met;
(c) Complete the process in RCW 39.102.080;
(d) Provide public notice as required in RCW 39.102.100; and
(e) Pass an ordinance adopting the revenue development area as
required in RCW 39.102.090.
(2) Any local government that has created an increment area under
chapter 39.89 RCW and has not issued bonds to finance any public
improvement may apply to the board and have its increment area
considered for approval as a revenue development area under this
chapter without adopting a new revenue development area under RCW
39.102.090 and 39.102.100 if it amends its ordinance to comply with RCW
39.102.090(1) and otherwise meets the conditions and limitations under
this chapter.
(3) As a condition to imposing a sales and use tax under RCW
82.14.475, a sponsoring local government, including any cosponsoring
local government seeking authority to impose a sales and use tax under
RCW 82.14.475, must apply to the board and be approved for a project
award amount. The application shall be in a form and manner prescribed
by the board and include but not be limited to information establishing
that the applicant is an eligible candidate to impose the local sales
and use tax under RCW 82.14.475, the anticipated effective date for
imposing the tax, the estimated number of years that the tax will be
imposed, and the estimated amount of tax revenue to be received in each
fiscal year that the tax will be imposed. The board shall make
available forms to be used for this purpose. As part of the
application, each applicant must provide to the board a copy of the
ordinance or ordinances creating the revenue development area as
required in RCW 39.102.090. A notice of approval to use local
infrastructure financing shall contain a project award that represents
the maximum amount of state contribution that the applicant, including
any cosponsoring local governments, can earn each year that local
infrastructure financing is used. The total of all project awards
shall not exceed the annual state contribution limit. The
determination of a project award shall be made based on information
contained in the application and the remaining amount of annual state
contribution limit to be awarded. Determination of a project award by
the board is final.
(4)(a) Sponsoring local governments, and any cosponsoring local
governments, applying in calendar year 2007 for a competitive project
award, must submit completed applications to the board no later than
July 1, 2007. By September 15, 2007, in consultation with the
department of revenue and the department of community, trade, and
economic development, the board shall approve competitive project
awards from competitive applications submitted by the 2007 deadline.
No more than two million five hundred thousand dollars in competitive
project awards shall be approved in 2007. For projects not approved by
the board in 2007, sponsoring and cosponsoring local governments may
apply again to the board in 2008 for approval of a project.
(b) Sponsoring local governments, and any cosponsoring local
governments, applying in calendar year 2008 for a competitive project
award, must submit completed applications to the board no later than
July 1, 2008. By September 18, 2008, in consultation with the
department of revenue and the department of community, trade, and
economic development, the board shall approve competitive project
awards from competitive applications submitted by the 2008 deadline.
(c) Except as provided in RCW 39.102.050(2), a total of no more
than five million dollars in competitive project awards shall be
approved for local infrastructure financing.
(d) The project selection criteria and weighting developed prior to
July 22, 2007, for the application evaluation and approval process
shall apply to applications received prior to November 1, 2007. In
evaluating applications for a competitive project award after November
1, 2007, the board shall, in consultation with the Washington state
economic development commission, develop the relative weight to be
assigned to the following criteria:
(i) The project's potential to enhance the sponsoring local
government's regional and/or international competitiveness;
(ii) The project's ability to encourage mixed use and transit-oriented development and the redevelopment of a geographic area;
(iii) Achieving an overall distribution of projects statewide that
reflect geographic diversity;
(iv) The estimated wages and benefits for the project is greater
than the average labor market area;
(v) The estimated state and local net employment change over the
life of the project;
(vi) The current economic health and vitality of the proposed
revenue development area and the contiguous community and the estimated
impact of the proposed project on the proposed revenue development area
and contiguous community;
(vii) The estimated state and local net property tax change over
the life of the project;
(viii) The estimated state and local sales and use tax increase
over the life of the project;
(ix) An analysis that shows that, over the life of the project,
neither the local excise tax allocation revenues nor the local property
tax allocation revenues will constitute more than eighty percent of the
total local funds as described in RCW 39.102.020(29)(c); and
(x) If a project is located within an urban growth area, evidence
that the project utilizes existing urban infrastructure and that the
transportation needs of the project will be adequately met through the
use of local infrastructure financing or other sources.
(e) In assigning weight to a project as required under (d) of this
subsection, the board shall, for cities that are eligible cities under
section 3 of this act, assign additional points, worth ten percent of
the total score, which must be added to the project's score in the
application review process.
(f)(i) Except as provided in this subsection (4)(((e))) (f), the
board may not approve the use of local infrastructure financing within
more than one revenue development area per county.
(ii) In a county in which the board has approved the use of local
infrastructure financing, the use of such financing in additional
revenue development areas may be approved, subject to the following
conditions:
(A) The sponsoring local government is located in more than one
county; and
(B) The sponsoring local government designates a revenue
development area that comprises portions of a county within which the
use of local infrastructure financing has not yet been approved.
(iii) In a county where the local infrastructure financing tool is
authorized under RCW 39.102.050, the board may approve additional use
of the local infrastructure financing tool.
(5) Once the board has approved the sponsoring local government,
and any cosponsoring local governments, to use local infrastructure
financing, notification must be sent by the board to the sponsoring
local government, and any cosponsoring local governments, authorizing
the sponsoring local government, and any cosponsoring local
governments, to impose the local sales and use tax authorized under RCW
82.14.475, subject to the conditions in RCW 82.14.475.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 35 RCW.

--- END ---