BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW
to read as follows:
In the process of reviewing and selecting sites to meet highway
construction environmental mitigation requirements under the national
environmental policy act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 4321 et seq.) and chapter
43.21C RCW, the department shall, to the greatest extent possible,
consider using public land first.
If public lands are not available that meet the required
environmental mitigation needs, the department may use other sites
while making every effort to avoid any net loss of agricultural lands
that have a designation of long-term commercial significance.

--- END ---