BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends that the revised
mathematics standards by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction will set higher expectations for Washington's students by
fortifying content and increasing rigor; provide greater clarity,
specificity, and measurability about what is expected of students in
each grade; supply more explicit guidance to educators about what to
teach and when; enhance the relevance of mathematics to students'
lives; and ultimately result in more Washington students having the
opportunity to be successful in mathematics. Additionally, the revised
mathematics standards should restructure the standards to make clear
the importance of all aspects of mathematics: Mathematics content
including the standard algorithms, conceptual understanding of the
content, and the application of mathematical processes within the
content.

--- END ---