BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the state has
committed to raise the achievement of all children of Washington
including children with visual impairments or blindness. The
legislature also finds that children with visual impairments and
blindness can benefit greatly if they are taught by an educator who is
trained to understand the learning, communication, and
orientation/mobility issues that blind and visually impaired children
encounter. Individuals who receive teacher training in educating the
visually impaired and blind acquire strategies to assist students in
reacting to and interacting with their environment and reach
achievement levels equal to sighted children. The legislature intends
to take the first steps to having such an in-state teacher preparation
program for teachers of visually impaired and blind students by
assessing the needs of the state in this area.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The professional educator standards board
shall consider approving out-of-state institutions of higher education
for the purposes of establishing a specialty endorsement program. By
December 15, 2008, the board shall report to the education committees
of the legislature the process used by the board for such consideration
and whether the board supports approval of out-of-state institutions of
higher education for the purposes of establishing a specialty
endorsement program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) As part of the state needs assessment
process conducted by the higher education coordinating board in
accordance with RCW 28B.76.230 and in consultation with interested
parties who are knowledgeable about training programs for teachers of
visually impaired and blind students and orientation/mobility teachers,
the board shall assess the need for baccalaureate and/or postgraduate
degree programs in Washington that specialize in teacher preparation
programs for teachers of visually impaired and blind students and
orientation/mobility teachers in Washington's preschools, and
elementary, middle, and high schools. If the board determines that
there is a need for one or more programs in Washington, then the board
shall encourage the appropriate institutions of higher education or
institutional sectors to create such a program or programs.
(2) By November 30, 2008, the board shall report to the legislature
on the needs assessment. The report shall also include a
recommendation on the appropriate level of one-time or start-up funding
to support the educator preparation program for teachers of visually
impaired and blind students and orientation/mobility teachers in
Washington's preschools and elementary, middle, and high schools.
Additionally, the report shall indicate which institutions or
institutional sectors demonstrate an interest or could be successful in
building and sustaining a high quality program, including which
institutions:
(a) Demonstrate the capacity to make a long-term commitment of
resources to build and sustain a program; and
(b) Can readily engage faculty appropriately qualified to develop
and deliver a high quality curriculum at the baccalaureate and/or
postgraduate level.

--- END ---