BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
establish best practices for students at risk to create a school
environment where students feel safe and that prevents problems from
starting; to ensure that school personnel have the skills and resources
to identify and intervene with at-risk students; and to help schools
and individuals reconnect with the community and share resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.310
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Every educational service district board shall implement best
practices for students at risk to identify, intervene, and seek support
for students showing emotional, social, or academic risk. The best
practices shall be in place beginning September 1, 2010.
(2) Educational service districts 105 and 112 shall develop a model
program, using emerging best practices, by September 1, 2008. The
educational service districts shall collaborate with others including
representatives from local school districts, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, relevant divisions of the
department of social and health services, the department of health,
risk management organizations, local family services organizations,
local law enforcement, and local juvenile justice agencies. The model
program shall include:
(a) An early warning system to identify signs for students at risk
of emotional, social, or academic failure;
(b) A personalized assessment for each student that addresses a
student's threat of violence to himself or herself or others; and
(c) A support system that provides wraparound services for students
who are determined to be at risk and their families.
(3) Educational service districts 105 and 112 shall each administer
one demonstration project to implement and document the effects of best
practices for students at risk. One demonstration project shall be in
a high school and the other shall be in a middle school or junior high
school. The educational service districts shall select project
participants, provide staff training for the requirements under
subsection (2)(a) and (b) of this section, and broker the services
required under subsection (2)(c) of this section.
(4) Educational service districts 105 and 112 shall conduct an
evaluation of the demonstration projects under this section. The
evaluation shall include an outline of the steps taken to develop and
implement best practices for students at risk. The evaluation shall
also include conclusions regarding the student progress in emotional,
social, and academic areas; the components that have been most
important to student success; and recommendations for continued
implementation and expansion of the best practices for students at
risk.
(5) Educational service districts 105 and 112 shall report findings
to the governor and the appropriate education and fiscal committees of
the legislature. An interim report is due December 1, 2008. The final
report is due December 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The sum of one hundred thousand dollars,
or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2009, from the general fund to educational service
districts 105 and 112 for the purposes of this act.
(2) The sum of fifty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2010,
from the general fund to educational service districts 105 and 112 for
the purposes of this act.

--- END ---