BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that
extracurricular activities are a vital part of the educational
experience for Washington's students. The legislature acknowledges
that children who are connected to their school and community become
responsible citizens and develop the skills to contribute to their own
economic well-being and to that of their families and communities. The
legislature finds that extracurricular activities assist our children
in developing the skills they need to become full members of society.
The legislature further finds that the fund-raising ability of
schools may decrease as a result of the requirements in chapter 5, Laws
of 2007, that only healthy foods be available on school campuses. The
legislature also finds that, in order to replace the funds lost,
alternative funding should be provided. Therefore, it is the intent of
the legislature to provide a replacement funding source for the funds
that will be lost to support extracurricular activities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The middle and high school activities
funding account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All
receipts from the surcharge imposed in section 4 of this act must be
deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may only be
used to fund extracurricular activities of public elementary and
secondary schools as provided in section 9 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Admission charge" means the price required or paid for
entering any premise or location where live sporting events or live
entertainment are held, and includes but is not limited in meaning to:
(a) A charge made for season tickets or subscriptions;
(b) A cover charge or a charge made for use of seats or tables,
reserved or otherwise, and similar accommodations;
(c) A charge for admission to any live entertainment or sporting
event that is included within the price paid for meals, refreshments,
or services where no separate admission charge is made.
(2) "Community arts program" means a musical, dance, art, or
theater program that is organized for the purposes of training or
engaging students or community residents in musical, dance, art, or
theater activities and that is operated, conducted, administered,
supported, or enabled by a city, town, county, district, nonprofit
youth organization as defined in RCW 82.04.4271, public school
district, other than those programs offered by the school and created
solely for the students by the school, or a program organized solely
for students to provide a recital to demonstrate progress or training
in music, art, dance, or theater arts. "Community arts program" does
not mean a musical, dance, art, or theater program that includes
professional performers or artists.
(3) "Community athletics program" means any athletic program that
is organized for the purposes of training for and engaging in athletic
activity and competition and that is operated, conducted, administered,
supported, or enabled by a city, town, county, district, nonprofit
youth organization as defined in RCW 82.04.4271, or public school
district other than those programs offered by the school and created
solely for the students by the school.
(4) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(5) "Live entertainment" means any activity provided for pleasure,
enjoyment, recreation, relaxation, diversion, or other similar purpose
by a person or persons who are physically present when providing an
activity to a patron or group of patrons who are physically present.
This includes, but is not limited to:
(a) Music or vocals provided by one or more professional or amateur
musicians or vocalists;
(b) Dancing performed by one or more professional or amateur
dancers or performers;
(c) Acting or drama provided by one or more professional or amateur
actors or players;
(d) Acrobatics or stunts provided by one or more professional or
amateur acrobats;
(e) Animal stunts or performances provided or incited by one or
more animal handlers or trainers;
(f) Athletic contests, events, or exhibitions provided by one or
more professional or amateur athletes;
(g) Comedy or magic provided by one or more professional or amateur
comedians, magicians, illusionists, entertainers, or performers;
(h) Cooking or product demonstrations provided by one or more
professional or amateur chefs, speakers, or demonstrators;
(i) A show or production involving any combination of the
activities listed in this subsection. Live entertainment does not
include ambient background music; television, radio, closed circuit, or
internet broadcasts of live entertainment; entertainment provided by a
patron or patrons; or the presentation of recorded music.
(6) "Person" has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.030.
(7) "Place" means, without limiting its scope, a theater,
showhouse, cabaret, nightclub, art gallery, museum, dance hall,
athletic park, swimming pool, skating rink, resort ground, amusement
park, and other enclosures and buildings or portions thereof and
buildings or portions thereof wherein entertainment or recreation is
provided, and located within the boundaries of the county or in any
state or federal reservation therein, under such rules as the
department shall adopt.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) There is imposed an admission surcharge
of one percent on every admission charge to a live sporting or live
entertainment event in this state. The surcharge shall be imposed on
the actual admission amount charged, exclusive of other taxes or fees,
and reduced admission charges shall be subject to the surcharge on the
reduced charge and not on the regular admission charge.
(2) Moneys collected under this act shall be deposited in the
middle and high school activities funding account created in section 2
of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The following are exempt from the surcharge
imposed in section 4 of this act:
(1) Admissions to any activity of an elementary or secondary
school;
(2) Admissions to any community athletics program;
(3) Admissions to any community arts program; and
(4) Admissions, where the charge for admission is less than one
dollar.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Whenever a charge is made for any admission
subject to the surcharge imposed by this act, a ticket or receipt shall
be provided that shows the price of the admission, the surcharge
imposed under this chapter, any other taxes imposed, and the total
charge for the ticket.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The surcharge imposed under this chapter
shall be paid by the buyer of the admissions to the person receiving
payment for the admission, and the surcharge shall be held in trust
until it is remitted to the department in a form and manner determined
by the department; and the person receiving payment for the admission
shall be personally liable for the amount of such surcharge if it is
not collected and remitted as provided in this act. The surcharge
shall be collected at the time the admission charge is paid by the
person seeking admission and shall be reported and remitted by the
person receiving the surcharge to the department in the form and manner
required by the department.
(2) Any person required to collect the surcharge imposed under this
chapter, who fails to collect the surcharge or, having collected the
surcharge, fails to remit it to the department in the manner required
by the department, whether the failure is the result of his or her own
act or the result of acts or conditions beyond his or her control, is
personally liable to the department for the amount of such surcharge.
(3) The department has the power to adopt rules prescribing methods
and schedules for the collection of the surcharge required to be
collected under this chapter.
(4) The administrative provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW, in so far
as they do not conflict with any more specific provision of this act,
apply to the administration of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 3 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
The superintendent of public instruction shall, without any
deduction for administrative or other costs, allocate funds by
September 10th of each year in the middle and high school activities
funding account established in section 2 of this act to be used to
support extracurricular activities of public middle and high schools,
including internal or interschool activities of an athletic, cultural,
social, or recreational nature for students of the district, and
including regional competitions associated with such activities.
The funds shall be allocated on a proportionate basis to each
district within the state, and each district shall, with the advice of
the school's associated student body association, distribute the funds
as needed to each activity, including individual student travel costs
associated with such activity; however, athletic activities may receive
no more than twenty-five percent of the funds allocated to each
district. Districts may not deduct any amount for administration or
divert funds to any other activity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 The secretary of state shall submit this
act to the people for their adoption and ratification, or rejection, at
the next general election to be held in this state, in accordance with
Article II, section 1 of the state Constitution and the laws adopted to
facilitate its operation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 This act takes effect July 1, 2009, if the
proposed amendment to Article II, section 1 of the state Constitution,
creating an admissions surcharge for funding of certain school
activities (SJR . . . (S-4030/08)), is validly submitted to and is
approved and ratified by the voters at the next general election. If
the proposed amendment is not approved and ratified, this act is void
in its entirety.

--- END ---