BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that while significant
gains have been made in reading achievement by students in public
schools during the past decade, additional resources and assistance are
needed in middle, junior high, and high schools. In these schools,
teachers need additional tools and strategies to increase reading
achievement, including professional development pertaining to phonemic
awareness, phonics, fluency, vocabulary, and comprehension. The
legislature further finds that without an increased investment by the
legislature, a large number of students will continue to leave high
school with below-basic reading skills. Without these essential
reading skills, these students not only will struggle academically, but
also will struggle socially, emotionally, and economically.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The Washington state adolescent reading program is created.
The purpose of the program is to develop and implement a statewide,
comprehensive program that will provide teachers the tools, skills, and
knowledge to successfully teach struggling adolescent students,
including students who are English language learners, to read. The
program will consist of four major components, which shall include:
Statewide leadership and coordination; regional leadership,
coordination, and assistance provided by reading specialists at
educational service districts; school district curriculum support and
technical assistance; and school-based assistance that will vary
depending on the number of struggling readers. Assistance shall
include both the teaching of foundational literacy and implementation
of effective, sustainable reading systems within school districts and
schools.
(2) Statewide leadership and coordination shall be provided by the
office of the superintendent of public instruction. In this capacity,
the office shall hire staff who: Understand reading research; know how
to apply the research in school districts, buildings, and classrooms;
and understand the critical elements needed for systemwide change.
These staff shall provide statewide leadership, coordination, technical
expertise, and logistics to successfully implement the program. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall consider
recommendations by an advisory panel that shall include representatives
from culturally and linguistically diverse backgrounds.
(3) In order to ensure that technical assistance is provided
statewide, a reading specialist shall be hired at each educational
service district, with two specialists hired in the Puget Sound
educational service district. These reading specialists are
responsible for providing training and information to school district
curriculum directors, middle, junior high, and high school principals,
classroom teachers, English language learner teachers,
paraprofessionals who assist students in learning to read, and other
individuals who are assisting students to read. Selection of the
reading specialists shall be done jointly by the superintendent of each
educational service district and a representative of the office of the
superintendent of public instruction.
(4) To help school district curriculum directors understand the
foundational skills needed to teach reading and to understand how to
implement effective reading systems in school districts and schools,
the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the
educational service district reading specialists shall provide training
opportunities for school district curriculum directors and other
appropriate district personnel to address specifically how to improve
the teaching of reading in school districts, schools, and classrooms.
(5)(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
create a school-based assistance program that has three different
levels of support depending on the number of students who have not met
the reading standard on the Washington assessment of student learning.
Schools with larger numbers of students who have not met the reading
standard shall receive more intensive assistance, while schools with
smaller numbers of struggling readers shall be provided a lower level
of assistance. The specific types of assistance that will be provided,
depending on the level of support, include, but are not limited to:
The provision of training and instructional materials in research-based
reading intervention programs; site visits to provide technical
assistance; the funding of reading coaches; the provision and training
on the use of common reading diagnostic assessments; and information
regarding how to design a schoolwide reading system.
(b) The school-based assistance program shall be initially
implemented in high schools in the 2008-09 school year. The
school-based assistance program shall be expanded to include middle
schools and junior high schools beginning in the 2009-10 school year.
The superintendent shall develop criteria and implement a process for
selecting the schools that will receive the differing levels of
assistance.
(c) Schools selected for the two highest levels of assistance shall
receive assistance for three school years.
(6) Subject to funds appropriated specifically for this purpose,
the superintendent of public instruction shall contract with a third
party to evaluate the effectiveness of the adolescent reading program
and to recommend actions that could be taken to make the adolescent
reading program more effective. The evaluation shall be submitted to
the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2010.

--- END ---