BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.10.056 and 2006 c 180 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A state priority is established for institutions of higher
education, including community colleges, to encourage growing numbers
of enrollments and degrees in the fields of engineering, technology,
biotechnology, sciences, computer sciences, and mathematics.
(2) In meeting this state priority, the legislature understands and
recognizes that the demands of the economic marketplace and the desires
of students are not always on parallel tracks. Therefore, institutions
of higher education:
(a) Shall determine local student demand for programs in the fields
of engineering, technology, biotechnology, sciences, computer sciences,
and mathematics and submit findings and proposed alternatives to meet
demand to the higher education coordinating board and the legislature
by November 1, 2008; and
(b) May examine its instructional programs, costs, research
initiatives, student enrollment characteristics, and regional context
and make a recommendation by June 1, 2009, to the higher education
coordinating board regarding the desirability and feasibility of a
two-year or four-year degree-granting institution evolving into a
four-year degree-granting institution of higher education with a
polytechnic focus. The board shall analyze the recommendations of each
campus in the context of statewide goals for higher education and
provide policy options along with the original campus recommendations
to the higher education and fiscal committees of the legislature by
December 1, 2009. The board, after reviewing polytechnic institutions
in other states, shall include in its report to the legislature a
proposed model for a polytechnic-focused four-year institution of
higher education that incorporates minimum standards and criteria for
a polytechnic college curriculum.
(3) While it is understood that these areas of emphasis should not
be the sole focus of institutions of higher education. It is the
intent of the legislature that steady progress in these areas occur.
The higher education coordinating board shall track and report progress
in the fields of engineering, technology, biotechnology, sciences,
computer sciences, and mathematics including, but not limited to, the
following information:
(a) The number of students enrolled in these fields on a biennial
basis;
(b) The number of associate, bachelor's, and master's degrees
conferred in these fields on a biennial basis;
(c) The amount of expenditures in enrollment and degree programs in
these fields; and
(d) The number and type of public-private partnerships established
relating to these fields among institutions of higher education,
including community colleges, and leading corporations in Washington
state.
(4) Institutions of higher education, including community colleges,
shall be provided discretion and flexibility in achieving the
objectives under this section. Examples of the types of institutional
programs that may help achieve these objectives include, but are not
limited to, establishment of institutes of technology, new polytechnic-based institutions, new divisions of existing institutions, and a
flexible array of delivery models, including face-to-face learning,
interactive courses, internet-based offerings, and instruction on main
campuses, branch campuses, and other educational centers.
(5) The legislature recognizes the global needs of the economic
marketplace for technologically prepared graduates, and the
relationship between technology industries and higher education.
Institutions of higher education, including community colleges, are
strongly urged to consider science, engineering, and technology program
growth in areas of the state that exhibit a high concentration of
aerospace, biotechnology, and technology industrial presence. Expanded
science and technology programs can gain from the proximity of
experienced and knowledgeable industry leaders, while industry can
benefit from access to new sources of highly trained and educated
graduates.

--- END ---