BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 In order to support the families of
veterans, and to assure that these families are able to care for the
veterans in their family, the legislature hereby creates the veterans'
caregiver act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Employer" means: (a) Any person, firm, corporation,
partnership, business trust, legal representative, or other business
entity which engages in any business, industry, profession, or activity
in this state; (b) the state, state institutions, and state agencies;
and (c) any unit of local government including, but not limited to, a
county, city, town, municipal corporation, quasi municipal corporation,
or political subdivision.
(2) "Employee" means a person who performs service for hire for an
employer, for an average of twenty or more hours per week, and includes
all individuals employed at any site owned or operated by an employer,
but does not include an independent contractor.
(3) "Family" means a husband, wife, child, parent, or domestic
partner under RCW 26.60.020.
(4) "Veteran" means the same as in RCW 41.04.005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The family member of a veteran shall be
allowed unpaid leave to care for a veteran in their family.
(2) The employee family member must provide his or her employer
with notice, as reasonable, of his or her intention to take unpaid
leave to care for a family veteran.
(3) The leave provided for in this section is in addition to any
vacation, sick, or other leave the employee may be entitled.
(4) An employer shall not retaliate against an employee for
requesting or taking the leave provided for in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The director of labor and industries shall
administer this chapter and adopt rules as necessary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 49 RCW.

--- END ---