BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 44.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that public transportation policy decisions
can be improved by keeping legislators regularly informed of current
traffic congestion, safety, and service level conditions affecting the
traveling public around the state.
During the legislative session, every meeting of the transportation
committees of the senate and house of representatives must begin with
a summary of the significant morning traffic conditions, including
ferry operations, for that day. The report must include, but not be
limited to, roadway and ferry operations in King, Pierce, Snohomish,
Thurston, Clark, and Spokane counties. The report must last at least
three minutes and must, whenever possible, include footage voluntarily
supplied from television news media.

--- END ---