BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.670 (Special sex offender
sentencing alternative) and 2006 c 133 s 1 are each repealed.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.505 and 2006 c 73 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When a person is convicted of a felony, the court shall impose
punishment as provided in this chapter.
(2)(a) The court shall impose a sentence as provided in the
following sections and as applicable in the case:
(i) Unless another term of confinement applies, the court shall
impose a sentence within the standard sentence range established in RCW
9.94A.510 or 9.94A.517;
(ii) RCW 9.94A.700 and 9.94A.705, relating to community placement;
(iii) RCW 9.94A.710 and 9.94A.715, relating to community custody;
(iv) RCW 9.94A.545, relating to community custody for offenders
whose term of confinement is one year or less;
(v) RCW 9.94A.570, relating to persistent offenders;
(vi) RCW 9.94A.540, relating to mandatory minimum terms;
(vii) RCW 9.94A.650, relating to the first-time offender waiver;
(viii) RCW 9.94A.660, relating to the drug offender sentencing
alternative;
(ix) ((RCW 9.94A.670, relating to the special sex offender
sentencing alternative;
(x))) RCW 9.94A.712, relating to certain sex offenses;
(((xi))) (x) RCW 9.94A.535, relating to exceptional sentences;
(((xii))) (xi) RCW 9.94A.589, relating to consecutive and
concurrent sentences;
(((xiii))) (xii) RCW 9.94A.603, relating to felony driving while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug and felony
physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug.
(b) If a standard sentence range has not been established for the
offender's crime, the court shall impose a determinate sentence which
may include not more than one year of confinement; community
restitution work; until July 1, 2000, a term of community supervision
not to exceed one year and on and after July 1, 2000, a term of
community custody not to exceed one year, subject to conditions and
sanctions as authorized in RCW 9.94A.710 (2) and (3); and/or other
legal financial obligations. The court may impose a sentence which
provides more than one year of confinement if the court finds reasons
justifying an exceptional sentence as provided in RCW 9.94A.535.
(3) If the court imposes a sentence requiring confinement of thirty
days or less, the court may, in its discretion, specify that the
sentence be served on consecutive or intermittent days. A sentence
requiring more than thirty days of confinement shall be served on
consecutive days. Local jail administrators may schedule court-ordered
intermittent sentences as space permits.
(4) If a sentence imposed includes payment of a legal financial
obligation, it shall be imposed as provided in RCW 9.94A.750,
9.94A.753, 9.94A.760, and 43.43.7541.
(5) Except as provided under RCW 9.94A.750(4) and 9.94A.753(4), a
court may not impose a sentence providing for a term of confinement or
community supervision, community placement, or community custody which
exceeds the statutory maximum for the crime as provided in chapter
9A.20 RCW.
(6) The sentencing court shall give the offender credit for all
confinement time served before the sentencing if that confinement was
solely in regard to the offense for which the offender is being
sentenced.
(7) The court shall order restitution as provided in RCW 9.94A.750
and 9.94A.753.
(8) As a part of any sentence, the court may impose and enforce
crime-related prohibitions and affirmative conditions as provided in
this chapter.
(9) The court may order an offender whose sentence includes
community placement or community supervision to undergo a mental status
evaluation and to participate in available outpatient mental health
treatment, if the court finds that reasonable grounds exist to believe
that the offender is a mentally ill person as defined in RCW 71.24.025,
and that this condition is likely to have influenced the offense. An
order requiring mental status evaluation or treatment must be based on
a presentence report and, if applicable, mental status evaluations that
have been filed with the court to determine the offender's competency
or eligibility for a defense of insanity. The court may order
additional evaluations at a later date if deemed appropriate.
(10) In any sentence of partial confinement, the court may require
the offender to serve the partial confinement in work release, in a
program of home detention, on work crew, or in a combined program of
work crew and home detention.
(11) In sentencing an offender convicted of a crime of domestic
violence, as defined in RCW 10.99.020, if the offender has a minor
child, or if the victim of the offense for which the offender was
convicted has a minor child, the court may, as part of any term of
community supervision, community placement, or community custody, order
the offender to participate in a domestic violence perpetrator program
approved under RCW 26.50.150.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.94A.575 and 2000 c 28 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
The power to defer or suspend the imposition or execution of
sentence is hereby abolished in respect to sentences prescribed for
felonies committed after June 30, 1984((, except for offenders
sentenced under RCW 9.94A.670, the special sex offender sentencing
alternative, whose sentence may be suspended)).

Sec. 4 RCW 9.94A.715 and 2006 c 130 s 2 and 2006 c 128 s 5 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) When a court sentences a person to the custody of the
department for a sex offense not sentenced under RCW 9.94A.712, a
violent offense, any crime against persons under RCW 9.94A.411(2), or
a felony offense under chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW, committed on or
after July 1, 2000, or when a court sentences a person to a term of
confinement of one year or less for a violation of RCW
9A.44.130(((10))) (11)(a) committed on or after June 7, 2006, the court
shall in addition to the other terms of the sentence, sentence the
offender to community custody for the community custody range
established under RCW 9.94A.850 or up to the period of earned release
awarded pursuant to RCW 9.94A.728 (1) and (2), whichever is longer.
The community custody shall begin: (a) Upon completion of the term of
confinement; (b) at such time as the offender is transferred to
community custody in lieu of earned release in accordance with RCW
9.94A.728 (1) and (2); or (c) with regard to offenders sentenced under
RCW 9.94A.660, upon failure to complete or administrative termination
from the special drug offender sentencing alternative program. Except
as provided in RCW 9.94A.501, the department shall supervise any
sentence of community custody imposed under this section.
(2)(a) Unless a condition is waived by the court, the conditions of
community custody shall include those provided for in RCW 9.94A.700(4).
The conditions may also include those provided for in RCW 9.94A.700(5).
The court may also order the offender to participate in rehabilitative
programs or otherwise perform affirmative conduct reasonably related to
the circumstances of the offense, the offender's risk of reoffending,
or the safety of the community, and the department shall enforce such
conditions pursuant to subsection (6) of this section.
(b) As part of any sentence that includes a term of community
custody imposed under this subsection, the court shall also require the
offender to comply with any conditions imposed by the department under
RCW 9.94A.720. The department shall assess the offender's risk of
reoffense and may establish and modify additional conditions of the
offender's community custody based upon the risk to community safety.
In addition, the department may require the offender to participate in
rehabilitative programs, or otherwise perform affirmative conduct, and
to obey all laws. The department may impose electronic monitoring as
a condition of community custody for an offender sentenced to a term of
community custody under this section pursuant to a conviction for a sex
offense. Within the resources made available by the department for
this purpose, the department shall carry out any electronic monitoring
imposed under this section using the most appropriate technology given
the individual circumstances of the offender. As used in this section,
"electronic monitoring" means the monitoring of an offender using an
electronic offender tracking system including, but not limited to, a
system using radio frequency or active or passive global positioning
system technology.
(c) The department may not impose conditions that are contrary to
those ordered by the court and may not contravene or decrease court
imposed conditions. The department shall notify the offender in
writing of any such conditions or modifications. In setting,
modifying, and enforcing conditions of community custody, the
department shall be deemed to be performing a quasi-judicial function.
(3) If an offender violates conditions imposed by the court or the
department pursuant to this section during community custody, the
department may transfer the offender to a more restrictive confinement
status and impose other available sanctions as provided in RCW
9.94A.737 and 9.94A.740.
(4) ((Except for terms of community custody under RCW 9.94A.670,))
The department shall discharge the offender from community custody on
a date determined by the department, which the department may modify,
based on risk and performance of the offender, within the range or at
the end of the period of earned release, whichever is later.
(5) At any time prior to the completion or termination of a sex
offender's term of community custody, if the court finds that public
safety would be enhanced, the court may impose and enforce an order
extending any or all of the conditions imposed pursuant to this section
for a period up to the maximum allowable sentence for the crime as it
is classified in chapter 9A.20 RCW, regardless of the expiration of the
offender's term of community custody. If a violation of a condition
extended under this subsection occurs after the expiration of the
offender's term of community custody, it shall be deemed a violation of
the sentence for the purposes of RCW 9.94A.631 and may be punishable as
contempt of court as provided for in RCW 7.21.040. If the court
extends a condition beyond the expiration of the term of community
custody, the department is not responsible for supervision of the
offender's compliance with the condition.
(6) Within the funds available for community custody, the
department shall determine conditions and duration of community custody
on the basis of risk to community safety, and shall supervise offenders
during community custody on the basis of risk to community safety and
conditions imposed by the court. The secretary shall adopt rules to
implement the provisions of this subsection.
(7) By the close of the next business day after receiving notice of
a condition imposed or modified by the department, an offender may
request an administrative review under rules adopted by the department.
The condition shall remain in effect unless the reviewing officer finds
that it is not reasonably related to any of the following: (a) The
crime of conviction; (b) the offender's risk of reoffending; or (c) the
safety of the community.

Sec. 5 RCW 18.155.010 and 2000 c 171 s 32 and 2000 c 28 s 37 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The legislature finds that sex offender therapists ((who examine
and treat sex offenders pursuant to the special sexual offender
sentencing alternative under RCW 9.94A.670 and)) who may treat juvenile
sex offenders pursuant to RCW 13.40.160((,)) play a vital role in
protecting the public from sex offenders who remain in the community
following conviction. The legislature finds that the qualifications,
practices, techniques, and effectiveness of sex offender treatment
providers vary widely and that the court's ability to effectively
determine the appropriateness of granting the sentencing alternative
and monitoring the offender to ensure continued protection of the
community is undermined by a lack of regulated practices. The
legislature recognizes the right of sex offender therapists to
practice, consistent with the paramount requirements of public safety.
Public safety is best served by regulating sex offender therapists
whose clients are being evaluated and being treated pursuant to RCW
((9.94A.670 and)) 13.40.160. This chapter shall be construed to
require only those sex offender therapists who examine and treat sex
offenders pursuant to RCW ((9.94A.670 and)) 13.40.160 to obtain a
sexual offender treatment certification as provided in this chapter.

Sec. 6 RCW 18.155.030 and 2004 c 38 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No person shall represent himself or herself as a certified sex
offender treatment provider or certified affiliate sex offender
treatment provider without first applying for and receiving a
certificate pursuant to this chapter.
(2) Only a certified sex offender treatment provider, or certified
affiliate sex offender treatment provider who has completed at least
fifty percent of the required hours under the supervision of a
certified sex offender treatment provider, may perform or provide the
following services:
(a) Evaluations conducted for the purposes of and pursuant to RCW
((9.94A.670 and)) 13.40.160;
(b) Treatment of convicted level III sex offenders who are
sentenced and ordered into treatment pursuant to chapter 9.94A RCW and
adjudicated level III juvenile sex offenders who are ordered into
treatment pursuant to chapter 13.40 RCW;
(c) Except as provided under subsection (3) of this section,
treatment of sexually violent predators who are conditionally released
to a less restrictive alternative pursuant to chapter 71.09 RCW.
(3) A certified sex offender treatment provider, or certified
affiliate sex offender treatment provider who has completed at least
fifty percent of the required hours under the supervision of a
certified sex offender treatment provider, may not perform or provide
treatment of sexually violent predators under subsection (2)(c) of this
section if the treatment provider has been:
(a) Convicted of a sex offense, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030;
(b) Convicted in any other jurisdiction of an offense that under
the laws of this state would be classified as a sex offense as defined
in RCW 9.94A.030; or
(c) Suspended or otherwise restricted from practicing any health
care profession by competent authority in any state, federal, or
foreign jurisdiction.
(4) Certified sex offender treatment providers and certified
affiliate sex offender treatment providers may perform or provide the
following service: Treatment of convicted level I and level II sex
offenders who are sentenced and ordered into treatment pursuant to
chapter 9.94A RCW and adjudicated juvenile level I and level II sex
offenders who are sentenced and ordered into treatment pursuant to
chapter 13.40 RCW.

--- END ---