BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that Washington state
voters have repeatedly expressed their will to limit taxing districts'
property tax collections absent voter approval. In 2000, voters
approved Initiative Measure No. 722 which provided for the elimination
of taxing districts' banked capacity. The legislature recognizes the
supreme court invalidated the initiative, and finds it is in the
interest of the people of the state of Washington, and in conformance
with the expressed will of the voters, that the elimination of banked
capacity be reenacted and reaffirmed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 RCW 84.55.092 (Protection of future levy
capacity) and 1998 c 16 s 3, 1988 c 274 s 4, & 1986 c 107 s 3 are each
repealed.

--- END ---