BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.55.092 and 1998 c 16 s 3 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
The regular property tax levy for each taxing district other than
the state may be set at the amount which would be allowed otherwise
under this chapter if the regular property tax levy for the district
for taxes due in prior years beginning with 1986 had been set at the
full amount allowed under this chapter including any levy authorized
under RCW 52.16.160 that would have been imposed but for the limitation
in RCW 52.18.065, applicable upon imposition of the benefit charge
under chapter 52.18 RCW. To set a regular property tax levy at the
increased amount authorized under this section, a taxing district must
submit an authorizing proposition to the voters for approval by a
majority of the voters of the taxing district voting on the
proposition. The proposition shall be voted on at an election held not
more than twelve months prior to the date in which the proposed regular
property tax is to be levied.
The purpose of this section is to remove the incentive for a taxing
district to maintain its tax levy at the maximum level permitted under
this chapter, and to protect the future levy capacity of a taxing
district that reduces its tax levy below the level that it otherwise
could impose under this chapter, by removing the adverse consequences
to future levy capacities resulting from such levy reductions.

--- END ---