BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.38.020 and 2002 c 183 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Blended special fuel" means a mixture of undyed diesel fuel
and another liquid, other than a de minimis amount of the liquid, that
can be used as a fuel to propel a motor vehicle.
(2) "Blender" means a person who produces blended special fuel
outside the bulk transfer-terminal system.
(3) "Bond" means a bond duly executed with a corporate surety
qualified under chapter 48.28 RCW, which bond is payable to the state
of Washington conditioned upon faithful performance of all requirements
of this chapter, including the payment of all taxes, penalties, and
other obligations arising out of this chapter.
(4) "Bulk transfer-terminal system" means the special fuel
distribution system consisting of refineries, pipelines, vessels, and
terminals. Special fuel in a refinery, pipeline, vessel, or terminal
is in the bulk transfer-terminal system. Special fuel in the fuel tank
of an engine, motor vehicle, or in a railcar, trailer, truck, or other
equipment suitable for ground transportation is not in the bulk
transfer-terminal system.
(5) "Bulk transfer" means a transfer of special fuel by pipeline or
vessel.
(6) "Bulk storage" means the placing of special fuel into a
receptacle other than the fuel supply tank of a motor vehicle.
(7) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(8) "Dyed special fuel user" means a person authorized by the
internal revenue code to operate a motor vehicle on the highway using
dyed special fuel, in which the use is not exempt from the special fuel
tax.
(9) "Evasion" or "evade" means to diminish or avoid the
computation, assessment, or payment of authorized taxes or fees
through:
(a) A knowing: False statement; omission; misrepresentation of
fact; or other act of deception;
(b) An intentional: Failure to file a return or report; or other
act of deception; or
(c) The unlawful use of dyed special fuel.
(10) "Export" means to obtain special fuel in this state for sales
or distribution outside the state.
(11) "Highway" means every way or place open to the use of the
public, as a matter of right, for the purpose of vehicular travel.
(12) "Import" means to bring special fuel into this state by a
means of conveyance other than the fuel supply tank of a motor vehicle.
(13) "International fuel tax agreement licensee" means a special
fuel user operating qualified motor vehicles in interstate commerce and
licensed by the department under the international fuel tax agreement.
(14) "Lessor" means a person: (a) Whose principal business is the
bona fide leasing or renting of motor vehicles without drivers for
compensation to the general public; and (b) who maintains established
places of business and whose lease or rental contracts require the
motor vehicles to be returned to the established places of business.
(15) "Licensee" means a person holding a license issued under this
chapter.
(16) "Motor vehicle" means a self-propelled vehicle designed for
operation upon land utilizing special fuel as the means of propulsion.
(17) "Natural gas" means naturally occurring mixtures of
hydrocarbon gases and vapors consisting principally of methane, whether
in gaseous or liquid form.
(18) "Person" means a natural person, fiduciary, association, or
corporation. The term "person" as applied to an association means and
includes the partners or members thereof, and as applied to
corporations, the officers thereof.
(19) "Position holder" means a person who holds the inventory
position in special fuel, as reflected by the records of the terminal
operator. A person holds the inventory position in special fuel if the
person has a contractual agreement with the terminal for the use of
storage facilities and terminating services at a terminal with respect
to special fuel. "Position holder" includes a terminal operator that
owns special fuel in their terminal.
(20) "Rack" means a mechanism for delivering special fuel from a
refinery or terminal into a truck, trailer, railcar, or other means of
nonbulk transfer.
(21) "Refiner" means a person who owns, operates, or otherwise
controls a refinery.
(22) "Removal" means a physical transfer of special fuel other than
by evaporation, loss, or destruction.
(23) "Special fuel" means and includes all combustible gases and
liquids suitable for the generation of power for propulsion of motor
vehicles((, except that it)).
(a) Special fuel does not include:
(i) Motor vehicle fuel as defined in chapter 82.36 RCW((, nor does
it include));
(ii) Dyed special fuel as defined by federal regulations, unless
the use is in violation of this chapter; or
(iii) Waste vegetable oil purchased or collected from a food
service establishment or food processing plant, as defined in RCW
69.07.010, and not resold. For purposes of this subsection, "waste
vegetable oil" has the same meaning as provided in section 2 of this
act.
(b) If a person holds for sale, sells, purchases, or uses any dyed
special fuel in violation of this chapter, all dyed special fuel held
for sale, sold, purchased, stored, or used by that person is considered
special fuel, and the person is subject to all presumptions, reporting,
and recordkeeping requirements and other obligations which apply to
special fuel, along with payment of any applicable taxes, penalties, or
interest for illegal use.
(24) "Special fuel distributor" means a person who acquires special
fuel from a supplier, distributor, or licensee for subsequent sale and
distribution.
(25) "Special fuel exporter" means a person who purchases special
fuel in this state and directly exports the fuel by a means other than
the bulk transfer-terminal system to a destination outside of the
state.
(26) "Special fuel importer" means a person who imports special
fuel into the state by a means other than the bulk transfer-terminal
system. If the importer of record is acting as an agent, the person
for whom the agent is acting is the importer. If there is no importer
of record, the owner of the special fuel at the time of importation is
the importer.
(27) "Special fuel supplier" means a person who holds a federal
certificate issued under the internal revenue code and authorizes the
person to tax-free transactions on special fuel in the bulk transfer-terminal system.
(28) "Special fuel user" means a person engaged in uses of special
fuel that are not specifically exempted from the special fuel tax
imposed under this chapter.
(29) "Terminal" means a special fuel storage and distribution
facility that has been assigned a terminal control number by the
internal revenue service, is supplied by pipeline or vessel, and from
which reportable special fuel is removed at a rack.
(30) "Terminal operator" means a person who owns, operates, or
otherwise controls a terminal.
(31) "Two-party exchange" or "buy-sell agreement" means a
transaction in which taxable special fuel is transferred from one
licensed supplier to another licensed supplier under an exchange or
buy-sell agreement whereby the supplier that is the position holder
agrees to deliver taxable special fuel to the other supplier or the
other supplier's customer at the rack of the terminal at which the
delivering supplier is the position holder.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
waste vegetable oil that is purchased or collected from a food service
establishment or food processing plant, as defined in RCW 69.07.010,
and is not resold.
(2) This exemption is available only if the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "waste vegetable oil" means
used cooking oil.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use of waste vegetable oil that is purchased or collected from a food
service establishment or food processing plant, as defined in RCW
69.07.010, and is not resold.
(2) "Waste vegetable oil" has the same meaning as provided in
section 2 of this act.

--- END ---