BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 2.36.072 and 1993 c 408 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each court shall establish a means to preliminarily determine by a
written declaration signed under penalty of perjury by the person
summoned, the qualifications set forth in RCW 2.36.070 of each person
summoned for jury duty prior to their appearance at the court to which
they are summoned to serve. Upon receipt by the summoning court of a
written declaration stating that a declarant does not meet the
qualifications set forth in RCW 2.36.070, that declarant shall be
excused from appearing in response to the summons. If a person
summoned to appear for jury duty fails to sign and return a declaration
of his or her qualifications to serve as a juror prior to appearing in
response to a summons and is later determined to be unqualified for one
of the reasons set forth in RCW 2.36.070, that person shall not be
entitled to any compensation as provided in RCW 2.36.150. Information
provided to the court for preliminary determination of statutory
qualification for jury duty may only be used for the term such person
is summoned and may not be used for any other purpose, except that the
court, or designee, may report a change of address or nondelivery of
summons of persons summoned for jury duty to the county auditor. The
court shall notify the office of the secretary of state and the
appropriate county election official if a declarant does not meet the
qualifications set forth in RCW 2.36.070 (1) through (3) and (5).

--- END ---