BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.210
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in
consultation with the department of health, shall develop anaphylactic
policy guidelines for schools to prevent anaphylaxis and deal with
medical emergencies resulting from it. The policy guidelines shall be
developed with input from pediatricians, school nurses, other health
care providers, parents of children with life-threatening allergies,
school administrators, teachers, and food service directors.
The policy guidelines shall include, but need not be limited to:
(a) A procedure for each school to follow to develop a treatment
plan including the responsibilities for school nurses and other
appropriate school personnel responsible for responding to a student
who may be experiencing anaphylaxis;
(b) The content of a training course for appropriate school
personnel for preventing and responding to a student who may be
experiencing anaphylaxis;
(c) A procedure for the development of an individualized emergency
health care plan for children with food or other allergies that could
result in anaphylaxis;
(d) A communication plan for the school to follow to gather and
disseminate information on students with food or other allergies who
may experience anaphylaxis;
(e) Strategies for reduction of the risk of exposure to
anaphylactic causative agents including food and other allergens.
(2) For the purpose of this section "anaphylaxis" means a severe
allergic and life-threatening reaction that is a collection of
symptoms, which may include breathing difficulties and a drop in blood
pressure or shock.
(3) By March 31, 2009, the superintendent of public instruction
shall report policy guidelines to school districts for the districts to
use to develop and adopt their policies.
(4) By September 1, 2009, each school district shall use the
guidelines developed under subsection (1) of this section to develop
and adopt a school district policy for each school in the district to
follow to assist schools to prevent anaphylaxis.

--- END ---