BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
heating oil, propane or natural gas used to heat a qualifying
residence.
(2) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Qualifying residence" means a residence for which an exemption
has been granted under RCW 84.36.381.
(b) "Heating oil" means any petroleum product used for space
heating in oil-fired furnaces, heaters, and boilers, including stove
oil, diesel fuel, or kerosene. "Heating oil" does not include
petroleum products used as fuels in motor vehicles, marine vessels,
trains, buses, aircraft, or any off-highway equipment not used for
space heating, or for industrial processing or the generation of
electrical energy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use of heating oil, propane, or natural gas used to heat a qualifying
residence.
(2) The definitions in section 1 of this act apply to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect January 1, 2009.

--- END ---