BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that neighborhood
organizations that carry out crime watch and other crime prevention
functions are important to community safety. These groups encourage
neighbors to look out for criminal incidents in their neighborhoods and
to report such incidents to law enforcement. The legislature intends
by this act to create an ongoing grant program to support these
functions and to encourage innovation in the activities carried out by
such groups to promote safe and coordinated crime prevention
strategies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Subject to the availability of funds
appropriated for this purpose, there is established in the department
of community, trade, and economic development a competitive grant
program to encourage communities to develop coordinated strategies to
reduce crime and promote safety.
(2) The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall make awards under the following terms:
(a) At a minimum, grant applications must:
(i) Provide evidence that the applicant is a nonprofit entity;
(ii) Define the geographic area to be served;
(iii) Include a needs assessment describing the impact of crime in
the area which may include, but is not limited to, local crime
statistics;
(iv) Explain in detail (A) the crime prevention and safety
promotion strategy for the area; and (B) an implementation plan
including objectives, tasks, and benchmarks; and
(v) Provide evidence (A) of additional resources committed to the
applicant's strategy totaling at least twenty-five percent of funds
awarded under this section. These resources may consist of public or
private funds, donated goods or services, and other measurable
commitments, including in-kind contributions such as volunteer
services, materials, supplies, physical facilities, or a combination
thereof; and (B) that the funds applied for, if received, will not be
used to replace funding for existing activities.
(b) Activities that may be funded through this grant program
include, but are not limited to, those that:
(i) Build community among neighbors and neighborhood organizations,
including law enforcement, other local government entities, and local
social services providers, to encourage collaboration in reducing crime
and promoting safety;
(ii) Promote awareness of the programs for which funding is sought;
(iii) Educate individuals on crime prevention and safety
techniques; and/or
(iv) Create or build on efforts by existing community programs,
coordinate their efforts, and/or develop other cooperative efforts or
initiatives to make most effective use of resources to carry out the
crime prevention and safety promotion strategy.
(3) The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall review applications for funding and, no later than December 1,
2008, select grant recipients. The department may select new
recipients every two years thereafter.
(4) Upon receiving funds, each recipient shall provide the
department with data and other information the department deems
necessary to monitor the recipient's activities funded under this
section. The purpose of such monitoring is to determine whether the
recipient is making progress in reaching its benchmarks, with such
benchmarks having been specified in the initial application.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The joint legislative audit and review
committee shall conduct an evaluation of the extent to which:
(a) The department has monitored each grant recipient's activities
funded by the program created in section 2 of this act; and
(b) Each grant recipient is making progress in reaching its
benchmarks relating to crime prevention and safety promotion, with such
benchmarks having been specified in the initial application.
The department and each grant recipient shall submit to the
department and to the joint legislative audit and review committee such
data and other information as the joint legislative audit and review
committee determines is necessary and relevant to make these
determinations.
(2) The joint legislative audit and review committee may contract
with the Washington state institute for public policy for appropriate
portions of the evaluation required by this section.
(3) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall report
to the appropriate committees of the legislature not later than August
30, 2010, and August 30, 2012, and every two years thereafter as
determined by the legislature in the operating budget. The department
shall consider the joint legislative audit and review committee
evaluation of future applications by evaluated entities and for
projects similar to evaluated projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The sum of forty-eight thousand dollars, or
as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2009, from the general fund to the department of
community, trade, and economic development for the purposes of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---