BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "homestead exemption" means an
exemption under this section.
(2) Subject to the conditions in subsection (6) of this section, a
portion of the assessed value of a residence is exempt from property
taxes imposed for state purposes. The exemption from property taxation
is equal to:
(a) For taxes levied for collection in 2010:
(i) The first fifty thousand dollars of valuation of each
residential tax parcel consisting of fewer than three dwelling units;
and
(ii) The first fifty thousand dollars of valuation of each
residential unit in a multiunit residential dwelling wherein each unit
is owned and taxed separately;
(b) For taxes levied for collection in 2011:
(i) The first seventy-five thousand dollars of valuation of each
residential tax parcel consisting of fewer than three dwelling units;
and
(ii) The first seventy-five thousand dollars of valuation of each
residential unit in a multiunit residential dwelling wherein each unit
is owned and taxed separately;
(c) For taxes levied for collection in 2012:
(i) The first one hundred thousand dollars of valuation of each
residential tax parcel consisting of fewer than three dwelling units;
and
(ii) The first one hundred thousand dollars of valuation of each
residential unit in a multiunit residential dwelling wherein each unit
is owned and taxed separately;
(d) Each subsequent year, the assessed valuation of a residence
exempt from taxation imposed for state purposes shall be increased by
an amount equal to the percentage growth in the state levy collections
for the prior calendar year. The department may round the dollar
amount to the nearest thousand dollars.
(3) The term "residence" means a single-family dwelling unit
whether such unit is separate or part of a multiunit dwelling,
including the land on which such dwelling stands. The term also
includes a single-family dwelling situated upon lands the fee of which
is vested in the United States, any instrumentality thereof including
an Indian tribe, or in the state of Washington, and notwithstanding the
provisions of RCW 84.04.080 and 84.04.090, such a residence shall be
deemed real property.
(4) The term "residence" also includes a mobile home which has
substantially lost its identity as a mobile unit by virtue of its being
fixed in location upon land owned or leased by the owner of the mobile
home and placed on a foundation (posts or blocks) with fixed pipe, and
connections with sewer, water, or other utilities.
(5) Each county assessor shall send a declaration form for the
owner to sign under penalty of perjury, as provided in RCW 9A.72.085,
that the property is the principal residence of the owner within the
meaning of subsection (6)(a) and (b) of this section. The declaration
form may be included with the valuation notice required by RCW
84.40.045.
(6) The following conditions apply to homestead exemptions:
(a) The residence must be occupied by the person claiming the
exemption as the principal place of residence as of the date of the
signed declaration under subsection (5) of this section. A person who
sells, transfers, or is displaced from his or her residence may
transfer his or her exemption status to a replacement residence, but no
claimant shall receive an exemption on more than one residence in any
year. However, the confinement of the person to a hospital, nursing
home, boarding home, or adult family home may not disqualify the claim
of exemption if:
(i) The residence is temporarily unoccupied;
(ii) The residence is occupied by either a spouse or a person
financially dependent on the claimant for support, or both; or
(iii) The residence is rented for the purpose of paying nursing
home, hospital, boarding home, or adult family home costs.
(b) The person claiming the exemption must have owned, at the time
of declaration, in fee, as a life estate, or by contract purchase, the
residence on which the property taxes have been imposed or if the
person claiming the exemption lives in a cooperative housing
association, corporation, or partnership, such person must own a share
therein representing the unit or portion of the structure in which he
or she resides. For purposes of this subsection, a residence owned by
a marital community or owned by cotenants is deemed to be owned by each
spouse or cotenant, and any lease for life is deemed a life estate.
(c) The declaration form identified in subsection (5) of this
section must be signed and returned to the county assessor not later
than November 30th for exemption from taxes payable the following year.
(7) If the assessor finds that the residence does not meet the
qualifications for a homestead exemption, the exemption shall be denied
but such denial is subject to appeal under the provisions of RCW
84.48.010 and in accordance with the provisions of RCW 84.40.038.
(8) The director of the department of revenue shall adopt such
rules and prescribe such forms as may be necessary and appropriate to
implement and administer this act subject to chapter 34.05 RCW, the
administrative procedure act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW
to read as follows:
Pursuant to the provisions of Article VII, section . . . (Senate
Joint Resolution No. …), the state levy shall be reduced as necessary
to prevent the value exempted under the homestead exemption in section
1 of this act from resulting in a higher tax rate than would have
occurred in the absence of the homestead exemption.

Sec. 3 RCW 84.48.010 and 2001 c 187 s 22 are each amended to read
as follows:
Prior to July 15th, the county legislative authority shall form a
board for the equalization of the assessment of the property of the
county. The members of said board shall receive a per diem amount as
set by the county legislative authority for each day of actual
attendance of the meeting of the board of equalization to be paid out
of the current expense fund of the county: PROVIDED, That when the
county legislative authority constitute the board they shall only
receive their compensation as members of the county legislative
authority. The board of equalization shall meet in open session for
this purpose annually on the 15th day of July and, having each taken an
oath fairly and impartially to perform their duties as members of such
board, they shall examine and compare the returns of the assessment of
the property of the county and proceed to equalize the same, so that
each tract or lot of real property and each article or class of
personal property shall be entered on the assessment list at its true
and fair value, according to the measure of value used by the county
assessor in such assessment year, which is presumed to be correct under
RCW 84.40.0301, and subject to the following rules:
First. They shall raise the valuation of each tract or lot or item
of real property which is returned below its true and fair value to
such price or sum as to be the true and fair value thereof, after at
least five days' notice shall have been given in writing to the owner
or agent.
Second. They shall reduce the valuation of each tract or lot or
item which is returned above its true and fair value to such price or
sum as to be the true and fair value thereof.
Third. They shall raise the valuation of each class of personal
property which is returned below its true and fair value to such price
or sum as to be the true and fair value thereof, and they shall raise
the aggregate value of the personal property of each individual
whenever the aggregate value is less than the true valuation of the
taxable personal property possessed by such individual, to such sum or
amount as to be the true value thereof, after at least five days'
notice shall have been given in writing to the owner or agent thereof.
Fourth. They shall reduce the valuation of each class of personal
property enumerated on the detail and assessment list of the current
year, which is returned above its true and fair value, to such price or
sum as to be the true and fair value thereof; and they shall reduce the
aggregate valuation of the personal property of such individual who has
been assessed at too large a sum to such sum or amount as was the true
and fair value of the personal property.
Fifth. The board may review all claims for either real or personal
property tax exemption, or homestead exemptions under section 1 of this
act, as determined by the county assessor, and shall consider any
taxpayer appeals from the decision of the assessor thereon to determine
(1) if the taxpayer is entitled to an exemption, and (2) if so, the
amount thereof.
The clerk of the board shall keep an accurate journal or record of
the proceedings and orders of said board showing the facts and evidence
upon which their action is based, and the said record shall be
published the same as other proceedings of county legislative
authority, and shall make a true record of the changes of the
descriptions and assessed values ordered by the county board of
equalization. The assessor shall correct the real and personal
assessment rolls in accordance with the changes made by the said county
board of equalization, and the assessor shall make duplicate abstracts
of such corrected values, one copy of which shall be retained in the
office, and one copy forwarded to the department of revenue on or
before the eighteenth day of August next following the meeting of the
county board of equalization.
The county board of equalization shall meet on the 15th day of July
and may continue in session and adjourn from time to time during a
period not to exceed four weeks, but shall remain in session not less
than three days: PROVIDED, That the county board of equalization with
the approval of the county legislative authority may convene at any
time when petitions filed exceed twenty-five, or ten percent of the
number of appeals filed in the preceding year, whichever is greater.
No taxes, except special taxes, shall be extended upon the tax
rolls until the property valuations are equalized by the department of
revenue for the purpose of raising the state revenue.
County legislative authorities as such shall at no time have any
authority to change the valuation of the property of any person or to
release or commute in whole or in part the taxes due on the property of
any person.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect if the proposed
amendment to Article VII of the state Constitution (Senate Joint
Resolution No. …), providing for a homestead exemption, is validly
submitted to and is approved and ratified by the voters at the next
general election. If the proposed amendment is not approved and
ratified, this act is void in its entirety.

--- END ---