BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1)(a) The joint legislative task force on
nuclear energy is established, with nine members as provided in this
subsection:
(i) The majority leader of the senate shall appoint one member from
each of the two largest caucuses of the senate;
(ii) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one
member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of
representatives; and
(iii) The governor shall appoint five members, including
representatives from the executive branch and the nuclear industry.
(b) The majority leader of the senate and the speaker of the house
of representatives jointly shall appoint the cochairs of the task force
from among the legislative members of the task force. The cochairs
shall convene the initial meeting of the task force. A steering
committee consisting of the legislative members of the task force shall
advise the cochairs on the meetings and other activities of the task
force.
(2) The task force shall study the feasibility of pursuing
additional nuclear-generated power in Washington including, but not
limited to, the following:
(a) An examination of advanced nuclear power reactors including,
but not limited to, generations III and IV nuclear technologies;
(b) A review of the advanced nuclear technologies that are in
operation in other countries;
(c) An examination of the methods by which spent fuel may be
recycled, converted, or disposed of;
(d) A review of the safety issues associated with operating and
maintaining advanced nuclear power reactors;
(e) The estimated cost per kilowatt hour of nuclear energy
generated by an advanced nuclear power reactor as compared to other
energy resources, such as wind, solar, hydroelectric, and coal;
(f) An examination of the licensing, permitting, or other
regulatory costs associated with constructing an advanced nuclear power
reactor in the state; and
(g) A review of potential federal tax incentives that may be
available to support advanced nuclear power reactor projects in the
state.
(3) Staff support for the task force will be provided by senate
committee services and the house of representatives office of program
research. The task force may hire additional staff with specific
technical expertise if such expertise is necessary to carry out the
mandates of this study, and only if an appropriation is specifically
provided for this purpose.
(4) Legislative members of the task force shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative
members, except those representing an employer or organization, are
entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(5) The expenses of the task force must be paid jointly by the
senate and house of representatives. Task force expenditures are
subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee
and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their
successor committees.
(6) The task force shall report its findings and recommendations to
the legislature by December 1, 2008.
(7) This section expires July 1, 2009.

--- END ---