BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 42.52 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of fish and wildlife and the parks and
recreation commission may approve private business activity in state-owned housing provided under Title 77 RCW or chapter 79A.05 RCW.
(2) Prior to granting approval of private business activity in
state-owned housing, the department of fish and wildlife and the parks
and recreation commission must adopt a private business activity policy
that is approved by the executive ethics board.
(a) The private business activity policy may only authorize private
business activity by the resident state employee while the employee is
off duty or the employee's spouse who is approved for residency in the
agency housing or the employee's children.
(b) The private business activity policy may not allow private
business activity that negatively impacts the agency's operations. For
the purposes of this section, "negatively impacts" includes but is not
limited to: (i) Negative impacts to visitors' services or access; (ii)
in-person visits to state-owned housing for the purpose of transacting
business that negatively impacts agency operations; (iii) the
incurrence of additional expenses by the state; (iv) the use of signage
in the state-owned residence; (v) advertising on state-owned property;
or (vi) an appearance of state endorsement of the private business
activity.
(3) The private business activity must comply with all other local,
state, and federal laws.
(4) All approvals of a private business activity in state-owned
housing must be by the agency director or designee in writing.
(5) A state employee, or the employee's spouse, who complies with
this section is presumed not to be in violation of RCW 42.52.070 or
42.52.160.

--- END ---