BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.40.124 and 2007 c 123 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Between January 1, 2007, and December 31, 2007, a member of
plan 1 or plan 2 employed as a supreme court justice, court of appeals
judge, or superior court judge may make a one-time irrevocable
election, filed in writing with the member's employer, the department,
and the administrative office of the courts, to accrue an additional
benefit equal to one and one-half percent of average final compensation
for each year of future service credit from the date of the election in
lieu of future employee and employer contributions to the judicial
retirement account plan under chapter 2.14 RCW.
(2)(((a))) A member who chooses to make the election under
subsection (1) of this section may apply to the department to increase
the member's benefit multiplier by an additional one and one-half
percent per year of service for the period in which the member served
as a justice or judge prior to the election. The member may purchase,
beginning with the most recent judicial service, the higher benefit
multiplier for up to seventy percent of that portion of the member's
prior judicial service that would ensure that the member has no more
than a seventy-five percent of average final compensation benefit
accrued by age sixty-four for members of plan 1, and age sixty-six for
members of plan 2. The member shall pay five percent of the salary
earned for each month of service for which the higher benefit
multiplier is being purchased, plus interest as determined by the
director. The purchase price shall not exceed the actuarially
equivalent value of the increase in the member's benefit resulting from
the increase in the benefit multiplier. This payment must be made
prior to retirement and prior to December 31, 2007. After December 31,
2007, a member may purchase the higher benefit multiplier for any of
the member's prior judicial service at the actuarially equivalent value
of the increase in the member's benefit resulting from the increase in
the benefit multiplier, as determined by the director.
(((b))) (3) From January 1, 2009, through June 30, 2009, the
following members may apply to the department to increase their benefit
multiplier by an additional one and one-half percent per year of
service for the period in which they served as a justice or judge:
(a) Active members of plan 1 or plan 2 who are not currently
employed as a supreme court justice, court of appeals judge, or
superior court judge, and who have past service as a supreme court
justice, court of appeals judge, or superior court judge; and
(b) Inactive vested members of plan 1 or plan 2 who have separated,
have not yet retired, and who have past service as a supreme court
justice, court of appeals judge, or superior court judge.
A member eligible under this subsection may purchase the higher
benefit multiplier for all or part of the member's prior judicial
service beginning with the most recent judicial service. The member
shall pay, for the applicable period of service, the actuarially
equivalent value of the increase in the member's benefit resulting from
the increase in the benefit multiplier as determined by the director.
(4) Subject to rules adopted by the department, a member applying
to increase the member's benefit multiplier under this section may pay
all or part of the cost with a lump sum payment, eligible rollover,
direct rollover, or trustee-to-trustee transfer from an eligible
retirement plan. The department shall adopt rules to ensure that all
lump sum payments, rollovers, and transfers comply with the
requirements of the internal revenue code and regulations adopted by
the internal revenue service. The rules adopted by the department may
condition the acceptance of a rollover or transfer from another plan on
the receipt of information necessary to enable the department to
determine the eligibility of any transferred funds for tax-free
rollover treatment or other treatment under federal income tax law.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.40.127 and 2007 c 123 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Between January 1, 2007, and December 31, 2007, a member of
plan 1 or plan 2 employed as a district court judge or municipal court
judge may make a one-time irrevocable election, filed in writing with
the member's employer and the department, to accrue an additional
benefit equal to one and one-half percent of average final compensation
for each year of future service credit from the date of the election.
(2)(((a))) A member who chooses to make the election under
subsection (1) of this section may apply to the department to increase
the member's benefit multiplier by one and one-half percent per year of
service for the period in which the member served as a judge prior to
the election. The member may purchase, beginning with the most recent
judicial service, the higher benefit multiplier for up to seventy
percent of that portion of the member's prior judicial service that
would ensure that the member has no more than a seventy-five percent of
average final compensation benefit accrued by age sixty-four for
members of plan 1, and age sixty-six for members of plan 2. The member
shall pay five percent of the salary earned for each month of service
for which the higher benefit multiplier is being purchased, plus
interest as determined by the director. The purchase price shall not
exceed the actuarially equivalent value of the increase in the member's
benefit resulting from the increase in the benefit multiplier. This
payment must be made prior to retirement and prior to December 31,
2007. After December 31, 2007, a member may purchase the higher
benefit multiplier for any of the member's prior judicial service at
the actuarially equivalent value of the increase in the member's
benefit resulting from the increase in the benefit multiplier, as
determined by the director.
(((b))) (3) From January 1, 2009, through June 30, 2009, the
following members may apply to the department to increase their benefit
multiplier by an additional one and one-half percent per year of
service for the period in which they served as a judge:
(a) Active members of plan 1 or plan 2 who are not currently
employed as a district court judge or municipal court judge, and who
have past service as a district court judge or municipal court judge;
and
(b) Inactive vested members of plan 1 or plan 2 who have separated,
have not yet retired, and who have past service as a district court
judge or municipal court judge.
A member eligible under this subsection may purchase the higher
benefit multiplier for all or part of the member's prior judicial
service beginning with the most recent judicial service. The member
shall pay, for the applicable period of service, the actuarially
equivalent value of the increase in the member's benefit resulting from
the increase in the benefit multiplier as determined by the director.
(4) Subject to rules adopted by the department, a member applying
to increase the member's benefit multiplier under this section may pay
all or part of the cost with a lump sum payment, eligible rollover,
direct rollover, or trustee-to-trustee transfer from an eligible
retirement plan. The department shall adopt rules to ensure that all
lump sum payments, rollovers, and transfers comply with the
requirements of the internal revenue code and regulations adopted by
the internal revenue service. The rules adopted by the department may
condition the acceptance of a rollover or transfer from another plan on
the receipt of information necessary to enable the department to
determine the eligibility of any transferred funds for tax-free
rollover treatment or other treatment under federal income tax law.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.40.870 and 2007 c 123 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Between January 1, 2007, and December 31, 2007, a member of
plan 3 employed as a supreme court justice, court of appeals judge, or
superior court judge may make a one-time irrevocable election, filed in
writing with the member's employer, the department, and the
administrative office of the courts, to accrue an additional plan 3
defined benefit equal to six-tenths percent of average final
compensation for each year of future service credit from the date of
the election in lieu of future employer contributions to the judicial
retirement account plan under chapter 2.14 RCW.
(2)(((a))) A member who chooses to make the election under
subsection (1) of this section may apply to the department to increase
the member's benefit multiplier by six-tenths percent per year of
service for the period in which the member served as a justice or judge
prior to the election. The member may purchase, beginning with the
most recent judicial service, the higher benefit multiplier for up to
seventy percent of that portion of the member's prior judicial service
that would ensure that the member has no more than a thirty-seven and
one-half percent of average final compensation benefit accrued by age
sixty-six. The member shall pay two and one-half percent of the salary
earned for each month of service for which the higher benefit
multiplier is being purchased, plus interest as determined by the
director. The purchase price shall not exceed the actuarially
equivalent value of the increase in the member's benefit resulting from
the increase in the benefit multiplier. This payment must be made
prior to retirement and prior to December 31, 2007. After December 31,
2007, a member may purchase the higher benefit multiplier for any of
the member's prior judicial service at the actuarially equivalent value
of the increase in the member's benefit resulting from the increase in
the benefit multiplier, as determined by the director.
(((b))) (3) From January 1, 2009, through June 30, 2009, the
following members may apply to the department to increase their benefit
multiplier by an additional six-tenths percent per year of service for
the period in which they served as a justice or judge:
(a) Active members of plan 3 who are not currently employed as a
supreme court justice, court of appeals judge, or superior court judge,
and who have past service as a supreme court justice, court of appeals
judge, or superior court judge; and
(b) Inactive vested members of plan 3 who have separated, have not
yet retired, and who have past service as a supreme court justice,
court of appeals judge, or superior court judge.
A member eligible under this subsection may purchase the higher
benefit multiplier for all or part of the member's prior judicial
service beginning with the most recent judicial service. The member
shall pay, for the applicable period of service, the actuarially
equivalent value of the increase in the member's benefit resulting from
the increase in the benefit multiplier as determined by the director.
(4) Subject to rules adopted by the department, a member applying
to increase the member's benefit multiplier under this section may pay
all or part of the cost with a lump sum payment, eligible rollover,
direct rollover, or trustee-to-trustee transfer from an eligible
retirement plan. The department shall adopt rules to ensure that all
lump sum payments, rollovers, and transfers comply with the
requirements of the internal revenue code and regulations adopted by
the internal revenue service. The rules adopted by the department may
condition the acceptance of a rollover or transfer from another plan on
the receipt of information necessary to enable the department to
determine the eligibility of any transferred funds for tax-free
rollover treatment or other treatment under federal income tax law.
(((3))) (5) A member who chooses to make the election under
subsection (1) of this section shall contribute a minimum of seven and
one-half percent of pay to the member's defined contribution account.

Sec. 4 RCW 41.40.873 and 2007 c 123 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Between January 1, 2007, and December 31, 2007, a member of
plan 3 employed as a district court judge or municipal court judge may
make a one-time irrevocable election, filed in writing with the
member's employer and the department, to accrue an additional plan 3
defined benefit equal to six-tenths percent of average final
compensation for each year of future service credit from the date of
the election.
(2)(((a))) A member who chooses to make the election under
subsection (1) of this section may apply to the department to increase
the member's benefit multiplier by six-tenths percent per year of
service for the period in which the member served as a judge prior to
the election. The member may purchase, beginning with the most recent
judicial service, the higher benefit multiplier for up to seventy
percent of that portion of the member's prior judicial service that
would ensure that the member has no more than a thirty-seven and one-half percent of average final compensation benefit accrued by age
sixty-six. The member shall pay two and one-half percent of the salary
earned for each month of service for which the higher benefit
multiplier is being purchased, plus interest as determined by the
director. The purchase price shall not exceed the actuarially
equivalent value of the increase in the member's benefit resulting from
the increase in the benefit multiplier. This payment must be made
prior to retirement and prior to December 31, 2007. After December 31,
2007, a member may purchase the higher benefit multiplier for any of
the member's prior judicial service at the actuarially equivalent value
of the increase in the member's benefit resulting from the increase in
the benefit multiplier, as determined by the director.
(((b))) (3) From January 1, 2009, through June 30, 2009, the
following members may apply to the department to increase their benefit
multiplier by an additional six-tenths percent per year of service for
the period in which they served as a judge:
(a) Active members of plan 3 not currently employed as a district
court judge or municipal court judge, and who have past service as a
district court judge or municipal court judge; and
(b) Inactive vested members of plan 3 who have separated, have not
yet retired, and who have past service as a district court judge or
municipal court judge.
A member eligible under this subsection may purchase the higher
benefit multiplier for all or part of the member's prior judicial
service beginning with the most recent judicial service. The member
shall pay, for the applicable period of service, the actuarially
equivalent value of the increase in the member's benefit resulting from
the increase in the benefit multiplier as determined by the director.
(4) Subject to rules adopted by the department, a member applying
to increase the member's benefit multiplier under this section may pay
all or part of the cost with a lump sum payment, eligible rollover,
direct rollover, or trustee-to-trustee transfer from an eligible
retirement plan. The department shall adopt rules to ensure that all
lump sum payments, rollovers, and transfers comply with the
requirements of the internal revenue code and regulations adopted by
the internal revenue service. The rules adopted by the department may
condition the acceptance of a rollover or transfer from another plan on
the receipt of information necessary to enable the department to
determine the eligibility of any transferred funds for tax-free
rollover treatment or other treatment under federal income tax law.
(((3))) (5) A member who chooses to make the election under
subsection (1) of this section shall contribute a minimum of seven and
one-half percent of pay to the member's defined contribution account.

Sec. 5 RCW 41.32.584 and 2007 c 123 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Between January 1, 2007, and December 31, 2007, a member of
plan 1 employed as a supreme court justice, court of appeals judge, or
superior court judge may make a one-time irrevocable election, filed in
writing with the member's employer, the department, and the
administrative office of the courts, to accrue an additional benefit
equal to one and one-half percent of average final compensation for
each year of future service credit from the date of the election.
(2)(((a))) A member who chooses to make the election under
subsection (1) of this section may apply to the department to increase
the member's benefit multiplier by one and one-half percent per year of
service for the period in which the member served as a justice or judge
prior to the election. The member may purchase, beginning with the
most recent judicial service, the higher benefit multiplier for up to
seventy percent of that portion of the member's prior judicial service
that would ensure that the member has no more than a seventy-five
percent of average final compensation benefit accrued by age sixty-four. The member shall pay five percent of the salary earned for each
month of service for which the higher benefit multiplier is being
purchased, plus interest as determined by the director. The purchase
price shall not exceed the actuarially equivalent value of the increase
in the member's benefit resulting from the increase in the benefit
multiplier. This payment must be made prior to retirement and prior to
December 31, 2007. After December 31, 2007, a member may purchase the
higher benefit multiplier for any of the member's prior judicial
service at the actuarially equivalent value of the increase in the
member's benefit resulting from the increase in the benefit multiplier,
as determined by the director.
(((b))) (3) From January 1, 2009, through June 30, 2009, the
following members may apply to the department to increase their benefit
multiplier by an additional one and one-half percent per year of
service for the period in which they served as a justice or judge:
(a) Active members of plan 1 not currently employed as a supreme
court justice, court of appeals judge, or superior court judge, and who
have past service as a supreme court justice, court of appeals judge,
or superior court judge; and
(b) Inactive vested members of plan 1 who have separated, have not
yet retired, and who have past service as a supreme court justice,
court of appeals judge, or superior court judge.
A member eligible under this subsection may purchase the higher
benefit multiplier for all or part of the member's prior judicial
service beginning with the most recent judicial service. The member
shall pay, for the applicable period of service, the actuarially
equivalent value of the increase in the member's benefit resulting from
the increase in the benefit multiplier as determined by the director.
(4) Subject to rules adopted by the department, a member applying
to increase the member's benefit multiplier under this section may pay
all or part of the cost with a lump sum payment, eligible rollover,
direct rollover, or trustee-to-trustee transfer from an eligible
retirement plan. The department shall adopt rules to ensure that all
lump sum payments, rollovers, and transfers comply with the
requirements of the internal revenue code and regulations adopted by
the internal revenue service. The rules adopted by the department may
condition the acceptance of a rollover or transfer from another plan on
the receipt of information necessary to enable the department to
determine the eligibility of any transferred funds for tax-free
rollover treatment or other treatment under federal income tax law.

--- END ---