BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.24.244 and 2007 c 370 s 4 and 2007 c 222 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) There shall be a license for microbreweries; fee to be one
hundred dollars for production of less than sixty thousand barrels of
malt liquor, including strong beer, per year.
(2) Any microbrewery licensed under this section may also act as a
distributor and/or retailer for beer and strong beer of its own
production. Any microbrewery licensed under this section may act as a
distributor for beer of its own production. Strong beer may not be
sold at a farmers market or under any endorsement which may authorize
microbreweries to sell beer at farmers markets. Any microbrewery
operating as a distributor and/or retailer under this subsection shall
comply with the applicable laws and rules relating to distributors
and/or retailers, except that a microbrewery operating as a distributor
may maintain a warehouse off the premises of the microbrewery for the
distribution of beer provided that (a) the warehouse has been approved
by the board under RCW 66.24.010 and (b) the number of warehouses off
the premises of the microbrewery does not exceed one. A microbrewery
holding a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license may sell beer of
its own production for off-premises consumption from its restaurant
premises in kegs or in a sanitary container brought to the premises by
the purchaser or furnished by the licensee and filled at the tap by the
licensee at the time of sale.
(3) The board may issue a license allowing a microbrewery to
operate a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant under RCW 66.24.420.
(4) The board may issue a license to a microbrewery allowing for
on-premises consumption of beer, including strong beer, wine, or both
of other manufacture if purchased from a Washington state-licensed
distributor. The microbrewer must determine, at the time the license
is issued, whether the licensed premises will be operated as a tavern
with persons under twenty-one years of age not allowed as provided for
in RCW 66.24.330, or as a beer and/or wine restaurant as described in
RCW 66.24.320.
(5) A microbrewery that holds a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant
license or a beer and/or wine restaurant license shall hold the same
privileges and endorsements as permitted under RCW 66.24.320 and
66.24.420.
(6) If the microbrewery licensee holds a separate license for a
spirits, beer, and wine restaurant or a beer and/or wine restaurant,
operated on the brewery premises, the licensee may hold a second retail
license for a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant or a beer and/or wine
restaurant, at a location separate from the licensed brewery premises.
(7)(a) A microbrewery licensed under this section may apply to the
board for an endorsement to sell bottled beer of its own production at
retail for off-premises consumption at a qualifying farmers market.
The annual fee for this endorsement is seventy-five dollars.
(b) For each month during which a microbrewery will sell beer at a
qualifying farmers market, the microbrewery must provide the board or
its designee a list of the dates, times, and locations at which bottled
beer may be offered for sale. This list must be received by the board
before the microbrewery may offer beer for sale at a qualifying farmers
market.
(c) The beer sold at qualifying farmers markets must be produced in
Washington.
(d) Each approved location in a qualifying farmers market is deemed
to be part of the microbrewery license for the purpose of this title.
The approved locations under an endorsement granted under this
subsection (7) do not constitute the tasting or sampling privilege of
a microbrewery. The microbrewery may not store beer at a farmers
market beyond the hours that the microbrewery offers bottled beer for
sale. The microbrewery may not act as a distributor from a farmers
market location.
(e) Before a microbrewery may sell bottled beer at a qualifying
farmers market, the farmers market must apply to the board for
authorization for any microbrewery with an endorsement approved under
this subsection (7) to sell bottled beer at retail at the farmers
market. This application shall include, at a minimum: (i) A map of
the farmers market showing all booths, stalls, or other designated
locations at which an approved microbrewery may sell bottled beer; and
(ii) the name and contact information for the on-site market managers
who may be contacted by the board or its designee to verify the
locations at which bottled beer may be sold. Before authorizing a
qualifying farmers market to allow an approved microbrewery to sell
bottled beer at retail at its farmers market location, the board shall
notify the persons or entities of the application for authorization
pursuant to RCW 66.24.010 (8) and (9). An authorization granted under
this subsection (7)(e) may be withdrawn by the board for any violation
of this title or any rules adopted under this title.
(f) The board may adopt rules establishing the application and
approval process under this section and any additional rules necessary
to implement this section.
(g) For the purposes of this subsection (7):
(i) "Qualifying farmers market" means an entity that sponsors a
regular assembly of vendors at a defined location for the purpose of
promoting the sale of agricultural products grown or produced in this
state directly to the consumer under conditions that meet the following
minimum requirements:
(A) There are at least five participating vendors who are farmers
selling their own agricultural products;
(B) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are
farmers exceeds the total combined gross annual sales of vendors who
are processors or resellers;
(C) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are
farmers, processors, or resellers exceeds the total combined gross
annual sales of vendors who are not farmers, processors, or resellers;
(D) The sale of imported items and secondhand items by any vendor
is prohibited; and
(E) No vendor is a franchisee.
(ii) "Farmer" means a natural person who sells, with or without
processing, agricultural products that he or she raises on land he or
she owns or leases in this state or in another state's county that
borders this state.
(iii) "Processor" means a natural person who sells processed food
that he or she has personally prepared on land he or she owns or leases
in this state or in another state's county that borders this state.
(iv) "Reseller" means a natural person who buys agricultural
products from a farmer and resells the products directly to the
consumer.

Sec. 2 RCW 66.24.244 and 2007 c 370 s 5 and 2007 c 222 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) There shall be a license for microbreweries; fee to be one
hundred dollars for production of less than sixty thousand barrels of
malt liquor, including strong beer, per year.
(2) Any microbrewery licensed under this section may also act as a
distributor and/or retailer for beer and strong beer of its own
production. Strong beer may not be sold at a farmers market or under
any endorsement which may authorize microbreweries to sell beer at
farmers markets. Any microbrewery operating as a distributor and/or
retailer under this subsection shall comply with the applicable laws
and rules relating to distributors and/or retailers, except that a
microbrewery operating as a distributor may maintain a warehouse off
the premises of the microbrewery for the distribution of beer provided
that (a) the warehouse has been approved by the board under RCW
66.24.010 and (b) the number of warehouses off the premises of the
microbrewery does not exceed one. A microbrewery holding a spirits,
beer, and wine restaurant license may sell beer of its own production
for off-premises consumption from its restaurant premises in kegs or in
a sanitary container brought to the premises by the purchaser or
furnished by the licensee and filled at the tap by the licensee at the
time of sale.
(3) The board may issue a license allowing a microbrewery to
operate a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant under RCW 66.24.420.
(4) The board may issue a license to a microbrewery allowing for
on-premises consumption of beer, including strong beer, wine, or both
of other manufacture if purchased from a Washington state-licensed
distributor. The microbrewer must determine, at the time the license
is issued, whether the licensed premises will be operated as a tavern
with persons under twenty-one years of age not allowed as provided for
in RCW 66.24.330, or as a beer and/or wine restaurant as described in
RCW 66.24.320.
(5) A microbrewery that holds a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant
license or a beer and/or wine restaurant license shall hold the same
privileges and endorsements as permitted under RCW 66.24.320 and
66.24.420.
(6) If the microbrewery licensee holds a separate license for a
spirits, beer, and wine restaurant or a beer and/or wine restaurant,
operated on the brewery premises, the licensee may hold a second retail
license for a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant or a beer and/or wine
restaurant, at a location separate from the licensed brewery premises.
(7)(a) A microbrewery licensed under this section may apply to the
board for an endorsement to sell bottled beer of its own production at
retail for off-premises consumption at a qualifying farmers market.
The annual fee for this endorsement is seventy-five dollars.
(b) For each month during which a microbrewery will sell beer at a
qualifying farmers market, the microbrewery must provide the board or
its designee a list of the dates, times, and locations at which bottled
beer may be offered for sale. This list must be received by the board
before the microbrewery may offer beer for sale at a qualifying farmers
market.
(c) The beer sold at qualifying farmers markets must be produced in
Washington.
(d) Each approved location in a qualifying farmers market is deemed
to be part of the microbrewery license for the purpose of this title.
The approved locations under an endorsement granted under this
subsection (7) do not constitute the tasting or sampling privilege of
a microbrewery. The microbrewery may not store beer at a farmers
market beyond the hours that the microbrewery offers bottled beer for
sale. The microbrewery may not act as a distributor from a farmers
market location.
(e) Before a microbrewery may sell bottled beer at a qualifying
farmers market, the farmers market must apply to the board for
authorization for any microbrewery with an endorsement approved under
this subsection (7) to sell bottled beer at retail at the farmers
market. This application shall include, at a minimum: (i) A map of
the farmers market showing all booths, stalls, or other designated
locations at which an approved microbrewery may sell bottled beer; and
(ii) the name and contact information for the on-site market managers
who may be contacted by the board or its designee to verify the
locations at which bottled beer may be sold. Before authorizing a
qualifying farmers market to allow an approved microbrewery to sell
bottled beer at retail at its farmers market location, the board shall
notify the persons or entities of the application for authorization
pursuant to RCW 66.24.010 (8) and (9). An authorization granted under
this subsection (7)(e) may be withdrawn by the board for any violation
of this title or any rules adopted under this title.
(f) The board may adopt rules establishing the application and
approval process under this section and any additional rules necessary
to implement this section.
(g) For the purposes of this subsection (7):
(i) "Qualifying farmers market" means an entity that sponsors a
regular assembly of vendors at a defined location for the purpose of
promoting the sale of agricultural products grown or produced in this
state directly to the consumer under conditions that meet the following
minimum requirements:
(A) There are at least five participating vendors who are farmers
selling their own agricultural products;
(B) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are
farmers exceeds the total combined gross annual sales of vendors who
are processors or resellers;
(C) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are
farmers, processors, or resellers exceeds the total combined gross
annual sales of vendors who are not farmers, processors, or resellers;
(D) The sale of imported items and secondhand items by any vendor
is prohibited; and
(E) No vendor is a franchisee.
(ii) "Farmer" means a natural person who sells, with or without
processing, agricultural products that he or she raises on land he or
she owns or leases in this state or in another state's county that
borders this state.
(iii) "Processor" means a natural person who sells processed food
that he or she has personally prepared on land he or she owns or leases
in this state or in another state's county that borders this state.
(iv) "Reseller" means a natural person who buys agricultural
products from a farmer and resells the products directly to the
consumer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 1 of this act expires June 30, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 2 of this act takes effect June 30,
2008.

--- END ---