BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to promote
innovative approaches to improving highway safety and protecting both
the traveling public and highway workers. Technological advances have
made it possible for electronic traffic flagging devices to be used on
highways in a manor that reduces highway worker exposure to vehicular
traffic. The legislature intends for the department of transportation
to pilot the use of electronic traffic flagging devices and consider
increased use of these devices.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.36 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall initiate a pilot project to evaluate the
benefits of using electronic traffic flagging devices. Electronic
traffic flagging devices must be tested by the department at multiple
sites and reviewed for efficiency and safety. The department shall
report to the transportation committees of the legislature on the best
use and practices involving electronic traffic flagging devices,
including recommendations for future use, by June 30, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The sum of one hundred thousand dollars, or
as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the biennium
ending June 30, 2009, from the motor vehicle account to the department
of transportation for the purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act expires December 31, 2009.

--- END ---