BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 19.25 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Performing group" means a vocal or instrumental group seeking
to use the name of another group that has previously released a
commercial sound recording under that name.
(b) "Person" means the performing group or its promoter, manager,
or agent. "Person" does not include the performance venue or its
owners, managers, or operators, unless the performance venue owns or
produces the performing group, or knew or should have known that the
performing group does not have a legal right to perform.
(c) "Recording group" means a vocal or instrumental group, at least
one of whose members has previously released a commercial sound
recording under that group's name and in which the member or members
have a legal right by virtue of use or operation under the group name
without having abandoned the name or affiliation with the group.
(d) "Sound recording" means a work that results from the fixation
on a material object of a series of musical, spoken, or other sounds
regardless of the nature of the material object, such as a disk, tape,
or other phonorecord, in which the sounds are embodied.
(2) No person shall advertise or conduct a live musical performance
or production through the use of a false, deceptive, or misleading
affiliation, connection, or association between a performing group and
a recording group unless any of the following apply:
(a) The performing group is the authorized registrant and owner of
a federal service mark for the group registered in the United States
patent and trademark office;
(b) At least one member of the performing group was previously a
member of the recording group and has a legal right by virtue of use or
operation under the group name without having abandoned the name or
affiliation of the group;
(c) The live musical performance or production is identified in all
advertising and promotion as a salute or tribute, and the name of the
vocal or instrumental group performing is not so closely related or
similar to that used by the recording group that it would tend to
confuse or mislead the public;
(d) The advertising does not relate to a live musical performance
or production taking place in this state; or
(e) The performance or production is expressly authorized by the
recording group.
(3)(a) Any person who violates any of the provisions of this
section shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed two thousand
five hundred dollars per violation. An action for a civil penalty may
be brought by the attorney general or a county or city prosecutor, and
shall be enforceable as a civil judgment.
(b) Any person who violates any of the provisions of this section
shall be subject to the equitable remedies described in chapter 19.86
RCW.
(c) Nothing in this section shall preclude prosecution of a
violation of this section under any other provision of law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act may be known and cited as the truth
in music advertising act.

--- END ---