BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.44.210 and 1967 c 227 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
As an alternate method of annexation to public hospital districts,
any territory adjacent to a public hospital district may be annexed
thereto by vote of the qualified electors residing in the territory to
be annexed, in the manner provided in RCW 70.44.210 through 70.44.230.
An election to annex such territory may only be called pursuant to a
resolution calling for such an election adopted by the district
commissioners following two public hearings on such a resolution. Both
hearings on a resolution must be held within the boundaries of the
territory to be annexed.
Any resolution calling for such an election shall describe the
boundaries of the territory to be annexed, state that the annexation of
such territory to the public hospital district will be conducive to the
welfare and benefit of the persons or property within the district and
within the territory proposed to be annexed, contain the tax
implications of the annexation along with how the money will be spent,
and fix the date, time, and place for a public hearing thereon which
date shall be not more than sixty nor less than forty days following
the adoption of such resolution.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.44.220 and 1967 c 227 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
Notice of ((such)) each of the two required hearings shall be
published once a week for at least ((two)) the three consecutive weeks
immediately before the hearings in one or more newspapers of general
circulation within the territory proposed to be annexed. If the
territory to be annexed is only served by newspapers of general
circulation publishing on a monthly or bimonthly basis, notice of the
two required hearings shall be published for at least three respective
newspaper publishing dates immediately before the hearings. The notice
shall contain a description of the boundaries of the territory proposed
to be annexed, the tax implications of the annexation along with how
the money will be spent, and shall state the time and place of the
hearing thereon and the fact that any changes in the boundaries of such
territory will be considered at such time and place. At such hearings
or any continuation thereof, any interested person may appear and be
heard on all matters relating to the proposed annexation. The district
commissioners may make such changes in the boundaries of the territory
proposed to be annexed as it shall deem reasonable and proper, but may
not delete any portion of the proposed area which will create an island
of included or excluded lands. If the district commissioners shall
determine that any additional territory should be included in the
territory to be annexed, ((a second)) an additional hearing shall be
held and notice given in the same manner as for the original hearings.
The district commissioners may adjourn the hearings on the proposed
annexation from time to time not exceeding thirty days in all. At the
next regular meeting following the conclusion of such hearings, the
district commissioners shall, if it finds that the annexation of such
territory will be conducive to the welfare and benefit of the persons
and property therein and the welfare and benefit of the persons and
property within the public hospital district, adopt a resolution fixing
the boundaries of the territory to be annexed and causing to be called
a special election on such annexation to be held not more than one
hundred twenty days nor less than sixty days following the adoption of
such resolution.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.44.230 and 1967 c 227 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
An election on the annexation of territory to a public hospital
district shall be conducted and canvassed in the same manner as
provided for the conduct of an election on the formation of a public
hospital district except that notice of such election shall be
published in one or more newspapers of general circulation in the
territory proposed to be annexed for the three consecutive weeks
immediately before the election and the ballot proposition shall be in
substantially the following form:

ANNEXATION TO (herein insert name of public hospital district)

"Shall the territory described in a resolution of the
public hospital district commissioners of (((here)) insert name
of public hospital district here) adopted on . . . .,
. . . . . ., ((19)) 20. . ., be annexed to such district and
should that district impose a permanent regular property tax
levy of (insert maximum amount of tax here) or less per
thousand dollars of the assessed valuation, with money raised
under this tax to be spent as follows: (insert how tax money
will be spent)?

YES . . . . . . . . . . . . □

NO . . . . . . . . . . . . □"

If a majority of those voting on such proposition vote in favor
thereof, the territory shall thereupon be annexed to the public
hospital district.

--- END ---