BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Any person who (i) has had his or her driver's license
revoked for a third or subsequent time due to an alcohol-related
violation of RCW 46.20.308, 46.20.3101, 46.61.502, or 46.61.504, (ii)
is eligible for licensing based on reports provided by the alcoholism
agency or probation department designated by RCW 46.61.5056, and (iii)
has successfully completed, as determined by the department of
licensing, an approved rehabilitation program, may apply for a
restricted driver's license if he or she signs a sworn affidavit or
declaration that he or she will never consume alcohol again for any
purposes, including religious services or medication.
(b) The department of licensing shall adopt rules to establish the
following rehabilitation time frame for a person to successfully
complete the rehabilitation program described in (a) of this
subsection:
(i) One year for the first rehabilitation;
(ii) Three years for the second rehabilitation; and
(iii) Six years for the third or subsequent rehabilitation.
(2) The department of licensing shall affix a "No Alcohol" label to
the back of the restricted driver's license upon issuance, which
enables the department and law enforcement personnel to determine that
the person is driving on a restricted status. The department shall
also make a permanent note of this restriction in the person's driving
record that is available to insurance companies. The "No Alcohol"
label may be removed from the back of the restricted driver's license
only upon request and if the person has not had an alcohol-related
violation of RCW 46.20.308, 46.20.3101, 46.61.502, or 46.61.504 during
the previous ten-year period.

--- END ---