BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.400.100 and 2002 c 78 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) School districts may employ public school principals and/or
vice principals to supervise the operation and management of the school
to which they are assigned. Such persons shall hold valid
administrative certificates ((and shall hold or have held either valid
teacher certificates or valid educational staff associate certificates.
Persons who hold or have held valid educational staff associate
certificates must also have demonstrated successful school-based
experience in an instructional role with students)).
(b) A school district may require additional training for
individuals who are employed as public school principals or vice
principals, who have not held a valid teacher certificate. The
additional training required by the district shall permit the
individual to obtain the additional training within the first three
years of employment as a principal or vice principal for the district.
(c) Persons who held teaching positions whose certificates were
revoked, suspended, or surrendered may not be employed as public school
principals or vice principals.
(2) In addition to such other duties as shall be prescribed by law
and by the job description adopted by the board of directors, each
principal shall:
(((1))) (a) Assume administrative authority, responsibility and
instructional leadership, under the supervision of the school district
superintendent, and in accordance with the policies of the school
district board of directors, for the planning, management, supervision
and evaluation of the educational program of the attendance area for
which he or she is responsible.
(((2))) (b) Submit recommendations to the school district
superintendent regarding appointment, assignment, promotion, transfer
and dismissal of all personnel assigned to the attendance area for
which he or she is responsible.
(((3))) (c) Submit recommendations to the school district
superintendent regarding the fiscal needs to maintain and improve the
instructional program of the attendance area for which he or she is
responsible.
(((4))) (d) Assume administrative authority and responsibility for
the supervision, counseling and discipline of pupils in the attendance
area for which he or she is responsible.

--- END ---