BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.09.510 and 2007 c 315 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Medical assistance may be provided in accordance with
eligibility requirements established by the department, as defined in
the social security Title XIX state plan for mandatory categorically
needy persons and:
(((1))) (a) Individuals who would be eligible for cash assistance
except for their institutional status;
(((2))) (b) Individuals who are under twenty-one years of age, who
would be eligible for medicaid, but do not qualify as dependent
children and who are in (((a))) (i) foster care, (((b))) (ii)
subsidized adoption, (((c))) (iii) a nursing facility or an
intermediate care facility for persons who are mentally retarded, or
(((d))) (iv) inpatient psychiatric facilities;
(((3))) (c) Individuals who:
(((a))) (i) Are under twenty-one years of age;
(((b))) (ii) On or after July 22, 2007, were in foster care under
the legal responsibility of the department or a federally recognized
tribe located within the state; and
(((c))) (iii) On their eighteenth birthday, were in foster care
under the legal responsibility of the department or a federally
recognized tribe located within the state;
(((4))) (d) Persons who are aged, blind, or disabled who: (((a)))
(i) Receive only a state supplement, or (((b))) (ii) would not be
eligible for cash assistance if they were not institutionalized;
(((5))) (e) Categorically eligible individuals who meet the income
and resource requirements of the cash assistance programs;
(((6))) (f) Individuals who are enrolled in managed health care
systems, who have otherwise lost eligibility for medical assistance,
but who have not completed a current six-month enrollment in a managed
health care system, and who are eligible for federal financial
participation under Title XIX of the social security act;
(((7))) (g) Children and pregnant women allowed by federal statute
for whom funding is appropriated;
(((8))) (h) Working individuals with disabilities authorized under
section 1902(a)(10)(A)(ii) of the social security act for whom funding
is appropriated;
(((9))) (i) Other individuals eligible for medical services under
RCW 74.09.035 and 74.09.700 for whom federal financial participation is
available under Title XIX of the social security act;
(((10))) (j) Persons allowed by section 1931 of the social security
act for whom funding is appropriated; and
(((11))) (k) Women who: (((a))) (i) Are under sixty-five years of
age; (((b))) (ii) have been screened for breast and cervical cancer
under the national breast and cervical cancer early detection program
administered by the department of health or tribal entity and have been
identified as needing treatment for breast or cervical cancer; and
(((c))) (iii) are not otherwise covered by health insurance. Medical
assistance provided under this subsection (1)(k) is limited to the
period during which the woman requires treatment for breast or cervical
cancer, and is subject to any conditions or limitations specified in
the omnibus appropriations act.
(2) To the extent permitted under federal law, the department shall
set the categorically needy income level for adults who are sixty-five
years of age or older, blind, or disabled, at eighty percent of the
federal poverty level as adjusted annually beginning July 1, 2009, at
ninety percent beginning July 1, 2011, and at one hundred percent
beginning July 1, 2013. As used in this section, "federal poverty
level" refers to the poverty guidelines updated periodically in the
federal register by the United States department of health and human
services under the authority of 42 U.S.C. Sec. 9902(2).

Sec. 2 RCW 74.09.530 and 2007 c 315 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The amount and nature of medical assistance and the
determination of eligibility of recipients for medical assistance shall
be the responsibility of the department of social and health services.
The department shall establish reasonable standards of assistance and
resource and income exemptions which shall be consistent with the
provisions of the Social Security Act and with the regulations of the
secretary of health, education and welfare for determining eligibility
of individuals for medical assistance and the extent of such assistance
to the extent that funds are available from the state and federal
government. The department shall not consider resources in determining
continuing eligibility for recipients eligible under section 1931 of
the social security act.
(2) Individuals eligible for medical assistance under RCW
74.09.510(((3))) (1)(c) shall be transitioned into coverage under that
subsection immediately upon their termination from coverage under RCW
74.09.510(((2)(a))) (1)(b)(i). The department shall use income
eligibility standards and eligibility determinations applicable to
children placed in foster care. The department, in consultation with
the health care authority, shall provide information regarding basic
health plan enrollment and shall offer assistance with the application
and enrollment process to individuals covered under RCW
74.09.510(((3))) (1)(c) who are approaching their twenty-first
birthday.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2009, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect July 1, 2009.

--- END ---