BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.08.025 and 2005 c 174 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Public assistance may be awarded to any applicant:
(a) Who is in need and otherwise meets the eligibility requirements
of department assistance programs; and
(b) Who has not made a voluntary assignment of property or cash for
the purpose of qualifying for an assistance grant((; and)).
(((c) Who is not)) (2) A person who is an inmate of a public
institution except as a patient in a medical institution or except as
an inmate in a public institution who could qualify for federal aid
assistance((: PROVIDED, That)) shall not receive public assistance
benefits while he or she is an inmate of a public institution, except
as otherwise provided by state law. A person who is placed on home
monitoring is not an inmate of a public institution under this
subsection, and is not prohibited from receiving public assistance
benefits on that basis.
(3) The assistance paid by the department to recipients in nursing
homes, or receiving nursing home care, may cover the cost of clothing
and incidentals and general maintenance exclusive of medical care and
health services. The department may pay a grant to cover the cost of
clothing and personal incidentals in public or private medical
institutions and institutions for tuberculosis. The department shall
allow recipients in nursing homes to retain, in addition to the grant
to cover the cost of clothing and incidentals, wages received for work
as a part of a training or rehabilitative program designed to prepare
the recipient for less restrictive placement to the extent permitted
under Title XIX of the federal social security act.
(((2))) (4) Any person otherwise qualified for temporary assistance
for needy families under this title who has resided in the state of
Washington for fewer than twelve consecutive months immediately
preceding application for assistance is limited to the benefit level in
the state in which the person resided immediately before Washington,
using the eligibility rules and other definitions established under
this chapter, that was obtainable on the date of application in
Washington state, if the benefit level of the prior state is lower than
the level provided to similarly situated applicants in Washington
state. The benefit level under this subsection shall be in effect for
the first twelve months a recipient is on temporary assistance for
needy families in Washington state.
(((3))) (5) Any person otherwise qualified for temporary assistance
for needy families who is assessed through the state alcohol and
substance abuse program as drug or alcohol-dependent and requiring
treatment to become employable shall be required by the department to
participate in a drug or alcohol treatment program as a condition of
benefit receipt.
(((4))) (6) Pursuant to 21 U.S.C. 862a(d)(1), the department shall
exempt individuals from the eligibility restrictions of 21 U.S.C.
862a(a)(1) and (2) to ensure eligibility for temporary assistance for
needy families benefits and federal food assistance.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.08.060 and 1985 c 335 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall ((be required to)) approve or deny the
application within forty-five days after ((the)) filing ((thereof)) and
shall immediately notify the applicant in writing of its decision((:
PROVIDED, That)). If the department is not able within forty-five
days, despite due diligence, to secure all information necessary to
establish ((his)) eligibility, the department ((is charged to)) shall
continue to secure such information and if such information, when
established, makes the applicant eligible, the department shall pay
((his)) the grant from date of authorization or forty-five days after
date of application whichever is sooner.
This rule shall not prevent an inmate of a Washington state
correctional institution who does not have an established release date
from applying for medical assistance.
Any person currently ineligible, who will become eligible after the
occurrence of a specific event, may apply for assistance within forty-five days of that event.
The department is authorized, in respect to work requirements, to
provide employment and training services, including job search, job
placement, work orientation, and necessary support services to verify
eligibility.

Sec. 3 RCW 74.09.010 and 2007 c 3 s 2 are each amended to read as
follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Children's health program" means the health care services
program provided to children under eighteen years of age and in
households with incomes at or below the federal poverty level as
annually defined by the federal department of health and human services
as adjusted for family size, and who are not otherwise eligible for
medical assistance or the limited casualty program for the medically
needy.
(2) (("Committee" means the children's health services committee
created in section 3 of this act.)) "Correctional institution" means
any place designated by law for the keeping of persons held in custody
under process of law, or under lawful arrest, including state prisons,
county and local jails, and other facilities operated by the department
of corrections, the department of social and health services juvenile
rehabilitation administration, or local governmental units primarily
for the purposes of punishment, correction, or rehabilitation following
conviction of a criminal offense.
(3) "County" means the board of county commissioners, county
council, county executive, or tribal jurisdiction, or its designee. A
combination of two or more county authorities or tribal jurisdictions
may enter into joint agreements to fulfill the requirements of RCW
74.09.415 through 74.09.435.
(4) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(5) "Department of health" means the Washington state department of
health created pursuant to RCW 43.70.020.
(6) "Institution for mental diseases" means a hospital, nursing
facility, or other institution of more than sixteen beds that is
primarily engaged in providing diagnosis, treatment, or care of persons
with mental diseases, including medical attention, nursing care, and
related services, which would be excluded from federal financial
participation in expenditure for services under federal law.
(7) "Internal management" means the administration of medical
assistance, medical care services, the children's health program, and
the limited casualty program.
(((7))) (8) "Limited casualty program" means the medical care
program provided to medically needy persons as defined under Title XIX
of the federal social security act, and to medically indigent persons
who are without income or resources sufficient to secure necessary
medical services.
(((8))) (9) "Medical assistance" means the federal aid medical care
program provided to categorically needy persons as defined under Title
XIX of the federal social security act.
(((9))) (10) "Medical care services" means the limited scope of
care financed by state funds and provided to general assistance
recipients, and recipients of alcohol and drug addiction services
provided under chapter 74.50 RCW.
(((10))) (11) "Nursing home" means nursing home as defined in RCW
18.51.010.
(((11))) (12) "Poverty" means the federal poverty level determined
annually by the United States department of health and human services,
or successor agency.
(((12))) (13) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health
services.
(((13))) (14) "Full benefit dual eligible beneficiary" means an
individual who, for any month: Has coverage for the month under a
medicare prescription drug plan or medicare advantage plan with part D
coverage; and is determined eligible by the state for full medicaid
benefits for the month under any eligibility category in the state's
medicaid plan or a section 1115 demonstration waiver that provides
pharmacy benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An individual who is receiving medical assistance benefits at
the time he or she becomes confined in a Washington state correctional
institution or Washington state institution for mental diseases shall
not be terminated from medical assistance on the basis of confinement.
Medical assistance to that individual shall be suspended during the
period of confinement in the following manner:
(a) No medical assistance benefits shall be paid to the individual
while he or she is in confinement, except as explicitly authorized by
state law.
(b) Upon the individual's release from confinement, medical
assistance benefits for the individual shall be immediately resumed.
No new application is required to effectuate resumption of medical
assistance.
(c) The individual is not required to recertify eligibility for
medical assistance during the period in which he or she is confined.
(i) If the individual is confined at the time at which he or she
would otherwise be required to recertify eligibility for medical
assistance, the department may allow the individual to recertify
eligibility prior to release from confinement, or may require the
individual to recertify eligibility immediately following release, or
at any later time established by rule.
(ii) The department shall explore the feasibility of obtaining a
medicaid state plan amendment to allow the state to receive medicaid
matching funds for medical assistance provided to an individual during
the period in which recertification of eligibility is pending under
(c)(i) of this subsection.
(d) The department may terminate medical assistance to a person who
is released from confinement to an address outside of the state of
Washington, or to an individual who receives medical assistance based
on the children's health program who ages out of the program during the
period of confinement.
(e) The department shall collaborate with the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs, the department of
corrections, the regional support networks, department field offices,
institutions for mental diseases, and correctional institutions to
establish policies and procedures that will facilitate speedy
notification of the department when an individual enrolled in medical
assistance is confined in a Washington state correctional institution
or Washington state institution for mental diseases, or is released
from confinement. The department shall adopt policies which promote
continuity of medical assistance for such individuals, and make efforts
to inform individuals in confinement about suspension of medical
assistance and any applicable recertification requirement upon release.
(f) To the extent funding is provided for this purpose, the
department shall expedite processing of applications for federal
supplemental security income or social security disability benefits for
individuals whose medical assistance benefits are suspended under this
section.
(2)(a) The department shall consider an application for medical
assistance from an individual who is confined in a Washington state
correctional institution or Washington state institution for mental
diseases if:
(i) The individual does not have an established final release date
because the individual has not yet been tried or sentenced in a
criminal case; or
(ii) The individual is scheduled to be released from confinement
within the next four months.
(b) The department shall approve or deny an application for medical
assistance from a confined individual within forty-five days after
filing thereof and shall immediately notify the applicant in writing of
its decision. If the department is unable despite due diligence to
secure necessary information to establish eligibility within forty-five
days, the department shall continue to secure such information for a
reasonable period. If the department determines that the applicant
would be eligible for medical assistance except for the fact of
confinement, the department shall approve the application, and medical
assistance for the individual shall be suspended as described in
subsection (1) of this section. No benefits shall be paid to the
individual prior to release from confinement, except as explicitly
authorized by law.
(c) In reviewing an application for medical assistance under this
subsection, the department shall include in its consideration evidence
of any medical evaluation performed within one year of the date of
application. If insufficient evidence is available upon which to make
a determination, the department shall arrange for an evaluation to be
performed consistent with RCW 74.09.075.
(3) The department is authorized to make rules necessary to
implement this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 74.09.555 and 2005 c 503 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall adopt rules and policies providing that
when persons with a mental disorder, who were enrolled in medical
assistance immediately prior to confinement, are released from
confinement, their medical assistance coverage will be fully reinstated
on the day of their release((, subject to any expedited review of their
continued eligibility for medical assistance coverage that is required
under federal or state law)).
(2) The department, in collaboration with the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs, the department of
corrections, and the regional support networks, shall establish
procedures for coordination between department field offices,
institutions for mental diseases, and correctional institutions, ((as
defined in RCW 9.94.049,)) that result in ((prompt reinstatement of
eligibility and)) speedy eligibility determinations for persons who are
likely to be eligible for medical assistance services ((upon release
from confinement)). Procedures developed under this subsection must
address:
(a) Mechanisms for receiving applications for medical assistance
((services applications)) on behalf of confined persons in anticipation
of their release from confinement;
(b) Expeditious review of applications filed by or on behalf of
confined persons and, to the extent practicable, completion of the
review before the person is released;
(c) Mechanisms for providing medical assistance ((services))
identity cards to persons eligible for medical assistance services
immediately upon or prior to their release from confinement; and
(d) Coordination with the federal social security administration,
through interagency agreements or otherwise, to expedite processing of
applications for federal supplemental security income or social
security disability benefits, including federal acceptance of
applications on behalf of confined persons.
(3) Where medical or psychiatric examinations during a person's
confinement indicate that the person is disabled, the correctional
institution or institution for mental diseases shall provide the
department with that information for purposes of making medical
assistance eligibility and enrollment determinations prior to the
person's release from confinement. The department shall, to the
maximum extent permitted by federal law, use the examination in making
its determination whether the person is disabled and eligible for
medical assistance.
(4) For purposes of this section, "confined" or "confinement" means
incarcerated in a correctional institution((, as defined in RCW
9.94.049,)) or admitted to an ((institute)) institution for mental
diseases((, as defined in 42 C.F.R. part 435, Sec. 1009 on July 24,
2005.
(5) For purposes of this section, "likely to be eligible" means
that a person:
(a) Was enrolled in medicaid or supplemental security income or
general assistance immediately before he or she was confined and his or
her enrollment was terminated during his or her confinement; or
(b) Was enrolled in medicaid or supplemental security income or
general assistance at any time during the five years before his or her
confinement, and medical or psychiatric examinations during the
person's confinement indicate that the person continues to be disabled
and the disability is likely to last at least twelve months following
release)).
(((6))) (5) The economic services administration shall adopt
standardized statewide screening and application practices and forms
designed to facilitate ((the)) applications ((of a)) for medical
assistance by persons confined ((person who is likely to be eligible
for medicaid)) in a correctional institution or institution for mental
diseases.

Sec. 6 RCW 72.09.380 and 1999 c 214 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretaries of the department of corrections and the department
of social and health services shall adopt rules and develop working
agreements which will ensure that offenders identified under RCW
72.09.370(1) will be assisted in making application for medicaid to
facilitate a decision regarding their eligibility for such entitlements
prior to the end of their term of confinement in a correctional
facility, and to share information regarding the entry and release of
offenders for the purpose of implementing section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Section 4 of this act takes effect September
1, 2009.

--- END ---