BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 23.86.400 and 1996 c 32 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Attachment" means the affixation or installation of any wire,
cable, or other physical material capable of carrying electronic
impulses or light waves for the carrying of intelligence for
telecommunications, information services as defined in 47 U.S.C. Sec.
153(20), or television, including, but not limited to ((cable, and)),
any or all related devices, apparatuses, or auxiliary equipment,
whether within or without the licensee's allocated space, upon any pole
owned or controlled in whole or in part by one or more locally
regulated utilities where the installation has been made with the
necessary consent.
(b) "Licensee" means any person, firm, corporation, partnership,
company, association, joint stock association, or cooperatively
organized association, which is authorized to construct attachments
upon, along, under, or across public ways.
(c) "Locally regulated utility" means an electric service
cooperative organized under this chapter and not subject to rate or
service regulation by the utilities and transportation commission.
(((c))) (d) "Nondiscriminatory" means that pole owners may not
((arbitrarily)) differentiate without good cause among or between
similar classes of ((persons)) licensees approved for attachments.
(2) All rates, terms, and conditions made, demanded, or received by
a locally regulated utility for ((attachments to)) allocated space on
its poles for the placement of licensees' attachments must be just,
fair, reasonable, nondiscriminatory, and sufficient. ((A locally
regulated utility shall levy attachment space rental rates that are
uniform for the same class of service within the locally regulated
utility service area.
(3) Nothing in)) A just and reasonable rate shall assure the
locally regulated utility the recovery of not less than all the
additional costs of procuring and maintaining pole attachments nor more
than the actual capital and operating expenses, including just
compensation, of the locally regulated utility attributable to that
portion of the pole, duct, or conduit used for the pole attachment,
including a share of the required support and clearance space, in
proportion to the space used for the pole attachment, as compared to
all other uses made of the subject facilities and uses that remain
available to the owner or owners of the subject facilities. Decisions,
rules, and regulations adopted by the utilities and transportation
commission pursuant to chapter 80.54 RCW apply to the locally regulated
utility.
(3) Except in extraordinary circumstances, a locally regulated
utility must respond to a licensee's request to attach within forty-five days. A request to attach may only be denied on a
nondiscriminatory basis (a) where there is insufficient capacity and
(b) for reasons of safety, reliability, and generally applicable
engineering purposes.
(4) Any dispute between the locally regulated utility and a
licensee, including, but not limited to, disputes over a specific
request to attach or over any rate, term, or condition sought by the
locally regulated utility or a licensee for attachments, must first be
presented to the governing board of the locally regulated utility for
resolution. If the dispute is not resolved by or before the governing
board of the locally regulated utility within forty-five days from the
date the dispute is presented to the governing board, either the
licensee or the locally regulated utility may initiate a complaint
proceeding before the utilities and transportation commission.
(5) Whenever the utilities and transportation commission shall
find, after hearing had upon complaint by a licensee or by a locally
regulated utility, that the rates, terms, or conditions demanded,
exacted, charged, or collected by any locally regulated utility in
connection with attachments are unjust, unreasonable, or that the rates
or charges are insufficient to yield a reasonable compensation for the
attachment, the commission shall determine the just, reasonable, or
sufficient rates, terms, and conditions thereafter to be observed and
in force and shall fix the rates, terms, and conditions by order. In
determining and fixing the rates, terms, and conditions, the commission
shall consider the interest of the customers of the attaching locally
regulated utility or licensee, as well as the interest of the customers
of the locally regulated utility upon which the attachment is made.
(6) Except as provided in subsections (2), (4), and (5) of this
section, this section shall not be otherwise construed or is not
intended to confer upon the utilities and transportation commission any
authority to exercise jurisdiction over locally regulated utilities.

Sec. 2 RCW 24.06.600 and 1996 c 32 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Attachment" means the affixation or installation of any wire,
cable, or other physical material capable of carrying electronic
impulses or light waves for the carrying of intelligence for
telecommunications, or information services as defined in 47 U.S.C.
Sec. 153(20), or television, including, but not limited to ((cable,
and)), any or all related devices, apparatuses, or auxiliary equipment,
whether within or without the licensee's allocated space, upon any pole
owned or controlled in whole or in part by one or more locally
regulated utilities where the installation has been made with the
necessary consent.
(b) "Licensee" means any person, firm, corporation, partnership,
company, association, joint stock association, or cooperatively
organized association, which is authorized to construct attachments
upon, along, under, or across public ways.
(c) "Locally regulated utility" means ((an [a])) a mutual
corporation organized under this chapter for the purpose of providing
utility service and not subject to rate or service regulation by the
utilities and transportation commission.
(((c))) (d) "Nondiscriminatory" means that pole owners may not
((arbitrarily)) differentiate without good cause among or between
similar classes of ((persons)) licensees approved for attachments.
(2) All rates, terms, and conditions made, demanded, or received by
a locally regulated utility for ((attachments to)) allocated space on
its poles for the placement of licensees' attachments must be just,
fair, reasonable, nondiscriminatory, and sufficient. ((A locally
regulated utility shall levy attachment space rental rates that are
uniform for the same class of service within the locally regulated
utility service area.
(3) Nothing in)) A just and reasonable rate shall assure the
locally regulated utility the recovery of not less than all the
additional costs of procuring and maintaining pole attachments nor more
than the actual capital and operating expenses, including just
compensation, of the locally regulated utility attributable to that
portion of the pole, duct, or conduit used for the pole attachment,
including a share of the required support and clearance space, in
proportion to the space used for the pole attachment, as compared to
all other uses made of the subject facilities and uses that remain
available to the owner or owners of the subject facilities. Decisions,
rules, and regulations adopted by the utilities and transportation
commission pursuant to chapter 80.54 RCW apply to the locally regulated
utility.
(3) Except in extraordinary circumstances, a locally regulated
utility must respond to a licensee's request to attach within forty-five days. A request to attach may only be denied on a
nondiscriminatory basis (a) where there is insufficient capacity and
(b) for reasons of safety, reliability, and generally applicable
engineering purposes.
(4) Any dispute between the locally regulated utility and a
licensee, including, but not limited to, disputes over a specific
request to attach or over any rate, term, or condition sought by the
locally regulated utility or a licensee for attachments, must first be
presented to the governing board of the locally regulated utility for
resolution. If the dispute is not resolved by or before the governing
board of the locally regulated utility within forty-five days from the
date the dispute is presented to the governing board, either the
licensee or the locally regulated utility may initiate a complaint
proceeding before the utilities and transportation commission.
(5) Whenever the utilities and transportation commission shall
find, after hearing had upon complaint by a licensee or by a locally
regulated utility, that the rates, terms, or conditions demanded,
exacted, charged, or collected by any locally regulated utility in
connection with attachments are unjust, unreasonable, or that the rates
or charges are insufficient to yield a reasonable compensation for the
attachment, the commission shall determine the just, reasonable, or
sufficient rates, terms, and conditions thereafter to be observed and
in force and shall fix the rates, terms, and conditions by order. In
determining and fixing the rates, terms, and conditions, the commission
shall consider the interest of the customers of the attaching locally
regulated utility or licensee, as well as the interest of the customers
of the locally regulated utility upon which the attachment is made.
(6) Except as provided in subsections (2), (4), and (5) of this
section, this section shall not be otherwise construed or is not
intended to confer upon the utilities and transportation commission any
authority to exercise jurisdiction over locally regulated utilities.

Sec. 3 RCW 35.21.455 and 1996 c 32 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Attachment" means the affixation or installation of any wire,
cable, or other physical material capable of carrying electronic
impulses or light waves for the carrying of intelligence for
telecommunications, information services as defined in 47 U.S.C. Sec.
153(20), or television, including, but not limited to ((cable, and)),
any or all related devices, apparatuses, or auxiliary equipment,
whether within or without the licensee's allocated space, upon any pole
owned or controlled in whole or in part by one or more locally
regulated utilities where the installation has been made with the
necessary consent.
(b) "Licensee" means any person, firm, corporation, partnership,
company, association, joint stock association, or cooperatively
organized association, which is authorized to construct attachments
upon, along, under, or across public ways.
(c) "Locally regulated utility" means a city owning and operating
an electric utility not subject to rate or service regulation by the
utilities and transportation commission.
(((c))) (d) "Nondiscriminatory" means that pole owners may not
((arbitrarily)) differentiate without good cause among or between
similar classes of ((persons)) licensees approved for attachments.
(2) All rates, terms, and conditions made, demanded, or received by
a locally regulated utility for ((attachments to)) allocated space on
its poles for the placement of licensees' attachments must be just,
fair, reasonable, nondiscriminatory, and sufficient. ((A locally
regulated utility shall levy attachment space rental rates that are
uniform for the same class of service within the locally regulated
utility service area.
(3) Nothing in)) A just and reasonable rate shall assure the
locally regulated utility the recovery of not less than all the
additional costs of procuring and maintaining pole attachments nor more
than the actual capital and operating expenses, including just
compensation, of the locally regulated utility attributable to that
portion of the pole, duct, or conduit used for the pole attachment,
including a share of the required support and clearance space, in
proportion to the space used for the pole attachment, as compared to
all other uses made of the subject facilities and uses that remain
available to the owner or owners of the subject facilities. Decisions,
rules, and regulations adopted by the utilities and transportation
commission pursuant to chapter 80.54 RCW apply to the locally regulated
utility.
(3) Except in extraordinary circumstances, a locally regulated
utility must respond to a licensee's request to attach within forty-five days. A request to attach may only be denied on a
nondiscriminatory basis (a) where there is insufficient capacity and
(b) for reasons of safety, reliability, and generally applicable
engineering purposes.
(4) Any dispute between the locally regulated utility and a
licensee, including, but not limited to, disputes over a specific
request to attach or over any rate, term, or condition sought by the
locally regulated utility or a licensee for attachments, must first be
presented to the governing board of the locally regulated utility for
resolution. If the dispute is not resolved by or before the governing
board of the locally regulated utility within forty-five days from the
date the dispute is presented to the governing board, either the
licensee or the locally regulated utility may initiate a complaint
proceeding before the utilities and transportation commission.
(5) Whenever the utilities and transportation commission shall
find, after hearing had upon complaint by a licensee or by a locally
regulated utility, that the rates, terms, or conditions demanded,
exacted, charged, or collected by any locally regulated utility in
connection with attachments are unjust, unreasonable, or that the rates
or charges are insufficient to yield a reasonable compensation for the
attachment, the commission shall determine the just, reasonable, or
sufficient rates, terms, and conditions thereafter to be observed and
in force and shall fix the rates, terms, and conditions by order. In
determining and fixing the rates, terms, and conditions, the commission
shall consider the interest of the customers of the attaching locally
regulated utility or licensee, as well as the interest of the customers
of the locally regulated utility upon which the attachment is made.
(6) Except as provided in subsections (2), (4), and (5) of this
section, this section shall not be otherwise construed or is not
intended to confer upon the utilities and transportation commission any
authority to exercise jurisdiction over locally regulated utilities.

Sec. 4 RCW 35A.21.125 and 1996 c 32 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Attachment" means the affixation or installation of any wire,
cable, or other physical material capable of carrying electronic
impulses or light waves for the carrying of intelligence for
telecommunications, information services as defined in 47 U.S.C. Sec.
153(20), or television, including, but not limited to ((cable, and)),
any or all related devices, apparatuses, or auxiliary equipment,
whether within or without the licensee's allocated space, upon any pole
owned or controlled in whole or in part by one or more locally
regulated utilities where the installation has been made with the
necessary consent.
(b) "Licensee" means any person, firm, corporation, partnership,
company, association, joint stock association, or cooperatively
organized association, which is authorized to construct attachments
upon, along, under, or across public ways.
(c) "Locally regulated utility" means a code city owning and
operating an electric utility not subject to rate or service regulation
by the utilities and transportation commission.
(((c))) (d) "Nondiscriminatory" means that pole owners may not
((arbitrarily)) differentiate without good cause among or between
similar classes of ((persons)) licensees approved for attachments.
(2) All rates, terms, and conditions made, demanded, or received by
a locally regulated utility for ((attachments to)) allocated space on
its poles for the placement of licensees' attachments must be just,
fair, reasonable, nondiscriminatory, and sufficient. ((A locally
regulated utility shall levy attachment space rental rates that are
uniform for the same class of service within the locally regulated
utility service area.
(3) Nothing in)) A just and reasonable rate shall assure the
locally regulated utility the recovery of not less than all the
additional costs of procuring and maintaining pole attachments nor more
than the actual capital and operating expenses, including just
compensation, of the locally regulated utility attributable to that
portion of the pole, duct, or conduit used for the pole attachment,
including a share of the required support and clearance space, in
proportion to the space used for the pole attachment, as compared to
all other uses made of the subject facilities and uses that remain
available to the owner or owners of the subject facilities. Decisions,
rules, and regulations adopted by the utilities and transportation
commission pursuant to chapter 80.54 RCW apply to the locally regulated
utility.
(3) Except in extraordinary circumstances, a locally regulated
utility must respond to a licensee's request to attach within forty-five days. A request to attach may only be denied on a
nondiscriminatory basis (a) where there is insufficient capacity and
(b) for reasons of safety, reliability, and generally applicable
engineering purposes.
(4) Any dispute between the locally regulated utility and a
licensee, including, but not limited to, disputes over a specific
request to attach or over any rate, term, or condition sought by the
locally regulated utility or a licensee for attachments, must first be
presented to the governing board of the locally regulated utility for
resolution. If the dispute is not resolved by or before the governing
board of the locally regulated utility within forty-five days from the
date the dispute is presented to the governing board, either the
licensee or the locally regulated utility may initiate a complaint
proceeding before the utilities and transportation commission.
(5) Whenever the utilities and transportation commission shall
find, after hearing had upon complaint by a licensee or by a locally
regulated utility, that the rates, terms, or conditions demanded,
exacted, charged, or collected by any locally regulated utility in
connection with attachments are unjust, unreasonable, or that the rates
or charges are insufficient to yield a reasonable compensation for the
attachment, the commission shall determine the just, reasonable, or
sufficient rates, terms, and conditions thereafter to be observed and
in force and shall fix the rates, terms, and conditions by order. In
determining and fixing the rates, terms, and conditions, the commission
shall consider the interest of the customers of the attaching locally
regulated utility or licensee, as well as the interest of the customers
of the locally regulated utility upon which the attachment is made.
(6) Except as provided in subsections (2), (4), and (5) of this
section, this section shall not be otherwise construed or is not
intended to confer upon the utilities and transportation commission any
authority to exercise jurisdiction over locally regulated utilities.

Sec. 5 RCW 54.04.045 and 1996 c 32 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Attachment" means the affixation or installation of any wire,
cable, or other physical material capable of carrying electronic
impulses or light waves for the carrying of intelligence for
telecommunications, information services as defined in 47 U.S.C. Sec.
153(20), or television, including, but not limited to ((cable, and)),
any or all related devices, apparatuses, or auxiliary equipment,
whether within or without the licensee's allocated space, upon any pole
owned or controlled in whole or in part by one or more locally
regulated utilities where the installation has been made with the
necessary consent.
(b) "Licensee" means any person, firm, corporation, partnership,
company, association, joint stock association, or cooperatively
organized association, which is authorized to construct attachments
upon, along, under, or across public ways.
(c) "Locally regulated utility" means a public utility district not
subject to rate or service regulation by the utilities and
transportation commission.
(((c))) (d) "Nondiscriminatory" means that pole owners may not
((arbitrarily)) differentiate without good cause among or between
similar classes of ((persons)) licensees approved for attachments.
(2) All rates, terms, and conditions made, demanded, or received by
a locally regulated utility for ((attachments to)) allocated space on
its poles for the placement of licensees' attachments must be just,
fair, reasonable, nondiscriminatory, and sufficient. ((A locally
regulated utility shall levy attachment space rental rates that are
uniform for the same class of service within the locally regulated
utility service area.
(3) Nothing in)) A just and reasonable rate shall assure the
locally regulated utility the recovery of not less than all the
additional costs of procuring and maintaining pole attachments nor more
than the actual capital and operating expenses, including just
compensation, of the locally regulated utility attributable to that
portion of the pole, duct, or conduit used for the pole attachment,
including a share of the required support and clearance space, in
proportion to the space used for the pole attachment, as compared to
all other uses made of the subject facilities and uses that remain
available to the owner or owners of the subject facilities. Decisions,
rules, and regulations adopted by the utilities and transportation
commission pursuant to chapter 80.54 RCW apply to the locally regulated
utility.
(3) Except in extraordinary circumstances, a locally regulated
utility must respond to a licensee's request to attach within forty-
five days. A request to attach may only be denied on a
nondiscriminatory basis (a) where there is insufficient capacity and
(b) for reasons of safety, reliability, and generally applicable
engineering purposes.
(4) Any dispute between the locally regulated utility and a
licensee, including, but not limited to, disputes over a specific
request to attach or over any rate, term, or condition sought by the
locally regulated utility or a licensee for attachments, must first be
presented to the governing board of the locally regulated utility for
resolution. If the dispute is not resolved by or before the governing
board of the locally regulated utility within forty-five days from the
date the dispute is presented to the governing board, either the
licensee or the locally regulated utility may initiate a complaint
proceeding before the utilities and transportation commission.
(5) Whenever the utilities and transportation commission shall
find, after hearing had upon complaint by a licensee or by a locally
regulated utility, that the rates, terms, or conditions demanded,
exacted, charged, or collected by any locally regulated utility in
connection with attachments are unjust, unreasonable, or that the rates
or charges are insufficient to yield a reasonable compensation for the
attachment, the commission shall determine the just, reasonable, or
sufficient rates, terms, and conditions thereafter to be observed and
in force and shall fix the rates, terms, and conditions by order. In
determining and fixing the rates, terms, and conditions, the commission
shall consider the interest of the customers of the attaching locally
regulated utility or licensee, as well as the interest of the customers
of the locally regulated utility upon which the attachment is made.
(6) Except as provided in subsections (2), (4), and (5) of this
section, this section shall not be otherwise construed or is not
intended to confer upon the utilities and transportation commission any
authority to exercise jurisdiction over locally regulated utilities.

--- END ---