BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 58.08.040 and 1997 c 393 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
Prior to any person recording a plat, replat, altered plat, or
binding site plan subsequent to May 31st in any year and prior to the
date of the ((collection of taxes)) completion of the tax roll for
collection in the ensuing year, the person shall deposit with the
county treasurer a sum equal to the product of the county assessor's
latest valuation on the property less improvements in such subdivision
multiplied by the current year's dollar rate increased by twenty-five
percent on the property platted. The treasurer's receipt shall be
evidence of the payment. The treasurer shall appropriate so much of
the deposit as will pay the taxes and assessments on the property when
the levy rates are certified by the assessor using the value of the
property at the time of filing a plat, replat, altered plat, or binding
site plan, and in case the sum deposited is in excess of the amount
necessary for the payment of the taxes and assessments, the treasurer
shall return, to the party depositing, the amount of excess.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.40.042 and 2002 c 168 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When real property is divided in accordance with chapter 58.17
RCW, the assessor shall carefully investigate and ascertain the true
and fair value of each lot and assess each lot on that same basis,
unless specifically provided otherwise by law. For purposes of this
section, "lot" has the same definition as in RCW 58.17.020.
(a) For each lot on which an advance tax deposit has been paid in
accordance with RCW 58.08.040, the assessor shall establish the true
and fair value by October 30 of the year following the recording of the
plat, replat, altered plat, or binding site plan. The value
established shall be the value of the lot as of January 1 of the year
the original parcel of real property was last revalued. An additional
property tax shall not be due on the land until the calendar year
following the year for which the advance tax deposit was paid if the
deposit was sufficient to pay the full amount of the taxes due on the
property.
(b) For each lot on which an advance tax deposit has not been paid,
the assessor shall establish the true and fair value not later than the
calendar year following the recording of the plat, map, subdivision, or
replat. For purposes of this section, "subdivision" means a division
of land into two or more lots.
(c) For each subdivision, all current year and delinquent taxes and
assessments on the entire tract must be paid in full in accordance with
RCW 58.17.160 and 58.08.030 except when property is being acquired by
a government for public use. For purposes of this section, "current
year taxes" means taxes that are collectible under RCW 84.56.010
subsequent to ((February 14)) completing the tax roll for current year
collection.
(2) When the assessor is required by law to segregate any part or
parts of real property, assessed before or after July 27, 1997, as one
parcel or when the assessor is required by law to combine parcels of
real property assessed before or after July 27, 1997, as two or more
parcels, the assessor shall carefully investigate and ascertain the
true and fair value of each part or parts of the real property and each
combined parcel and assess each part or parts or each combined parcel
on that same basis.

Sec. 3 RCW 84.56.070 and 2007 c 295 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
((On the fifteenth day of February succeeding the levy of taxes,))
The county treasurer shall proceed to collect all personal property
taxes after first completing the tax roll for the current year's
collection. The treasurer shall give notice by mail to all persons
charged with personal property taxes, and if such taxes are not paid
before they become delinquent, the treasurer shall forthwith proceed to
collect the same. In the event that he or she is unable to collect the
same when due, the treasurer shall prepare papers in distraint, which
shall contain a description of the personal property, the amount of
taxes, the amount of the accrued interest at the rate provided by law
from the date of delinquency, and the name of the owner or reputed
owner. The treasurer shall without demand or notice distrain
sufficient goods and chattels belonging to the person charged with such
taxes to pay the same, with interest at the rate provided by law from
the date of delinquency, together with all accruing costs, and shall
proceed to advertise the same by posting written notices in three
public places in the county in which such property has been distrained,
one of which places shall be at the county court house, such notice to
state the time when and place where such property will be sold. The
county treasurer, or the treasurer's deputy, shall tax the same fees
for making the distraint and sale of goods and chattels for the payment
of taxes as are allowed by law to sheriffs for making levy and sale of
property on execution; traveling fees to be computed from the county
seat of the county to the place of making distraint. If the taxes for
which such property is distrained, and the interest and costs accruing
thereon, are not paid before the date appointed for such sale, which
shall be not less than ten days after the taking of such property, such
treasurer or treasurer's designee shall proceed to sell such property
at public auction, or so much thereof as shall be sufficient to pay
such taxes, with interest and costs, and if there be any excess of
money arising from the sale of any personal property, the treasurer
shall pay such excess less any cost of the auction to the owner of the
property so sold or to his or her legal representative: PROVIDED, That
whenever it shall become necessary to distrain any standing timber
owned separately from the ownership of the land upon which the same may
stand, or any fish trap, pound net, reef net, set net or drag seine
fishing location, or any other personal property as the treasurer shall
determine to be incapable or reasonably impracticable of manual
delivery, it shall be deemed to have been distrained and taken into
possession when the treasurer shall have, at least thirty days before
the date fixed for the sale thereof, filed with the auditor of the
county wherein such property is located a notice in writing reciting
that the treasurer has distrained such property, describing it, giving
the name of the owner or reputed owner, the amount of the tax due, with
interest, and the time and place of sale; a copy of the notice shall
also be sent to the owner or reputed owner at his last known address,
by registered letter at least thirty days prior to the date of sale:
AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That if the county treasurer has reasonable
grounds to believe that any personal property, including mobile homes,
manufactured homes, or park model trailers, upon which taxes have been
levied, but not paid, is about to be removed from the county where the
same has been assessed, or is about to be destroyed, sold or disposed
of, the county treasurer may demand such taxes, without the notice
provided for in this section, and if necessary may forthwith distrain
sufficient goods and chattels to pay the same.

Sec. 4 RCW 86.09.490 and 1937 c 72 s 164 are each amended to read
as follows:
The assessment upon real property shall be a lien against the
property assessed, from and after the first day of January in the year
in which the assessment becomes due and payable, but as between grantor
and grantee such lien shall not attach until the ((fifteenth day of
February of such year, which)) county treasurer has completed the
property tax roll for the current year's collection and provided the
notification required by RCW 84.56.020. The lien shall be paramount
and superior to any other lien theretofore or thereafter created,
whether by mortgage or otherwise, except a lien for undelinquent flood
control district assessments, diking or drainage, or diking or drainage
improvement, district assessments and for unpaid and outstanding
general ad valorem taxes, and such lien shall not be removed until the
assessments are paid or the property sold for the payment thereof as
provided by law.

Sec. 5 RCW 84.60.050 and 1994 c 301 s 54 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When real property is acquired by purchase or condemnation by
the state of Washington, any county or municipal corporation or is
placed under a recorded agreement for immediate possession and use or
an order of immediate possession and use pursuant to RCW 8.04.090, such
property shall continue to be subject to the tax lien for the years
prior to the year in which the property is so acquired or placed under
such agreement or order, of any tax levied by the state, county,
municipal corporation or other tax levying public body, except as is
otherwise provided in RCW 84.60.070.
(2) The lien for taxes applicable to the real property being
acquired or placed under immediate possession and use for the year in
which such real property is so acquired or placed under immediate
possession and use shall be for only the pro rata portion of taxes
allocable to that portion of the year prior to the date of execution of
the instrument vesting title, date of recording such agreement of
immediate possession and use, date of such order of immediate
possession and use, or date of judgment. No taxes levied or tax lien
on such property allocable to a period subsequent to the dates
identified in this subsection shall be valid and any such taxes levied
shall be canceled as provided in RCW 84.48.065. In the event the owner
has paid taxes allocable to that portion of the year subsequent to the
dates identified in this subsection he or she shall be entitled to a
pro rata refund of the amount paid on the property so acquired or
placed under a recorded agreement or an order of immediate possession
and use. If the dates identified in this subsection precede ((February
15th of)) the completion of the property tax rolls for the current
year's collection in the year in which such taxes become payable, no
lien for such taxes shall be valid and any such taxes levied but not
payable shall be canceled as provided in RCW 84.48.065.

Sec. 6 RCW 87.03.265 and 1939 c 171 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The assessment upon real property shall be a lien against the
property assessed, from and after the first day of January in the year
in which it is levied, but as between grantor and grantee such lien
shall not attach until the ((fifteenth day of February of)) county
treasurer has completed the property tax roll for the current year's
collection and provided the notification required by RCW 84.56.020 in
the year in which the assessment is payable, which lien shall be
paramount and superior to any other lien theretofore or thereafter
created, whether by mortgage or otherwise, except for a lien for prior
assessments, and such lien shall not be removed until the assessments
are paid or the property sold for the payment thereof as provided by
law. And the lien for the bonds of any issue shall be a preferred lien
to that of any subsequent issue. Also the lien for all payments due or
to become due under any contract with the United States, or the state
of Washington, accompanying which bonds of the district have not been
deposited with the United States or the state of Washington, as in RCW
87.03.140 provided, shall be a preferred lien to any issue of bonds
subsequent to the date of such contract.

Sec. 7 RCW 87.03.270 and 1988 c 134 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
The assessment roll, before its equalization and adoption, shall be
checked and compared as to descriptions and ownerships, with the county
treasurer's land rolls. On or before the fifteenth day of January in
each year the secretary must deliver the assessment roll or the
respective segregation thereof to the county treasurer of each
respective county in which the lands therein described are located, and
said assessments shall become due and payable ((on the fifteenth day of
February following)) after the county treasurer has completed the
property tax roll for the current year's collection and provided the
notification required by RCW 84.56.020.
All assessments on said roll shall become delinquent on the first
day of May following the filing of the roll unless the assessments are
paid on or before the thirtieth day of April of said year: PROVIDED,
That if an assessment is ten dollars or more for said year and if one-half of the assessment is paid on or before the thirtieth day of April,
the remainder shall be due and payable on or before the thirty-first
day of October following and shall be delinquent after that date. All
delinquent assessments shall bear interest at the rate of twelve
percent per annum, computed on a monthly basis and without compounding,
from the date of delinquency until paid.
Upon receiving the assessment roll the county treasurer shall
prepare therefrom an assessment book in which shall be written the
description of the land as it appears in the assessment roll, the name
of the owner or owners where known, and if assessed to the unknown
owners, then the word "unknown", and the total assessment levied
against each tract of land. Proper space shall be left in said book
for the entry therein of all subsequent proceedings relating to the
payment and collection of said assessments.
On or before April 1st of each year, the treasurer of the district
shall send a statement of assessments due. County treasurers who
collect irrigation district assessments may send the statement of
irrigation district assessments together with the statement of general
taxes.
Upon payment of any assessment the county treasurer must enter the
date of said payment in said assessment book opposite the description
of the land and the name of the person paying and give a receipt to
such person specifying the amount of the assessment and the amount paid
with the description of the property assessed.
It shall be the duty of the treasurer of the district to furnish
upon request of the owner, or any person interested, a statement
showing any and all assessments levied as shown by the assessment roll
in his office upon land described in such request. All statements of
irrigation district assessments covering any land in the district shall
show the amount of the irrigation district assessment, the dates on
which the assessment is due, the place of payment, and, if the property
was sold for delinquent assessments in a prior year, the amount of the
delinquent assessment and the notation "certificate issued": PROVIDED,
That the failure of the treasurer to render any statement herein
required of him shall not render invalid any assessments made by any
irrigation district.
It shall be the duty of the county treasurer of any county, other
than the county in which the office of the board of directors is
located, to make monthly remittances to the county treasurer of the
county in which the office of the board of directors is located
covering all amounts collected by him for the irrigation district
during the preceding month.
When the treasurer collects a delinquent assessment, the treasurer
shall collect any other amounts due by reason of the delinquency,
including accrued costs, which shall be deposited to the treasurer's
operation and maintenance fund.

Sec. 8 RCW 85.08.480 and 1933 c 125 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The respective installments of assessments for construction or
maintenance of improvements made under the provisions of this chapter,
shall be collected in the same manner and shall become delinquent at
the same time as general taxes, certificates of delinquency shall be
issued, and the lien of the assessment shall be enforced by foreclosure
and sale of the property assessed, as in the case of general taxes, all
according to the laws in force on January 1, 1923, except as
hereinafter specifically provided.
The annual assessments or installments of assessments, both for
construction and for maintenance and repairs of the diking and/or
drainage system shall become due in two equal installments, one-half
being payable on or before ((May)) April 30th, and the other half on or
before ((November 30th)) October 31st; and delinquency interest thereon
shall run from said dates on said respective halves of said
assessments.
The rate of interest thereon after delinquency, also the rate of
interest borne by certificates of delinquency, shall be ((ten)) twelve
percent per annum. Certificates of delinquency for any assessment or
installment thereof shall be issued upon demand and payment of such
delinquent assessment and the fee for the same at any time after the
expiration of twelve months after the date of delinquency thereof. In
case no certificate of delinquency be issued after the expiration of
four years from date of delinquency of assessments for construction
costs, or after the expiration of two years from date of delinquency of
assessments for maintenance or repairs, certificates of delinquency
shall be issued to the county, and foreclosure thereof shall forthwith
be effected in the manner provided in ((sections 11292 to 11317
inclusive)) chapter 84.64 RCW.
The holder of a certificate of delinquency for any drainage, diking
or sewerage improvement district or consolidated district assessment or
installment thereof may pay any delinquent general taxes upon the
property described therein, and may redeem any certificate of
delinquency for general taxes against said property and the amount so
paid together with interest thereon at the rate provided by law shall
be included in the lien of said certificate of delinquency.
The expense of foreclosure proceedings by the county shall be paid
by the districts whose liens are foreclosed: Costs of foreclosure by
the county or private persons as provided by law, shall be included in
the judgment of foreclosure.

Sec. 9 RCW 82.45.090 and 2003 c 53 s 404 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except for a sale of a beneficial interest in real property
where no instrument evidencing the sale is recorded in the official
real property records of the county in which the property is located,
the tax imposed by this chapter shall be paid to and collected by the
treasurer of the county within which is located the real property which
was sold. In collecting the tax the treasurer shall act as agent for
the state. The county treasurer shall cause a ((stamp)) verification
of payment evidencing satisfaction of the lien to be affixed to the
instrument of sale or conveyance prior to its recording or to the real
estate excise tax affidavit in the case of used mobile home sales and
used floating home sales. A receipt issued by the county treasurer for
the payment of the tax imposed under this chapter shall be evidence of
the satisfaction of the lien imposed hereunder and may be recorded in
the manner prescribed for recording satisfactions of mortgages. No
instrument of sale or conveyance evidencing a sale subject to the tax
shall be accepted by the county auditor for filing or recording until
the tax shall have been paid and the ((stamp)) verification of payment
affixed thereto; in case the tax is not due on the transfer, the
instrument shall not be so accepted until suitable notation of such
fact has been made on the instrument by the treasurer. The county
treasurer shall require a verification of payment that evidences
satisfaction of all property tax upon a used mobile home, used
manufactured home, used park model mobile home, or used floating home,
to be affixed to any instrument of sale or conveyance thereof, or upon
the real estate excise tax affidavit. No real estate excise tax
affidavit, instrument of sale, or conveyance for a used mobile home,
used manufactured home, used park model mobile home, or used floating
home will be accepted by the county auditor for filing or recording
until the property tax has been paid and the verification of payment
affixed thereto.
(2) For a sale of a beneficial interest in real property where a
tax is due under this chapter and where no instrument is recorded in
the official real property records of the county in which the property
is located, the sale shall be reported to the department of revenue
within five days from the date of the sale on such returns or forms and
according to such procedures as the department may prescribe. Such
forms or returns shall be signed by both the transferor and the
transferee and shall be accompanied by payment of the tax due.
(3) Any person who intentionally makes a false statement on any
return or form required to be filed with the department under this
chapter is guilty of perjury under chapter 9A.72 RCW.

Sec. 10 RCW 84.69.030 and 1991 c 245 s 32 are each amended to
read as follows:
((Except in cases wherein the county legislative authority acts
upon its own motion,)) No orders for a refund under this chapter shall
be made except on a claim:
(1) Verified by the person who paid the tax, the person's guardian,
executor or administrator; and
(2) Filed with the county treasurer within three years after
((making)) the due date of the payment sought to be refunded; and
(3) Stating the statutory ground upon which the refund is claimed.

--- END ---