BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.34.095 and 2000 c 87 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The following information is confidential and not subject to
disclosure, except as provided in this section:
(a) A report of abandonment, abuse, financial exploitation, or
neglect made under this chapter;
(b) The identity of the vulnerable adult, person making the report,
or of a witness, without the individual's written permission; and
(c) All files, reports, records, communications, and working papers
used or developed in the investigation or provision of protective
services.
(2) Information considered confidential may be disclosed only for
a purpose consistent with this chapter or as authorized by chapter
18.20, 18.51, 70.128, 74.04, or 74.39A RCW, or as authorized by the
long-term care ombudsman programs under federal law or state law,
chapter 43.190 RCW, or other applicable federal law.
(3) The department may disclose the following information:
(a) The fact that a report of abuse, abandonment, financial
exploitation, neglect, or self-neglect was received by the department;
(b) Whether or not a department investigator has been assigned and
whether the investigation is completed or ongoing;
(c) Whether or not the department offered protective services to
the vulnerable adult and whether the vulnerable adult accepted the
offer of protective services.
(4) A court or presiding officer in an administrative proceeding
may order disclosure of confidential information only if the court, or
presiding officer in an administrative proceeding, determines that
disclosure is essential to the administration of justice and will not
endanger the life or safety of the vulnerable adult, witnesses, or
individual who made the report. The court or presiding officer in an
administrative hearing may place restrictions on such disclosure as the
court or presiding officer deems proper.
(5) The department may adopt rules necessary to implement this
section.

--- END ---