BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.36.005 and 1996 c 54 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that:
(1) As the number of people in the state grows, wildlife management
techniques change, and wildlife habitat is altered, people will
encounter wildlife more frequently. As a result, conflicts between
humans and wildlife will also increase. Wildlife is a public resource
of significant value to the people of the state and the responsibility
to minimize and resolve these conflicts is shared by all citizens of
the state.
(2) In particular, the state recognizes the importance of
commercial agricultural and horticultural crop production, the state's
commercial livestock industry, and the value of healthy ((deer and
elk)) wildlife populations, which can damage ((such)) crops and
commercial livestock. The legislature further finds that damage
prevention is key to maintaining healthy ((deer and elk)) wildlife
populations, wildlife-related recreational opportunities, ((and))
commercially productive agricultural and horticultural crops, and a
thriving commercial livestock industry, and that the state,
participants in wildlife recreation, and private landowners and tenants
share the responsibility for damage prevention. Toward this end, the
legislature encourages landowners and tenants to contribute through
their land management practices to healthy wildlife populations and to
provide access for related recreation. It is in the best interests of
the state for the department ((of fish and wildlife)) to respond
quickly to wildlife damage complaints and to work with these landowners
and tenants to minimize and/or prevent damages and conflicts while
maintaining ((deer and elk)) wildlife populations for enjoyment by all
citizens of the state.
(3) A timely and simplified process for resolving claims for
damages caused by ((deer and elk)) wildlife for commercial agricultural
((or)), horticultural, or commercial livestock products is beneficial
to the claimant and the state.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.36.010 and 1996 c 54 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Unless otherwise specified,)) The ((following)) definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter((:)) unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Commercial livestock" means cattle, sheep, and horses held or
raised by a person for sale, trade, or barter, and from which the
person derives an annual income from the sales of the animals in excess
of ten thousand dollars.
(2) "Crop" means a commercially raised horticultural and/or
agricultural product and includes growing or harvested product but does
not include livestock. For the purposes of this chapter all parts of
horticultural trees shall be considered a crop and shall be eligible
for claims.
(((2))) (3) "Emergency" means an unforeseen circumstance beyond the
control of the landowner or tenant that presents a real and immediate
threat to crops, domestic animals, or fowl.
(((3))) (4) "Immediate family member" means spouse, brother,
sister, grandparent, parent, child, or grandchild.
(5) "Predatory wildlife" means bears, wolves, and cougars.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.36.040 and 1996 c 54 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Pursuant to this section, the director or the director's
designee may distribute money appropriated to pay claims for damages to
crops caused by wild deer or elk in an amount of up to ten thousand
dollars per claim. Damages payable under this section are limited to
the value of such commercially raised horticultural or agricultural
crops, whether growing or harvested, and shall be paid only to the
owner of the crop at the time of damage, without assignment. Damages
shall not include damage to other real or personal property including
other vegetation or animals, damages caused by animals other than wild
deer or elk, lost profits, consequential damages, or any other damages
whatsoever. ((These damages))
(b) Pursuant to this section, the director or the director's
designee may distribute money appropriated to reimburse the owner of
commercial livestock that has been killed by predatory wildlife, or
injured by predatory wildlife to such a degree that the market value of
the commercial livestock has been diminished, if during the current
fiscal biennium the department has received appropriations from either
the state wildlife account or the general fund above the amounts
specified in RCW 77.36.070 and 77.36.080 for the reimbursement of
damage to commercial livestock. Each individual animal represents one
claim, and each claim must be paid the fair market value of the killed
or injured animal up to the following values: Two hundred dollars for
sheep, one thousand five hundred dollars for cattle, and one thousand
five hundred dollars for horses.
(c) Damage claim payments under this section shall comprise the
exclusive remedy for claims against the state for damages caused by
wildlife.
(2) The director may, consistent with section 4 of this act, adopt
rules for the form of affidavits or proof to be provided in claims
under this section((. The director may adopt rules)) and to specify
the time and method of assessing damage. The burden of proving damages
shall be on the claimant. Payment of claims shall remain subject to
the other conditions and limits of this chapter.
(3) If funds are limited, payments of claims shall be prioritized
in the order that the claims are received. No claim may be processed
if:
(a) The claimant did not notify the department within ten days of
discovery of ((the)) damage to crops or within seventy-two hours of the
discovery of a predatory wildlife attack on commercial livestock. If
the claimant intends to take steps that prevent determination of
damages, such as harvest of damaged crops, then the claimant shall
notify the department as soon as reasonably possible after discovery so
that the department has an opportunity to document the damage and take
steps to prevent additional damage; or
(b) The claimant did not present a complete, written claim within
sixty days after the damage, or the last day of damaging if the damage
was of a continuing nature.
(4)(a) The director or the director's designee may examine and
assess the damage upon notice, and may convene, upon its own initiative
or on the request of the claimant, the commercial livestock valuation
committee created in section 4 of this act to assist with the
assessment of the damage.
(b) The department and claimant may agree to an assessment of
damages by a neutral person or persons knowledgeable in horticultural
((or)), agricultural, or commercial livestock practices. The
department and claimant shall share equally in the costs of such third
party examination and assessment of damage.
(5) There shall be no payment for damages if:
(a) The crops are on lands leased from any public agency;
(b) The landowner or claimant failed to use or maintain applicable
damage prevention materials or methods furnished by the department, or
failed to comply with a wildlife damage prevention agreement under RCW
77.12.260;
(c) The director has expended all funds appropriated for payment of
such claims for the current fiscal year; or
(d) The damages are covered by insurance. The claimant shall
notify the department at the time of claim of insurance coverage in the
manner required by the director. Insurance coverage shall cover all
damages prior to any payment under this chapter.
(6) When there is a determination of claim by the director or the
director's designee pursuant to this section, the claimant has sixty
days to accept the claim or it is deemed rejected.
(7) The limitation on claim payments established in subsection
(5)(a) of this section is limited only to crop damage and does not
apply to commercial livestock damaged or killed on land leased by a
public agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 77.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The commercial livestock valuation committee is created to
assist the director with the determination of the market value of
killed or injured commercial livestock for the purposes of reimbursing
the owner under RCW 77.36.040.
(b) In assisting with the determination of the market value of
injured or killed commercial livestock, the members of the commercial
livestock valuation committee must have access to all documentation
regarding a particular claim, along with other information that is
deemed useful by the committee members.
(c) The recommendation of the commercial livestock valuation
committee is deemed final when four or more of the committee members
determine the fair market value, if any, for the claim in question.
(2) The commercial livestock valuation committee is composed of
seven members appointed by the commission. The membership of the
commercial livestock valuation committee must be composed as follows:
(a) Three members must be professionally involved in sheep
production;
(b) Three members must be professionally involved in cattle
production; and
(c) One member must be professionally involved in horse production.
(3) The members of the commercial livestock valuation committee are
appointed for a four-year term. If a vacancy occurs on the committee
prior to the expiration of a term, the commission must appoint a
replacement within sixty days to complete the term. After a term
expires, a committee member may be reappointed.
(4) The commercial livestock valuation committee must be convened
at time intervals necessary to provide timely recommendations for
claims filed under RCW 77.36.040. A majority of members currently
serving on the committee constitutes a quorum, and the chair of the
committee must be selected by the committee members. The department
must provide staff support for all official committee meetings.
(5) Each member of the commercial livestock valuation committee
shall serve without compensation but may be reimbursed for travel
expenses as authorized in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(6) The members of the commercial livestock valuation committee, or
individuals acting on their behalf, are immune from civil liability for
official acts performed in the course of their duties.

Sec. 5 RCW 77.36.050 and 1996 c 54 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If the claimant does not accept the director's decision under
RCW 77.36.040, or if the claim exceeds ten thousand dollars, then the
claim may be filed with the ((office of)) risk management division of
the office of financial management under RCW 4.92.040(5). The ((office
of)) risk management division shall recommend to the legislature
whether the claim should be paid. If the legislature approves the
claim, the director shall pay it from moneys appropriated for that
purpose. No funds shall be expended for damages under this chapter
except as appropriated by the legislature.
(2) For livestock claims only, the risk management division of the
office of financial management may consult the commercial livestock
valuation committee created in section 4 of this act.

Sec. 6 RCW 77.36.060 and 1996 c 54 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The director may refuse to consider and pay claims ((of)) for
damage to crops for persons who have posted the property against
hunting or who have not allowed public hunting during the season prior
to the occurrence of the damages.

Sec. 7 RCW 77.36.070 and 1996 c 54 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may pay no more than one hundred twenty thousand
dollars per fiscal year from the state wildlife ((fund)) account
created in RCW 77.12.170 for crop claims under RCW 77.36.040 and for
assessment costs and compromise of claims. Such money shall be used to
pay animal damage claims only if the claim meets the conditions of RCW
77.36.040 and the damage occurred in a place where the opportunity to
hunt was not restricted or prohibited by a county, municipality, or
other public entity during the season prior to the occurrence of the
damage.
(2) The department may pay no more than the amount indicated for
predatory wildlife damage in the current fiscal biennium's
appropriation to the department from the state wildlife account for
claims under RCW 77.36.040 and for assessment costs and compromise of
predatory wildlife claims. The money must be used to pay animal damage
claims only if the claim meets the conditions of RCW 77.36.040.

Sec. 8 RCW 77.36.080 and 1996 c 54 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may pay no more than thirty thousand dollars per
fiscal year from the general fund for claims under RCW 77.36.040 and
for assessment costs and compromise of crop claims unless the
legislature declares an emergency. Such money shall be used to pay
animal damage claims only if the claim meets the conditions of RCW
77.36.040 and the damage occurred in a place where the opportunity to
hunt was restricted or prohibited by a county, municipality, or other
public entity during the season prior to the occurrence of the damage.
(2) The department may pay no more than the amount indicated for
predatory wildlife damage in the current fiscal biennium's
appropriation to the department from the general fund for claims under
RCW 77.36.040 and for assessment costs and compromise of predatory
wildlife claims. The money must be used to pay animal damage claims
only if the claim meets the conditions of RCW 77.36.040.
(3) The legislature may declare an emergency, defined for the
purposes of this section as any happening arising from weather, fire,
or other natural conditions((, or fire)) that causes unusually great
damage to ((commercially raised)) commercial livestock by predatory
wildlife or to agricultural or horticultural crops by deer or elk. In
an emergency, the department may pay as much as may be subsequently
appropriated, in addition to the funds authorized under subsection (1)
of this section, for claims under RCW 77.36.040 and for assessment and
compromise of claims. Such money shall be used to pay animal damage
claims only if the claim meets the conditions of RCW 77.36.040 and the
department has expended all funds authorized under RCW 77.36.070 or
subsection (1) of this section.

--- END ---