BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.27A.130 and 1988 c 127 s 26 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department of ecology may make complete inventories of the
state's water resources and enter into such agreements with the
director of the United States geological survey as will ((insure))
ensure that investigations and surveys are carried on in an economical
manner.
(2) The department shall complete a data gap analysis by June 30,
2009, to evaluate groundwater monitoring activities across the state,
on a basin-by-basin basis. This study will inform future decisions to
develop an effective groundwater monitoring program. This study must
include:
(a) Summarizing historic and current monitoring of ambient
groundwater levels and water quality within each WRIA as defined in RCW
90.82.020;
(b) Evaluating the completeness and quality of the data and
conclusions produced from such monitoring;
(c) Identifying priorities for enhanced groundwater monitoring
where water levels and water quality are of concern;
(d) Evaluating and recommending quality controls and other
protocols associated with data collection and management;
(e) Summarizing and compiling existing studies of groundwater
levels, water quality, and monitoring activities; and
(f) Recommending the components necessary to establish a
comprehensive, statewide ambient groundwater monitoring and assessment
program and the funding necessary to implement the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 RCW 43.27A.130 is recodified as a section in
chapter 90.54 RCW.

--- END ---