BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.81.005 and 2002 c 218 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is hereby found and declared that blighted ((areas which))
properties constitute a serious and growing menace, injurious to the
public health((,)) and safety((, morals and welfare)) of the residents
of the state, and exist in municipalities of the state((; that the
existence of such areas contributes substantially and increasingly to
the spread of disease and crime and depreciation of property values,
constitutes an economic and social liability, substantially impairs or
arrests the sound growth of municipalities, retards the provision of
housing accommodations, hinders job creation and economic growth,
aggravates traffic problems and substantially impairs or arrests the
elimination of traffic hazards and the improvement of traffic
facilities; and that)). The prevention and elimination of such
((areas)) properties is a matter of state policy and state concern in
order that the state and its municipalities shall not continue to be
endangered by ((areas)) properties which are focal centers of disease,
promote juvenile delinquency, are conducive to fires, and are difficult
to police and to provide police protection for((, and, while
contributing little to the tax income of the state and its
municipalities, consume an excessive proportion of its revenues because
of the extra services required for police, fire, accident,
hospitalization and other forms of public protection, services, and
facilities)).
It is further found and declared that certain of such ((areas))
properties, or portions thereof, may require acquisition, clearance,
and disposition subject to use restrictions, as provided in this
chapter, since the prevailing condition of decay may make impracticable
the reclamation of the ((area)) properties by rehabilitation; that
other ((areas)) properties or portions thereof may, through the means
provided in this chapter, be susceptible of rehabilitation in such a
manner that the conditions and evils hereinbefore enumerated may be
eliminated, remedied, or prevented; and that to the extent feasible
salvable blighted ((areas)) properties should be rehabilitated through
voluntary action and the regulatory process.
((It is further found and declared that there is an urgent need to
enhance the ability of municipalities to act effectively and
expeditiously to revive blighted areas and to prevent further blight
due to shocks to the economy of the state and their actual and
threatened effects on unemployment, poverty, and the availability of
private capital for businesses and projects in the area.))
It is further found and declared that the powers conferred by this
chapter are for public uses and purposes for which public money may be
expended and the power of eminent domain exercised((; and that the
necessity in the public interest for the provisions herein enacted is
hereby declared as a matter of legislative determination)).

Sec. 2 RCW 35.81.015 and 2002 c 218 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following terms wherever used or referred to in this chapter,
shall have the following meanings, unless a different meaning is
clearly indicated by the context:
(1) "Agency" or "community renewal agency" means a public agency
created under RCW 35.81.160 or otherwise authorized to serve as a
community renewal agency under this chapter.
(2) "Blighted ((area)) property" means ((an area which)) specific
property, by reason of the substantial physical dilapidation,
deterioration, defective construction, and material((, and arrangement
and/or age or obsolescence)) of buildings or improvements, whether
residential or nonresidential, inadequate provision for ventilation,
light, proper sanitary facilities, or open spaces as determined by
competent appraisers on the basis of an examination of the building
standards of the municipality; ((inappropriate uses of land or
buildings; existence of overcrowding of buildings or structures;
defective or inadequate street layout; faulty lot layout in relation to
size, adequacy, accessibility or usefulness; excessive land coverage;
insanitary)) unsanitary or unsafe conditions; deterioration of site;
existence of hazardous soils, substances, or materials; ((diversity of
ownership;)) tax or special assessment delinquency exceeding the fair
value of the land; defective or unusual conditions of title; ((improper
subdivision or obsolete platting; existence of persistent and high
levels of unemployment or poverty within the area;)) or the existence
of conditions that endanger life or property by fire or other causes,
or any combination of such factors, is conducive to ill health,
transmission of disease, or infant mortality((, juvenile delinquency or
crime; substantially impairs or arrests the sound growth of the
municipality or its environs, or retards the provision of housing
accommodations; constitutes an economic or social liability)); and/or
((is detrimental, or)) constitutes a menace((,)) to the public
health((,)) and safety((, welfare, or morals)) in its present condition
and use.
(3) "Bonds" means any bonds, notes, or debentures (including
refunding obligations) herein authorized to be issued.
(4) "Clerk" means the clerk or other official of the municipality
who is the custodian of the official records of such municipality.
(5) "Community renewal area" means ((a blighted)) an area in which
one or more blighted properties, and only such blighted properties, are
located, and which the local governing body designates as appropriate
for a community renewal project or projects.
(6) "Community renewal plan" means a plan, as it exists from time
to time, for a community renewal project or projects, which plan (a)
shall be consistent with the comprehensive plan or parts thereof for
the municipality as a whole; (b) shall be sufficiently complete to
indicate such land acquisition, demolition, and removal of structures,
redevelopment, improvements, and rehabilitation as may be proposed to
be carried out in the community renewal area; zoning and planning
changes, if any, which may include, among other things, changes related
to land uses, densities, and building requirements; and the plan's
relationship to definite local objectives respecting appropriate land
uses, improved traffic, public transportation, public utilities,
recreational and community facilities, and other public improvements;
(c) shall address the need for replacement housing, within the
municipality, where existing housing is lost as a result of the
community renewal project undertaken by the municipality under this
chapter; and (d) may include a plan to address any persistent high
levels of unemployment or poverty in the community renewal area.
(7) "Community renewal project" includes one or more undertakings
or activities of a municipality in a community renewal area: (a) For
the elimination ((and the prevention of the development or spread)) of
blight; (b) for encouraging economic growth through job creation or
retention; (c) for redevelopment or rehabilitation in a community
renewal area; or (d) any combination or part thereof in accordance with
a community renewal plan.
(8) "Federal government" includes the United States of America or
any agency or instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of the United
States of America.
(9) "Local governing body" means the council or other legislative
body charged with governing the municipality.
(10) "Mayor" means the chief executive of a city or town, or the
elected executive, if any, of any county operating under a charter, or
the county legislative authority of any other county.
(11) "Municipality" means any incorporated city or town, or any
county, in the state.
(12) "Obligee" includes any bondholder, agent, or trustees for any
bondholders, any lessor demising to the municipality property used in
connection with a community renewal project, or any assignee or
assignees of such lessor's interest or any part thereof, and the
federal government when it is a party to any contract with the
municipality.
(13) "Person" means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation,
company, association, joint stock association, or school district; and
shall include any trustee, receiver, assignee, or other person acting
in a similar representative capacity.
(14) "Persons of low income" means an individual with an annual
income, at the time of hiring or at the time assistance is provided
under this chapter, that does not exceed the higher of either: (a)
Eighty percent of the statewide median family income, adjusted for
family size; or (b) eighty percent of the median family income for the
county or standard metropolitan statistical area, adjusted for family
size, where the community renewal area is located.
(15) "Public body" means the state or any municipality, board,
commission, district, or any other subdivision or public body of the
state or of a municipality.
(16) "Public officer" means any officer who is in charge of any
department or branch of the government of the municipality relating to
health, fire, building regulations, or to other activities concerning
dwellings in the municipality.
(17) "Real property" includes all lands, including improvements and
fixtures thereon, and property of any nature appurtenant thereto, or
used in connection therewith, and every estate, interest, right and
use, legal or equitable, therein, including terms for years and liens
by way of judgment, mortgage or otherwise.
(18) "Redevelopment" includes (a) acquisition of ((a)) blighted
((area)) properties or portions thereof; (b) demolition and removal of
buildings and improvements; (c) installation, construction, or
reconstruction of streets, utilities, parks, playgrounds, and other
improvements necessary for carrying out in the area the community
renewal provisions of this chapter in accordance with the community
renewal plan; (d) making the land available for development or
redevelopment by private enterprise or public bodies (including sale,
initial leasing, or retention by the municipality itself) at its fair
value for uses in accordance with the community renewal plan; and (e)
making loans or grants to a person or public body for the purpose of
creating or retaining jobs, a substantial portion of which, as
determined by the municipality, shall be for persons of low income.
(19) "Rehabilitation" includes the restoration and renewal of ((a))
blighted ((area)) properties or portions thereof, in accordance with a
community renewal plan, by (a) carrying out plans for a program of
voluntary or compulsory repair and rehabilitation of buildings or other
improvements; (b) acquisition of real property and demolition or
removal of buildings and improvements thereon where necessary to
eliminate unhealthful, ((insanitary)) unsanitary, or unsafe
conditions((, lessen density, reduce traffic hazards, eliminate
obsolete or other uses detrimental to the public welfare, or otherwise
to remove or prevent the spread of blight or deterioration)), or to
provide land for needed public facilities; (c) installation,
construction, or reconstruction of streets, utilities, parks,
playgrounds, and other improvements necessary for carrying out in the
area the community renewal provisions of this chapter; and (d) the
disposition of any property acquired in such community renewal area for
uses in accordance with such community renewal plan.

Sec. 3 RCW 35.81.040 and 2002 c 218 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
A municipality for the purposes of this chapter may formulate a
workable program for using appropriate private and public resources to
eliminate((, and prevent the development or spread of,)) blighted
((areas)) properties, to encourage needed community rehabilitation, to
provide for the redevelopment of such ((areas)) properties, or to
undertake the activities, or other feasible municipal activities as may
be suitably employed to achieve the objectives of the workable program.
The workable program may include, without limitation, provision for:
The ((prevention of the spread of blight into areas of the municipality
which are free from blight through)) diligent enforcement of housing,
zoning, and occupancy controls and standards; the rehabilitation of
blighted ((areas)) properties or portions thereof by replanning,
removing congestion, providing parks, playgrounds, and other public
improvements, by encouraging voluntary rehabilitation and by compelling
the repair and rehabilitation of deteriorated or deteriorating
structures; the replacement of housing that is lost as a result of
community renewal activities within a community renewal area; the
clearance and redevelopment of blighted ((areas)) properties or
portions thereof; and the reduction of unemployment and poverty within
the community renewal area by providing financial or technical
assistance to a person or public body that is used to create or retain
jobs, a substantial portion of which, as determined by the
municipality, shall be for persons of low income.

Sec. 4 RCW 35.81.050 and 2002 c 218 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No municipality shall exercise any of the powers hereafter
conferred upon municipalities by this chapter until after its local
governing body shall have adopted an ordinance or resolution finding
that: (a) One or more blighted ((areas)) properties exist in such
municipality; and (b) the rehabilitation, redevelopment, or a
combination thereof, of such ((area or areas)) property or properties
is necessary in the interest of the public health((,)) and safety((,
morals, or welfare)) of the residents of such municipality.
(2) After adoption of the ordinance or resolution making the
findings described in subsection (1) of this section, the local
governing body of the municipality may elect to have the powers of a
community renewal agency under this chapter exercised in one of the
following ways:
(a) By appointing a board or commission composed of not less than
five members, which board or commission shall ((include municipal
officials and)) be comprised of elected officials from such
municipality, selected by the mayor, with approval of the local
governing body of the municipality; or
(b) By the local governing body of the municipality directly((; or
(c) By the board of a public corporation, commission, or authority
under chapter 35.21 RCW, or a public facilities district created under
chapter 35.57 or 36.100 RCW, or a public port district created under
chapter 53.04 RCW, or a housing authority created under chapter 35.82
RCW, that is authorized to conduct activities as a community renewal
agency under this chapter)).

Sec. 5 RCW 35.81.060 and 2002 c 218 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A municipality shall not approve a community renewal project
for a community renewal area unless the local governing body has, by
ordinance or resolution, determined ((such an area to be a blighted))
that one or more blighted properties are located in the area and
designated the area as appropriate for a community renewal project.
The local governing body shall not approve a community renewal plan
until a comprehensive plan or parts of the plan for an area which would
include a community renewal area for the municipality have been
prepared as provided in chapter 36.70A RCW. For municipalities not
subject to the planning requirements of chapter 36.70A RCW, any
proposed comprehensive plan must be consistent with a local
comprehensive plan adopted under chapter 35.63 or 36.70 RCW, or any
other applicable law. A municipality shall not acquire real property
for a community renewal project unless the local governing body has
approved the community renewal project plan in accordance with
subsection (4) of this section.
(2) The municipality may itself prepare or cause to be prepared a
community renewal plan, or any person or agency, public or private, may
submit such a plan to the municipality. Prior to its approval of a
community renewal project, the local governing body shall review and
determine the conformity of the community renewal plan with the
comprehensive plan or parts thereof for the development of the
municipality as a whole. If the community renewal plan is not
consistent with the existing comprehensive plan, the local governing
body may amend its comprehensive plan or community renewal plan.
(3) Prior to adoption, the local governing body shall hold a public
hearing on a community renewal plan after providing public notice under
RCW 8.25.290. ((The notice shall be given by publication once each
week for two consecutive weeks not less than ten nor more than thirty
days prior to the date of the hearing in a newspaper having a general
circulation in the community renewal area of the municipality and by
mailing a notice of the hearing not less than ten days prior to the
date of the hearing to the persons whose names appear on the county
treasurer's tax roll as the owner or reputed owner of the property, at
the address shown on the tax roll.)) In addition to the information
required to be provided under RCW 8.25.290, the notice shall describe
the time, date, place, and purpose of the hearing, shall generally
identify the community renewal area affected, and shall outline the
general scope of the community renewal plan under consideration.
(4) Following the hearing, the local governing body may approve a
community renewal project if it finds that (a) a feasible plan exists
for making available adequate housing for the residents who may be
displaced by the project; (b) the community renewal plan conforms to
the comprehensive plan for the municipality; (c) ((the community
renewal plan will afford maximum opportunity, consistent with the needs
of the municipality, for the rehabilitation or redevelopment of the
community renewal area by private enterprise; (d))) a sound and
adequate financial program exists for the financing of the project; and
(((e))) (d) the community renewal project area ((is a blighted area))
contains one or more blighted properties as defined in RCW
35.81.015(2).
(5) A community renewal project plan may be modified at any time by
the local governing body as long as the local governing body provides
notice of the proposed modification as described under subsection (3)
of this section. However, if modified after the lease or sale by the
municipality of real property in the community renewal project area,
the modification shall be subject to the rights at law or in equity as
a lessee or purchaser, or the successor or successors in interest may
be entitled to assert.
(6) Unless otherwise expressly stated in an ordinance or resolution
of the governing body of the municipality, a community renewal plan
shall not be considered a subarea plan or part of a comprehensive plan
for purposes of chapter 36.70A RCW. However, a municipality that has
adopted a comprehensive plan under chapter 36.70A RCW may adopt all or
part of a community renewal plan at any time as a new or amended
subarea plan, whether or not any subarea plan has previously been
adopted for all or part of the community renewal area. Any community
renewal plan so adopted, unless otherwise determined by the growth
management hearings board with jurisdiction under a timely appeal in
RCW 36.70A.280, shall be conclusively presumed to comply with the
requirements in this chapter for consistency with the comprehensive
plan.

Sec. 6 RCW 35.81.070 and 2002 c 218 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every municipality shall have all the powers necessary or
convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of
this chapter, including the following powers in addition to others
granted under this chapter:
(1) To undertake and carry out community renewal projects within
the municipality, to make and execute contracts and other instruments
necessary or convenient to the exercise of its powers under this
chapter, and to disseminate blight clearance and community renewal
information.
(2) To provide or to arrange or contract for the furnishing or
repair by any person or agency, public or private, of services,
privileges, works, streets, roads, public utilities or other facilities
for, or in connection with, a community renewal project; to install,
construct, and reconstruct streets, utilities, parks, playgrounds, and
other public improvements; and to agree to any conditions that it may
deem reasonable and appropriate attached to federal financial
assistance and imposed pursuant to federal law relating to the
determination of prevailing salaries or wages or compliance with labor
standards, in the undertaking or carrying out of a community renewal
project, and to include in any contract let in connection with such a
project, provisions to fulfill such of said conditions as it may deem
reasonable and appropriate.
(3) To provide financial or technical assistance, using available
public or private funds, to a person or public body for the purpose of
creating or retaining jobs, a substantial portion of which, as
determined by the municipality, shall be for persons of low income.
(4) To make payments, loans, or grants to, provide assistance to,
and contract with existing or new owners and tenants of property in the
community renewal areas as compensation for any adverse impacts, such
as relocation or interruption of business, that may be caused by the
implementation of a community renewal project, and/or consideration for
commitments to develop, expand, or retain land uses that contribute to
the success of the project or plan, including without limitation
businesses that will create or retain jobs, a substantial portion of
which, as determined by the municipality, shall be for persons of low
income.
(5) To contract with a person or public body to provide financial
assistance, authorized under this section, to property owners and
tenants impacted by the implementation of the community renewal plan
and to provide incentives to property owners and tenants to encourage
them to locate in the community renewal area after adoption of the
community renewal plan.
(6) Within the municipality, to enter upon any building or property
in any community renewal area, in order to make surveys and appraisals,
provided that such entries shall be made in such a manner as to cause
the least possible inconvenience to the persons in possession((, and to
obtain)) and only pursuant to an order for this purpose from a court of
competent jurisdiction in the event entry is denied or resisted; to
acquire by purchase, lease, option, gift, grant, bequest, devise,
eminent domain, or otherwise, any real property and such personal
property as may be necessary for the administration of the provisions
herein contained, together with any improvements thereon; to hold,
improve, clear, or prepare for redevelopment any such property; to
dispose of any real property; to insure or provide for the insurance of
any real or personal property or operations of the municipality against
any risks or hazards, including the power to pay premiums on any such
insurance((: PROVIDED, That no statutory provision with respect to the
acquisition, clearance, or disposition of property by public bodies
shall restrict a municipality in the exercise of such functions with
respect to a community renewal project)).
(7) To invest any community renewal project funds held in reserves
or sinking funds or any such funds which are not required for immediate
disbursement, in property or securities in which mutual savings banks
may legally invest funds subject to their control; to redeem such bonds
as have been issued pursuant to RCW 35.81.100 at the redemption price
established therein or to purchase such bonds at less than redemption
price, all such bonds so redeemed or purchased to be canceled.
(8) To borrow money and to apply for, and accept, advances, loans,
grants, contributions and any other form of financial assistance from
the federal government, the state, county, or other public body, or
from any sources, public or private, for the purposes of this chapter,
and to enter into and carry out contracts in connection therewith. A
municipality may include in any application or contract for financial
assistance with the federal government for a community renewal project
such conditions imposed pursuant to federal laws as the municipality
may deem reasonable and appropriate and which are not inconsistent with
the purposes of this chapter.
(9) Within the municipality, to make or have made all plans
necessary to the carrying out of the purposes of this chapter and to
contract with any person, public or private, in making and carrying out
such plans and to adopt or approve, modify, and amend such plans. Such
plans may include, without limitation: (a) A comprehensive plan or
parts thereof for the locality as a whole, (b) community renewal plans,
(c) plans for carrying out a program of voluntary or compulsory repair
and rehabilitation of buildings and improvements, (d) plans for the
enforcement of state and local laws, codes, and regulations relating to
the use of land and the use and occupancy of buildings and improvements
and to the compulsory repair, rehabilitation, demolition, or removal of
buildings and improvements, (e) appraisals, title searches, surveys,
studies, and other preliminary plans and work necessary to prepare for
the undertaking of community renewal projects, and (f) plans to provide
financial or technical assistance to a person or public body for the
purpose of creating or retaining jobs, a substantial portion of which,
as determined by the municipality, shall be for persons of low income.
The municipality is authorized to develop, test, and report methods and
techniques, and carry out demonstrations and other activities, for the
prevention and the elimination of blight, for job creation or retention
activities, and to apply for, accept, and utilize grants of, funds from
the federal government for such purposes.
(10) To prepare plans for the relocation of families displaced from
a community renewal area, and to coordinate public and private agencies
in such relocation, including requesting such assistance for this
purpose as is available from other private and governmental agencies,
both for the municipality and other parties.
(11) To appropriate such funds and make such expenditures as may be
necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter, and in accordance
with state law: (a) Levy taxes and assessments for such purposes; (b)
acquire land either by negotiation or eminent domain, or both; (c)
close, vacate, plan, or replan streets, roads, sidewalks, ways, or
other places; (d) plan or replan, zone or rezone any part of the
municipality; (e) adopt annual budgets for the operation of a community
renewal agency, department, or offices vested with community renewal
project powers under RCW 35.81.150; and (f) enter into agreements with
such agencies or departments (which agreements may extend over any
period) respecting action to be taken by such municipality pursuant to
any of the powers granted by this chapter.
(12) Within the municipality, to organize, coordinate, and direct
the administration of the provisions of this chapter as they apply to
such municipality in order that the objective of remedying blighted
((areas)) properties and preventing the causes thereof within such
municipality may be most effectively promoted and achieved, and to
establish such new office or offices of the municipality or to
reorganize existing offices in order to carry out such purpose most
effectively.
(13) To contract with a person or public body to assist in carrying
out the purposes of this chapter.
(14) To exercise all or any part or combination of powers herein
granted.

Sec. 7 RCW 35.81.080 and 2002 c 218 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
A municipality shall have the right to acquire by condemnation, in
accordance with the procedure provided for condemnation by such
municipality for other purposes, any interest in real property, which
it may deem necessary for a community renewal project under this
chapter after the adoption by the local governing body of a resolution
declaring that the acquisition of the real property described therein
is necessary for such purpose. Condemnation for community renewal of
blighted ((areas)) properties is declared to be a public use, and
property already devoted to any other public use or acquired by the
owner or a predecessor in interest by eminent domain may be condemned
for the purposes of this chapter.
((The award of compensation for real property taken for such a
project shall not be increased by reason of any increase in the value
of the real property caused by the assembly, clearance, or
reconstruction, or proposed assembly, clearance, or reconstruction in
the project area. No allowance shall be made for the improvements
begun on real property after notice to the owner of such property of
the institution of proceedings to condemn such property. Evidence
shall be admissible bearing upon the insanitary, unsafe, or substandard
condition of the premises, or the unlawful use thereof.))

Sec. 8 RCW 35.81.090 and 2002 c 218 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A municipality, with approval of its legislative authority, may
acquire real property, or any interest therein, for the purposes of a
community renewal project (a) prior to the selection of one or more
persons interested in undertaking to redevelop or rehabilitate the real
property, or (b) after the selection of one or more persons interested
in undertaking to redevelop or rehabilitate such real property. In
either case the municipality may select a redeveloper through a
competitive bidding process consistent with this section or through a
process consistent with RCW 35.81.095.
(2) A municipality, with approval of its legislative authority, may
sell, lease, or otherwise transfer real property or any interest
therein acquired by it for a community renewal project, in a community
renewal area for residential, recreational, commercial, industrial, or
other uses or for public use, and may enter into contracts with respect
thereto, or may retain such a property or interest only for parks and
recreation, education, public utilities, public transportation, public
safety, health, highways, streets, and alleys, administrative
buildings, or civic centers, in accordance with the community renewal
project plan, subject to such covenants, conditions, and restrictions,
including covenants running with the land, as it may deem to be
necessary or desirable to ((assist in preventing the development or
spread of blighted areas or otherwise to)) carry out the purposes of
this chapter. However, such a sale, lease, other transfer, or
retention, and any agreement relating thereto, may be made only after
the approval of the community renewal plan by the local governing body.
The purchasers or lessees and their successors and assigns shall be
obligated to devote the real property only to the uses specified in the
community renewal plan, and may be obligated to comply with any other
requirements as the municipality may determine to be in the public
interest, including the obligation to begin and complete, within a
reasonable time, any improvements on the real property required by the
community renewal plan or promised by the transferee. The real
property or interest shall be sold, leased, or otherwise transferred
for the consideration the municipality determines adequate. In
determining the adequacy of consideration, a municipality may take into
account the uses permitted under the community renewal plan; the
restrictions upon, and the covenants, conditions, and obligations
assumed by, the transferee; and the public benefits to be realized,
including furthering of the objectives of the plan for the prevention
of the recurrence of blighted ((areas)) properties.
(3) The municipality in any instrument of conveyance to a private
purchaser or lessee may provide that the purchaser or lessee shall be
without power to sell, lease, or otherwise transfer the real property,
or to permit changes in ownership or control of a purchaser or lessee
that is not a natural person, in each case without the prior written
consent of the municipality until the purchaser or lessee has completed
the construction of all improvements that it has obligated itself to
construct thereon. The municipality may also retain the right, upon
any earlier transfer or change in ownership or control without consent;
or any failure or change in ownership or control without consent; or
any failure to complete the improvements within the time agreed to
terminate the transferee's interest in the property; or to retain or
collect on any deposit or instrument provided as security, or both.
The enforcement of these restrictions and remedies is declared to be
consistent with the public policy of this state. Real property
acquired by a municipality that, in accordance with the provisions of
the community renewal plan, is to be transferred, shall be transferred
as rapidly as feasible, in the public interest, consistent with the
carrying out of the provisions of the community renewal plan. The
inclusion in any contract or conveyance to a purchaser or lessee of any
covenants, restrictions, or conditions (including the incorporation by
reference therein of the provisions of a community renewal plan or any
part thereof) shall not prevent the recording of such a contract or
conveyance in the land records of the auditor or the county in which
the city or town is located, in a manner that affords actual or
constructive notice thereof.
(4)(a)(i) A municipality may dispose of real property in a
community renewal area, acquired by the municipality under this
chapter, to any private persons only under those reasonable competitive
bidding procedures as it shall prescribe, or by competitive bidding as
provided in this subsection, through direct negotiation where
authorized under (c) of this subsection, or by a process authorized in
RCW 35.81.095.
(ii) A competitive bidding process may occur (A) prior to the
purchase of the real property by the municipality, or (B) after the
purchase of the real property by the municipality.
(b)(i) A municipality may, by public notice by publication once
each week for three consecutive weeks in a newspaper having a general
circulation in the community, prior to the execution of any contract or
deed to sell, lease, or otherwise transfer real property and prior to
the delivery of any instrument of conveyance with respect thereto under
the provisions of this section, invite bids from, and make available
all pertinent information to, private redevelopers or any persons
interested in undertaking to redevelop or rehabilitate a community
renewal area, or any part thereof. This notice shall identify the
area, or portion thereof, and shall state that further information as
is available may be obtained at the office as shall be designated in
the notice.
(ii) The municipality shall consider all responsive redevelopment
or rehabilitation bids and the financial and legal ability of the
persons making the bids to carry them out. The municipality may accept
the bids as it deems to be in the public interest and in furtherance of
the purposes of this chapter. Thereafter, the municipality may
execute, in accordance with the provisions of subsection (2) of this
section, and deliver contracts, deeds, leases, and other instruments of
transfer.
(c) If the legislative authority of the municipality determines
that the sale of real property to a specific person is necessary to the
success of a neighborhood revitalization or community renewal project
for which the municipality is providing assistance to a nonprofit
organization from federal community development block grant funds under
42 U.S.C. Sec. 5305(a)(15), or successor provision, under a plan or
grant application approved by the United States department of housing
and urban development, or successor agency, then the municipality may
sell or lease that property to that person through direct negotiation,
for consideration determined by the municipality to be adequate
consistent with subsection (2) of this section. This direct
negotiation may occur, and the municipality may enter into an agreement
for sale or lease, either before or after the acquisition of the
property by the municipality. Unless the municipality has provided
notice to the public of the intent to sell or lease the property by
direct negotiation, as part of a citizen participation process adopted
under federal regulations for the plan or grant application under which
the federal community development block grant funds have been awarded,
the municipality shall publish notice of the sale at least fifteen days
prior to the conveyance of the property.
(5) A municipality may operate and maintain real property acquired
in a community renewal area for a period of three years pending the
disposition of the property for redevelopment, without regard to the
provisions of subsection (2) of this section, for such uses and
purposes as may be deemed desirable even though not in conformity with
the community renewal plan. However, the municipality may, after a
public hearing, extend the time for a period not to exceed three years.
(6) Any covenants, restrictions, promises, undertakings, releases,
or waivers in favor of a municipality contained in any deed or other
instrument accepted by any transferee of property from the municipality
or community renewal agency under this chapter, or contained in any
document executed by any owner of property in a community renewal area,
shall run with the land to the extent provided in the deed, instrument,
or other document, so as to bind, and be enforceable by the
municipality against, the person accepting or making the deed,
instrument, or other document and that person's heirs, successors in
interest, or assigns having actual or constructive notice thereof.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 RCW 35.81.030 (Encouragement of private
enterprise) and 2002 c 218 s 3 & 1965 c 7 s 35.81.030 are each
repealed.

--- END ---