BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 FINDINGS AND DECLARATIONS. The legislature
finds that in recent years professionals have recognized the value of
developing a more coordinated and integrated response to sex offender
management. The legislature further finds that a comprehensive
response to issues that arise, such as integrating federal and state
laws, or assessing whether system flaws contributed to an offense, can
enhance the state's interest in protecting the community with an
emphasis on public safety. While the legislature recognizes that sex
offenses cannot be eliminated entirely, the interests of the public
will be best served if Washington state experts and practitioners from
across the continuum of the sex offender response system coordinate sex
offender management planning and create a system to assess the
performance of all components of the sex offender response systems
statewide. The legislature intends to foster such coordination by
creating a sex offender policy board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 ESTABLISHMENT OF BOARD. (1) The sentencing
guidelines commission shall establish, staff, and maintain a sex
offender policy board.
(2) Although the board is established by the commission, it shall
maintain an independent existence from the commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 BOARD MEMBERSHIP. (1) The sex offender
policy board shall consist of thirteen voting members. Unless the
member is specifically named in this section, the following
organizations shall designate a person to sit on the board.
(a) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs;
(b) The Washington association of prosecuting attorneys;
(c) The Washington association of criminal defense lawyers;
(d) The chair of the indeterminate sentence review board or his or
her designee;
(e) The Washington association for the treatment of sex abusers;
(f) The secretary of the department of corrections or his or her
designee;
(g) The Washington state superior court judge's association;
(h) The assistant secretary of the juvenile rehabilitation
administration or his or her designee;
(i) The office of crime victims advocacy in the department of
community, trade, and economic development;
(j) The Washington state association of counties;
(k) The association of Washington cities;
(l) The Washington association of sexual assault programs; and
(m) The director of the special commitment center or his or her
designee.
(2) The person so named in subsection (1) of this section has the
authority to make decisions on behalf of the organization he or she
represents.
(3) The nonvoting membership shall consist of the following:
(a) Two members of the sentencing guidelines commission chosen by
the chair of the commission; and
(b) A representative of the criminal justice division in the
attorney general's office.
(4) The board shall choose its chair by majority vote from among
its voting membership. The chair's term shall be two years.
(5) The chair of the sentencing guidelines commission shall convene
the first meeting.
(6) The Washington institute for public policy shall act as an
advisor to the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 LENGTH OF MEMBERSHIP TERMS. (1) The
following members of the sex offender policy board shall be appointed
for a term of three years and shall serve until their successor is
selected by the agency they represent:
(a) The member selected by the Washington association of sheriffs
and police chiefs;
(b) The member selected by the Washington association of
prosecuting attorneys;
(c) The member selected by the Washington association of criminal
defense lawyers;
(d) The member selected by the Washington association for the
treatment of sex abusers;
(e) The member selected by the Washington state superior court
judge's association;
(f) The member selected by the Washington state association of
counties;
(g) The member selected by the association of Washington cities;
and
(h) The member selected by the Washington association of sexual
assault providers.
(2) Any vacancy before the expiration of a term shall be filled by
the appointing agency for the unexpired portion of the term in which
the vacancy occurs. The terms of the initial members listed in
subsection (1) of this section shall be staggered so that their terms
expire after one, two, and three years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 BOARD AUTHORITY. (1) The sex offender
policy board may create subcommittees as needed.
(2) Within available funding, the board may contract with outside
entities which have specific expertise necessary to assist the board in
performing its duties.
(3) The board shall develop bylaws to govern its operation, using
the bylaws created by the sentencing guidelines commission as a guide.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 DUTIES OF THE BOARD. The sex offender
policy board's duties are as follows:
(1)(a) To stay apprised of (i) research and best practices related
to risk assessment, treatment, and supervision of sex offenders; (ii)
community education regarding sex offenses and offenders; (iii)
prevention of sex offenses; and (iv) sex offender management, in
general;
(b) To conduct case reviews on sex offenses as needed to understand
performance of sex offender prevention and response systems or which
are requested by the governor, the legislature, or local criminal
justice agencies. The reviews shall be conducted in a manner that
protects the right to a fair trial;
(c) To develop and report on benchmarks that measure performance
across the state's sex offender response system;
(d) To assess and communicate best practices or upcoming trends in
other jurisdictions to determine their applicability and viability in
Washington state;
(e) To provide a forum for discussion of issues that requires
interagency communication, coordination, and collaboration, including:
(i) Community education and the distribution of information about
all parts of the sex offender management system to interested parties;
(ii) Existing community-based prevention programs; and
(iii) Sex offender registration and monitoring in the community.
(2) The board shall develop an initial work plan detailing the
method for achieving its duties and submit it to the governor and the
legislature no later than December 1, 2008. The board shall annually
update the work plan and include reasonable performance measures to
indicate whether its duties are being met.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 REIMBURSEMENT. The members of the sex
offender policy board shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as
provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 MEMBER REPLACEMENT. Any member of the sex
offender policy board who misses three consecutive meetings shall have
that fact called to that member's attention by the chair of the board
with the request that the member reconsider his or her ability to
continue as a member. After discussion, if the chair believes the
member is not able to continue as a board member, the chair shall
request that the appointing agency replace the member for the remainder
of the unexpired term.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 43.131 RCW
to read as follows:
SUNSET TERMINATION. The sex offender policy board and its powers
and duties shall be terminated on June 30, 2013, as provided in section
10 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 43.131
RCW to read as follows:
SUNSET REPEALER. The following acts or parts of acts, as now
existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed, effective June 30,
2014:
(1) Section 1 of this act;
(2) Section 2 of this act;
(3) Section 3 of this act;
(4) Section 4 of this act;
(5) Section 5 of this act;
(6) Section 6 of this act;
(7) Section 7 of this act; and
(8) Section 8 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 NULL AND VOID CLAUSE. If specific funding
for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter
number, is not provided by June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations
act, this act is null and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 CAPTIONS NOT LAW. Captions used in this
act are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 1 through 8 of this act are each
added to chapter 9.94A RCW.

--- END ---