BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 67.70 RCW
to read as follows:
In any advertising, including broadcast, print media, or written
advertising, on behalf of the state lottery, the state lottery or its
lottery sales agents may not actively target advertisement to persons
under the age of twenty-one years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 9.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, no person may
assist, participate with, or knowingly allow a person under the age of
twenty-one years to engage in any wagering activity allowed by this
chapter.
(2) A person who violates this section is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor subject to the penalty set forth in RCW 9A.20.021.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.46.0305 and 1987 c 4 s 25 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature hereby authorizes the wagering on the outcome of
the roll of dice or the flipping of or matching of coins on the
premises of an establishment engaged in the business of selling food or
beverages for consumption on the premises to determine which of the
participants will pay for coin-operated music on the premises or
certain items of food or beverages served or sold by such establishment
and therein consumed. Such establishments are hereby authorized to
possess dice and dice cups on their premises, but only for use in such
limited wagering. Persons engaged in such limited form of wagering
shall not be subject to the criminal or civil penalties otherwise
provided for in this chapter((: PROVIDED, That minors shall be barred
from engaging in the wagering activities allowed by this chapter)).

Sec. 4 RCW 9.46.110 and 1999 c 221 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of any county, city-county, city, or
town, by local law and ordinance, and in accordance with the provisions
of this chapter and rules adopted under this chapter, may provide for
the taxing of any gambling activity authorized by this chapter within
its jurisdiction, the tax receipts to go to the county, city-county,
city, or town so taxing the activity. Any such tax imposed by a county
alone shall not apply to any gambling activity within a city or town
located in the county but the tax rate established by a county, if any,
shall constitute the tax rate throughout the unincorporated areas of
such county.
(2) The operation of punch boards and pull-tabs are subject to the
following conditions:
(a) Chances may ((only)) not be sold to ((adults)) persons under
the age of twenty-one years;
(b) The price of a single chance may not exceed one dollar;
(c) No punch board or pull-tab license may award as a prize upon a
winning number or symbol being drawn the opportunity of taking a chance
upon any other punch board or pull-tab;
(d) All prizes available to be won must be described on an
information flare. All merchandise prizes must be on display within
the immediate area of the premises in which any such punch board or
pull-tab is located. Upon a winning number or symbol being drawn, a
merchandise prize must be immediately removed from the display and
awarded to the winner. All references to cash or merchandise prizes,
with a value over twenty dollars, must be removed immediately from the
information flare when won, or such omission shall be deemed a fraud
for the purposes of this chapter; and
(e) When any person wins money or merchandise from any punch board
or pull-tab over an amount determined by the commission, every licensee
shall keep a public record of the award for at least ninety days
containing such information as the commission shall deem necessary.
(3)(a) Taxation of bingo and raffles shall never be in an amount
greater than five percent of the gross receipts from a bingo game or
raffle less the amount awarded as cash or merchandise prizes.
(b) Taxation of amusement games shall only be in an amount
sufficient to pay the actual costs of enforcement of the provisions of
this chapter by the county, city or town law enforcement agency and in
no event shall such taxation exceed two percent of the gross receipts
from the amusement game less the amount awarded as prizes.
(c) No tax shall be imposed under the authority of this chapter on
bingo or amusement games when such activities or any combination
thereof are conducted by any bona fide charitable or nonprofit
organization as defined in this chapter, which organization has no paid
operating or management personnel and has gross receipts from bingo or
amusement games, or a combination thereof, not exceeding five thousand
dollars per year, less the amount awarded as cash or merchandise
prizes.
(d) No tax shall be imposed on the first ten thousand dollars of
gross receipts less the amount awarded as cash or merchandise prizes
from raffles conducted by any bona fide charitable or nonprofit
organization as defined in this chapter.
(e) Taxation of punch boards and pull-tabs for bona fide charitable
or nonprofit organizations is based on gross receipts from the
operation of the games less the amount awarded as cash or merchandise
prizes, and shall not exceed a rate of ten percent. At the option of
the county, city-county, city, or town, the taxation of punch boards
and pull-tabs for commercial stimulant operators may be based on gross
receipts from the operation of the games, and may not exceed a rate of
five percent, or may be based on gross receipts from the operation of
the games less the amount awarded as cash or merchandise prizes, and
may not exceed a rate of ten percent.
(f) Taxation of social card games may not exceed twenty percent of
the gross revenue from such games.
(4) Taxes imposed under this chapter become a lien upon personal
and real property used in the gambling activity in the same manner as
provided for under RCW 84.60.010. The lien shall attach on the date
the tax becomes due and shall relate back and have priority against
real and personal property to the same extent as ad valorem taxes.

Sec. 5 RCW 67.70.120 and 2003 c 53 s 303 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A ticket or share shall not be sold to any person under the age
of ((eighteen)) twenty-one years, but this shall not be deemed to
prohibit the purchase of a ticket or share for the purpose of making a
gift by a person ((eighteen)) twenty-one years of age or older to a
person less than that age.
(2) Any licensee who knowingly sells or offers to sell a lottery
ticket or share to any person under the age of ((eighteen)) twenty-one
years is guilty of a misdemeanor.
(3) In the event that a person under the age of ((eighteen))
twenty-one years directly purchases a ticket in violation of this
section, that person is guilty of a misdemeanor. No prize will be paid
to such person and the prize money otherwise payable on the ticket will
be treated as unclaimed pursuant to RCW 67.70.190.

Sec. 6 RCW 67.16.060 and 1991 c 270 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It shall be unlawful:
(a) To conduct pool selling, bookmaking, or to circulate hand
books; ((or))
(b) To bet or wager on any horse race other than by the parimutuel
method; ((or))
(c) For any licensee to take more than the percentage provided in
RCW 67.16.170 and 67.16.175; ((or))
(d) For any licensee to compute breaks in the parimutuel system
otherwise than at ten cents;
(e) For any person under the age of twenty-one years to engage in
the wagering activities allowed by this chapter; or
(f) For any person to assist, participate with, or knowingly allow
a person under the age of twenty-one years to engage in any wagering
activity allowed by this chapter.
(2) Any willful violation of the terms of this chapter, or of any
rule, regulation, or order of the commission shall constitute a gross
misdemeanor and when such violation is by a person holding a license
under this chapter, the commission may cancel the license held by the
offender, and such cancellation shall operate as a forfeiture of all
rights and privileges granted by the commission and of all sums of
money paid to the commission by the offender; and the action of the
commission in that respect shall be final.
(3) The commission shall have power to exclude from any and all
race courses of the state of Washington any person whom the commission
deems detrimental to the best interests of racing or any person who
willfully violates any of the provisions of this chapter or of any
rule, regulation, or order issued by the commission.
(4) Every race meet held in this state contrary to the provisions
of this chapter is hereby declared to be a public nuisance.

--- END ---