BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.225
RCW to read as follows:
Whenever a juvenile fails to appear for a scheduled court hearing
under RCW 28A.225.035 and the court issues a bench warrant as a result,
the court shall also appoint an attorney to represent the juvenile if
one has not already been appointed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.225
RCW to read as follows:
Except for RCW 28A.225.030(5), the court may order that notice
required under this chapter be provided by means other than personal
service but only if personal service has been attempted but has been
unsuccessful, and service has then been attempted by certified mail but
returned as unclaimed and the court bases its decision on documents or
other information indicating that an alternative form of service is
more likely than not to reach the person to be notified. For purposes
of this section, "alternative form of service" means certified mail,
return receipt requested, or regular mail.

--- END ---