BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.39A RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall not contract with any home care agency, as
defined in RCW 70.127.010, that has been found by the department of
labor and industries or a court of competent jurisdiction to have
violated any provision of chapters 39.12, 49.46, and 49.48 RCW, unless
the department finds that denying a contract would seriously inhibit
the state's ability to provide vulnerable and elderly residents with
quality community-based home care or the agency's violation or
violations involved: (1) Very few employees; (2) a de minimus amount
of wages per affected employee; or (3) an incidental offense.

--- END ---