BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 88.16.010 and 2003 c 58 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board of pilotage commissioners of the state of Washington
is hereby created and shall consist of the assistant secretary of
marine ((transportation)) operations of the department of
transportation of the state of Washington, or the assistant secretary's
designee who shall be an employee of the marine division, who shall be
chairperson, the director of the department of ecology, or the
director's designee, and seven members appointed by the governor and
confirmed by the senate. Each of the appointed commissioners shall be
appointed for a term of four years from the date of the member's
commission. No person shall be eligible for appointment to the board
unless that person is at the time of appointment eighteen years of age
or over and a citizen of the United States and of the state of
Washington. Two of the appointed commissioners shall be pilots
licensed under this chapter and actively engaged in piloting upon the
waters covered by this chapter for at least three years immediately
preceding the time of appointment and while serving on the board. One
pilot shall be from the Puget Sound pilotage district and the other
pilot shall be from either the Grays Harbor pilotage district or the
Puget Sound pilotage district. Two of the appointed commissioners
shall be actively engaged in the ownership, operation, or management of
deep sea cargo and/or passenger carrying vessels for at least three
years immediately preceding the time of appointment and while serving
on the board. One of the shipping commissioners shall be a
representative of American and one of foreign shipping. One of the
commissioners shall be a representative from a recognized environmental
organization concerned with marine waters. The remaining commissioners
shall be persons interested in and concerned with pilotage, maritime
safety, and marine affairs, with broad experience related to the
maritime industry exclusive of experience as either a state licensed
pilot or as a shipping representative.
(2) Any vacancy in an appointed position on the board shall be
filled by the governor for the remainder of the unfilled term, subject
to confirmation by the senate.
(3) Five members of the board shall constitute a quorum. At least
one pilot, one shipping representative, and one public member must be
present at every meeting. All commissioners and the chairperson shall
have a vote.

Sec. 2 RCW 88.16.035 and 2006 c 53 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board of pilotage commissioners shall:
(a) Adopt rules, pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, necessary for the
enforcement and administration of this chapter;
(b)(i) Issue training licenses and pilot licenses to pilot
applicants meeting the qualifications provided for in RCW 88.16.090 and
such additional qualifications as may be determined by the board;
(ii) Establish a comprehensive training program to assist in the
training and evaluation of pilot applicants before final licensing; and
(iii) Establish additional training requirements, including a
program of continuing education developed after consultation with pilot
organizations, including those located within the state of Washington,
as required to maintain a competent pilotage service;
(c) Maintain a register of pilots, records of pilot accidents, and
other history pertinent to pilotage((, along with a roster of vessels,
agents, owners, operators, and masters necessary for the maintenance of
a roster of persons interested in and concerned with pilotage and
maritime safety));
(d) Determine from time to time the number of pilots necessary to
be licensed in each district of the state to optimize the operation of
a safe, fully regulated, efficient, and competent pilotage service in
each district;
(e) Annually fix the pilotage tariffs for pilotage services
performed aboard vessels as required by this chapter: PROVIDED, That
the board may fix extra compensation for extra services to vessels in
distress, for awaiting vessels, for all vessels in direct transit to or
from a Canadian port where Puget Sound pilotage is required for a
portion of the voyage, or for being carried to sea on vessels against
the will of the pilot, and for such other services as may be determined
by the board;
(f) File annually with the governor and the chairs of the
transportation committees of the senate and house of representatives a
report which includes, but is not limited to, the following: The
number, names, ((addresses,)) ages, pilot license number, training
license number, and years of service as a Washington licensed pilot of
any person licensed by the board as a Washington state pilot or
trainee; the names, employment, and other information of the members of
the board; the total number of pilotage assignments by pilotage
district, including information concerning the various types and sizes
of vessels and the total annual tonnage; the annual earnings or
stipends of individual pilots and trainees before and after deduction
for expenses of pilot organizations, including extra compensation as a
separate category; the annual expenses of private pilot associations,
including personnel employed and capital expenditures; the status of
pilotage tariffs, extra compensation, and travel; the retirement
contributions paid to pilots and the disposition thereof; the number of
groundings, ((mishaps)) marine occurrences, or other incidents which
are reported to or investigated by the board, and which are determined
to be accidents, as defined by the board, including the vessel name,
location of incident, pilot's or trainee's name, and disposition of the
case together with information received before the board acted from all
persons concerned, including the United States coast guard; the names,
qualifications, time scheduled for examinations, and the district of
persons desiring to apply for Washington state pilotage licenses;
summaries of dispatch records, quarterly reports from pilots, and the
bylaws and operating rules of pilotage organizations; the names, sizes
in deadweight tons, surcharges, if any, port of call, name of the pilot
or trainee, and names and horsepower of tug boats for any and all oil
tankers subject to the provisions of RCW 88.16.190 together with the
names of any and all vessels for which the United States coast guard
requires special handling pursuant to their authority under the Ports
and Waterways Safety Act of 1972; the expenses of the board; and any
and all other information which the board deems appropriate to include;
(g) ((Publish a manual which)) Make available information that
includes the pilotage act and other statutes of Washington state and
the federal government ((which)) that affect pilotage, including the
rules of the board, together with such additional information as may be
informative for pilots, agents, owners, operators, and masters((. Such
manual shall be distributed without cost to all pilots and governmental
agencies upon request. All other copies shall be sold for a five
dollar fee with proceeds to be credited to the pilotage account));
(h) Appoint advisory committees and employ marine experts as
necessary to carry out its duties under this chapter;
(i) Provide for the maintenance of efficient and competent pilotage
service on all waters covered by this chapter; and do such other things
as are reasonable, necessary, and expedient to insure proper and safe
pilotage upon the waters covered by this chapter and facilitate the
efficient administration of this chapter.
(2) The board may pay stipends to pilot trainees under subsection
(1)(b) of this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 88.16.070 and 1996 c 144 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every vessel not exempt under this section that operates in the
waters of the Puget Sound pilotage district or Grays Harbor pilotage
district is subject to compulsory pilotage under this chapter.
(1) A United States vessel on a voyage in which it is operating
exclusively on its coastwise endorsement, its fishery endorsement
(including catching and processing its own catch outside United States
waters and economic zone for delivery in the United States), and/or its
recreational (or pleasure) endorsement, and all United States and
Canadian vessels engaged exclusively in the coasting trade on the west
coast of the continental United States (including Alaska) and/or
British Columbia shall be exempt from the provisions of this chapter
unless a pilot licensed under this chapter be actually employed, in
which case the pilotage rates provided for in this chapter shall apply.
((However,))
(2) The board ((shall)) may, upon the written petition of any
interested party, and upon notice and opportunity for hearing, grant an
exemption from the provisions of this chapter to any vessel that the
board finds is (a) a small passenger vessel ((or yacht which)) that is
not more than five hundred gross tons (international), does not exceed
two hundred feet in overall length, and is operated exclusively in the
waters of the Puget Sound pilotage district and lower British Columbia,
or (b) a yacht that is not more than five hundred gross tons
(international) and does not exceed two hundred feet in overall length.
Such an exemption shall not be detrimental to the public interest in
regard to safe operation preventing loss of human lives, loss of
property, and protecting the marine environment of the state of
Washington. Such petition shall set out the general description of the
vessel, the contemplated use of same, the proposed area of operation,
and the name and address of the vessel's owner. The board shall
annually, or at any other time when in the public interest, review any
exemptions granted to this specified class of small vessels to insure
that each exempted vessel remains in compliance with the original
exemption. The board shall have the authority to revoke such exemption
where there is not continued compliance with the requirements for
exemption. The board shall maintain a file which shall include all
petitions for exemption, a roster of vessels granted exemption, and the
board's written decisions which shall set forth the findings for grants
of exemption. Each applicant for exemption or annual renewal shall pay
a fee, payable to the pilotage account. Fees for initial applications
and for renewals shall be established by rule, and shall not exceed one
thousand five hundred dollars. The board shall report annually to the
legislature on such exemptions.
(3) Every vessel not ((so)) exempt((,)) under subsection (1) or (2)
of this section shall, while navigating the Puget Sound and Grays
Harbor ((and Willapa Bay)) pilotage districts, employ a pilot licensed
under the provisions of this chapter and shall be liable for and pay
pilotage rates in accordance with the pilotage rates herein established
or which may hereafter be established under the provisions of this
chapter: PROVIDED, That any vessel inbound to or outbound from
Canadian ports is exempt from the provisions of this section, if said
vessel actually employs a pilot licensed by the Pacific pilotage
authority (the pilot licensing authority for the western district of
Canada), and if it is communicating with the vessel traffic system and
has appropriate navigational charts, and if said vessel uses only those
waters east of the international boundary line which are west of a line
which begins at the southwestern edge of Point Roberts then to Alden
Point (Patos Island), then to Skipjack Island light, then to Turn Point
(Stuart Island), then to Kellet Bluff (Henry Island), then to Lime Kiln
(San Juan Island) then to the intersection of one hundred twenty-three
degrees seven minutes west longitude and forty-eight degrees twenty-five minutes north latitude then to the international boundary. The
board shall correspond with the Pacific pilotage authority from time to
time to ensure the provisions of this section are enforced. If any
exempted vessel does not comply with these provisions it shall be
deemed to be in violation of this section and subject to the penalties
provided in RCW 88.16.150 as now or hereafter amended and liable to
pilotage fees as determined by the board. The board shall investigate
any accident on the waters covered by this chapter involving a Canadian
pilot and shall include the results in its annual report.

Sec. 4 RCW 88.16.090 and 2007 c 518 s 706 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person may pilot any vessel subject to this chapter on waters
covered by this chapter only if licensed to pilot such vessels on such
waters under this chapter.
(2)(a) A person is eligible to be licensed as a pilot or a pilot
trainee if the person:
(i) Is a citizen of the United States;
(ii) Is over the age of twenty-five years and under the age of
seventy years;
(iii) ((Is a resident of the state of Washington at the time of
licensure as a pilot;
(iv)))(A) Holds at the time of application, as a minimum, a United
States government license as master of steam or motor vessels of not
more than one thousand six hundred gross register tons (three thousand
international tonnage convention tons) upon oceans, near coastal
waters, or inland waters; or the then most equivalent federal license
as determined by the board; any such license to have been held by the
applicant for a period of at least two years before application;
(B) Holds at the time of licensure as a pilot, after successful
completion of the board-required training program, a first class United
States endorsement without restrictions on the United States government
license for the pilotage district in which the pilot applicant desires
to be licensed; however, all applicants for a pilot examination
scheduled to be given before July 1, 2008, must have the United States
pilotage endorsement at the time of application; and
(C) The board may ((establish such other)) require that applicants
and pilots have federal licenses ((requirements for applicants and
pilots )) and endorsements as it deems appropriate; and
(((v))) (iv) Successfully completes a board-specified training
program.
(b) In addition to the requirements of (a) of this subsection, a
pilot applicant must meet such other qualifications as may be required
by the board.
(c) A person applying for a license under this section shall not
have been convicted of an offense involving drugs or the personal
consumption of alcohol in the twelve months prior to the date of
application. This restriction does not apply to license renewals under
this section.
(3) The board may establish such other training license and pilot
license requirements as it deems appropriate.
(4) Pilot applicants shall be evaluated and may be ranked for entry
into a board-specified training program in a manner specified by the
board based on their ((experience, other qualifications as may be set
by the board,)) performance on a written examination or examinations
established by the board, ((and)) performance ((in such)) on other
evaluation exercises as may be required by the board, ((for entry into
a board-specified training program)) and other criteria or
qualifications as may be set by the board.
When the board determines that the demand for pilots requires entry
of an applicant into the training program it shall issue a training
license to that applicant, but under no circumstances may an applicant
be issued a training license more than four years after taking the
written entry examination. The training license authorizes the trainee
to do such actions as are specified in the training program.
After the completion of the training program the board shall
evaluate the trainee's performance and knowledge. The board, as it
deems appropriate, may then issue a pilot license, delay the issuance
of the pilot license, deny the issuance of the pilot license, or
require further training and evaluation.
(5) The board may (a) appoint a special independent committee or
((may)) (b) contract with ((a firm)) private or governmental entities
knowledgeable and experienced in the development ((of professional
tests and evaluations for development and grading of the examinations
and other evaluation methods. Active licensed state pilots may be
consulted for the general development of any examinations and
evaluation exercises but shall have no knowledge of the specific
questions. The pilot members of the board may participate in the
grading of examinations)), administration, and grading of licensing
examinations or simulator evaluations for marine pilots, or (c) do
both. Active, licensed pilots designated by the board may participate
in the development, administration, and grading of examinations and
other evaluation exercises. If the board does appoint a special
examination or evaluation development committee, it is authorized to
pay the members of the committee the same compensation and travel
expenses as received by members of the board. Any person who willfully
gives advance knowledge of information contained on a pilot examination
or other evaluation exercise is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
(6) This subsection applies to the review of a pilot applicant's
written examinations and evaluation exercises to qualify to be placed
on a waiting list to become a pilot trainee. Failure to comply with
the process set forth in this subsection renders the results of the
pilot applicant's written examinations and evaluation exercises final.
A pilot applicant may seek board review, administrative review, and
judicial review of the results of the written examinations and
evaluation exercises in the following manner:
(a) A pilot applicant who seeks a review of the results of his or
her written examinations or evaluation exercises must request from the
board-appointed or board-designated examination committee an
administrative review of the results of his or her written examinations
or evaluation exercises as set forth by board rule.
(b) The determination of the examination committee's review of a
pilot applicant's examination results becomes final after thirty days
from the date of service of written notification of the committee's
determination unless a full adjudicative hearing before an
administrative law judge has been requested by the pilot applicant
before the thirty-day period has expired, as set forth by board rule.
(c) When a full adjudicative hearing has been requested by the
pilot applicant, the board shall request the appointment of an
administrative law judge under chapter 34.12 RCW who has sufficient
experience and familiarity with pilotage matters to be able to conduct
a fair and impartial hearing. The hearing shall be governed by
chapter 34.05 RCW. The administrative law judge shall issue an initial
order.
(d) The initial order of the administrative law judge is final
unless within thirty days of the date of service of the initial order
the board or pilot applicant requests review of the initial order
under chapter 34.05 RCW.
(e) The board may appoint a person to review the initial order and
to prepare and enter a final order as governed by chapter 34.05 RCW and
as set forth by board rule. The person appointed by the board under
this subsection (6)(e) is called the board reviewing officer.
(7) Pilots are licensed under this section for a term of five years
from and after the date of the issuance of their respective state
licenses. Licenses must thereafter be renewed as a matter of course,
unless the board withholds the license for good cause. Each pilot
shall pay to the state treasurer an annual license fee in an amount set
by the board by rule. The fees established under this subsection may
be increased in excess of the fiscal growth factor as provided in RCW
43.135.055 through the fiscal year ending June 30, 2009. The fees must
be deposited in the ((state treasury to the credit of the)) pilotage
account. The board may assess partially active or inactive pilots a
reduced fee.
(((7))) (8) All pilots and ((applicants)) pilot trainees are
subject to an annual physical examination by a physician chosen by the
board. The physician shall examine the ((applicant's)) pilot's or
pilot trainee's heart, blood pressure, circulatory system, lungs and
respiratory system, eyesight, hearing, and such other items as may be
prescribed by the board. After consultation with a physician and the
United States coast guard, the board shall establish minimum health
standards to ensure that pilots and pilot trainees licensed by the
state are able to perform their duties. Within ninety days of the date
of each annual physical examination, and after review of the
physician's report, the board shall make a determination of whether the
pilot or ((applicant)) pilot trainee is fully able to carry out the
duties of a pilot or pilot trainee under this chapter. The board may
in its discretion check with the appropriate authority for any
convictions of or information regarding offenses by a licensed pilot or
pilot trainee involving drugs or the personal consumption of alcohol in
the prior twelve months.
(((8))) (9) The board may require vessel simulator training for a
pilot ((applicant)) trainee and shall require vessel simulator training
for a licensed pilot subject to RCW 88.16.105. The board shall also
require vessel simulator training in the first year of active duty for
a new pilot and at least once every five years for all active pilots.
(((9))) (10) The board shall prescribe, pursuant to chapter 34.05
RCW, such reporting requirements and review procedures as may be
necessary to assure the accuracy and validity of license and service
claims. Willful misrepresentation of such required information by a
pilot applicant shall result in disqualification of the pilot
applicant.

Sec. 5 RCW 88.16.100 and 1990 c 116 s 28 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board shall have power on its own motion or, in its
discretion, upon the written request of any interested party, to
investigate the performance of pilotage services subject to this
chapter and to issue a reprimand, impose a fine against a pilot in an
amount not to exceed five thousand dollars, suspend, withhold, or
revoke the license of any pilot, or any combination of the above, for
misconduct, incompetency, inattention to duty, intoxication, or failure
to perform his duties under this chapter, or violation of any of the
rules or regulations provided by the board for the government of
pilots. The board may partially or totally stay any disciplinary
action authorized in this subsection and subsection (2) of this
section. The board shall have the power to require that a pilot
satisfactorily complete a specific course of training or treatment.
(2) In all instances where a pilot licensed under this chapter
performs pilot services on a vessel exempt under RCW 88.16.070, the
board may on its own motion, or in its discretion upon the written
request of any interested party, investigate whether the services were
performed in a professional manner consistent with sound maritime
practices. If the board finds that the pilotage services were
performed in a manner that constitutes an act of incompetence,
misconduct, or negligence so as to endanger life, limb, or property, or
violated or failed to comply with state laws or regulations intended to
promote marine safety or to protect navigable waters, the board may
issue a reprimand, impose a fine against a pilot in an amount not to
exceed five thousand dollars, suspend, withhold, or revoke the state
pilot license, or any combination of the above. The board shall have
the power to require that a pilot satisfactorily complete a specific
course of training or treatment.
(3) The board shall implement a system of specified disciplinary
actions or corrective actions, including training or treatment, that
will be taken when a state licensed pilot in a specified period of time
has had multiple disciplinary actions taken against the pilot's license
pursuant to subsections (1) and (2) of this section. In developing
these disciplinary or corrective actions, the board shall take into
account the cause of the disciplinary action and the pilot's previous
record.
(4) The board shall immediately review the pilot's license of a
pilot who has been ((convicted within the prior twelve months of))
charged with any offense involving drugs or the personal consumption of
alcohol while on duty, including an offense of operation of a vehicle
or vessel while under the influence of alcohol or drugs. After a
hearing held pursuant to subsection (5) of this section:
(a) The board shall order a pilot who has been found to have been
convicted ((within the prior twelve months)) of an offense involving
drugs or the personal consumption of alcohol while on duty and who has
not been convicted of another offense involving drugs or the personal
consumption of alcohol in the previous five years to actively
participate in and satisfactorily complete a specific program of
treatment. The board may impose other sanctions it determines are
appropriate. If the pilot does not satisfactorily complete the program
of treatment, the board shall suspend, revoke, or withhold the pilot's
license until the treatment is completed; and
(b) The board shall suspend for ((up to)) not less than one year
the license of a pilot found to have been convicted ((within the prior
twelve months)) of a second or subsequent offense involving drugs or
the personal consumption of alcohol while on duty.
(5) When the board determines that reasonable cause exists to issue
a reprimand, impose a fine, suspend, revoke, or withhold any pilot's
license or require training or treatment under subsection (1), (2), or
(4) of this section, it shall ((forthwith)) prepare and personally
serve upon such pilot a notice advising him or her of the board's
intended action, the specific grounds ((therefor)) for the action, and
the right to request a hearing to challenge the board's action. The
pilot shall have thirty days from the date on which notice is served to
request a full hearing before an administrative law judge on the issue
of the reprimand, fine, suspension, revocation, or withholding of his
or her pilot's license, or requiring treatment or training. The
board's proposed reprimand, fine, suspension, revocation, or
withholding of a license, or requiring treatment or training shall
become final upon the expiration of thirty days from the date notice is
served, unless a hearing has been requested prior to that time. When
a hearing is requested, the board shall request the appointment of an
administrative law judge under chapter 34.12 RCW who has sufficient
experience and familiarity with pilotage matters to be able to conduct
a fair and impartial hearing. The hearing shall be governed by the
provisions of Title 34 RCW. All final decisions of the administrative
law judge shall be subject to review by the superior court of the state
of Washington for Thurston county ((or)), by the superior court of the
county in which the pilot maintains his or her residence or principal
place of business, or by the superior court of the county in which the
board maintains its office, to which court any case with all the papers
and proceedings therein shall be immediately certified by the
administrative law judge if requested to do so by any party to the
proceedings at any time within thirty days after the date of any such
final decision. No appeal may be taken after the expiration of thirty
days after the date of final decision. Any case so certified to the
superior court shall be tried de novo and after certification of the
record to said superior court the proceedings shall be had as in a
civil action. Moneys collected from fines under this section shall be
deposited in the pilotage account.
(6) The board shall have the power, on an emergency basis, to
temporarily suspend a state pilot's license: (a) When a pilot has been
involved in any vessel accident where there has been major property
damage, loss of life, or loss of a vessel, or (b) where there is a
reasonable cause to believe that a pilot has diminished mental capacity
or is under the influence of drugs, alcohol, or other substances, when
in the opinion of the board, such an accident or physical or mental
impairment would significantly diminish that pilot's ability to carry
out pilotage duties and that the public health, safety, and welfare
requires such emergency action. The board shall make a determination
within seventy-two hours whether to continue the suspension. The board
shall develop rules for exercising this authority including procedures
for the chairperson or vice-chairperson of the board to temporarily
order such suspensions, emergency meetings of the board to consider
such suspensions, the length of suspension, opportunities for hearings,
and an appeal process. The board shall develop rules under chapter
34.05 RCW.
(7) The board shall immediately notify the United States coast
guard that it has revoked or suspended a license pursuant to this
section and that a suspended or revoked license has been reinstated.

Sec. 6 RCW 88.16.102 and 1979 ex.s. c 207 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
The license of ((all pilots shall be)) a pilot is terminated upon
the pilot reaching the age of seventy((: PROVIDED, That all pilots
licensed as of September 1, 1979 may continue piloting and hold
licenses until May 1, 1982)).

Sec. 7 RCW 88.16.103 and 1986 c 122 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Pilots and pilot trainees, after completion of an assignment or
assignments which are seven hours or longer in duration, shall receive
a mandatory rest period of seven hours.
(2) A pilot or pilot trainee shall refuse a pilotage assignment if
the pilot or pilot trainee is physically or mentally fatigued or if the
pilot or pilot trainee has a reasonable belief that the assignment
cannot be carried out in a competent and safe manner. Upon refusing an
assignment ((as herein provided)) under this subsection, a pilot or
pilot trainee shall submit a written explanation to the board within
forty-eight hours. If the board finds that the pilot's or pilot
trainee's written explanation is without merit, or reasonable cause did
not exist for the assignment refusal, such pilot or pilot trainee may
be subject to the provisions of RCW 88.16.100.
(3) The board shall quarterly review the dispatch records of pilot
organizations or pilot's quarterly reports to ensure the provisions of
this section are enforced. The board may prescribe rules for rest
periods pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 8 RCW 88.16.105 and 1991 c 200 s 1003 are each amended to
read as follows:
The board shall prescribe, pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, rules
governing the size and type of vessels which a newly licensed pilot may
be assigned to pilot on the waters of this state and whether the
assignment involves docking or undocking a vessel. The rules shall
also prescribe required familiarization trips before a newly licensed
pilot may pilot a larger or different type of vessel. ((Such rules
shall be for the first five-year period in which pilots are actually
employed.))

Sec. 9 RCW 88.16.107 and 1977 ex.s. c 337 s 15 are each amended
to read as follows:
Any pilot or pilot trainee licensed pursuant to this chapter may
appear or testify before the legislature or board of pilotage
commissioners and no person shall place any sanction against said pilot
or pilot trainee for having testified or appeared.

Sec. 10 RCW 88.16.110 and 2001 c 36 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every pilot licensed under this chapter shall file with the
board not later than the tenth day of January, April, July, and October
of each year a report for the preceding quarter. ((Said)) The report
shall contain an account of all moneys received for pilotage by him or
her or by any other person for the pilot or on the pilot's account or
for his or her benefit. ((Said)) The report shall state the name of
each vessel piloted, the amount charged to and/or collected from each
vessel, the port of registry of such vessel, its dead weight tonnage,
whether it was inward or outward bound, whether the amount so received,
collected, or charged is in full payment of pilotage, and ((such))
other information as the board shall prescribe by ((regulation
prescribe)) rule. The board may from time to time require additional
information as it deems necessary.
(2) The report shall include information for each vessel that
suffers a grounding, collision, or other major marine casualty that
occurred while the pilot was on duty during the reporting period. The
report shall also include information on near miss incidents as defined
in RCW 88.46.100. Information concerning near miss incidents provided
pursuant to this section shall not be used for imposing any sanctions
or penalties. The board shall forward information provided under this
subsection to the department of ecology for inclusion in the collision
reporting system established under RCW 88.46.100.

Sec. 11 RCW 88.16.118 and 2005 c 123 s 2 and 2005 c 26 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) A ((ship's)) pilot licensed to act as such by the state of
Washington, and any countywide port district located partly or entirely
within the Grays Harbor pilotage district as defined by RCW
88.16.050(2) authorized to provide pilotage services with pilots
employed by or under contract with the port district, shall not be
liable for damages in excess of the amount of five thousand dollars for
damages or loss occasioned by a pilot's or pilot trainee's errors,
omissions, fault, or neglect in the performance of pilotage or pilot
training services, except as may arise by reason of the willful
misconduct or gross negligence of ((a)) the pilot.
(b) A pilot trainee licensed to act as such by the state of
Washington is not liable for damages in excess of the amount of five
thousand dollars for damages or loss occasioned by the pilot trainee's
errors, omissions, fault, or neglect in the performance of pilotage or
pilot training services, except as may arise by reason of the willful
misconduct or gross negligence of the pilot trainee.
(2) When a pilot or pilot trainee boards a vessel to provide
pilotage services, that pilot or pilot trainee becomes a servant of the
vessel and its owner and operator. Nothing in this section exempts the
vessel, its owner, or its operator from liability for damage or loss
occasioned by that ship to a person or property on the ground that
(((1))) (a) the ship was piloted by a Washington state licensed pilot
or pilot trainee, or (((2))) (b) the damage or loss was occasioned by
the error, omission, fault, or neglect of a Washington state licensed
pilot or pilot trainee.
(3) Pilots, pilot trainees, and board members are immune from civil
liability to any party for damages or other relief that is in any way
based on the communication of, to a pilot or pilot trainee, to the
board, or to any other appropriate governmental authority or person,
any of the following: (a) Information about any incident or occurrence
involving collision, allision, or grounding of any vessel, including
near-miss occurrences; (b) information about any other marine
occurrence that the pilot or pilot trainee believes involved or
involves undue risk in the navigation of any vessel that could result
in damage to any person, vessel, structure, aid to navigation, or the
marine environment of this state; or (c) any report or other written,
oral, or electronic evaluation of the performance of any pilot or pilot
trainee. "Performance" includes, but is not limited to, professional
ability, attitude, performance of duties, effort, knowledge, skills,
and other relevant factors. This protection and immunity does not
apply when a pilot or pilot trainee intentionally releases or discloses
information known to be false. The immunity granted to a person under
this section is in addition to any common law or statutory privilege or
immunity enjoyed by the person, and this section is not intended to
abrogate or modify any such common law or statutory privilege or
immunity. The immunity from civil liability provided under this
section shall be liberally construed to accomplish the purposes of this
chapter and to encourage the free flow of information and opinions to
the board.

Sec. 12 RCW 88.16.135 and 1987 c 485 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any ((steamship company or)) ship operator or ship husbanding agent
may submit a request in writing to the board that a particular pilot
not be assigned to pilot that company's vessels. The request shall be
based on specific safety concerns of the ((steamship company or)) ship
operator or ship husbanding agent.
The board shall notify interested persons and hold a hearing on
that request, and either approve or disapprove the request. If the
request is approved, the board shall notify the affected pilot and give
the pilot a specific list of vessels for which that pilot shall not
provide pilotage services.

Sec. 13 RCW 88.16.155 and 1977 ex.s. c 337 s 11 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The master of any vessel which employs a Washington licensed
pilot shall certify on a form prescribed by the board of pilotage
commissioners that the vessel complies with:
(a) Such provisions of the United States coast guard regulations
governing the safety and navigation of vessels in United States waters,
as codified in Title 33 of the code of federal regulations, as the
board may prescribe; and
(b) The provisions of current international agreements governing
the safety, radio equipment, and pollution of vessels and other matters
as ratified by the United States Senate and prescribed by the board.
(2) The master of any vessel which employs a Washington licensed
pilot shall be prepared to produce, and any Washington licensed pilot
employed by a vessel shall request to see, certificates of the vessel
which certify and indicate that the vessel complies with subsection (1)
of this section and the rules of the board promulgated pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section.
(3) If the master of a vessel which employs a Washington licensed
pilot cannot certify that the vessel complies with subsection (1) of
this section and the rules of the board adopted pursuant to subsection
(1) of this section, the master shall certify that:
(a) The vessel will comply with subsection (1) of this section
before the time the vessel is scheduled to leave the waters of
Washington state; and
(b) The coast guard captain of the port was notified of the
noncomplying items when they were determined; and
(c) The coast guard captain of the port has authorized the vessel
to proceed under such conditions as prescribed by the coast guard
pursuant to its authority under federal statutes and regulations.
(4) After the board has prescribed the form required under
subsection (1) of this section, no Washington licensed pilot shall
offer pilotage services to any vessel on which the master has failed to
make a certification required by this section. If the master fails to
make a certification the pilot shall:
(a) Disembark from the vessel as soon as safely practicable; and
(b) Immediately inform the ((port)) coast guard captain of the port
of the conditions and circumstances by the best possible means; and
(c) Forward a written report to the board no later than twenty-four
hours after disembarking from the vessel.
(5) Any Washington licensed pilot who offers pilotage services to
a vessel on which the master has failed to make a certification
required by this section or the rules of the board adopted under this
section shall be subject to RCW 88.16.150, as now or hereafter amended,
and RCW 88.16.100, as now or hereafter amended.
(6) The board shall revise the requirements enumerated in this
section as necessary to reflect changes in coast guard regulations,
federal statutes, and international agreements. All actions of the
board under this section shall comply with chapters 34.05 and 42.30
RCW. The board shall prescribe the time of and method for retention of
forms which have been signed by the master of a vessel in accordance
with the provisions of this section.
(7) This section shall not apply to the movement of dead ships.
The board shall prescribe pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, after
consultation with the coast guard and interested persons, for the
movement of dead ships and the certification process thereon.

Sec. 14 RCW 88.16.200 and 1991 c 200 s 603 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any vessel designed for the purpose of carrying as its cargo
liquefied natural or ((propane)) liquefied petroleum gas shall adhere
to the provisions of RCW 88.16.190(2) as though it were an oil tanker.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A new section is added to chapter 88.16 RCW
to read as follows:
A master, pilot, or pilot trainee who deviates from the provisions
of this chapter or Title 363 WAC in order to comply with any federal or
international law or treaty, such as 46 U.S.C. Sec. 2304 et seq., or
any other provision of law of the state, or who deviates in order to
ensure the safety of the vessel or its crew under the control of the
master, pilot, or pilot trainee, shall submit a pilot's report of
marine safety occurrence as prescribed by the board of pilotage
commissioners in WAC 363-116-200 in the case of a near-miss occurrence.
If the deviation occurred while the vessel was operating under the
control of a pilot or pilot trainee licensed in this state, then the
report must be submitted by the pilot or pilot trainee with input
provided by the master. The report must describe the circumstances
leading to the deviation from the provisions of this chapter and the
consequences of that deviation. If the consequences of the deviation
include an incident as defined in WAC 363-116-200, then the pilot's
report of marine safety occurrence must be submitted in addition to any
reports required as a result of the incident. The board shall
investigate the circumstances surrounding the deviation and, if the
facts of the situation so warrant, may waive enforcement action against
the master, pilot, or pilot trainee if the board finds that the
deviation was: Taken in order to comply with any other law that may
have precedence; required by the ordinary practice of seamen; or
justified by the special circumstances of the case.

Sec. 16 RCW 34.05.514 and 2001 c 220 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) ((and (3))) through (4)
of this section, proceedings for review under this chapter shall be
instituted by paying the fee required under RCW 36.18.020 and filing a
petition in the superior court, at the petitioner's option, for (a)
Thurston county, (b) the county of the petitioner's residence or
principal place of business, or (c) in any county where the property
owned by the petitioner and affected by the contested decision is
located.
(2) For proceedings involving institutions of higher education, the
petition shall be filed either in the county in which the principal
office of the institution involved is located or in the county of a
branch campus if the action involves such branch.
(3) For proceedings conducted by the pollution control hearings
board pursuant to chapter 43.21B RCW or as otherwise provided in RCW
90.03.210(2) involving decisions of the department of ecology on
applications for changes or transfers of water rights that are the
subject of a general adjudication of water rights that is being
litigated actively under chapter 90.03 or 90.44 RCW, the petition must
be filed with the superior court conducting the adjudication, to be
consolidated by the court with the general adjudication. A party to
the adjudication shall be a party to the appeal under this chapter only
if the party files or is served with a petition for review to the
extent required by this chapter.
(4) For proceedings involving appeals of examinations or evaluation
exercises of the board of pilotage commissioners under chapter 88.16
RCW, the petition must be filed either in Thurston county or in the
county in which the board maintains its principal office.

Sec. 17 RCW 88.16.061 and 1967 c 15 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
The account in the general fund designated in RCW 43.79.330(17) as
the "Puget Sound pilotage account" is hereby redesignated as the
"pilotage account".
The pilotage account is hereby redesignated as a nonappropriated
account, and is therefore created in the custody of the state
treasurer. All receipts designated, credited, or transferred to the
pilotage account must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from
the account may be used only for the purposes of the board of pilotage
commissioners as prescribed under this chapter. Only the board or the
board's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The
account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but
an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

Sec. 18 RCW 43.79.330 and 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
All moneys to the credit of the following state funds on the first
day of August, 1955, and all moneys thereafter paid to the state
treasurer for or to the credit of such funds, are hereby transferred to
the following accounts in the state treasury, the creation of which is
hereby authorized:
(1) Capitol building construction fund moneys, to the capitol
building construction account;
(2) Cemetery ((fund)) account moneys, to the cemetery account;
(3) Feed and fertilizer fund moneys, to the feed and fertilizer
account;
(4) Forest development fund moneys, to the forest development
account;
(5) Harbor improvement fund moneys, to the harbor improvement
account;
(6) Millersylvania Park current fund moneys, to the Millersylvania
Park current account;
(7) ((Puget Sound pilotage fund moneys, to the Puget Sound pilotage
account;
(8))) Real estate commission fund moneys, to the real estate
commission account;
(((9))) (8) Reclamation revolving fund moneys, to the reclamation
revolving account;
(((10))) (9) University of Washington building fund moneys, to the
University of Washington building account; and
(((11))) (10) State College of Washington building fund moneys, to
the Washington State University building account.

Sec. 19 RCW 43.84.092 and 2007 c 514 s 3, 2007 c 513 s 1, 2007 c
484 s 4, and 2007 c 356 s 9 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate
share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily
balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search
and rescue account, the budget stabilization account, the capitol
building construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the Columbia river basin water supply development
account, the common school construction fund, the county arterial
preservation account, the county criminal justice assistance account,
the county sales and use tax equalization account, the data processing
building construction account, the deferred compensation administrative
account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of
licensing services account, the department of retirement systems
expense account, the developmental disabilities community trust
account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking water
assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the education construction fund, the education legacy trust
account, the election account, the energy freedom account, the
essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital
projects account, the federal forest revolving account, the ferry bond
retirement fund, the freight congestion relief account, the freight
mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account,
the grade crossing protective fund, the health services account, the
public health services account, the health system capacity account, the
personal health services account, the high capacity transportation
account, the state higher education construction account, the higher
education construction account, the highway bond retirement fund, the
highway infrastructure account, the highway safety account, the high-occupancy toll lanes operations account, the industrial insurance
premium refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial
retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal
account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate
excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical
aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the motor vehicle
fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the multimodal
transportation account, the municipal criminal justice assistance
account, the municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the
natural resources deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the
pension funding stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and
maintenance account, ((the pilotage account,)) the public employees'
retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement
system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities
construction loan revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public
health supplemental account, the public transportation systems account,
the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital
construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the
Puyallup tribal settlement account, the real estate appraiser
commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional
mobility grant program account, the resource management cost account,
the rural arterial trust account, the rural Washington loan fund, the
safety and education account, the site closure account, the small city
pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C account, the
special wildlife account, the state employees' insurance account, the
state employees' insurance reserve account, the state investment board
expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund
accounts, the state patrol highway account, the supplemental pension
account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system
combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control
account, the tobacco settlement account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the
transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership
account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tuition recovery trust
fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University
of Washington building account, the urban arterial trust account, the
volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension
principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers'
administrative fund, the Washington fruit express account, the
Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety
employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state
health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement
account, the Washington State University building account, the
Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution
control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital
projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the
agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the
permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the
state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective
beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 20 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2007 c 523 s 5, 2007 c 357 s 21, and
2007 c 214 s 14 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the foster care scholarship endowment fund, the foster care
endowed scholarship trust fund, the students with dependents grant
account, the basic health plan self-insurance reserve account, the
contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined
fund drive account, the commemorative works account, the Washington
international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the developmental
disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account, the fair fund,
the family leave insurance account, the fruit and vegetable inspection
account, the future teachers conditional scholarship account, the game
farm alternative account, the GET ready for math and science
scholarship account, the grain inspection revolving fund, the juvenile
accountability incentive account, the law enforcement officers' and
firefighters' plan 2 expense fund, the local tourism promotion account,
the pilotage account, the produce railcar pool account, the regional
transportation investment district account, the rural rehabilitation
account, the stadium and exhibition center account, the youth athletic
facility account, the self-insurance revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide
abatement account, the children's trust fund, the Washington horse
racing commission Washington bred owners' bonus fund account, the
Washington horse racing commission class C purse fund account, the
individual development account program account, the Washington horse
racing commission operating account (earnings from the Washington horse
racing commission operating account must be credited to the Washington
horse racing commission class C purse fund account), the life sciences
discovery fund, the Washington state heritage center account, and the
reading achievement account. However, the earnings to be distributed
shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's
service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right-of-way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 Sections 17 through 20 of this act take
effect July 1, 2009.

--- END ---