BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
protect residents of this state from catastrophic health costs and
ensure access to meaningful preventive health care. The program
established by this chapter establishes a program that provides such
care to all residents of this state not enrolled in medicare, veterans'
benefits, TRICARE, CHAMPUS, FEHBP, or other federal government
programs, or who are confined or reside in a government-operated
institution.
The legislature finds that such a program will help ensure the
financial security of all residents of this state by providing broad
pooling of catastrophic health care costs.
The legislature finds that lack of preventive and catastrophic
coverage can adversely affect the health of residents of Washington.
The legislature further finds that a significant percentage of the
population of this state does not have reasonably available insurance
or other coverage for the costs of necessary preventive and
catastrophic health care. This lack of health care is detrimental to
the health of individuals lacking coverage and to the public welfare,
and results in substantial expenditures for emergency and remedial
health care, often at the expense of health care providers, health care
facilities, and all purchasers of health care, including the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Allowed charges" means those expenses incurred by covered
persons for medically necessary expenses based on the terms and
conditions of the program, as defined by the board.
(2) "Assessment" means that amount due and payable from employers
and employees to fund the program.
(3) "Authority" means the state health care authority established
in chapter 41.05 RCW.
(4) "Board" means the guaranteed health benefits board created in
section 7 of this act.
(5) "Carrier" or "participating carrier" means a disability
insurance company regulated under chapter 48.20 or 48.21 RCW, a health
care service contractor as defined in RCW 48.44.010, and a health
maintenance organization as defined in RCW 48.46.020. Carrier also
includes any self-funded program that may be created by the authority
under this chapter and any entity that offers to participate in the
program even if that entity is not otherwise subject to regulation
under Title 48 RCW.
(6) "CHAMPUS" means the civilian health and medical program of the
uniformed services.
(7) "Code" means the internal revenue code, as codified in Title 26
U.S.C., as amended.
(8) "Commissioner" means the Washington state insurance
commissioner.
(9) "Competitive bid process" means a documented formal process
providing an equal and open opportunity to qualified carriers and
culminating in a selection based on criteria that may include such
factors as the carrier's fees or costs, ability, capacity, experience,
reputation, responsiveness to time limitations, responsiveness to
solicitation requirements, quality of previous performance, or
compliance with statutes and rules relating to contracts or services.
(10) "Coverage year" means a calendar year, unless the authority
adopts a different twelve-month period.
(11) "Creditable coverage" means the period an individual was
covered under a group or individual health plan or insurance in another
state or through an otherwise excluded plan of health care coverage
that provided benefits similar to or more comprehensive than those
offered by the program for at least three months without a break in
coverage of more than sixty-three days.
(12) "Employee" includes common law employees and leased employees
of an employer.
(13) "Employer" or "business entity" means any business having
employees that are permanent residents of this state who are subject to
medicare tax. Employer includes all of the following forms of
business: Partnerships, subchapter "c" and "s" corporations, nonprofit
organizations, governmental entities, limited liability corporations or
partnerships, and sole proprietorships.
(14) "FEHBP" means the federal employees health benefits program.
(15) "Medical assistance" or "medicaid" means coverage under Title
XIX of the federal social security act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq., as
amended) and chapter 74.09 RCW.
(16) "Medicare" means coverage under Title XVIII of the social
security act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395 et seq., as amended).
(17) "Permanent residence" means the place where a person lives
with the intent to make it a fixed and permanent home. For purposes of
this chapter, it has the same meaning as "domicile."
(18) "Permanent resident" means a person who permanently resides in
Washington. Persons with homes in more than one state are considered
permanent residents of this state if they intend to make Washington
their permanent home and reside in this state for at least six months
each year. A person is not a permanent resident if he or she remains
away from this state for more than six consecutive months and does not
intend to make Washington his or her permanent home.
(19) "Preexisting condition" means any medical condition, illness,
or injury that existed prior to the effective date of coverage.
(20) "Program" means the guaranteed health benefit program created
in this chapter.
(21) "Resident" means a person living in a particular locality in
the state of Washington. Confinement of a person in a nursing home,
hospital, or other institution by itself is not sufficient to qualify
a person as a resident.
(22) "Wages" means wages subject to medicare tax.
(23) "Wellness program" or "wellness activity" means a bona fide,
explicit program of an activity, such as but not limited to smoking
cessation, injury and accident prevention, reduction of alcohol misuse,
appropriate weight reduction, exercise, automobile and motorcycle
safety, blood cholesterol reduction, or nutrition education for the
purpose of improving enrollee health status and reducing health service
costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The guaranteed health benefit program is
created.
(1) On the effective date of this section, and except as set forth
in this section, every person who has permanently resided in Washington
state for at least six months, and all children born in this state on
or after the effective date of this section who live with an eligible
resident parent or legal guardian, are enrolled in the program.
(2)(a) Persons moving to this state after the effective date of
this section who provide satisfactory evidence of permanent residency
in this state to the authority must be enrolled into the program.
(b) Any person moving to this state after the effective date of
this section who cannot provide evidence of creditable coverage is
eligible for the program, upon satisfactory evidence of permanent
residency, after six months of permanent residency. However, no
preexisting condition will be covered until the person has permanently
resided in Washington for twelve months.
(3) Persons enrolled in the state's medicaid managed-care program
are eligible for the program. However, persons enrolled in the state's
medicaid fee-for-service program are not eligible.
(4) Persons not eligible for the program include persons who are:
(a) Enrolled in both parts A and B of medicare;
(b) Enrolled in federal government programs such as but not limited
to medicare, veterans' administration benefits, TRICARE, CHAMPUS, and
FEHBP; or
(c) Confined or reside in a government-operated institution.
(5) Persons who disenroll from federal health care programs or who
cease to reside in a government-operated institution must be registered
with a participating carrier based on rules adopted by the authority.
(6) Each person must be covered as an individual.
(7) Coverage continues in force as long as the person permanently
resides in this state.
(8) Participating carriers shall accept every eligible person
immediately upon receipt of a completed registration form, subject to
reasonable verification of eligibility, as established by the authority
by rule.
(9) The authority shall adopt standards for implementing this
section by rule, including evidence of permanent residency and
creditable coverage and procedures for registering with participating
carriers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Except as provided in this section, all
participating carriers must accept any eligible person that registers
for coverage with the carrier as long as the person resides in the area
in which the carrier is contracted to offer coverage.
(2) If a person chooses a different carrier during an open
enrollment period for the following coverage year, the prior carrier
must cooperate with the new carrier and the eligible person during
transition of coverage.
(3) Upon request of a covered person during an open enrollment
period, a participating carrier must continue coverage for a covered
person:
(a) Unless the covered person commits a fraud against the program
or the carrier;
(b) Unless the covered person no longer resides in the
participating carrier's contracted area;
(c) Unless the covered person is no longer eligible to participate
in the program, such as if the person establishes permanent residency
in another state; or
(d) For other conditions as the authority may adopt by rule.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) With respect to coverage for persons
eligible for the program on the effective date of this section and who
become eligible thereafter, there is no limitation or exclusion of
benefits relating to a preexisting condition because the condition was
present or expected before the date of eligibility for coverage,
whether or not any medical advice, diagnosis, care, or treatment was
recommended or received before that date.
(2) Benefits for persons moving to Washington after the effective
date of this section may not be excluded or limited for any preexisting
condition that occurred more than twelve months prior to the date the
person first establishes permanent residency in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The program shall be funded by assessments
as provided for in this section.
(1)(a) Every employer operating in Washington is required to pay an
assessment to finance the program.
(b) The employer assessment is calculated as follows:
(i) Three percent up to five hundred thousand dollars of wages;
(ii) Four percent over five hundred thousand dollars of wages and
up to one million dollars of wages; and
(iii) Five percent over one million dollars of wages.
(2) Employees shall pay a flat assessment equal to one percent of
their wages subject to medicare tax.
(3) Washington residents earning wages in another state shall pay
a flat assessment equal to two percent of such wages subject to
medicare tax.
(4) Assessments must be collected by the department of revenue and
deposited in the guaranteed benefit program trust account established
in section 22 of this act.
(a) Moneys in the account must be used to pay participating
carriers at a rate determined annually by the board after conclusion of
a competitive bidding process and to pay the necessary and appropriate
expenses associated with administration of the program.
(b) Assessments also may be used to establish such reserves as are
deemed necessary or appropriate by the board for any self-funded plan
that may be established by the board.
(5) The board may not incur any liabilities or obligations beyond
the extent to which funds have been allocated by the legislature.
(a) If the board determines that the assessment will not generate
sufficient funds to pay for the program's benefits, the board must
present options to the legislature to raise revenue, lower costs, or
both.
(b) In presenting options to the legislature, the board must
consider reducing covered benefits, increasing the attachment point,
changing the residency requirement for persons moving into the state,
or implementing cost-saving measures in order to administer the program
within the allocated budget. However, universal eligibility for the
program for permanent residents as provided for by this chapter may not
be abridged.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The guaranteed health benefits board is
established to govern the program as set forth in this section.
(1) The governor shall appoint nine members to the board who shall
represent: The general public; health care providers, including health
care facilities; carriers; business, both large and small business
entities; and labor.
(2)(a) The original members of the board must be appointed for
intervals of one to three years. Thereafter, all board members serve
a term of three years.
(b) Appointed members of the board are eligible for reappointment.
(c) Board members serve without compensation, except that they may
be reimbursed for travel expenses pursuant to RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.
(d) The board must adopt a plan of operation, bylaws, and other
governing documents as may be necessary to ensure the fair, reasonable,
and equitable operation of the board.
(e) Meetings of the board are subject to the open public meetings
act, chapter 42.30 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The board shall determine the schedule of
benefits for the program and establish a schedule of allowed charges
for any self-funded arrangement, including a list of expenses that are
covered or excluded under the program.
(1) Preventive benefits. Scheduled benefits for preventive care
must include annual examinations, cancer screenings, immunizations, and
other benefits the board determines to cover, taking into account
recommendations of the United States preventive services task force,
and must include at least one annual dental care visit.
(2) Catastrophic benefits. Catastrophic coverage must include
coverage for medically necessary care after a covered person incurs
allowed charges, as determined by the board, in excess ten thousand
dollars during a coverage year.
(3) Mandated benefits, services, included providers, and patient
bill of rights protections. The schedule of benefits adopted by the
board must include all mandated benefits and mandated offerings in
force as of the effective date of this section, as well as all state
statutes and rules regarding patient rights and carrier contracting
with categories of providers, including the state's grievance and
appeals requirements and a person's right to request an independent
review of medical necessity decisions made by a carrier, as provided in
RCW 43.70.235, 48.43.500 through 48.43.535, 48.43.545, 48.43.550,
70.02.045, 70.02.110, and 70.02.900.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The authority shall administer, supervise,
and manage the program.
(1) The authority shall adopt administrative cost savings plans and
incentives designed to reduce the administrative burdens of carriers,
providers, and the program.
(2) The authority shall develop a plan for contracting with
participating carriers that:
(a) Rewards health outcomes rather than simply paying for
particular procedures;
(b) Pays for health care that reflects patient preference and is of
proven value; and
(c) Calls for the use of evidence-based standards of care where
available.
(3) The authority may appoint technical or advisory committees
whose members serve without compensation for their services but may be
reimbursed for their travel expenses, as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.
(4) The authority may adopt rules to administer the program,
including but not limited to rules that establish procedures for
appeals of eligibility decisions, establish appeals procedures for
enforcement actions and other purposes the authority determines are
necessary for the efficient and effective administration of the
program, and ensure that all covered persons receive quality health
care and that all covered services are medically necessary and
efficacious, cost-effective, and reasonable in relation to the services
delivered.
(5) The authority may appoint a medical director and other staff
the authority determines are necessary or appropriate to fulfill the
responsibilities and duties necessary for the administration of the
program.
(6)(a) The authority may contract with private entities or enter
into interagency agreements with public agencies to provide technical
or professional assistance or assist in the administration of the
program.
(b) Any such contractor is prohibited from releasing, publishing,
or otherwise using any information made available to it under its
contractual responsibility without specific permission of the
authority.
(7) The authority may apply for, receive, and accept grants, gifts,
and other payments, including property and service, from any
governmental or other public or private entity or person and may make
arrangements for the use of these receipts, including the undertaking
of special studies and other projects relating to health care costs or
access to health care.
(8) The authority shall develop and implement a plan to publicize
the existence of the program and maintain public awareness of the
program and shall publicize open enrollment options for eligible
persons.
(9) The authority shall review all publications of carriers related
to the program for compliance with applicable state and federal
requirements.
(10) The authority shall report to the board on all operations of
the program, prepare an annual budget, and manage the administrative
expenses of the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 By July 1, 2010, the authority shall
establish a program for accepting enrollment registration forms for
receipt of services from participating carriers, with the intent that
the first coverage year begin January 1, 2011.
(1) Eligible persons may register with any participating carrier
that offers program coverage where the person resides.
(2) Eligible persons who do not register with a carrier before the
first day of a coverage year must be assigned to a participating
carrier through a rotational system to be established and managed by
the authority.
(3) Registration with a participating carrier must be for the
entire coverage year except as may be established by the authority by
rule.
(4) Parents or legal guardians may register their dependents.
(5) Students attending school in another state may continue program
coverage under rules adopted by the authority.
(6) Eligibility for the program ceases the first day of the month
following establishment of permanent residency in another state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Benefits must be provided by carriers
selected by the authority after completion of a competitive bid process
through one or more contracts with carriers.
(1) All participating carriers must be in good standing with the
office of insurance commissioner.
(2) The rates charged by carriers must be negotiated by the
authority and approved by the board. Rates may not change more
frequently than annually.
(3) Payment to participating carriers must be by a capitated
arrangement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 In order to ensure availability of program
coverage throughout the entire state and choice for program enrollees,
one or more self-funded arrangements may be offered in areas of the
state if the authority determines that fewer than two options for
enrollment will be available to eligible enrollees in any coverage
year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Rates for program benefits shall be based
on a single community-rated risk pool. Rates paid to participating
carriers, including any self-funded arrangement, must be risk adjusted
annually based on experience during the most recent prior year for
which statistics related to rates and risk are available and applied to
the rates charged by a participating carrier for the next succeeding
coverage year.
(1) Every carrier that participates in the program must submit to
the authority, or to a third party at the direction of the authority,
all information deemed necessary for risk assessment and adjustment
calculations, including demographic and claims data.
(2) Carriers that do not participate in the program in later years
shall provide all necessary data to the authority, or to a third party
at the direction of the authority, for the carrier's years of
participation in the program.
(3) All claims data related to the program are the property of the
state.
(4) The authority shall adopt rules to establish and manage risk
adjustment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 (1) The authority shall conduct an annual
open enrollment period for the program of no fewer than thirty days
each twelve-month period during which any person may choose to change
participating carriers for the following coverage year.
(2) The authority shall establish by rule standards by which a
person may change participating carriers at times other than during the
annual open enrollment period.
(a) A person may not be registered with more than one participating
carrier at the same time.
(b) When changing carriers, there must be no overlap and no gap in
an enrollee's coverage.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 It is the express intent of this chapter
that the program be secondary to all amounts paid or payable through
any worker's compensation coverage, automobile medical payment, or
liability insurance whether provided on the basis of fault or nonfault,
and by any hospital or medical benefits paid or payable under or
provided pursuant to any federal law or program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 Participating carriers shall file reports
with the authority in a format, manner, and time designated by the
authority by rule.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 The insurance commissioner has authority
over the solvency of participating carriers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 The privacy protections of chapters 48.43
and 70.02 RCW and the federal health insurance portability and
accountability act (45 C.F.R. 160 et seq.) apply to all contracts
issued to participating carriers and all actions of the board, the
authority, the commissioner, and the secretary of the department of
social and health services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 The legislature recognizes that every
individual possesses a fundamental right to exercise his or her
religious beliefs and conscience. The legislature further recognizes
that in developing public policy, conflicting religious and moral
beliefs must be respected. The state also recognizes the right of
individuals enrolled in the program to receive the full range of
services covered under the program. Therefore:
(1) No person may be required by law or contract to participate in
the provision of or payment for a specific service if the person
objects to doing so for reason of conscience or religion.
(2) The authority shall establish a mechanism to recognize the
right to exercise conscience while ensuring enrollees have timely
access to services and ensuring prompt payment to service providers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 (1) All persons appointed by participating
carriers to assist in the choosing of and registering with a carrier,
other than persons providing only ministerial duties and employees of
any agency of the state, must be appropriately licensed by the
commissioner as producers and must comply with the requirements of
chapter 48.17 RCW.
(2) When an eligible person is assisted in choosing and registering
with a participating carrier by a licensed producer, the carrier chosen
by the enrollee must pay the producer a commission.
(a) The amount of the commission must be set forth in a rule
adopted by the authority.
(b) When establishing the amount of the commission, the authority
must consider the rates of commission paid to producers by carriers for
health plans other than this program.
(c) Preference in commission rates may be given to producers who
assist with enrollment of eligible persons who reside in rural or
underserved areas of the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 Employers must make information developed
by the authority about the program and open enrollment available to
their employees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 (1) The guaranteed benefit program trust
account is established in the custody of the state treasurer. All
receipts from the deposit of assessments, reserves, dividends, and
refunds must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the
account may be used only for payment of premiums to participating
carriers and operating expenses of the program.
(a) Expenditures from the account must be disbursed by the state
treasurer by warrants on vouchers authorized by the authority.
(b) Moneys in the account, including unanticipated revenues under
RCW 43.79.270, may be spent only after allocation.
(2) The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.
(3) The authority must keep full and adequate records and accounts
of the assets, obligations, transactions, and affairs of the program
created under this chapter.
(4) The state investment board shall act as the investor for the
funds and, except as provided in RCW 43.33A.160 and 43.84.160, one
hundred percent of all earnings from these investments must accrue
directly to the fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 (1) The guaranteed benefit program reserve
trust account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All
receipts from reserves established for self-funded benefits, if any,
must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may
only be used for the establishment of appropriate reserves, payment of
benefits for eligible enrollees, and operating expenses of any self-
funded program. Only the authority may authorize expenditures from the
account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.
(2) The account is subject to the examination requirements of
chapter 48.03 RCW as if the program were a domestic insurer. In
conducting this examination, the commissioner is authorized to
determine the adequacy of the reserves established for the program.
(3) The authority shall file periodic statements of the financial
condition, transactions, and affairs of any self-funded option
established under the program established under this section in a form
and manner prescribed by the commissioner. A copy of the annual
statement must be filed with the speaker of the house of
representatives and the president of the senate within four months
after the end of the coverage year.

Sec. 24 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2007 c 523 s 5, 2007 c 357 s 21, and
2007 c 214 s 14 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the foster care scholarship endowment fund, the foster care
endowed scholarship trust fund, the students with dependents grant
account, the basic health plan self-insurance reserve account, the
contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined
fund drive account, the commemorative works account, the Washington
international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the developmental
disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account, the fair fund,
the family leave insurance account, the fruit and vegetable inspection
account, the future teachers conditional scholarship account, the game
farm alternative account, the GET ready for math and science
scholarship account, the grain inspection revolving fund, the
guaranteed benefit program reserve trust account, the guaranteed
benefit program trust account, the juvenile accountability incentive
account, the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 expense
fund, the local tourism promotion account, the produce railcar pool
account, the regional transportation investment district account, the
rural rehabilitation account, the stadium and exhibition center
account, the youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance
revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide abatement account, the children's
trust fund, the Washington horse racing commission Washington bred
owners' bonus fund account, the Washington horse racing commission
class C purse fund account, the individual development account program
account, the Washington horse racing commission operating account
(earnings from the Washington horse racing commission operating account
must be credited to the Washington horse racing commission class C
purse fund account), the life sciences discovery fund, the Washington
state heritage center account, and the reading achievement account.
However, the earnings to be distributed shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW
43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right-of-way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 The state auditor shall examine the records
of the program every second year, or more frequently upon request of
the board, and may recommend methods of accounting and the rendering of
periodic reports of projects undertaken by the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 A new section is added to chapter 42.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The following information is exempt from disclosure under this
chapter:
(a) Records obtained by or on file with any carrier or the
authority containing information concerning the medical history or
treatment of any person, a person's financial information, and a
person's social security number;
(b) Actuarial formula, statistics, and assumptions submitted in
support of or in response to a request for proposals as part of a
competitive bid or submitted to or at the request of the authority; and
(c) Actuarial formulas, statistics, cost and utilization data, or
other proprietary information submitted upon request of the authority
may be withheld at any time from public inspection when necessary to
preserve trade secrets or prevent unfair competition.
(2) When soliciting proposals for the purpose of awarding contracts
for goods or services related to the program, the authority, upon
written request of the bidder, shall exempt from public inspection and
copying such proprietary data, trade secrets, or other information
contained in the bidder's proposal that relate to the bidder's unique
methods of conducting business or of determining prices or premium
rates to be charged for services under terms of the proposal.
(3) The definitions in section 2 of this act apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 (1) The secretary of the department of
social and health services shall seek all necessary waivers or
amendments needed for full implementation of the program and shall seek
to obtain federal reimbursements for all eligible persons who enroll in
the program.
(2) The secretary of the department of social and health services
shall report to the governor, the legislature, the commissioner, and
the authority on the status of federal reimbursement and requests for
waivers or amendments. This includes any waiver requested or granted
by the federal department of health and human services under section
1115 of the social security act or such other waivers or amendments as
the secretary may determine are necessary.
(3) The secretary of the department of social and health services
shall consult with the board and other interested parties prior to
submission of waivers and amendments to the federal department of
health and human services.
(4) Rules adopted under the authority of this chapter must meet
federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of
federal funds by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29 (1) The commissioner shall study and report
on whether to retain, eliminate, or change the Washington state health
insurance pool, created in chapter 48.41 RCW, after full implementation
of this program. The final report must be submitted to the governor
and appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1st of a year
that is no later than two years after the first registration occurs.
(2) The report must consider the following:
(a) The economic impact to the pool of implementing the program;
(b) The potential impact to residents of eliminating or changing
the pool;
(c) Alternatives for coverage for existing members of the pool and
persons who might require access to the pool for coverage to supplement
the program if the pool were eliminated;
(d) The potential for cost savings to the state, residents,
providers, and facilities, and carriers by eliminating or changing the
pool;
(e) Alternative approaches to changing or winding down the pool;
and
(f) Any other factors the commissioner determines are relevant to
the question of whether the Washington state health insurance pool
should be retained, eliminated, or changed.
(3) In preparation of the report, the commissioner shall consult
with relevant parties, such as but not limited to the board and the
authority, the state office of financial management, the Washington
state health insurance pool board, carriers, providers (including
facilities), consumers, business, and labor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 30 The authority shall report to the governor
and to the legislature on the effects of the program no later than
December 1st of a year that is no later than five years after full
implementation of the program and every odd-numbered year thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 31 The commissioner, the authority, and the
secretary of the department of social and health services may adopt
such rules as are necessary or desirable to implement this act.

Sec. 32 RCW 70.47.020 and 2007 c 259 s 35 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Washington basic health plan" or "plan" means the system of
enrollment and payment for basic health care services, administered by
the plan administrator through participating managed health care
systems, created by this chapter.
(2) "Administrator" means the Washington basic health plan
administrator, who also holds the position of administrator of the
Washington state health care authority.
(3) "Health coverage tax credit program" means the program created
by the Trade Act of 2002 (P.L. 107-210) that provides a federal tax
credit that subsidizes private health insurance coverage for displaced
workers certified to receive certain trade adjustment assistance
benefits and for individuals receiving benefits from the pension
benefit guaranty corporation.
(4) "Health coverage tax credit eligible enrollee" means individual
workers and their qualified family members who lose their jobs due to
the effects of international trade and are eligible for certain trade
adjustment assistance benefits; or are eligible for benefits under the
alternative trade adjustment assistance program; or are people who
receive benefits from the pension benefit guaranty corporation and are
at least fifty-five years old.
(5) "Managed health care system" means: (a) Any health care
organization, including health care providers, insurers, health care
service contractors, health maintenance organizations, or any
combination thereof, that provides directly or by contract basic health
care services, as defined by the administrator and rendered by duly
licensed providers, to a defined patient population enrolled in the
plan and in the managed health care system; or (b) a self-funded or
self-insured method of providing insurance coverage to subsidized
enrollees provided under RCW 41.05.140 and subject to the limitations
under RCW 70.47.100(7).
(6) "Subsidized enrollee" means:
(a) An individual, or an individual plus the individual's spouse or
dependent children:
(i) Who is not eligible for medicare;
(ii) Who is not confined or residing in a government-operated
institution, unless he or she meets eligibility criteria adopted by the
administrator;
(iii) Who is not a full-time student who has received a temporary
visa to study in the United States;
(iv) Who resides in an area of the state served by a managed health
care system participating in the plan;
(v) Whose gross family income at the time of enrollment does not
exceed ((two)) three hundred percent of the federal poverty level as
adjusted for family size and determined annually by the federal
department of health and human services; and
(vi) Who chooses to obtain basic health care coverage from a
particular managed health care system in return for periodic payments
to the plan; and
(b) An individual who meets the requirements in (a)(i) through (iv)
and (vi) of this subsection and who is a foster parent licensed under
chapter 74.15 RCW and whose gross family income at the time of
enrollment does not exceed three hundred percent of the federal poverty
level as adjusted for family size and determined annually by the
federal department of health and human services((; and
(c) To the extent that state funds are specifically appropriated
for this purpose, with a corresponding federal match, an individual, or
an individual's spouse or dependent children, who meets the
requirements in (a)(i) through (iv) and (vi) of this subsection and
whose gross family income at the time of enrollment is more than two
hundred percent, but less than two hundred fifty-one percent, of the
federal poverty level as adjusted for family size and determined
annually by the federal department of health and human services)).
(7) "Nonsubsidized enrollee" means an individual, or an individual
plus the individual's spouse or dependent children: (a) Who is not
eligible for medicare; (b) who is not confined or residing in a
government-operated institution, unless he or she meets eligibility
criteria adopted by the administrator; (c) who is accepted for
enrollment by the administrator as provided in RCW 48.43.018, either
because the potential enrollee cannot be required to complete the
standard health questionnaire under RCW 48.43.018, or, based upon the
results of the standard health questionnaire, the potential enrollee
would not qualify for coverage under the Washington state health
insurance pool; (d) who resides in an area of the state served by a
managed health care system participating in the plan; (e) who chooses
to obtain basic health care coverage from a particular managed health
care system; and (f) who pays or on whose behalf is paid the full costs
for participation in the plan, without any subsidy from the plan.
(8) "Subsidy" means the difference between the amount of periodic
payment the administrator makes to a managed health care system on
behalf of a subsidized enrollee plus the administrative cost to the
plan of providing the plan to that subsidized enrollee, and the amount
determined to be the subsidized enrollee's responsibility under RCW
70.47.060(2).
(9) "Premium" means a periodic payment, which an individual, their
employer or another financial sponsor makes to the plan as
consideration for enrollment in the plan as a subsidized enrollee, a
nonsubsidized enrollee, or a health coverage tax credit eligible
enrollee.
(10) "Rate" means the amount, negotiated by the administrator with
and paid to a participating managed health care system, that is based
upon the enrollment of subsidized, nonsubsidized, and health coverage
tax credit eligible enrollees in the plan and in that system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 33 This chapter may be known and cited as the
guaranteed health benefit program act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 34 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 35 Sections 1 through 23, 25, 27 through 31,
33, and 34 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 36 The secretary of state shall submit this
act to the people for their adoption and ratification, or rejection, at
the next general election to be held in this state, in accordance with
Article II, section 1 of the state Constitution and the laws adopted to
facilitate its operation.

--- END ---