BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that as more
requirements are put in place for buildings to be more energy
efficient, the more work there will be retrofitting those buildings
with solar panels, insulation, and other weatherizing materials. The
legislature further finds that blue collar, stepping-stone jobs are
leaving the economy without being replaced with equivalent jobs.
Therefore, the legislature intends to create a green collar jobs
training program that focuses on underprivileged youth.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Washington energy efficiency worker training program is
created within the department. The program shall help individuals,
including at-risk youth, seeking employment pathways out of poverty and
into economic self-sufficiency prepare for jobs in the energy-efficient
building, construction, and retrofit industries. The program must
provide occupational skills training in the energy-efficient building,
construction, and retrofit industries. The occupational skills
training may include curriculum development, on-the-job training,
classroom training, and safety and health training. The program may
include internship programs in fields related to energy efficiency and
renewable energy. The department, in collaboration with the workforce
training and education coordinating board, the Washington state
building and construction trades council, and the Washington state
apprenticeship and training council, shall adopt rules to implement the
program.
(2) The board shall provide an interim report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2010, and a final report
by December 1, 2012, detailing the effectiveness and any
recommendations for the energy efficiency worker training program
established in subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act expires June 30, 2013.

--- END ---