BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.72.030 and 2007 c 150 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislative authority of each county having shellfish tidelands
within its boundaries is authorized to establish a shellfish protection
district to include areas in which nonpoint pollution threatens the
water quality upon which the continuation or restoration of shellfish
farming or harvesting is dependent. The legislative authority shall
constitute the governing body of the district and shall adopt a
shellfish protection program with elements and activities to be
effective within the district. The legislative authority may appoint
a local advisory council to advise the legislative authority in
preparation and implementation of shellfish protection programs. This
program shall include any elements deemed appropriate to deal with the
nonpoint pollution threatening water quality over shellfish tidelands,
including, but not limited to, requiring the elimination or decrease of
contaminants in storm water runoff, establishing monitoring,
inspection, and repair elements to ensure that on-site sewage systems
are adequately maintained and working properly, assuring that animal
grazing and manure management practices are consistent with best
management practices, and establishing educational and public
involvement programs to inform citizens on the causes of the
threatening nonpoint pollution and what they can do to decrease the
amount of such pollution. The county legislative authority shall
consult with the department of health, the department of ecology, the
department of agriculture, or the conservation commission as
appropriate as to the elements of the program. An element may be
omitted where another program is effectively addressing those sources
of nonpoint water pollution. Within the limits of RCW 90.72.040 and
90.72.070, the county legislative authority shall have full
jurisdiction and authority to manage, regulate, and control its
programs and to fix, alter, regulate, and control the fees for services
provided and charges or rates as provided under those programs.
Programs established under this chapter, may, but are not required to,
be part of a system of sewerage as defined in RCW 36.94.010.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.72.045 and 2007 c 150 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The county legislative authority shall create a shellfish
protection district and establish a shellfish protection program
developed under RCW 90.72.030 or an equivalent program to address the
causes or suspected causes of pollution within one hundred eighty days
after the department of health, because of water quality degradation
due to ongoing nonpoint sources of pollution has closed or downgraded
the classification of a recreational or commercial shellfish growing
area within the boundaries of the county. The county legislative
authority shall initiate implementation of the shellfish protection
program within sixty days after it is established.
A copy of the program must be provided to the departments of
health, ecology, and agriculture. An agency that has regulatory
authority for any of the sources of nonpoint pollution covered by the
program shall cooperate with the county in its implementation. The
county legislative authority shall submit a written report to the
department of health annually that describes the status and progress of
the program. If rates or fees are collected under RCW 90.72.070 for
implementation of the shellfish protection district program, the annual
report shall provide sufficient detail of the expenditure of the
revenue collected to ensure compliance with RCW 90.72.070.

Sec. 3 RCW 90.72.070 and 1992 c 100 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The county legislative authority establishing a shellfish
protection district may finance the protection program through (1)
county tax revenues, (2) reasonable inspection fees and similar fees
for services provided, (3) reasonable charges or rates specified in its
protection program, or (4) federal, state, or private grants.
((Confined animal feeding operations subject to the national pollutant
discharge elimination system and implementing regulations shall not be
subject to fees, rates, or charges by a shellfish protection
district.)) A dairy animal feeding operation with a certified dairy
nutrient management plan as required in chapter 90.64 RCW shall be
subject to fees, rates, or charges by a shellfish protection district
of no more than five hundred dollars in a calendar year. Facilities
permitted and assessed fees for wastewater discharge under the national
pollutant discharge elimination system shall not be subject to fees,
rates, or charges for wastewater discharge by a shellfish protection
district. Lands classified as forest land under chapter 84.33 RCW and
timber land under chapter 84.34 RCW shall not be subject to fees,
rates, or charges by a shellfish protection district. Counties may
collect charges or rates in the manner determined by the county
legislative authority.

--- END ---