BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 19.27 RCW
to read as follows:
The charge under this chapter for permits for specialty
agricultural buildings constructed on a commercial agricultural
operation may not exceed seventy-five dollars. Specialty agricultural
structures are those that are designed and constructed to house farm
equipment, hay, grain, poultry, livestock, or other horticultural
products. Human habitation, public use, and employment where
agricultural products are processed, treated, or packaged are not
permitted uses of a specialty agricultural building. For the purposes
of this section, "commercial agricultural operation" means an operation
that generates an average of at least ten thousand dollars gross income
per year from the sale of agricultural products.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.27.100 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 8 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
Except as provided in section 1 of this act, nothing in this
chapter shall prohibit a city, town, or county of the state from
imposing fees different from those set forth in the state building
code.

--- END ---