BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that while state and
local governments invest billions of dollars per year in infrastructure
development and rehabilitation through numerous programs, there is no
overall strategy guiding our state's infrastructure investments. The
legislature also finds that the state often undertakes significant new
policy initiatives that impact how infrastructure funds are spent,
without identifying funding needs or sources necessary to achieve the
policy objectives. Therefore, the legislature finds that a statewide
infrastructure investment strategy is necessary to provide policy
direction for our infrastructure investments and to identify
sufficient, reliable, and sustainable funding for infrastructure
investments that will help the state achieve its policy priorities and
help local governments carry out regulatory mandates resulting from
those priorities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The legislative committee on a statewide
infrastructure investment strategy created in section 4 of this act is
directed to develop a ten-year statewide infrastructure investment
strategy to provide policy direction for state infrastructure
investments and identify sufficient and sustainable funding for
investments needed to implement policy initiatives of the state. The
strategy must provide the following:
(1) Identify the state's financial responsibility for
infrastructure investment necessary to achieve the state's policy goals
and regulatory obligations placed on local government resulting from
such policy goals over the next ten years relating to:
(a) Basic infrastructure;
(b) Housing to accommodate growth;
(c) Economic development;
(d) Transportation mobility and congestion relief;
(e) Parks and recreational facilities;
(f) Open space and the environment;
(g) K-12 and higher education;
(h) Community development and arts facilities;
(i) Historic and cultural sites;
(j) Criminal justice and public safety; and
(k) Flood control facilities;
(2) Identify appropriate funding sources and forecasted revenues
during the next ten years for infrastructure investments identified in
categories outlined in subsection (1)(a) through (k) of this section,
including analysis of funding requests in state grant and loan programs
relative to available funding;
(3) In the event available funding falls short of identified need,
identify potential new funding sources to meet the ten-year funding
need;
(4) Determine whether existing state infrastructure funding
programs appropriately reflect and support the achievement of the
state's policy goals and regulatory obligations placed on local
governments for the infrastructure categories identified in subsection
(1)(a) through (k) of this section;
(5) Make appropriate recommendations for either restructuring state
infrastructure funding assistance programs or creating new programs, or
both, to help meet state policy goals and obligations. Recommendations
must include criteria necessary for eligibility to receive funding
assistance for each state infrastructure funding assistance program;
and
(6) The legislative committee on a statewide infrastructure
investment strategy must prioritize a work plan for the categories
listed in subsection (1)(a) through (k) of this section and include
findings from studies that complement the work plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The legislative committee on a statewide
infrastructure investment strategy created in section 4 of this act
must work with the office of financial management, in cooperation with
the department of community, trade, and economic development, the
department of ecology, and the department of health, to develop a plan
for reorganizing infrastructure assistance programs into an improved
infrastructure investment system. The implementation plan must
identify opportunities for the system to:
(1) Increase access to program information and applications;
(2) Coordinate program investments to ensure all budget and tax
support from all state sources is disclosed;
(3) Promote strategic investments aligned with state policy goals;
(4) Provide effective and efficient program administration;
(5) Suggest changes in statutes to accomplish the plan; and
(6) Estimate costs to implement the plan.
The implementation plan must be delivered to the governor and the
appropriate legislative committees by November 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The legislative committee on a statewide
infrastructure investment strategy is created. The committee consists
of three members from each caucus in both the senate and the house of
representatives, for a total of twelve members.
(2) The legislative committee on a statewide infrastructure
investment strategy must produce a progress report by December 1, 2008,
and recommendations for legislative action in 2009, for review by the
appropriate standing committees of the legislature. During 2009, the
committee must create appropriate task forces including appropriate
stakeholders as necessary on identified priorities in section 2(1) of
this act in order to develop the final report. The final report must
be completed and submitted to the senate, the house of representatives,
and the office of financial management by December 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act expires December 1, 2009.

--- END ---