BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 4.56.250 and 1986 c 305 s 301 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((As used in this section, the following terms have the
meanings indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Economic damages" means objectively verifiable monetary
losses, including medical expenses, loss of earnings, burial costs,
loss of use of property, cost of replacement or repair, cost of
obtaining substitute domestic services, loss of employment, and loss of
business or employment opportunities.
(b) "Noneconomic damages" means subjective, nonmonetary losses,
including, but not limited to pain, suffering, inconvenience, mental
anguish, disability or disfigurement incurred by the injured party,
emotional distress, loss of society and companionship, loss of
consortium, injury to reputation and humiliation, and destruction of
the parent-child relationship.
(c) "Bodily injury" means physical injury, sickness, or disease,
including death.
(d) "Average annual wage" means the average annual wage in the
state of Washington as determined under RCW 50.04.355.
(2) In no action seeking damages for personal injury or death may
a claimant recover a judgment for noneconomic damages exceeding an
amount determined by multiplying 0.43 by the average annual wage and by
the life expectancy of the person incurring noneconomic damages, as the
life expectancy is determined by the life expectancy tables adopted by
the insurance commissioner. For purposes of determining the maximum
amount allowable for noneconomic damages, a claimant's life expectancy
shall not be less than fifteen years. The limitation contained in this
subsection applies to all claims for noneconomic damages made by a
claimant who incurred bodily injury. Claims for loss of consortium,
loss of society and companionship, destruction of the parent-child
relationship, and all other derivative claims asserted by persons who
did not sustain bodily injury are to be included within the limitation
on claims for noneconomic damages arising from the same bodily injury.
(3) If a case is tried to a jury, the jury shall not be informed of
the limitation contained in subsection (2) of this section.)) Exemplary
damages may be recoverable in a civil action if it is proven by a
preponderance of the evidence that the party against whom exemplary
damages are sought has acted with reckless and wanton disregard for the
health, safety, and welfare of another.
(2) Damages awarded on a final and enforceable judgment under
subsection (1) of this section are subject to a fifty percent
reallocation as provided under this subsection. The fifty percent
reallocation shall be distributed as follows: (a) Twenty-five percent
shall be provided to the state general fund for the department of
social and health services to fund services to children who are
dependent as provided under chapter 13.34 RCW and their families; and
(b) twenty-five percent shall be provided to the state general fund for
the department of corrections to fund community custody, community
placement, and postrelease supervision of offenders as provided in
chapter 9.94A RCW.
(3) This section does not apply to a civil action against the state
or its representatives or agents, or a unit of local government or its
representatives or agents.

--- END ---