BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the requirements of this section, an amount equal to
the estimated taxes collected under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW on the
sale or use of tangible personal property incorporated into, and labor
and services rendered in respect to, the construction of a qualified
port terminal, less estimated amounts of any local taxes that are
credited against the state sales and use taxes, shall be distributed to
a county or city within which a qualified port terminal is located.
(2) To receive distributions under this section, the city or county
must:
(a) Submit an application to the department of community, trade,
and economic development prior to the initiation of construction of the
port terminal. The application shall be in a form and manner required
by the department of community, trade, and economic development, but
must include information that verifies that: (i) The construction of
the port terminal is reasonably estimated to exceed one hundred fifty
million dollars; and (ii) the date construction of the port terminal is
expected to be completed. The department of community, trade, and
economic development shall rule on the application within forty-five
days and must notify the department of all approved applications;
(b) Submit an expenditure plan to the department of community,
trade, and economic development within one hundred twenty days of the
submittal of the application under (a) of this subsection. The plan
must be developed in consultation with any port authorities, tribal
governments, or other local governments in close proximity to the
proposed project as well as private entities involved with the
qualified port terminal's development and operation. The plan must
specify the use of funds distributed under this section, subject to (c)
of this subsection. The department of community, trade, and economic
development shall notify the city or county of any deficiencies in the
expenditure plan within ninety days of the plan's submittal;
(c) Use any distributions under this section exclusively for public
infrastructure needs related to the qualified port terminal including,
but not limited to: Street and road construction necessary to access
and service the new terminal; rail construction necessary to access and
service the new terminal; water and sewer system construction;
construction of facilities for emergency services; construction of
storm water and drainage management systems; and environmental impact
mitigation.
(3) The department of community, trade, and economic development
must approve applications under this section only if it determines with
a high degree of certainty that the qualified port terminal would be
adding new jobs to the state of Washington, and that a collective
bargaining agreement between the operators of the qualified terminal
and organized labor is in place regarding the business operations to be
conducted at the qualified terminal.
(4) An entity constructing a qualified port terminal that will
benefit from the public infrastructure built using distributions under
this section must comply with the provisions of chapter 39.12 RCW in
constructing the qualified port terminal.
(5)(a) A port district or other person contracting for the
construction of a qualified port terminal or any portion of a qualified
port terminal must provide the city or county within whose jurisdiction
the qualified port terminal is located, if the city or county is
approved for distributions under this section, with documentation
necessary to determine the amounts of distributions under this section,
upon request of the city or county. Such documentation must include
copies of construction contracts, tax returns, and other documents
showing the amounts of sales and use taxes paid in respect to the
construction of the qualified port terminal.
(b) Annually, by March 31st, cities or counties approved for
distributions under this section must provide such information to the
department, as the department deems necessary, to determine the amount
of the distributions under this section. Such information must be
provided to the department in a form and manner required by the
department. The department may request assistance from the department
of community, trade, and economic development in determining the
distributions under this section. The department must give cities and
counties eligible for distributions under this section notice of the
department's determination of the distribution amounts at least thirty
days before the distributions under this section are required to be
made under (c) of this subsection.
(c) The department must notify the state treasurer of the amounts
to be distributed under this section. Funds must be distributed to a
city or county by July 1st of each year, beginning in the state fiscal
year following the fiscal year in which initiation of construction of
the port terminal begins. The state treasurer may not distribute funds
under this section for construction occurring after the date of
completion specified in subsection (2)(a)(ii) of this section has
elapsed; however, the department of community, trade, and economic
development may extend the date of completion for good cause shown.
Distributions under this section are final. Errors in amounts
distributed that are discovered after the distributions have been made
may not be corrected.
(6) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section.
(a) "Port terminal" means a facility for cargo related maritime
activities.
(b) "Qualified port terminal" means a port terminal constructed
after the effective date of this act that is reasonably estimated to
cost over one hundred fifty million dollars to construct, built
primarily with private investment, and located within thirty air miles
of a major port terminal located outside of the United States.
(7) Only one project may be selected by the department of
community, trade, and economic development under the terms of this
section. Upon final distribution of funds related to the single
project, the department of community, trade, and economic development
must submit a report to the legislature. The report must describe the
details of the project, its overall economic development impact to the
region, and an estimate of new construction and longshoremen jobs
created because of the project. The department must also evaluate the
funding mechanism for public infrastructure utilized in this section
and make recommendations on whether it could be used to benefit other
projects for economic development purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act expires June 30, 2018.

--- END ---