BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.129.005 and 1994 c 214 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature recognizes that long-term and intermediate care
facilities are a critical part of the state's long-term care services
system. It is the intent of the legislature that individuals who
reside in long-term and intermediate care facilities receive
appropriate services, be treated with courtesy, and continue to enjoy
their basic civil and legal rights.
It is also the intent of the legislature that long-term care
facility and intermediate care facility for the mentally retarded
residents have the opportunity to exercise reasonable control over life
decisions. The legislature finds that choice, participation, privacy,
and the opportunity to engage in religious, political, civic,
recreational, and other social activities foster a sense of self-worth
and enhance the quality of life for ((long-term care)) residents.
The legislature finds that the public interest would be best served
by providing the same basic resident rights in all long-term and
intermediate care settings. Residents in nursing facilities are
guaranteed certain rights by federal law and regulation, 42 U.S.C.
1396r and 42 C.F.R. part 483. It is the intent of the legislature to
extend those basic rights to residents in veterans' homes, boarding
homes, ((and)) adult family homes, and intermediate care facility for
the mentally retarded.
The legislature intends that a facility should care for its
residents in a manner and in an environment that promotes maintenance
or enhancement of each resident's quality of life. A resident should
have a safe, clean, comfortable, and homelike environment, allowing the
resident to use his or her personal belongings to the extent possible.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.129.007 and 1994 c 214 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
The rights set forth in this chapter are the minimal rights
guaranteed to all residents of long-term and intermediate care
facilities, and are not intended to diminish rights set forth in other
state or federal laws that may contain additional rights.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.129.010 and 1997 c 392 s 203 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Department" means the department of state government
responsible for licensing the provider in question.
(2) "Facility" means a long-term care facility or an intermediate
care facility for the mentally retarded.
(3) "Long-term care facility" means a facility that is licensed or
required to be licensed under chapter 18.20, 72.36, or 70.128 RCW.
(4) "Intermediate care facility for the mentally retarded" means an
intermediate care facility certified by the department of social and
health services and/or by the federal department of health and human
services to provide residential care under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396d(d).
(5) "Resident" means the individual receiving services in a long-term care facility or an intermediate care facility for the mentally
retarded, that resident's attorney-in-fact, guardian, or other legal
representative acting within the scope of their authority.
(((5))) (6) "Physical restraint" means a manual method, obstacle,
or physical or mechanical device, material, or equipment attached or
adjacent to the resident's body that restricts freedom of movement or
access to his or her body, is used for discipline or convenience, and
not required to treat the resident's medical symptoms.
(((6))) (7) "Chemical restraint" means a psychopharmacologic drug
that is used for discipline or convenience and not required to treat
the resident's medical symptoms.
(((7))) (8) "Representative" means a person appointed under RCW
7.70.065.
(((8))) (9) "Reasonable accommodation" by a facility to the needs
of a prospective or current resident has the meaning given to this term
under the federal Americans with disabilities act of 1990, 42 U.S.C.
Sec. 12101 et seq. and other applicable federal or state
antidiscrimination laws and regulations.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.129.040 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 18 s 66 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The resident has the right to manage his or her financial
affairs, and the facility may not require residents to deposit their
personal funds with the facility.
(2) Upon written authorization of a resident, if the facility
agrees to manage the resident's personal funds, the facility must hold,
safeguard, manage, and account for the personal funds of the resident
deposited with the facility as specified in this section.
(a) The facility must deposit a resident's personal funds in excess
of one hundred dollars in an interest-bearing account or accounts that
is separate from any of the facility's operating accounts, and that
credits all interest earned on residents' funds to that account. In
pooled accounts, there must be a separate accounting for each
resident's share.
(b) The facility must maintain a resident's personal funds that do
not exceed one hundred dollars in a noninterest-bearing account,
interest-bearing account, or petty cash fund.
(3) The facility must establish and maintain a system that assures
a full and complete and separate accounting of each resident's personal
funds entrusted to the facility on the resident's behalf.
(a) The system must preclude any commingling of resident funds with
facility funds or with the funds of any person other than another
resident.
(b) The individual financial record must be available on request to
the resident or his or her legal representative.
(4) Upon the death of a resident with a personal fund deposited
with the facility the facility must convey within forty-five days the
resident's funds, and a final accounting of those funds, to the
individual or probate jurisdiction administering the resident's estate;
but in the case of a resident who received ((long-term)) care services
paid for by the state, the funds and accounting shall be sent to the
state of Washington, department of social and health services, office
of financial recovery. The department shall establish a release
procedure for use for burial expenses.

Sec. 5 RCW 70.129.090 and 1994 c 214 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The resident has the right and the facility must not interfere
with access to any resident by the following:
(a) Any representative of the state;
(b) The resident's individual physician;
(c) The state long-term care ombudsman as established under chapter
43.190 RCW;
(d) The agency responsible for the protection and advocacy system
for developmentally disabled individuals as established under part C of
the developmental disabilities assistance and bill of rights act;
(e) The agency responsible for the protection and advocacy system
for mentally ill individuals as established under the protection and
advocacy for mentally ill individuals act;
(f) Subject to reasonable restrictions to protect the rights of
others and to the resident's right to deny or withdraw consent at any
time, immediate family or other relatives of the resident and others
who are visiting with the consent of the resident;
(g) The agency responsible for the protection and advocacy system
for individuals with disabilities as established under section 509 of
the rehabilitation act of 1973, as amended, who are not served under
the mandates of existing protection and advocacy systems created under
federal law.
(2) The facility must provide reasonable access to a resident by
his or her representative or an entity or individual that provides
health, social, legal, or other services to the resident, subject to
the resident's right to deny or withdraw consent at any time.
(3) The facility must allow representatives of the state ombudsman
to examine a resident's clinical records with the permission of the
resident or the resident's legal representative, and consistent with
state and federal law.
(4) The facility shall notify the resident's representative, if
any, of access, visitation, or examination of clinical records made
under this section.

Sec. 6 RCW 70.129.105 and 1997 c 392 s 211 are each amended to
read as follows:
No long-term care facility ((or)), nursing facility licensed under
chapter 18.51 RCW, or an intermediate care facility for the mentally
retarded shall require or request residents to sign waivers of
potential liability for losses of personal property or injury, or to
sign waivers of residents' rights set forth in this chapter or in the
applicable licensing or certification laws.

Sec. 7 RCW 70.129.110 and 1997 c 392 s 205 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The facility must permit each resident to remain in the
facility, and not transfer or discharge the resident from the facility
unless:
(a) The transfer or discharge is necessary for the resident's
welfare and the resident's needs cannot be met in the facility;
(b) The safety of individuals in the facility is endangered;
(c) The health of individuals in the facility would otherwise be
endangered;
(d) The resident has failed to make the required payment for his or
her stay; or
(e) The facility ceases to operate.
(2) All ((long-term care)) facilities shall fully disclose to
potential residents or their legal representative the service
capabilities of the facility prior to admission to the facility. If
the care needs of the applicant who is medicaid eligible are in excess
of the facility's service capabilities, the department shall identify
other care settings or residential care options consistent with federal
law.
(3) Before a ((long-term care)) facility transfers or discharges a
resident, the facility must:
(a) First attempt through reasonable accommodations to avoid the
transfer or discharge, unless agreed to by the resident;
(b) Notify the resident and representative and make a reasonable
effort to notify, if known, an interested family member of the transfer
or discharge and the reasons for the move in writing and in a language
and manner they understand;
(c) Record the reasons in the resident's record; and
(d) Include in the notice the items described in subsection (5) of
this section.
(4)(a) Except when specified in this subsection, the notice of
transfer or discharge required under subsection (3) of this section
must be made by the facility at least thirty days before the resident
is transferred or discharged.
(b) Notice may be made as soon as practicable before transfer or
discharge when:
(i) The safety of individuals in the facility would be endangered;
(ii) The health of individuals in the facility would be endangered;
(iii) An immediate transfer or discharge is required by the
resident's urgent medical needs; or
(iv) A resident has not resided in the facility for thirty days.
(5) The written notice specified in subsection (3) of this section
must include the following:
(a) The reason for transfer or discharge;
(b) The effective date of transfer or discharge;
(c) The location to which the resident is transferred or
discharged;
(d) The name, address, and telephone number of the state long-term
care ombudsman;
(e) For residents with developmental disabilities, the mailing
address and telephone number of the agency responsible for the
protection and advocacy of developmentally disabled individuals
established under part C of the developmental disabilities assistance
and bill of rights act; ((and))
(f) For residents who are mentally ill, the mailing address and
telephone number of the agency responsible for the protection and
advocacy of mentally ill individuals established under the protection
and advocacy for mentally ill individuals act; and
(g) For residents of an intermediate care facility for the mentally
retarded, the mailing addresses and telephone numbers of the resident's
representative, if any, and the human rights committee of that facility
established under 42 C.F.R. 483.440.
(6) A facility must provide sufficient preparation and orientation
to residents to ensure safe and orderly transfer or discharge from the
facility.
(7) A resident discharged in violation of this section has the
right to be readmitted immediately upon the first availability of a
gender-appropriate bed in the facility.

Sec. 8 RCW 70.129.150 and 1997 c 392 s 206 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) This section applies to long-term care facilities, intermediate
care facilities for the mentally retarded, and nursing facilities
licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW.
(2) Prior to admission, all ((long-term care)) facilities ((or
nursing facilities licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW)) that require
payment of an admissions fee, deposit, or a minimum stay fee, by or on
behalf of a person seeking admission to the ((long-term care facility
or nursing)) facility, shall provide the resident, or his or her
representative, full disclosure in writing in a language the resident
or his or her representative understands, a statement of the amount of
any admissions fees, deposits, prepaid charges, or minimum stay fees.
The facility shall also disclose to the person, or his or her
representative, the facility's advance notice or transfer requirements,
prior to admission. In addition, the ((long-term care facility or
nursing)) facility shall also fully disclose in writing prior to
admission what portion of the deposits, admissions fees, prepaid
charges, or minimum stay fees will be refunded to the resident or his
or her representative if the resident leaves the ((long-term care
facility or nursing)) facility. Receipt of the disclosures required
under this subsection must be acknowledged in writing. If the facility
does not provide these disclosures, the deposits, admissions fees,
prepaid charges, or minimum stay fees may not be kept by the facility.
If a resident dies or is hospitalized or is transferred to another
facility for more appropriate care and does not return to the original
facility, the facility shall refund any deposit or charges already paid
less the facility's per diem rate for the days the resident actually
resided or reserved or retained a bed in the facility notwithstanding
any minimum stay policy or discharge notice requirements, except that
the facility may retain an additional amount to cover its reasonable,
actual expenses incurred as a result of a private-pay resident's move,
not to exceed five days' per diem charges, unless the resident has
given advance notice in compliance with the admission agreement. All
((long-term care facilities or nursing)) facilities covered under this
section are required to refund any and all refunds due the resident or
his or her representative within thirty days from the resident's date
of discharge from the facility. Nothing in this section applies to
provisions in contracts negotiated between ((a nursing facility or
long-term care)) the facility and a certified health plan, health or
disability insurer, health maintenance organization, managed care
organization, or similar entities.
(2) Where a ((long-term care facility or nursing)) facility
requires the execution of an admission contract by or on behalf of an
individual seeking admission to the facility, the terms of the contract
shall be consistent with the requirements of this section, and the
terms of an admission contract by a long-term care facility or an
intermediate care facility for the mentally retarded shall be
consistent with the requirements of this chapter.

Sec. 9 RCW 70.129.160 and 1998 c 245 s 113 are each amended to
read as follows:
The long-term care ombudsman shall monitor implementation of this
chapter and determine the degree to which veterans' homes, nursing
facilities, adult family homes, ((and)) boarding homes, and
intermediate care facilities for the mentally retarded ensure that
residents are able to exercise their rights. The long-term care
ombudsman shall consult with the departments of health and social and
health services, long-term care facility organizations, the human
rights committee of an intermediate care facility for the mentally
retarded, resident groups, and senior and disabled citizen
organizations.

Sec. 10 RCW 70.129.170 and 1994 c 214 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature intends that ((long-term care facility))
residents of facilities or nursing home residents, their family members
or guardians, the long-term care ombudsman, protection and advocacy
personnel, and the human rights committee identified in RCW
70.129.110(((4))) (5) (e) ((and)), (f), and (g), and others who may
seek to assist ((long-term care facility or nursing home)) residents,
use the least formal means available to satisfactorily resolve disputes
that may arise regarding the rights conferred by the provisions of
chapter 70.129 RCW and RCW 18.20.180, 18.51.009, 72.36.037, and
70.128.125. Wherever feasible, direct discussion with facility
personnel or administrators should be employed. Failing that, and
where feasible, recourse may be sought through state or federal long-term care, intermediate care facility for the mentally retarded, or
nursing home licensing or other regulatory authorities. ((However,))
(2) The procedures suggested in this section are cumulative and
shall not restrict an agency or person from seeking a remedy provided
by law or from obtaining additional relief based on the same facts,
including any remedy available to an individual at common law.
(3) Chapter 214, Laws of 1994 is not intended to, and shall not be
construed to, create any right of action on the part of any individual
beyond those in existence under any common law or statutory doctrine.
(4) Chapter 214, Laws of 1994 is not intended to, and shall not be
construed to, operate in derogation of any right of action on the part
of any individual in existence on June 9, 1994.

--- END ---