BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.44525 and 1998 c 313 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to the limits in this section, an eligible person is
allowed a credit against the tax due under this chapter. The credit is
based on qualified employment positions in eligible areas. The credit
is available to persons who are engaged in international services as
defined in this section. In order to receive the credit, the
international service activities must take place at a business within
the eligible area.
(2)(a) On or after January 1, 2009, the credit shall equal three
thousand dollars for each increase over the prior calendar year in
qualified employment positions ((created after July 1, 1998,)) in an
eligible area. ((A)) The credit is earned for the calendar year ((the
person is hired to fill the position)) immediately following the
calendar year in which the increased qualified employment position is
established, plus the four subsequent consecutive years, if the
position is maintained for those four years.
(b) ((Credit may not be taken for hiring of persons into positions
that exist on July 1, 1998. Credit is authorized for new employees
hired for new positions created after July 1, 1998. New positions
filled by existing employees are eligible for the credit under this
section only if the position vacated by the existing employee is filled
by a new hire.
(c) When a position is newly created, if it is filled before July
1st, this position is eligible for the full yearly credit. If it is
filled after June 30th, this position is eligible for half of the
credit)) The number of qualified employment positions is determined by
dividing the total hours spent providing international services by all
of an eligible person's employees by 1820. A single qualified
employment position is created for each full increment of 1820 such
work hours in a calendar year.
(((d))) (3) Credit under this section may not be claimed against
taxes due for periods before the calendar year for which the credit was
earned. Credit may be accrued and carried over until it is used. No
refunds may be granted for credits under this section.
(((3))) (4) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Eligible area" means: (i) A community empowerment zone under
RCW ((43.63A.700)) 43.31C.020; or (ii) a contiguous group of census
tracts that meets the unemployment and poverty criteria of RCW
((43.63A.710)) 43.31C.030 and is designated under subsection (((4)))
(5) of this section;
(b) "Eligible person" means a person, as defined in RCW 82.04.030,
who in an eligible area at a specific location is engaged in the
business of providing international services;
(c)(i) "International services" means the provision of ((a)) an
eligible service, as defined under (c)(iii) of this subsection, that is
subject to tax under RCW 82.04.290(2), and either:
(A) Is for a person domiciled outside the United States; or
(B) The service itself is for use primarily outside of the United
States.
(ii) "International services" excludes any service taxable under
RCW 82.04.290(1).
(iii) Eligible services are: Computer; data processing;
information; legal; accounting and tax preparation; engineering;
architectural; business consulting; business management; public
relations and advertising; surveying; geological consulting; real
estate appraisal; or financial services. For the purposes of this
section these services mean the following:
(A) "Computer services" are services such as computer programming,
custom software modification, customization of canned software, custom
software installation, custom software maintenance, custom software
repair, training in the use of software, computer systems design, and
custom software update services;
(B) "Data processing services" are services such as word
processing, data entry, data retrieval, data search, information
compilation, payroll processing, business accounts processing, data
production, and other computerized data and information storage or
manipulation. "Data processing services" also includes the use of a
computer or computer time for data processing whether the processing is
performed by the provider of the computer or by the purchaser or other
beneficiary of the service;
(C) "Information services" are services such as electronic data
retrieval or research that entails furnishing financial or legal
information, data or research, internet service as defined in RCW
82.04.297, general or specialized news, or current information;
(D) "Legal services" are services such as representation by an
attorney, or other person when permitted, in an administrative or legal
proceeding, legal drafting, paralegal services, legal research
services, and court reporting services, arbitration, and mediation
services;
(E) "Accounting and tax preparation services" are services such as
accounting, auditing, actuarial, bookkeeping, or tax preparation
services;
(F) "Engineering services" are services such as civil, electrical,
mechanical, petroleum, marine, nuclear, and design engineering, machine
designing, machine tool designing, and sewage disposal system designing
services;
(G) "Architectural services" are services such as structural or
landscape design or architecture, interior design, building design,
building program management, and space planning services;
(H) "Business consulting services" are services such as primarily
providing operating counsel, advice, or assistance to the management or
owner of any business, private, nonprofit, or public organization,
including but not limited to those in the following areas:
Administrative management consulting; general management consulting;
human resource consulting or training; management engineering
consulting; management information systems consulting; manufacturing
management consulting; marketing consulting; operations research
consulting; personnel management consulting; physical distribution
consulting; site location consulting; economic consulting; motel,
hotel, and resort consulting; restaurant consulting; government affairs
consulting; and lobbying;
(I) "Business management services" are services such as
administrative management, business management, and office management.
"Business management services" does not include property management or
property leasing, motel, hotel, and resort management, or automobile
parking management;
(J) "Public relations and advertising services" are services such
as layout, art direction, graphic design, copy writing, mechanical
preparation, opinion research, marketing research, marketing, or
production supervision;
(K) "Surveying services" are services such as land surveying;
(L) "Geological consulting services" are services rendered for the
oil, gas, and mining industry and other earth resource industries, and
other services such as soil testing;
(M) "Real estate appraisal services" are services such as market
appraisal and other real estate valuation; and
(N) "Financial services" are services such as banking, loan,
security, investment management, investment advisory, mortgage
servicing, contract collection, and finance leasing services, engaged
in by financial businesses, or businesses similar to or in competition
with financial businesses; and
(((d) "Qualified employment position" means a permanent full-time
position to provide international services. If an employee is either
voluntarily or involuntarily separated from employment, the employment
position is considered filled on a full-time basis if the employer is
either training or actively recruiting a replacement employee.
(4))) (5) By ordinance, the legislative authority of a city, or
legislative authorities of contiguous cities by ordinance of each
city's legislative authority, with population greater than eighty
thousand, located in a county containing no community empowerment zones
as designated under RCW ((43.63A.700)) 43.31C.020, may designate a
contiguous group of census tracts within the city or cities as an
eligible area under this section. Each of the census tracts must meet
the unemployment and poverty criteria of RCW ((43.63A.710)) 43.31C.030.
Upon making the designation, the city or cities shall transmit to the
department of revenue a certification letter and a map, each explicitly
describing the boundaries of the census tract. This designation must
be made by December 31, 1998.
(((5))) (6) No application is necessary for the tax credit. The
person must keep records necessary for the department to verify
eligibility under this section. This information includes:
(a) Employment records for the previous six years;
(b) Information relating to description of international service
activity engaged in at the eligible location by the person; ((and))
(c) Records showing the number of work hours performed by employees
of the eligible person while providing international services; and
(d) Information relating to customers of international service
activity engaged in at that location by the person.
(((6))) (7) If at any time the department finds that a person is
not eligible for tax credit under this section, the amount of taxes for
which a credit has been used shall be immediately due. The department
shall assess interest, but not penalties, on the credited taxes for
which the person is not eligible. The interest shall be assessed at
the rate provided for delinquent excise taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW,
shall be assessed retroactively to the date the tax credit was taken,
and shall accrue until the taxes for which a credit has been used are
repaid.
(((7))) (8) The employment security department shall provide to the
department of revenue such information needed by the department of
revenue to verify eligibility under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect January 1, 2009.

--- END ---