BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.4452 and 2005 c 514 s 1003 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for each person whose research and development spending during
the year in which the credit is claimed exceeds 0.92 percent of the
person's taxable amount during the same calendar year.
(2) The credit shall be calculated as follows:
(a) Determine the greater of the amount of qualified research and
development expenditures of a person or eighty percent of amounts
received by a person other than a public educational or research
institution in compensation for the conduct of qualified research and
development;
(b) Subtract 0.92 percent of the person's taxable amount from the
amount determined under (a) of this subsection;
(c) Multiply the amount determined under (b) of this subsection by
the following:
(i) For the period June 10, 2004, through December 31, 2006, the
person's average tax rate for the calendar year for which the credit is
claimed;
(ii) For the calendar year ending December 31, 2007, the greater of
the person's average tax rate for that calendar year or 0.75 percent;
(iii) For the calendar year ending December 31, 2008, the greater
of the person's average tax rate for that calendar year or 1.0 percent;
(iv) For the calendar year ending December 31, 2009, the greater of
the person's average tax rate for that calendar year or 1.25 percent;
(v) For the calendar year ending December 31, 2010, and thereafter,
1.50 percent.
For purposes of calculating the credit, if a person's reporting
period is less than annual, the person may use an estimated average tax
rate for the calendar year for which the credit is claimed by using the
person's average tax rate for each reporting period. A person who uses
an estimated average tax rate must make an adjustment to the total
credit claimed for the calendar year using the person's actual average
tax rate for the calendar year when the person files its last return
for the calendar year for which the credit is claimed.
(3) Any person entitled to the credit provided in subsection (2) of
this section as a result of qualified research and development
conducted under contract may assign all or any portion of the credit to
the person contracting for the performance of the qualified research
and development.
(4) The credit, including any credit assigned to a person under
subsection (3) of this section, shall be claimed against taxes due for
the same calendar year in which the qualified research and development
expenditures are incurred. The credit, including any credit assigned
to a person under subsection (3) of this section, for each calendar
year shall not exceed the lesser of two million dollars or the amount
of tax otherwise due under this chapter for the calendar year.
(5) For any person claiming the credit, including any credit
assigned to a person under subsection (3) of this section, whose
research and development spending during the calendar year in which the
credit is claimed fails to exceed 0.92 percent of the person's taxable
amount during the same calendar year or who is otherwise ineligible,
the department shall declare the taxes against which the credit was
claimed to be immediately due and payable. The department shall assess
interest, but not penalties, on the taxes against which the credit was
claimed. Interest shall be assessed at the rate provided for
delinquent excise taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW, retroactively to the
date the credit was claimed, and shall accrue until the taxes against
which the credit was claimed are repaid. Any credit assigned to a
person under subsection (3) of this section that is disallowed as a
result of this section may be claimed by the person who performed the
qualified research and development subject to the limitations set forth
in subsection (4) of this section.
(6)(a) The legislature finds that accountability and effectiveness
are important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to make policy
choices regarding the best use of limited state resources the
legislature needs information on how a tax incentive is used.
(b) A person claiming the credit shall file a complete annual
survey with the department. The survey is due by March 31st following
any year in which a credit is claimed. The department may extend the
due date for timely filing of annual surveys under this section as
provided in RCW 82.32.590. The survey shall include the amount of the
tax credit claimed, the qualified research and development expenditures
during the calendar year for which the credit is claimed, the taxable
amount during the calendar year for which the credit is claimed, the
number of new products or research projects by general classification,
the number of trademarks, patents, and copyrights associated with the
research and development activities for which a credit was claimed, and
whether the credit has been assigned under subsection (3) of this
section and who assigned the credit. The survey shall also include the
following information for employment positions in Washington:
(i) The number of total employment positions;
(ii) Full-time, part-time, and temporary employment positions as a
percent of total employment;
(iii) The number of employment positions according to the following
wage bands: Less than thirty thousand dollars; thirty thousand dollars
or greater, but less than sixty thousand dollars; and sixty thousand
dollars or greater. A wage band containing fewer than three
individuals may be combined with another wage band; and
(iv) The number of employment positions that have employer-provided
medical, dental, and retirement benefits, by each of the wage bands.
(c) The department may request additional information necessary to
measure the results of the tax credit program, to be submitted at the
same time as the survey.
(d)(i) All information collected under this subsection, except the
amount of the tax credit claimed, is deemed taxpayer information under
RCW 82.32.330. Information on the amount of tax credit claimed is not
subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be
disclosed to the public upon request, except as provided in this
subsection (6)(d). If the amount of the tax credit as reported on the
survey is different than the amount actually claimed on the taxpayer's
tax returns or otherwise allowed by the department, the amount actually
claimed or allowed may be disclosed.
(ii) Persons for whom the actual amount of the tax credit claimed
on the taxpayer's returns or otherwise allowed by the department is
less than ten thousand dollars during the period covered by the survey
may request the department to treat the tax credit amount as
confidential under RCW 82.32.330.
(e) If a person fails to file a complete annual survey required
under this subsection with the department by the due date or any
extension under RCW 82.32.590, the person entitled to the credit
provided in subsection (2) of this section is not eligible to claim or
assign the credit provided in subsection (2) of this section in the
year the person failed to timely file a complete survey.
(7) The department shall use the information from subsection (6) of
this section to prepare summary descriptive statistics by category. No
fewer than three taxpayers shall be included in any category. The
department shall report these statistics to the legislature each year
by September 1st.
(8) The department shall use the information from subsection (6) of
this section to study the tax credit program authorized under this
section. The department shall report to the legislature by December 1,
2009, and December 1, 2013. The reports shall measure the effect of
the program on job creation, the number of jobs created for Washington
residents, company growth, the introduction of new products, the
diversification of the state's economy, growth in research and
development investment, the movement of firms or the consolidation of
firms' operations into the state, and such other factors as the
department selects.
(9) For the purpose of this section:
(a) "Average tax rate" means a person's total tax liability under
this chapter for the calendar year for which the credit is claimed
divided by the taxpayer's total taxable amount under this chapter for
the calendar year for which the credit is claimed.
(b)(i) "Qualified research and development expenditures" means
operating expenses, including wages, compensation of a proprietor or a
partner in a partnership as determined under rules adopted by the
department, benefits, supplies, and computer expenses, directly
incurred in qualified research and development by a person claiming the
credit provided in this section, including amounts paid to a public
educational or research institute or a person that specializes in phase
I and II clinical trials as defined in RCW 82.63.010.
(ii) The term does not include:
(A) Amounts paid to a person to conduct qualified research and
development, other than amounts paid to a public educational or
research institution ((to conduct qualified research and development.
Nor does the term include)) or a person that specializes in phase I and
II clinical trials as defined in RCW 82.63.010;
(B) Amounts received by a person that specializes in phase I and II
clinical trials as defined in RCW 82.63.010 from a person eligible for
the credit provided by this section in respect to such amounts;
(C) Capital costs and overhead, such as expenses for land,
structures, or depreciable property.
(iii) For purposes of this subsection (9), a person specializes in
phase I and II clinical trials if the person is an independent research
facility that derives a majority of its gross income subject to tax
under this chapter from conducting phase I and II clinical trials.
(c) "Qualified research and development" shall have the same
meaning as in RCW 82.63.010.
(d) "Research and development spending" means qualified research
and development expenditures plus eighty percent of amounts paid to a
person other than a public educational or research institution or a
person that specializes in phase I and II clinical trials as defined in
RCW 82.63.010, to conduct qualified research and development.
(e) "Taxable amount" means the taxable amount subject to the tax
imposed in this chapter required to be reported on the person's
combined excise tax returns for the calendar year for which the credit
is claimed, less any taxable amount for which a credit is allowed under
RCW 82.04.440.
(10) This section expires January 1, 2015.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.63.010 and 2004 c 2 s 3 are each amended to read as
follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Advanced computing" means technologies used in the designing
and developing of computing hardware and software, including
innovations in designing the full spectrum of hardware from hand-held
calculators to super computers, and peripheral equipment.
(2) "Advanced materials" means materials with engineered properties
created through the development of specialized processing and synthesis
technology, including ceramics, high value-added metals, electronic
materials, composites, polymers, and biomaterials.
(3) "Applicant" means a person applying for a tax deferral under
this chapter.
(4)(a) "Biotechnology" means the application of technologies, such
as recombinant DNA techniques, biochemistry, molecular and cellular
biology, genetics and genetic engineering, cell fusion techniques, and
new bioprocesses, using living organisms, or parts of organisms, to
produce or modify products, to improve plants or animals, to develop
microorganisms for specific uses, to identify targets for small
molecule pharmaceutical development, or to transform biological systems
into useful processes and products or to develop microorganisms for
specific uses.
(b) The term also includes the conducting of studies of
investigational new drugs in humans required by a governmental entity,
such as the United States food and drug administration, before an
investigational new drug can be licensed and marketed for human use.
(5) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(6) "Electronic device technology" means technologies involving
microelectronics; semiconductors; electronic equipment and
instrumentation; radio frequency, microwave, and millimeter
electronics; optical and optic-electrical devices; and data and digital
communications and imaging devices.
(7) "Eligible investment project" means an investment project which
either initiates a new operation, or expands or diversifies a current
operation by expanding, renovating, or equipping an existing facility.
The lessor or owner of the qualified building is not eligible for a
deferral unless:
(a) The underlying ownership of the buildings, machinery, and
equipment vests exclusively in the same person; or
(b)(i) The lessor by written contract agrees to pass the economic
benefit of the deferral to the lessee;
(ii) The lessee that receives the economic benefit of the deferral
agrees in writing with the department to complete the annual survey
required under RCW 82.63.020(2); and
(iii) The economic benefit of the deferral passed to the lessee is
no less than the amount of tax deferred by the lessor and is evidenced
by written documentation of any type of payment, credit, or other
financial arrangement between the lessor or owner of the qualified
building and the lessee.
(8) "Environmental technology" means assessment and prevention of
threats or damage to human health or the environment, environmental
cleanup, and the development of alternative energy sources.
(9) "Investment project" means an investment in qualified buildings
or qualified machinery and equipment, including labor and services
rendered in the planning, installation, and construction or improvement
of the project.
(10) "Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030 and includes
state universities as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.
(11) "Pilot scale manufacturing" means design, construction, and
testing of preproduction prototypes and models in the fields of
biotechnology, advanced computing, electronic device technology,
advanced materials, and environmental technology other than for
commercial sale. As used in this subsection, "commercial sale"
excludes sales of prototypes or sales for market testing if the total
gross receipts from such sales of the product, service, or process do
not exceed one million dollars.
(12) "Qualified buildings" means construction of new structures,
and expansion or renovation of existing structures for the purpose of
increasing floor space or production capacity used for pilot scale
manufacturing or qualified research and development, including plant
offices and other facilities that are an essential or an integral part
of a structure used for pilot scale manufacturing or qualified research
and development. If a building is used partly for pilot scale
manufacturing or qualified research and development, and partly for
other purposes, the applicable tax deferral shall be determined by
apportionment of the costs of construction under rules adopted by the
department.
(13) "Qualified machinery and equipment" means fixtures, equipment,
and support facilities that are an integral and necessary part of a
pilot scale manufacturing or qualified research and development
operation. "Qualified machinery and equipment" includes: Computers;
software; data processing equipment; laboratory equipment,
instrumentation, and other devices used in a process of experimentation
to develop a new or improved pilot model, plant process, product,
formula, invention, or similar property; manufacturing components such
as belts, pulleys, shafts, and moving parts; molds, tools, and dies;
vats, tanks, and fermenters; operating structures; and all other
equipment used to control, monitor, or operate the machinery. For
purposes of this chapter, qualified machinery and equipment must be
either new to the taxing jurisdiction of the state or new to the
certificate holder, except that used machinery and equipment may be
treated as qualified machinery and equipment if the certificate holder
either brings the machinery and equipment into Washington or makes a
retail purchase of the machinery and equipment in Washington or
elsewhere.
(14) "Qualified research and development" means research and
development performed within this state in the fields of advanced
computing, advanced materials, biotechnology, electronic device
technology, and environmental technology.
(15) "Recipient" means a person receiving a tax deferral under this
chapter.
(16)(a) "Research and development" means activities performed to
discover technological information, and technical and nonroutine
activities concerned with translating technological information into
new or improved products, processes, techniques, formulas, inventions,
or software. The term includes exploration of a new use for an
existing drug, device, or biological product if the new use requires
separate licensing by the federal food and drug administration under
chapter 21, C.F.R., as amended. The term also includes the conducting
of phase I or II clinical trials to determine whether investigational
new drugs for use in humans are safe and effective when conducted by a
person that specializes in phase I and II clinical trials. For
purposes of this subsection (16), a person specializes in phase I and
II clinical trials if the person is an independent research facility
that derives a majority of its gross income subject to tax under
chapter 82.04 RCW from conducting phase I and II clinical trials. The
term does not include adaptation or duplication of existing products
where the products are not substantially improved by application of the
technology((, nor does)). The term also does not include surveys
((and)); studies, other than phase I and II clinical trials; social
science and humanities research((,)); market research or testing((,));
quality control((,)); sale promotion and service((,)); computer
software developed for internal use((,)); and research in areas such as
improved style, taste, and seasonal design.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, the following definitions
apply:
(i) "Phase I clinical trial" means initial studies in patients or
healthy volunteer subjects to determine the metabolism and
pharmacologic actions of drugs in humans, the side effects associated
with increasing doses, and, if possible, to gain early evidence of
effectiveness.
(ii) "Phase II clinical trial" means controlled clinical studies
conducted to evaluate the effectiveness of a drug for a particular
indication or indications in patients with the disease or condition
under study and to determine the common short-term side effects and
risks.
(17)(a) "Initiation of construction" means the date that a building
permit is issued under the building code adopted under RCW 19.27.031
for:
(i) Construction of the qualified building, if the underlying
ownership of the building vests exclusively with the person receiving
the economic benefit of the deferral;
(ii) Construction of the qualified building, if the economic
benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in
subsection (7) of this section; or
(iii) Tenant improvements for a qualified building, if the economic
benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in
subsection (7) of this section.
(b) "Initiation of construction" does not include soil testing,
site clearing and grading, site preparation, or any other related
activities that are initiated before the issuance of a building permit
for the construction of the foundation of the building.
(c) If the investment project is a phased project, "initiation of
construction" shall apply separately to each phase.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 For purposes of RCW 82.04.4452, this act
applies with respect to research and development spending and qualified
research and development expenditures incurred on or after January 1,
2008.

--- END ---