BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) A county, located in eastern Washington, planning under RCW
36.70A.040 shall establish, in consultation with cities, a process for
authorizing the siting of new mobile home parks and manufactured
housing communities outside of urban growth areas designated under RCW
36.70A.110.
(b) For purposes of this section, "mobile home park" or
"manufactured housing community" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
59.20.030.
(2) A county, located in eastern Washington, considering an
application to site a new mobile home park or manufactured housing
community outside of an urban growth area may approve the siting if the
following criteria are met:
(a) The proposed site is adjacent to or in close proximity to an
urban growth area;
(b) Affordable housing will be provided within the mobile home park
or manufactured housing community for a range of income levels;
(c) Appropriate infrastructure and services for the site are
available or have been provided for;
(d) Environmental protection issues for the site, including air and
water quality issues, have been provided for;
(e) Development regulations have been established to ensure that
urban growth will not occur in adjacent nonurban areas;
(f) Provisions to mitigate adverse impacts on designated
agricultural lands, forest lands, and mineral resource lands have been
made; and
(g) The siting of the mobile home park or manufactured housing
community does not conflict with development regulations adopted by the
county to protect critical areas.
(3) Final approval of an application to site a mobile home park or
manufactured housing community as provided in this section does not
constitute an adopted amendment to the comprehensive plan adopted under
RCW 36.70A.070.
(4) For purposes of this section, "eastern Washington" means that
portion of the state lying east of the crest of the Cascade mountain
range.

--- END ---