BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that while
Washington's Constitution expressly prohibits the use of eminent domain
to transfer private property to another private owner for the purpose
of increasing tax revenues, Washington courts continue to allow the use
of eminent domain to be transferred to uses that are in fact private in
nature.
The legislature therefore declares that government's use of eminent
domain power in Washington should be restricted to uses that protect
public health and safety or provide public use facilities, such as
streets, roads, highways, lighting systems for roadways, traffic
signals, transportation corridors, utility corridors, water systems,
storm and sanitary sewer systems, sewage treatment facilities,
landfills, park and recreational facilities, and schools.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 No government shall take or damage private
land or any interest in real property that is not to be used expressly
for the construction of a public use facility or the provision of a
public service necessary to protect public health and safety.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 8 RCW.

--- END ---