BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.55.050 and 2007 c 380 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to any otherwise applicable statutory dollar rate
limitations, regular property taxes may be levied by or for a taxing
district in an amount exceeding the limitations provided for in this
chapter if such levy is authorized by a proposition approved by a
majority of the voters of the taxing district voting on the proposition
at a general election held within the district or at a special election
within the taxing district called by the district for the purpose of
submitting such proposition to the voters. Any election held pursuant
to this section shall be held not more than twelve months prior to the
date on which the proposed levy is to be made, except as provided in
subsection (2) of this section. The ballot of the proposition shall
state the dollar rate proposed and shall clearly state the conditions,
if any, which are applicable under subsection (4) of this section.
(2) Subject to statutory dollar limitations, a proposition placed
before the voters under this section may authorize annual increases in
levies for multiple consecutive years, up to six consecutive years,
during which period each year's authorized maximum legal levy shall be
used as the base upon which an increased levy limit for the succeeding
year is computed, but the ballot proposition must state the dollar rate
proposed only for the first year of the consecutive years and must
state the limit factor, or a specified index to be used for determining
a limit factor, such as the consumer price index, which need not be the
same for all years, by which the regular tax levy for the district may
be increased in each of the subsequent consecutive years. Elections
for this purpose must be held at a primary or general election. The
title of each ballot measure must state the ((specific)) limited
purposes for which the proposed annual increases during the specified
period of up to six consecutive years shall be used, and funds raised
under the levy shall not supplant existing funds used for these
purposes. For purposes of this subsection, existing funds means the
actual operating expenditures for the calendar year in which the ballot
measure is approved by voters. Actual operating expenditures excludes
lost federal funds, lost or expired state grants or loans,
extraordinary events not likely to reoccur, changes in contract
provisions beyond the control of the taxing district receiving the
services, and major nonrecurring capital expenditures.
(3) After a levy authorized pursuant to this section is made, the
dollar amount of such levy ((shall)) may not be used for the purpose of
computing the limitations for subsequent levies provided for in this
chapter, ((except as provided in subsection (5) of this section))
unless the ballot proposition expressly states that the levy made under
this section will be used for this purpose.
(4) If expressly stated, a proposition placed before the voters
under subsection (1) or (2) of this section may:
(a) Use the dollar amount of a levy under subsection (1) of this
section, or the dollar amount of the final levy under subsection (2) of
this section, for the purpose of computing the limitations for
subsequent levies provided for in this chapter;
(b) Limit the period for which the increased levy is to be made
under (a) of this subsection;
(((b))) (c) Limit the purpose for which the increased levy is to be
made under (a) of this subsection, but if the limited purpose includes
making redemption payments on bonds, the period for which the increased
levies are made shall not exceed nine years;
(((c))) (d) Set the levy or levies at a rate less than the maximum
rate allowed for the district; or
(((d))) (e) Include any combination of the conditions in this
subsection.
(5) Except as otherwise ((provided)) expressly stated in an
approved ballot measure under this section, ((after the expiration of
a limited period under subsection (4)(a) of this section or the
satisfaction of a limited purpose under subsection (4)(b) of this
section, whichever comes first,)) subsequent levies shall be computed
as if:
(a) The ((limited)) proposition under ((subsection (4) of)) this
section had not been approved; and
(b) The taxing district had made levies at the maximum rates which
would otherwise have been allowed under this chapter during the years
levies were made under the ((limited)) proposition.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies prospectively only to levy
lid lift ballot propositions under RCW 84.55.050 that receive voter
approval on or after the effective date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---