BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.16.381 and 2007 c 262 s 1 and 2007 c 44 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The director shall grant special parking privileges to any
person who has a disability that limits or impairs the ability to walk
or involves acute sensitivity to light and meets one of the following
criteria, as determined by a licensed physician, an advanced registered
nurse practitioner licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW, or a physician
assistant licensed under chapter 18.71A or 18.57A RCW:
(a) Cannot walk two hundred feet without stopping to rest;
(b) Is severely limited in ability to walk due to arthritic,
neurological, or orthopedic condition;
(c) Has such a severe disability, that the person cannot walk
without the use of or assistance from a brace, cane, another person,
prosthetic device, wheelchair, or other assistive device;
(d) Uses portable oxygen;
(e) Is restricted by lung disease to such an extent that forced
expiratory respiratory volume, when measured by spirometry is less than
one liter per second or the arterial oxygen tension is less than sixty
mm/hg on room air at rest;
(f) Impairment by cardiovascular disease or cardiac condition to
the extent that the person's functional limitations are classified as
class III or IV under standards accepted by the American Heart
Association;
(g) Has a disability resulting from an acute sensitivity to
automobile emissions which limits or impairs the ability to walk. The
personal physician, advanced registered nurse practitioner, or
physician assistant of the applicant shall document that the disability
is comparable in severity to the others listed in this subsection;
(h) Is legally blind and has limited mobility; or
(i) Is restricted by a form of porphyria to the extent that the
applicant would significantly benefit from a decrease in exposure to
light.
(2) The applications for parking permits for persons with
disabilities and parking permits for persons with temporary
disabilities are official state documents. Knowingly providing false
information in conjunction with the application is a gross misdemeanor
punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW. The following statement must
appear on each application form immediately below the physician's,
advanced registered nurse practitioner's, or physician assistant's
signature and immediately below the applicant's signature: "A parking
permit for a person with disabilities may be issued only for a medical
necessity that severely affects mobility or involves acute sensitivity
to light (RCW 46.16.381). Knowingly providing false information on
this application is a gross misdemeanor. The penalty is up to one year
in jail and a fine of up to $5,000 or both."
(3) Persons who qualify for special parking privileges are entitled
to receive from the department of licensing a removable windshield
placard bearing the international symbol of access and an individual
serial number, along with a special identification card bearing the
name and date of birth of the person to whom the placard is issued, and
the placard's serial number. The special identification card shall be
issued to all persons who are issued parking placards, including those
issued for temporary disabilities, and special parking license plates
for persons with disabilities. The department shall design the placard
to be displayed when the vehicle is parked by suspending it from the
rearview mirror, or in the absence of a rearview mirror the card may be
displayed on the dashboard of any vehicle used to transport the person
with disabilities. Instead of regular motor vehicle license plates,
persons with disabilities are entitled to receive special license
plates under this section or RCW 46.16.385 bearing the international
symbol of access for ((one)) up to two vehicles registered in the name
of the person with disabilities. Persons with disabilities who are not
issued the special license plates are entitled to receive a second
special placard upon submitting a written request to the department.
Persons who have been issued the parking privileges and who are using
a vehicle or are riding in a vehicle displaying the placard or special
license plates issued under this section or RCW 46.16.385 may park in
places reserved for persons with physical disabilities. The director
shall adopt rules providing for the issuance of special placards and
license plates to public transportation authorities, nursing homes
licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW, boarding homes licensed under chapter
18.20 RCW, senior citizen centers, private nonprofit agencies as
defined in chapter 24.03 RCW, and vehicles registered with the
department as cabulances that regularly transport persons with
disabilities who have been determined eligible for special parking
privileges provided under this section. The director may issue special
license plates for a vehicle registered in the name of the public
transportation authority, nursing home, boarding home, senior citizen
center, private nonprofit agency, or cabulance service if the vehicle
is primarily used to transport persons with disabilities described in
this section. Public transportation authorities, nursing homes,
boarding homes, senior citizen centers, private nonprofit agencies, and
cabulance services are responsible for insuring that the special
placards and license plates are not used improperly and are responsible
for all fines and penalties for improper use.
(4) Whenever the person with disabilities transfers or assigns his
or her interest in the vehicle, the special license plates shall be
removed from the motor vehicle. If another vehicle is acquired by the
person with disabilities and the vehicle owner qualifies for a special
plate, the plate shall be attached to the vehicle, and the director
shall be immediately notified of the transfer of the plate. If another
vehicle is not acquired by the person with disabilities, the removed
plate shall be immediately surrendered to the director.
(5) The special license plate shall be renewed in the same manner
and at the time required for the renewal of regular motor vehicle
license plates under this chapter. No special license plate may be
issued to a person who is temporarily disabled. A person who has a
condition expected to improve within six months may be issued a
temporary placard for a period not to exceed six months. If the
condition exists after six months a new temporary placard shall be
issued upon receipt of a new certification from the person's physician.
The permanent parking placard and identification card of a person with
disabilities shall be renewed at least every five years, as required by
the director, by satisfactory proof of the right to continued use of
the privileges. In the event of the permit holder's death, the parking
placard and identification card must be immediately surrendered to the
department. The department shall match and purge its database of
parking permits issued to persons with disabilities with available
death record information at least every twelve months.
(6) Additional fees shall not be charged for the issuance of the
special placards or the identification cards. No additional fee may be
charged for the issuance of the special license plates except the
regular motor vehicle registration fee and any other fees and taxes
required to be paid upon registration of a motor vehicle.
(7) Any unauthorized use of the special placard, special license
plate issued under this section or RCW 46.16.385, or identification
card is a traffic infraction with a monetary penalty of two hundred
fifty dollars.
(8) It is a parking infraction, with a monetary penalty of two
hundred fifty dollars for a person to make inaccessible the access
aisle located next to a space reserved for persons with physical
disabilities. The clerk of the court shall report all violations
related to this subsection to the department.
(9) It is a parking infraction, with a monetary penalty of two
hundred fifty dollars for any person to park a vehicle in a parking
place provided on private property without charge or on public property
reserved for persons with physical disabilities without a placard or
special license plate issued under this section or RCW 46.16.385. If
a person is charged with a violation, the person shall not be
determined to have committed an infraction if the person produces in
court or before the court appearance the placard or special license
plate issued under this section or RCW 46.16.385 required under this
section. A local jurisdiction providing nonmetered, on-street parking
places reserved for persons with physical disabilities may impose by
ordinance time restrictions of no less than four hours on the use of
these parking places. A local jurisdiction may impose by ordinance
time restrictions of no less than four hours on the use of nonreserved,
on-street parking spaces by vehicles displaying the special parking
placards or special license plates issued under this section or RCW
46.16.385. All time restrictions must be clearly posted.
(10) The penalties imposed under subsections (8) and (9) of this
section shall be used by that local jurisdiction exclusively for law
enforcement. The court may also impose an additional penalty
sufficient to reimburse the local jurisdiction for any costs it may
have incurred in removal and storage of the improperly parked vehicle.
(11) Except as provided by subsection (2) of this section, it is a
traffic infraction with a monetary penalty of two hundred fifty dollars
for any person willfully to obtain a special license plate issued under
this section or RCW 46.16.385, placard, or identification card in a
manner other than that established under this section.
(12)(a) A law enforcement agency authorized to enforce parking laws
may appoint volunteers, with a limited commission, to issue notices of
infractions for violations of this section or RCW 46.61.581.
Volunteers must be at least twenty-one years of age. The law
enforcement agency appointing volunteers may establish any other
qualifications the agency deems desirable.
(b) An agency appointing volunteers under this section must provide
training to the volunteers before authorizing them to issue notices of
infractions.
(c) A notice of infraction issued by a volunteer appointed under
this subsection has the same force and effect as a notice of infraction
issued by a police officer for the same offense.
(d) A police officer or a volunteer may request a person to show
the person's identification card or special parking placard when
investigating the possibility of a violation of this section. If the
request is refused, the person in charge of the vehicle may be issued
a notice of infraction for a violation of this section.
(13) For second or subsequent violations of this section, in
addition to a monetary fine, the violator must complete a minimum of
forty hours of:
(a) Community restitution for a nonprofit organization that serves
persons having disabilities or disabling diseases; or
(b) Any other community restitution that may sensitize the violator
to the needs and obstacles faced by persons who have disabilities.
(14) The court may not suspend more than one-half of any fine
imposed under subsection (7), (8), (9), or (11) of this section.
(15) For the purposes of this section, "legally blind" means a
person who: (a) Has no vision or whose vision with corrective lenses
is so limited that the individual requires alternative methods or
skills to do efficiently those things that are ordinarily done with
sight by individuals with normal vision; or (b) has an eye condition of
a progressive nature which may lead to blindness.

--- END ---