BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.10.400 and 1979 ex.s. c 259 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
The boards of regents of the state universities, the boards of
trustees of the regional universities and of The Evergreen State
College, and the state board for community and technical colleges
((education)) are authorized and empowered:
(1) To assist the faculties and such other employees as any such
board may designate in the purchase of old age annuities or retirement
income plans under such rules ((and regulations)) as any such board may
prescribe. County agricultural agents, home demonstration agents, 4-H
club agents, and assistant county agricultural agents paid jointly by
the Washington State University and the several counties shall be
deemed to be full time employees of the Washington State University for
the purposes hereof;
(2) To provide, under such rules and regulations as any such board
may prescribe for the faculty members or other employees under its
supervision, for the retirement of any such faculty member or other
employee on account of age or condition of health, retirement on
account of age to be not earlier than the sixty-fifth birthday:
PROVIDED, That such faculty member or such other employee may elect to
retire at the earliest age specified for retirement by federal social
security law: PROVIDED FURTHER, That any supplemental payment
authorized by subsection (3) of this section and paid as a result of
retirement earlier than age sixty-five shall be at an actuarially
reduced rate;
(3) To pay to any such retired person or to his or her designated
beneficiary(s), each year after his or her retirement, a supplemental
amount which, when added to the amount of such annuity or retirement
income plan, or retirement income benefit pursuant to RCW 28B.10.415,
received by ((him or his)) the retired person or the retired person's
designated beneficiary(s) in such year, will not exceed fifty percent
of the average annual salary paid to such retired person for his or her
highest two consecutive years of full time service under an annuity or
retirement income plan established pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section at an institution of higher education: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That
if such retired person prior to ((his)) retirement elected a
supplemental payment survivors option, any such supplemental payments
to such retired person or ((his)) the retired person's designated
beneficiary(s) shall be at actuarially reduced rates: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That if a faculty member or other employee of an institution
of higher education who is a participant in a retirement plan
authorized by this section dies, or has died before retirement but
after becoming eligible for retirement on account of age, the
designated beneficiary(s) shall be entitled to receive the supplemental
payment authorized by this subsection (((3) of this section)) to which
such designated beneficiary(s) would have been entitled had said
deceased faculty member or other employee retired on the date of death
after electing a supplemental payment survivors option: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That for the purpose of this subsection, the designated
beneficiary(s) shall be (a) the surviving spouse of the retiree; or,
(b) with the written consent of such spouse, if any, such other person
or persons as shall have an insurable interest in the retiree's life
and shall have been nominated by written designation duly executed and
filed with the retiree's institution of higher education;
(4) The higher education coordinating board is also authorized and
empowered as described in this section, subject to the following: The
board is prohibited from offering or funding a purchased annuity or
retirement income plan authorized under this section for the benefit of
any retiree who is receiving or accruing a retirement allowance from a
public employee retirement system under Title 41 or chapter 43.43 RCW.

--- END ---