BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.32.813 and 2006 c 257 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An active member who has completed a minimum of ((five)) two
years of creditable service in the teachers' retirement system may,
upon written application to the department, make a one-time purchase of
up to seven years of service credit for public education experience
outside the Washington state retirement system, subject to the
following limitations:
(a) The public education experience being claimed must have been
performed as a teacher in a public school in another state or with the
federal government; ((and))
(b) The public education experience being claimed must have been
covered by a retirement or pension plan provided by a state or
political subdivision of a state, or by the federal government; and
(c) The member is not currently receiving a benefit or currently
eligible to receive an unreduced retirement benefit from a retirement
or pension plan of a state or political subdivision of a state or the
federal government that includes the service credit to be purchased.
(2) The service credit purchased shall be membership service, and
may be used to qualify the member for retirement.
(3) The member shall pay the actuarial value of the resulting
increase in the member's benefit calculated in a manner consistent with
the department's method for calculating payments for reestablishing
service credit under RCW 41.50.165.
(4) The member may pay all or part of the cost of the service
credit to be purchased with a lump sum payment, eligible rollover,
direct rollover, or trustee-to-trustee transfer from an eligible
retirement plan. The department shall adopt rules to ensure that all
lump sum payments, rollovers, and transfers comply with the
requirements of the internal revenue code and regulations adopted by
the internal revenue service. The rules adopted by the department may
condition the acceptance of a rollover or transfer from another plan on
the receipt of information necessary to enable the department to
determine the eligibility of any transferred funds for tax-free
rollover treatment or other treatment under federal income tax law.
(5) The employer also may pay all or a portion of the member's cost
of the service credit purchased under this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.32.868 and 2006 c 257 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An active member who has completed a minimum of ((five)) two
years of creditable service in the teachers' retirement system may,
upon written application to the department, make a one-time purchase of
up to seven years of service credit for public education experience
outside the Washington state retirement system, subject to the
following limitations:
(a) The public education experience being claimed must have been
performed as a teacher in a public school in another state or with the
federal government;
(b) The public education experience being claimed must have been
covered by a retirement or pension plan provided by a state or
political subdivision of a state, or by the federal government; and
(c) The member is not currently receiving a benefit or currently
eligible to receive an unreduced retirement benefit from a retirement
or pension plan of a state or political subdivision of a state or the
federal government that includes the service credit to be purchased.
(2) The service credit purchased shall be membership service, and
may be used to qualify the member for retirement.
(3) The member shall pay the actuarial value of the resulting
increase in the member's benefit calculated in a manner consistent with
the department's method for calculating payments for reestablishing
service credit under RCW 41.50.165.
(4) The member may pay all or part of the cost of the service
credit to be purchased with a lump sum payment, eligible rollover,
direct rollover, or trustee-to-trustee transfer from an eligible
retirement plan. The department shall adopt rules to ensure that all
lump sum payments, rollovers, and transfers comply with the
requirements of the internal revenue code and regulations adopted by
the internal revenue service. The rules adopted by the department may
condition the acceptance of a rollover or transfer from another plan on
the receipt of information necessary to enable the department to
determine the eligibility of any transferred funds for tax-free
rollover treatment or other treatment under federal income tax law.
(5) The employer also may pay all or a portion of the member's cost
of the service credit purchased under this section.

--- END ---