BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds and declares that:
(a) Over the past two decades, there has been a significant
increase in the number of meals prepared or eaten outside the home,
with an estimated one-third of calories and almost half of total food
dollars associated with food obtained from restaurants and other food
service establishments;
(b) Broader availability of nutrition information regarding foods
served at restaurants and other food service establishments will
facilitate consumers making more informed decisions about the food they
purchase;
(c) Three-quarters of American adults report using food labels on
packaged foods, which are required by the nutrition labeling and
education act of 1990;
(d) Availability of nutrition information regarding restaurant food
assists consumers who closely monitor their diet;
(e) Due to substantial variations in restaurant characteristics,
restaurants have used a variety of methods to provide broad nutrition
information that their customers desire;
(f) Providing accurate nutrition information for food prepared in
restaurants is significantly more difficult than for processed food
items because of greater variability of portion size, formulation, and
other characteristics of the restaurant food product and the processes
used to produce it;
(g) In implementing the federal nutrition labeling and education
act of 1990, the United States food and drug administration recognized
the need for accuracy in nutrition information statements and addressed
the challenges of determining restaurant food product nutrition
information by permitting nutrition information for such products to be
determined with a reasonable basis;
(h) Notwithstanding the substantial variability of nutrition
characteristics of standard food items served at restaurants and other
food service establishments, public health will be advanced by
providing nutrition information, determined with a reasonable basis,
for standard food items generally available at restaurants; and
(i) Restaurants and other food service establishments generally are
more likely to provide nutrition information regarding food items, if
there is not a threat of conflicting or overlapping governmental
requirements for disclosure of nutrition information, or vulnerability
to frivolous litigation regarding the accuracy of disclosure of
nutrition information.
(2) The legislature intends to provide consumers with greater
access to nutrition information regarding restaurant foods by (a)
recognizing that nutrition information determined with a reasonable
basis is appropriately accurate, and (b) allowing restaurants
reasonable flexibility in providing nutrition information to consumers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Covered food facility" means one of at least twenty-five food
facilities in the United States doing business under the same trade
name regardless of whether the food establishment is subject to the
same ownership or type of ownership. "Covered food facility" does not
include the following types of food facilities:
(a) Certified farmers' markets;
(b) Commissaries;
(c) Licensed health care facilities;
(d) Mobile support units;
(e) Restricted food service facilities;
(f) Temporary food facilities;
(g) Vending machines; and
(h) Public and private school cafeterias.
(2) "Same trade name" means a group of at least twenty-five or more
food facilities doing business in the United States that is deemed to
be doing business under the same trade name if each facility shares an
identical business name and provides substantially the same menu items.
Any food facility not sharing an identical trade name with a covered
food facility, regardless of common ownership, or which does not offer
substantially the same menu items is not deemed to be operating under
the same trade name.
(3) "Substantially the same menu items" means any group of twenty-five or more facilities in the United States doing business under the
same trade name that is deemed to be serving substantially the same
menu items if the food facilities have more than eighty percent, by
number, of the same menu items, based on a standard recipe, such that
calories, fat, carbohydrates, and sodium content of each food item is
substantially the same from one food facility to another.
(4) "Standard recipe" means a recipe or formula used consistently
in preparing a standard food item from one food facility to another.
(5) "Standard food item" means a food item offered for sale at
least one hundred eighty days per calendar year, but does not include
food not separately offered for sale, including unsolicited requests
for product customization, alcoholic beverages the labeling of which is
not regulated by the United States food and drug administration, or
packaged foods otherwise subject to the nutrition requirements of the
nutrition labeling and education act of 1990.
(6) "Reasonable basis" means any way of determining nutrition
information for a standard food item made without a malicious intent to
deceive, including but not limited to, nutrient databases, cookbooks,
laboratory analyses, and other reasonable means. A "reasonable basis"
determination of nutrition information is required only once per
standard food item, provided that portion size is reasonably consistent
and the food service establishment follows a standardized recipe and
trains to a consistent method of preparation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1)(a) A covered food facility shall make
the following nutrition information available to consumers for each
standard food item:
(i) The total number of calories;
(ii) The amount of total fat, saturated fat, and trans fat;
(iii) The amount of carbohydrates; and
(iv) The amount of sodium.
(b) The nutrition information shall be determined with a reasonable
basis and disclosed on a per item basis in accordance with the United
States food and drug administration's requirements for disclosure under
the nutrition labeling and education act of 1990.
(2)(a) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a
covered food facility shall disclose in written form the information
listed in subsection (1) of this section, within the facility, by one
or more methods, including, but not limited to:
(i) Menu or other writing at the point of sale;
(ii) Standard food item packaging;
(iii) Counter or table tent;
(iv) Tray liner;
(v) Poster;
(vi) Brochure or other printed material; or
(vii) Electronic medium, including electronic kiosk.
(b) When nutrition information is disclosed by means other than a
menu or other writing at the point of sale, the covered food facility
shall conspicuously display at or near the point of sale a notice that
reads: "NUTRITION INFORMATION IS AVAILABLE UPON REQUEST" or other
similar referral statement that discloses the availability of the
nutrition information.
(3) If a covered food facility provides consumers a point of sale
in an outdoor area drive-thru or drive-in auto stall, then that covered
food facility shall conspicuously display at or near the point of sale
the nutritional information required in subsection (1) of this section
or shall conspicuously display at or near the point of sale a notice
that reads: "NUTRITION INFORMATION IS AVAILABLE UPON REQUEST" or other
similar referral statement that discloses the availability of the
nutrition information by at least one of the methods listed in
subsection (2) of this section.
(4) A covered food facility is exempt from providing the nutrition
information required by subsections (1) and (2) of this section if it
determines with a reasonable basis the total number of calories per
standard food item and provides that information in a size and typeface
similar to other information on the printed menu or on the menu board
next to each standard menu item on the printed menu or menu board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Any food facility may voluntarily provide
under this chapter nutrition information for a standard food item,
provided that all of the nutrients required by section 3(1) of this act
are determined with a reasonable basis and disclosed in written form
within the facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
this chapter is the exclusive authority regarding nutrition
information, including but not limited to, means of determination and
dissemination of nutrition information provided under section 3 or 4 of
this act. If a food facility, not covered under section 2 of this act,
elects to provide the nutritional information required under section 3
of this act in a manner listed under section 3 of this act, then the
state has the same jurisdiction with regard to nutrition information in
that food facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Local boards of health or health districts
are preempted from adopting an ordinance, rule, policy, regulation, or
permit requirement regarding mandatory menu labeling or nutritional
information disclosure at restaurants as shown in section 3 of this
act. Any ordinance, rule, policy, regulation, or permit requirement
regarding mandatory menu labeling or nutritional information disclosure
at restaurants adopted prior to the effective date of this section is
null and void and is superseded by the requirements of section 3 of
this act. However, this chapter does not prohibit a local board of
health or health district from adopting or encouraging voluntary
measures regarding menu labeling or nutritional information disclosure
at restaurants.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act expires January 1, 2013.

--- END ---