BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.215.215 and 2007 c 415 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In determining whether an individual is of appropriate
character, suitability, and competence to obtain a license to provide
child care and early learning services to children, be employed with an
agency, or have access to children in the care of an agency:
The department may consider the history of past involvement of
child protective services or law enforcement agencies with the
individual for the purpose of establishing a pattern of conduct,
behavior, or inaction with regard to the health, safety, or welfare of
a child. No report of child abuse or neglect that has been destroyed
or expunged under RCW 26.44.031 may be used for such purposes. No
unfounded or inconclusive allegation of child abuse or neglect as
defined in RCW 26.44.020 may be disclosed to a provider licensed under
this chapter.
(2) ((In order to determine the suitability of applicants for an
agency license, licensees, their employees, and other persons who have
unsupervised access to children in care, and who have)) The department
may consider the facts and circumstances of a previous licensing
enforcement action taken by the department under this chapter, provided
that the licensing action may not automatically disqualify the
individual from obtaining a license, employment, or access. It is the
burden of the department to show that the facts and circumstances of
the licensing enforcement action are grounds for disqualification of
the individual's current application.
(3) If an individual has not resided in the state of Washington
during the three-year period before being authorized to care for
children, the department shall ((be fingerprinted)) conduct a criminal
history records check with the federal bureau of investigation.
(a) The individual's fingerprints shall be forwarded to the
Washington state patrol and federal bureau of investigation for a
criminal history record check.
(b) The fingerprint criminal history record checks shall be at the
expense of the licensee. The licensee may not pass this cost on to the
employee or prospective employee, unless the employee is determined to
be unsuitable due to his or her criminal history record.
(c) The director shall use the information solely for the purpose
of determining eligibility for a license and for determining the
character, suitability, and competence of those persons or agencies,
excluding parents, not required to be licensed who are authorized to
care for children.
(d) Criminal justice agencies shall provide the director such
information as they may have and that the director may require for such
purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.215 RCW
to read as follows:
If an individual prevails against the department in a judicial
review of a licensing enforcement action as allowed by chapter 34.05
RCW and the court determines that the department's action was arbitrary
and capricious, the individual shall be awarded all costs, including
reasonable attorneys' fees, incurred in connection with such legal
action. In addition, it shall be within the discretion of the court to
award such individual an amount not less than five dollars and not to
exceed one hundred dollars for each day that he or she was denied a
license.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The department of early learning and the
early learning advisory council shall jointly report to the governor
and the appropriate committees of the legislature regarding the
implementation of current activities to improve the quality and safety
of child care licensed pursuant to chapter 43.215 RCW.
(2) The joint report shall report on the status and progress of the
department's and the early learning advisory council's work in the
following areas:
(a) An implementation plan for Washington's quality rating and
improvement system created pursuant to RCW 43.215.100. Prior to
implementing the quality rating and improvement system, the department
of early learning shall present the system to the legislature and the
legislature shall formally approve the implementation of the system
through the omnibus appropriations act or by statute or concurrent
resolution;
(b) The implementation of the state training and registry system;
(c) The implementation of practices to enhance outreach and
education to consumers and the general public regarding: The
department's toll-free number established under RCW 43.215.520; the
department's web site regarding child care licensing and enforcement
actions as provided in RCW 43.215.525, 43.215.530 and 43.215.370; and
any other items related to parent and consumer access to accurate
information about child care;
(d) Efforts concerning public education regarding unlicensed child
care;
(e) The results of negotiated rule making for family child care
licensees as provided in RCW 43.215.350 and, if applicable, negotiated
rule making for child day care centers;
(f) If applicable, any evaluation of the roles and responsibilities
of the child care resource and referral network in providing
information to assist parents in making informed child care decisions;
and
(g) If applicable, efforts regarding the establishment of statewide
standards for licensed child care provider preservice and continuing
training and education.
(3) The preliminary joint report shall be provided to the
governor's office and the appropriate committees of the legislature by
December 1, 2008, with a final report presented by June 30, 2009.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2009.

--- END ---