BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35A.14 RCW
to read as follows:
When the zoning of any unincorporated territory that as of January
1, 2008: (1) Is located in a home rule charter county with a
population over one million; (2) contains no residents; (3) is entirely
surrounded by the territory of one incorporated city; and (4) is not
part of the urban growth area of the surrounding city, is changed by
the county to allow residential development, or is changed by the
county to allow more dense residential development, the territory shall
immediately be deemed as annexed to the surrounding city and that city
shall zone the annexed territory to allow, at a minimum, six dwelling
units per acre.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---