BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that victims of
identity theft who try to file police incident reports in either the
jurisdiction where any part of the crime occurred, or in the
jurisdiction in which the victim resides, are sometimes prohibited by
the police department from doing so. Several statutes previously
passed by the legislature require a victim of identity theft to possess
and display a police incident report as a condition of enforcing the
rights provided by certain statutes. A police incident report is
necessary for an identity theft victim to exercise certain state and
federal rights, and is helpful in asserting the rights of others.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 9.35 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person who has learned or reasonably suspects that his or her
financial information or means of identification has been unlawfully
obtained, used by, or disclosed to another, as described in this
chapter, may file an incident report with a law enforcement agency, by
contacting the local law enforcement agency that has jurisdiction over
his or her actual residence, place of business, or place where the
crime occurred. The law enforcement agency shall create a police
incident report of the matter and provide the complainant with a copy
of that report, and may refer the incident report to another law
enforcement agency.
(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a law
enforcement agency to investigate reports claiming identity theft. An
incident report filed under this section is not required to be counted
as an open case for purposes of compiling open case statistics.

--- END ---