BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that high school
students need to graduate with the skills necessary to be successful in
college and work. The state graduation requirements help to ensure
that Washington high school graduates have the basic skills to be
competitive in a global economy. Under education reform started in
1993, time was to be the variable, obtaining the skills was to be the
constant. Therefore, students who need additional time to gain the
academic skills needed for college and the workplace should have the
opportunities they need to reach high academic achievement, even if
that takes more than the standard four years of high school.
Different students face different challenges and barriers to their
academic success. Some students struggle to meet the standard on a
single portion of the Washington assessment of student learning while
excelling in the other subject areas; other students struggle to
complete the necessary state or local graduation credits; while still
others have their knowledge tested on the assessments and have
completed all the credit requirements but are struggling because
English is not their first language. The legislature finds that many
of these students need additional time and support to achieve academic
proficiency and meet all graduation requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The extended learning opportunities program is created for
eligible eleventh and twelfth grade students who are not on track to
meet local or state graduation requirements as well as eighth grade
students who may not be on track to meet the standard on the Washington
assessment of student learning or need additional assistance in order
to have the opportunity for a successful entry into high school. The
program shall provide early notification of graduation status,
information on education opportunities including preapprenticeship
programs that are available, and incentives for new district programs.
(2) Schools shall notify eligible students and their parents or
legal guardians about the status of their progress on state and local
graduation requirements, the alternative assessment opportunities
available to students under RCW 28A.655.061 and 28A.655.065, and
regarding continued instructional services identified in section 3 of
this act. Information provided to students and their parents or legal
guardians must include:
(a) Any credit deficiencies;
(b) The students' attendance rates over the past two years;
(c) Whether they have completed other graduation requirements
established by the state board of education or the legislature;
(d) If the student is in a transitional bilingual program, the
score on his or her Washington language proficiency test II;
(e) Remediation strategies and alternative education options
available to students including, but not limited to, informing students
of the option to continue to receive instructional services after grade
twelve or until the age of twenty-one. This may include:
(i) School district programs, high school courses, and career and
technical education options available for students to meet graduation
requirements;
(ii) Available programs offered through skill centers or community
or technical colleges.
(3) The first notification of information in subsection (2) of this
section shall take place in the spring of the eighth grade year for
students who did not meet the standard on the Washington assessment of
student learning. The second notification shall take place in the
spring of the eleventh grade year and then, if necessary, the spring of
the twelfth grade year for students who are not on track to meet state
and local graduation requirements. Schools may notify students and
their parents or guardians through school conferences, written
notification, or in the student learning plan identified under RCW
28A.655.061. Schools serving English language learners and their
parents shall translate information in the primary language of the
family to the extent feasible. Notifications shall begin with the
graduating class of 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Under the extended learning opportunities program, districts
shall make available to students in grade twelve who have failed to
meet one or more local or state graduation requirements the option of
continuing enrollment in the school district in accordance with RCW
28A.225.160. Districts are authorized to use basic education program
funding to provide instruction to eligible students under RCW
28A.150.220(3).
(2) Under the extended learning program, instructional services for
eligible students in grades eight, eleven, and twelve can occur during
the regular school day, evenings, on weekends, or at a time and
location deemed appropriate by the school district, including the
educational service district, in order to meet the needs of these
students. Instructional services provided under this section do not
include services offered at private schools. Instructional services
can include, but are not limited to, the following:
(a) Individual or small group instruction;
(b) Instruction in English language arts and/or mathematics that
eligible students need to pass all or part of the Washington assessment
of student learning;
(c) Attendance in a public high school or public alternative school
classes or at a skill center;
(d) Inclusion in remediation programs, including summer school;
(e) Language development instruction for English language learners;
(f) Online curriculum and instructional support, including programs
for credit retrieval and Washington assessment of student learning
preparatory classes; and
(g) Reading improvement specialists available at the educational
service districts to serve eighth, eleventh, and twelfth grade
educators through professional development in accordance with RCW
28A.415.350. The reading improvement specialist may also provide
direct services to eighth, eleventh, and twelfth grade students and
those students electing to continue a fifth year in a high school
program, and who are still struggling with basic reading skills.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.165.035 and 2004 c 20 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Use of best practices magnifies the opportunities for student
success. The following are services and activities that may be
supported by the learning assistance program:
(1) Extended learning time opportunities occurring:
(a) Before or after the regular school day;
(b) On Saturday; and
(c) Beyond the regular school year;
(2) Services and funding under section 3 of this act;
(3) Professional development for certificated and classified staff
that focuses on:
(a) The needs of a diverse student population;
(b) Specific literacy and mathematics content and instructional
strategies; and
(c) The use of student work to guide effective instruction;
(((3))) (4) Consultant teachers to assist in implementing effective
instructional practices by teachers serving participating students;
(((4))) (5) Tutoring support for participating students; and
(((5))) (6) Outreach activities and support for parents of
participating students.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 28A.630
RCW to read as follows:
(1) If funding is appropriated for this purpose, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall explore online curriculum
support in languages other than English that are currently available.
By December 1, 2008, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature recommendations for other online support in other languages
that would most appropriately assist Washington's English language
learners. Included in the recommendations shall be the actions that
would need to be taken to access the recommended online support and the
cost.
(2) This section expires June 30, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
(1) If funding is appropriated for this purpose, school districts
shall provide all ninth graders enrolled in the district the option of
taking the PSAT at no cost to the student.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
enter into an agreement with the firm that administers the PSAT to
reimburse the firm for the testing fees of students who take the test.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The legislature intends to build on the
lessons learned in the Lorraine Wojahn dyslexia pilot reading program,
which the legislature has funded since 2005.
(2) By September 15, 2008, each of the grant recipients shall
report to the office of the superintendent of public instruction on the
lessons learned in the pilot program regarding effective assessment and
intervention programs to help students with dyslexia or characteristics
of dyslexia, best practices for professional development, and
strategies to build capacity and sustainability among teaching staff.
(3) By December 31, 2008, the office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall aggregate the reports from the grant
recipients and provide a report and recommendations to the appropriate
committees of the legislature. The recommendations shall include how
the lessons learned through the pilot program are best shared with
school districts and how the best practices can be implemented
statewide.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 28A.310
RCW to read as follows:
Educational service districts shall develop and provide a program
of outreach to community-based programs and organizations within the
district that are serving non-English speaking segments of the
population as well as those programs that target subgroups of students
that may be struggling academically, including to the extent possible,
African-American, Native American, Asian, Pacific Islander, Hispanic,
low income, and special education. Educational service districts shall
consult and coordinate with the governor's minority commissions and the
governor's office of Indian affairs in order to efficiently conduct
this outreach and are encouraged to enter into partnerships with
representatives of the local business communities in order to develop
a coordinated outreach plan. The purpose of the outreach activities
shall be to inform students via the various community-based programs
and organizations of the educational opportunities available under
chapter . . ., Laws of 2008 (this act) and to engage them in the
process as appropriate. Outreach shall at a minimum include
information about the availability of dropout and credit retrieval
programs, remediation programs, and extended learning opportunities,
including fifth year opportunities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) The legislature finds that educators are
faced with the complex responsibility of educating an increasing
population of English language learners who speak a wide variety of
languages and dialects and may come with varying levels of formal
schooling, students who come from low-income households, and students
who have learning disabilities. These educators struggle to provide
meaningful instruction that helps students meet high content standards
while overcoming their challenges. The 2007 legislature directed the
professional educator standards board to begin the process of adopting
new certification requirements and revising the higher education
teacher preparation program requirements. Additionally, the office of
the superintendent of public instruction was directed to contract with
the northwest regional educational laboratory to review and report on
the ongoing English as a second language pilot projects and best
practices related to helping students who are English language
learners. It is therefore the intent of the legislature to build upon
the work started in 2007 by requiring that the professional educator
standards board consider the findings of the northwest regional
educational laboratory and incorporate into its ongoing work a review
of how to revise the current certification requirements and teacher
preparation programs in order to better serve the needs of English
language learners.
(2) The professional educator standards board shall convene a work
group to develop recommendations for increasing teacher knowledge,
skills, and competencies to address the needs of English language
learner students. The work group shall include representatives from
the Washington association of colleges for teacher education, school
districts with significant populations of English language learner
students who speak a single language, school districts with significant
populations of English language learner students who speak multiple
languages, classroom teachers, English as a second language teachers,
bilingual education teachers, principals, the migrant and bilingual
education office in the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, and the higher education coordinating board. In making
its selections, the professional educator standards board will include
members from diverse cultural backgrounds and strive to promote
geographic balance. The professional educator standards board shall
invite participation by the northwest regional educational laboratory.
(3) The work group shall identify gaps and weaknesses in the
current knowledge and skills standards for teacher preparation and
teacher competencies regarding understanding how students acquire
language, how to teach academic content in English to non-English
speakers, and how to demonstrate cultural competence. The work group
shall look to the English as a second language demonstration projects
under RCW 28A.630.058 and the accompanying research and evaluation by
the northwest regional educational laboratory.
(4)(a) The work group shall submit an interim report by December 1,
2008, to the governor and the education and higher education committees
of the legislature with initial findings and general recommendations to
improve the teacher preparation knowledge and skills standards and
teacher competencies in the areas identified under subsection (2) of
this section. Recommendations shall also include what professional
development program components are most effective for existing
educators of English language learners.
(b) A final report shall be submitted to the governor and the
education and higher education committees of the legislature with
specific recommendations by December 1, 2009.

Sec. 10 RCW 28B.118.010 and 2007 c 405 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The higher education coordinating board shall design the Washington
college bound scholarship program in accordance with this section.
(1) "Eligible students" are those students who qualify for free or
reduced-price lunches. If a student qualifies in the seventh grade,
the student remains eligible even if the student does not receive free
or reduced-price lunches thereafter.
(2) Eligible students shall be notified of their eligibility for
the Washington college bound scholarship program beginning in their
seventh grade year. Students shall also be notified of the
requirements for award of the scholarship.
(3) To be eligible for a Washington college bound scholarship, a
student must sign a pledge during seventh or eighth grade that includes
a commitment to graduate from high school with at least a C average and
with no felony convictions. Students who were in the eighth grade
during the 2007-08 school year may sign the pledge during the 2008-09
school year. The pledge must be witnessed by a parent or guardian and
forwarded to the higher education coordinating board by mail or
electronically, as indicated on the pledge form.
(4)(a) Scholarships shall be awarded to eligible students
graduating from public high schools, approved private high schools
under chapter 28A.195 RCW, or who received home-based instruction under
chapter 28A.200 RCW.
(b) To receive the Washington college bound scholarship, a student
must graduate with at least a "C" average from a public high school or
an approved private high school under chapter 28A.195 RCW in Washington
or have received home-based instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW, must
have no felony convictions, and must be a resident student as defined
in RCW 28B.15.012(2) (a) through (d).
(5) A student's family income will be assessed upon graduation
before awarding the scholarship.
(6) If at graduation from high school the student's family income
does not exceed sixty-five percent of the state median family income,
scholarship award amounts shall be as provided in this section.
(a) For students attending two or four-year institutions of higher
education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, the value of the award shall be
(i) the difference between the student's tuition and required fees,
less the value of any state-funded grant, scholarship, or waiver
assistance the student receives; (ii) plus five hundred dollars for
books and materials.
(b) For students attending private four-year institutions of higher
education in Washington, the award amount shall be the representative
average of awards granted to students in public research universities
in Washington.
(c) For students attending private vocational schools in
Washington, the award amount shall be the representative average of
awards granted to students in public community and technical colleges
in Washington.
(7) Recipients may receive no more than four full-time years' worth
of scholarship awards.
(8) Institutions of higher education shall award the student all
need-based and merit-based financial aid for which the student would
otherwise qualify. The Washington college bound scholarship is
intended to replace unmet need, loans, and, at the student's option,
work-study award before any other grants or scholarships are reduced.
(9) The first scholarships shall be awarded to students graduating
in 2012.
(10) The state of Washington retains legal ownership of tuition
units awarded as scholarships under this chapter until the tuition
units are redeemed. These tuition units shall remain separately held
from any tuition units owned under chapter 28B.95 RCW by a Washington
college bound scholarship recipient.
(11) The scholarship award must be used within five years of
receipt. Any unused scholarship tuition units revert to the Washington
college bound scholarship account.
(12) Should the recipient terminate his or her enrollment for any
reason during the academic year, the unused portion of the scholarship
tuition units shall revert to the Washington college bound scholarship
account.

--- END ---