BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.95N.290 and 2006 c 183 s 30 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The authority is governed by a board of directors. The
board of directors is comprised of eleven participating manufacturers,
appointed by the director of the department. Five board positions are
reserved for representatives of the top ten brand owners by return
share of covered electronic products, and six board positions are
reserved for representatives of other brands, including at least one
board position reserved for a manufacturer who is also a retailer
selling their own private label. The return share of covered
electronic products used to determine the top ten brand owners for
purposes of electing the board must be determined by the department by
January 1, 2007.
(b) The board must have representation from both television and
computer manufacturers.
(2) The board shall select from its membership the chair of the
board and such other officers as it deems appropriate.
(3) A majority of the board constitutes a quorum.
(4) The directors of the department of community, trade, and
economic development and the department of ecology((, and the state
treasurer)) serve as ex officio members. The state agency directors
((and the state treasurer)) serving in ex officio capacity may each
designate an employee of their respective departments to act on their
behalf in all respects with regard to any matter to come before the
authority. Ex officio designations must be made in writing and
communicated to the authority director.
(5) The board shall create its own bylaws in accordance with the
laws of the state of Washington.
(6) Any member of the board may be removed for misfeasance,
malfeasance, or willful neglect of duty after notice and a public
hearing, unless the notice and hearing are expressly waived in writing
by the affected member.
(7) The members of the board serve without compensation but are
entitled to reimbursement, solely from the funds of the authority, for
expenses incurred in the discharge of their duties under this chapter.

--- END ---