BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that reducing
greenhouse gases is critical to mitigating the effects of climate
change. There is currently much scientific dialogue about the impacts
of human-caused carbon dioxide emissions and other greenhouse gases to
the atmosphere. It is important to take prudent steps now to reduce
the effects of human activities on the climate. One step is to
influence the amount of human-caused carbon dioxide that is added to or
sequestered from the atmosphere through conserving and managing forests
and producing long-lived forest products.
The legislature finds that managed forests have the potential to
provide a reduction in the emissions of carbon dioxide. Forests
provide long-term storage pools and active carbon sinks. Additionally,
they provide durable wood-based materials that can substitute for
higher energy consuming products such as steel and concrete.
For many, investments in more efficient ways to derive energy-powered services and forestry-based carbon offsets are proving to be a
cost-effective part of an overall emissions reduction and offset
program. Providing carbon credits to the forest industry could be an
economic incentive that would maintain Washington's forest land base.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The director of the department of
ecology shall design a market-based cap and trade system consistent
with the goals established by the legislature in RCW 80.80.020. In
designing the market-based system to achieve the emissions goals
established in RCW 80.80.020, the director shall:
(a) Attempt, to the extent possible, to coordinate the development
of a cap and trade system with other entities, such as the western
climate initiative;
(b) Seek to ensure that the system is equitable, administratively
simple for government and private participants, and minimizes
administrative costs; and
(c) In conjunction with the department of community, trade, and
economic development and section 3 of this act, establish voluntary
allowances and accounting systems for carbon storage within the forest
industry.
(2) The director of the department of ecology, in conjunction with
the department of transportation, and the department of licensing,
shall establish a method to require every vehicle registered in the
state to annually purchase carbon credits based on a greenhouse gas
index or rating system for motor vehicle emissions when renewing their
vehicle licenses according to chapter 46.16 RCW from the forestry
carbon offset program established in section 3 of this act.
(3) The director of the department of ecology must not require
emissions reporting for forestry activities regulated under chapter
76.09 RCW and RCW 70.94.660.
(4) The director of the department of ecology, in conjunction with
the department of revenue, shall develop options for a method to
require manufacturers, wholesalers, and retailers who sell products in
Washington that are produced with a carbon intensive process, including
foreign manufactured products, to purchase carbon credits from the
forestry carbon offset program established in section 3 of this act.
(5) The director of the department of ecology must adopt rules that
define principles and standards relating to the creation, measurement,
accounting, marketing, verifying, registering, transferring, and
selling of carbon offsets for Washington's auto industry, providing
credit for the California motor vehicle emission standards effective
January 1, 2005, under chapter 70.94 RCW.
(6) The director of the department of ecology shall report to the
legislature by December 1, 2008, on the following:
(a) The progress to date in achieving the requirements of this
section;
(b) Recommendations on future directions; and
(c) Any additional resources and statutory authority needed to
implement the voluntary forestry carbon offset program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The director of the department of
community, trade, and economic development shall design and implement
a forestry carbon offset program. For purposes of this section,
"forestry carbon offset" means a transferable unit based on a measured
amount of carbon storage expressed as a carbon dioxide equivalent and
accruing on forest land as live or dead matter in trees, shrubs, forest
litter, and soil, and in forest products.
(2) The director of the department of community, trade, and
economic development shall establish a forestry carbon offset program
advisory group. The advisory group consists of at least nine persons
and must contain:
(a) A representative from the department of natural resources;
(b) A representative from the department of fish and wildlife;
(c) A representative from the department of ecology;
(d) Representatives from private forest landowners and the forest
products industry;
(e) A representative from a nongovernmental forestry conservation
organization; and
(f) Representatives from businesses, governmental agencies, and
nongovernmental organizations with knowledge and experience in the
accounting of carbon sequestration and storage.
(3) The director of the department of community, trade, and
economic development, in conjunction with the forestry carbon offset
program advisory group, shall develop administrative rules that define
principles and standards relating to the creation, measurement,
accounting, marketing, verifying, registering, transferring, and
selling of forestry carbon offsets from forest lands subject to the
forest practices act, chapter 76.09 RCW.
(4) Rules adopted under this section must set standards to ensure
that in order to be marketed, registered, transferred, or sold, a
forestry carbon offset must be created as a result of forest management
activities that:
(a) Have the effect of increasing carbon storage on forest lands
and products as measured by a forestry carbon offset accounting system;
and
(b) Provide environmental, social, and economic benefits for
Washington and its citizens including, but not limited to, protection
or enhancement of long-term timber supplies, native fish and wildlife
habitat, and water quality.
(5) The director of the department of community, trade, and
economic development shall contract with the college of forest
resources at the University of Washington who shall work in conjunction
with a nonprofit consortium involved in research on renewable
industrial materials, to establish a formula to ensure that the
forestry carbon offset accounting system:
(a) Accounts for relevant sources of carbon credits for carbon
storage or sequestration;
(b) Accounts for duration and permanence of the carbon storage or
emission reductions;
(c) Includes provisions for establishing the appropriate baseline
for forestry and forest product manufacturing practices from which
carbon credits for carbon storage or sequestration may be measured.
The baseline must be based on minimum compliance with the forest
practices rules adopted under chapter 76.09 RCW as of January 1, 1990;
(d) Accounts for site-class specific forest management practices,
including provisions for establishing carbon credits for carbon storage
or sequestration, from the implementation of practices contributing to
increased carbon for a given rotation or independent of rotation, if
necessary, to meet regulatory requirements;
(e) Accounts for carbon credits for carbon storage resulting from
harvesting for wood products and the collection of biomass for biofuel
or other products;
(f) Accounts for environmental, social, and economic benefits of
forestry carbon offsets by ensuring that forest landowners that
participate in the system are actively managing their forests; and
(g) Encourages third-party verification (certification) of forestry
carbon offsets.
(6) Rules adopted under this section may address qualifications for
persons and agencies that provide third-party verification and
registration of forestry carbon offsets.
(7) The director of the department of community, trade, and
economic development shall report to the legislature by December 1,
2008, on the following:
(a) The progress to date in achieving the requirements of this
section;
(b) Recommendations on future directions; and
(c) Any additional resources and statutory authority needed to
implement the voluntary forestry carbon offset program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---