BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 2.36.100 and 1992 c 93 s 5 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Except for a person who is not qualified for jury service under
RCW 2.36.070, no person may be excused from jury service by the court
except:
(a) When the person is seventy-five years of age or older and
notifies the court of the person's decision not to serve, in which case
the person's name shall be removed from further consideration as a
juror from the master jury list; provided that:
(i) No person who is seventy-five years of age or older shall be
required to apply for this exemption;
(ii) The person may be reinstated to the master jury list by
submitting a signed, written request asking to be reinstated; and
(iii) Each court shall establish procedures to allow the person, or
another person having a power of attorney or other legal authority to
act in the person's behalf, to notify the court of the person's
decision not to serve; provided that no person who is seventy-five
years of age or older shall be required to make a personal appearance
in court;
(b) Upon a showing of undue hardship, extreme inconvenience, or
public necessity((,)); or
(c) For any reason deemed sufficient by the court for a period of
time the court deems necessary.
(2) At the discretion of the court's designee, after a request by
a prospective juror to be excused, a prospective juror excused from
juror service for a particular time may be assigned to another jury
term within the twelve-month period. If the assignment to another jury
term is made at the time a juror is excused from the jury term for
which he or she was summoned, a second summons under RCW 2.36.095 need
not be issued.
(3) When the jury source list has been fully summoned within a
consecutive twelve-month period and additional jurors are needed,
jurors who have already served during the consecutive twelve-month
period may be summoned again for service. A juror who has previously
served may only be excused if he or she served at least two weeks of
juror service within the preceding twelve months. An excuse for prior
service shall be granted only upon the written request of the
prospective juror, which request shall certify the terms of prior
service. Prior jury service may include service in superior court, in
a court of limited jurisdiction, in the United States District Court,
or on a jury of inquest.

--- END ---