BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 64.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The declaration, bylaws, governing documents, or association of
apartment owners may not prohibit the display of political signs by an
owner or resident on the owner's or resident's property, including the
external doors and windows of the owner's or resident's property,
before any primary or general election. The governing documents or
association of apartment owners may include reasonable rules and
regulations regarding the placement and manner of display of political
signs.
(2) This section applies retroactively to any declaration, bylaws,
and governing documents in effect on the effective date of this
section. Any provision in a governing document in effect on the
effective date of this section that is inconsistent with this section
is void and unenforceable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 64.34 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The declaration, bylaws, governing documents, or unit owners'
association may not prohibit the display of political signs by an owner
or resident on the unit owner's or resident's property, including the
external doors and windows of the unit owner's or resident's property,
before any primary or general election. The governing documents or
unit owners' association may include reasonable rules and regulations
regarding the placement and manner of display of political signs.
(2) This section applies retroactively to any declaration, bylaws,
and governing documents in effect on the effective date of this
section. Any provision in a governing document in effect on the
effective date of this section that is inconsistent with this section
is void and unenforceable.

--- END ---