BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.20A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) At the request of a home care, home health, or hospice agency
licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW unless otherwise prohibited by law,
the department shall provide information in the possession of the
department's background check central unit stating whether a home care
aide, home health care aide, or applicant is the subject of the
following:
(a) A civil adjudication proceeding finding of, or upholding an
agency finding of, domestic violence, abuse, sexual abuse, neglect,
abandonment, exploitation, financial exploitation, or misappropriation
of resident funds or property, under any applicable chapter including
but not limited to chapters 13.34, 18.51, 18.130, 26.44, 26.50, 74.34,
and 74.42 RCW, or rules adopted under these or other applicable
chapters;
(b) A final finding by adult protective services, resident
protection, or supported living program; or
(c) A final finding by child protective services.
(2) The department shall provide the requested information with
reasonable promptness, and may charge a reasonable fee for the costs of
this service.
(3) The department may adopt rules to implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.20A RCW
to read as follows:
Unless permitted by law, or an authorized written release is
provided, the department shall not release substantive information
about the nature of the civil adjudication proceedings findings.

--- END ---