BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.63A.720 and 1995 c 353 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is established in the department of community, trade, and
economic development a grant program to enhance funding for
prostitution prevention and intervention services, law enforcement
training, and community outreach and education. Activities that can be
funded through this grant program ((shall provide effective
prostitution prevention and intervention services, such as counseling,
parenting, housing relief, education, and vocational training, that:
(1) Comprehensively address the problems of persons who are
prostitutes; and
(2) Enhance the ability of persons to leave or avoid prostitution))
include but are not limited to:
(a) Services directed to address the impact of sexual assault,
residential treatment and services, mental health and chemical
dependency services, parenting services, housing assistance, education
and vocational training, or intensive case management services. These
activities must (i) address the problems of persons who are either
prostitutes or minors who have a history of engaging in sexual conduct
for a fee or who are victims of commercial sexual abuse of a minor or
both; and (ii) enhance the ability of persons to leave or avoid
prostitution or to cease or avoid being a victim of commercial sexual
abuse of a minor; or
(b) Law enforcement training, community outreach, and education
regarding prostitution and minors who have a history of engaging in
sexual conduct for a fee or are the victims of commercial sexual abuse
of a minor, including law enforcement training regarding the
availability of services for minors under chapter 13.32A RCW.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "commercial sexual abuse of
a minor" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 9.68A.100.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.63A.730 and 1995 c 353 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) At a minimum, grant applications to provide services under RCW
43.63A.720(1)(a) must include the following:
(((1))) (a) The proposed geographic service area;
(((2))) (b) A description of the extent and effect of the needs for
prostitution prevention and intervention within the relevant geographic
area;
(((3))) (c) An explanation of how the funds will be used, their
relationship to existing services available within the community, and
the need that they will fulfill;
(((4))) (d) An explanation of what organizations were involved in
the development of the proposal; and
(((5))) (e) The methods that will be employed to measure the
success of the program.
(2) At a minimum, grant applications to provide services under RCW
43.63A.720(1)(b) must include the following:
(a) The proposed geographic outreach and education area or proposed
selected law enforcement population, as applicable;
(b) An explanation of how the funds will be used, their
relationship to existing training, outreach or education services
available within the community, and the need that they will fulfill;
(c) An explanation of what organizations were involved in the
development of the proposal; and
(d) The methods that will be employed to measure the success of the
program.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.63A.740 and 1995 c 353 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
The prostitution prevention and intervention account is created in
the state treasury. All designated receipts from fees under RCW
9.68A.105 and 9A.88.120 shall be deposited into the account.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for funding the grant
program ((to enhance prostitution prevention and intervention
services)) as provided under RCW 43.63A.720.

--- END ---