BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Hundreds of thousands of patients in
Washington need translation and interpretation services to understand
medical instructions and diagnoses and to communicate clearly with
their doctors. For them, translation and interpretation are essential
to assuring that they receive the high quality health care called for
by the state's blue ribbon commission. The health care system in the
state is not currently meeting the needs of these patients, largely
because of unanswered questions about how to fund needed language
services.
Studies document that limited English speakers are less likely to
have a regular primary care provider or receive preventative care and
more likely to experience medical errors, all of which lead to negative
health outcomes and higher long-term costs to the health care system.
Furthermore, language barriers impede informed consent for treatment or
surgical procedures, leaving health care organizations and providers
vulnerable to potentially costly lawsuits.
According to the 2005 American community survey, four hundred
fifty-four thousand Washington residents speak English less than very
well. Title VI of the civil rights act of 1964 and executive orders
issued by President Clinton and President Bush establish the
requirement that health care providers who serve patients in federally
funded programs must provide language access services to all patients
with limited English proficiency. Nevertheless, most health care
providers lack systems and financial resources to provide these
services.
In a 2006 national survey of hospitals, forty-eight percent cited
cost and reimbursement concerns as a primary barrier to providing
language services. In Washington state, medicaid and the state
children's health insurance program reimburse health care providers for
interpreter services. Private insurers and the Washington basic health
plan do not. Quality language services lead to better health outcomes
and long-term cost savings to the health care system, and the private
and public sectors should share the responsibility of covering the cost
of these vital services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The insurance commissioner shall conduct a
study of language access problems encountered by consumers who purchase
health insurance contracts in the state of Washington. Such study
shall include an analysis and recommendations regarding:
(1) Health care problems encountered by consumers with limited
English proficiency;
(2) Barriers that language problems provide for the understanding
of insurance contracts, costs, and the resolution of disputes between
consumers and health care providers;
(3) The feasibility and benefit of requiring health care insurers
to provide for communication with limited English proficiency customers
in languages other than English; and
(4) The feasibility of instituting interpretation and translation
services by the office of the insurance commissioner for Washington
residents to help them receive consumer advice and dispute resolution
assistance in languages that they speak and understand. The results of
this analysis and associated recommendations shall be reported to the
governor and the legislature no later than January 1, 2009.

--- END ---