BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.41.070 and 2002 c 302 s 703 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The chief of police of a municipality or the sheriff of a
county shall within thirty days after the filing of an application of
any person, issue a license to such person to carry a pistol concealed
on his or her person within this state for five years from date of
issue, for the purposes of protection or while engaged in business,
sport, or while traveling. However, if the applicant does not have a
valid permanent Washington driver's license or Washington state
identification card or has not been a resident of the state for the
previous consecutive ninety days, the issuing authority shall have up
to sixty days after the filing of the application to issue a license.
The issuing authority shall not refuse to accept completed applications
for concealed pistol licenses during regular business hours.
(2) For the purposes of this section, any person who is an active
duty member of the United States armed forces, including the national
guard and armed forces reserves stationed in the state, shall be
considered a resident of the state even if he or she:
(a) Maintains a residence in another state and claims that
residence for voting or tax purposes; or
(b) Does not have a valid permanent Washington driver's license or
Washington state identification card, but does have a valid out-of-state driver's license or an identification card issued by another
state.
(3) The applicant's constitutional right to bear arms shall not be
denied, unless:
(a) He or she is ineligible to possess a firearm under the
provisions of RCW 9.41.040 or 9.41.045;
(b) The applicant's concealed pistol license is in a revoked
status;
(c) He or she is under twenty-one years of age;
(d) He or she is subject to a court order or injunction regarding
firearms pursuant to RCW 9A.46.080, 10.14.080, 10.99.040, 10.99.045,
26.09.050, 26.09.060, 26.10.040, 26.10.115, 26.26.130, 26.50.060,
26.50.070, or 26.26.590;
(e) He or she is free on bond or personal recognizance pending
trial, appeal, or sentencing for a felony offense;
(f) He or she has an outstanding warrant for his or her arrest from
any court of competent jurisdiction for a felony or misdemeanor; or
(g) He or she has been ordered to forfeit a firearm under RCW
9.41.098(1)(e) within one year before filing an application to carry a
pistol concealed on his or her person.
No person convicted of a felony may have his or her right to
possess firearms restored or his or her privilege to carry a concealed
pistol restored, unless the person has been granted relief from
disabilities by the secretary of the treasury under 18 U.S.C. Sec.
925(c), or RCW 9.41.040 (3) or (4) applies.
(((2))) (4) The issuing authority shall check with the national
crime information center, the Washington state patrol electronic
database, the department of social and health services electronic
database, and with other agencies or resources as appropriate, to
determine whether the applicant is ineligible under RCW 9.41.040 or
9.41.045 to possess a firearm and therefore ineligible for a concealed
pistol license. This subsection applies whether the applicant is
applying for a new concealed pistol license or to renew a concealed
pistol license.
(((3))) (5) Any person whose firearms rights have been restricted
and who has been granted relief from disabilities by the secretary of
the treasury under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 925(c) or who is exempt under 18
U.S.C. Sec. 921(a)(20)(A) shall have his or her right to acquire,
receive, transfer, ship, transport, carry, and possess firearms in
accordance with Washington state law restored except as otherwise
prohibited by this chapter.
(((4))) (6) The license application shall bear the full name,
residential address, telephone number at the option of the applicant,
date and place of birth, race, gender, description, not more than two
complete sets of fingerprints, and signature of the licensee, and the
licensee's driver's license number or state identification card number
if used for identification in applying for the license. A signed
application for a concealed pistol license shall constitute a waiver of
confidentiality and written request that the department of social and
health services, mental health institutions, and other health care
facilities release information relevant to the applicant's eligibility
for a concealed pistol license to an inquiring court or law enforcement
agency.
The application for an original license shall include two complete
sets of fingerprints to be forwarded to the Washington state patrol.
The license and application shall contain a warning substantially
as follows:

CAUTION: Although state and local laws do not differ, federal
law and state law on the possession of firearms differ. If you
are prohibited by federal law from possessing a firearm, you
may be prosecuted in federal court. A state license is not a
defense to a federal prosecution.

The license shall contain a description of the major differences
between state and federal law and an explanation of the fact that local
laws and ordinances on firearms are preempted by state law and must be
consistent with state law. The application shall contain questions
about the applicant's eligibility under RCW 9.41.040 to possess a
pistol, the applicant's place of birth, and whether the applicant is a
United States citizen. The applicant shall not be required to produce
a birth certificate or other evidence of citizenship. A person who is
not a citizen of the United States shall meet the additional
requirements of RCW 9.41.170 and produce proof of compliance with RCW
9.41.170 upon application. The license shall be in triplicate and in
a form to be prescribed by the department of licensing.
The original thereof shall be delivered to the licensee, the
duplicate shall within seven days be sent to the director of licensing
and the triplicate shall be preserved for six years, by the authority
issuing the license.
The department of licensing shall make available to law enforcement
and corrections agencies, in an on-line format, all information
received under this subsection.
(((5))) (7) The nonrefundable fee, paid upon application, for the
original five-year license shall be thirty-six dollars plus additional
charges imposed by the Federal Bureau of Investigation that are passed
on to the applicant. No other state or local branch or unit of
government may impose any additional charges on the applicant for the
issuance of the license.
The fee shall be distributed as follows:
(a) Fifteen dollars shall be paid to the state general fund;
(b) Four dollars shall be paid to the agency taking the
fingerprints of the person licensed;
(c) Fourteen dollars shall be paid to the issuing authority for the
purpose of enforcing this chapter; and
(d) Three dollars to the firearms range account in the general
fund.
(((6))) (8) The nonrefundable fee for the renewal of such license
shall be thirty-two dollars. No other branch or unit of government may
impose any additional charges on the applicant for the renewal of the
license.
The renewal fee shall be distributed as follows:
(a) Fifteen dollars shall be paid to the state general fund;
(b) Fourteen dollars shall be paid to the issuing authority for the
purpose of enforcing this chapter; and
(c) Three dollars to the firearms range account in the general
fund.
(((7))) (9) The nonrefundable fee for replacement of lost or
damaged licenses is ten dollars to be paid to the issuing authority.
(((8))) (10) Payment shall be by cash, check, or money order at the
option of the applicant. Additional methods of payment may be allowed
at the option of the issuing authority.
(((9))) (11) A licensee may renew a license if the licensee applies
for renewal within ninety days before or after the expiration date of
the license. A license so renewed shall take effect on the expiration
date of the prior license. A licensee renewing after the expiration
date of the license must pay a late renewal penalty of ten dollars in
addition to the renewal fee specified in subsection (((6))) (8) of this
section. The fee shall be distributed as follows:
(a) Three dollars shall be deposited in the state wildlife ((fund))
account and used exclusively first for the printing and distribution of
a pamphlet on the legal limits of the use of firearms, firearms safety,
and the preemptive nature of state law, and subsequently the support of
volunteer instructors in the basic firearms safety training program
conducted by the department of fish and wildlife. The pamphlet shall
be given to each applicant for a license; and
(b) Seven dollars shall be paid to the issuing authority for the
purpose of enforcing this chapter.
(((10))) (12) Notwithstanding the requirements of subsections (1)
through (((9))) (11) of this section, the chief of police of the
municipality or the sheriff of the county of the applicant's residence
may issue a temporary emergency license for good cause pending review
under subsection (1) of this section. However, a temporary emergency
license issued under this subsection shall not exempt the holder of the
license from any records check requirement. Temporary emergency
licenses shall be easily distinguishable from regular licenses.
(((11))) (13) A political subdivision of the state shall not modify
the requirements of this section or chapter, nor may a political
subdivision ask the applicant to voluntarily submit any information not
required by this section.
(((12))) (14) A person who knowingly makes a false statement
regarding citizenship or identity on an application for a concealed
pistol license is guilty of false swearing under RCW 9A.72.040. In
addition to any other penalty provided for by law, the concealed pistol
license of a person who knowingly makes a false statement shall be
revoked, and the person shall be permanently ineligible for a concealed
pistol license.
(((13))) (15) A person may apply for a concealed pistol license:
(a) To the municipality or to the county in which the applicant
resides if the applicant resides in a municipality;
(b) To the county in which the applicant resides if the applicant
resides in an unincorporated area; or
(c) Anywhere in the state if the applicant is a nonresident.

--- END ---