BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that marine
habitat mitigation banks are an important tool for providing
compensatory mitigation and conservation for unavoidable impacts to
marine habitat. The legislature further finds that the benefits of
marine habitat mitigation banks include:
(a) Maintenance of the ecological functioning of marine habitat by
consolidating compensatory mitigation, habitat preservation, and
conservation into a single large parcel rather than smaller individual
parcels;
(b) Potential development of a landscape ecology plan that would
facilitate the use of smaller individual parcels that could be
connected through functional transportation corridors;
(c) Increased potential for the establishment and long-term
management of successful mitigation and conservation by bringing
together financial resources, planning, and scientific expertise not
practicable for many project-specific mitigation and conservation
proposals;
(d) Increased certainty over the success of mitigation and
conservation and the reduction of temporal losses of marine habitat
since mitigation and conservation banks are typically implemented and
functioning in advance of project impacts;
(e) Potential enhanced protection and preservation of the state's
highest value and highest functioning marine habitat;
(f) A reduction in permit processing times and increased
opportunity for more cost-effective compensatory mitigation and
conservation for development projects; and
(g) The ability to provide compensatory mitigation and conservation
in an efficient, predictable, and economically and environmentally
responsible manner.
(2) Therefore, the legislature finds that the establishment of
marine habitat mitigation banks in select areas will help document the
benefits to the state of marine habitat mitigation banks.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Bank sponsor" means any public or private entity responsible
for establishing and, in most circumstances, operating a bank.
(2) "Banking instrument" means the documentation of agency and bank
sponsor concurrence on the objectives and administration of the bank
that describes in detail the physical and legal characteristics of the
bank, including the service area, and how the bank will be established
and operated.
(3) "Credit" means a unit of trade representing the increase in the
ecological value of the site, as measured by acreage, functions, or
values, or by some other assessment method.
(4) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(5) "Marine habitat mitigation bank" or "bank" means a site where
marine habitat is restored, enhanced, or, in exceptional circumstances,
preserved expressly for the purpose of providing compensatory
mitigation in advance of authorized impacts to similar resources.
(6) "Mitigation" means sequentially avoiding impacts, minimizing
impacts, and compensating for remaining unavoidable impacts.
(7) "Pilot program" means a program established under this chapter
to establish a marine habitat mitigation bank in the service area to
document the potential uses of a marine habitat mitigation bank.
(8) "Practicable" means available and capable of being done after
taking into consideration cost, existing technology, and logistics in
light of overall project purposes.
(9) "Service area" means a Puget Sound county in which southern
Puget Sound and southern Hood Canal are both located.
(10) "Unavoidable" means adverse impacts that remain after all
appropriate and practicable avoidance and minimization have been
achieved.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The department shall establish a pilot
program to establish a marine habitat mitigation bank on privately
owned land in the service area. Further, the department shall,
together with county legislative authorities and affected tribes,
approve a bank sponsor in the service area. The department shall
certify the bank using procedures consistent with chapter 90.84 RCW and
any rules adopted under that chapter. The department, in consultation
with other appropriate agencies and interests, shall develop
substantive standards for a pilot marine habitat mitigation bank to
implement the intent of section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Prior to authorizing use of credits from a
bank as a means of mitigation under a permit issued or approved by the
department, the department must ensure that all appropriate and
practicable steps have been undertaken to first avoid and then minimize
adverse impacts to marine habitat. In determining appropriate steps to
avoid and minimize adverse impacts to marine habitat, the department
shall take into consideration the functions and values of the marine
land, including fish habitat and protection of adjacent properties.
The department may approve the use of credits from a bank when:
(1) The credits represent the restoration or enhancement of marine
habitat of like kind and in close proximity when marine habitat are
being mitigated;
(2) There is no practicable opportunity for on-site compensation;
or
(3) Use of credits from a bank is environmentally preferable to on-site compensation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The department, in consultation with the
bank sponsor approved under this chapter, shall submit a report to the
appropriate standing committees of the legislature by June 30, 2010.
The report must include:
(1) A description of the marine habitat mitigation banks in
operation in the service area;
(2) A description of the projects for which the credits were used
for compensatory purposes, including a description of the marine
habitat impacts for which compensation was required; and
(3) Recommendations for any changes necessary to make the marine
habitat mitigation bank provisions of this chapter operate more
effectively and to possibly expand this pilot program for the
establishment of banks outside the service area.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A bank certified under section 3 of this act
may continue to operate under chapter 90.84 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 5 of this act expire June
30, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act takes effect July 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 90 RCW.

--- END ---