BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.74.137 and 1988 c 198 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every person applying for a purchaser's license, or renewal
thereof, shall pay an annual license fee of ((five)) twenty-five
dollars. The director of labor and industries may adjust the amount of
the license fee to reflect the administrative costs of the department.
The fee shall not exceed ((fifteen)) one hundred dollars.
Said license fee shall accompany the application and shall be
transmitted by the department to the state treasurer: PROVIDED, That
if the applicant is denied a purchaser's license the license fee shall
be returned to said applicant by registered mail.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.74.140 and 1988 c 198 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every person engaging in the business of keeping or storing of
explosives shall pay an annual license fee for each magazine
maintained, to be graduated by the department of labor and industries
according to the quantity kept or stored therein, of ((ten)) fifty
dollars. The director of labor and industries may adjust the amount of
the license fee to reflect the administrative costs of the department.
The fee shall not exceed ((one)) four hundred dollars.
Said license fee shall accompany the application and shall be
transmitted by the department to the state treasurer.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.74.142 and 1988 c 198 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every person applying for a user's license, or renewal thereof,
under this chapter shall pay an annual license fee of ((five)) fifty
dollars. The director of labor and industries may adjust the amount of
the license fee to reflect the administrative costs of the department.
The fee shall not exceed ((fifteen)) two hundred dollars.
Said license fee shall accompany the application, and be ((turned
over)) transmitted by the department to the state treasurer: PROVIDED,
That if the applicant is denied a user's license the license fee shall
be returned to said applicant by registered mail.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.74.144 and 1988 c 198 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every person engaged in the business of manufacturing explosives
shall pay an annual license fee of ((twenty-five)) fifty dollars. The
director of labor and industries may adjust the amount of the license
fee to reflect the administrative costs of the department. The fee
shall not exceed ((fifty)) two hundred dollars.
Businesses licensed to manufacture explosives are not required to
have a dealer's license, but must comply with all of the dealer
requirements of this chapter when they sell explosives.
The license fee shall accompany the application and shall be
transmitted by the department to the state treasurer.

Sec. 5 RCW 70.74.146 and 1988 c 198 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every person engaged in the business of selling explosives shall
pay an annual license fee of ((twenty-five)) fifty dollars. The
director of labor and industries may adjust the amount of the license
fee to reflect the administrative costs of the department. The fee
shall not exceed ((fifty)) two hundred dollars.
Businesses licensed to sell explosives must comply with all of the
dealer requirements of this chapter.
The license fee shall accompany the application and shall be
transmitted by the department to the state treasurer.

Sec. 6 RCW 70.74.360 and 1988 c 198 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director of labor and industries shall require, as a
condition precedent to the original issuance or renewal of any
explosive license, fingerprinting and criminal history record
information checks of every applicant. In the case of a corporation,
fingerprinting and criminal history record information checks shall be
required for the management officials directly responsible for the
operations where explosives are used if such persons have not
previously had their fingerprints recorded with the department of labor
and industries. In the case of a partnership, fingerprinting and
criminal history record information checks shall be required of all
general partners. Such fingerprints as are required by the department
of labor and industries shall be submitted on forms provided by the
department to the identification section of the Washington state patrol
and to the identification division of the federal bureau of
investigation in order that these agencies may search their records for
prior convictions of the individuals fingerprinted. The Washington
state patrol shall provide to the director of labor and industries such
criminal record information as the director may request. The applicant
shall give full cooperation to the department of labor and industries
and shall assist the department of labor and industries in all aspects
of the fingerprinting and criminal history record information check.
The applicant ((may)) shall be required to pay ((a)) the current
federal and state fee ((not to exceed twenty dollars to the agency that
performs the fingerprinting and criminal history process)) for
fingerprint-based criminal history background checks.
(2) The director of labor and industries shall not issue a license
to manufacture, purchase, store, use, or deal with explosives to:
(a) Any person under twenty-one years of age;
(b) Any person whose license is suspended or whose license has been
revoked, except as provided in RCW 70.74.370;
(c) Any person who has been convicted in this state or elsewhere of
a violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, perjury, false swearing,
or bomb threats or a crime involving a schedule I or II controlled
substance, or any other drug or alcohol related offense, unless such
other drug or alcohol related offense does not reflect a drug or
alcohol dependency. However, the director of labor and industries may
issue a license if the person suffering a drug or alcohol related
dependency is participating in or has completed an alcohol or drug
recovery program acceptable to the department of labor and industries
and has established control of their alcohol or drug dependency. The
director of labor and industries shall require the applicant to provide
proof of such participation and control; or
(d) Any person who has previously been adjudged to be mentally ill
or insane, or to be incompetent due to any mental disability or disease
and who has not at the time of application been restored to competency.
(3) The director of labor and industries may establish reasonable
licensing fees for the manufacture, dealing, purchase, use, and storage
of explosives.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 70.74 RCW
to read as follows:
All funds collected by the department under RCW 70.74.137 through
70.74.146 and 70.74.360 shall be transferred to the state treasurer for
deposit into the accident and medical aid funds under RCW 51.44.010 and
51.44.020.

--- END ---