BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.22.340 and 2005 c 399 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall adopt specific rules for conversion vending
units and medical units. The rules for conversion vending units and
medical units shall be established to protect the occupants from fire;
to address other life safety issues; and to ensure that the design and
construction are capable of supporting any concentrated load of five
hundred pounds or more. Also, the director shall adopt specific rules
concerning safety standards as necessary to implement subsection (3) of
this section by January 1, 2006.
(2) The director of labor and industries shall adopt rules
governing safety of body and frame design, and the installation of
plumbing, heating, and electrical equipment in mobile homes, commercial
coaches, recreational vehicles, and/or park trailers: PROVIDED, That
the director shall not prescribe or enforce rules governing the body
and frame design of recreational vehicles and park trailers until after
the American National Standards Institute shall have published
standards and specifications upon this subject. The rules shall be
reasonably consistent with recognized and accepted principles of safety
for body and frame design and plumbing, heating, and electrical
installations, in order to protect the health and safety of the people
of this state from dangers inherent in the use of substandard and
unsafe body and frame design, construction, plumbing, heating,
electrical, and other equipment and shall correlate with and, so far as
practicable, conform to the then current standards and specifications
of the American National Standards Institute standards A119.1 for
mobile homes and commercial coaches((, A119.2 for recreational
vehicles,)) and A119.5 for recreational park trailers, and national
fire protection association standard 1192 for recreational vehicles.
(3) Except as provided in RCW 43.22.436, it shall be unlawful for
any person to lease, sell or offer for sale, within this state, any
mobile homes, commercial coaches, conversion vending units, medical
units, recreational vehicles, and/or park trailers manufactured after
January 1, 1968, containing plumbing, heating, electrical, or other
equipment, and after July 1, 1970, body and frame design or
construction, unless such equipment, design, or construction meets the
requirements of the rules provided for in this section.
(4) Any person violating this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.
Each day upon which a violation occurs shall constitute a separate
violation.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.22.434 and 2005 c 274 s 296 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The director or the director's authorized representative may
conduct such inspections, investigations, and audits as may be
necessary to adopt or enforce manufactured and mobile home, commercial
coach, conversion vending units, medical units, recreational vehicle,
park trailer, factory built housing, and factory built commercial
structure rules adopted under the authority of this chapter or to carry
out the director's duties under this chapter.
(2) For purposes of enforcement of this chapter, persons duly
designated by the director upon presenting appropriate credentials to
the owner, operator, or agent in charge may:
(a) At reasonable times and without advance notice enter any
factory, warehouse, or establishment in which manufactured and mobile
homes, commercial coaches, conversion vending units, medical units,
recreational vehicles, park trailers, factory built housing, and
factory built commercial structures are manufactured, stored, or held
for sale;
(b) At reasonable times, within reasonable limits, and in a
reasonable manner inspect any factory, warehouse, or establishment as
required to comply with the standards adopted by the secretary of
housing and urban development under the national manufactured home
construction and safety standards act of 1974. Each inspection shall
be commenced and completed with reasonable promptness; and
(c) As requested by an owner of a conversion vending unit or
medical unit, inspect an alteration.
(3) For purposes of determining compliance with this chapter's
permitting requirements for alterations of mobile and manufactured
homes, the department may audit the records of a contractor as defined
in chapter 18.27 RCW or RCW 18.106.020(1) or an electrical contractor
as defined in RCW 19.28.006 when the department has reason to believe
that a violation of the permitting requirements has occurred. The
department shall adopt rules implementing the auditing procedures.
Information obtained from a contractor through an audit authorized by
this subsection is confidential and not open to public inspection under
chapter 42.56 RCW.
(4)(((a))) The department shall set a schedule of fees by rule
which will cover the costs incurred by the department in the
administration of RCW 43.22.335 through 43.22.490. The department may
waive mobile/manufactured home alteration permit fees for indigent
permit applicants.
(((b)(i) Until April 1, 2009, subject to (a) of this subsection,
the department may adopt by rule a temporary statewide fee schedule
that decreases fees for mobile/manufactured home alteration permits and
increases fees for factory-built housing and commercial structures plan
review and inspection services.
(ii) Effective April 1, 2009, the department must adopt a new fee
schedule that is the same as the fee schedule that was in effect
immediately prior to the temporary fee schedule authorized in (b)(i) of
this subsection. However, the new fee schedule must be adjusted by the
fiscal growth factors not applied during the period that the temporary
fee schedule was in effect.))

Sec. 3 RCW 43.22.480 and 1998 c 37 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall adopt and enforce rules that protect the
health, safety, and property of the people of this state by assuring
that all factory built housing or factory built commercial structures
are structurally sound and that the plumbing, heating, electrical, and
other components thereof are reasonably safe. The rules shall be
reasonably consistent with recognized and accepted principles of safety
and structural soundness, and in adopting the rules the department
shall consider, so far as practicable, the standards and specifications
((contained in the uniform building, plumbing, and mechanical codes,
including the barrier free code and the Washington energy code)) as
adopted by the state building code council pursuant to chapters 19.27
and 19.27A RCW, and the national electrical code, including the state
rules as adopted pursuant to chapter 19.28 RCW and published by the
national fire protection association or, when applicable, the temporary
worker building code adopted under RCW 70.114A.081.
(2) The department shall set a schedule of fees which will cover
the costs incurred by the department in the administration and
enforcement of RCW 43.22.450 through 43.22.490.
(3) The director may adopt rules that provide for approval of a
plan that is certified as meeting state requirements or the equivalent
by a professional who is licensed or certified in a state whose
licensure or certification requirements meet or exceed Washington
requirements.

--- END ---