BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 61.34.020 and 1988 c 33 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) (("Pattern of equity skimming" means engaging in a least three
acts of equity skimming within any three-year period, with at least one
of the acts occurring after June 9, 1988.
(2) "Dwelling" means a single, duplex, triplex, or four-unit family
residential building.
(3) "Person" includes any natural person, corporation, joint stock
association, or unincorporated association.
(4))) An "act of equity skimming" occurs when:
(a)(i) A person purchases a dwelling with the representation that
the purchaser will pay for the dwelling by assuming the obligation to
make payments on existing mortgages, deeds of trust, or real estate
contracts secured by and pertaining to the dwelling, or by representing
that such obligation will be assumed; and
(ii) The person fails to make payments on such mortgages, deeds of
trust, or real estate contracts as the payments become due, within two
years subsequent to the purchase; and
(iii) The person diverts value from the dwelling by either (A)
applying or authorizing the application of rents from the dwelling for
the person's own benefit or use, or (B) obtaining anything of value
from the sale or lease with option to purchase of the dwelling for the
person's own benefit or use, or (C) removing or obtaining appliances,
fixtures, furnishings, or parts of such dwellings or appurtenances for
the person's own benefit or use without replacing the removed items
with items of equal or greater value; or
(b)(i) The person purchases a dwelling in a transaction in which
all or part of the purchase price is financed by the seller and is (A)
secured by a lien which is inferior in priority or subordinated to a
lien placed on the dwelling by the purchaser, or (B) secured by a lien
on other real or personal property, or (C) without any security; and
(ii) The person obtains a superior priority loan which either (A)
is secured by a lien on the dwelling which is superior in priority to
the lien of the seller, but not including a bona fide assumption by the
purchaser of a loan existing prior to the time of purchase, or (B)
creating any lien or encumbrance on the dwelling when the seller does
not hold a lien on the dwelling; and
(iii) The person fails to make payments or defaults on the superior
priority loan within two years subsequent to the purchase; and
(iv) The person diverts value from the dwelling by applying or
authorizing any part of the proceeds from such superior priority loan
for the person's own benefit or use.
(2) "Distressed home" means either:
(a) A dwelling that is in danger of foreclosure or at risk of loss
due to nonpayment of taxes; or
(b) A dwelling that is in danger of foreclosure or that is in the
process of being foreclosed due to a default under the terms of a
mortgage.
(3) "Distressed home consultant" means a person who:
(a) Solicits or contacts a distressed homeowner in writing, in
person, or through any electronic or telecommunications medium and
makes a representation or offer to perform any service that the person
represents will:
(i) Stop, enjoin, delay, void, set aside, annul, stay, or postpone
a foreclosure sale;
(ii) Obtain forbearance from any servicer, beneficiary, or
mortgagee;
(iii) Assist the distressed homeowner to exercise a right of
reinstatement provided in the loan documents or to refinance a loan
that is in foreclosure or is in danger of foreclosure;
(iv) Obtain an extension of the period within which the distressed
homeowner may reinstate the distressed homeowner's obligation or extend
the deadline to object to a ratification;
(v) Obtain a waiver of an acceleration clause contained in any
promissory note or contract secured by a mortgage on a distressed home
or contained in the mortgage;
(vi) Assist the distressed homeowner to obtain a loan or advance of
funds;
(vii) Save the distressed homeowner's residence from foreclosure;
(viii) Avoid or ameliorate the impairment of the distressed
homeowner's credit resulting from the recording of a notice of trustee
sale, the filing of a petition to foreclose, or the conduct of a
foreclosure sale;
(ix) Purchase or obtain an option to purchase the distressed
homeowner's residence within twenty days of an advertised or docketed
foreclosure sale;
(x) Arrange for the distressed homeowner to become a lessee or
tenant entitled to continue to reside in the distressed homeowner's
residence;
(xi) Arrange for the distressed homeowner to have an option to
repurchase the distressed homeowner's residence; or
(xii) Engage in any documentation, grant, conveyance, sale, lease,
trust, or gift by which the distressed homeowner clogs the distressed
homeowner's equity of redemption in the distressed homeowner's
residence; or
(b) Systematically contacts owners of property that court records,
newspaper advertisements, or any other source demonstrate are in
foreclosure or are in danger of foreclosure.
"Distressed home consultant" does not mean a financial institution
that the distressed homeowner is a customer of, a nonprofit credit
counseling service, or a licensed attorney.
(4) "Distressed home consulting transaction" means an agreement
between a distressed homeowner and a distressed home consultant in
which the distressed home consultant represents or offers to perform
any of the services enumerated in subsection (3)(a) of this section.
(5) "Distressed home conveyance" means a transaction in which:
(a) A distressed homeowner transfers an interest in the distressed
home to a distressed home purchaser;
(b) The distressed home purchaser allows the distressed homeowner
to occupy the distressed home; and
(c) The distressed home purchaser or a person acting in
participation with the distressed home purchaser conveys or promises to
convey the distressed home to the distressed homeowner, provides the
distressed homeowner with an option to purchase the distressed home at
a later date, or promises the distressed homeowner an interest in, or
portion of, the proceeds of any resale of the distressed home.
(6) "Distressed home purchaser" means any person who acquires an
interest in a distressed home under a distressed home conveyance.
"Distressed home purchaser" includes a person who acts in joint venture
or joint enterprise with one or more distressed home purchasers in a
distressed home conveyance. A financial institution is not a
distressed home purchaser.
(7) "Distressed homeowner" means an owner of a distressed home.
(8) "Dwelling" means a single, duplex, triplex, or four-unit family
residential building.
(9) "Financial institution" means any federally or state chartered
bank or trust company, savings bank or savings and loan association, or
credit union.
(10) "Homeowner" means a person who owns and occupies a dwelling as
his or her primary residence, whether or not his or her ownership
interest is encumbered by a mortgage, deed of trust, or other lien.
(11) "In danger of foreclosure" means any of the following:
(a) The homeowner has defaulted on the mortgage and, under the
terms of the mortgage, the mortgagee has the right to accelerate full
payment of the mortgage and repossess, sell, or cause to be sold, the
property;
(b) The homeowner is at least thirty days delinquent on any loan
that is secured by the property; or
(c) The homeowner has a good faith belief that he or she is likely
to default on the mortgage within the upcoming four months due to a
lack of funds, and the homeowner has reported this belief to:
(i) The mortgagee;
(ii) A person licensed or required to be licensed under chapter
19.134 RCW;
(iii) A person licensed or required to be licensed under chapter
19.146 RCW;
(iv) A person licensed or required to be licensed under chapter
18.85 RCW;
(v) An attorney-at-law;
(vi) A mortgage counselor or other credit counselor licensed or
certified by any federal, state, or local agency; or
(vii) Any other party to a distressed home consulting transaction.
(12) "Mortgage" means a mortgage, mortgage deed, deed of trust,
security agreement, or other instrument securing a mortgage loan and
constituting a lien on or security interest in housing.
(13) "Nonprofit credit counseling service" means a nonprofit
organization described under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue
code, or similar successor provisions, that is licensed or certified by
any federal, state, or local agency.
(14) "Pattern of equity skimming" means engaging in at least three
acts of equity skimming within any three-year period, with at least one
of the acts occurring after June 9, 1988.
(15) "Person" includes any natural person, corporation, joint stock
association, or unincorporated association.
(16) "Resale" means a bona fide market sale of the distressed home
subject to the distressed home conveyance by the distressed home
purchaser to an unaffiliated third party.
(17) "Resale price" means the gross sale price of the distressed
home on resale.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A distressed home consulting transaction
must:
(a) Be in writing in at least twelve-point font;
(b) Be in the same language as principally used by the distressed
home consultant to describe his or her services to the distressed
homeowner. If the agreement is written in a language other than
English, the distressed home consultant shall cause the agreement to be
translated into English and shall deliver copies of both the original
and English language versions to the distressed homeowner at the time
of execution and shall keep copies of both versions on file in
accordance with subsection (2) of this section. Any ambiguities or
inconsistencies between the English language and the original language
versions of the written agreement must be strictly construed in favor
of the distressed homeowner;
(c) Fully disclose the exact nature of the distressed home
consulting services to be provided, including any distressed home
conveyance that may be involved and the total amount and terms of any
compensation to be received by the distressed home consultant or anyone
working in association with the distressed home consultant;
(d) Be dated and signed by the distressed homeowner and the
distressed home consultant;
(e) Contain the complete legal name, address, telephone number, fax
number, e-mail address, and internet address if any, of the distressed
home consultant, and if the distressed home consultant is serving as an
agent for any other person, the complete legal name, address, telephone
number, fax number, e-mail address, and internet address if any, of the
principal; and
(f) Contain the following notice, which must be initialed by the
distressed homeowner, in bold face type and in at least fourteen-point
font:

"NOTICE REQUIRED BY WASHINGTON LAW

THIS IS AN IMPORTANT LEGAL CONTRACT AND COULD RESULT IN THE LOSS OF
YOUR HOME.
. . . Name of distressed home consultant . . . or anyone working
for him or her CANNOT guarantee you that he or she will be able to
refinance your home or arrange for you to keep your home. Continue
making mortgage payments until refinancing, if applicable, is approved.
You should consult with an attorney before signing this contract.
If you sign a promissory note, lien, mortgage, deed of trust, or
deed, you could lose your home and be unable to get it back."

(2) At the time of execution, the distressed home consultant shall
provide the distressed homeowner with a copy of the written agreement,
and the distressed home consultant shall keep a separate copy of the
written agreement on file for at least five years following the
completion or other termination of the agreement.
(3) This section does not relieve any duty or obligation imposed
upon a distressed home consultant by any other law including, but not
limited to, the duties of a credit service organization under chapter
19.134 RCW or a person required to be licensed under chapter 19.146
RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A distressed home consultant has a fiduciary
relationship with the distressed homeowner, and each distressed home
consultant is subject to all requirements for fiduciaries otherwise
applicable under state law. A distressed home consultant's fiduciary
duties include, but are not limited to, the following:
(1) To act in the distressed homeowner's best interest and in
utmost good faith toward the distressed homeowner, and not compromise
a distressed homeowner's right or interest in favor of another's right
or interest, including a right or interest of the distressed home
consultant;
(2) To disclose to the distressed homeowner all material facts of
which the distressed home consultant has knowledge that might
reasonably affect the distressed homeowner's rights, interests, or
ability to receive the distressed homeowner's intended benefit from the
residential mortgage loan;
(3) To use reasonable care in performing his or her duties; and
(4) To provide an accounting to the distressed homeowner for all
money and property received from the distressed homeowner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) A person may not induce or attempt to
induce a distressed homeowner to waive his or her rights under this
chapter, except that a distressed homeowner may waive the five-business-day right to cancel as provided in section 7 of this act if
the distressed home is subject to a foreclosure sale within the five
business days and the distressed homeowner agrees to waive his or her
right to cancel in a handwritten statement signed by all parties
holding title to the distressed home.
(2) Any waiver by a homeowner of the provisions of this chapter is
void and unenforceable as contrary to public policy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A distressed home purchaser shall enter into
a distressed home reconveyance in the form of a written contract. The
contract must be written in at least twelve-point boldface type in the
same language principally used by the distressed home purchaser and
distressed homeowner to negotiate the sale of the distressed home, and
must be fully completed, signed, and dated by the distressed homeowner
and distressed home purchaser before the execution of any instrument of
conveyance of the distressed home.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The contract required in section 5 of this
act must contain the entire agreement of the parties and must include
the following:
(1) The name, business address, and telephone number of the
distressed home purchaser;
(2) The address of the distressed home;
(3) The total consideration to be provided by the distressed home
purchaser in connection with or incident to the sale;
(4) A complete description of the terms of payment or other
consideration including, but not limited to, any services of any nature
that the distressed home purchaser represents that he or she will
perform for the distressed homeowner before or after the sale;
(5) The time at which possession is to be transferred to the
distressed home purchaser;
(6) A complete description of the terms of any related agreement
designed to allow the distressed homeowner to remain in the home, such
as a rental agreement, repurchase agreement, or lease with option to
buy;
(7) A complete description of the interest, if any, the distressed
homeowner maintains in the proceeds of, or consideration to be paid
upon, the resale of the distressed home;
(8) A notice of cancellation as provided in section 8 of this act;
and
(9) The following notice in at least fourteen-point boldface type
if the contract is printed, or in capital letters if the contract is
typed, and completed with the name of the distressed home purchaser,
immediately above the statement required in section 8 of this act;

"NOTICE REQUIRED BY WASHINGTON LAW

Until your right to cancel this contract has ended, . . . . . . (Name)
or anyone working for . . . . . . (Name) CANNOT ask you to sign or have
you sign any deed or any other document."

The contract required by this section survives delivery of any
instrument of conveyance of the distressed home and has no effect on
persons other than the parties to the contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) In addition to any other right of
rescission, a distressed homeowner has the right to cancel any contract
with a distressed home purchaser until midnight of the fifth business
day following the day on which the distressed homeowner signs a
contract that complies with this chapter or until 8:00 a.m. on the last
day of the period during which the distressed homeowner has a right of
redemption, whichever occurs first.
(2) Cancellation occurs when the distressed homeowner delivers to
the distressed home purchaser, by any means, a written notice of
cancellation to the address specified in the contract.
(3) A notice of cancellation provided by the distressed homeowner
is not required to take the particular form as provided with the
contract.
(4) Within ten days following the receipt of a notice of
cancellation under this section, the distressed home purchaser shall
return without condition any original contract and any other documents
signed by the distressed homeowner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) The contract required in section 5 of
this act must contain, in immediate proximity to the space reserved for
the distressed homeowner's signature, the following conspicuous
statement in at least fourteen-point boldface type if the contract is
printed, or in capital letters if the contract is typed:

"You may cancel this contract for the sale of your house without any
penalty or obligation at any time before

. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
(Date and time of day)

See the attached notice of cancellation form for an explanation of this
right."

The distressed home purchaser shall accurately enter the date and
time of day on which the cancellation right ends.
(2) The contract must be accompanied by a completed form in
duplicate, captioned "NOTICE OF CANCELLATION" in twelve-point boldface
type if the contract is printed, or in capital letters if the contract
is typed, followed by a space in which the distressed home purchaser
shall enter the date on which the distressed homeowner executes any
contract. This form must be attached to the contract, must be easily
detachable, and must contain in at least twelve-point type if the
contract is printed, or in capital letters if the contract is typed,
the following statement written in the same language as used in the
contract:

"NOTICE OF CANCELLATION

. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
(Enter date contract signed)
You may cancel this contract for the sale of your house, without any
penalty or obligation, at any time before

. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
(Enter date and time of day)
To cancel this transaction, personally deliver a signed and dated copy
of this cancellation notice to

. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
(Name of purchaser)
at

. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
(Street address of purchaser's place of business)
NOT LATER THAN

. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
(Enter date and time of day)
I hereby cancel this transaction.

. . . . . . . . . .
(Date)

. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
(Seller's signature)"

(3) The distressed home purchaser shall provide the distressed
homeowner with a copy of the contract and the attached notice of
cancellation at the time the contract is executed by all parties.
(4) The five-business-day period during which the distressed
homeowner may cancel the contract must not begin to run until all
parties to the contract have executed the contract and the distressed
home purchaser has complied with this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) Any provision in a contract that
attempts or purports to require arbitration of any dispute arising
under this chapter is void at the option of the distressed homeowner.
(2) This section applies to any contract entered into on or after
the effective date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A distressed home purchaser shall not:
(1) Enter into, or attempt to enter into, a distressed home
conveyance with a distressed homeowner unless the distressed home
purchaser verifies and can demonstrate that the distressed homeowner
has a reasonable ability to pay for the subsequent conveyance of an
interest back to the distressed homeowner. In the case of a lease with
an option to purchase, payment ability also includes the reasonable
ability to make the lease payments and purchase the property within the
term of the option to purchase. An evaluation of a distressed
homeowner's reasonable ability to pay includes debt to income ratios,
fair market value of the distressed home, and the distressed
homeowner's payment and credit history. There is a rebuttable
presumption that the distressed home purchaser has not verified a
distressed homeowner's reasonable ability to pay if the distressed home
purchaser has not obtained documentation of assets, liabilities, and
income, other than an undocumented statement, of the distressed
homeowner;
(2) Fail to either:
(a) Ensure that title to the distressed home has been reconveyed to
the distressed homeowner; or
(b) Make payment to the distressed homeowner so that the distressed
homeowner has received consideration in an amount of at least eighty-two percent of the fair market value of the property as of the date of
the eviction or voluntary relinquishment of possession of the
distressed home by the distressed homeowner. For the purposes of this
subsection (2)(b), the following applies:
(i) There is a rebuttable presumption that an appraisal by a person
licensed or certified by an agency of the federal government or this
state to appraise real estate constitutes the fair market value of the
distressed home;
(ii) "Consideration" means any payment or thing of value provided
to the distressed homeowner, including unpaid rent owed by the
distressed homeowner before the date of eviction or voluntary
relinquishment of the distressed home, reasonable costs paid to
independent third parties necessary to complete the distressed home
conveyance transaction, the payment of money to satisfy a debt or legal
obligation of the distressed homeowner, or the reasonable cost of
repairs for damage to the distressed home caused by the distressed
homeowner. "Consideration" does not include amounts imputed as a down
payment or fee to the distressed home purchaser or a person acting in
participation with the distressed home purchaser;
(3) Enter into repurchase or lease terms as part of the distressed
home conveyance that are unfair or commercially unreasonable, or engage
in any other unfair or deceptive acts or practices;
(4) Represent, directly or indirectly, that (a) the distressed home
purchaser is acting as an advisor or consultant, (b) the distressed
home purchaser is acting on behalf of or in the interests of the
distressed homeowner, or (c) the distressed home purchaser is assisting
the distressed homeowner to save the distressed home, buy time, or use
other substantially similar language;
(5) Misrepresent the distressed home purchaser's status as to
licensure or certification;
(6) Perform any of the following until after the time during which
the distressed homeowner may cancel the transaction has expired:
(a) Accept from any distressed homeowner an execution of, or induce
any distressed homeowner to execute, any instrument of conveyance of
any interest in the distressed home;
(b) Record with the county auditor any document, including any
instrument of conveyance, signed by the distressed homeowner; or
(c) Transfer or encumber or purport to transfer or encumber any
interest in the distressed home;
(7) Fail to reconvey title to the distressed home when the terms of
the distressed home conveyance contract have been fulfilled;
(8) Enter into a distressed home conveyance where any party to the
transaction is represented by a power of attorney;
(9) Fail to extinguish or assume all liens encumbering the
distressed home immediately following the conveyance of the distressed
home;
(10) Fail to close a distressed home conveyance in person before an
independent third party who is authorized to conduct real estate
closings within the state.

Sec. 11 RCW 61.34.040 and 1988 c 33 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to the criminal penalties provided in RCW
61.34.030, the legislature finds ((and declares)) that ((equity
skimming substantially affects)) the practices covered by this chapter
are matters vitally affecting the public interest((. The commission by
any person of an act of equity skimming or a pattern of equity skimming
is an unfair or deceptive act or practice and unfair method of
competition in the conduct of trade or commerce in violation of RCW
19.86.020)) for the purpose of applying chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation
of this chapter is not reasonable in relation to the development and
preservation of business and is an unfair method of competition for the
purpose of applying chapter 19.86 RCW.
(2) In a private right of action under chapter 19.86 RCW for a
violation of this chapter, the court may double or triple the award of
damages pursuant to RCW 19.86.090, subject to the statutory limit. If,
however, the court determines that the defendant acted in bad faith,
the limit for doubling or tripling the award of damages may be
increased, but shall not exceed one hundred thousand dollars. Any
claim for damages brought under this chapter must be commenced within
four years after the date of the alleged violation.
(3) The remedies provided in this chapter are cumulative and do not
restrict any remedy that is otherwise available. The provisions of
this chapter are not exclusive and are in addition to any other
requirements, rights, remedies, and penalties provided by law. An
action under this chapter shall not affect the rights in the distressed
home held by a distressed home purchaser for value under this chapter
or other applicable law.

Sec. 12 RCW 59.18.030 and 1998 c 276 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Distressed home" has the same meaning as in RCW 61.34.020.
(2) "Distressed home conveyance" has the same meaning as in RCW
61.34.020.
(3) "Distressed home purchaser" has the same meaning as in RCW
61.34.020.
(4) "Dwelling unit" is a structure or that part of a structure
which is used as a home, residence, or sleeping place by one person or
by two or more persons maintaining a common household, including but
not limited to single family residences and units of multiplexes,
apartment buildings, and mobile homes.
(((2))) (5) "In danger of foreclosure" means any of the following:
(a) The homeowner has defaulted on the mortgage and, under the
terms of the mortgage, the mortgagee has the right to accelerate full
payment of the mortgage and repossess, sell, or cause to be sold the
property;
(b) The homeowner is at least thirty days delinquent on any loan
that is secured by the property; or
(c) The homeowner has a good faith belief that he or she is likely
to default on the mortgage within the upcoming four months due to a
lack of funds, and the homeowner has reported this belief to:
(i) The mortgagee;
(ii) A person licensed or required to be licensed under chapter
19.134 RCW;
(iii) A person licensed or required to be licensed under chapter
19.146 RCW;
(iv) A person licensed or required to be licensed under chapter
18.85 RCW;
(v) An attorney-at-law;
(vi) A mortgage counselor or other credit counselor licensed or
certified by any federal, state, or local agency; or
(vii) Any other party to a distressed property conveyance.
(6) "Landlord" means the owner, lessor, or sublessor of the
dwelling unit or the property of which it is a part, and in addition
means any person designated as representative of the landlord.
(((3))) (7) "Mortgage" is used in the general sense and includes
all instruments, including deeds of trust, that are used to secure an
obligation by an interest in real property.
(8) "Person" means an individual, group of individuals,
corporation, government, or governmental agency, business trust,
estate, trust, partnership, or association, two or more persons having
a joint or common interest, or any other legal or commercial entity.
(((4))) (9) "Owner" means one or more persons, jointly or
severally, in whom is vested:
(a) All or any part of the legal title to property; or
(b) All or part of the beneficial ownership, and a right to present
use and enjoyment of the property.
(((5))) (10) "Premises" means a dwelling unit, appurtenances
thereto, grounds, and facilities held out for the use of tenants
generally and any other area or facility which is held out for use by
the tenant.
(((6))) (11) "Rental agreement" means all agreements which
establish or modify the terms, conditions, rules, regulations, or any
other provisions concerning the use and occupancy of a dwelling unit.
(((7))) (12) A "single family residence" is a structure maintained
and used as a single dwelling unit. Notwithstanding that a dwelling
unit shares one or more walls with another dwelling unit, it shall be
deemed a single family residence if it has direct access to a street
and shares neither heating facilities nor hot water equipment, nor any
other essential facility or service, with any other dwelling unit.
(((8))) (13) A "tenant" is any person who is entitled to occupy a
dwelling unit primarily for living or dwelling purposes under a rental
agreement.
(((9))) (14) "Reasonable attorney's fees", where authorized in this
chapter, means an amount to be determined including the following
factors: The time and labor required, the novelty and difficulty of
the questions involved, the skill requisite to perform the legal
service properly, the fee customarily charged in the locality for
similar legal services, the amount involved and the results obtained,
and the experience, reputation and ability of the lawyer or lawyers
performing the services.
(((10))) (15) "Gang" means a group that: (a) Consists of three or
more persons; (b) has identifiable leadership or an identifiable name,
sign, or symbol; and (c) on an ongoing basis, regularly conspires and
acts in concert mainly for criminal purposes.
(((11))) (16) "Gang-related activity" means any activity that
occurs within the gang or advances a gang purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 59.18 RCW
to read as follows:
In an unlawful detainer action involving a distressed home:
(1) The plaintiff shall disclose to the court whether the defendant
previously held title to the distressed home, and explain how the
plaintiff came to acquire title;
(2) A defendant who previously held title to the distressed home
shall not be required to escrow any money pending trial when a material
question of fact exists as to whether the plaintiff acquired title from
the defendant directly or indirectly through a distressed home
conveyance;
(3) There must be both an automatic stay of the action and a
consolidation of the action with a pending or subsequent quiet title
action when a defendant claims that the plaintiff acquired title to the
distressed home through a distressed home conveyance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Sections 2 through 10 of this act are each
added to chapter 61.34 RCW.

--- END ---