BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.265.010 and 2005 c 471 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Borrower" means a taxpayer who receives the proceeds of a
refund anticipation loan.
(2) "Department" means the department of financial institutions.
(3) "Director" means the director of the department of financial
institutions.
(4) "Facilitator" means a person who receives or accepts for
delivery an application for a refund anticipation loan, delivers a
check in payment of refund anticipation loan proceeds, or in any other
manner acts to allow the making of a refund anticipation loan.
"Facilitator" does not include a bank, thrift, savings association,
industrial bank, or credit union, operating under the laws of the
United States or this state, an affiliate that is a servicer for such
an entity, any retailer who acts only as a distributor and collector of
information or materials for a facilitator, or any person who acts
solely as an intermediary and does not deal with a taxpayer in the
making of the refund anticipation loan.
(5) "Lender" means a person who extends credit to a borrower in the
form of a refund anticipation loan.
(6) "Person" means an individual, a firm, a partnership, an
association, a corporation, or other entity.
(7) "Refund anticipation loan" means a loan borrowed by a taxpayer
from a lender based on the taxpayer's anticipated federal income tax
refund.
(8) "Refund anticipation loan fee" means the charges, fees, or
other consideration imposed by the lender for a refund anticipation
loan. This term does not include any charge, fee, or other
consideration usually imposed by the facilitator in the ordinary course
of business for nonloan services, such as fees for tax return
preparation and fees for electronic filing of tax returns.
(9) "Refund anticipation loan fee schedule" means a listing or
table of refund anticipation loan fees charged by the facilitator or
the lender for three or more representative refund anticipation loan
amounts. The schedule shall list separately each fee or charge
imposed, as well as a total of all fees imposed, related to the making
of refund anticipation loans. The schedule shall also include, for
each representative loan amount, the estimated annual percentage rate
calculated under the guidelines established by the federal truth in
lending act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1601 et seq.
(10) "Taxpayer" means an individual who files a federal income tax
return.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.265.020 and 2005 c 471 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No person may individually, or in conjunction or cooperation
with another person act as a facilitator unless that person is:
(a) A tax preparer or works for a person that engages in the
business of tax preparation;
(b) Accepted by the internal revenue service as an authorized IRS
e-file provider; and
(c) Registered with the department as a facilitator. The director
may prescribe the registration form.
(2) A person is registered as a facilitator by providing the
department, on or before December 31st of each year with:
(a) A list of authorized IRS e-file providers in the state of
Washington for the current tax filing year; and
(b) A thirty-five dollar processing fee for each authorized e-file
provider on the list.
(3)(a) A person registered as a facilitator must establish policies
and procedures to ensure a retailer who is acting as a distributor and
collector of information or materials:
(i) Appropriately safeguards and protects an applicant's personal
private financial information; and
(ii) Acts solely in a clerical role and does not provide any
counseling regarding refund anticipation loan products.
(b) The director may adopt rules necessary to implement this
subsection.
(4) After the December 31st deadline, a facilitator may amend the
registration required in subsection (2) of this section to reflect
additions or deletions of office locations or e-file providers
authorized by the internal revenue service.
(((4))) (5) The department shall make available to the public a
list of all facilitators registered under this section.
(((5))) (6) This section does not apply to a person doing business
as a bank, thrift, savings association, industrial bank, or credit
union, operating under the laws of the United States or this state, an
affiliate that is a servicer for such an entity, or any person who acts
solely as an intermediary and does not deal with a taxpayer in the
making of the refund anticipation loan.
(((6))) (7) This chapter shall preempt and be exclusive of all
local acts, statutes, ordinances, and regulations relating to refund
anticipation loans. This subsection shall be given retroactive and
prospective effect.

--- END ---