BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
Institutions of higher education shall:
(1) In accordance with RCW 29A.08.310, put in place a prompt and
link to the secretary of state's voter registration web site;
(2) Make voter registration forms available in places of prominence
within the premises of each campus;
(3) In consultation with the secretary of state, student programs,
and the student government association, or its equivalent, develop and
implement policies regarding distribution of voter registration forms
to students at the beginning of each term and in campus housing
facilities; and
(4) Collaborate with student programs and the student government
association, or its equivalent, to conduct nonpartisan voter
information activities, which may include voter registration, candidate
debates, and issue forums. Responsibility for proposing such
activities shall reside with the student government association, or its
equivalent.

--- END ---