BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1)(a) Bellevue Community College shall
create a pilot program to establish a student position on the Bellevue
Community College board of trustees for the period of two years
beginning July 1, 2008, and expiring June 30, 2010.
(b) The governor shall select the student member from a list of
candidates, of at least three and not more than five, submitted by the
governing body of the associated students. The student member shall be
appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate.
(c) The student member shall be a student in good standing at
Bellevue Community College at the time of appointment.
(d) The student member shall hold his or her office for a term of
one year, from July 1, 2008, until June 30, 2009, or until the student
member's successor is appointed and qualified, whichever is later.
(2) A student appointed under this section shall excuse himself or
herself from participation or voting on matters relating to the hiring,
discipline, or tenure of faculty members and personnel.
(3) Bellevue Community College, in consultation with the governing
body of associated students, shall create criteria by which the pilot
program shall be evaluated. Bellevue Community College, in
consultation with the body of associated students, shall report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2009, on the
status of the pilot project based on the criteria established in this
section. The report shall include recommendations on whether the
student position shall be made permanent.

--- END ---