BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.30.080 and 2005 c 273 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
A special meeting may be called at any time by the presiding
officer of the governing body of a public agency or by a majority of
the members of the governing body by delivering written notice
personally, by mail, by fax, or by electronic mail to each member of
the governing body; and to each local newspaper of general circulation
and ((to each)) local radio or television station ((which)) that has on
file with the governing body a written request to be notified of such
special meeting or of all special meetings. Such notice also shall be
posted on the agency's web site, if any, and prominently displayed at
the main entrance of the agency's principal location and the meeting
site if it is not held at the agency's principal location. If the
voting district for the governing body has fewer than one thousand
registered voters, individuals residing in the district who have a
written request to be notified of special meetings on file with the
governing body shall receive such notice by fax, electronic mail, or
telephonic message. Such notice must be delivered ((personally, by
mail, by fax, or by electronic mail)) or posted, as applicable, at
least twenty-four hours before the time of such meeting as specified in
the notice. The call and notice shall specify the time and place of
the special meeting and the business to be transacted. Final
disposition shall not be taken on any other matter at such meetings by
the governing body. Such written notice may be dispensed with as to
any member who at or prior to the time the meeting convenes files with
the clerk or secretary of the governing body a written waiver of
notice. Such waiver may be given by telegram, by fax, or electronic
mail. Such written notice may also be dispensed with as to any member
who is actually present at the meeting at the time it convenes. The
notices provided in this section may be dispensed with in the event a
special meeting is called to deal with an emergency involving injury or
damage to persons or property or the likelihood of such injury or
damage, when time requirements of such notice would make notice
impractical and increase the likelihood of such injury or damage. An
agency shall be considered to have complied with the requirement for
posting a notice on its web site if the agency made a good faith effort
to post the notice at least twenty-four hours before the meeting and
was unable to do so because of circumstances beyond its control. Such
circumstances include, but are not limited to, problems with internet
software, equipment or systems, and the inability or failure of a
third-party contractor to post a notice in a timely manner.

--- END ---