BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The purpose of this act is to safeguard
public health and life safety, to promote the public welfare by
improving the quality of human environmental design, and to limit the
practice of interior design to persons having specific design
education, experience, and examination.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the Washington state board of interior design as
established by the department of licensing.
(2) "Building shell" means the architecture of the existing
building, including the framework, the perimeter or exterior walls, the
building core and columns, and other structural, load-bearing elements
of the building.
(3) "Construction documents" mean the detailed working drawings
that define the work to be constructed. This may include partition
plans, power and communication plans, reflected ceiling plans, material
and finishes plans, and furniture layout plans, as well as elevations,
sections, and details, along with the drawings of associated
consultants.
(4) "Contract administration" means the set of services which may
include: Developing and monitoring schedules and construction costs;
ensuring construction is completed in conformance with contracts and
design intent; liaison with contractors and consultants throughout the
course of construction; reviewing shop drawings and submissions from
the contractor; observing and commenting on construction progress;
monitoring move in and furniture installation; and conducting required
postoccupancy evaluations.
(5) "Contract documents" means the set of documents that form a
part of the legal contract for services between two or more parties.
These typically include detailed instructions to the contractor, tender
forms, construction documents and specifications.
(6) "Diversified and appropriate interior design experience"
relates to the skills and tasks of a registered interior designer.
(7)(a) "Interior Design" means designs, consultations, studies,
drawings, specifications, and the contract administration of design
construction contracts relating to nonstructural interior elements of
a building or structure. "Interior design" includes, but is not
limited to, space planning, finishes, furnishings, and the design for
fabrication of nonstructural or nonseismic elements within and
surrounding interior spaces of a building, and a scope of services
performed by a professional design practitioner, qualified by means of
education, experience, and examination, to protect and enhance the
life, health, safety, and welfare of the public. These services may
include any or all of the following tasks:
(i) Research and analysis of the client's goals and requirements,
and development of documents, drawings, and diagrams that outline those
needs;
(ii) Formulation of preliminary space plans and two and three-dimensional design concept studies and sketches that integrate the
client's program needs and are based on knowledge of the principles of
interior design and theories of human behavior;
(iii) Confirmation that preliminary space plans and design concepts
are safe, functional, aesthetically appropriate, and meet all public
health, safety, and welfare requirements, including code,
accessibility, environmental, and sustainability guidelines.
(b) "Interior design" specifically excludes the design of or the
responsibility for architectural and engineering work, except for
specifications for fixtures and their location with interior spaces.
"Interior Design" also specifically excludes construction of
structural, mechanical, plumbing, heating, air conditioning,
ventilation, electrical or vertical transportation systems, fire-rated
vertical shafts in multistory structures, fire-related protection of
structural elements, smoke evacuations and compartmentalization,
sprinkler systems, and emergency alarm systems.
(8) "License" means a certificate granted by the Washington state
board of licensing as established.
(9) "Maintenance" means the ability of a product or material to be
kept to its proper condition and the work required to sustain that
condition over the life of that material.
(10) "Nonstructural or nonseismic" means interior elements or
components that are not load bearing or do not assist in the seismic
design, and do not require design computations for a building's
structure. It excludes the structural frame supporting a building.
Common nonstructural elements or components include, but are not
limited to, ceiling and partition systems. These elements employ
normal and typical bracing conventions and are not part of the
structural integrity of the building.
(11) "Partition" means a wall which does not support a vertical
load of a structure other than its own weight, but may support loads
attached to it such as cabinetry, shelving, or grab bars, and does not
extend further than from the floor of an interior area of a structure
designed for human habitation or occupancy, to the underside of the
deck of that structure.
(12) "Programming" means the scope of work which includes, but is
not limited to: Conducting research; identifying and analyzing the
needs and goals of the client or occupants of the space; evaluating
existing documentation and conditions; assessing project resources and
limitations; identifying life, safety, and code requirements; and
developing project schedules and budgets.
(13) "Reflected ceiling plan" means a ceiling design that
illustrates a ceiling as if it was projected downward and may include
lighting and other elements.
(14) "Registered interior designer" means a person registered under
this chapter who is a registered design professional qualified by
education, experience, and examination to affect the function, safety,
and quality of interior spaces, and who renders or offers to render
interior design services.
(15) "Responsible supervisory control" is the direct responsibility
for supervision by a registered interior designer of the work and the
decision-making process such as reviewing, enforcing, and controlling
compliance with all design criteria and life-safety requirements. Each
location designated for the practice of interior design must have in
that location a registered interior designer who bears regulatory
responsibility for the interior design work in that location. The
registered interior designer must provide responsible supervisory
control over nonregistered persons working in that location in the
practice of interior design.
(16) "Space planning" means the analysis and design of spatial and
occupancy requirements including, but not limited to, preliminary space
layouts and final planning for nonload-bearing walls, partitions,
panels, and furnishings.
(17) "Specifications" means the detailed written description of
construction, workmanship, and materials of the work to be undertaken.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Only individuals registered under this
chapter may render interior design services. No person shall be
identified as a registered interior designer who is not registered in
Washington state.
(2) No firm, partnership, association, or corporation may engage in
the practice of interior design, or hold itself out to the public as
being engaged in the practice of interior design or use the word
"interior design" or "registered interior designer" in its name in any
manner unless all interior design services are rendered by or under the
responsible supervisory control of persons registered under this
chapter.
(3) Registration shall be renewed every two years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Each applicant for registration shall be
required to hold an accredited certificate, diploma, or degree in
interior design.
(1) As of January 1, 2012, all interior design programs must be
accredited by the council for interior design accreditation or be an
interior design program determined by the board to be substantially
equivalent to an accredited program. If the interior design program is
accredited by the council for interior design within two years of an
applicant's completion of the program, then the program will be
accepted as a council for interior design accredited program.
(2) Each applicant shall provide proof of a minimum of two years of
full-time diversified interior design experience under direct
supervision of a registered interior designer or licensed architect,
within established standards as the board, by rule, deems appropriate
required on the effective date of this act.
(3) Each applicant shall provide to the board proof of passage of
the examination administered by the national council for interior
design qualification.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Any person who applies for registration or
licensure and remits the application and initial fees within a two-year
period after the effective date of this act shall be registered or
licensed by the board provided that the applicant meets subsections
(1), (2), and (3) of this section:
(1) The applicant has previously passed the national council for
interior design qualification examination;
(2) In lieu of the requirement for an accredited baccalaureate
degree or degree, diploma, or certificate from a program with a minimum
number of credit hours in interior design coursework as determined by
the board, the board may register an applicant who demonstrates in
accordance with such standards that the board deems equivalent; and
(3) In lieu of the requirement for an accredited baccalaureate
degree or degree, diploma, or certificate from a program with a minimum
number of credit hours in interior design coursework as determined by
the board, the board may register applicants who provide documented
proof of diversified experience in the practice of interior design for
a minimum of fifteen years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The governor shall appoint seven board
members to an interior design board. Nominees shall come from a list
of names supplied by Washington state chapter of American society of
interior designers and northern pacific chapter of international
interior design association. Both organizations shall provide a
minimum of ten names to be considered for appointment.
(2) Each member of the initially appointed board shall be qualified
as described by sections 4 and 5 of this act. Appointments shall be
limited to registered interior designers and for a duration of five
years. Each member shall hold office until the appointment and
qualification of his or her successor. Vacancies occurring prior to
the expiration of the term shall be filled by appointment in like
manner for the unexpired term. The governor may remove any of the
members of the board for inefficiency, neglect of duty, or dishonorable
conduct.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The renewal date for licenses shall be
set by the board. An interior designer who fails to pay the renewal
fee within thirty days of the due date shall pay all delinquent fees
plus a penalty fee equal to one-third of the renewal fee. An interior
designer that fails to pay a renewal fee for a period of five years may
be reinstated under such circumstances as the board determines.
(2) A registered interior designer in good standing may withdraw
from active registration with the state by giving written notice to the
department, and may within five years thereafter resume active
registration upon payment of the then current renewal fee. An interior
designer may be reinstated after a withdrawal of more than five years
under such circumstances as the board determines.
(3) An interior designer registered under this chapter must
complete one national council for interior design qualification
approved continuing education unit, equal to ten hours of continuing
education instruction, every two years. The board in consultation with
professional organizations representing interior design must develop a
form to verify continuing education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Each registered interior designer shall
obtain a seal as prescribed by the board. Any interior design
construction documents, which may include drawings, plans,
specifications, or reports prepared or issued by the registered
interior designer and being filed for public record with any
jurisdiction or local building department for the purposes of obtaining
a building permit shall bear the signature and seal of the interior
designer who prepared or approved the document and the date sealed.
The seal shall be evidence of the authenticity of the document.
Interior design construction documents bearing the seal of a registered
interior designer shall be accepted for filing by the appropriate
jurisdiction or local building department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The board may waive the examination
requirement of this section for an individual who holds a current valid
interior design registration from another state and who holds a current
certificate number issued by the national council for interior design
qualification, and where the qualifications required by that state are
equivalent or more stringent, as determined by the board, to those
required in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) This chapter does not apply to licensed
architects registered or licensed under this state, providing that such
architects not refer to themselves as registered interior designers
unless registered by this chapter.
(2) This chapter does not apply to an employee of a retail
establishment providing consultation regarding interior decoration or
furnishings on the premises of the retail establishment or in the
furtherance of a retail sale or prospective retail sale, providing such
persons do not refer to themselves as a registered interior designer.
This chapter does not apply to a person who provides decorative
services or assistance in selection of surface materials, window
treatments, wall coverings, paint, floor coverings, surface-mounted
fixtures, and loose furnishings not subject to regulation under
applicable provisions of jurisdictional codes, regulations, or the
jurisdictional fire codes, providing such persons do not refer to
themselves as a registered interior designer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 The board shall provide grounds for
disciplinary action, and have disciplinary power to suspend, revoke,
fine, annul registration, or impose civil penalty for each violation
provided that there is satisfactory proof of violated provisions of the
rules adopted by the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 The board shall provide procedures for
investigations, considerations, and guidelines.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A violation of any provision of this
chapter shall be punishable as established by the board. Any person
who, for a fee or other direct compensation, holds himself or herself
out as a registered interior designer, advertises, puts out any sign,
card, or drawings in this state designating himself or herself as a
registered interior designer, or uses some form of the term "interior
design" in the title of a profession or business, or who engages in the
preparation of plans and specifications or executes tasks identified as
interior design services without first having complied with the
provisions of this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon
conviction thereof shall be fined up to one thousand dollars for each
offense, and each and every day of violation of this chapter shall
constitute a separate offense.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Sections 1 through 13 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

--- END ---