BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.41.080 and 2004 c 261 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Standards for fire protection and the enforcement thereof, with
respect to all hospitals to be licensed hereunder shall be the
responsibility of the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the
director of fire protection, who shall adopt, after approval by the
department, ((such)) the recognized standards ((as may be)) applicable
to hospitals for the protection of life against the cause and spread of
fire and fire hazards((. Such standards shall be consistent with the
standards)) adopted by the federal centers for medicare and medicaid
services for hospitals that care for medicare or medicaid
beneficiaries. The standards used for an inspection of an existing
hospital, or existing portion thereof, shall be standards for existing
buildings and not standards for new construction. The department upon
receipt of an application for a license, shall submit to the director
of fire protection in writing, a request for an inspection, giving the
applicant's name and the location of the premises to be licensed. Upon
receipt of such a request, the chief of the Washington state patrol,
through the director of fire protection, or his or her deputy, shall
make an inspection of the hospital to be licensed((, and)) during the
department's inspection. If it is found that the premises do not
comply with the required safety standards and fire regulations as
adopted pursuant to this chapter, ((he or she)) the director of fire
protection, or his or her deputy, shall promptly make a written report
to ((the hospital and to)) the department listing the corrective
actions required ((and the time allowed for accomplishing such
corrections)). The department shall incorporate the written report
into the department's final inspection report. The applicant or
licensee shall ((notify the chief of the Washington state patrol,
through the director of fire protection, upon completion of any
corrections required by him or her, and the chief of the Washington
state patrol, through the director of fire protection, or his or her
deputy, shall make a reinspection of such premises)) submit corrections
to comply with the fire protection standards along with any other
licensing inspection corrections to the department. The department
shall submit the section of the statement of corrections from the
applicant or licensee regarding fire protection standards to the
director of fire protection. If extensive and serious corrections are
required, the director of fire protection, or his or her deputy, may
reinspect the premises. The director of fire protection, or his or her
deputy, shall utilize the scope and severity matrix developed by the
centers for medicare and medicaid services when determining what
corrections will require a reinspection. Whenever the hospital to be
licensed meets with the approval of the chief of the Washington state
patrol, through the director of fire protection, he or she shall submit
to the department, in a timely manner so the license will not be
delayed, a written report approving the hospital with respect to fire
protection, and such report is required before a full license can be
issued. The chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director
of fire protection, shall make or cause to be made inspections of such
hospitals on average at least once ((a year)) every eighteen months.
Inspections conducted by the joint commission on hospitals accredited
by it shall be deemed equivalent to an inspection by the chief of the
Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, for
purposes of meeting the requirements for the inspections specified in
this section.
The director of fire protection shall designate one lead deputy
state fire marshal on a regional basis to provide consistency with each
of the department's survey teams for the purpose of conducting the fire
protection inspection during the department's licensing inspection.
The director of fire protection shall ensure deputy state fire marshals
are provided orientation with the department on the unique environment
of hospitals before they conduct fire protection inspections in
hospitals. The orientation shall include, but not be limited to:
Clinical environment of hospitals; operating room environment; fire
protection practices in hospitals; full participation in a complete
licensing inspection of at least one urban hospital; and full
participation in a complete licensing inspection of at least one rural
hospital.
In cities which have in force a comprehensive building code, the
provisions of which are determined by the chief of the Washington state
patrol, through the director of fire protection, to be equal to the
minimum standards of the code for hospitals adopted by the chief of the
Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, the
chief of the fire department, provided the latter is a paid chief of a
paid fire department, shall make the inspection with the chief of the
Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, or
his or her deputy and they shall jointly approve the premises before a
full license can be issued.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.160.050 and 2005 c 109 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) All certificate of competency holders that desire to
continue in the fire protection sprinkler business shall annually,
prior to January 1, secure from the state director of fire protection
a renewal certificate of competency upon payment of the fee as
prescribed by the state director of fire protection. Application for
renewal shall be upon a form prescribed by the state director of fire
protection and the certificate holder shall furnish the information
required by the director.
(b) Failure of any certificate of competency holder to secure his
or her renewal certificate of competency within sixty days after the
due date shall constitute sufficient cause for the state director of
fire protection to suspend the certificate of competency.
(c) The state director of fire protection may, upon the receipt of
payment of all delinquent fees including a late charge, restore a
certificate of competency that has been suspended for failure to pay
the renewal fee.
(d) A certificate of competency holder may voluntarily surrender
his or her certificate of competency to the state director of fire
protection and be relieved of the annual renewal fee. After
surrendering the certificate of competency, he or she shall not be
known as a certificate of competency holder and shall desist from the
practice thereof. Within two years from the time of surrender of the
certificate of competency, he or she may again qualify for a
certificate of competency, without examination, by the payment of the
required fee. If two or more years have elapsed, he or she shall
return to the status of a new applicant.
(2)(a) All licensed fire protection sprinkler system contractors
desiring to continue to be licensed shall annually, prior to January 1,
secure from the state director of fire protection a renewal license
upon payment of the fee as prescribed by the state director of fire
protection. Application for renewal shall be upon a form prescribed by
the state director of fire protection and the license holder shall
furnish the information required by the director.
(b) Failure of any license holder to secure his or her renewal
license within sixty days after the due date shall constitute
sufficient cause for the state director of fire protection to suspend
the license.
(c) The state director of fire protection may, upon the receipt of
payment of all delinquent fees including a late charge, restore a
license that has been suspended for failure to pay the renewal fee.
(3) The initial certificate of competency or license fee shall be
prorated based upon the portion of the year such certificate of
competency or license is in effect, prior to renewal on January 1.
(4) The fire protection contractor license fund is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from license and
certificate fees and charges or from the money generated by the rules
and regulations promulgated under this chapter shall be deposited into
the fund. Expenditures from the fund may be used only for purposes
authorized under this chapter and standards for fire protection and its
enforcement, with respect to all hospitals as required by RCW
70.41.080, and for providing assistance in identifying fire sprinkler
system components that have been subject to either a recall or
voluntary replacement program by a manufacturer of fire sprinkler
products, a nationally recognized testing laboratory, or the federal
consumer product safety commission. Assistance shall include, but is
not limited to, aiding in the identification of recalled components,
information sharing strategies aimed at ensuring the consumer is made
aware of recalls and voluntary replacement programs, and providing
training and assistance to local fire authorities, the fire sprinkler
industry, and the public. Only the state director of fire protection
or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the fund.
The fund is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW,
but no appropriation is required for expenditures.

--- END ---