BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 71A.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In coordination with other funding sources for early
intervention services, the department shall contract with each county
through the employment and day program to provide funding for early
intervention services to all eligible children with disabilities from
birth to three years of age who have been identified as needing
services. Eligibility shall be determined according to Part C of the
federal individuals with disabilities education act and as specified in
the Washington infant toddler early intervention program policies and
procedures. Counties shall provide or contract for early intervention
services to all eligible children within the county who have been
identified as needing services in partnership with infant toddler early
intervention program local lead agencies, school districts, and birth-to-three providers.
(2) The department shall contract with each county through the
employment and day program to provide funding for early intervention
services. The contract amount shall be set at the rate specified in
subsection (3) of this section multiplied by the number of active
individualized family service plans in the county. For purposes of
this subsection, the number of active individualized family service
plans is the infant toddler early intervention program day-in-time
count of active plans as taken in May of the previous fiscal year. In
calculating the contract amounts, the department shall include any
amounts provided to a county through the employment and day program in
fiscal year 2008 where that funding was designated for early
intervention services to eligible children with disabilities from birth
to three years of age.
(3)(a) For fiscal year 2009, the department shall provide funding
at the rate of two thousand four hundred dollars.
(b) For fiscal year 2010 and each fiscal year thereafter, the
department shall provide funding for early intervention services at
the previous fiscal year's rate multiplied by inflation as defined in
RCW 84.55.005, as determined by the department of revenue in September
of the previous fiscal year.
(4)(a) Nothing in this section precludes counties from providing
funding at a level higher than the amounts designated in subsection (2)
of this section.
(b) Services provided under this section shall be determined
according to Part C of the federal individuals with disabilities
education act and the child's individualized family service plan. The
state designated birth-to-three agency shall be payor of last resort
for birth-to-three early intervention services provided under this
section.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.88C.010 and 2000 c 90 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The caseload forecast council is hereby created. The council
shall consist of two individuals appointed by the governor and four
individuals, one of whom is appointed by the chairperson of each of the
two largest political caucuses in the senate and house of
representatives. The chair of the council shall be selected from among
the four caucus appointees. The council may select such other officers
as the members deem necessary.
(2) The council shall employ a caseload forecast supervisor to
supervise the preparation of all caseload forecasts. As used in this
chapter, "supervisor" means the caseload forecast supervisor.
(3) Approval by an affirmative vote of at least five members of the
council is required for any decisions regarding employment of the
supervisor. Employment of the supervisor shall terminate after each
term of three years. At the end of the first year of each three-year
term the council shall consider extension of the supervisor's term by
one year. The council may fix the compensation of the supervisor. The
supervisor shall employ staff sufficient to accomplish the purposes of
this section.
(4) The caseload forecast council shall oversee the preparation of
and approve, by an affirmative vote of at least four members, the
official state caseload forecasts prepared under RCW 43.88C.020. If
the council is unable to approve a forecast before a date required in
RCW 43.88C.020, the supervisor shall submit the forecast without
approval and the forecast shall have the same effect as if approved by
the council.
(5) A council member who does not cast an affirmative vote for
approval of the official caseload forecast may request, and the
supervisor shall provide, an alternative forecast based on assumptions
specified by the member.
(6) Members of the caseload forecast council shall serve without
additional compensation but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 44.04.120 while attending sessions of the council
or on official business authorized by the council. Nonlegislative
members of the council shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(7) "Caseload," as used in this chapter, means the number of
persons expected to meet entitlement requirements and require the
services of public assistance programs, state correctional
institutions, state correctional noninstitutional supervision, state
institutions for juvenile offenders, the common school system, long-term care, medical assistance, infant toddler early intervention
program, foster care, and adoption support.
(8) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
provided in RCW 43.88.020 apply to this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act may be known and cited as the
infant and toddler equity act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---