BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) In order to facilitate the authorized
interstate exchange of criminal history record information for
noncriminal justice purposes including, but not limited to, background
checks for the licensing and screening of employees and volunteers, and
adopting provisions from the national crime prevention and privacy
compact, as enacted by section 217 of Public Law 105-251 (42 U.S.C.
Sec. 14611-14616), the legislature shall implement the national crime
prevention and privacy compact.
(2) This act may be known and cited as the national crime
prevention and privacy compact.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The national crime prevention and privacy compact shall be
implemented.
(2) The Washington state patrol criminal records division
administrator, or the administrator's designee, is the state's compact
officer, and shall execute the compact on behalf of the state and shall
administer the compact within the state. The state patrol may adopt
rules and establish procedures for the cooperative exchange of criminal
history records between the state and federal government for
noncriminal justice use.
(3) The Washington state patrol identification and criminal history
section is the repository of criminal history records for purposes of
the compact and shall carry out the compact as necessary.
(4) The compact and this section do not affect or abridge the
obligations and responsibilities of the state patrol under other
provisions of this chapter or chapter 10.97 RCW and does not alter or
amend the manner, direct or otherwise, in which the public is afforded
access to criminal history records under state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2008.

--- END ---