BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 54.12.080 and 2007 c 469 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Commissioners of public utility districts are eligible to
receive salaries as follows:
(a) Each public utility district commissioner of a district
operating utility properties shall receive a salary of one thousand
four hundred dollars per month during a calendar year if the district
received total gross revenue of over fifteen million dollars during the
fiscal year ending June 30th before the calendar year. However, the
board of commissioners of such a public utility district may pass a
resolution increasing the rate of salary up to ((thirteen)) one
thousand eight hundred dollars per month.
(b) Each public utility district commissioner of a district
operating utility properties shall receive a salary of ((seven
hundred)) one thousand dollars per month during a calendar year if the
district received total gross revenue of from two million dollars to
fifteen million dollars during the fiscal year ending June 30th before
the calendar year. However, the board of commissioners of such a
public utility district may pass a resolution increasing the rate of
salary up to ((nine)) one thousand three hundred dollars per month.
(c) Commissioners of other districts shall serve without salary.
However, the board of commissioners of such a public utility district
may pass a resolution providing for salaries not exceeding ((four)) six
hundred dollars per month for each commissioner.
(2) In addition to salary, all districts may provide by resolution
for the payment of per diem compensation to each commissioner at a rate
not exceeding ninety dollars for each day or portion thereof spent in
actual attendance at official meetings of the district commission or in
performance of other official services or duties on behalf of the
district, to include meetings of the commission of his or her district
or meetings attended by one or more commissioners of two or more
districts called to consider business common to them, but such
compensation paid during any one year to a commissioner shall not
exceed twelve thousand six hundred dollars. Per diem compensation
shall not be paid for services of a ministerial or professional nature.
(3) Any commissioner may waive all or any portion of his or her
compensation payable under this section as to any month or months
during his or her term of office, by a written waiver filed with the
district as provided in this section. The waiver, to be effective,
must be filed any time after the commissioner's election and prior to
the date on which the compensation would otherwise be paid. The waiver
shall specify the month or period of months for which it is made.
(4) Each district commissioner shall be reimbursed for reasonable
expenses actually incurred in connection with such business and
meetings, including his or her subsistence and lodging and travel while
away from his or her place of residence.
(5) Any district providing group insurance for its employees,
covering them, their immediate family, and dependents, may provide
insurance for its commissioner with the same coverage.
The dollar thresholds established in this section must be adjusted
for inflation by the office of financial management every five years,
beginning July 1, 2008, based upon changes in the consumer price index
during that time period. "Consumer price index" means, for any
calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index, for
Washington state, for wage earners and clerical workers, all items,
compiled by the bureau of labor and statistics, United States
department of labor. If the bureau of labor and statistics develops
more than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the
index covering the greatest number of people, covering areas
exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and including all items
shall be used for the adjustments for inflation in this section. The
office of financial management must calculate the new dollar threshold
and transmit it to the office of the code reviser for publication in
the Washington State Register at least one month before the new dollar
threshold is to take effect.
A person holding office as commissioner for two or more special
purpose districts shall receive only that per diem compensation
authorized for one of his or her commissioner positions as compensation
for attending an official meeting or conducting official services or
duties while representing more than one of his or her districts.
However, such commissioner may receive additional per diem compensation
if approved by resolution of all boards of the affected commissions.

--- END ---