BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1)(a) A joint select legislative task force
on guardians ad litem in cases under Titles 13 and 26 RCW is
established, with members as provided in this subsection.
(i) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from each
of the two largest caucuses of the senate.
(ii) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one
member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of
representatives.
(iii) The president of the senate and the speaker of the house of
representatives jointly shall appoint the following members of the task
force:
(A) A representative from a statewide domestic violence advocacy
group;
(B) A representative from a community sexual assault program;
(C) Two birth parents with at least one representing the interests
of low-income parents;
(D) A representative of a statewide foster parents association;
(E) A representative from a qualified legal aid provider that
receives funding from the office of civil legal aid;
(F) One person who acts as a paid guardian ad litem;
(G) One person who acts as an unpaid guardian ad litem;
(H) One private attorney who represents parents under Title 13 or
26 RCW;
(I) One professional who evaluates families for the purposes of
determining the custody or placement decisions of children;
(J) One superior court judge who is familiar with cases under
Titles 13 and 26 RCW;
(K) One court commissioner who is familiar with cases under Titles
13 and 26 RCW;
(L) A representative from the Washington state court-appointed
special advocates;
(M) A representative from the administrative office of the courts
who has participated in developing the curricula under RCW 2.56.030(1);
(N) A representative of public defenders who represent children
under Title 13 or 26 RCW; and
(O) An attorney who represents parents from the office of public
defense's parents' representation program.
(vi) The following shall also be members of the task force:
(A) A representative from the attorney general's office who
currently handles Title 13 RCW cases;
(B) A person designated by the secretary of the department of
social and health services who has experience working on dependency
cases under Title 13 RCW; and
(C) The office of the family and children's ombudsman or the
ombudsman's designee.
(b) The task force shall choose its cochairs from among its
legislative membership. The legislative members of the task force
shall convene the first meeting of the task force.
(2) The task force shall review the following issues:
(a) The implementation of the results of the review and study as
directed by RCW 2.56.150;
(b) The feasibility and desirability of establishing statewide
standards regarding fees and costs for services performed by guardians
ad litem;
(c) The training curriculum currently developed by the
administrative office of the courts under RCW 2.56.030(15) and the
desirability of requiring specialized training for cases involving
special needs children;
(d) Applicable federal laws impacting Washington's guardians ad
litem statutes;
(e) RCW 13.34.100 and the exceptions to the appointment of
guardians ad litem for children in dependencies;
(f) Court oversight of the qualifications and performance of
guardians ad litem;
(g) The feasibility and desirability of establishing statewide
standards regarding grievance and removal procedures and remedies;
(h) The feasibility and desirability of establishing statewide
standards for guardians ad litem including requiring legal training for
volunteer guardians ad litem;
(i) The feasibility and desirability of establishing statewide
model protocols to be used by guardians ad litem for screening and
interviewing parties, witnesses, and children, and developing parenting
plan recommendations in cases involving allegations of limiting factors
under RCW 26.09.191; and
(j) Other issues deemed relevant to improving the practice of
guardians ad litem in cases under Titles 13 and 26 RCW.
(3) Staff support for the task force must be provided by senate
committee services and the house of representatives office of program
research.
(4) The task force may form an executive committee, create
subcommittees, designate alternative representatives, and define other
procedures, as needed, for the operation of the task force.
(5) The task force, where appropriate, may consult with individuals
from the public or private sector or ask the individuals to establish
an advisory committee. Members of such an advisory committee are not
entitled to expense reimbursement.
(6) The administrative office of the courts shall cooperate with
the task force and provide information as the chair or cochairs may
request.
(7) Legislative members of the task force shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses under RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members, except
those representing an employee or organization, are entitled to be
reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.
(8) The expenses of the task force must be paid jointly by the
senate and house of representatives. Task force expenditures are
subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee
and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their
successor committees.
(9) The task force shall report its findings and recommendations to
the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2008.
(10) This section expires January 1, 2009.

--- END ---