BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 16.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The director may adopt rules establishing fees for conducting
special inspections of poultry or poultry facilities that the director
may provide at the request of the poultry owner or individual managing
such animals.
(2) The fees shall, as closely as practical, cover the cost of the
service provided.
(3) Persons requesting facility approval or inspections under this
section are responsible for payment of fees for the requested services.
All fees collected under this section shall be deposited in an account
in the agricultural local fund and used to carry out the purposes of
this chapter.

--- END ---