BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that creating
affordable housing to address the needs of Washington's workforce is a
top priority, and that creating such housing not only benefits working
families, but society as a whole. However, there are many barriers in
creating such affordable housing and it is in the best interest of the
state to determine what those barriers are and how they can be
alleviated. Of particular concern in developing workforce housing is
the cost of condominium construction liability insurance. Despite the
fact that construction materials have improved and that defect claims
reportedly have decreased in number, the price of condominium
construction liability insurance has not dropped, creating a huge
financial burden for affordable housing developers and nonprofit
affordable housing developers in particular. Therefore, the
legislature declares it to be in the public interest to convene a task
force to review condominium construction liability insurance products
to help determine how these products can be more competitively priced,
allowing more affordable housing units to be developed throughout the
state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1)(a) A legislative task force on
condominium construction liability insurance is established, with
thirteen members as provided in this subsection. The office of the
insurance commissioner shall convene the task force with the following
members:
(i) The majority leader of the senate shall appoint one member from
the senate.
(ii) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one
member from the house of representatives.
(iii) The majority leader of the senate and the speaker of the
house of representatives shall jointly appoint eleven nonlegislative
members of the task force, which shall include one member each from the
office of the insurance commissioner, the master builders association,
the building industry association of Washington, the association of
general contractors, the Washington low income housing alliance, a
nonprofit housing developer, a for-profit housing developer, a
condominium owners' association, and a lender, and two members
representing the interests of the insurance industry.
(b) The task force shall elect its cochairs from among its
membership. The office of the insurance commissioner shall convene the
initial meeting of the task force.
(2) The task force shall study condominium construction liability
insurance including, but not limited to, the following:
(a) The type and number of construction defect claims that are
filed against condominium developers, including contractors and their
subcontractors;
(b) The difference, if any, in the claim experience between for-profit and nonprofit developers;
(c) The number and type of entities that are providing construction
liability insurance to condominium developers in the Washington market;
(d) The type of insurance packages that are available in the market
for new condominium construction projects;
(e) How to increase the number of entities offering construction
liability insurance for condominium developers with a goal of making
insurance rates more affordable through increased competition;
(f) Compare Washington's market to other states in terms of number
of entities offering construction liability insurance for condominium
developers and the availability and affordability of such coverage.
(3) To support the work of the task force, the office of the
insurance commissioner shall invite authorized insurers who offer
construction liability insurance for condominium developers to
participate in the voluntary submission of claims data for condominium
construction liability claims. To further support the work of the task
force, the insurance commissioner shall invite the surplus line
association of Washington to participate in obtaining the voluntary
submission of claims data for condominium construction liability claims
from unauthorized insurers who offer construction liability insurance
for condominium developers. The task force shall determine the scope
and extent of the claims data to be requested, as well as the format
for submission.
(4) Legislative members of the task force must be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120.
(5) The task force shall report its findings and recommendations,
including recommendations on any proposed legislation, to the
legislature by December 1, 2009.
(6) This section expires July 1, 2010.

--- END ---