BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The director may control predatory animals that the director
determines to be injurious to livestock, crops, and property and may
for this purpose enter into written agreements with the federal and
state governments, political subdivisions and agencies of such
governments, political subdivisions and agencies of the state including
counties, municipal corporations and associations, and individuals when
such cooperation will implement the control of predators injurious to
livestock, crops, and property.
(2) The director may make expenditures and contract for personal
services, control materials, and equipment as required to carry out
predatory animal control functions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The sum of fifty thousand dollars, or as
much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2009, from the general fund to the department of fish
and wildlife for the purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2008.

--- END ---