BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.410.210 and 2005 c 497 s 201 are each amended to
read as follows:
The purpose of the professional educator standards board is to
establish policies and requirements for the preparation and
certification of educators that provide standards for competency in
professional knowledge and practice in the areas of certification; a
foundation of skills, knowledge, and attitudes necessary to help
students with diverse needs, abilities, cultural experiences, and
learning styles meet or exceed the learning goals outlined in RCW
28A.150.210; knowledge of research-based practice; and professional
development throughout a career. The Washington professional educator
standards board shall:
(1) Establish policies and practices for the approval of programs
of courses, requirements, and other activities leading to educator
certification including teacher, school administrator, and educational
staff associate certification;
(2) Establish policies and practices for the approval of the
character of work required to be performed as a condition of entrance
to and graduation from any educator preparation program including
teacher, school administrator, and educational staff associate
preparation program as provided in subsection (1) of this section;
(3) Establish a list of accredited institutions of higher education
of this and other states whose graduates may be awarded educator
certificates as teacher, school administrator, and educational staff
associate and establish criteria and enter into agreements with other
states to acquire reciprocal approval of educator preparation programs
and certification, including teacher certification from the national
board for professional teaching standards;
(4) Establish policies for approval of nontraditional educator
preparation programs;
(5) Conduct a review of educator program approval standards at
least every five years, beginning in 2006, to reflect research findings
and assure continued improvement of preparation programs for teachers,
administrators, and school specialized personnel;
(6) Specify the types and kinds of educator certificates to be
issued and conditions for certification in accordance with subsection
(1) of this section and RCW 28A.410.010;
(7) Hear and determine educator certification appeals as provided
by RCW 28A.410.100;
(8) Apply for and receive federal or other funds on behalf of the
state for purposes related to the duties of the board;
(9) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW that are necessary for the
effective and efficient implementation of this chapter;
(10) Maintain data concerning educator preparation programs and
their quality, educator certification, educator employment trends and
needs, and other data deemed relevant by the board;
(11) Serve as an advisory body to the superintendent of public
instruction on issues related to educator recruitment, hiring,
mentoring and support, professional growth, retention, educator
evaluation including but not limited to peer evaluation, and revocation
and suspension of licensure;
(12) Submit, by October 15th of each even-numbered year, a joint
report with the state board of education to the legislative education
committees, the governor, and the superintendent of public instruction.
The report shall address the progress the boards have made and the
obstacles they have encountered, individually and collectively, in the
work of achieving the goals set out in RCW 28A.150.210;
(13) Establish the prospective teacher assessment system for basic
skills and subject knowledge that shall be required to obtain residency
certification pursuant to RCW 28A.410.220 through 28A.410.240; ((and))
(14) By January 2010, set performance standards and develop, pilot,
and implement a uniform and externally administered professional-level
certification assessment based on demonstrated teaching skill. In the
development of this assessment, consideration shall be given to changes
in professional certification program components such as the
culminating seminar; and
(15) Conduct meetings under the provisions of chapter 42.30 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.410.220 and 2002 c 92 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Beginning not later than September 1, 2001, the Washington
professional educator standards board shall make available and pilot a
means of assessing an applicant's knowledge in the basic skills. For
the purposes of this section, "basic skills" means the subjects of at
least reading, writing, and mathematics. Beginning September 1, 2002,
except as provided in (c) of this subsection and subsection (((3))) (4)
of this section, passing this assessment shall be required for
admission to approved teacher preparation programs and for persons from
out-of-state applying for a Washington state residency teaching
certificate.
(b) On an individual student basis, approved teacher preparation
programs may admit into their programs a candidate who has not achieved
the minimum basic skills assessment score established by the Washington
professional educator standards board. Individuals so admitted may not
receive residency certification without passing the basic skills
assessment under this section.
(c) The Washington professional educator standards board may
establish criteria to ensure that persons from out-of-state who are
applying for residency certification and persons applying to master's
degree level teacher preparation programs can demonstrate to the
board's satisfaction that they have the requisite basic skills based
upon having completed another basic skills assessment acceptable to the
Washington professional educator standards board or by some other
alternative approved by the Washington professional educator standards
board.
(2) The professional educator standards board shall set performance
standards and develop, pilot, and implement a uniform and externally
administered professional-level certification assessment based on
demonstrated teaching skill. In the development of this assessment,
consideration shall be given to changes in professional certification
program components such as the culminating seminar.
(3) Beginning not later than September 1, 2002, the Washington
professional educator standards board shall provide for the initial
piloting and implementation of a means of assessing an applicant's
knowledge in the subjects for which the applicant has applied for an
endorsement to his or her residency or professional teaching
certificate. The assessment of subject knowledge shall not include
instructional methodology. Beginning September 1, 2005, passing this
assessment shall be required to receive an endorsement for
certification purposes.
(((3))) (4) The Washington professional educator standards board
may permit exceptions from the assessment requirements under
subsections (1) ((and)), (2), and (3) of this section on a case-by-case
basis.
(((4))) (5) The Washington professional educator standards board
shall provide for reasonable accommodations for individuals who are
required to take the assessments in subsection (1) ((or)), (2), or (3)
of this section if the individuals have learning or other disabilities.
(((5))) (6) With the exception of applicants exempt from the
requirements of subsections (1) ((and)), (2), and (3) of this section,
an applicant must achieve a minimum assessment score or scores
established by the Washington professional educator standards board on
each of the assessments under subsections (1) ((and)), (2), and (3) of
this section.
(((6))) (7) The Washington professional educator standards board
and superintendent of public instruction, as determined by the
Washington professional educator standards board, may contract with one
or more third parties for:
(a) The development, purchase, administration, scoring, and
reporting of scores of the assessments established by the Washington
professional educator standards board under subsections (1) ((and)),
(2), and (3) of this section;
(b) Related clerical and administrative activities; or
(c) Any combination of the purposes in this subsection.
(((7))) (8) Applicants for admission to a Washington teacher
preparation program and applicants for residency and professional
certificates who are required to successfully complete one or more of
the assessments under subsections (1) ((and)), (2), and (3) of this
section, and who are charged a fee for the assessment by a third party
contracted with under subsection (((6))) (7) of this section, shall pay
the fee charged by the contractor directly to the contractor. Such
fees shall be reasonably related to the actual costs of the contractor
in providing the assessment.
(((8))) (9) The superintendent of public instruction is responsible
for supervision and providing support services to administer this
section.
(((9))) (10) The Washington professional educator standards board
shall collaboratively select or develop and implement the assessments
and minimum assessment scores required under this section with the
superintendent of public instruction and shall provide opportunities
for representatives of other interested educational organizations to
participate in the selection or development and implementation of such
assessments in a manner deemed appropriate by the Washington
professional educator standards board.
(((10))) (11) The Washington professional educator standards board
shall adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW that are reasonably necessary
for the effective and efficient implementation of this section.

--- END ---