BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.150.010 and 2007 c 113 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Self-service storage facility" means any real property
designed and used for the purpose of renting or leasing individual
storage space to occupants who are to have access to the space for the
purpose of storing and removing personal property on a self-service
basis, but does not include a garage or other storage area in a private
residence. No occupant may use a self-service storage facility for
residential purposes.
(2) "Owner" means the owner, operator, lessor, or sublessor of a
self-service storage facility, his or her agent, or any other person
authorized by him or her to manage the facility, or to receive rent
from an occupant under a rental agreement.
(3) "Occupant" means a person, or his or her sublessee, successor,
or assign, who is entitled to the use of the storage space at a self-service storage facility under a rental agreement, to the exclusion of
others.
(4) "Rental agreement" means any written agreement or lease which
establishes or modifies the terms, conditions, rules or any other
provision concerning the use and occupancy of a self-service storage
facility.
(5) "Personal property" means movable property not affixed to land,
and includes, but is not limited to, goods, merchandise, furniture, and
household items.
(6) "Last known address" means that address provided by the
occupant in the latest rental agreement, or the address provided by the
occupant in a subsequent written notice of a change of address.
(7) "Reasonable manner" means to dispose of personal property by
donation to a not-for-profit charitable organization, removal of the
personal property from the self-service storage facility by a trash
hauler or recycler, or any other method that in the discretion of the
owner is reasonable under the circumstances.
(8) "Commercially reasonable manner" means a public sale of the
personal property in the self-storage space. The personal property may
be sold in the owner's discretion on or off the self-service storage
facility site as a single lot or in parcels. If five or more bidders
are in attendance at a public sale of the personal property, the
proceeds received are deemed to be commercially reasonable.
(9) "Costs of the sale" means reasonable costs directly incurred by
the delivering or sending of notices, advertising, accessing,
inventorying, auctioning, conducting a public sale, removing, and
disposing of property stored in a self-service storage facility.
(10) "Late fee" means a fee or charge assessed by an owner of a
self-service storage facility as an estimate of any loss incurred by an
owner for an occupant's failure to pay rent when due. A late fee is
not a penalty, interest on a debt, nor is a late fee a reasonable
expense that the owner may incur in the course of collecting unpaid
rent in enforcing the owner's lien rights pursuant to RCW 19.150.020 or
enforcing any other remedy provided by statute or contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 19.150 RCW
to read as follows:
Any late fee charged by the owner shall be provided for in the
rental agreement. No late fee shall be collected unless it is written
in the rental agreement or as an addendum to such agreement. An owner
may impose a reasonable late fee for each month an occupant does not
pay rent when due. A late fee of twenty dollars or twenty percent of
the monthly rental amount, whichever is greater, for each late rental
payment shall be deemed reasonable, and shall not constitute a penalty.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.150.020 and 1988 c 240 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The owner of a self-service storage facility and his or her heirs,
executors, administrators, successors, and assigns have a lien upon all
personal property located at a self-service storage facility for rent,
labor, ((or other charges)) late fees, and costs of the sale, present
or future, incurred pursuant to the rental agreement, and for expenses
necessary for the preservation, sale, or disposition of personal
property subject to this chapter. The lien may be enforced consistent
with this chapter. However, any lien on a motor vehicle or boat which
has attached and is set forth in the documents of title to the motor
vehicle or boat shall have priority over any lien created pursuant to
this chapter.

Sec. 4 RCW 19.150.901 and 1988 c 240 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
This chapter shall only apply to rental agreements entered into,
automatically extended, or automatically renewed after June 9, 1988.
Rental agreements entered into before June 9, 1988, which provide for
monthly rental payments but providing no specific termination date
shall be subject to this chapter on the first monthly rental payment
date next succeeding June 9, 1988.

Sec. 5 RCW 19.150.902 and 1988 c 240 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
All rental agreements entered into before June 9, 1988, and not
automatically extended or automatically renewed after that date, or
otherwise made subject to this chapter pursuant to RCW 19.150.901, and
the rights, duties, and interests flowing from them, shall remain
valid, and may be enforced or terminated in accordance with their terms
or as permitted by any other statute or law of this state.

--- END ---