BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
improve access to higher education for all residents and ensure that
students have the necessary resources and support services to attain
their educational goals while keeping families strong. For many
students, the lack of affordable, accessible, quality child care on or
in close proximity to colleges and universities is a barrier to
completion of their higher education goals. It is the intent of the
legislature to adopt policies that leverage existing resources and
maximize educational outcomes by supporting affordable, accessible, and
quality child care programs. Further, it is the intent of the
legislature that any funds appropriated under this act should be
divided equally between the two accounts created by this act.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.135.010 and 1999 c 375 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Two Washington accounts for student child care in higher education
are established. The higher education coordinating board and the state
board for community and technical colleges shall administer the
programs((. Through these programs the boards may award on a
competitive basis)) and shall award child care grants to state
institutions of higher education to encourage programs to address the
need for high quality, accessible, and affordable child care for
students at higher education institutions. The grants shall be used
exclusively for the provision of quality child care services for
students at institutions of higher education. The university or
college administration and student government association, or its
equivalent, of each institution receiving the award shall contribute
financial support in an amount equal to or greater than the child care
grant received by the institution. Student government associations may
solicit funds from private organizations, such as university or college
foundations, as part of their financial support for child care.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.135.030 and 2005 c 490 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
The higher education coordinating board shall administer the
program for four-year institutions of higher education((. The state
board for community and technical colleges shall administer the program
for community and technical colleges. The higher education
coordinating board and the state board for community and technical
colleges)) and shall have the following powers and duties in
administering ((each)) the program:
(1) To adopt rules necessary to carry out the program;
(2) To establish one or more review committees to assist in the
evaluation of proposals for funding. The review committees ((shall
include but not be limited to individuals from the Washington
association for the education of young children and the child care
resource and referral network)) may receive input from parents,
educators, and other experts in the field of early childhood education
for this purpose;
(3) To establish each biennium specific guidelines for submitting
grant proposals consistent with the overall goals of the program.
((During the 1999-2001 biennium)) The guidelines shall be consistent
with the following desired outcomes of increasing access to quality
child care for students, ((addressing the demand for infant and toddler
care,)) providing affordable child care alternatives((, creating more
cooperative preschool programs, creating models that can be replicated
at other institutions)) for students, and creating a partnership
between university or college administrations, university or college
foundations, and student government associations, or ((its)) their
equivalents ((and increasing efficiency and innovation at campus child
care centers));
(4) To ((establish guidelines for an allocation system based on
factors that include but are not limited to:)) proportionally
distribute the amount of money available in the trust fund((;
characteristics of the institutions including the size of the faculty
and student body; and the number of child care grants received)) based
on the financial support for child care received by the student
government associations or their equivalents;
(5) To solicit grant proposals and provide information to the
institutions of higher education about the program; ((and))
(6) To establish reporting, evaluation, accountability, monitoring,
and dissemination requirements for the recipients of the grants;
(7) To complete and submit a report on child care at the four-year
institutions of higher education to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2008. The report shall include but not be
limited to information on the need for high quality, affordable, and
accessible child care for students; the extent to which child care is
a barrier to student access and completion of students' education; an
inventory of existing child care centers and services provided; and the
amount contributed by each university or college administration and
student government association for the purposes of child care; and
(8) To report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by
December 15, 2009, and every two years thereafter, on the status of
program design and implementation. The report shall include but not be
limited to summary information on the institutions receiving child
grant allocations, including expenditures and reports for the previous
biennium, services provided by each institutional child care center,
and the number of students using such services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28B.135
RCW to read as follows:
The state board for community and technical colleges shall
administer the program for community and technical colleges and shall
have the following powers and duties in administering the program
established in RCW 28B.135.010:
(1) To adopt rules necessary to carry out the program;
(2) To establish, if deemed necessary, one or more review
committees to assist in the evaluation of proposals for funding. The
review committees may receive input from parents, educators, and other
experts in the field of early childhood education for this purpose;
(3) To establish each biennium specific guidelines for submitting
grant proposals consistent with the overall goals of the program. The
guidelines shall be consistent with the following desired outcomes of
increasing access to quality child care for students, providing
affordable child care alternatives for students, creating more
cooperative preschool programs or other alternative parent education
models, creating models that can be replicated at other institutions,
creating a partnership between college administrations, college
foundations, and student government associations, or their equivalents,
and increasing innovation at campus child care centers;
(4) To establish guidelines for an allocation system based on
factors that include but are not limited to: The amount of money
available in the trust fund and the financial support for child care
received by the student government associations or their equivalent;
(5) To solicit grant proposals and provide information to the
institutions of higher education about the program;
(6) To establish reporting, evaluation, accountability, monitoring,
and dissemination requirements for the recipients of the grants;
(7) To complete and submit a report on child care at the public
two-year institutions of higher education to the appropriate committees
of the legislature by December 1, 2008. The report shall include but
not be limited to information on the need for high quality, affordable,
and accessible child care for students; the extent to which child care
is a barrier to student access and completion of their education,
including workforce training programs at community and technical
colleges; an inventory of existing child care centers and services
provided; and the amount contributed by each college administration and
student government association for the purposes of child care; and
(8) To report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by
December 15, 2009, and every two years thereafter, on the status of
program design and implementation within the community and technical
college system. The report shall include but not be limited to summary
information on the institutions receiving child grant allocations,
including expenditures and reports for the previous biennium, services
provided by each institutional child care center, and the number of
students using such services.

--- END ---