BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 50.04.145 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 23 s 25 are each
amended to read as follows:
The term "employment" shall not include services rendered by any
((person, firm, or corporation)) individual currently engaging in a
business that requires registration under chapter 18.27 RCW or
licensing under chapter 19.28 RCW and which is registered under chapter
18.27 RCW or licensed under chapter 19.28 RCW when:
(1) ((Contracting to perform work for any contractor registered
under chapter 18.27 RCW or licensed under chapter 19.28 RCW)) The
individual has been and will continue to be free from control or
direction over the performance of the service, both under the contract
of service and in fact;
(2) ((The person, firm, or corporation has a principal place of
business which would be eligible for a business deduction for internal
revenue service tax purposes other than that furnished by the
contractor for which the business has contracted to furnish services))
The service is either outside the usual course of business for which
the service is performed, or the service is performed outside of all
the places of business of the enterprise for which the service is
performed, or the individual is responsible, both under the contract
and in fact, for the costs of the principal place of business from
which the service is performed;
(3) ((The person, firm, or corporation maintains)) The individual
is customarily engaged in an independently established trade,
occupation, profession, or business, of the same nature as that
involved in the contract of service, or the individual has a principal
place of business for the business the individual is conducting that is
eligible for a business deduction for federal income tax purposes,
other than that furnished by the employer for which the business has
contracted to furnish services;
(4) On the effective date of the contract of service, the
individual is responsible for filing at the next applicable filing
period, both under the contract of service and in fact, a schedule of
expenses with the internal revenue service for the type of business the
individual is conducting;
(5) On the effective date of the contract of service, or within a
reasonable period after the effective date of the contract, the
individual has an active and valid certificate of registration with the
department of revenue, and an active and valid account with any other
state agencies as required by the particular case, for the business the
individual is conducting for the payment of all state taxes normally
paid by employers and businesses and has registered for and received a
unified business identifier number from the state of Washington;
(6) On the effective date of the contract of service, the
individual is maintaining a separate set of books or records that
reflect all items of income and expenses of the business that the
individual is conducting; and
(((4) The work which the person, firm, or corporation has
contracted to perform is:
(a) The work of a contractor as defined in RCW 18.27.010; or
(b) The work of installing wires or equipment to convey electric
current or installing apparatus to be operated by such current as it
pertains to the electrical industry as described in chapter 19.28 RCW;
and
(5) A contractor registered under chapter 18.27 RCW or licensed
under chapter 19.28 RCW does not supervise or control the means by
which the result is accomplished or the manner in which the work is
performed))
(7) On the effective date of the contract of service, the
individual must have a valid contractor registration or electrical
contractor license.

Sec. 2 RCW 51.08.070 and 1991 c 246 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Employer" means any person, body of persons, corporate or
otherwise, and the legal representatives of a deceased employer, all
while engaged in this state in any work covered by the provisions of
this title, by way of trade or business, or who contracts with one or
more workers, the essence of which is the personal labor of such worker
or workers. Or as ((a separate alternative,)) an exception to the
definition of employer, persons or entities are not employers when they
contract or agree to remunerate the services performed by an individual
who meets the tests set forth in subsections (1) through (6) of RCW
51.08.195 or the separate tests set forth in section 5 of this act for
work done by a contractor registered under chapter 18.27 RCW or
licensed under chapter 19.28 RCW.
((For the purposes of this title, a contractor registered under
chapter 18.27 RCW or licensed under chapter 19.28 RCW is not an
employer when:
(1) Contracting with any other person, firm, or corporation
currently engaging in a business which is registered under chapter
18.27 RCW or licensed under chapter 19.28 RCW;
(2) The person, firm, or corporation has a principal place of
business which would be eligible for a business deduction for internal
revenue service tax purposes other than that furnished by the
contractor for which the business has contracted to furnish services;
(3) The person, firm, or corporation maintains a separate set of
books or records that reflect all items of income and expenses of the
business; and
(4) The work which the person, firm, or corporation has contracted
to perform is:
(a) The work of a contractor as defined in RCW 18.27.010; or
(b) The work of installing wires or equipment to convey electric
current or installing apparatus to be operated by such current as it
pertains to the electrical industry as described in chapter 19.28
RCW.))

Sec. 3 RCW 51.08.180 and 1991 c 246 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1))) "Worker" means every person in this state who is engaged in
the employment of an employer under this title, whether by way of
manual labor or otherwise in the course of his or her employment; also
every person in this state who is engaged in the employment of or who
is working under an independent contract, the essence of which is his
or her personal labor for an employer under this title, whether by way
of manual labor or otherwise, in the course of his or her employment,
or as ((a separate alternative,)) an exception to the definition of
worker, a person is not a worker if he or she meets the tests set forth
in subsections (1) through (6) of RCW 51.08.195 or the separate tests
set forth in section 5 of this act for work done by a contractor
registered under chapter 18.27 RCW or licensed under chapter 19.28 RCW:
PROVIDED, That a person is not a worker for the purpose of this title,
with respect to his or her activities attendant to operating a truck
which he or she owns, and which is leased to a common or contract
carrier.
(((2) For the purposes of this title, any person, firm, or
corporation currently engaging in a business which is registered under
chapter 18.27 RCW or licensed under chapter 19.28 RCW is not a worker
when:
(a) Contracting to perform work for any contractor registered under
chapter 18.27 RCW or licensed under chapter 19.28 RCW;
(b) The person, firm, or corporation has a principal place of
business which would be eligible for a business deduction for internal
revenue service tax purposes other than that furnished by the
contractor for which the business has contracted to furnish services;
(c) The person, firm, or corporation maintains a separate set of
books or records that reflect all items of income and expenses of the
business; and
(d) The work which the person, firm, or corporation has contracted
to perform is:
(i) The work of a contractor as defined in RCW 18.27.010; or
(ii) The work of installing wires or equipment to convey electric
current or installing apparatus to be operated by such current as it
pertains to the electrical industry as described in chapter 19.28 RCW.
(3) Any person, firm, or corporation registered under chapter 18.27
RCW or licensed under chapter 19.28 RCW including those performing work
for any contractor registered under chapter 18.27 RCW or licensed under
chapter 19.28 RCW is a worker when the contractor supervises or
controls the means by which the result is accomplished or the manner in
which the work is performed.
(4) For the purposes of this title, any person participating as a
driver or back-up driver in commuter ride sharing, as defined in RCW
46.74.010(1), is not a worker while driving a ride-sharing vehicle on
behalf of the owner or lessee of the vehicle.))

Sec. 4 RCW 51.08.195 and 1991 c 246 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As ((a separate alternative)) an exception to the definition of
"employer" under RCW 51.08.070 and the definition of "worker" under RCW
51.08.180, services performed by an individual for remuneration shall
not constitute employment subject to this title if it is shown that:
(1) The individual has been and will continue to be free from
control or direction over the performance of the service, both under
the contract of service and in fact; and
(2) The service is either outside the usual course of business for
which the service is performed, or the service is performed outside all
of the places of business of the enterprise for which the service is
performed, or the individual is responsible, both under the contract
and in fact, for the costs of the principal place of business from
which the service is performed; and
(3) The individual is customarily engaged in an independently
established trade, occupation, profession, or business, of the same
nature as that involved in the contract of service, or the individual
has a principal place of business for the business the individual is
conducting that is eligible for a business deduction for federal income
tax purposes; and
(4) On the effective date of the contract of service, the
individual is responsible for filing at the next applicable filing
period, both under the contract of service and in fact, a schedule of
expenses with the internal revenue service for the type of business the
individual is conducting; and
(5) On the effective date of the contract of service, or within a
reasonable period after the effective date of the contract, the
individual has established an account with the department of revenue,
and other state agencies as required by the particular case, for the
business the individual is conducting for the payment of all state
taxes normally paid by employers and businesses and has registered for
and received a unified business identifier number from the state of
Washington; and
(6) On the effective date of the contract of service, the
individual is maintaining a separate set of books or records that
reflect all items of income and expenses of the business which the
individual is conducting.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 51.08 RCW
to read as follows:
For the purposes of this title, any individual performing services
for remuneration under an independent contract and who is registered
under chapter 18.27 RCW or licensed under chapter 19.28 RCW is not a
worker when:
(1) The individual has been, and will continue to be, free from
control or direction over the performance of the service, both under
the contract of service and in fact;
(2) The service is either outside the usual course of business for
which the service is performed, or the service is performed outside all
of the places of business of the enterprise for which the service is
performed, or the individual is responsible, both under the contract
and in fact, for the costs of the principal place of business from
which the service is performed;
(3) The individual is customarily engaged in an independently
established trade, occupation, profession, or business, of the same
nature as that involved in the contract of service, or the individual
has a principal place of business for the business the individual is
conducting that is eligible for a business deduction for federal income
tax purposes other than that furnished by the employer for which the
business has contracted to furnish services;
(4) On the effective date of the contract of service, the
individual is responsible for filing at the next applicable filing
period, both under the contract of service and in fact, a schedule of
expenses with the internal revenue service for the type of business the
individual is conducting;
(5) On the effective date of the contract of service, or within a
reasonable period after the effective date of the contract, the
individual has established an active and valid account with the
department of revenue, and other state agencies as required by the
particular case, for the business the individual is conducting for the
payment of all state taxes normally paid by employers and businesses
and has registered for and received a unified business identifier
number from the state of Washington;
(6) On the effective date of the contract of service, the
individual is maintaining a separate set of books or records that
reflect all items of income and expenses of the business which the
individual is conducting; and
(7) On the effective date of the contract of service, the
individual must have a valid contractor registration or electrical
contractor license.

--- END ---