BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 19.86 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Every seller shall post in a conspicuous location a notice
stating that purchasers of animals have specific rights under law and
that a written statement of the rights is available upon request by any
interested party. The notice shall be in one hundred point type and
read as follows: "Purchasers of animals from this seller are entitled
to specific rights under the law. Purchasers must be provided a
written copy of the rights at the time of sale. Prospective purchasers
may receive a copy of the rights from this seller upon request."
(b) Every seller shall, at the time of sale or upon the request of
a prospective purchaser, provide a written notice of rights under this
section. The notice shall be signed by the purchaser and the seller at
the time of sale acknowledging receipt.
(2) Every seller shall, at the time of sale, deliver to the
purchaser of each animal a written statement containing the following
information:
(a) The date of the animal's birth, if known;
(b) The breeder's name and address, if known;
(c) The date the seller received the animal, if not bred by the
seller;
(d) The breed, sex, and color of the animal, and identifying marks
existing at the time of sale. If the animal is from a United States
department of agriculture licensed source, the statement shall contain
the individual identifying tag, tattoo, or color number for that
animal. If the breed is unknown or mixed, this fact shall be stated;
(e) A record of any inoculations and parasite or worming treatments
administered to the animal, to the extent known, including dates of
administration and the type of vaccine or worming treatment; and
(f) A record of any diagnosis from a licensed veterinarian, and a
record of any treatment or medication received by the animal while in
the possession of the seller, whether provided by a licensed
veterinarian or by the seller, and either of the following:
(i) A statement, signed by the seller and purchaser at the time of
sale, that:
(A) The animal has no known disease or illness;
(B) The animal has no known congenital or hereditary condition that
adversely affects the health of the animal at the time of the sale, or
that is likely to adversely affect the health of the animal in the
future; or
(ii) A statement disclosing any known health problems.
(3) The written statement required by subsection (2) of this
section shall be signed by both the seller, certifying the accuracy of
the statement, and by the purchaser acknowledging receipt of the
statement.
(4) If, within fifteen days after the date of purchase, a dog
purchased from a seller is determined, through physical examination,
diagnostic tests, or necropsy by a veterinarian, to be clinically ill
or dies from any contagious or infectious illness or any parasitic
illness which renders it unfit for purchase or results in its death,
the purchaser may exercise one of the following options:
(a) Return the dog to the seller for a complete refund of the
purchase price, not including the sales tax;
(b) Return the dog to the seller for a replacement dog of equal
value of the purchaser's choice, providing a replacement dog is
available;
(c) Retain the dog and be entitled to receive reimbursement from
the seller for reasonable veterinary fees incurred in curing or
attempting to cure the affected dog, subject to the limitation that the
seller's liability for reimbursement shall not exceed the purchase
price, not including sales tax, of the dog. This subsection (4)(c)
shall apply only if the purchaser's veterinarian determines the dog's
illness can be treated by procedures that are appropriate and
customary. The value of these services is considered reasonable if
comparable to the value of similar services rendered by other licensed
veterinarians in reasonable proximity to the treating veterinarian.
Reimbursement shall not include the costs of the initial veterinary
examination fee and diagnostic or treatment fees not directly related
to the veterinarian's certification that the animal is unfit for
purchase pursuant to this section.
For the purposes of this subsection, veterinary findings of
intestinal and external parasites shall not be grounds for declaring
the dog unfit for purchase unless the dog is clinically ill or dies due
to that condition. A dog shall not be found unfit for purchase on
account of injury sustained or illness not existent in the animal on or
before delivery to the purchaser.
If, within one year after the date of purchase, a dog purchased
from a seller is certified through physical examination, diagnostic
tests, or necropsy by a veterinarian that the dog has, or has died
from, a defect which is congenital or hereditary and which adversely
affects or affected the health of the animal, and that existed in the
animal on or before delivery to the purchaser, the purchaser may
exercise one of the options as provided in (a), (b), and (c) of this
subsection.
Remedies available under (a), (b), and (c) of this subsection shall
also apply to replacement dogs.
(5) A veterinarian's certification of illness, congenital or
hereditary defects, or death shall be necessary for a refund or
replacement or to receive reimbursement for veterinary costs if the dog
is retained by the purchaser and treated for illness or congenital or
hereditary defect as provided in this section. The veterinarian's
certification shall be supplied at the purchaser's expense. The
veterinarian's certification shall state the following information:
(a) The purchaser's name and address;
(b) The date the dog was examined;
(c) The breed and age of the dog;
(d)(i) That the veterinarian examined the dog;
(ii) That the dog has or had an illness as described in subsection
(4) of this section or a defect as described in subsection (4) of this
section which renders it unfit for purchase or which resulted in its
death; and
(iii) The precise findings of the examination, diagnostic tests, or
necropsy;
(e) The treatment recommended, if any, and an estimate or the
actual cost of the treatment should the purchaser choose to retain the
dog and seek reimbursement for veterinary fees to cure or attempt to
cure the dog; and
(f) The veterinarian's name, address, telephone number, and
signature.
Within five business days of a veterinary examination which
certifies illness, defect, or death, the purchaser shall notify the
seller of the name, address, and telephone number of the examining
veterinarian. Failure to notify the seller or to carry out the
recommended treatment prescribed by the examining veterinarian who made
the initial diagnosis until a remedy as provided for in subsection (4)
of this section is agreed upon shall result in the purchaser's
forfeiture of rights under this section. Subsection (4) of this
section shall not apply where a seller who has provided a health
certificate issued by a veterinarian discloses in writing at the time
of sale the health problem for which the buyer later seeks to return
the dog. Such disclosures shall be signed by both the seller and
purchaser.
Where the seller has provided a guarantee of good health,
subsection (4) of this section shall apply regardless of whether the
seller disclosed the health problem at the time of sale.
(6) The refund or reimbursement required by this section shall be
made by the seller not later than fourteen days following receipt of
the veterinarian's certification that the dog is unfit for purchase or
has died from a condition defined as unfit for purchase in this
section. The certification shall be presented to the seller not later
than seven days following receipt thereof by the purchaser.
(7)(a) Any seller who advertises or otherwise represents that a dog
is registered or registerable shall provide the purchaser of the dog
with the following information at the time of sale:
(i) The breeder's name and address;
(ii) The name and registration number of the dam and sire of the
purchased dog's litter;
(iii) The name and address of the pedigree registry organization
where the dam and sire are registered.
(b) All documentation necessary to effect the registration of the
dog shall be provided by the seller to the owner within one hundred
twenty days of the date of sale. The one hundred twenty-day period may
be extended by the seller if the dog is being imported from outside the
United States by notifying the purchaser in writing of the reason for
the extension and a reasonable estimate of the arrival date of the
registration documents.
(c) If the seller fails to provide this documentation within one
hundred twenty days of the date of sale or fails to notify the
purchaser of an extension under (b) of this subsection, the purchaser
may elect one of the following remedies:
(i) Return the dog and receive a full refund of the purchase price,
not including sales tax;
(ii) Retain the dog and receive a refund from the seller in an
amount equal to fifty percent of the purchase price, unless the seller
has misrepresented any of the information required to be provided when
a dog is advertised or otherwise represented to be registered as
registerable as set forth under (a) of this subsection, in which case
the amount of the refund shall be the full purchase price of the dog,
not including sales tax.
(d) The seller may withhold the dog's registration application
until the purchaser supplies the seller with a signed veterinarian's
certificate stating that the dog has been spayed or neutered, provided
that withholding of the application was agreed to in writing by the
purchaser at the time of sale.
The seller shall provide the registration application within ten
days of receiving the veterinarian's certificate if the certificate is
supplied beyond the one hundred twenty-day period provided for in (b)
of this subsection.
(8) As used in this section:
(a) "Seller" means any person, business, or other entity, including
pet breeder, that sells more than twenty animals or three litters,
whichever is greater, in a twelve-month period. "Seller" does not
include animal control agencies, human societies, or other bona fide
nonprofit organizations performing the functions of humane societies.
(b) "Unfit for purchase" means any disease, deformity, injury,
physical condition, illness or any defect which is congenital or
hereditary and which has a significant adverse effect on the health of
the animal or which was manifest, capable of diagnosis, or likely to
have been contracted on or before the sale and delivery of the animal
to the consumer.
(c) "Veterinarian" means an individual licensed under the laws of
the state of Washington or any other state to practice veterinary
medicine and surgery.

--- END ---