BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) A developmental disability is a natural part of human
experience and the presence of a developmental disability in the life
of a person does not diminish or alter a person's rights or opportunity
to participate fully in the life of the community. The legislature
recognizes that with the advancement and widespread availability of
medical, educational, and social services, people with significant,
multiple developmental disabilities are living longer and that
investing in them at every stage of life helps maintain their skills
and abilities and provides them the opportunity to have a meaningful
daily life. Providing continued learning opportunities for individuals
with severe and profound intellectual developmental disabilities
supports both the individual and helps to maintain the well-being of
the family; and
(2) Gainful employment or involvement in employment-related
activities is an appropriate and desired goal for adults with
developmental disabilities. However, for adults with severe and
profound developmental disabilities or adults who are nearing
retirement age, community access services should be available as an
alternative, or in addition to, employment-related services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 71A.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall adopt and implement rules that enable
working age adults with developmental disabilities to pursue and
maintain gainful employment in integrated settings. The rules must
provide that counties, under contract with the department and within
specific funding provided for this purpose, will:
(a) Develop and make available services that offer support for
working age adults who do not have a severe or profound developmental
disability or are not nearing retirement age to pursue or maintain
gainful employment, including support and technical assistance to
achieve integrated employment outcomes; and
(b) Offer persons with a severe or profound developmental
disability and persons nearing retirement age the option to participate
in employment-related activities and nonemployment-related community
access services. Community access services may include, but are not
limited to:
(i) Community participation;
(ii) Social skills;
(iii) Self-advocacy skills;
(iv) Recreational skills;
(v) Continuing education classes;
(vi) Active supervision; and
(vii) Transportation.
(2) To the extent specific funding is provided for this purpose,
department staff will:
(a) Authorize services to working age adults that support the
individual's ability to pursue and maintain integrated, gainful
employment; and
(b) Authorize community access services as provided in subsection
(1)(b) of this section for persons with severe or profound
developmental disabilities or adults nearing retirement age. For
persons with severe or profound developmental disabilities:
(i) Employment-related services and community access services are
not mutually exclusive and may be provided in conjunction with one
another; and
(ii) Persons will be given a choice of services, and the authority
to exercise control over the selection of employment-related and
community access services available to them.
(3) The department shall make every effort to maximize the use of
federal funds to fund services authorized under this section.

--- END ---