BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.23.352 and 2002 c 94 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any second-class city or any town may construct any public
works, as defined in RCW 39.04.010, by contract or day labor without
calling for bids therefor whenever the estimated cost of the work or
improvement, including cost of materials, supplies and equipment will
not exceed the sum of forty-five thousand dollars, or sixty thousand
dollars after January 1, 2010, if more than one craft or trade is
involved with the public works, or thirty thousand dollars, or forty
thousand dollars after January 1, 2010, if a single craft or trade is
involved with the public works or the public works project is street
signalization or street lighting. A public works project means a
complete project. The restrictions in this subsection do not permit
the division of the project into units of work or classes of work to
avoid the restriction on work that may be performed by day labor on a
single project.
Whenever the cost of the public work or improvement, including
materials, supplies and equipment, will exceed these figures, the same
shall be done by contract. All such contracts shall be let at public
bidding upon publication of notice calling for sealed bids upon the
work. The notice shall be published in the official newspaper, or a
newspaper of general circulation most likely to bring responsive bids,
at least thirteen days prior to the last date upon which bids will be
received. The notice shall generally state the nature of the work to
be done that plans and specifications therefor shall then be on file in
the city or town hall for public inspections, and require that bids be
sealed and filed with the council or commission within the time
specified therein. Each bid shall be accompanied by a bid proposal
deposit in the form of a cashier's check, postal money order, or surety
bond to the council or commission for a sum of not less than five
percent of the amount of the bid, and no bid shall be considered unless
accompanied by such bid proposal deposit. The council or commission of
the city or town shall let the contract to the lowest responsible
bidder or shall have power by resolution to reject any or all bids and
to make further calls for bids in the same manner as the original call.
When the contract is let then all bid proposal deposits shall be
returned to the bidders except that of the successful bidder which
shall be retained until a contract is entered into and a bond to
perform the work furnished, with surety satisfactory to the council or
commission, in accordance with RCW 39.08.030. If the bidder fails to
enter into the contract in accordance with his or her bid and furnish
a bond within ten days from the date at which he or she is notified
that he or she is the successful bidder, the check or postal money
order and the amount thereof shall be forfeited to the council or
commission or the council or commission shall recover the amount of the
surety bond. A low bidder who claims error and fails to enter into a
contract is prohibited from bidding on the same project if a second or
subsequent call for bids is made for the project.
If no bid is received on the first call the council or commission
may readvertise and make a second call, or may enter into a contract
without any further call or may purchase the supplies, material or
equipment and perform the work or improvement by day labor.
(2) The allocation of public works projects to be performed by city
or town employees shall not be subject to a collective bargaining
agreement.
(3) In lieu of the procedures of subsection (1) of this section, a
second-class city or a town may let contracts using the small works
roster process provided in RCW 39.04.155.
Whenever possible, the city or town shall invite at least one
proposal from a minority or woman contractor who shall otherwise
qualify under this section.
(4) The form required by RCW 43.09.205 shall be to account and
record costs of public works in excess of five thousand dollars that
are not let by contract.
(5) The cost of a separate public works project shall be the costs
of the materials, equipment, supplies, and labor on that construction
project.
(6) Any purchase of supplies, material, or equipment, except for
public work or improvement, where the cost thereof exceeds ((seven))
fifteen thousand ((five hundred)) dollars shall be made upon call for
bids.
(7) Bids shall be called annually and at a time and in the manner
prescribed by ordinance for the publication in a newspaper of general
circulation in the city or town of all notices or newspaper
publications required by law. The contract shall be awarded to the
lowest responsible bidder.
(8) For advertisement and formal sealed bidding to be dispensed
with as to purchases with an estimated value of ((fifteen))
seventy-five thousand dollars or less, the council or commission must
authorize by resolution, use of the uniform procedure provided in RCW
39.04.190.
(9) The city or town legislative authority may waive the
competitive bidding requirements of this section pursuant to RCW
39.04.280 if an exemption contained within that section applies to the
purchase or public work.
(10) This section does not apply to performance-based contracts, as
defined in RCW 39.35A.020(4), that are negotiated under chapter 39.35A
RCW.
(11) Nothing in this section shall prohibit any second class city
or any town from allowing for preferential purchase of products made
from recycled materials or products that may be recycled or reused.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.32.245 and 2007 c 88 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No contract for the purchase of materials, equipment, or
supplies may be entered into by the county legislative authority or by
any elected or appointed officer of the county until after bids have
been submitted to the county. Bid specifications shall be in writing
and shall be filed with the clerk of the county legislative authority
for public inspection. An advertisement shall be published in the
official newspaper of the county stating the time and place where bids
will be opened, the time after which bids will not be received, the
materials, equipment, supplies, or services to be purchased, and that
the specifications may be seen at the office of the clerk of the county
legislative authority. The advertisement shall be published at least
once at least thirteen days prior to the last date upon which bids will
be received.
(2) The bids shall be in writing and filed with the clerk. The
bids shall be opened and read in public at the time and place named in
the advertisement. Contracts requiring competitive bidding under this
section may be awarded only to the lowest responsible bidder.
Immediately after the award is made, the bid quotations shall be
recorded and open to public inspection and shall be available by
telephone inquiry. Any or all bids may be rejected for good cause.
(3) For advertisement and formal sealed bidding to be dispensed
with as to purchases between ((five)) fifteen thousand and
((twenty-five)) seventy-five thousand dollars, the county legislative
authority must use the uniform process to award contracts as provided
in RCW 39.04.190. Advertisement and formal sealed bidding may be
dispensed with as to purchases of less than ((five)) fifteen thousand
dollars upon the order of the county legislative authority.
(4) This section does not apply to performance-based contracts, as
defined in RCW 39.35A.020(4), that are negotiated under chapter 39.35A
RCW; or contracts and purchases for the printing of election ballots,
voting machine labels, and all other election material containing the
names of candidates and ballot titles.
(5) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the legislative
authority of any county from allowing for preferential purchase of
products made from recycled materials or products that may be recycled
or reused.
(6) This section does not apply to contracting for public defender
services by a county.

Sec. 3 RCW 52.14.110 and 2001 c 79 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Insofar as practicable, purchases and any public works by the
district shall be based on competitive bids. A formal sealed bid
procedure shall be used as standard procedure for purchases and
contracts for purchases executed by the board of commissioners. Formal
sealed bidding shall not be required for:
(1) The purchase of any materials, supplies, or equipment if the
cost will not exceed the sum of ((ten)) fifteen thousand dollars.
However, whenever the estimated cost does not exceed ((fifty))
seventy-five thousand dollars, the commissioners may by resolution use
the process provided in RCW 39.04.190 to award contracts;
(2) Contracting for work to be done involving the construction or
improvement of a fire station or other buildings where the estimated
cost will not exceed the sum of two thousand five hundred dollars,
which includes the costs of labor, material, and equipment;
(3) Contracts using the small works roster process under RCW
39.04.155; and
(4) Any contract for purchases or public work pursuant to RCW
39.04.280 if an exemption contained within that section applies to the
purchase or public work.

Sec. 4 RCW 57.08.050 and 2003 c 145 s 1 and 2003 c 60 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All work ordered, the estimated cost of which is in excess of
ten thousand dollars, shall be let by contract and competitive bidding.
Before awarding any such contract the board of commissioners shall
publish a notice in a newspaper of general circulation where the
district is located at least once thirteen days before the last date
upon which bids will be received, inviting sealed proposals for such
work, plans and specifications which must at the time of publication of
such notice be on file in the office of the board of commissioners
subject to the public inspection. The notice shall state generally the
work to be done and shall call for proposals for doing the same to be
sealed and filed with the board of commissioners on or before the day
and hour named therein.
Each bid shall be accompanied by a certified or cashier's check or
postal money order payable to the order of the county treasurer for a
sum not less than five percent of the amount of the bid, or accompanied
by a bid bond in an amount not less than five percent of the bid with
a corporate surety licensed to do business in the state, conditioned
that the bidder will pay the district as liquidated damages the amount
specified in the bond, unless the bidder enters into a contract in
accordance with the bidder's bid, and no bid shall be considered unless
accompanied by such check, cash or bid bond. At the time and place
named such bids shall be publicly opened and read and the board of
commissioners shall proceed to canvass the bids and may let such
contract to the lowest responsible bidder upon plans and specifications
on file or to the best bidder submitting the bidder's own plans and
specifications. The board of commissioners may reject all bids for
good cause and readvertise and in such case all checks, cash or bid
bonds shall be returned to the bidders. If the contract is let, then
all checks, cash, or bid bonds shall be returned to the bidders, except
that of the successful bidder, which shall be retained until a contract
shall be entered into for doing the work, and a bond to perform such
work furnished with sureties satisfactory to the board of commissioners
in the full amount of the contract price between the bidder and the
commission in accordance with the bid. If the bidder fails to enter
into the contract in accordance with the bid and furnish the bond
within ten days from the date at which the bidder is notified that the
bidder is the successful bidder, the check, cash, or bid bonds and the
amount thereof shall be forfeited to the district. If the bidder fails
to enter into a contract in accordance with the bidder's bid, and the
board of commissioners deems it necessary to take legal action to
collect on any bid bond required by this section, then the district
shall be entitled to collect from the bidder any legal expenses,
including reasonable attorneys' fees occasioned thereby. A low bidder
who claims error and fails to enter into a contract is prohibited from
bidding on the same project if a second or subsequent call for bids is
made for the project.
(2) As an alternative to requirements under subsection (1) of this
section, a water-sewer district may let contracts using the small works
roster process under RCW 39.04.155.
(3) Any purchase of materials, supplies, or equipment, with an
estimated cost in excess of ((ten)) fifteen thousand dollars, shall be
by contract. Any purchase of materials, supplies, or equipment, with
an estimated cost of less than ((fifty)) seventy-five thousand dollars
shall be made using the process provided in RCW 39.04.190. Any
purchase of materials, supplies, or equipment with an estimated cost of
((fifty)) seventy-five thousand dollars or more shall be made by
competitive bidding following the procedure for letting contracts for
projects under subsection (1) of this section.
(4) As an alternative to requirements under subsection (3) of this
section, a water-sewer district may let contracts for purchase of
materials, supplies, or equipment with the suppliers designated on
current state agency, county, city, or town purchasing rosters for the
materials, supplies, or equipment, when the roster has been established
in accordance with the competitive bidding law for purchases applicable
to the state agency, county, city, or town. The price and terms for
purchases shall be as described on the applicable roster.
(5) The board may waive the competitive bidding requirements of
this section pursuant to RCW 39.04.280 if an exemption contained within
that section applies to the purchase or public work.

--- END ---