BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Autism is a developmental disability significantly affecting
verbal and nonverbal communication and social interaction and is
generally evident before age three;
(2) Autism adversely affects a student's educational performance;
(3) Autistic behaviors not only may make life difficult for people
with autism but also may make life challenging for their families,
health care providers, and teachers;
(4) Families coping with this devastating condition are searching
for answers about its causes, diagnosis, prevention, and treatment;
(5) Strategies about how to best prevent, identify, treat, and
accommodate the needs of individuals with autism and their families are
urgently needed;
(6) Early intervention is critical for affected children to gain
maximum benefit from current therapies; and
(7) An autism-specific supplement to be used in conjunction with an
individualized education plan will better assist people with autism as
well as assisting the families, health care providers, and the teachers
who care for those with the condition.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.155
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in
consultation with the autism task force and representatives from state
and nonprofit agencies that provide programs and services for people
with autism, shall develop guidelines for an autism-specific supplement
to be used in conjunction with an individualized education plan (IEP).
The supplement should address the unique needs of students with autism.
(2) The guidelines for the autism-specific supplement shall
consider, but need not be limited to:
(a) Extended educational programming, including extended day and
extended school year services, that consider the duration of programs
and settings based on an assessment of behavior, social skills,
communication, academics, and self-help skills;
(b) Daily schedules reflecting minimal unstructured time and active
engagement in learning activities, including lunch, snack, and recess,
and providing flexibility within routines that are adaptable to
individual skill levels and assist with schedule changes, such as field
trips, substitute teachers, and pep rallies;
(c) In-home and community-based training or a viable alternative
that assists the student with acquisition of social and behavioral
skills, including strategies that facilitate maintenance and
generalization of those skills from home to school, school to home,
home to community, and school to community;
(d) Positive behavior support strategies based on information, such
as:
(i) Antecedent manipulation, replacement behaviors, reinforcement
strategies, and data-based decisions; and
(ii) A behavior intervention plan developed from a functional
behavioral assessment that uses current data related to target
behaviors and addresses behavioral programming across home, school, and
community-based settings;
(e) Beginning at any age, futures planning for integrated living,
work, community, and educational environments that considers skills
necessary to function in current and postsecondary environments;
(f) Parent and family training and support, provided by qualified
personnel with experience in autism spectrum disorder, that:
(i) Provides a family with skills necessary for a child to succeed
in the home and community setting;
(ii) Includes information regarding resources such as parent
support groups, workshops, videos, conferences, and materials designed
to increase parent knowledge of specific teaching and management
techniques related to the child's curriculum; and
(iii) Facilitates parental carryover of in-home training and
includes strategies for behavior management and developing structured
home environments and communication training so that parents are active
participants in promoting the continuity of interventions across all
settings;
(g) A suitable staff-to-student ratio appropriate to identified
activities and as needed to achieve social and behavioral progress
based on the child's developmental and learning level, including
acquisition, fluency, maintenance, and generalization, that encourages
work towards individual independence as determined by:
(i) Adaptive behavior evaluation results;
(ii) Behavioral accommodation needs across settings; and
(iii) Transitions within the school day;
(h) Communication interventions, including language forms and
functions that enhance effective communication across settings, such as
augmentative, incidental, and naturalistic teaching;
(i) Social skills supports and strategies based on social skills
assessment and curriculum, and provided across settings, for example
trained peer facilitators such as a circle of friends, video modeling,
social stories, and role playing;
(j) Professional educator and staff support, such as training
provided to personnel who work with students to assure the correct
implementation of techniques and strategies described in the
individualized education programs; and
(k) Teaching strategies based on peer reviewed and research-based
practices for students with autism spectrum disorder, such as those
associated with discrete-trial training, visual supports, applied
behavior analysis, structured learning, augmentative communication, or
social skills training.
(2) As used in this section, "recess" means unstructured playtime.
(3) By September 1, 2008, the superintendent of public instruction
shall develop recommendations for guidelines for an autism-specific
supplement to be used with the IEPs and shall submit the
recommendations to the governor and the education committees of the
legislature.
(4) By December 1, 2008, the superintendent of public instruction
shall report the policy guidelines to school districts for the
districts to use to develop and adopt their policies.
(5) By April 1, 2009, each school district shall use the guidelines
developed under subsection (3) of this section to develop guidelines
for an autism-specific supplement to be used in conjunction with an IEP
that address the unique needs of students with autism.

--- END ---