BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.155
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in
consultation with the autism task force, and representatives from state
and nonprofit agencies that promote autism awareness and provide
programs and services for people with autism, shall develop autism
awareness and training policy guidelines for schools to ensure that
teachers responsible for autistic children are well-prepared and up-to-date on the most effective methods of teaching children with autism.
(2) The autism awareness and training policy guidelines shall
ensure, but need not be limited to requiring that:
(a) A candidate for a Washington instructional certificate
satisfactorily complete instruction in autism awareness and methods of
teaching students with autism at an accredited institution of higher
education; and
(b) All teachers not subject to (a) of this subsection be required
to pursue instruction in autism awareness and methods for teaching
students with autism by the 2010-11 school year as part of the
professional development requirement established by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction.
(3) By September 1, 2008, the professional educator standards board
and the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
develop recommendations for autism awareness instruction and methods of
teaching students with autism for all teacher preparation and
professional development programs and shall submit the recommendations
to the governor and the education committees of the legislature.
(4) By December 1, 2008, the superintendent of public instruction
shall report the policy guidelines to school districts for the
districts to use to develop and adopt their policies.
(5) By April 1, 2009, each school district shall use the guidelines
developed under subsection (1) of this section to develop and adopt a
school district policy for each school in the district to ensure that
teachers are well-prepared and up-to-date on the most effective methods
of teaching children with autism.
(6) Guidelines adopted by school districts under this section shall
also apply to classified staff seeking a special education endorsement
or certification, or both.

--- END ---