BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 By December 10, 2008, the department of
community, trade, and economic development shall conduct a study to
determine the efficacy of creating a state agency run homeowners'
association ombudsman office, which would provide dispute resolution
services and information to homeowners about their rights and duties
under chapter 64.38 RCW. The study must include:
(1) The estimated number of Washington residents that live in
communities or cooperatives subject to chapter 64.38 RCW;
(2) The estimated number of owners who would take advantage of the
ombudsman office;
(3) The estimated expense of creating and running the ombudsman
office; and
(4) A determination based on a cost-benefit analysis of whether the
ombudsman office should be created.
If the department determines that an ombudsman office should be
created, the study must also include recommendations for procedures
that the ombudsman office should follow when providing dispute
resolution services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The homeowners' association declarations
task force is created with ten members as provided in this subsection.
(a) The majority leader of the senate shall appoint one member from
the senate.
(b) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one
member from the house of representatives.
(c) The majority leader of the senate and the speaker of the house
of representatives jointly shall appoint eight nonlegislative members
of the task force, which shall include two board members representing
two different homeowners' associations, three homeowners who own a home
that is their primary residence in a community or cooperative that is
governed by chapter 64.38 RCW, two attorneys with expertise in
homeowners' association formation, and a representative from the
department of community, trade, and economic development.
(2) The task force shall convene as soon as possible upon the
appointment of its members. The task force shall elect a chair and
adopt rules for conducting the business of the task force.
Administrative and clerical support shall be provided by the department
of community, trade, and economic development.
(3) Legislative members of the task force must be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120.
(4) The task force shall conduct a review of declarations that have
been used to form homeowners' associations in Washington state and
other states.
(5) The task force shall draft model declarations, which declarants
may appropriate to form homeowners' associations.
(6) By December 10, 2008, the task force shall provide a report of
the model declarations to the department of community, trade, and
economic development and to the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act expires December 31, 2008.

--- END ---