BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 64.38.005 and 1995 c 283 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The intent of this chapter is to provide consistent laws regarding
the formation and legal administration of homeowners' associations.
Unless otherwise provided in this chapter, this chapter applies to all
homeowners' associations in the state, regardless of when the
declaration was recorded or the association was established.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 64.38 RCW
to read as follows:
An obligation of good faith is imposed in the performance and
enforcement of all contracts and duties governed by this chapter and in
all other transactions involving declarants, associations, and their
members.
For purposes of this section, "good faith" means honesty in fact
and the observance of reasonable standards of fair dealing.

Sec. 3 RCW 64.38.010 and 1995 c 283 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
For purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Homeowners' association" or "association" means a corporation,
unincorporated association, or other legal entity, each member of which
is an owner of residential real property located within the
association's jurisdiction, as described in the governing documents,
and by virtue of membership ((or ownership of property)), the owner is
obligated to pay ((real property taxes, insurance premiums, maintenance
costs, or for improvement of real property other than that which is
owned by the member)) assessments pursuant to the governing documents.
"Homeowners' association" does not mean an association created under
chapter 64.32 or 64.34 RCW.
(2) "Governing documents" means the declaration, articles of
incorporation, bylaws, ((plat, declaration of covenants, conditions,
and restrictions,)) rules and regulations of the association, or other
written instrument by which the association has the authority to
exercise any of the powers provided for in this chapter or to manage,
maintain, or otherwise affect the property under its jurisdiction.
(3) "Board of directors" or "board" means the body, regardless of
name, with primary authority to manage the affairs of the association.
(4) "Common areas" means property owned, or otherwise maintained,
repaired or administered by the association.
(5) "Common expense" means the costs incurred by the association to
exercise any of the powers provided for in this chapter.
(6) "Residential real property" means any real property, the use of
which is limited by law, covenant or otherwise to primarily residential
or recreational purposes.
(7) "Assessment" means all sums chargeable by the association
against a lot including, without limitation:
(a) Regular and special assessments for common expenses, charges,
and fines imposed by the association;
(b) Interest and late charges on any delinquent account; and
(c) Costs of collection, including reasonable attorneys' fees,
incurred by the association in connection with the collection of an
owner's delinquent account.
This subsection (7) supersedes any inconsistent provision in the
governing documents.
(8) "Bylaws" means the code adopted for the regulation or
management of the internal affairs of the association, irrespective of
the designated name of that code. If an association is incorporated
under Title 23 or 24 RCW, "bylaws" means the definition assigned to
"bylaws" in the act pursuant to which the association is incorporated.
(9) "Community" means residential real property that is subject to
a declaration under which an association is established for governance
of the community.
(10) "Cooperative" means a community in which the residential real
property is owned by an association where each of those members is
entitled, by virtue of his or her ownership interest in the
association, to exclusive possession of a portion of the property.
(11) "Declarant" means any person who executes as a declarant a
declaration or succeeds to the rights of a declarant pursuant to an
instrument recorded in the real property records of every county in
which any portion of the community is located.
(12) "Declaration" means the declaration of covenants, conditions,
and restrictions or any other document, however denominated, that is
recorded in every county in which any portion of the community is
located and that provides for the establishment of an association to
govern the community. In the case of a cooperative, "declaration"
means the document or documents, however denominated, that create the
cooperative housing association that owns the residential real property
comprising the cooperative, whether or not the document or documents
are recorded.
(13) "Lot" means a physical portion of a community designated for
separate ownership or occupancy and designated for residential use, the
boundaries of which are described in the real property records of every
county in which any portion of the community is located. Within a
cooperative, "lot" means that portion of the community designated for
exclusive possession by a member of the cooperative's association.
"Lot" does not mean an apartment created under chapter 64.32 RCW or a
unit created under chapter 64.34 RCW.
(14) "Owner" means a declarant or other person who owns a lot, but
does not include a person who has an interest in a lot solely as
security for an obligation. Under a real estate contract, "owner"
means the vendee, not the vendor.
(15) "Person" means a natural person, corporation, partnership,
limited partnership, trust, government subdivision or agency, or other
legal entity.
(16) "Rules" means the rules, regulations, and policies,
irrespective of their designated name, that are adopted by the members
of the board of an association in accordance with the governing
documents and that supplement, but do not contradict or contravene, the
governing documents.

Sec. 4 RCW 64.38.015 and 1995 c 283 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The membership of an association at all times shall consist
exclusively of the owners of all real property over which the
association has jurisdiction, both developed and undeveloped or, in the
case of a cooperative, the members of the association who by virtue of
their ownership interest in the association have exclusive possession
of a lot.

Sec. 5 RCW 64.38.020 and 1995 c 283 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless otherwise provided in the ((governing documents))
declaration, an association may:
(1) Adopt and amend bylaws, resolutions, policies, rules, and
regulations that are not inconsistent with the declaration or with this
chapter;
(2) Adopt and amend budgets for revenues, expenditures, and
reserves, and impose and collect assessments for common expenses from
owners;
(3) Hire and discharge or contract with managing agents and other
employees, agents, and independent contractors;
(4) Institute, defend, or intervene in litigation or administrative
proceedings in its own name on behalf of itself or two or more owners
on matters affecting the homeowners' association, but not on behalf of
owners involved in disputes that are not the responsibility of the
association;
(5) Make contracts and incur liabilities;
(6) Regulate the use, maintenance, repair, replacement, and
modification of common areas;
(7) Cause additional improvements to be made as a part of the
common areas;
(8) Acquire, hold, encumber, and convey in its own name any right,
title, or interest to real or personal property;
(9) Grant easements, leases, licenses, and concessions through or
over the common areas and petition for or consent to the vacation of
streets and alleys;
(10) Impose and collect any payments, fees, or charges for the use,
rental, or operation of the common areas;
(11) Impose and collect charges for late payments of assessments
((and, after notice and an opportunity to be heard by the board of
directors or by the representative designated by the board of directors
and in accordance with the procedures as provided in the bylaws or
rules and regulations adopted by the board of directors, levy
reasonable fines in accordance with a previously established schedule
adopted by the board of directors and furnished to the owners for
violation of the bylaws, rules, and regulations of the association));
(12) Take enforcement action with respect to any violation of the
governing documents;
(13) After notice and an opportunity to be heard by the board of
directors or by the representative designated by the board of
directors, and in accordance with the procedures provided in the
governing documents, levy reasonable fines in accordance with a
previously established schedule adopted by the board of directors and
furnished to the owners for violations of the governing documents;
(14) Exercise any other powers conferred by the declaration,
articles, or bylaws;
(((13))) (15) Exercise all other powers that may be exercised in
this state by the same type of ((corporation)) legal entity as the
association, provided those powers do not conflict with any duties
imposed on an association in this chapter; and
(((14))) (16) Exercise any other powers necessary and proper for
the governance and operation of the association.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 64.38 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This section establishes voluntary procedures for the
enforcement of governing documents.
(2) A homeowners' association is deemed to have provided notice and
an opportunity to be heard as required under RCW 64.38.020(13) if the
association fulfills the following requirements:
(a) The association must provide the owner with a notice of the
violation that contains:
(i) A reference to the rule or rules that the owner allegedly
violated;
(ii) A short statement of the evidence of the rule violation;
(iii) The name of a person with firsthand knowledge of the facts
that support the determination that the violation occurred;
(iv) A short statement of the action that the association intends
to take, including the amount of any fine, subject to the owner's right
to request a hearing;
(v) A statement that if the owner wishes to contest or explain the
violation, he or she must submit a written request for a hearing to the
association within fifteen days of delivery of the notice of violation;
(vi) A statement of the owner's rights to a hearing, to attend the
hearing, to be represented by counsel, and to review the evidence
supporting the alleged violation;
(b) Upon the timely request for a hearing from an owner, the
association must set a hearing date no less than thirty and no more
than sixty days from the association's receipt of the request. The
association must notify the owner of the hearing at least twenty days
before the hearing and must include with the notification a copy of the
association's rules of procedure for conducting a hearing;
(c) Upon a timely request by the owner who requested a hearing, the
association must, at least ten days before the date of the hearing,
either provide the owner with a copy of all its evidence concerning the
alleged violation, including copies of the complaint signed by a
witness with firsthand knowledge of the facts that support the
determination that the violation occurred, or identify a reasonable
time and place at which the owner may inspect such evidence;
(d) The association must permit the owner to be represented by
counsel at the hearing; and
(e) The association must provide the owner with a written decision,
including a statement of the reasons for the decision, within thirty
days after the hearing.
(3) The chair of the hearing may adjourn or continue the hearing,
if necessary, to gather additional information that the association
needs in order to make a decision.
(4) If an owner does not request a hearing within fifteen days of
the association's delivery of the notice of violation, the association
may take the remedial action stated in the notice, including the
imposition of any fine listed in the notice.

Sec. 7 RCW 64.38.025 and 1995 c 283 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in the association's governing documents or
this chapter, the board of directors shall act in all instances on
behalf of the association. In the performance of their duties, the
officers of the association and members of the board of directors shall
exercise the degree of care and loyalty required of an officer or
director of a corporation organized under chapter 24.03 RCW.
(2) The board of directors shall not act on behalf of the
association to amend the articles of incorporation, to take any action
that requires the vote or approval of the owners, to terminate the
association, to elect members of the board of directors, or to
determine the qualifications, powers, and duties, or terms of office of
members of the board of directors; but the board of directors may fill
vacancies in its membership of the unexpired portion of any term.
(((3) Within thirty days after adoption by the board of directors
of any proposed regular or special budget of the association, the board
shall set a date for a meeting of the owners to consider ratification
of the budget not less than fourteen nor more than sixty days after
mailing of the summary. Unless at that meeting the owners of a
majority of the votes in the association are allocated or any larger
percentage specified in the governing documents reject the budget, in
person or by proxy, the budget is ratified, whether or not a quorum is
present. In the event the proposed budget is rejected or the required
notice is not given, the periodic budget last ratified by the owners
shall be continued until such time as the owners ratify a subsequent
budget proposed by the board of directors.
(4) The owners by a majority vote of the voting power in the
association present, in person or by proxy, and entitled to vote at any
meeting of the owners at which a quorum is present, may remove any
member of the board of directors with or without cause.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 64.38 RCW
to read as follows:
A board of directors may by majority vote incorporate an
unincorporated homeowners' association as a nonprofit corporation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 64.38 RCW
to read as follows:
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision in the governing
documents or other applicable statutes, any member of the board of
directors may be removed with or without cause by a majority vote of
the owners (1) entitled to elect the board member and present, in
person or by proxy, and (2) entitled to vote at any regular or special
meeting of the owners at which a quorum is present.

Sec. 10 RCW 64.38.030 and 1995 c 283 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless provided for in the ((governing documents)) declaration, the
bylaws of the association ((shall)) must contain provisions that are
consistent with this chapter and provide for:
(1) The number, qualifications, powers and duties, terms of office,
and manner of electing and removing the board of directors and officers
of the association and filling vacancies;
(2) Election by the board of directors of the officers of the
association as the bylaws specify;
(3) Which, if any, of its powers the board of directors or officers
of the association may delegate to other persons or to a managing
agent;
(4) Which of its officers may prepare, execute, certify, and record
amendments to the governing documents on behalf of the association;
(5) The method of amending the bylaws; and
(6) ((Subject to the provisions of the governing documents,)) Any
other matters the association deems necessary and appropriate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 64.38 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The association must provide the homeowner with the documents
and records reasonably requested by the homeowner to furnish a buyer
with the resale certificate required in this section.
(2) Unless waived in writing by the buyer and except as provided
under subsection (5) of this section, in a transaction for the sale of
a lot that is subject to this chapter, the seller shall furnish to the
buyer a resale certificate signed by an officer or authorized agent of
the association and based on the books and records of the association
and the actual knowledge of the person signing the certificate
containing:
(a) A statement setting forth the amount of the annual assessment
due from the seller, any unpaid assessment currently due and payable
from the seller, and a statement of any special assessments that have
been levied against the lot and have not been paid even though they are
not yet due;
(b) A statement, which must be current to within forty-five days,
of whether the sum of assessments that are delinquent under the
association's reasonable delinquency policy exceeds ten percent of the
association's budgeted annual expenditures and, if so, the total number
of lots that are delinquent under the delinquency policy;
(c) A statement, which must be current to within forty-five days,
of whether any obligation or liability of the association in excess of
the lesser of ten thousand dollars or five percent of the association's
budgeted annual expenditures that is sixty days or more past due and,
if so, the circumstances that account for this delinquency;
(d) A statement of any anticipated repair or replacement costs
approved by the board of directors that exceed five percent of the
association's current budgeted annual expenditures;
(e) A statement of the amount of any reserves for repair or
replacement and of any portions of those reserves currently designated
by the association for any specified projects;
(f) The annual financial statement of the association, including
the audit report if it has been prepared, for the year immediately
preceding the current year;
(g) A balance sheet and a revenue and expense statement of the
association, which must be current to within one hundred twenty days;
(h) The current ratified budget of the association;
(i) A statement of any unsatisfied judgments against the
association and the status of any pending suits or legal proceedings in
which the association is a plaintiff or defendant;
(j) A statement describing any insurance coverage maintained by the
association;
(k) A statement as to whether there are any alterations or
improvements to the seller's lot that the association has determined
violate any provision of the governing documents;
(l) A statement of whether the association is under declarant
control;
(m) A statement as to whether there are any known and currently
existing violations of applicable health or building codes with respect
to the lot or improvements located on the lot, or any portions of the
common areas or improvements of the common areas; and
(n) A copy of the governing documents that include the following,
if applicable:
(i) The plat maps and declaration;
(ii) The articles of incorporation;
(iii) Bylaws, rules, regulations, and policies, if any, including
architectural and construction standards and guidelines;
(iv) The association's current fine schedule;
(v) A copy of the minutes of the most recent meeting of the members
of the association, minutes of the previous six meetings of the board
of directors, except that minutes of a board meeting that occurred more
than three years before the date of the resale certificate required
under this section does not need to be provided; and
(vi) Any other information reasonably requested by the seller on
behalf of the mortgagees of prospective buyers.
The association may charge a fee for photocopying costs not to
exceed fifteen cents per page for providing any of the documents
required to be disclosed in this subsection. The duty to provide
copies of documents that are recorded in the recording office of the
county in which the lot is located is satisfied if the association
identifies in the resale certificate a link to a web site in which
copies of the recorded documents can be obtained. The duty to provide
copies of documents that are publicly available on the association's
web site is satisfied if the association identifies in the resale
certificate a link to its web site. The duty to provide copies of the
documents required to be disclosed in this subsection is satisfied if
the association provides the documents via compact disc or other
electronic storage device or via electronic transmission to an email
address that the seller who requests the issuance of a resale
certificate shall provide to the association.
(3)(a) The association, within ten days after a request by a
seller, and subject to the seller's payment of a reasonable fee not to
exceed one hundred fifty dollars, shall furnish to the seller a resale
certificate signed by an officer or authorized agent of the association
and containing the information necessary to enable the seller to comply
with this section.
(b) The association may charge a seller a nominal fee for updating
a resale certificate within six months of the seller's request.
(4) The seller shall sign the resale certificate, but the seller is
not liable to the buyer for any erroneous information provided by the
association and included in the resale certificate unless, and to the
extent, the seller had actual knowledge of the erroneous information.
(5) The resale certificate is not required in real property
transfers that occur between commercial buyers and sellers or those
transfers listed in RCW 64.06.010.
(6) The resale certificate must be attached to the seller
disclosure statement required under RCW 64.06.020 unless the buyer has
waived the right to receive a seller disclosure statement as provided
under chapter 64.06 RCW.
(7) The timing of delivery of the seller's disclosures to the buyer
under this section is governed by RCW 64.06.030. A buyer may rescind
an agreement for the purchase and sale of a lot in accordance with RCW
64.06.030, and the buyer has the rights and remedies provided in RCW
64.06.070.
(8) The fee set forth in subsection (3)(a) of this section may be
adjusted for inflation based on the consumer price index applicable to
the geographic area in which the lot is located.
(9) An association may require the seller to obtain a signed
acknowledgement from the buyer affirming that any disclosed information
will not be disclosed to third parties unless such disclosure is
related to the decision to purchase the lot.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 64.38 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided under subsection (2) of this section, a
seller must furnish to a purchaser before the execution of any contract
for sale of residential real property in which the lot is subject to
this chapter the following notice:

"BY PURCHASING THE RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY THAT IS THE SUBJECT OF THIS
AGREEMENT, YOU WILL BECOME A MEMBER OF A HOMEOWNERS' ASSOCIATION THAT
GOVERNS THE COMMUNITY IN WHICH THE PROPERTY IS LOCATED. THE
ASSOCIATION MAY MAINTAIN AND REPAIR COMMON AREAS, RESTRICT THE USE OF
YOUR PROPERTY, COLLECT DUES, AND APPROVE OR DISAPPROVE BUILDING PLANS.
UNLESS YOU WAIVE YOUR RIGHT IN WRITING, YOU ARE ENTITLED TO RECEIVE
FROM THE SELLER AS PART OF THE DISCLOSURE STATEMENT REQUIRED UNDER
CHAPTER 64.06 RCW A CERTIFICATE SIGNED BY AN OFFICER OR AUTHORIZED
AGENT OF THE HOMEOWNERS' ASSOCIATION DISCLOSING CERTAIN FINANCIAL AND
OTHER INFORMATION ABOUT THE ASSOCIATION."

(2) The notice is not required in real property transfers that
occur between commercial buyers and sellers or those transfers listed
in RCW 64.06.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 64.38 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Within thirty days after adoption by the board of directors of
any proposed regular or special budget of the association, the board
shall set a date for a meeting of the owners to consider adoption of
the budget no less than ten and no more than sixty days after the
mailing of the summary of the proposed regular or special budget. A
proposed budget is adopted if approved by a majority vote of members,
in person or by proxy, present at the meeting, or by a larger
percentage if specified in the governing documents, if there is a
quorum present at the meeting. If the proposed budget is not adopted
or the required notice is not provided, the periodic budget last
adopted by the owners shall be continued until the owners adopt a
subsequent budget proposed by the board of directors.
(2) To the extent authorized in the declaration, an association's
lien rights may include liens to secure payment of fines validly
imposed.
(3) A lien for unpaid assessments and the personal liability for
the payment of assessments is extinguished unless proceedings to
enforce the lien or collect the debt are instituted within six years
after the amount of the assessments sought to be recovered becomes due.
(4) This section applies retroactively to any governing documents
in effect on the effective date of this section.
(5) This section supersedes any provisions of the governing
documents that are inconsistent with this section. All such
inconsistent provisions of the governing documents are void and
unenforceable.

Sec. 14 RCW 64.38.035 and 1995 c 283 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A meeting of the association must be held at least once each
year.
(2) Special meetings of the association may be called by the
president, a majority of the board of directors, or by owners having
((ten)) five percent of the votes in the association. Whoever calls
the special meeting determines the first order of business on the
agenda. The board may place additional business on the agenda as long
as it is the last order of business at the special meeting. Special
meetings must be held at a reasonable time and at a reasonable place.
Any business may be placed on the agenda for a special meeting as long
as the business does not conflict with this chapter or the
association's governing documents. This subsection supersedes any
inconsistent provisions of the governing documents or other applicable
statute.
(3) Not less than ((fourteen)) ten nor more than sixty days in
advance of any meeting, the secretary or other officers specified in
the bylaws shall cause notice to be hand-delivered or sent prepaid by
first-class United States mail to the mailing address of each owner or
to any other mailing address designated in writing by the owner. The
notice of any meeting shall state the time and place of the meeting and
the business to be placed on the agenda by the board of directors for
a vote by the owners, including the general nature of any proposed
amendment to the articles of incorporation, bylaws, any budget or
changes in the previously approved budget that result in a change in
assessment obligation, and any proposal to remove a director.
(((2) Except as provided in this subsection, all meetings of the
board of directors shall be open for observation by all owners of
record and their authorized agents. The board of directors shall keep
minutes of all actions taken by the board, which shall be available to
all owners. Upon the affirmative vote in open meeting to assemble in
closed session, the board of directors may convene in closed executive
session to consider personnel matters; consult with legal counsel or
consider communications with legal counsel; and discuss likely or
pending litigation, matters involving possible violations of the
governing documents of the association, and matters involving the
possible liability of an owner to the association. The motion shall
state specifically the purpose for the closed session. Reference to
the motion and the stated purpose for the closed session shall be
included in the minutes. The board of directors shall restrict the
consideration of matters during the closed portions of meetings only to
those purposes specifically exempted and stated in the motion. No
motion, or other action adopted, passed, or agreed to in closed session
may become effective unless the board of directors, following the
closed session, reconvenes in open meeting and votes in the open
meeting on such motion, or other action which is reasonably identified.
The requirements of this subsection shall not require the disclosure of
information in violation of law or which is otherwise exempt from
disclosure.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A new section is added to chapter 64.38 RCW
to read as follows:
Except as provided in this section, all meetings of the board of
directors shall be open for observation by all owners of record and
their authorized agents. The board of directors shall keep minutes of
all actions taken by the board, which must be available to all owners.
Upon the affirmative vote in open meeting to assemble in closed
session, the board of directors may convene in closed executive session
to consider personnel matters; consult with legal counsel or consider
communications with legal counsel; and discuss likely or pending
litigation, matters involving possible violations of the governing
documents of the association, and matters involving the possible
liability of an owner to the association. The motion must state
specifically the purpose for the closed session. Reference to the
motion and the stated purpose for the closed session must be included
in the minutes. The board of directors shall restrict the
consideration of matters during the closed portions of meetings only to
those purposes specifically exempted and stated in the motion. A
motion, or other action adopted, passed, or agreed to in closed session
may not become effective unless the board of directors, following the
closed session, reconvenes in open meeting and votes in the open
meeting on such motion, or other action that is reasonably identified.
This section does not require the disclosure of information in
violation of law or that is otherwise exempt from disclosure. This
section supersedes any conflicting provisions in Title 23 or 24 RCW or
in the association's governing documents.

Sec. 16 RCW 64.38.040 and 1995 c 283 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the governing documents specify a ((different)) smaller
percentage, a quorum is present throughout any meeting of the
association if the owners to which ((thirty-four)) twenty-five percent
of the votes of the association are allocated are present in person or
by proxy at the beginning of the meeting.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A new section is added to chapter 64.38 RCW
to read as follows:
For declarations that exist before the effective date of this
section:
(1) If a declaration requires more than seventy-five percent of the
votes in the association to approve any amendment to the declaration,
the association shall, if so directed by owners holding at least sixty-seven percent of the votes in the association, bring an action in
superior court for the county, which any portion of the real property
subject to the declaration is located, to reduce the percentage of
votes required to amend the declaration. The owners' decision to bring
an action may, notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in the
declaration, be made by votes cast at a meeting of the association duly
called or by written consent, or by both. The action shall be an in
rem declaratory judgment action whose title shall be the description of
the property subject to the declaration.
(2) If the court finds that the percentage of votes set forth in
the declaration is an unreasonable burden on the ability of the owners
to amend the declaration and of the association to administer the
property under its jurisdiction, the court shall enter an order
striking the percentage of votes from the declaration and substituting
the percentage of votes that the court determines to be appropriate in
the circumstances. The court shall not mandate approval of less than
sixty-seven percent of the votes in the association to amend any
provision of the declaration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 A new section is added to chapter 64.38 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,
declarations recorded after the effective date of this section can be
amended with the approval of at least sixty-seven percent of the total
votes in the association, or any larger percentage specified in the
declaration.
(2) A declarant may unilaterally amend the declaration, but only if
the right to amend is clearly stated in the declaration and if the
amendment:
(a) Subjects additional property to the declaration pursuant to a
plan of expansion set forth in the declaration;
(b) Withdraws property from the declaration, if the withdrawal is
allowed under the terms of the declaration and if the property to be
withdrawn is not owned by any third party;
(c) Brings any provision of the declaration into compliance with
any applicable statute, rule, regulation, or judicial determination;
(d) Enables any title insurance company to issue title insurance
coverage for the lots;
(e) Enables any institutional or governmental lender, purchaser,
insurer, or guarantor of mortgage loans, to make, purchase, insure, or
guarantee mortgage loans for the lots; or
(f) Satisfies the requirements of any local, state, or federal
governmental agency.
The amendment shall not adversely affect the title to any lot
unless the owner of the affected lot consents to it in writing.
(3) The declaration may require all or a specified number or
percentage of the eligible mortgagees who hold first lien security
interests encumbering lots to approve specified actions of the owners
or association as a condition to the effectiveness of those actions,
but a requirement for approval may not operate to:
(a) Deny or delegate control of the general administrative affairs
of the association by the owners or board of directors;
(b) Prevent the association or board of directors from commencing,
intervening in, or settling any litigation or proceeding; or
(c) Prevent any insurance trustee or the association from receiving
and distributing any insurance proceeds.
For purposes of this subsection, "eligible mortgagee" means the
holder of a mortgage on a lot that has filed with the secretary of the
association a written request for copies of notices of any action by
the association that requires the consent of mortgagees that includes
the lot number and address of the property subject to the mortgage. If
an eligible mortgagee fails to respond to a request for approval within
thirty days following the association's issuance of a notice requesting
such approval, the eligible mortgagee's approval is deemed granted.
(4) The declaration may permit the association's members to approve
an amendment through a combination of votes conducted during meetings
or through a written consent process.
(5) The declaration may require that to be effective all
declaration amendments must be signed by one or more officers of the
association, or if applicable, by the declarant. To be effective, all
declaration amendments must be acknowledged and recorded in each county
in which any portion of the property is located.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 A new section is added to chapter 64.38 RCW
to read as follows:
An action to challenge the validity of a declaration amendment
adopted by the association under this chapter and after the effective
date of this section may not be brought more than one year after the
amendment is recorded.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 A new section is added to chapter 64.38 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This section applies to associations in which the declaration
or the bylaws authorize only the board of directors to adopt, amend, or
rescind bylaws and to do so without a vote of the members and, with
respect to those associations, to all bylaws adopted or amended by the
board of directors after the effective date of this section.
(2) A bylaw adopted, amended, or rescinded by the board of
directors shall not be valid or enforceable until it is ratified by the
association's members as set forth in this subsection:
(a) The board of directors shall submit all bylaws adopted,
amended, or rescinded by the board to a vote of the members. The vote
must be held at the next regularly scheduled annual meeting of the
association, or at a special meeting held before the next annual
meeting.
(b) The notice of the annual or special meeting must include the
text of any existing bylaw that the board has approved for amendment or
rescission, and the text of any new or amended bylaw approved by the
board.
(c) Unless the governing documents specify a longer advance notice
period for a meeting, notice of the meeting, at which the proposed
bylaw change will be voted upon, must be provided at least ten days in
advance of the meeting and shall not be given more than sixty days in
advance of the meeting.
(d) The proposed bylaw change is deemed approved and ratified by
the members unless a majority of all the votes in the association vote
at the meeting, in person or by proxy, to reject the bylaw change
approved by the board.
(3) All bylaw changes ratified by the members in accordance with
this section take effect the day after the annual or special meeting at
which they were ratified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 A new section is added to chapter 64.38 RCW
to read as follows:
For rules, or amendments to rules, adopted after the effective date
of this section:
(1) A rule adopted by the board is valid and enforceable if all the
following requirements are satisfied:
(a) The rule is in writing;
(b) The rule is required by law or, within the authority of the
board, conferred by law or by the declaration;
(c) The rule is consistent with the governing documents; and
(d) The rule is adopted or amended in substantial compliance with
the requirements of this chapter.
(2) Except for emergency rules, the board of directors must provide
the association's members with notice and an opportunity to comment on
any proposed new or amended rule before the board is authorized to
adopt or enforce that rule. For purposes of this section, an
"emergency rule" is a rule that is necessary for the immediate
preservation of health and safety or a rule that sets forth specific
rights or obligations affecting the association or its members under
state statutes or administrative rules. Emergency rules become
effective immediately, subject to the members' right to request a
ratification vote under subsection (3) of this section.
(3) Except for emergency rules, rules adopted by the board of
directors following notice and an opportunity for comment become
effective thirty days after notice of the rules is provided to the
members in the manner authorized by the governing documents, unless a
written petition signed by twenty percent of the total votes in the
association is submitted to the board within that thirty-day period
requesting a ratification vote on the proposed rule. If a ratification
vote is requested, the association shall use the following process for
the ratification vote:
(a) The board of directors must submit the rules on which a
ratification vote has been requested to a vote of the members. The
vote must be conducted at the next regularly scheduled annual meeting
of the association, or at a special meeting held before the next annual
meeting.
(b) The notice of the meeting, at which the ratification vote will
be conducted, must include the text of the proposed rules.
(c) Unless the governing documents specify a longer advance notice
period for an association meeting, notice of the meeting, at which the
ratification vote will be conducted, must be provided at least ten days
in advance of the meeting and shall not be provided more than sixty
days in advance of the meeting.
(d) The proposed rule change is deemed approved and ratified by the
members, unless a majority of all the votes in the association vote at
the meeting, in person or by proxy, to reject the rule change approved
by the board.
(e) All rule changes ratified by the members in accordance with
this section take effect on the original effective date or later
effective date established by the board.
(4) The board of directors is not required to use the following
optional rule-making process. However, use of this process establishes
compliance with the requirements of subsection (1) of this section.
For purposes of this section, "rule change" means the adoption or
amendment of a rule by the board.
(a) The board shall give notice of a proposed rule change to the
owners. The notice must include the following information: (i) The
text of the proposed rule change; (ii) a description of the purpose and
effect of the proposed rule change; and (iii) the deadline for
submission of a comment on the proposed rule change.
(b) For a period of at least thirty days following actual or
constructive delivery of a notice of a proposed rule change, the board
shall accept written comments from owners on the proposed rule change.
(c) The board shall consider any comments it receives and make a
decision on a proposed rule change at a board meeting. Except for
emergency rules, a decision on a rule may not be made until after the
comment submission deadline.
(d) The board shall give notice of a rule change to the owners.
The notice must set out the text of the rule change and state the date
the rule change takes effect. Except for emergency rules, the date the
rule change takes effect must not be less than thirty days after notice
of the rule change is provided in the manner authorized in the
governing documents.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 A new section is added to chapter 64.38 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Requestor" means the party requesting mediation.
(b) "Request" means a request for mediation.
(c) "Recipient" means the party that receives the request for
mediation.
(2) For disputes that arise after the effective date of this
section and do not apply to any judicial or other legal proceedings
pending before the effective date of this section:
(a) With the exception of the claims listed in (b) of this
subsection, disputes between owners or between owners and their
association that involve the governing documents must be submitted to
mediation before any party may pursue the claim through court
proceedings.
(b) The following categories of claims are exempt from the
prelitigation mediation requirement under (a) of this subsection:
(i) Claims in which the statute of limitations will soon expire,
except that any party to the lawsuit may file a motion with the court
requesting that the judge order the parties to mediate before allowing
them to proceed with the lawsuit and temporarily stay the litigation
proceedings pending the outcome of mediation;
(ii) Claims for injunctive relief, except that any party to the
lawsuit may file a motion with the court requesting that the judge
order the parties to mediate before allowing them to proceed with the
lawsuit and temporarily stay the litigation proceedings pending the
outcome of mediation;
(iii) Claims for declaratory judgment;
(iv) Claims related to assessments, or the collection of
assessments, or to foreclosures;
(v) Claims for defects in construction of homes and other
improvements, whether individually owned or part of the common areas;
(vi) Claims that involve parties who are not subject to the
association's governing documents;
(vii) Claims between members of the association that are unrelated
to the association's governing documents;
(viii) Claims or issues that have been the subject of a previous
mediation request, response, or mediation conference under this section
within twelve months of the date of the most recent request, response,
or mediation conference, whichever is sooner.
(c) Unless another reasonable alternative dispute resolution
process is set forth in the declaration or adopted by a majority vote
of the nondeclarant members of the association, the following
procedures in this subsection govern the mediation of disputes under
this chapter:
(i) The party requesting mediation must submit a request for
mediation to the other parties;
(ii) The request may be made in any medium, provided that the
requestor can prove the request was received by the recipient;
(iii) Mediation must be conducted by one mediator, unless the
parties agree otherwise;
(iv) Unless all parties to the mediation agree otherwise, the
mediation conference must be held within ninety days of the date the
request is received by all recipients;
(v) The request for mediation must: State the issues that the
requestor wishes to mediate; certify that the requestor is willing to
meet in good faith; and propose a mediator and provide full contact
information (name, address, telephone and fax numbers, and e-mail
address) for the proposed mediator;
(vi) The recipients must respond to the requestor no later than
thirty days after the request is received by all recipients. The
response may be made in any medium as long as the recipient can prove
that the response was received by the requestor;
(vii) If the recipient agrees to mediate, the response must include
a statement of any additional issues that the recipient wishes to
mediate, a statement of whether the mediator proposed by the requestor
is acceptable to the recipient and, if not, a proposed alternative
mediator and that mediator's contact information. If the recipient
declines to mediate, the response must indicate this decision and
include a statement of the reasons that the recipient declines to
mediate;
(viii) The requestor must reply to the recipient's response within
fifteen days of receipt. If the response identifies additional issues
that the recipient wishes to address at mediation, the reply must state
whether the requestor agrees to mediate those issues. If the requestor
does not agree to mediate those issues, the reply must indicate this
decision and include a statement of the reasons that the requestor
declines to mediate the issues identified by the recipient. A
requestor's refusal to mediate the issues identified in the reply is
subject to (e) of this subsection;
(ix) If the recipient has proposed an alternative mediator, the
reply must state whether the alternative mediator is acceptable to the
requestor. If the alternative mediator is not acceptable, the
requestor must contact the two proposed mediators within fifteen days
of delivering the reply and request that the mediators choose a third
person who is available within the time frame required in this section
to act as mediator;
(x) The mediator may be an attorney or judge. The mediator's
primary function is to assist the parties in communicating with one
another and to find ways to resolve the disputed issues by agreement.
(d) Either the recipient or the requestor can decline mediation.
If mediation is declined, or a party fails to participate in a
scheduled mediation conference, the other party may proceed with filing
a legal action. In such a case, the court may:
(i) Enter an order compelling the parties to participate in a
mediation conference if the court determines that mediation would be
productive or useful; and
(ii) Impose appropriate remedies for a party's unjustified failure
to mediate claims subject to mandatory mediation requirements imposed
under this section including, without limitation, requiring that party
to pay all mediation fees and costs charged by the mediator, reimburse
the plaintiff for the costs of filing suit, reimburse the plaintiff for
process of service costs, and reimburse the plaintiff for some or all
of the plaintiffs' attorneys' fees and costs.
This subsection (2)(d) supersedes any inconsistent provisions in an
association's governing documents. The standard of review of a trial
court's decision under this section is abuse of discretion.
(e) Unless the parties agree otherwise, the fees and costs of
mediation must be shared equally by all parties to the mediation. For
purposes of this subsection (2)(e), "fees and costs of mediation" means
only those fees and costs charged by the mediator or mediation service
and does not include investigation costs or fees paid to an attorney to
represent a party to the mediation. If the mediator requires
prepayment of all or a portion of the anticipated fees and costs, all
parties to the mediation must comply with this requirement. An
association may not condition mediation on a member's payment of any
charges, costs, or fees.
(3) This section does not limit any party's right to seek relief in
a court of competent jurisdiction after the mediation requirements in
this section have been met.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 A new section is added to chapter 64.38 RCW
to read as follows:
All notices required under this chapter or the governing documents
must be delivered or sent pursuant to the requirements under RCW
64.38.035, unless the governing documents set forth an alternative
provision for providing notice, but not for a shorter time period for
giving notice than is required under RCW 64.38.035.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 A new section is added to chapter 64.38 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided under subsection (2) of this section, in a
transaction for the sale of a lot that is subject to this chapter, the
seller shall furnish to a buyer a homeowners' association information
pamphlet that is identical, in form and substance, to the following:

"FREQUENTLY ASKED QUESTIONS
ABOUT HOMEOWNERS' ASSOCIATIONS

Buying a home is a big investment. Homeownership frequently
includes automatic membership in a homeowners' association (HOA).
There are rights and obligations that come with being a member of an
HOA. The information below attempts to give you a basic understanding
of what membership in an HOA may involve. To better understand what
membership in a particular HOA might involve, you should review that
HOA's governing documents and consider seeking the assistance of legal
counsel to answer any questions you may have.

(1) WHAT IS AN HOA?

Washington law defines an HOA as a legal entity in which each
member is an owner of residential property that is subject to
the HOA's jurisdiction as a result of certain recorded
governing documents. The law governing homeowners'
associations, chapter 64.38 RCW, provides more information in
this regard.

(2) WHAT ARE THE GOVERNING DOCUMENTS OF AN HOA?

The principal governing document of an HOA is often known as
the Declaration of Covenants, Conditions, and Restrictions and
Easements (CCRs). Other important HOA documents may include
Articles of Incorporation, Bylaws, Rules, and Policies.

(3) WHAT SERVICES AND AMENITIES ARE PROVIDED BY HOAs?

The services and amenities provided by HOAs vary greatly from
community to community. These may include common areas such as
a swimming pool, tennis court, playground, trails, community
center, or even a golf course. Some HOAs provide landscaping
services for homeowners, and some even paint and maintain the
exterior of homes.

(4) WHAT OBLIGATIONS DOES AN HOA HAVE?

Each HOA is different, but the most common HOA roles include
maintaining common areas and amenities, administering and
enforcing use and architectural restrictions, adopting budgets,
and collecting assessments.

(5) AM I REQUIRED TO BE A MEMBER OF THE HOA?

Generally, the governing documents for an HOA make membership
mandatory for all owners within the community. The HOA's
governing documents are essentially a legally binding contract
between the owner/members and the association. If you have
questions about your legal rights and obligations as a member
of the HOA, you should consult an attorney.

(6) HOW DOES MEMBERSHIP IN AN HOA AFFECT THE OWNERSHIP OF MY
HOME?

By virtue of your membership in an HOA, you will have various
rights and obligations as described in the governing documents.
These may include restrictions on the use of your property,
architectural controls on future improvements of your property,
and the obligation to pay assessments, also known as dues, to
the HOA.

(7) WHO IS IN CHARGE OF AN HOA?

HOAs are typically governed by a board of directors or board of
trustees elected by the homeowners. The board's
responsibilities and power depend upon the HOA's governing
documents.

(8) HOW DOES THE HOA ENFORCE THE GOVERNING DOCUMENTS?

The governing documents of an HOA typically give it
wide-ranging powers to enforce its covenants, rules, and
policies. This may include the power to file a lawsuit for
damages or injunctive relief or fine an owner who does not
comply with the restrictions.

(9) WHAT HAPPENS IF I DO NOT PAY MY HOA ASSESSMENTS?

The governing documents likely give your HOA the power to place
a lien on your home or take other legal action if you fail to
pay properly levied assessments. If you do not pay your
assessments on time, this might result in the foreclosure of
your home by the HOA.

(10) WHAT IS THE DIFFERENCE BETWEEN AN HOA AND A CONDOMINIUM
ASSOCIATION?

A condominium association is a specialized type of homeowners'
association. A condominium association is created under
different statutes than those that apply to HOAs. Unless your
governing documents state that your community is a condominium
created pursuant to the Washington Condominium Act, chapter
64.34 RCW, or the Horizontal Property Regimes Act, chapter
64.32 RCW, it is not a condominium.

(11) WHAT HAPPENS IF ONE OF THE COMMON AREAS OF MY HOA MUST BE
REPAIRED OR REPLACED?

Well-managed HOAs will normally include an amount for reserves
in their annual budgets. In this way, a portion of the
assessments you pay is set aside and builds up over time to pay
for expensive repairs or replacements. You should review the
HOA's financial statements to determine if this is true for
your HOA.

(12) WHAT IS THE AMOUNT OF THE ASSESSMENTS THAT CAN BE CHARGED
BY MY HOA?

If you are a new buyer, you are entitled to a resale
certificate that will provide this information. Otherwise,
this information should be provided to you as part of the HOA's
annual budget process. If you have questions, you should
consult the HOA's manager or a member of its board of
directors.

(13) CAN ASSESSMENTS BE INCREASED?

Typically, the governing documents allow for assessments to be
adjusted based on the HOA's annual budget. The law governing
homeowners' associations requires that an HOA's annual budget
be ratified by its members. This is a good opportunity to ask
questions as to how budget changes will affect your
assessments.

(14) CAN MY HOA RESTRICT THE TYPES OF IMPROVEMENTS I CAN MAKE
TO MY HOME?

Depending on your governing documents, your HOA may have
certain architectural or design guidelines and restrictions.
If it does, there may be restrictions on the exterior
appearance of your home, and you may be required to submit
plans and specifications for approval before you make any
changes to the exterior or build any additions or other
structures.

(15) WHAT TYPES OF USE RULES MIGHT AFFECT MY HOME?

The HOA's governing documents may contain rules relating to
trees, landscaping, pets, satellite dishes, clotheslines,
fences, parking, home businesses, rental of homes, and other
issues. You should carefully read the governing documents to
understand the nature of these restrictions.

(16) AS A MEMBER OF AN HOA, CAN I RENT MY HOME?

The answer to this question depends on the governing documents
for the particular community. Some governing documents
prohibit all rentals, some limit the number of homes that can
be rented at any time, while others have no restrictions on
leasing.

(17) WHEN DOES MY HOA MEET?

In Washington state, HOAs must hold a meeting of the membership
at least once each year. Notice of the date and time of the
meeting must be provided to you by the officers of the
association. Your HOA's board will likely meet more often. If
you would like information concerning the board's meeting
schedule, you should consult the HOA's manager or a member of
the board.

(18) CAN I ATTEND THE REGULAR MEETINGS OF MY HOA's BOARD OF
DIRECTORS?

Board meetings are generally open to members of the HOA to
observe, but not to participate in. The law governing
homeowners' associations permits a board to consider certain
sensitive topics in private (executive session), and to exclude
HOA members from that part of the board's meeting. Review the
HOA's governing documents, particularly its bylaws, to
determine your rights.

(19) AS A MEMBER OF AN ASSOCIATION, CAN I OBTAIN COPIES OF THE
HOA's RECORDS?

The law governing homeowners' associations provides that the
records of the HOA must be made available for review by owners
during normal business hours at the office of the HOA or its
managing agent.

(20) HOW CAN I DETERMINE WHETHER THE HOA OF WHICH I AM
CONSIDERING BECOMING A MEMBER FACES ANY SERIOUS FINANCIAL
PROBLEMS?

As a purchaser of a home within an HOA, you are entitled to
receive a resale certificate that will provide you with
information regarding the financial condition of the HOA and
whether it is involved in any litigation.

However, you should also ask the seller questions to get a
clear picture of the HOA's financial condition.

(21) DO THE BENEFITS OF BELONGING TO AN HOA OUTWEIGH THE
BURDENS?

This is a question you should consider when the home you want
to buy is part of an HOA. Some of the typical benefits and
burdens are described above. Studying the governing documents
for the community in which you are considering purchasing a
home is an important step. Consider exploring this question
with your seller, real estate professional, attorney, and other
advisors. You may also wish to speak with neighboring
homeowners about the community and the HOA."

(2) The homeowners' association information pamphlet is not
required in real property transfers that occur between commercial
buyers and sellers or those transfers listed in RCW 64.06.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 A new section is added to chapter 64.38 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, the declaration may
provide for a period of declarant control of the association, during
which period a declarant or persons designated by the declarant may (a)
appoint and remove the officers and members of the board of directors
or (b) veto or approve a proposed action of the board or association.
A declarant's failure to veto or approve the proposed action in writing
within thirty days of written notice of the proposed action is deemed
an approval of the proposed action by the declarant.
(2) Regardless of any period provided in the declaration, a period
of declarant control terminates within thirty days after two-thirds of
the lots are transferred to owners other than the declarant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 The code reviser shall alphabetize and
renumber the definitions in RCW 64.38.010.

--- END ---