BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.14.0455 and 2006 c 311 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to the provisions in RCW 36.73.065, a transportation
benefit district under chapter 36.73 RCW may fix and impose a sales and
use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The tax
authorized in this section is in addition to any other taxes authorized
by law and shall be collected from those persons who are taxable by the
state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any
taxable event within the boundaries of the district. The rate of tax
shall not exceed two-tenths of one percent of the selling price in the
case of a sales tax, or value of the article used, in the case of a use
tax. The tax may not be imposed for a period exceeding ten years.
This tax may be extended for a period not exceeding ten years with an
affirmative vote of the voters voting at the election. If the
transportation benefit district is located in either a county that
borders another state and has a population of more than four hundred
thousand or a county with a population of more than seven hundred
thousand persons and less than one million persons, and a portion of
the sales tax is used to fund initial construction on a highway of
statewide significance within the county, the sales tax may be imposed
for more than ten years.
(2) Money received from the tax imposed under this section must be
spent in accordance with the requirements of chapter 36.73 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax imposed and collected under chapters 82.08 and 82.12
RCW, less any credits allowed under chapter 82.14 RCW, on initial
construction for a highway of statewide significance to be constructed
under chapter 36.73 RCW in either a county that borders another state
and has a population of more than four hundred thousand or a county
that has a population of more than seven hundred thousand persons and
less than one million persons, must be transferred to the highway
project to defray the costs or pay debt service on that project. In
the case of a toll project, this transfer or credit must be used to
lower the overall cost of the project and thereby the corresponding
tolls.
(2) This transaction is exempt from the requirements in RCW
43.135.035(4).
(3) Government entities constructing highway projects under chapter
36.73 RCW shall report to the department the amount of state sales or
use tax covered under this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.80.120 and 2006 c 311 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Distributor" means every person who imports, refines,
manufactures, produces, or compounds motor vehicle fuel and special
fuel as defined in RCW 82.36.010 and 82.38.020, respectively, and sells
or distributes the fuel into a county;
(b) "Person" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.030;
(c) "District" means a transportation benefit district under
chapter 36.73 RCW that is authorized to fix and impose a sales and use
tax under RCW 82.14.0455 or a regional transportation investment
district under chapter 36.120 RCW.
(2) ((A regional transportation investment district under chapter
36.120 RCW,)) Subject to the conditions of this section, a
transportation benefit district under chapter 36.73 RCW that is
authorized to fix and impose a sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.0455
or a regional transportation investment district under chapter 36.120
RCW, may levy additional excise taxes equal to ten percent of the
statewide motor vehicle fuel tax rate under RCW 82.36.025 on each
gallon of motor vehicle fuel as defined in RCW 82.36.010 and on each
gallon of special fuel as defined in RCW 82.38.020 sold within the
boundaries of the district. The additional excise tax is subject to
the approval of a majority of the voters within the district
boundaries. Vehicles paying an annual license fee under RCW 82.38.075
are exempt from the district's fuel excise tax. The additional excise
taxes are subject to the same exceptions and rights of refund as
applicable to other motor vehicle fuel and special fuel excise taxes
levied under chapters 82.36 and 82.38 RCW. The proposed tax may not be
levied less than one month from the date the election results are
certified. The commencement date for the levy of any tax under this
section will be the first day of January, April, July, or October.
(3) The local option motor vehicle fuel tax on each gallon of motor
vehicle fuel and on each gallon of special fuel is imposed upon the
distributor of the fuel.
(4) A taxable event for the purposes of this section occurs upon
the first distribution of the fuel within the boundaries of the
district to a retail outlet, bulk fuel user, or ultimate user of the
fuel.
(5) All administrative provisions in chapters 82.01, 82.03, and
82.32 RCW, insofar as they are applicable, apply to local option fuel
taxes imposed under this section.
(6) Before the effective date of the imposition of the fuel taxes
under this section, a district shall contract with the department of
licensing for the administration and collection of the taxes. The
contract must provide that a percentage amount, not to exceed one
percent of the taxes imposed under this section, will be deposited into
the local tax administration account created in the custody of the
state treasurer. The department of licensing may spend money from this
account, upon appropriation, for the administration of the local taxes
imposed under this section.
(7) The state treasurer shall distribute monthly to the district
levying the tax as part of the regional transportation investment
district plan or the plan of a transportation benefit district under
chapter 36.73 RCW that is authorized to fix and impose a sales and use
tax under RCW 82.14.0455, after the deductions for payments and
expenditures as provided in RCW 46.68.090(1) (a) and (b).
(8) The proceeds of the additional taxes levied by a district in
this section, to be used as a part of a regional transportation
investment district plan or the plan of a transportation benefit
district under chapter 36.73 RCW that is authorized to fix and impose
a sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.0455, must be used in accordance
with chapter 36.120 RCW, but only for those areas that are considered
"highway purposes" as that term is construed in Article II, section 40
of the state Constitution.
(9) A district may only levy the tax under this section if the
district is comprised of boundaries identical to the boundaries of a
county or counties. A district may not levy the tax in this section if
a member county is levying the tax in RCW 82.80.010 or 82.80.110.

--- END ---