BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the replacement
of the vulnerable state route number 520 bridge is a matter of urgency
for the safety of Washington's traveling public and the needs of the
transportation system in central Puget Sound. The state route number
520 bridge is forty-four years old and has a useful remaining life of
between thirteen and eighteen years. While one hundred fifteen
thousand vehicles travel on the bridge each day, there is an ever
present likelihood that wind or an earthquake could suddenly destroy
the bridge or render it unusable. Therefore, the state must develop a
comprehensive approach to fund a state route number 520 bridge
replacement to be constructed by 2018.
The legislature reaffirms its 2007 finding that the state must take
the necessary steps to move forward with a state route number 520
bridge replacement project design that provides six total lanes, with
four general purpose lanes and two lanes that are for high-occupancy
vehicle travel and can accommodate high capacity transportation, and
that the bridge shall be designed to accommodate light rail in the
future. The legislature further intends that the high-occupancy
vehicle lanes in the state route number 520 corridor are for vehicles
with three or more occupants, must be able to support a bus rapid
transit system, and must be managed in a way that prioritizes
maintaining travel time, speed, and reliability.
The legislature finds that the financial plan for the bridge
assumes a total project cost of no more than four billion dollars and
that there is a current funding shortfall of approximately two billion
dollars. The legislature further finds that the bridge replacement
project requires funding from multiple revenue sources, including a
partnership between the state and the users of the bridge.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Following the submission of the report required in section 4 of
this act and subsequent approval by the legislature, the department may
collect tolls on the existing state route number 520 bridge or on a
replacement state route number 520 bridge.
(2) The schedule of toll charges must be established by the
transportation commission and collected in a manner determined by the
commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 47.56 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall work with the federal highways administration
to determine the necessary actions for receiving federal authorization
to toll the interstate 90 floating bridge. The department must
periodically report the status of those discussions to the governor and
the joint transportation committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The executive director of the Puget
Sound regional council, the secretary of the department of
transportation or his or her designee, and a member of the state
transportation commission from King county shall form a state route
number 520 tolling implementation committee.
(2) The committee must:
(a) Evaluate the potential diversion of traffic from state route
number 520 to other parts of the transportation system when tolls are
implemented on state route number 520;
(b) Evaluate the most advanced tolling technology to ensure an
efficient and timely trip for users of the state route number 520
bridge;
(c) Evaluate available active traffic management technology to
determine the most effective options for technology that could manage
congestion on the state route number 520 bridge;
(d) Explore opportunities to partner with the business community to
reduce congestion and financially contribute to the state route number
520 bridge replacement project;
(e) Conduct public work sessions and open houses to provide
information to citizens, including users of the bridge and business and
freight interests, regarding implementation of tolls on the state route
number 520 bridge and solicit citizen views on the following items:
(i) Funding a portion of the state route number 520 bridge
replacement project with tolls on the existing bridge;
(ii) Funding the state route number 520 bridge replacement project
and improvements on the Interstate 90 bridge with a toll paid by
drivers on both bridges;
(iii) Providing incentives and choices for users of the state route
number 520 bridge replacement project to use transit and to carpool;
and
(iv) Implementing variable tolling as a way to reduce congestion on
the facility; and
(f) Provide a report to the governor and the legislature by January
2009.
(3) The department of transportation shall provide staff support to
the committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Any person involved in the construction of the state route
number 520 bridge replacement and HOV project may apply for deferral of
state and local sales and use taxes on the site preparation for, the
construction of, the acquisition of any related machinery and equipment
that will become a part of, and the rental of equipment for use in, the
project.
(b) Application shall be made to the department of revenue in a
form and manner prescribed by the department of revenue. The
application must contain information regarding estimated or actual
costs, time schedules for completion and operation, and other
information required by the department of revenue. The department of
revenue shall approve the application within sixty days if it meets the
requirements of this section.
(2) The department of revenue shall issue a sales and use tax
deferral certificate for state and local sales and use taxes imposed or
authorized under chapters 82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW and RCW
81.104.170 on the project.
(3) A person granted a tax deferral under this section shall begin
paying the deferred taxes in the fifth year after the date certified by
the department of revenue as the date on which the project is
operationally complete. The project is operationally complete under
this section when the replacement bridge is constructed and opened to
traffic. The first payment is due on December 31st of the fifth
calendar year after the certified date, with subsequent annual payments
due on December 31st of the following nine years. Each payment shall
equal ten percent of the deferred tax.
(4) The department of revenue may authorize an accelerated
repayment schedule upon request of a person granted a deferral under
this section.
(5) Interest shall not be charged on any taxes deferred under this
section for the period of deferral, although all other penalties and
interest applicable to delinquent excise taxes may be assessed and
imposed for delinquent payments under this section. The debt for
deferred taxes is not extinguished by insolvency or other failure of
any private entity granted a deferral under this section.
(6) Applications and any other information received by the
department of revenue under this section are not confidential and are
subject to disclosure. Chapter 82.32 RCW applies to the administration
of this section.
(7) For purposes of this section, "person" has the same meaning as
in RCW 82.04.030 and also includes the department of transportation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Section 4 of this act expires February 1,
2009.

--- END ---