BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.33A.100 and 2001 c 302 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The state investment board shall maintain appropriate offices and
employ such personnel as may be necessary to perform its duties.
Employment by the investment board shall include but not be limited to
an executive director, investment officers, and a confidential
secretary, which positions are exempt from classified service under
chapter 41.06 RCW. Employment of the executive director by the board
shall be for a term of three years, and such employment shall be
subject to confirmation of the state finance committee: PROVIDED, That
nothing shall prevent the board from dismissing the director for cause
before the expiration of the term nor shall anything prohibit the
board, with the confirmation of the state finance committee, from
employing the same individual as director in succeeding terms.
Compensation levels for the executive director, a confidential
secretary, and all investment officers, including the deputy director
for investment management, employed by the investment board shall be
established by the state investment board.
The investment board is authorized to maintain a retention pool
within the state investment board expense account under RCW 43.33A.160,
from the earnings of the funds managed by the board pursuant to a
performance management and compensation program developed by the
investment board, in order to address recruitment and retention
problems and to reward performance. The compensation levels and
incentive compensation for investment officers shall be limited to the
average of total compensation provided by state or other public funds
of similar size, based upon a biennial survey conducted by the
investment board, with review and comment by the joint legislative
audit and review committee. ((However, in any fiscal year the salary
increases granted by the investment board from the retention pool to
investment officers pursuant to this section may not exceed an average
of five percent.)) Disbursements from the retention pool shall be from
legislative appropriations and shall be on authorization of the board's
executive director or the director's designee.
The investment board shall provide notice to the director of the
department of personnel, the director of financial management, and the
chairs of the house of representatives and senate fiscal committees of
proposed changes to the compensation levels for the positions. The
notice shall be provided not less than sixty days prior to the
effective date of the proposed changes.
As of July 1, 1981, all employees classified under chapter 41.06
RCW and engaged in duties assumed by the state investment board on July
1, 1981, are assigned to the state investment board. The transfer
shall not diminish any rights granted these employees under chapter
41.06 RCW nor exempt the employees from any action which may occur
thereafter in accordance with chapter 41.06 RCW.
All existing contracts and obligations pertaining to the functions
transferred to the state investment board in ((this 1980 act)) chapter
3, Laws of 1981 shall remain in full force and effect, and shall be
performed by the board. None of the transfers directed by ((this 1980
act)) chapter 3, Laws of 1981 shall affect the validity of any act
performed by a state entity or by any official or employee thereof
prior to July 1, 1981.

--- END ---