BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) There are sufficient waters in the Columbia river mainstem and
the Lower Snake river mainstem to establish an allocation of one
hundred thousand acre feet of water annually to be available pursuant
to section 2 of this act for appropriation for biofuel irrigation and
organic crop irrigation without harming instream resources;
(2) A program that makes water available for irrigation of biofuel
irrigation and for organic crop irrigation will provide significant
environmental and economic benefits for the state; and
(3) At such time as authorized water withdrawals for the biofuel
and organically grown water rights reach one hundred thousand acre
feet, but no later than 2013, the legislature should review the
economic and environmental benefits resulting from this authorization
and determine whether there is a need to increase the amount of water
allocated under section 2 of this act, taking into account cumulative
withdrawals from water rights issued under chapter 90.90 RCW and the
broader water code.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 90.90 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Biofuel irrigation" means the use of water for the purpose of
irrigating crops that are grown as feed stocks for the production of
ethanol, biodiesel, or other types of engine, heating, or power
generation fuels.
(b) "Columbia river mainstem" and "Lower Snake river mainstem" have
the same meaning as defined in RCW 90.90.030(12).
(c) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(d) "Organic crop irrigation" means the use of water for the
purpose of irrigating crops that are certified under United States
department of agriculture or Washington department of agriculture
standards as "organically grown" fruits or vegetables.
(e) "Person" means any firm, association, water users' association,
corporation, limited liability company, irrigation district, municipal
corporation, or other legal entity as well as an individual.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision in this title, this
chapter, or any other applicable law, an allocation of an annual
aggregate of one hundred thousand acre feet of water from the Columbia
river mainstem and the Lower Snake river mainstem is established in
perpetuity. The waters allocated under this section are available for
appropriation and use for biofuel irrigation and organic crop
irrigation. The department is authorized and directed to issue permits
and certificates for the uninterruptible appropriation and use of the
water allocated under this section, but solely for the purpose of
biofuel irrigation and organic crop irrigation.
(3) For the avoidance of doubt, no application, permit, or
certificate to appropriate and use waters under this section may be
denied or conditioned to be interruptible on the grounds that such a
denial or condition is necessary to satisfy the instream flow or "no
net loss" requirements, or any other state law or regulation. In
addition, except as specifically provided in this section, water
allocated under the provisions of this section and permits and
certificates issued under this section are deemed as not requiring any
further mitigation and the allocation of water under this section and
permits and certificates issued under this section are deemed to
satisfy all consultation requirements under state law related to the
issuance of new water rights.
(4) Any person may apply for a permit to appropriate waters
allocated under this section. The following terms and conditions are
applicable to permits and certificates issued under this section:
(a) Water withdrawal locations included in permits and certificates
issued under this section must be within the Columbia river mainstem or
the Lower Snake river mainstem;
(b) Waters appropriated under this section must be for biofuel
irrigation or organic crop irrigation use within the Columbia basin
project area;
(c) Except as modified and limited by this section, water rights
issued under the biofuels or organic crop irrigation designation are
subject to existing provisions required under the current water code;
(d) Permits for the use of waters for biofuel irrigation and
organic crop irrigation must include a specific designation of the
acreage where the water is to be used and the number of acres to be
irrigated. Changes in the place of use must be approved. However, the
number of irrigated acres may not be increased and the change does not
impair any existing senior water right. No change to a use other than
biofuel irrigation or organic crop irrigation may be approved;
(e) The total water duty for the biofuel and organic crops grown
using an appropriation under this section is limited to no more than
2.9 acre feet per acre (for a single seasonal crop);
(f) The new water rights issued under this section may be used with
other water rights to establish suitable, multiyear crop rotations for
long-term production needs;
(g) Except as modified and limited by this section, standard
provisions included in permits and certificates such as provisions
requiring water measuring and fish screens must be included in permits
and certificates issued under this section; and
(h) Applicants for a biofuel or organic crop irrigation water right
under this section must agree, as a condition of the department issuing
the new water right, that the total water duty for all existing water
rights owned by the applicant be recalibrated using methodologies
jointly agreed upon by the department and the state's water conservancy
boards, and consistent with the current water code. This recalibration
must be initiated upon issuance of the new biofuel or organic
irrigation water right. Data and technical information for
recalibration of existing water rights must be submitted to the
department by the applicant within one year after the applicant's
receipt of the new water right issued under this section. Recalibrated
water rights must be reissued after the existing (thirty-day) appeal
period for department water orders, with existing public/agency
notification standards in place.
(5) The implementation of this section is not limited to, but may
be directly included under, voluntary regional agreements under RCW
90.90.030.

--- END ---