BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71A.20.170 and 2005 c 353 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The developmental disabilities community trust account is
created in the state treasury. All net proceeds from the use of excess
property identified in the 2002 joint legislative audit and review
committee capital study or other studies of the division of
developmental disabilities residential habilitation centers at Lakeland
Village, Fircrest school, Yakima Valley school, Francis Hadden Morgan
Center, and Rainier school that would not impact current residential
habilitation center operations must be deposited into the account.
((Income)) Proceeds may come from the lease of the land, conservation
easements, sale of timber, or other activities short of sale of the
property. "Excess property" includes that portion of the property at
Rainier school previously under the cognizance and control of
Washington State University for use as a dairy/forage research
facility. (("Proceeds" include the net receipts from the use of all or
a portion of the properties.)) Only investment income from the
principal of the proceeds deposited into the trust account may be spent
from the account. For purposes of this section, investment income
includes lease or rent payments or other periodic payments for use of
real property deposited into the trust account. For purposes of this
section, principle means the actual excess land assigned to the trust
account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account shall be used exclusively to provide
family support and/or employment/day services to eligible persons with
developmental disabilities who can be served by community-based
developmental disability services. It is the intent of the legislature
that the account should not be used to replace, supplant, or reduce
existing appropriations.
(2) ((The department shall report on its efforts and strategies to
provide income to the developmental disabilities community trust
account from the excess property identified in subsection (1) of this
section from the lease of the property, sale of timber, or other
activity short of sale of the property. The department shall report by
June 30, 2006.
(3))) The account shall be known as the Dan Thompson memorial
developmental disabilities community trust account.

--- END ---