BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.84.030 and 1998 c 248 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to the requirements of this chapter, the department,
through a collaborative process, shall adopt rules for:
(((1))) (a) Certification, operation, and monitoring of wetlands
mitigation banks. The rules shall include procedures to assure that:
(((a))) (i) Priority is given to banks providing for the
restoration of degraded or former wetlands;
(((b))) (ii) Banks involving the creation and enhancement of
wetlands are certified only where there are adequate assurances of
success and that the bank will result in an overall environmental
benefit; and
(((c))) (iii) Banks involving the preservation of wetlands or
associated uplands are certified only when the preservation is in
conjunction with the restoration, enhancement, or creation of a
wetland, or in other exceptional circumstances as determined by the
department consistent with this chapter;
(((2))) (b) Determination and release of credits from banks.
Procedures regarding credits shall authorize the use and sale of
credits to offset adverse impacts and the phased release of credits as
different levels of the performance standards are met;
(((3))) (c) Public involvement in the certification of banks, using
existing statutory authority;
(((4))) (d) Coordination of governmental agencies;
(((5))) (e) Establishment of criteria for determining service areas
for each bank in accordance with subsection (2) of this section;
(((6))) (f) Performance standards; and
(((7))) (g) Long-term management, financial assurances, and
remediation for certified banks.
(2) The criteria for determining service areas under subsection
(1)(e) of this section shall include:
(a) A requirement that restricts the maximum extent of the service
area of a wetlands mitigation bank to the water resource inventory area
(WRIA) as established under chapter 173-500 WAC in which the bank is
located except in exceptional circumstances where a service area may
include parts of an adjacent WRIA if it is ecologically defensible and
appropriate;
(b) Definitions of exceptional circumstance for expansion of a
service area beyond the immediate WRIA boundaries in which the bank is
located; and
(c) Designation that the department and the appropriate city or
county in which the bank is located have final approval for determining
the service areas for a specific bank.
(3) Before adopting rules under this chapter, the department shall
submit the proposed rules to the appropriate standing committees of the
legislature. By January 30, 1999, the department shall submit a report
to the appropriate standing committees of the legislature on its
progress in developing rules under this chapter.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.84.050 and 1998 c 248 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Prior to authorizing use of credits from a bank as a means of
mitigation under a permit issued or approved by the department, the
department must assure that all appropriate and practicable steps have
been undertaken to first avoid and then minimize adverse impacts to
wetlands. In determining appropriate steps to avoid and minimize
adverse impacts to wetlands, the department shall take into
consideration the functions and values of the wetland, including fish
habitat, groundwater quality, and protection of adjacent properties.
(2) The department may approve use of credits from a bank when:
(((1))) (a) The credits represent the creation, restoration, or
enhancement of wetlands of like kind and in close proximity when
estuarine wetlands are being mitigated;
(((2))) (b) There is no practicable opportunity for on-site
compensation; or
(((3))) (c) Use of credits from a bank is environmentally
preferable to on-site compensation.
(3) In addition, for linear public infrastructure projects, the
department may approve the use of credits from a bank for impacts
located outside of the designated service area of the bank as
determined in RCW 90.84.030(1)(e) when at least seventy-five percent of
the project impacts are located within the service area.

--- END ---