BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.45.070 and 1997 c 332 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall only approve an application if the parties to
the acquisition have taken the proper steps to safeguard the value of
charitable assets and ensure that any proceeds from the acquisition are
used for appropriate charitable health purposes. To this end, the
department may not approve an application unless, at a minimum, it
determines that:
(1) The acquisition is permitted under chapter 24.03 RCW, the
Washington nonprofit corporation act, and other laws governing
nonprofit entities, trusts, or charities;
(2) The nonprofit corporation that owns the hospital being acquired
has exercised due diligence in authorizing the acquisition, selecting
the acquiring person, and negotiating the terms and conditions of the
acquisition;
(3) The procedures used by the nonprofit corporation's board of
trustees and officers in making its decision fulfilled their fiduciary
duties, that the board and officers were sufficiently informed about
the proposed acquisition and possible alternatives, and that they used
appropriate expert assistance;
(4) No conflict of interest exists related to the acquisition,
including, but not limited to, conflicts of interest related to board
members of, executives of, and experts retained by the nonprofit
corporation, acquiring person, or other parties to the acquisition;
(5) The nonprofit corporation will receive fair market value for
its assets. The attorney general ((or the department may)) shall
employ, at the expense of the acquiring person, reasonably necessary
expert assistance in making this determination. This expense must be
in addition to the fees charged under RCW 70.45.030;
(6) Charitable funds will not be placed at unreasonable risk, if
the acquisition is financed in part by the nonprofit corporation;
(7) Any management contract under the acquisition will be for fair
market value;
(8) The proceeds from the acquisition will be controlled as
charitable funds independently of the acquiring person or parties to
the acquisition, and will be used for charitable health purposes
consistent with the nonprofit corporation's original purpose, including
providing health care to the disadvantaged, the uninsured, and the
underinsured and providing benefits to promote improved health in the
affected community;
(9) Any charitable entity established to hold the proceeds of the
acquisition will be broadly based in and representative of the
community where the hospital to be acquired is located, taking into
consideration the structure and governance of such entity; and
(10) A right of first refusal to repurchase the assets by a
successor nonprofit corporation or foundation has been retained if the
hospital is subsequently sold to, acquired by, or merged with another
entity.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.45.080 and 1997 c 332 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall ((only)) approve an application only if the
acquisition in question will not detrimentally affect the continued
existence of accessible, affordable health care that is responsive to
the needs of the community in which the hospital to be acquired is
located. To this end, the department shall not approve an application
unless, at a minimum, it determines that:
(1) Sufficient safeguards are included to assure the affected
community continued access to affordable care, and that alternative
sources of care are available in the community should the acquisition
result in a reduction or elimination of particular health services;
(2) The acquisition will not result in the revocation of hospital
privileges;
(3) Sufficient safeguards are included to maintain appropriate
capacity for health science research and health care provider
education;
(4) The acquiring person and parties to the acquisition are
committed to providing health care to the disadvantaged, the uninsured,
and the underinsured and to providing benefits to promote improved
health in the affected community. Activities and funding provided
under RCW 70.45.070(8) may be considered in evaluating compliance with
this commitment; ((and))
(5) Sufficient safeguards are included to avoid conflict of
interest in patient referral; and
(6) The department shall employ, at the expense of the acquiring
person, a qualified independent expert to conduct an independent,
comprehensive health impact study in order to determine that all of the
above conditions will be met. This expense must be in addition to fees
charged under RCW 70.45.030.

--- END ---