BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) On January 8, 2008, the National Instant
Criminal Background Check System Improvement Amendments Act of 2007
became federal law. In that law, congress made a finding that between
1998 and 2004 about nine hundred sixteen thousand individuals were
prohibited from purchasing a firearm because they failed a background
check through the national instant criminal background check system, or
NICS. Congress also found that the current NICS is unable to access
nearly twenty-one million criminal records, and millions of existing
records in the system are missing critical data, such as arrest
dispositions, due to data backlogs. Because of these data
deficiencies, some persons who should have been prohibited from
obtaining firearms were able to purchase firearms and use them to
commit serious crimes. Congress found that the primary cause of delays
and deficiencies in the national instant criminal background check
system is the lack of updates, available state criminal disposition
records, and automated access to information concerning persons
prohibited from possessing or receiving a firearm because of mental
illness, restraining orders, or misdemeanor convictions for domestic
violence.
(2) To implement the NICS Improvement Amendments Act, congress
appropriated one billion one hundred twenty-five million dollars in
grant funds to assist states in developing and improving their
electronic data systems. In order to be eligible for these new federal
grants, states must provide to the United States attorney general, by
July 6, 2008, a reasonable estimate of the number of the records that
concern persons who are prohibited from possessing or receiving a
firearm under Title 18, United States Code, including the number of
persons:
(a) Convicted of a felony;
(b) Convicted of a misdemeanor crime of domestic violence;
(c) With outstanding arrest warrants;
(d) Who are users or addicted to illegal drugs as demonstrated by
arrests, convictions, or adjudications and whose record is not
protected from disclosure to the United States attorney general under
any provision of state or federal law;
(e) Who have been adjudicated as a "mental defective," as defined
by federal law, or committed to a mental institution and whose record
is not protected from disclosure to the United States attorney general
under any provision of state or federal law; and
(f) Subject to a domestic violence order.
(3) After provision of the estimate in subsection (2) of this
section, the state is eligible for federal grants to assist the state
in designing and building a data system to report the necessary
information to the NICS. Failure to provide an estimate described in
subsection (2) of this section could result in the loss of other
federal public safety grants awarded under the Omnibus Crime Control
and Safe Streets Act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The legislature directs the Washington state
patrol, the department of licensing, and the administrative office of
the courts to establish a work group, with the Washington state office
of the attorney general, and any other necessary offices, agencies, and
departments, to develop a written plan for providing the estimate
required under the NICS Improvement Amendments Act of 2007. The work
group must report back to the legislature and the Washington state
office of the attorney general with the plan for providing the estimate
no later than May 1, 2008. The Washington state attorney general is
authorized to collect and deliver the estimate to the United States
attorney general.

--- END ---