BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All field offices and the headquarters office of the children's
administration in the department shall become accredited by a
nationally recognized child welfare accrediting entity no later than
December 31, 2008.
(2) If an unexpected fatality or near fatality of a child receiving
care or services from a particular field office occurs, the department
shall notify the accrediting entity of this fact within six months of
occurrence of the fatality or near fatality. Upon completion of the
review of the fatality or near fatality, the department shall forward
the report of the review to the accrediting entity. Upon receipt of
the report, the accrediting entity shall determine the need for a
remedial visit. If the accrediting entity determines a remedial visit
is indicated, during the visit it shall assess the implementation of
the corrective actions identified in the fatality or near fatality
report and determine whether it needs to take any action regarding the
state's accreditation status.
(3) For purposes of this section, "near fatality" has the same
meaning as that stated in RCW 74.13.500(4).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 RCW 74.13.017 (Accreditation -- Completion
date) and 2003 c 207 s 8 & 2001 c 265 s 2 are each repealed.

--- END ---