BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that some Washington
consumers have entered into used vehicle transactions that were not in
their best interest. The legislature further finds that some used
vehicle dealers provide consumers with inadequate disclosures regarding
items purchased and financing terms. The legislature recognizes the
impact that deceptive practices by used vehicle dealers have on working
families' finances and transportation. Because of the importance of
this issue, the legislature determines that the consumer protections
available to used vehicle buyers should be thoroughly reviewed to
ensure that the law fully protects used vehicle buyers from unfair and
deceptive practices by used vehicle dealers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A legislative task force on consumer
protections for used vehicle sales is established with nine members as
provided in this subsection.
(a) The majority leader of the senate shall appoint one member from
each of the two largest caucuses of the senate.
(b) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one
member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of
representatives.
(c) The majority leader of the senate and the speaker of the house
of representatives jointly shall appoint five nonlegislative members of
the task force, which shall include one consumer advocate, two used
vehicle dealers, an attorney with expertise in consumer protection law,
and a representative from the consumer protection division of the
attorney general's office.
(2) The task force shall:
(a) Convene as soon as possible upon the appointment of its
members;
(b) Elect a chair and adopt rules for conducting the business of
the task force;
(c) Thoroughly study consumer protections applicable to used
vehicle buyers and the prevalence of consumer protection violations by
used vehicle dealers. The materials studied must include, but are not
limited to, the following:
(i) The provisions governing used vehicle transactions in Titles 19
and 46 RCW;
(ii) State and federal laws and regulations governing the
disclosure of financing terms and retail installment terms;
(iii) Other states' laws and regulations governing used vehicle
transactions and the disclosure of financing terms and retail
installment terms; and
(iv) Any study or reports that provide information on the
prevalence of consumer protection violations by used vehicle dealers;
(d) Determine and document perceived and actual shortcomings of the
current consumer protections afforded to used vehicle buyers; and
(e) Draft proposed legislation if the task force determines that
additional consumer protections for used vehicle dealers are advisable.
(3) Staff support for the task force must be provided by senate
committee services and the house of representatives office of program
research.
(4) Legislative members of the task force must be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120.
(5) The task force shall report its findings and any proposed
legislation to the legislature by September 10, 2008.
(6) The section expires December 31, 2008.

--- END ---