BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.130 and 2006 c 285 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Each comprehensive land use plan and development regulations
shall be subject to continuing review and evaluation by the county or
city that adopted them. Except as otherwise provided, a county or city
shall take legislative action to review and, if needed, revise its
comprehensive land use plan and development regulations to ensure the
plan and regulations comply with the requirements of this chapter
according to the time periods specified in subsection (4) of this
section.
(b) Except as otherwise provided, a county or city not planning
under RCW 36.70A.040 shall take action to review and, if needed, revise
its policies and development regulations regarding critical areas and
natural resource lands adopted according to this chapter to ensure
these policies and regulations comply with the requirements of this
chapter according to the time periods specified in subsection (4) of
this section. Legislative action means the adoption of a resolution or
ordinance following notice and a public hearing indicating at a
minimum, a finding that a review and evaluation has occurred and
identifying the revisions made, or that a revision was not needed and
the reasons therefor.
(c) The review and evaluation required by this subsection may be
combined with the review required by subsection (3) of this section.
The review and evaluation required by this subsection shall include,
but is not limited to, consideration of critical area ordinances and,
if planning under RCW 36.70A.040, an analysis of the population
allocated to a city or county from the most recent ten-year population
forecast by the office of financial management.
(d) Any amendment of or revision to a comprehensive land use plan
shall conform to this chapter. Any amendment of or revision to
development regulations shall be consistent with and implement the
comprehensive plan.
(2)(a) Each county and city shall establish and broadly disseminate
to the public a public participation program consistent with RCW
36.70A.035 and 36.70A.140 that identifies procedures and schedules
whereby updates, proposed amendments, or revisions of the comprehensive
plan are considered by the governing body of the county or city no more
frequently than once every year. "Updates" means to review and revise,
if needed, according to subsection (1) of this section, and the time
periods specified in subsection (4) of this section or in accordance
with the provisions of subsections (5) and (8) of this section.
Amendments may be considered more frequently than once per year under
the following circumstances:
(i) The initial adoption of a subarea plan that does not modify the
comprehensive plan policies and designations applicable to the subarea;
(ii) The adoption or amendment of a shoreline master program under
the procedures set forth in chapter 90.58 RCW;
(iii) The amendment of the capital facilities element of a
comprehensive plan that occurs concurrently with the adoption or
amendment of a county or city budget; and
(iv) ((Until June 30, 2006, the designation of recreational lands
under RCW 36.70A.1701. A county amending its comprehensive plan
pursuant to this subsection (2)(a)(iv) may not do so more frequently
than every eighteen months; and
(v))) The adoption of comprehensive plan amendments necessary to
enact a planned action under RCW 43.21C.031(2), provided that
amendments are considered in accordance with the public participation
program established by the county or city under this subsection (2)(a)
and all persons who have requested notice of a comprehensive plan
update are given notice of the amendments and an opportunity to
comment.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in (a) of this subsection, all
proposals shall be considered by the governing body concurrently so the
cumulative effect of the various proposals can be ascertained.
However, after appropriate public participation a county or city may
adopt amendments or revisions to its comprehensive plan that conform
with this chapter whenever an emergency exists or to resolve an appeal
of a comprehensive plan filed with a growth management hearings board
or with the court.
(3)(a) Each county that designates urban growth areas under RCW
36.70A.110 shall review, at least every ten years, its designated urban
growth area or areas, and the densities permitted within both the
incorporated and unincorporated portions of each urban growth area. In
conjunction with this review by the county, each city located within an
urban growth area shall review the densities permitted within its
boundaries, and the extent to which the urban growth occurring within
the county has located within each city and the unincorporated portions
of the urban growth areas.
(b) The county comprehensive plan designating urban growth areas,
and the densities permitted in the urban growth areas by the
comprehensive plans of the county and each city located within the
urban growth areas, shall be revised to accommodate the urban growth
projected to occur in the county for the succeeding twenty-year period.
The review required by this subsection may be combined with the review
and evaluation required by RCW 36.70A.215.
(4) The department shall establish a schedule for counties and
cities to take action to review and, if needed, revise their
comprehensive plans and development regulations to ensure the plan and
regulations comply with the requirements of this chapter. Except as
provided in subsections (5) and (8) of this section, the schedule
established by the department shall provide for the reviews and
evaluations to be completed as follows:
(a) On or before December 1, 2004, and every seven years
thereafter, for Clallam, Clark, Jefferson, King, Kitsap, Pierce,
Snohomish, Thurston, and Whatcom counties and the cities within those
counties;
(b) On or before December 1, 2005, and every seven years
thereafter, for Cowlitz, Island, Lewis, Mason, San Juan, Skagit, and
Skamania counties and the cities within those counties;
(c) On or before December 1, 2006, and every seven years
thereafter, for Benton, Chelan, Douglas, Grant, Kittitas, Spokane, and
Yakima counties and the cities within those counties; and
(d) On or before December 1, 2007, and every seven years
thereafter, for Adams, Asotin, Columbia, Ferry, Franklin, Garfield,
Grays Harbor, Klickitat, Lincoln, Okanogan, Pacific, Pend Oreille,
Stevens, Wahkiakum, Walla Walla, and Whitman counties and the cities
within those counties.
(5)(a) Nothing in this section precludes a county or city from
conducting the review and evaluation required by this section before
the time limits established in subsection (4) of this section.
Counties and cities may begin this process early and may be eligible
for grants from the department, subject to available funding, if they
elect to do so.
(b) A county that is subject to a schedule established by the
department under subsection (4)(b) through (d) of this section and
meets the following criteria may comply with the requirements of this
section at any time within the thirty-six months following the date
established in the applicable schedule: The county has a population of
less than fifty thousand and has had its population increase by no more
than seventeen percent in the ten years preceding the date established
in the applicable schedule as of that date.
(c) A city that is subject to a schedule established by the
department under subsection (4)(b) through (d) of this section and
meets the following criteria may comply with the requirements of this
section at any time within the thirty-six months following the date
established in the applicable schedule: The city has a population of
no more than five thousand and has had its population increase by the
greater of either no more than one hundred persons or no more than
seventeen percent in the ten years preceding the date established in
the applicable schedule as of that date.
(d) State agencies are encouraged to provide technical assistance
to the counties and cities in the review of critical area ordinances,
comprehensive plans, and development regulations.
(6) A county or city subject to the time periods in subsection
(4)(a) of this section that, pursuant to an ordinance adopted by the
county or city establishing a schedule for periodic review of its
comprehensive plan and development regulations, has conducted a review
and evaluation of its comprehensive plan and development regulations
and, on or after January 1, 2001, has taken action in response to that
review and evaluation shall be deemed to have conducted the first
review required by subsection (4)(a) of this section. Subsequent
review and evaluation by the county or city of its comprehensive plan
and development regulations shall be conducted in accordance with the
time periods established under subsection (4)(a) of this section.
(7) The requirements imposed on counties and cities under this
section shall be considered "requirements of this chapter" under the
terms of RCW 36.70A.040(1). Only those counties and cities: (a)
Complying with the schedules in this section; (b) demonstrating
substantial progress towards compliance with the schedules in this
section for development regulations that protect critical areas; or (c)
complying with the extension provisions of subsection (5)(b) or (c) of
this section may receive grants, loans, pledges, or financial
guarantees from those accounts established in RCW 43.155.050 and
70.146.030. A county or city that is fewer than twelve months out of
compliance with the schedules in this section for development
regulations that protect critical areas is making substantial progress
towards compliance. Only those counties and cities in compliance with
the schedules in this section may receive preference for grants or
loans subject to the provisions of RCW 43.17.250.
(8) Except as provided in subsection (5)(b) and (c) of this
section:
(a) Counties and cities required to satisfy the requirements of
this section according to the schedule established by subsection (4)(b)
through (d) of this section may comply with the requirements of this
section for development regulations that protect critical areas one
year after the dates established in subsection (4)(b) through (d) of
this section;
(b) Counties and cities complying with the requirements of this
section one year after the dates established in subsection (4)(b)
through (d) of this section for development regulations that protect
critical areas shall be deemed in compliance with the requirements of
this section; and
(c) This subsection (8) applies only to the counties and cities
specified in subsection (4)(b) through (d) of this section, and only to
the requirements of this section for development regulations that
protect critical areas that must be satisfied by December 1, 2005,
December 1, 2006, and December 1, 2007.
(9) Notwithstanding subsection (8) of this section and the
substantial progress provisions of subsection((s)) (7) ((and (10))) of
this section, only those counties and cities complying with the
schedule in subsection (4) of this section, or the extension provisions
of subsection (5)(b) or (c) of this section, may receive preferences
for grants, loans, pledges, or financial guarantees from those accounts
established in RCW 43.155.050 and 70.146.030.
(((10) Until December 1, 2005, and notwithstanding subsection (7)
of this section, a county or city subject to the time periods in
subsection (4)(a) of this section demonstrating substantial progress
towards compliance with the schedules in this section for its
comprehensive land use plan and development regulations may receive
grants, loans, pledges, or financial guarantees from those accounts
established in RCW 43.155.050 and 70.146.030. A county or city that is
fewer than twelve months out of compliance with the schedules in this
section for its comprehensive land use plan and development regulations
is deemed to be making substantial progress towards compliance.))

Sec. 2 RCW 46.68.290 and 2006 c 337 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The transportation partnership account is hereby created in the
state treasury. All distributions to the account from RCW 46.68.090
must be deposited into the account. Money in the account may be spent
only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account must be used
only for projects or improvements identified as 2005 transportation
partnership projects or improvements in the omnibus transportation
appropriations act, including any principal and interest on bonds
authorized for the projects or improvements.
(2) The legislature finds that:
(a) Citizens demand and deserve accountability of transportation-related programs and expenditures. Transportation-related programs
must continuously improve in quality, efficiency, and effectiveness in
order to increase public trust;
(b) Transportation-related agencies that receive tax dollars must
continuously improve the way they operate and deliver services so
citizens receive maximum value for their tax dollars; and
(c) Fair, independent, comprehensive performance audits of
transportation-related agencies overseen by the elected state auditor
are essential to improving the efficiency, economy, and effectiveness
of the state's transportation system.
(3) For purposes of chapter 314, Laws of 2005:
(a) "Performance audit" means an objective and systematic
assessment of a state agency or agencies or any of their programs,
functions, or activities by the state auditor or designee in order to
help improve agency efficiency, effectiveness, and accountability.
Performance audits include economy and efficiency audits and program
audits.
(b) "Transportation-related agency" means any state agency, board,
or commission that receives funding primarily for transportation-related purposes. At a minimum, the department of transportation, the
transportation improvement board or its successor entity, the county
road administration board or its successor entity, and the traffic
safety commission are considered transportation-related agencies. The
Washington state patrol and the department of licensing shall not be
considered transportation-related agencies under chapter 314, Laws of
2005.
(4) Within the authorities and duties under chapter 43.09 RCW, the
state auditor shall establish criteria and protocols for performance
audits. Transportation-related agencies shall be audited using
criteria that include generally accepted government auditing standards
as well as legislative mandates and performance objectives established
by state agencies. Mandates include, but are not limited to, agency
strategies, timelines, program objectives, and mission and goals as
required in RCW 43.88.090.
(5) Within the authorities and duties under chapter 43.09 RCW, the
state auditor may conduct performance audits for transportation-related
agencies. The state auditor shall contract with private firms to
conduct the performance audits.
(6) The audits may include:
(a) Identification of programs and services that can be eliminated,
reduced, consolidated, or enhanced;
(b) Identification of funding sources to the transportation-related
agency, to programs, and to services that can be eliminated, reduced,
consolidated, or enhanced;
(c) Analysis of gaps and overlaps in programs and services and
recommendations for improving, dropping, blending, or separating
functions to correct gaps or overlaps;
(d) Analysis and recommendations for pooling information technology
systems used within the transportation-related agency, and evaluation
of information processing and telecommunications policy, organization,
and management;
(e) Analysis of the roles and functions of the transportation-related agency, its programs, and its services and their compliance
with statutory authority and recommendations for eliminating or
changing those roles and functions and ensuring compliance with
statutory authority;
(f) Recommendations for eliminating or changing statutes, rules,
and policy directives as may be necessary to ensure that the
transportation-related agency carry out reasonably and properly those
functions vested in the agency by statute;
(g) Verification of the reliability and validity of transportation-related agency performance data, self-assessments, and performance
measurement systems as required under RCW 43.88.090;
(h) Identification of potential cost savings in the transportation-related agency, its programs, and its services;
(i) Identification and recognition of best practices;
(j) Evaluation of planning, budgeting, and program evaluation
policies and practices;
(k) Evaluation of personnel systems operation and management;
(l) Evaluation of purchasing operations and management policies and
practices;
(m) Evaluation of organizational structure and staffing levels,
particularly in terms of the ratio of managers and supervisors to
nonmanagement personnel; and
(n) Evaluation of transportation-related project costs, including
but not limited to environmental mitigation, competitive bidding
practices, permitting processes, and capital project management.
(7) Within the authorities and duties under chapter 43.09 RCW, the
state auditor must provide the preliminary performance audit reports to
the audited state agency for comment. The auditor also may seek input
on the preliminary report from other appropriate officials. Comments
must be received within thirty days after receipt of the preliminary
performance audit report unless a different time period is approved by
the state auditor. The final performance audit report shall include
the objectives, scope, and methodology; the audit results, including
findings and recommendations; the agency's response and conclusions;
and identification of best practices.
(8) The state auditor shall provide final performance audit reports
to the citizens of Washington, the governor, the joint legislative
audit and review committee, the appropriate legislative committees, and
other appropriate officials. Final performance audit reports shall be
posted on the internet.
(9) The audited transportation-related agency is responsible for
follow-up and corrective action on all performance audit findings and
recommendations. The audited agency's plan for addressing each audit
finding and recommendation shall be included in the final audit report.
The plan shall provide the name of the contact person responsible for
each action, the action planned, and the anticipated completion date.
If the audited agency does not agree with the audit findings and
recommendations or believes action is not required, then the action
plan shall include an explanation and specific reasons.
The office of financial management shall require periodic progress
reports from the audited agency until all resolution has occurred. The
office of financial management is responsible for achieving audit
resolution. The office of financial management shall annually report
by December 31st the status of performance audit resolution to the
appropriate legislative committees and the state auditor. The
legislature shall consider the performance audit results in connection
with the state budget process.
The auditor may request status reports on specific audits or
findings.
(((10) For the period from July 1, 2005, until June 30, 2007, the
amount of $4,000,000 is appropriated from the transportation
partnership account to the state auditors office for the purposes of
subsections (2) through (9) of this section.))

Sec. 3 RCW 49.12.450 and 1998 c 334 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 49.46 RCW or other
provisions of this chapter, the obligation of an employer to furnish or
compensate an employee for apparel required during work hours shall be
determined only under this section.
(2) Employers are not required to furnish or compensate employees
for apparel that an employer requires an employee to wear during
working hours unless the required apparel is a uniform.
(3) As used in this section, "uniform" means:
(a) Apparel of a distinctive style and quality that, when worn
outside of the workplace, clearly identifies the person as an employee
of a specific employer;
(b) Apparel that is specially marked with an employer's logo;
(c) Unique apparel representing an historical time period or an
ethnic tradition; or
(d) Formal apparel.
(4) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, if an
employer requires an employee to wear apparel of a common color that
conforms to a general dress code or style, the employer is not required
to furnish or compensate an employee for that apparel. For the
purposes of this subsection, "common color" is limited to the following
colors or light or dark variations of such colors: White, tan, or
blue, for tops; and tan, black, blue, or gray, for bottoms. An
employer is permitted to require an employee to obtain two sets of
wearing apparel to accommodate for the seasonal changes in weather
which necessitate a change in wearing apparel.
(5) If an employer changes the color or colors of apparel required
to be worn by any of his or her employees during a two-year period of
time, the employer shall furnish or compensate the employees for the
apparel. The employer shall be required to furnish or compensate only
those employees who are affected by the change. The two-year time
period begins on the date the change in wearing apparel goes into
effect and ends two years from this date. The beginning and end of the
two-year time period applies to all employees regardless of when the
employee is hired.
(6) ((The department shall utilize negotiated rule making as
defined by RCW 34.05.310(2)(a) in the development and adoption of rules
defining apparel that conforms to a general dress code or style. This
subsection expires January 1, 2000.
(7))) For the purposes of this section, personal protective
equipment required for employee protection under chapter 49.17 RCW is
not deemed to be employee wearing apparel.

Sec. 4 RCW 51.48.100 and 1985 c 227 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1))) The director may waive the whole or any part of any penalty
charged under this title.
(((2) Until June 30, 1986: (a) The director may, at his or her
discretion, declare a penalty-free period of no more than three months
only for employers who have never previously registered under RCW
51.16.110 for eligible employees under Title 51 RCW; and (b) such
employers may qualify once for penalty-free status upon payment of up
to one year's past due premium in full and satisfaction of the
requirements of RCW 51.16.110. Such employers shall be subject to all
penalties for any subsequent failure to comply with the requirements of
this title.))

Sec. 5 RCW 71A.16.030 and 1998 c 216 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((The department will develop an outreach program to ensure
that any eligible person with developmental disabilities services in
homes, the community, and residential habilitation centers will be made
aware of these services. This subsection (1) expires June 30, 2003.
(2))) The secretary shall establish a single procedure for persons
to apply for a determination of eligibility for services provided to
persons with developmental disabilities.
(((3) Until June 30, 2003, the procedure set out under subsection
(1) of this section must require that all applicants and all persons
with developmental disabilities currently receiving services from the
division of developmental disabilities within the department be given
notice of the existence and availability of residential habilitation
center and community support services. For genuine choice to exist,
people must know what the options are. Available options must be
clearly explained, with services customized to fit the unique needs and
circumstances of developmentally disabled clients and their families.
Choice of providers and design of services and supports will be
determined by the individual in conjunction with the department. When
the person cannot make these choices, the person's legal guardian may
make them, consistent with chapter 11.88 or 11.92 RCW. This subsection
expires June 30, 2003.
(4))) (2) An application may be submitted by a person with a
developmental disability, by the legal representative of a person with
a developmental disability, or by any other person who is authorized by
rule of the secretary to submit an application.

Sec. 6 RCW 78.56.160 and 1998 c 245 s 161 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((Until June 30, 1996, there shall be a moratorium on metals
mining and milling operations using the heap leach extraction
process.)) The department of natural resources and the department of
ecology shall jointly review the existing laws and regulations
pertaining to the heap leach extraction process for their adequacy in
safeguarding the environment.
(2) Metals mining using the process of in situ extraction is
permanently prohibited in the state of Washington.

Sec. 7 RCW 81.112.050 and 1998 c 192 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) At the time of formation, the area to be included within the
boundary of the authority shall be that area set forth in the system
plan adopted by the joint regional policy committee. Prior to
submitting the system and financing plan to the voters, the authority
may make adjustments to the boundaries as deemed appropriate but must
assure that, to the extent possible, the boundaries: (a) Include the
largest-population urban growth area designated by each county under
chapter 36.70A RCW; and (b) follow election precinct boundaries. If a
portion of any city is determined to be within the service area, the
entire city must be included within the boundaries of the authority.
(2) After voters within the authority boundaries have approved the
system and financing plan, elections to add areas contiguous to the
authority boundaries may be called by resolution of the regional
transit authority, after consultation with affected transit agencies
and with the concurrence of the legislative authority of the city or
town if the area is incorporated, or with the concurrence of the county
legislative authority if the area is unincorporated. Only those areas
that would benefit from the services provided by the authority may be
included and services or projects proposed for the area must be
consistent with the regional transportation plan. The election may
include a single ballot proposition providing for annexation to the
authority boundaries and imposition of the taxes at rates already
imposed within the authority boundaries.
(((3) Upon receipt of a resolution requesting exclusion from the
boundaries of the authority from a city whose municipal boundaries
cross the boundaries of an authority and thereby result in only a
portion of the city being subject to local option taxes imposed by the
authority under chapters 81.104 and 81.112 RCW in order to implement a
high-capacity transit plan, and where the vote to approve the city's
incorporation occurred simultaneously with an election approving the
local option taxes, then upon a two-thirds majority vote of the
governing board of the authority, the governing board shall redraw the
boundaries of the authority to exclude that portion of the city that is
located within the authority's boundaries, and the excluded area is no
longer subject to local option taxes imposed by the authority. This
subsection expires December 31, 1998.))

Sec. 8 RCW 28B.115.020 and 1991 c 332 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Board" means the higher education coordinating board.
(2) "Department" means the state department of health.
(3) "Eligible education and training programs" means education and
training programs approved by the department that lead to eligibility
for a credential as a credentialed health care professional.
(4) "Eligible expenses" means reasonable expenses associated with
the costs of acquiring an education such as tuition, books, equipment,
fees, room and board, and other expenses determined by the board.
(5) "Eligible student" means a student who has been accepted into
an eligible education or training program and has a declared intention
to serve in a health professional shortage area upon completion of the
education or training program.
(6) "Forgiven" or "to forgive" or "forgiveness" means to render
health care services in a health professional shortage area in the
state of Washington in lieu of monetary repayment.
(7) "Health professional shortage areas" means those areas where
credentialed health care professionals are in short supply as a result
of geographic maldistribution or as the result of a short supply of
credentialed health care professionals in specialty health care areas
and where vacancies exist in serious numbers that jeopardize patient
care and pose a threat to the public health and safety. The department
shall determine health professional shortage areas as provided for in
RCW 28B.115.070((, or until June 1, 1992, as provided for in RCW
28B.115.060)). In making health professional shortage area
designations in the state the department may be guided by applicable
federal standards for "health manpower shortage areas," and "medically
underserved areas," and "medically underserved populations."
(8) "Credentialed health care profession" means a health care
profession regulated by a disciplining authority in the state of
Washington under RCW 18.130.040 or by the state board of pharmacy under
chapter 18.64 RCW and designated by the department in RCW
28B.115.070((, or until June 1, 1992, as established in RCW
28B.115.060)) as a profession having shortages of credentialed health
care professionals in the state.
(9) "Credentialed health care professional" means a person
regulated by a disciplining authority in the state of Washington to
practice a health care profession under RCW 18.130.040 or by the state
board of pharmacy under chapter 18.64 RCW.
(10) "Loan repayment" means a loan that is paid in full or in part
if the participant renders health care services in a health
professional shortage area as defined by the department.
(11) "Nonshortage rural area" means a nonurban area of the state of
Washington that has not been designated as a rural physician shortage
area. The department shall identify the nonshortage rural areas of the
state.
(12) "Participant" means a credentialed health care professional
who has received a loan repayment award and has commenced practice as
a credentialed health care provider in a designated health professional
shortage area or an eligible student who has received a scholarship
under this program.
(13) "Program" means the health professional loan repayment and
scholarship program.
(14) "Required service obligation" means an obligation by the
participant to provide health care services in a health professional
shortage area for a period to be established as provided for in this
chapter.
(15) "Rural physician shortage area" means rural geographic areas
where primary care physicians are in short supply as a result of
geographic maldistributions and where their limited numbers jeopardize
patient care and pose a threat to public health and safety. The
department shall designate rural physician shortage areas.
(16) "Satisfied" means paid-in-full.
(17) "Scholarship" means a loan that is forgiven in whole or in
part if the recipient renders health care services in a health
professional shortage area.
(18) "Sponsoring community" means a rural hospital or hospitals as
authorized in chapter 70.41 RCW, a rural health care facility or
facilities as authorized in chapter 70.175 RCW, or a city or county
government or governments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 28B.115.060 (Eligible credentialed health care
professions -- Required service obligations) and 1991 c 332 s 19; and
(2) RCW 77.65.230 (Surcharge on Dungeness crab-coastal fishery
licenses and Dungeness crab-coastal class B fishery licenses -- Dungeness
crab appeals account) and 2000 c 107 s 44 & 1994 c 260 s 15.

--- END ---