BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.120.070 and 2007 c 509 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Beginning no sooner than the 2007 general election and subject
to subsection (3) of this section, two or more contiguous county
legislative authorities, or a single county legislative authority as
provided under RCW 36.120.030(8), upon receipt of the regional
transportation investment plan under RCW 36.120.040, may submit to the
voters of the proposed district a single ballot proposition that
approves formation of the district, approves the regional
transportation investment plan, and approves the revenue sources
necessary to finance the plan. For a county to participate in the
plan, the county legislative authority shall, within ninety days after
receiving the plan, adopt an ordinance indicating the county's
participation. The planning committee may draft the ballot proposition
on behalf of the county legislative authorities, and the county
legislative authorities may give notice as required by law for ballot
propositions, and perform other duties as required to submit the
proposition to the voters of the proposed district for their approval
or rejection. Counties may negotiate interlocal agreements necessary
to implement the plan. The electorate will be the voters voting within
the boundaries of the proposed district. A simple majority of the
total persons voting on the single ballot proposition is required for
approval.
(2) The participating counties shall submit a regional
transportation investment plan at the 2007 general election as part of
a single ballot proposition that includes, in conjunction with RCW
81.112.030(10), a plan to support an authority's system and financing
plan, or additional implementation phases of the system and financing
plan, developed under chapter 81.112 RCW. The regional transportation
investment plan shall not be considered approved unless both a majority
of the persons voting on the proposition residing in the proposed
district vote in favor of the proposition and a majority of the persons
voting on the proposition residing within the regional transit
authority vote in favor of the proposition.
(3) For the purpose of temporarily eliminating the opportunity for
a regional transportation investment district to be formed under this
chapter, the participating county or counties shall not submit a ballot
proposition to voters prior to November 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act expires January 1, 2010.

--- END ---