BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the conditions and requirements of this section, the
tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to the sale of qualifying
property and services. The exemption is in the form of a remittance
and applies to part of the state portion of the sales tax.
(2) The exemption only applies to construction performed in cities,
towns, or counties that have adopted: (a) An expedited permitting
process for the construction of environmentally certified buildings;
and (b) low-impact development regulations, as determined by the
department of ecology. For residential construction, the exemption
only applies if the selling price is less than the median price in the
local jurisdiction for the type of home, as reflected in a recognized
real estate listing service for the month prior to the sale of the
home. For residential construction not within the boundary of a city
or town, "local jurisdiction" means the unincorporated area of the
county.
(3) A person claiming an exemption from state sales tax must pay
the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020. The buyer may then apply to the
department for remittance for part of the tax paid under RCW 82.08.020.
For the sale of qualifying property and services used in the
construction of a building with a gold or platinum rating under the
leadership in energy and environmental design green building rating
system or a five-star rating under the Washington built green program,
the remittance equals the following percentage of sales tax paid:
Fifty percent for the fiscal year ending July 1, 2011; forty percent
for the fiscal year ending July 1, 2012; thirty percent for the fiscal
year ending July 1, 2013; twenty percent for the fiscal year ending
July 1, 2014; and ten percent for the fiscal year ending July 1, 2015.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Construction" means the construction, repair, decoration, or
improvement of new or existing buildings.
(b) "Environmentally certified building" means a commercial or
residential building: (i) With a silver, gold, or platinum rating
under the leadership in energy and environmental design green building
rating system; (ii) with a four or five-star rating under the
Washington built green program; or (iii) with a rating for sustainable
building that is equivalent to (b)(i) or (ii) of this subsection,
verifiable, and approved by the department in rule.
(c) "Qualifying property and services" means tangible personal
property and labor and services used, or to be used, in the
construction of environmentally certified buildings.
(d) "Type of home" means single family or multifamily, as
appropriate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the conditions and requirements of this section, the
provisions of this chapter do not apply to the use of qualifying
property and services. The exemption is in the form of a remittance
and applies to part of the state portion of the use tax.
(2) A person claiming an exemption from state use tax must pay the
tax imposed under this chapter. The person may then apply to the
department for remittance of all, or part of, the tax paid under this
chapter. For the use of qualifying property and services used in the
construction of a building with a gold or platinum rating under the
leadership in energy and environmental design green building rating
system, a five-star rating under the Washington built green program, or
an equivalent rating as provided in section 1(4)(b)(iii) of this act,
the remittance equals the following percentage of sales tax paid:
Fifty percent for the fiscal year ending July 1, 2011; forty percent
for the fiscal year ending July 1, 2012; thirty percent for the fiscal
year ending July 1, 2013; twenty percent for the fiscal year ending
July 1, 2014; and ten percent for the fiscal year ending July 1, 2015.
(3) The conditions, requirements, and definitions in section 1 of
this act apply to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 By December 1, 2012, and by December 1st of
the two following years, the department of revenue shall submit a
report to the legislature. The report must: (1) Provide the amount of
sales and use tax exempted under this act; (2) describe the commercial
or residential character of tax exempt construction; (3) identify the
geographic location of tax exempt construction; and (4) estimate cost
savings and emission reductions for homes and buildings subject to the
exemptions under this act. The department may include any other
information in the report that it deems necessary for the legislative
evaluation of the sales and use tax exemption authorized in this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect July 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act expires July 1, 2015.

--- END ---