BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.330.090 and 2007 c 228 s 201 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall work with private sector organizations,
industry and ((cluster)) sector associations, federal agencies, state
agencies that use a ((cluster)) sector-based approach to service
delivery, local governments, local associate development organizations,
and higher education and training institutions in the development of
industry ((cluster)) sector-based strategies to diversify the economy,
facilitate technology transfer and diffusion, and increase value-added
production. The industry ((clusters)) sectors targeted by the
department may include, but are not limited to, aerospace, agriculture,
food processing, forest products, marine services, health and
biomedical, software, digital and interactive media, transportation and
distribution, and microelectronics. The department shall, on a
continuing basis, evaluate the potential return to the state from
devoting additional resources to an industry ((cluster)) sector-based
approach to economic development and identifying and assisting
additional ((clusters)) sectors. The department shall use information
gathered ((in each service delivery region)) by each regional office in
formulating its industry cluster- and sector-based strategies and shall
assist local communities in identifying regional industry clusters and
sectors and developing industry cluster- and sector-based strategies.
(2)(((a) The department shall promote, market, and encourage growth
in the production of films and videos, as well as television
commercials within the state; to this end the department is directed to
assist in the location of a film and video production studio within the
state.
(b) The department may, in carrying out its efforts to encourage
film and video production in the state, solicit and receive gifts,
grants, funds, fees, and endowments, in trust or otherwise, from
tribal, local, or other governmental entities, as well as private
sources, and may expend the same or any income therefrom for the
encouragement of film and video production. All revenue received for
such purposes shall be deposited into the film and video promotion
account created in RCW 43.330.092.
(3))) In assisting in the development of regional and statewide
industry cluster- and sector-based strategies, the department's
activities shall include, but are not limited to:
(a) Facilitating regional focus group discussions and conducting
studies to identify industry clusters, appraise the current information
linkages within a cluster, and identify issues of common concern within
a cluster;
(b) Supporting industry and cluster associations, publications of
association and cluster directories, and related efforts to create or
expand the activities of industry and cluster associations;
(c) Administering a competitive grant program to fund activities
designed to further regional cluster growth. In administering the
program, the department shall work with an industry cluster advisory
committee with equal representation from the workforce training and
education coordinating board, the state board for community and
technical colleges, the employment security department, business, and
labor.
(i) The industry cluster advisory committee shall recommend
criteria for evaluating applications for grant funds and recommend
applicants for receipt of grant funds.
(ii) Applicants must include organizations from at least two
counties and participants from the local business community. Eligible
organizations include, but are not limited to, local governments,
economic development councils, nonprofit industry or industry cluster
associations, chambers of commerce, federally recognized Indian tribes,
workforce development councils, and educational institutions.
(iii) Applications must evidence financial participation of the
partner organizations.
(iv) Priority shall be given to applicants which will use the grant
funds to build linkages and joint projects, to develop mechanisms for
information sharing among cluster members, to develop common resources
and common training, and to develop common research and development
projects or facilities.
(v) The maximum amount of a grant is one hundred fifty thousand
dollars.
(vi) A maximum of ((one)) three hundred thousand dollars total can
go to King, Pierce, Kitsap, and Snohomish counties combined.
(vii) Five percent of funds received for the grant program shall
be used by the department, with the industry cluster advisory
committee, to: (A) Identify and share with grant recipients the public
and private resources available that could be more intensively devoted
to assist industry clusters; and (B) identify mechanisms by which
public resources can be coordinated and more efficiently delivered to
support the growth and competitiveness of industry clusters, including
consistent timing of grant applications, the development of common
criteria for receipt of grants, and the establishment of grant review
committees with overlapping membership. No more than ten percent of
funds received for the grant program may be used by the department for
administrative costs.
(((4))) (3) As used in ((subsection (3) of)) this section((,)):
(a) "Industry cluster" means a geographic concentration of
interdependent competitive firms that do business with each other((.
"Industry cluster" also includes)), including firms that sell inside
and outside of the geographic region as well as support firms that
supply raw materials, components, and business services, and other
institutions including government and education.
(b) "Sector" means a group of industries with similar business
processes, products, or services, such as construction or health
services; formerly categorized by the standard industrial
classification system, now categorized by the North American industry
classification system.
(4)(a) The department shall promote, market, and encourage growth
in the production of films and videos, as well as television
commercials within the state; to this end the department is directed to
assist in the location of a film and video production studio within the
state.
(b) The department may, in carrying out its efforts to encourage
film and video production in the state, solicit and receive gifts,
grants, funds, fees, and endowments, in trust or otherwise, from
tribal, local, or other governmental entities, as well as private
sources, and may expend the same or any income therefrom for the
encouragement of film and video production. All revenue received for
such purposes shall be deposited into the film and video promotion
account created in RCW 43.330.092.

--- END ---