BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that information
technology plays an increasingly important role in the state's economy
but that the knowledge level and adoption of information technologies
are limited in some areas of the state. It is the intent of this act
to address digital literacy and technology training needs of low-income
and technology underserved residents of the state through state support
of community technology programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Administrator" means the community technology opportunity
program administrator designated by the Washington State University
extension.
(2) "Community technology program" means a program, including a
digital inclusion program, engaged in diffusing information and
communications technology in local communities, particularly in
underserved areas. These programs may include, but are not limited to,
programs that provide education and skill-building opportunities,
hardware and software, internet connectivity, and development of
locally relevant content and delivery of vital services through
technology.
(3) "Telecommunications company" has the same meaning as provided
in RCW 80.04.010 and includes providers of internet services subject to
tax under RCW 82.04.297.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The community technology opportunity program
is created to support the efforts of community technology programs
throughout the state. The community technology opportunity program
must be administered by the Washington State University extension. The
Washington State University extension may contract for services in
order to carry out the extension's obligations under this section.
(1) In implementing the community technology opportunity program
the administrator must:
(a) Provide organizational and capacity building support to
community technology programs throughout the state, and identify and
facilitate the availability of other public and private sources of
funds to enhance the purposes of this chapter and the work of community
technology programs. No more than fifteen percent of funds received by
the administrator for the program may be expended on these functions;
(b) Establish a competitive grant program and provide grants to
community technology programs to provide training and skill-building
opportunities; access to hardware and software; internet connectivity;
assistance in the adoption of information and communication
technologies in low-income and underserved areas of the state; and
development of locally relevant content and delivery of vital services
through technology.
(2) Grant applicants must:
(a) Provide evidence that the applicant is a nonprofit entity or a
public entity that is working in partnership with a nonprofit entity;
(b) Define the geographic area or population to be served;
(c) Include in the application the results of a needs assessment
addressing, in the geographic area or among the population to be
served: The impact of inadequacies in technology access or knowledge,
barriers faced, and services needed;
(d) Explain in detail the strategy for addressing the needs
identified and an implementation plan including objectives, tasks, and
benchmarks for the applicant and the role that other organizations will
play in assisting the applicant's efforts;
(e) Provide evidence of matching funds and resources, which are
equivalent to at least one-quarter of the grant amount committed to the
applicant's strategy;
(f) Provide evidence that funds applied for, if received, will be
used to provide effective delivery of community technology services in
alignment with the goals of this chapter and to increase the
applicant's level of effort beyond the current level; and
(g) Comply with such other requirements as the administrator
establishes.
(3) The administrator may use no more than ten percent of funds
received for the community technology opportunity program to cover
administrative expenses.
(4) The administrator must establish expected program outcomes for
each grant recipient and must require grant recipients to provide an
annual accounting of program outcomes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The Washington community technology
opportunity account is established in the state treasury. Donated
funds from private and public sources may be deposited into the
account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the
operation of the community technology opportunity program as provided
in sections 1 through 3 of this act. Only the administrator or the
administrator's designee may authorize expenditures from the account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

--- END ---