BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares that
government exists to conduct the people's business, and the people
remaining informed about the actions of government contributes to the
oversight of how the people's business is conducted. The legislature
further finds that many public servants who expose actions of their
government that are contrary to the law or public interest face the
potential loss of their careers and livelihoods.
It is the policy of the legislature that employees should be
encouraged to disclose, to the extent not expressly prohibited by law,
improper governmental actions, and it is the intent of the legislature
to protect the rights of state employees making these disclosures. It
is also the policy of the legislature that employees should be
encouraged to identify rules warranting review or provide information
to the rules review committee, and it is the intent of the legislature
to protect the rights of these employees.
This act shall be broadly construed in order to effectuate the
purpose of this act.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.40.020 and 1999 c 361 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, the terms defined in this section shall
have the meanings indicated unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Abuse of authority" means an arbitrary or capricious exercise
of, or willful failure to exercise, power that adversely affects the
rights of any person or that results in personal gain or advantage to
himself, herself, or preferred other persons.
(2) "Auditor" means the office of the state auditor.
(((2))) (3) "Employee" means any individual employed or holding
office in any department or agency of state government.
(((3))) (4) "Good faith" means the individual providing the
information or report of improper governmental activity has a
reasonable basis in fact for reporting or providing the
((communication)) information. (("Good faith" is lacking when the
employee knows or reasonably ought to know that the report is
malicious, false, or frivolous.)) An individual who knowingly provides
or reports malicious, false, or frivolous information, or information
that is provided with reckless disregard for the truth, or who
knowingly omits relevant information is not acting in good faith.
(((4))) (5) "Gross mismanagement" means the arbitrary or capricious
exercise of management responsibilities in a manner grossly deviating
from the standard of care or competence that a reasonable person would
observe in the same situation.
(6) "Gross waste of funds" means to spend or use funds or to allow
funds to be used without valuable result in a manner grossly deviating
from the standard of care or competence that a reasonable person would
observe in the same situation.
(((5))) (7)(a) "Improper governmental action" means any action by
an employee undertaken in the performance of the employee's official
duties:
(i) Which is (([a])) a gross waste of public funds or resources as
defined in this section;
(ii) Which is in violation of federal or state law or rule, if the
violation is not merely technical or of a minimum nature; ((or))
(iii) Which is of substantial and specific danger to the public
health or safety;
(iv) Which is gross mismanagement;
(v) Which is an abuse of authority; or
(vi) Which prevents the dissemination of scientific opinion or
alters technical findings without scientifically valid justification,
unless state law or a common law privilege prohibits disclosure. This
provision is not meant to preclude the discretion of agency management
to adopt a particular scientific opinion or technical finding from
among differing opinions or technical findings to the exclusion of
other scientific opinions or technical findings. Nothing in this
subsection prevents or impairs a state agency's or public official's
ability to manage its public resources or its employees in the
performance of their official job duties. This subsection does not
apply to de minimis, technical disagreements that are not relevant for
otherwise improper governmental activity. Nothing in this provision
requires the auditor to contract or consult with external experts
regarding the scientific validity, invalidity, or justification of a
finding or opinion.
(b) "Improper governmental action" does not include personnel
actions, for which other remedies exist, including but not limited to
employee grievances, complaints, appointments, promotions, transfers,
assignments, reassignments, reinstatements, restorations,
reemployments, performance evaluations, reductions in pay, dismissals,
suspensions, demotions, violations of the state civil service law,
alleged labor agreement violations, reprimands, claims of
discriminatory treatment, or any action which may be taken under
chapter 41.06 RCW, or other disciplinary action except as provided in
RCW 42.40.030.
(((6))) (8) "Public official" means the attorney general or his or
her designee or designees; the director, or equivalent thereof in the
agency where the employee works; an appropriate number of individuals
designated to receive whistleblower reports by the head of each agency;
or the executive ethics board.
(9) "Substantial and specific danger" means a risk of serious
injury, illness, peril, or loss, to which the exposure of the public is
a gross deviation from the standard of care or competence which a
reasonable person would observe in the same situation.
(((7))) (10) "Use of official authority or influence" includes
threatening, taking, directing others to take, recommending,
processing, or approving any personnel action such as an appointment,
promotion, transfer, assignment including but not limited to duties and
office location, reassignment, reinstatement, restoration,
reemployment, performance evaluation, determining any material changes
in pay, provision of training or benefits, tolerance of a hostile work
environment, or any adverse action under chapter 41.06 RCW, or other
disciplinary action.
(((8))) (11) "Whistleblower" means an employee who in good faith
reports, or is perceived by the employer as reporting, whether they did
or not, alleged improper governmental action to the auditor or other
public official, as defined in subsection (8) of this section,
initiating an investigation under RCW 42.40.040. For purposes of the
provisions of this chapter and chapter 49.60 RCW relating to reprisals
and retaliatory action, the term "whistleblower" also means: (a) An
employee who in good faith provides information to the auditor or other
public official, as defined in subsection (8) of this section, in
connection with an investigation under RCW 42.40.040 and an employee
who is believed to have reported asserted improper governmental action
to the auditor or other public official, as defined in subsection (8)
of this section, or to have provided information to the auditor or
other public official, as defined in subsection (8) of this section, in
connection with an investigation under RCW 42.40.040 but who, in fact,
has not reported such action or provided such information; or (b) an
employee who in good faith identifies rules warranting review or
provides information to the rules review committee, and an employee who
is believed to have identified rules warranting review or provided
information to the rules review committee but who, in fact, has not
done so.

Sec. 3 RCW 42.40.030 and 1995 c 403 s 510 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An employee shall not directly or indirectly use or attempt to
use the employee's official authority or influence for the purpose of
intimidating, threatening, coercing, commanding, influencing, or
attempting to intimidate, threaten, coerce, command, or influence any
individual for the purpose of interfering with the right of the
individual to: (a) Disclose to the auditor (or representative thereof)
or other public official, as defined in RCW 42.40.020, information
concerning improper governmental action; or (b) identify rules
warranting review or provide information to the rules review committee.
(2) Nothing in this section authorizes an individual to disclose
information otherwise prohibited by law, except to the extent that
information is necessary to substantiate the whistleblower complaint,
in which case information may be disclosed to the auditor or public
official, as defined in RCW 42.40.020, by the whistleblower for the
limited purpose of providing information related to the complaint. Any
information provided to the auditor or public official under the
authority of this subsection may not be further disclosed.

Sec. 4 RCW 42.40.040 and 1999 c 361 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) In order to be investigated, an assertion of improper
governmental action must be provided to the auditor or other public
official within one year after the occurrence of the asserted improper
governmental action. The public official, as defined in RCW 42.40.020,
receiving an assertion of improper governmental action must report the
assertion to the auditor within fifteen calendar days of receipt of the
assertion. The auditor retains sole authority to investigate an
assertion of improper governmental action including those made to a
public official. A failure of the public official to report the
assertion to the auditor within fifteen days does not impair the rights
of the whistleblower.
(b) Except as provided under RCW 42.40.910 for legislative and
judicial branches of government, the auditor has the authority to
determine whether to investigate any assertions received. In
determining whether to conduct either a preliminary or further
investigation, the auditor shall consider factors including, but not
limited to: The nature and quality of evidence and the existence of
relevant laws and rules; whether the action was isolated or systematic;
the history of previous assertions regarding the same subject or
subjects or subject matter; whether other avenues are available for
addressing the matter; whether the matter has already been investigated
or is in litigation; the seriousness or significance of the asserted
improper governmental action; and the cost and benefit of the
investigation. The auditor has the sole discretion to determine the
priority and weight given to these and other relevant factors and to
decide whether a matter is to be investigated. The auditor shall
document the factors considered and the analysis applied.
(c) The auditor also has the authority to investigate assertions of
improper governmental actions as part of an audit conducted under
chapter 43.09 RCW. The auditor shall document the reasons for handling
the matter as part of such an audit.
(d) Except as provided under RCW 42.40.910, the auditor also has
the authority to investigate, within available resources, reports of
improper governmental activities made by whistleblowers to any public
official pursuant to RCW 42.40.050.
(2) Subject to subsection (5)(c) of this section, the identity or
identifying characteristics of a whistleblower is confidential at all
times unless the whistleblower consents to disclosure by written waiver
or by acknowledging his or her identity in a claim against the state
for retaliation. In addition, the identity or identifying
characteristics of any person who in good faith provides information in
an investigation under this section is confidential at all times,
unless the person consents to disclosure by written waiver or by
acknowledging his or her identity as a witness who provides information
in an investigation.
(3) Upon receiving specific information that an employee has
engaged in improper governmental action, the auditor shall, within
((five)) fifteen working days of receipt of the information, mail
written acknowledgement to the whistleblower at the address provided
stating whether a preliminary investigation will be conducted. For a
period not to exceed ((thirty)) sixty working days from receipt of the
assertion, the auditor shall conduct such preliminary investigation of
the matter as the auditor deems appropriate.
(4) In addition to the authority under subsection (3) of this
section, the auditor may, on its own initiative, investigate incidents
of improper state governmental action.
(5)(a) If it appears to the auditor, upon completion of the
preliminary investigation, that the matter is so unsubstantiated that
no further investigation, prosecution, or administrative action is
warranted, the auditor shall so notify the whistleblower summarizing
where the allegations are deficient, and provide a reasonable
opportunity to reply. Such notification may be by electronic means.
(b) The written notification shall contain a summary of the
information received and of the results of the preliminary
investigation with regard to each assertion of improper governmental
action.
(c) In any case to which this section applies, the identity or
identifying characteristics of the whistleblower shall be kept
confidential unless the auditor determines that the information has
been provided other than in good faith. If the auditor makes such a
determination, the auditor shall provide reasonable advance notice to
the employee.
(d) With the agency's consent, the auditor may forward the
assertions to an appropriate agency to investigate and report back to
the auditor no later than sixty working days after the assertions are
received from the auditor. The auditor is entitled to all
investigative records resulting from such a referral. All procedural
and confidentiality provisions of this chapter apply to investigations
conducted under this subsection. The auditor shall document the
reasons the assertions were referred.
(6) During the preliminary investigation, the auditor shall provide
written notification of the nature of the assertions to the subject or
subjects of the investigation and the agency head. The notification
shall include the relevant facts and laws known at the time and the
procedure for the subject or subjects of the investigation and the
agency head to respond to the assertions and information obtained
during the investigation. This notification does not limit the auditor
from considering additional facts or laws which become known during
further investigation.
(((7)))(a) If it appears to the auditor after completion of the
preliminary investigation that further investigation, prosecution, or
administrative action is warranted, the auditor shall so notify the
whistleblower, the subject or subjects of the investigation, and the
agency head and either conduct a further investigation or issue a
report under subsection (((10))) (9) of this section.
(b) If the preliminary investigation resulted from an anonymous
assertion, a decision to conduct further investigation shall be subject
to review by a three-person panel convened as necessary by the auditor
prior to the commencement of any additional investigation. The panel
shall include a state auditor representative knowledgeable of the
subject agency operations, a citizen volunteer, and a representative of
the attorney general's office. This group shall be briefed on the
preliminary investigation and shall recommend whether the auditor
should proceed with further investigation.
(c) If further investigation is to occur, the auditor shall provide
written notification of the nature of the assertions to the subject or
subjects of the investigation and the agency head. The notification
shall include the relevant facts known at the time and the procedure to
be used by the subject or subjects of the investigation and the agency
head to respond to the assertions and information obtained during the
investigation.
(((8))) (7) Within sixty working days after the preliminary
investigation period in subsection (3) of this section, the auditor
shall complete the investigation and report its findings to the
whistleblower unless written justification for the delay is furnished
to the whistleblower, agency head, and subject or subjects of the
investigation. In all such cases, the report of the auditor's
investigation and findings shall be sent to the whistleblower within
one year after the information was filed under subsection (3) of this
section.
(((9))) (8)(a) At any stage of an investigation under this section
the auditor may require by subpoena the attendance and testimony of
witnesses and the production of documentary or other evidence relating
to the investigation at any designated place in the state. The auditor
may issue subpoenas, administer oaths, examine witnesses, and receive
evidence. In the case of contumacy or failure to obey a subpoena, the
superior court for the county in which the person to whom the subpoena
is addressed resides or is served may issue an order requiring the
person to appear at any designated place to testify or to produce
documentary or other evidence. Any failure to obey the order of the
court may be punished by the court as a contempt thereof.
(b) The auditor may order the taking of depositions at any stage of
a proceeding or investigation under this chapter. Depositions shall be
taken before an individual designated by the auditor and having the
power to administer oaths. Testimony shall be reduced to writing by or
under the direction of the individual taking the deposition and shall
be subscribed by the deponent.
(c) Agencies shall cooperate fully in the investigation and shall
take appropriate action to preclude the destruction of any evidence
during the course of the investigation.
(d) During the investigation the auditor shall interview each
subject of the investigation. If it is determined there is reasonable
cause to believe improper governmental action has occurred, the subject
or subjects and the agency head shall be given fifteen working days to
respond to the assertions prior to the issuance of the final report.
(((10))) (9)(a) If the auditor determines there is reasonable cause
to believe an employee has engaged in improper governmental action, the
auditor shall report, to the extent allowable under existing public
disclosure laws, the nature and details of the activity to:
(i) The subject or subjects of the investigation and the head of
the employing agency; ((and))
(ii) If appropriate, the attorney general or such other authority
as the auditor determines appropriate;
(iii) Electronically to the governor, secretary of the senate, and
chief clerk of the house of representatives; and
(iv) Except for information whose release is specifically
prohibited by statute or executive order, the public through the public
file of whistleblower reports maintained by the auditor.
(b) The auditor has no enforcement power except that in any case in
which the auditor submits an investigative report containing reasonable
cause determinations to the agency, the agency shall send its plan for
resolution to the auditor within fifteen working days of having
received the report. The agency is encouraged to consult with the
subject or subjects of the investigation in establishing the resolution
plan. The auditor may require periodic reports of agency action until
all resolution has occurred. If the auditor determines that
appropriate action has not been taken, the auditor shall report the
determination to the governor and to the legislature and may include
this determination in the agency audit under chapter 43.09 RCW.
(((11))) (10) Once the auditor concludes that appropriate action
has been taken to resolve the matter, the auditor shall so notify the
whistleblower, the agency head, and the subject or subjects of the
investigation. If the resolution takes more than one year, the auditor
shall provide annual notification of its status to the whistleblower,
agency head, and subject or subjects of the investigation.
(((12))) (11) Failure to cooperate with such audit or
investigation, or retaliation against anyone who assists the auditor by
engaging in activity protected by this chapter shall be reported as a
separate finding with recommendations for corrective action in the
associated report whenever it occurs.
(12) This section does not limit any authority conferred upon the
attorney general or any other agency of government to investigate any
matter.

Sec. 5 RCW 42.40.070 and 1989 c 284 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
A written summary of this chapter and procedures for reporting
improper governmental actions established by the auditor's office shall
be made available by each department or agency of state government to
each employee upon entering public employment. Such notices may be in
agency internal newsletters, included with paychecks or stubs, sent via
electronic mail to all employees, or sent by other means that are
cost-effective and reach all employees of the government level,
division, or subdivision. Employees shall be notified by each
department or agency of state government each year of the procedures
and protections under this chapter.

Sec. 6 RCW 42.40.050 and 1999 c 283 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Any person who is a whistleblower, as defined in RCW
42.40.020, and who has been subjected to workplace reprisal or
retaliatory action is presumed to have established a cause of action
for the remedies provided under chapter 49.60 RCW.
(b) For the purpose of this section, "reprisal or retaliatory
action" means, but is not limited to, any of the following:
(((a))) (i) Denial of adequate staff to perform duties;
(((b))) (ii) Frequent staff changes;
(((c))) (iii) Frequent and undesirable office changes;
(((d))) (iv) Refusal to assign meaningful work;
(((e))) (v) Unwarranted and unsubstantiated letters of reprimand or
unsatisfactory performance evaluations;
(((f))) (vi) Demotion;
(((g))) (vii) Reduction in pay;
(((h))) (viii) Denial of promotion;
(((i))) (ix) Suspension;
(((j))) (x) Dismissal;
(((k))) (xi) Denial of employment;
(((l))) (xii) A supervisor or superior behaving in or encouraging
coworkers to behave in a hostile manner toward the whistleblower; ((and
(m))) (xiii) A change in the physical location of the employee's
workplace or a change in the basic nature of the employee's job, if
either are in opposition to the employee's expressed wish;
(xiv) Issuance of or attempt to enforce any nondisclosure policy or
agreement in a manner inconsistent with prior practice; or
(xv) Any other action that is inconsistent compared to actions
taken before the employee engaged in conduct protected by this chapter,
or compared to other employees who have not engaged in conduct
protected by this chapter.
(2) The agency presumed to have taken retaliatory action under
subsection (1) of this section may rebut that presumption by proving by
a preponderance of the evidence showing that there have been a series
of documented personnel problems or a single, egregious event, or that
the agency action or actions were justified by reasons unrelated to the
employee's status as a whistleblower and by showing that improper
motive was not a substantial factor.
(3) Nothing in this section prohibits an agency from making any
decision exercising its authority to terminate, suspend, or discipline
an employee who engages in workplace reprisal or retaliatory action
against a whistleblower. However, the agency also shall implement any
order under chapter 49.60 RCW (other than an order of suspension if the
agency has terminated the retaliator).

Sec. 7 RCW 49.60.230 and 1993 c 510 s 21 and 1993 c 69 s 11 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Who may file a complaint:
(a) Any person claiming to be aggrieved by an alleged unfair
practice may, personally or by his or her attorney, make, sign, and
file with the commission a complaint in writing under oath or by
declaration. The complaint shall state the name of the person alleged
to have committed the unfair practice and the particulars thereof, and
contain such other information as may be required by the commission.
(b) Whenever it has reason to believe that any person has been
engaged or is engaging in an unfair practice, the commission may issue
a complaint.
(c) Any employer or principal whose employees, or agents, or any of
them, refuse or threaten to refuse to comply with the provisions of
this chapter may file with the commission a written complaint under
oath or by declaration asking for assistance by conciliation or other
remedial action.
(2) Any complaint filed pursuant to this section must be so filed
within six months after the alleged act of discrimination except that
complaints alleging an unfair practice in a real estate transaction
pursuant to RCW 49.60.222 through 49.60.225 must be so filed within one
year after the alleged unfair practice in a real estate transaction has
occurred or terminated and a complaint alleging whistleblower
retaliation must be filed within two years.
(3) On or before the third Monday in January of each year, the
commission shall report to the governor and the legislature the number
of retaliation reports it has received in the past year, the number of
such reports that were substantiated, and the number of such cases
still under consideration as well as how long each unresolved case has
been under consideration. This information shall also be posted for
public review on the agency web site.

Sec. 8 RCW 49.60.250 and 1993 c 510 s 23 and 1993 c 69 s 14 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) In case of failure to reach an agreement for the elimination of
such unfair practice, and upon the entry of findings to that effect,
the entire file, including the complaint and any and all findings made,
shall be certified to the chairperson of the commission. The
chairperson of the commission shall thereupon request the appointment
of an administrative law judge under Title 34 RCW to hear the complaint
and shall cause to be issued and served in the name of the commission
a written notice, together with a copy of the complaint, as the same
may have been amended, requiring the respondent to answer the charges
of the complaint at a hearing before the administrative law judge, at
a time and place to be specified in such notice.
(2) The place of any such hearing may be the office of the
commission or another place designated by it. The case in support of
the complaint shall be presented at the hearing by counsel for the
commission: PROVIDED, That the complainant may retain independent
counsel and submit testimony and be fully heard. No member or employee
of the commission who previously made the investigation or caused the
notice to be issued shall participate in the hearing except as a
witness, nor shall the member or employee participate in the
deliberations of the administrative law judge in such case. Any
endeavors or negotiations for conciliation shall not be received in
evidence.
(3) The respondent shall file a written answer to the complaint and
appear at the hearing in person or otherwise, with or without counsel,
and submit testimony and be fully heard. The respondent has the right
to cross-examine the complainant.
(4) The administrative law judge conducting any hearing may permit
reasonable amendment to any complaint or answer. Testimony taken at
the hearing shall be under oath and recorded.
(5) If, upon all the evidence, the administrative law judge finds
that the respondent has engaged in any unfair practice, the
administrative law judge shall state findings of fact and shall issue
and file with the commission and cause to be served on such respondent
an order requiring such respondent to cease and desist from such unfair
practice and to take such affirmative action, including, (but not
limited to) hiring, reinstatement or upgrading of employees, with or
without back pay, an admission or restoration to full membership rights
in any respondent organization, or to take such other action as, in the
judgment of the administrative law judge, will effectuate the purposes
of this chapter, including action that could be ordered by a court,
except that damages for humiliation and mental suffering shall not
exceed ((ten)) twenty thousand dollars, and including a requirement for
report of the matter on compliance. Relief available for violations of
RCW 49.60.222 through 49.60.224 shall be limited to the relief
specified in RCW 49.60.225.
(6) If a determination is made that retaliatory action, as defined
in RCW 42.40.050, has been taken against a whistleblower, as defined in
RCW 42.40.020, the administrative law judge may, in addition to any
other remedy, require restoration of benefits, back pay, and any
increases in compensation that would have occurred, with interest;
impose a civil penalty upon the retaliator of up to ((three)) five
thousand dollars; and issue an order to the state employer to suspend
the retaliator for up to thirty days without pay. At a minimum, the
administrative law judge shall require that a letter of reprimand be
placed in the retaliator's personnel file. No agency shall issue any
nondisclosure order or policy, execute any nondisclosure agreement, or
spend any funds requiring information that is public under the public
records act, chapter 42.56 RCW, be kept confidential; except that
nothing in this section shall affect any state or federal law requiring
information be kept confidential. All penalties recovered shall be
paid into the state treasury and credited to the general fund.
(7) The final order of the administrative law judge shall include
a notice to the parties of the right to obtain judicial review of the
order by appeal in accordance with the provisions of RCW 34.05.510
through 34.05.598, and that such appeal must be served and filed within
thirty days after the service of the order on the parties.
(8) If, upon all the evidence, the administrative law judge finds
that the respondent has not engaged in any alleged unfair practice, the
administrative law judge shall state findings of fact and shall
similarly issue and file an order dismissing the complaint.
(9) An order dismissing a complaint may include an award of
reasonable attorneys' fees in favor of the respondent if the
administrative law judge concludes that the complaint was frivolous,
unreasonable, or groundless.
(10) The commission shall establish rules of practice to govern,
expedite, and effectuate the foregoing procedure.
(11) Instead of filing with the commission, a complainant may
pursue arbitration conducted by the American arbitration association or
another arbitrator mutually agreed by the parties, with the cost of
arbitration shared equally by the complainant and the respondent.

Sec. 9 RCW 42.40.910 and 1999 c 361 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
This act and chapter 361, Laws of 1999 ((does)) do not affect the
jurisdiction of the legislative ethics board, the executive ethics
board, or the commission on judicial conduct, as set forth in chapter
42.52 RCW. The senate, the house of representatives, and the supreme
court shall adopt policies regarding the applicability of chapter 42.40
RCW to the senate, house of representatives, and judicial branch.

--- END ---