BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that there exists
disagreement over the ownership of certain minerals located on land
formerly owned by the state of Washington located on Maury Island in
section 29, township 22N, range 03E, and conveyed by the state in deeds
dated in 1910 and 1923. Although the fee simple ownership of these
lands were clearly transferred into private hands, the conveyance
instruments contained a mineral reservation whereby the ownership of
the minerals located on the land remained in state ownership to be
managed for the benefit of the state land trust beneficiaries.
Although the conveyance instruments expressly reserve to the state the
ownership of all minerals of every kind, name, or description located
in or upon the land, there has been no legal determination of the title
to the sand, gravel, and rock resources located on these lands and
whether sand, gravel, and rock resources are included in this broad
mineral reservation.
(2) It is the intent of this act to fulfill the state's fiduciary
duty to the state land trust beneficiaries by preserving any interest
it may have in the mineral resources on these lands until the question
of title to such resources is determined.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 79.105 RCW
under the subchapter heading "general provisions" to read as follows:
(1) Until a judgment is entered by a Washington appellate court
that determines title to the sand, gravel, and rock resources in the
lands described in subsection (2) of this section, the department shall
not authorize any portion of the state-owned aquatic lands that
comprise the Maury Island aquatic reserve designated by commissioner
order dated November 8, 2004, for industrial uses or for transportation
of materials from a surface mine as defined under RCW 78.44.031, mining
operation, or other industrial activities, and may not authorize the
construction of docks or other improvements associated with these uses.
(2) This section applies to those parcels of land located on Maury
Island within section 29, township 22N, range 03E and originally
conveyed from state ownership by deeds recorded on or about February
18, 1910, and January 26, 1923.
(3) This section expires January 1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The joint legislative audit and review
committee shall contract with an appropriate entity to develop a report
consisting of a summary of the original grant to the state and all
subsequent conveyances, and to review and fully analyze the conveyance
documents including compliance with applicable statutory requirements
in effect at the time of each sale, verify the chain of title, and
identify any flaws in complying with applicable statutory requirements
in the use and the reservation of mineral rights, including the title
to sand and gravel, with respect to lands formerly owned by the state
of Washington located on Maury Island in section 29, township 22N,
range 03E, and conveyed by the state in deeds dated in 1910 and 1923.
The joint legislative audit and review committee shall provide a report
to the appropriate committees of the legislature by January 31, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---