BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to an auction
sale of farm machinery and equipment made by or through an auctioneer
if the auctioneer took possession of the machinery and equipment from
an eligible farmer and the farmer provided the auctioneer with an
exemption certificate under RCW 82.08.855. An auctioneer must keep
records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this
section.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section.
(a) "Agricultural products" and "eligible farmer" have the same
meanings as provided in RCW 82.08.855.
(b) "Farm machinery and equipment" means machinery and equipment
used primarily for growing, raising, or producing agricultural
products.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply to the use of farm
machinery and equipment acquired at an auction sale held or conducted
by an auctioneer if the auctioneer took possession of the machinery and
equipment from an eligible farmer and the farmer provided the
auctioneer with an exemption certificate under RCW 82.08.855.
(2) The definitions in section 1 of this act apply to this section.

--- END ---