BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Mathematics and science education are critical to the future
prosperity of the state and its citizens;
(2) The need for quality mathematics and science instruction is
significant and growing. Forty-six percent of Washington students who
enroll in community or technical colleges immediately after high school
require mathematics remediation before they can begin work toward a
degree or certificate. High school graduation requirements in
mathematics and science will be increasing;
(3) Significant vacancies exist for qualified mathematics and
science teachers in Washington's K-12 school system. Competition for
mathematics and science teachers is increasing and many who are now
teaching in these subject areas have not been appropriately certified
or received adequate preparation; and
(4) Immediate action is needed to improve mathematics and science
instruction and to help fill mathematics and science teaching
vacancies. The legislature intends to improve, unify, and accelerate
recruitment and preparation programs for mathematics and science
teachers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) By September 15, 2008, the professional
educator standards board shall submit a report with recommendations for
strengthening the state's corps of K-12 mathematics and science
teachers to the governor, the superintendent of public instruction, and
the education committees of the legislature. The report shall:
(a) Quantify demand by detailing the number of K-12 mathematics and
science teachers needed statewide and regionally by the 2010-11 school
year. This analysis shall include the number of teachers, by district,
assigned to teach mathematics and science both with and without
appropriate certification in those subjects and the number of
mathematics and science teaching vacancies needing to be filled, by
district;
(b) Specify how demand will be met by the 2010-11 school year,
including:
(i) The impact of state-funded recruitment programs such as the
pipeline for paraeducators conditional scholarship, retooling to teach
mathematics and science conditional scholarship, alternative routes
conditional scholarship, future teachers conditional scholarship, and
the recruiting Washington teachers program;
(ii) How alternative route certification programs can be
streamlined and accelerated, based on best practices in other states,
to enable mid-career professionals with mathematics and science
expertise to become certified as K-12 teachers;
(iii) Financial incentives, based on best practices in other
states, that can be used to hire, support, and retain mathematics and
science teachers in a competitive marketplace; and
(iv) The role recruitment programs contribute to a highly qualified
teaching corps of secondary mathematics and science teachers; and
(c) Specify strategies for improving retention of mathematics and
science teachers and increasing their classroom effectiveness,
including:
(i) Outlining how to improve the induction of new mathematics and
science teachers using a multiyear approach, mandatory participation by
all school districts, orientation and training sessions before the
start of the school year, highly skilled mentors, and ongoing
professional development for new teachers and mentors; and
(ii) Identifying strategies, based on best practices, to improve
the rigor and productivity of state-funded mathematics and science
teacher preparation programs.
(2) The board's analysis and recommendations shall take into
account the teacher skills necessary to meet the increased student
needs due to the increased K-12 graduation requirements from the state
board of education and the opportunities provided by the revised
mathematics and science standards and recommended curricula. In
preparing the report and recommendation, the board shall at a minimum,
consult with nationally recognized experts on teacher quality and
teacher recruitment and retention, including representatives from
nationally recognized centers, representatives of the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, educators, the business
community, classified employees, representatives of higher education,
career and technical organizations, representatives of federally
recognized Washington tribes, representatives of cultural, linguistic,
and racial minority groups, and the community of persons with
disabilities. The board shall consider the possible role of a public-private partnership in helping to meet the demand for mathematics and
science teachers and in improving the quality of instruction in these
subject areas.
(3) The professional educator standards board and the Washington
state institute for public policy shall also conduct a study of
differential pay for teachers in high-demand subject areas such as
mathematics and science. The study shall examine the design,
successes, and limitations of differential pay programs in other
states. The board and the institute shall provide a report of their
findings and recommendations to the governor, the superintendent of
public instruction, the education committees of the legislature, and
the basic education finance task force by September 1, 2008.
(4) By December 1, 2008, the board shall develop, with various
organizations and stakeholders that administer programs that include
educator recruitment, a collaborative statewide plan for educator
recruitment and submit the plan to the governor, the superintendent of
public instruction, and the education committees of the legislature.

--- END ---