BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 49.60 RCW
to read as follows:
Where an impermissible motive is an element of a claim under this
chapter, a violation is established where the complaining party
demonstrates that the impermissible motive was a substantial factor,
not that it was the only factor or the main factor, or that the
complaining party would not have been subject to the treatment absent
the impermissible motive. It is not a defense to liability or relief
that the complaining party would have been subject to the same
treatment absent the impermissible motive.

--- END ---