BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the public
interest is served when applications for new land use projects are
assessed using the laws in effect at that time, not former versions
that have been repealed or revised. Washington requires jurisdictions
to update their land use and development laws and regulations on a
regular basis. The public has an interest in ensuring that projects
proposed during the public comment and approval process for these
updates follow the new laws, not the version that has been replaced.
Local governments have an interest in ensuring that their new laws are
followed by all persons, without exemptions for those who were able to
file for a permit application during the period of time the new law was
proposed, enacted, and subject to appeal. Real estate developers have
an interest in ensuring that everyone is required to follow the same
laws, without an exemption for those who win a race to the permit
counter when a change is proposed. Further, the legislature finds that
the public has an interest in meaningfully commenting on large projects
to ensure that they fit their community.
The legislature finds that other states employ a vesting date of
the time an application is approved, rather than when it is filed.
Many states do so for all projects at all times, not just when changes
to the law are proposed.
Development in other states has been able to continue in a
reasonable fashion. A later vesting date provides reasonable certainty
for the development community while providing better protection of the
public interest and improving the ability of local governments to
comply with the legislature's land use and environmental protection
goals and mandates.
This act is intended to better protect the public interest by
setting the vesting date for many projects as the date when permits are
issued. The courts should construe this and related laws liberally to
effectuate that purpose.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70A.290 and 1997 c 429 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All requests for review to a growth management hearings board
shall be initiated by filing a petition that includes a detailed
statement of issues presented for resolution by the board. The board
shall render written decisions articulating the basis for its holdings.
The board shall not issue advisory opinions on issues not presented to
the board in the statement of issues, as modified by any prehearing
order.
(2) All petitions relating to whether or not an adopted
comprehensive plan, development regulation, or permanent amendment
thereto, is in compliance with the goals and requirements of this
chapter or chapter 90.58 or 43.21C RCW must be filed within sixty days
after publication by the legislative bodies of the county or city.
(a) Except as provided in (c) of this subsection, the date of
publication for a city shall be the date the city publishes the
ordinance, or summary of the ordinance, adopting the comprehensive plan
or development regulations, or amendment thereto, as is required to be
published.
(b) Promptly after adoption, a county shall publish a notice that
it has adopted the comprehensive plan or development regulations, or
amendment thereto.
Except as provided in (c) of this subsection, for purposes of this
section the date of publication for a county shall be the date the
county publishes the notice that it has adopted the comprehensive plan
or development regulations, or amendment thereto.
(c) For local governments planning under RCW 36.70A.040, promptly
after approval or disapproval of a local government's shoreline master
program or amendment thereto by the department of ecology as provided
in RCW 90.58.090, the local government shall publish a notice that the
shoreline master program or amendment thereto has been approved or
disapproved by the department of ecology. For purposes of this
section, the date of publication for the adoption or amendment of a
shoreline master program is the date the local government publishes
notice that the shoreline master program or amendment thereto has been
approved or disapproved by the department of ecology.
(3) Unless the board dismisses the petition as frivolous or finds
that the person filing the petition lacks standing, or the parties have
filed an agreement to have the case heard in superior court as provided
in RCW 36.70A.295, the board shall, within ten days of receipt of the
petition, set a time for hearing the matter.
(4) The board shall base its decision on the record developed by
the city, county, or the state and supplemented with additional
evidence if the board determines that such additional evidence would be
necessary or of substantial assistance to the board in reaching its
decision.
(5) The board, shall consolidate, when appropriate, all petitions
involving the review of the same comprehensive plan or the same
development regulation or regulations.
(6) Pending a board's final decision on a petition for review, or
during the sixty-day period following the publication of a
comprehensive plan, development regulation, or amendment thereto as
provided in subsection (2) of this section, whichever occurs later, the
submission of an application for a proposed division of land, building
permit, or other project approval shall not result in the vesting of
any development rights that may be affected by the comprehensive plan,
development regulation, or amendment. After a board has issued its
final decision on a petition for review or the sixty-day period has
expired, whichever occurs later, the application for the proposed
division of land, building permit, or other project approval shall be
subject to the zoning, permitting, or other land use control ordinances
in effect at that time.
(7) When an application for the proposed division of land, building
permit, or other project approval has been previously submitted by
nonprofit affordable housing organizations or housing authorities, and
documentable evidence exists that supports a finding that a later
vesting date would create an undue burden or significant cost impact
that would jeopardize the project, then the legislative review
authority may at its discretion, upon consideration of the documentable
evidence, allow nonprofit affordable housing organizations or housing
authorities to vest at the time an application for the proposed
division of land, building permit, or other project approval is
approved.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.70A.130 and 2006 c 285 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Each comprehensive land use plan and development regulations
shall be subject to continuing review and evaluation by the county or
city that adopted them. Except as otherwise provided, a county or city
shall take legislative action to review and, if needed, revise its
comprehensive land use plan and development regulations to ensure the
plan and regulations comply with the requirements of this chapter
according to the time periods specified in subsection (4) of this
section.
(b) Except as otherwise provided, a county or city not planning
under RCW 36.70A.040 shall take action to review and, if needed, revise
its policies and development regulations regarding critical areas and
natural resource lands adopted according to this chapter to ensure
these policies and regulations comply with the requirements of this
chapter according to the time periods specified in subsection (4) of
this section. Legislative action means the adoption of a resolution or
ordinance following notice and a public hearing indicating at a
minimum, a finding that a review and evaluation has occurred and
identifying the revisions made, or that a revision was not needed and
the reasons therefor.
(c) The review and evaluation required by this subsection may be
combined with the review required by subsection (3) of this section.
The review and evaluation required by this subsection shall include,
but is not limited to, consideration of critical area ordinances and,
if planning under RCW 36.70A.040, an analysis of the population
allocated to a city or county from the most recent ten-year population
forecast by the office of financial management.
(d) Any amendment of or revision to a comprehensive land use plan
shall conform to this chapter. Any amendment of or revision to
development regulations shall be consistent with and implement the
comprehensive plan.
(e) During the review and evaluation process authorized under this
subsection, an application for the proposed division of land, building
permit, or other project approval shall be subject to the zoning,
permitting, and other land use control ordinances in effect at the time
the local government takes final action on the application, including
all administrative appeals, unless eighteen months have elapsed since
the filing of a complete application, at which time the project will
vest to the laws in effect at the time the application was completed.
(2)(a) Each county and city shall establish and broadly disseminate
to the public a public participation program consistent with RCW
36.70A.035 and 36.70A.140 that identifies procedures and schedules
((whereby)) for considering amendments to comprehensive plans and
development regulations.
(b) The procedures under (a) of this subsection must provide that
updates, proposed amendments, or revisions of the comprehensive plan
are considered by the governing body of the county or city no more
frequently than once every year. "Updates" means to review and revise,
if needed, according to subsection (1) of this section, and the time
periods specified in subsection (4) of this section or in accordance
with the provisions of subsections (5) and (8) of this section.
Amendments may be considered more frequently than once per year under
the following circumstances:
(i) The initial adoption of a subarea plan that does not modify the
comprehensive plan policies and designations applicable to the subarea;
(ii) The adoption or amendment of a shoreline master program under
the procedures set forth in chapter 90.58 RCW;
(iii) The amendment of the capital facilities element of a
comprehensive plan that occurs concurrently with the adoption or
amendment of a county or city budget; and
(iv) ((Until June 30, 2006, the designation of recreational lands
under RCW 36.70A.1701. A county amending its comprehensive plan
pursuant to this subsection (2)(a)(iv) may not do so more frequently
than every eighteen months; and
(v))) The adoption of comprehensive plan amendments necessary to
enact a planned action under RCW 43.21C.031(2), provided that
amendments are considered in accordance with the public participation
program established by the county or city under this subsection (2)(a)
and all persons who have requested notice of a comprehensive plan
update are given notice of the amendments and an opportunity to
comment.
(((b))) (c) Except as otherwise provided in (a) of this subsection,
all proposals shall be considered by the governing body concurrently so
the cumulative effect of the various proposals can be ascertained.
However, after appropriate public participation a county or city may
adopt amendments or revisions to its comprehensive plan that conform
with this chapter whenever an emergency exists or to resolve an appeal
of a comprehensive plan filed with a growth management hearings board
or with the court.
(d) Land use development applications filed after the submission or
filing of a proposed comprehensive plan or development regulation
amendment shall not vest until the time the local government takes
final action on the application, including all administrative appeals,
unless eighteen months have elapsed since the filing of a complete
application, at which time the project will vest to the laws in effect
at the time the application was completed.
(3)(a) Each county that designates urban growth areas under RCW
36.70A.110 shall review, at least every ten years, its designated urban
growth area or areas, and the densities permitted within both the
incorporated and unincorporated portions of each urban growth area. In
conjunction with this review by the county, each city located within an
urban growth area shall review the densities permitted within its
boundaries, and the extent to which the urban growth occurring within
the county has located within each city and the unincorporated portions
of the urban growth areas.
(b) The county comprehensive plan designating urban growth areas,
and the densities permitted in the urban growth areas by the
comprehensive plans of the county and each city located within the
urban growth areas, shall be revised to accommodate the urban growth
projected to occur in the county for the succeeding twenty-year period.
The review required by this subsection may be combined with the review
and evaluation required by RCW 36.70A.215.
(4) The department shall establish a schedule for counties and
cities to take action to review and, if needed, revise their
comprehensive plans and development regulations to ensure the plan and
regulations comply with the requirements of this chapter. Except as
provided in subsections (5) and (8) of this section, the schedule
established by the department shall provide for the reviews and
evaluations to be completed as follows:
(a) On or before December 1, 2004, and every seven years
thereafter, for Clallam, Clark, Jefferson, King, Kitsap, Pierce,
Snohomish, Thurston, and Whatcom counties and the cities within those
counties;
(b) On or before December 1, 2005, and every seven years
thereafter, for Cowlitz, Island, Lewis, Mason, San Juan, Skagit, and
Skamania counties and the cities within those counties;
(c) On or before December 1, 2006, and every seven years
thereafter, for Benton, Chelan, Douglas, Grant, Kittitas, Spokane, and
Yakima counties and the cities within those counties; and
(d) On or before December 1, 2007, and every seven years
thereafter, for Adams, Asotin, Columbia, Ferry, Franklin, Garfield,
Grays Harbor, Klickitat, Lincoln, Okanogan, Pacific, Pend Oreille,
Stevens, Wahkiakum, Walla Walla, and Whitman counties and the cities
within those counties.
(5)(a) Nothing in this section precludes a county or city from
conducting the review and evaluation required by this section before
the time limits established in subsection (4) of this section.
Counties and cities may begin this process early and may be eligible
for grants from the department, subject to available funding, if they
elect to do so.
(b) A county that is subject to a schedule established by the
department under subsection (4)(b) through (d) of this section and
meets the following criteria may comply with the requirements of this
section at any time within the thirty-six months following the date
established in the applicable schedule: The county has a population of
less than fifty thousand and has had its population increase by no more
than seventeen percent in the ten years preceding the date established
in the applicable schedule as of that date.
(c) A city that is subject to a schedule established by the
department under subsection (4)(b) through (d) of this section and
meets the following criteria may comply with the requirements of this
section at any time within the thirty-six months following the date
established in the applicable schedule: The city has a population of
no more than five thousand and has had its population increase by the
greater of either no more than one hundred persons or no more than
seventeen percent in the ten years preceding the date established in
the applicable schedule as of that date.
(d) State agencies are encouraged to provide technical assistance
to the counties and cities in the review of critical area ordinances,
comprehensive plans, and development regulations.
(6) A county or city subject to the time periods in subsection
(4)(a) of this section that, pursuant to an ordinance adopted by the
county or city establishing a schedule for periodic review of its
comprehensive plan and development regulations, has conducted a review
and evaluation of its comprehensive plan and development regulations
and, on or after January 1, 2001, has taken action in response to that
review and evaluation shall be deemed to have conducted the first
review required by subsection (4)(a) of this section. Subsequent
review and evaluation by the county or city of its comprehensive plan
and development regulations shall be conducted in accordance with the
time periods established under subsection (4)(a) of this section.
(7) The requirements imposed on counties and cities under this
section shall be considered "requirements of this chapter" under the
terms of RCW 36.70A.040(1). Only those counties and cities: (a)
Complying with the schedules in this section; (b) demonstrating
substantial progress towards compliance with the schedules in this
section for development regulations that protect critical areas; or (c)
complying with the extension provisions of subsection (5)(b) or (c) of
this section may receive grants, loans, pledges, or financial
guarantees from those accounts established in RCW 43.155.050 and
70.146.030. A county or city that is fewer than twelve months out of
compliance with the schedules in this section for development
regulations that protect critical areas is making substantial progress
towards compliance. Only those counties and cities in compliance with
the schedules in this section may receive preference for grants or
loans subject to the provisions of RCW 43.17.250.
(8) Except as provided in subsection (5)(b) and (c) of this
section:
(a) Counties and cities required to satisfy the requirements of
this section according to the schedule established by subsection (4)(b)
through (d) of this section may comply with the requirements of this
section for development regulations that protect critical areas one
year after the dates established in subsection (4)(b) through (d) of
this section;
(b) Counties and cities complying with the requirements of this
section one year after the dates established in subsection (4)(b)
through (d) of this section for development regulations that protect
critical areas shall be deemed in compliance with the requirements of
this section; and
(c) This subsection (8) applies only to the counties and cities
specified in subsection (4)(b) through (d) of this section, and only to
the requirements of this section for development regulations that
protect critical areas that must be satisfied by December 1, 2005,
December 1, 2006, and December 1, 2007.
(9) Notwithstanding subsection (8) of this section and the
substantial progress provisions of subsections (7) and (10) of this
section, only those counties and cities complying with the schedule in
subsection (4) of this section, or the extension provisions of
subsection (5)(b) or (c) of this section, may receive preferences for
grants, loans, pledges, or financial guarantees from those accounts
established in RCW 43.155.050 and 70.146.030.
(((10) Until December 1, 2005, and notwithstanding subsection (7)
of this section, a county or city subject to the time periods in
subsection (4)(a) of this section demonstrating substantial progress
towards compliance with the schedules in this section for its
comprehensive land use plan and development regulations may receive
grants, loans, pledges, or financial guarantees from those accounts
established in RCW 43.155.050 and 70.146.030. A county or city that is
fewer than twelve months out of compliance with the schedules in this
section for its comprehensive land use plan and development regulations
is deemed to be making substantial progress towards compliance.))
(10) When an application for the proposed division of land,
building permit, or other project approval has been previously
submitted by nonprofit affordable housing organizations or housing
authorities, and documentable evidence exists that supports a finding
that a later vesting date would create an undue burden or significant
cost impact that would jeopardize the project, then the legislative
review authority may at its discretion, upon consideration of the
documentable evidence, allow nonprofit affordable housing organizations
or housing authorities to vest at the time an application for the
proposed division of land, building permit, or other project approval
is approved.

Sec. 4 RCW 58.17.033 and 1987 c 104 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) through (5) of this
section, a proposed division of land, as defined in RCW 58.17.020,
shall be considered under the subdivision or short subdivision
ordinance, and zoning or other land use control ordinances, in effect
on the land at the time a fully completed application for preliminary
plat approval of the subdivision, or short plat approval of the short
subdivision, has been submitted to the appropriate county, city, or
town official.
(2) An application for preliminary plat approval that is filed
while a petition for review is pending before a growth management
hearings board, or during the sixty-day period following the
publication of the local government's comprehensive plan, development
regulation, or amendment thereto, whichever is later, shall be subject
to the vesting provisions of the growth management act as set forth in
RCW 36.70A.290(6).
(3) A local government's decision regarding the issuance of plat
approvals for the following categories of large development projects
shall be in accordance with the pertinent ordinances governing
subdivisions and short subdivisions, zoning, other land use
regulations, and impact fees that are in effect on the date the permit
application is approved or denied:
(a) Fully contained communities established under RCW 36.70A.350;
(b) Master planned resorts established under RCW 36.70A.360;
(c) Residential development exceeding one hundred housing units of
any lot size, or ten or more units of less than ten acres in size, and
located outside of an urban growth area;
(d) Retail developments exceeding forty thousand feet of floor
area; and
(e) Any development of agricultural or forest lands of long-term
commercial significance designated under RCW 36.70A.170, except for
single residential dwellings or structures for agricultural accessory
uses developed in accordance with RCW 36.70A.177.
(4) An application for preliminary plat approval that is filed
during a local government's process of reviewing a comprehensive land
use plan and development regulations shall be subject to the vesting
provisions of the growth management act as set forth in RCW 36.70A.130
(1)(e) and (2)(d).
(5) The requirements for a fully completed application shall be
defined by local ordinance.
(((3))) (6) The limitations imposed by this section shall not
restrict conditions imposed under chapter 43.21C RCW.
(7) Beginning July 1, 2008, for a period of up to five years from
the date of filing, or once substantial construction has begun,
whichever occurs earlier, any lots in a final plat filed for record are
a valid land use, notwithstanding any change in zoning laws during the
intervening period.
(8) When an application for the proposed division of land, building
permit, or other project approval has been previously submitted by
nonprofit affordable housing organizations or housing authorities, and
documentable evidence exists that supports a finding that a later
vesting date would create an undue burden or significant cost impact
that would jeopardize the project, then the legislative review
authority may at its discretion, upon consideration of the documentable
evidence, allow nonprofit affordable housing organizations or housing
authorities to vest at the time an application for the proposed
division of land, building permit, or other project approval is
approved.

Sec. 5 RCW 19.27.095 and 1991 c 281 s 27 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) through (4) of this
section, a valid and fully complete building permit application for a
structure, that is permitted under the zoning or other land use control
ordinances in effect on the date of the application, shall be
considered under the building permit ordinance in effect at the time of
application, and the zoning or other land use control ordinances in
effect on the date of application.
(2) An application for a building permit that is filed while a
petition for review is pending before a growth management hearings
board, or during the sixty-day period following the publication of the
local government's comprehensive plan, development regulation, or
amendment thereto, whichever is later, shall be subject to the vesting
provisions of the growth management act as set forth in RCW
36.70A.290(6).
(3) An application for a building permit that is filed during a
local government's process of reviewing a comprehensive land use plan
and development regulations shall be subject to the vesting provisions
of the growth management act as set forth in RCW 36.70A.130 (1)(e) and
(2)(d).
(4) A local government's decision regarding the issuance of
building permits for the following categories of large development
projects shall be in accordance with the pertinent ordinances governing
building permits, zoning, other land use regulations, and impact fees
that are in effect on the date the permit application is approved or
denied:
(a) Fully contained communities established under RCW 36.70A.350;
(b) Master planned resorts established under RCW 36.70A.360;
(c) Residential development exceeding one hundred housing units of
any lot size, or ten or more units of less than ten acres in size, and
located outside of an urban growth area;
(d) Retail developments exceeding forty thousand square feet of
floor area; and
(e) Any development of agricultural or forest lands of long-term
commercial significance designated under RCW 36.70A.170, except for
single residential dwellings or structures for agricultural accessory
uses developed in accordance with RCW 36.70A.177.
(5) The requirements for a fully completed application shall be
defined by local ordinance but for any construction project costing
more than five thousand dollars the application shall include, at a
minimum:
(a) The legal description, or the tax parcel number assigned
pursuant to RCW 84.40.160, and the street address if available, and may
include any other identification of the construction site by the prime
contractor;
(b) The property owner's name, address, and phone number;
(c) The prime contractor's business name, address, phone number,
current state contractor registration number; and
(d) Either:
(i) The name, address, and phone number of the office of the lender
administering the interim construction financing, if any; or
(ii) The name and address of the firm that has issued a payment
bond, if any, on behalf of the prime contractor for the protection of
the owner, if the bond is for an amount not less than fifty percent of
the total amount of the construction project.
(((3))) (6) The information required on the building permit
application by subsection (((2))) (5)(a) through (d) of this section
shall be set forth on the building permit document which is issued to
the owner, and on the inspection record card which shall be posted at
the construction site.
(((4))) (7) The information required by subsection (((2))) (5) of
this section and information supplied by the applicant after the permit
is issued under subsection (((5))) (8) of this section shall be kept on
record in the office where building permits are issued and made
available to any person on request. If a copy is requested, a
reasonable charge may be made.
(((5))) (8) If any of the information required by subsection
(((2))) (5)(d) of this section is not available at the time the
application is submitted, the applicant shall so state and the
application shall be processed forthwith and the permit issued as if
the information had been supplied, and the lack of the information
shall not cause the application to be deemed incomplete for the
purposes of vesting under subsection (1) of this section. However, the
applicant shall provide the remaining information as soon as the
applicant can reasonably obtain such information.
(((6))) (9) The limitations imposed by this section shall not
restrict conditions imposed under chapter 43.21C RCW.
(10) When an application for the proposed division of land,
building permit, or other project approval has been previously
submitted by nonprofit affordable housing organizations or housing
authorities, and documentable evidence exists that supports a finding
that a later vesting date would create an undue burden or significant
cost impact that would jeopardize the project, then the legislative
review authority may at its discretion, upon consideration of the
documentable evidence, allow nonprofit affordable housing organizations
or housing authorities to vest at the time an application for the
proposed division of land, building permit, or other project approval
is approved.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
The vesting of any land use or development rights for the following
categories of large development projects shall be in accordance with
the pertinent ordinances that are in effect on the date the permit
application is approved or denied:
(1) Fully contained communities established under RCW 36.70A.350;
(2) Master planned resorts established under RCW 36.70A.360;
(3) Residential development exceeding one hundred housing units of
any lot size, or ten or more units of less than ten acres in size, and
located outside of an urban growth area;
(4) Retail developments exceeding forty thousand square feet of
floor area; and
(5) Any development of agricultural or forest lands of long-term
commercial significance designated under RCW 36.70A.170, except for
single residential dwellings or structures for agricultural accessory
uses developed in accordance with RCW 36.70A.177.
When an application for the proposed division of land, building permit,
or other project approval has been previously submitted by nonprofit
affordable housing organizations or housing authorities, and
documentable evidence exists that supports a finding that a later
vesting date would create an undue burden or significant cost impact
that would jeopardize the project, then the legislative review
authority may at its discretion, upon consideration of the documentable
evidence, allow nonprofit affordable housing organizations or housing
authorities to vest at the time an application for the proposed
division of land, building permit, or other project approval is
approved.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act shall be broadly construed to give
full effect to the objectives and purposes under section 1 of this act.

--- END ---