BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 17.15.010 and 1997 c 357 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(1) "Integrated pest management" means a coordinated decision-making and action process that uses the most appropriate pest control
science and methods ((and strategy in an environmentally and
economically sound manner to meet agency programmatic pest management
objectives. The elements of integrated pest management include:
(a) Preventing pest problems;
(b) Monitoring for the presence of pests and pest damage;
(c) Establishing the density of the pest population, that may be
set at zero, that can be tolerated or correlated with a damage level
sufficient to warrant treatment of the problem based on health, public
safety, economic, or aesthetic thresholds;
(d) Treating pest problems to reduce populations below those levels
established by damage thresholds using strategies that may include
biological, cultural, mechanical, and chemical control methods and that
must consider human health, ecological impact, feasibility, and cost-effectiveness)) to produce long-term prevention or suppression of pest
problems in a cost-effective manner with minimum impact on human
health, the environment, and nontarget organisms, in order to avoid
unacceptable damage to agency programs and property and to the health
and welfare of the citizens of the state. The elements of integrated
pest management include:
(a) Preventing pest problems through sanitation, habitat
modification, cultural techniques, and other methods;
(b) Monitoring for the presence of pests and pest damage;
(c) Establishing the density of the pest population, that may be
set at zero, that may be tolerated or correlated with a damage level
sufficient to warrant treatment of the problem based on health, public
safety, economic, or aesthetic thresholds;
(d) Treating pest problems to reduce populations below those levels
established by damage thresholds with physical, mechanical, cultural,
biological, chemical, and educational methods to keep pest organisms
numbers low enough to prevent unacceptable damage. Chemicals and all
other pest suppression methods used within the framework of integrated
pest management must be carefully evaluated for their health,
environmental, and economic consequences, and for their effectiveness
and reliability; and
(e) Evaluating the effects and efficacy of pest treatments.
(2) "Pest" means, but is not limited to, any insect, rodent,
nematode, snail, slug, weed, and any form of plant or animal life or
virus, except virus, bacteria, or other microorganisms on or in a
living person or other animal or in or on processed food or beverages
or pharmaceuticals, which is normally considered to be a pest, or which
the director of the department of agriculture may declare to be a pest.

Sec. 2 RCW 17.15.020 and 1997 c 357 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each of the following state agencies or institutions shall
implement integrated pest management practices when carrying out the
agency's or institution's duties related to pest control:
(1) The department of agriculture;
(2) The state noxious weed control board;
(3) The department of ecology;
(4) The department of health;
(5) The department of fish and wildlife;
(((5))) (6) The department of transportation;
(((6))) (7) The parks and recreation commission;
(((7))) (8) The department of natural resources;
(((8))) (9) The department of corrections;
(((9))) (10) The department of general administration; and
(((10))) (11) Each state institution of higher education, for the
institution's own building and grounds maintenance.

Sec. 3 RCW 17.15.040 and 1997 c 357 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The interagency integrated pest management coordinating
committee is created. The committee is composed of the integrated pest
management coordinator from each agency or institution listed under RCW
17.15.020 and the representatives designated under RCW 17.15.030. The
coordinator from the department of ((agriculture)) health shall serve
as chair of the committee.
(2) The interagency integrated pest management coordinating
committee shall share information among the state agencies and
institutions and facilitate interagency coordination.
(3) The interagency integrated pest management coordinating
committee shall meet at least two times a year. All meetings of the
committee must be open to the public. The committee shall give public
notice of each meeting, and make summaries of each meeting available to
the public.
(4) By November 30th of each odd-numbered year ((up to and
including November 30th, 2001)), the department of ((agriculture))
health, with the advice of the interagency integrated pest management
coordinating committee, shall prepare a report on the progress of
integrated pest management programs. The report is to be made
available through the state library and ((placed on the legislative
alert list)) the department of health's electronic web site.

--- END ---