BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that local governments
experience hardships in financing the cost of catastrophic medical
expenses of incarcerated individuals. Additionally, the legislature
finds that most of these costs are unavoidable, given mandatory minimum
penalties that local governments must comply with in housing
incarcerated individuals. It is the intent of the legislature to
provide some assistance to local jurisdictions that experience extreme
medical expenses that exceed ten thousand dollars per individual
offender per calendar year.

Sec. 2 RCW 2.70.020 and 1996 c 221 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The director, under the supervision and direction of the advisory
committee, shall:
(1) Administer all criminal appellate indigent defense services;
(2) Submit a biennial budget for all costs related to state
appellate indigent defense;
(3) Establish administrative procedures, standards, and guidelines
for the program including a cost-efficient system that provides for
recovery of costs;
(4) Recommend criteria and standards for determining and verifying
indigency. In recommending criteria for determining indigency, the
director shall compile and review the indigency standards used by other
state agencies and shall periodically submit the compilation and report
to the legislature on the appropriateness and consistency of such
standards;
(5) Collect information regarding indigency cases funded by the
state and report annually to the legislature and the supreme court;
(6) Coordinate with the supreme court and the judges of each
division of the court of appeals to determine how attorney services
should be provided;
(7) Administer a program for local jurisdiction assistance with
extraordinary medical expenses. Reimbursement shall be made to the
jurisdiction that is ultimately financially responsible for the medical
bills.
(a) To be eligible for the assistance, a city or county must submit
actual copies of its bills, protected for patient confidentiality, to
the office of public defense no later than ninety days following the
end of each calendar year. The total costs for an individual offender
during the calendar year must exceed ten thousand dollars in order for
the jurisdiction to qualify for assistance.
(b) Reimbursement rates will follow the medicaid reimbursement
rate, regardless of the rate at which the city or county was billed.
If the appropriation is not enough to provide assistance for all
applications, assistance shall be provided on a proportional basis,
linking the proportion of the aggregate requests in relation to the
proportion of the total funding available.
(c) The director may seek assistance in reviewing the extraordinary
medical expenses from the health care authority and the department of
corrections.
The office of public defense shall not provide direct
representation of clients.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.08.250 and 2007 c 522 s 950 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The money received by the state treasurer from fees, fines,
forfeitures, penalties, reimbursements or assessments by any court
organized under Title 3 or 35 RCW, or chapter 2.08 RCW, shall be
deposited in the public safety and education account which is hereby
created in the state treasury. The legislature shall appropriate the
funds in the account to promote traffic safety education, highway
safety, criminal justice training, crime victims' compensation,
judicial education, the judicial information system, civil
representation of indigent persons under RCW 2.53.030, winter
recreation parking, drug court operations, and state game programs.
Through the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2009, the legislature may
appropriate moneys from the public safety and education account for
purposes of appellate indigent defense and other operations of the
office of public defense, the criminal litigation unit of the attorney
general's office, the treatment alternatives to street crimes program,
crime victims advocacy programs, justice information network
telecommunication planning, treatment for supplemental security income
clients, sexual assault treatment, operations of the administrative
office of the courts, security in the common schools, alternative
school start-up grants, programs for disruptive students, criminal
justice data collection, Washington state patrol criminal justice
activities, drug court operations, unified family courts, local court
backlog assistance, financial assistance to local jurisdictions for
extraordinary costs incurred in the adjudication of criminal cases,
financial assistance to local jurisdictions for extraordinary costs
incurred for prisoner medical expenses, domestic violence treatment and
related services, the department of corrections' costs in implementing
chapter 196, Laws of 1999, reimbursement of local governments for costs
associated with implementing criminal and civil justice legislation,
the replacement of the department of corrections' offender-based
tracking system, secure and semi-secure crisis residential centers,
HOPE beds, the family policy council and community public health and
safety networks, the street youth program, public notification about
registered sex offenders, and narcotics or methamphetamine-related
enforcement, education, training, and drug and alcohol treatment
services.
(2)(a) The equal justice subaccount is created as a subaccount of
the public safety and education account. The money received by the
state treasurer from the increase in fees imposed by sections 9, 10,
12, 13, 14, 17, and 19, chapter 457, Laws of 2005 shall be deposited in
the equal justice subaccount and shall be appropriated only for:
(i) Criminal indigent defense assistance and enhancement at the
trial court level, including a criminal indigent defense pilot program;
(ii) Representation of parents in dependency and termination
proceedings;
(iii) Civil legal representation of indigent persons; and
(iv) Contribution to district court judges' salaries and to
eligible elected municipal court judges' salaries.
(b) For the 2005-07 fiscal biennium, an amount equal to twenty-five
percent of revenues to the equal justice subaccount, less one million
dollars, shall be appropriated from the equal justice subaccount to the
administrator for the courts for purposes of (a)(iv) of this
subsection. For the 2007-09 fiscal biennium and subsequent fiscal
biennia, an amount equal to fifty percent of revenues to the equal
justice subaccount shall be appropriated from the equal justice
subaccount to the administrator for the courts for the purposes of
(a)(iv) of this subsection.
(3) The excessive medical expenses subaccount is created as a
subaccount of the public safety and education account. An amount equal
to three million dollars shall be appropriated each biennium to the
office of public defense to provide assistance to local jurisdictions
for extraordinary costs incurred for prisoner medical expenses. Fifty
percent of the assistance will be provided to cities and fifty percent
to counties consistent with the requirements in section 1 of this act.

--- END ---