BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The department shall establish a pilot
program for the purpose of assessing the impact of inmate participation
in two-year postsecondary education degree programs within state
correctional institutions.
(2) The department shall select two state correctional institutions
as sites for the pilot program no later than November 1, 2008. In
selecting the pilot sites, priority shall be given to those state
correctional institutions that have had contracts, within the previous
two years, with an accredited community college to provide
postsecondary educational services to inmates. The department shall
consider for inclusion in the pilot program any two-year postsecondary
education degree program from an accredited community college that is
part of an associate of arts degree program or that is intended to
provide the first two years of the equivalent of a baccalaureate degree
program, provided that priority shall be given to those community
colleges that have demonstrated a history of contributing or
demonstrates a future potential for contributing nonstate resources to
the pilot program, such as volunteer staff.
(3) In selecting inmates to participate in the pilot program, the
department shall select a representative sampling of inmates with
varying risk levels and backgrounds in order to conduct a reliable and
complete recidivism reduction analysis and shall further give priority
to inmates:
(a) Whose individual reentry plan under RCW 72.09.270 includes
postsecondary education degree program participation; and
(b) Whose remaining period of incarceration will be no less than
two-years but no more than four years at the commencement of
participation in the pilot program.
(4) The pilot program established by this section shall begin
providing services by March 1, 2009, and shall extend for an additional
period of four fiscal years, beginning July 1, 2009, and ending June
30, 2012.
(5) Inmates shall not be required to pay the costs of participation
in any two-year postsecondary education degree programs, including
books, fees, tuition, or any other appropriate ancillary costs, if
costs are incurred as a result of participating in the pilot program
established under this section.
(6) The department may accept any and all donations and grants of
money, equipment, supplies, materials, and services from any third
party including, but not limited to, nonprofit entities, and may
receive, utilize, and dispose of the same to provide postsecondary
education to inmates participating in the pilot program established
under this section. Any funds collected by the department under this
subsection shall be used solely for the creation, maintenance, or
expansion of inmate educational and vocational programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The Washington state institute for
public policy shall evaluate the pilot program established under
section 1 of this act and shall make a preliminary report to the
governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1,
2015, and a final report by September 30, 2018.
(2) The evaluation of the pilot program shall include whether the
pilot program:
(a) Is cost-effective;
(b) Results in better employment and income outcomes for inmates
participating in the program;
(c) Affects maintenance of stable housing in the community; and
(d) Impacts recidivism.

Sec. 3 RCW 72.09.465 and 2007 c 483 s 403 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall, if funds are appropriated for the
specific purpose, implement postsecondary education degree programs
within state correctional institutions, including the state
correctional institution with the largest population of female inmates.
The department shall consider for inclusion in any postsecondary
education degree program, any postsecondary education degree program
from an accredited community college, college, or university that is
part of an associate of arts, baccalaureate, masters of arts, or other
graduate degree program.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section and
section 1 of this act, inmates shall be required to pay the costs for
participation in any postsecondary education degree programs
established under this ((subsection [section])) section, including
books, fees, tuition, or any other appropriate ancillary costs, by one
or more of the following means:
(a) The inmate who is participating in the postsecondary education
degree program shall, during confinement, provide the required payment
or payments to the department; or
(b) A third party shall provide the required payment or payments
directly to the department on behalf of an inmate, and such payments
shall not be subject to any of the deductions as provided in this
chapter.
(3) The department may accept any and all donations and grants of
money, equipment, supplies, materials, and services from any third
party, including but not limited to nonprofit entities, and may
receive, utilize, and dispose of same to provide postsecondary
education to inmates.
(4) Any funds collected by the department under this section ((and
RCW 72.09.450(4))) shall be used solely for the creation, maintenance,
or expansion of inmate postsecondary education degree programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Nothing in this act creates an entitlement
for an inmate to receive services or funding under the pilot program
established in this act, nor an obligation for the department to
commence or maintain programs of higher education except as otherwise
provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 and 2 of this act are each added
to chapter 72.09 RCW.

--- END ---