BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds it necessary to
clarify the original intent regarding eligible expenditures of the
sales and use tax provided in RCW 82.14.460. The legislature intended
that upon the original effective date of RCW 82.14.460, the moneys
collected under RCW 82.14.460 would be permitted to be used for the
purposes as provided in RCW 82.14.460 as clarified by section 2 of this
act.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.14.460 and 2005 c 504 s 804 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A county legislative authority may authorize, fix, and impose
a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter.
(2) The tax authorized in this section shall be in addition to any
other taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from those persons
who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon
the occurrence of any taxable event within the county. The rate of tax
shall equal one-tenth of one percent of the selling price in the case
of a sales tax, or value of the article used, in the case of a use tax.
(3) Moneys collected under this section shall be used solely for
the purpose of providing for the operation or delivery of new or
expanded chemical dependency or mental health treatment programs and
services and for the operation or delivery of new or expanded
therapeutic court programs and services. For the purposes of this
section, "programs and services" includes, but is not limited to,
treatment services, case management, and housing that are a component
of a coordinated chemical dependency or mental health treatment program
or service.
(4) Moneys collected under this section shall not be used to
supplant existing funding for these purposes, provided that nothing in
this section shall be interpreted to prohibit the use of moneys
collected under this section for the replacement of lapsed federal
funding previously provided for the operation or delivery of services
and programs as provided in this section.

--- END ---