BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 13.34.215 and 2007 c 413 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A child may petition the juvenile court to reinstate the
previously terminated parental rights of his or her parent under the
following circumstances:
(a) The child was previously found to be a dependent child under
this chapter;
(b) The child's parent's rights were terminated in a proceeding
under this chapter;
(c) The child has not achieved his or her permanency plan within
three years of a final order of termination((, or if the final order
was appealed, within three years of exhaustion of any right to appeal
the order terminating parental rights)); and
(d) ((Absent good cause,)) The child must be at least twelve years
old at the time the petition is filed. Upon the child's motion for
good cause shown, or on its own motion, the court may hear a petition
filed by a child younger than twelve years old.
(2) A child seeking to petition under this section shall be
provided counsel at no cost to the child.
(3) The petition must be signed by the child in the absence of a
showing of good cause as to why the child could not do so.
(4) If, after a threshold hearing to consider the parent's apparent
fitness and interest in reinstatement of parental rights, ((it
appears)) the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the
best interests of the child may be served by reinstatement of parental
rights, the juvenile court shall order that a hearing on the merits of
the petition be held.
(5) The court shall give prior notice for any proceeding under this
section, or cause prior notice to be given, to the department, the
child's attorney, and the child. The court shall also order the
department to give prior notice of any hearing to the child's former
parent whose parental rights are the subject of the petition, any
parent whose rights have not been terminated, the child's current
foster parent, relative caregiver, guardian or custodian, and the
child's tribe, if applicable.
(6) The juvenile court shall conditionally grant the petition if it
finds by clear and convincing evidence that the child has not achieved
his or her permanency plan and is not likely to imminently achieve his
or her permanency plan and that reinstatement of parental rights is in
the child's best interest. In determining whether reinstatement is in
the child's best interest the court shall consider, but is not limited
to, the following:
(a) Whether the parent whose rights are to be reinstated is a fit
parent and has remedied his or her deficits as provided in the record
of the prior termination proceedings and prior termination order;
(b) The age and maturity of the child, and the ability of the child
to express his or her preference;
(c) Whether the reinstatement of parental rights will present a
risk to the child's health, welfare, or safety; and
(d) Other material changes in circumstances, if any, that may have
occurred which warrant the granting of the petition.
(7) In determining whether the child has or has not achieved his or
her permanency plan or whether the child is likely to achieve his or
her permanency plan, the department shall provide the court, and the
court shall review, information related to any efforts to achieve the
permanency plan including efforts to achieve adoption or a permanent
guardianship.
(8)(a) If the court conditionally grants the petition under
subsection (6) of this section, the case will be continued for six
months and a temporary order of reinstatement entered. During this
period, the child shall be placed in the custody of the parent. The
department shall develop a permanency plan for the child reflecting the
plan to be reunification and shall provide transition services to the
family as appropriate.
(b) If the child must be removed from the parent due to abuse or
neglect allegations prior to the expiration of the conditional six-month period, the court shall dismiss the petition for reinstatement of
parental rights if the court finds the allegations have been proven by
a preponderance of the evidence.
(c) If the child has been successfully placed with the parent for
six months, the court order reinstating parental rights remains in
effect and the court shall dismiss the dependency.
(9) After the child has been placed with the parent for six months,
the court shall hold a hearing. If the placement with the parent has
been successful, the court shall enter a final order of reinstatement
of parental rights, which shall restore all rights, powers, privileges,
immunities, duties, and obligations of the parent as to the child,
including those relating to custody, control, and support of the child.
The court shall dismiss the dependency and direct the clerk's office to
provide a certified copy of the final order of reinstatement of
parental rights to the parent at no cost.
(10) The granting of the petition under this section does not
vacate or otherwise affect the validity of the original termination
order.
(((10))) (11) Any parent whose rights are reinstated under this
section shall not be liable for any child support owed to the
department pursuant to RCW 13.34.160 or Title 26 RCW for the time
period from the date of termination of parental rights to the date
parental rights are reinstated.
(((11))) (12) A proceeding to reinstate parental rights is a
separate action from the termination of parental rights proceeding and
does not vacate the original termination of parental rights. An order
granted under this section reinstates the parental rights to the child.
This reinstatement is a recognition that the situation of the parent
and child have changed since the time of the termination of parental
rights and reunification is now appropriate.
(((12))) (13) This section is retroactive and applies to any child
who is under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court at the time of the
hearing regardless of the date parental rights were terminated.
(14) The state, the department, and its employees are not liable
for civil damages resulting from any act or omission in the provision
of services under this section, unless the act or omission constitutes
gross negligence. This section does not create any duty and shall not
be construed to create a duty where none exists. This section does not
create a cause of action against the state, the department, or its
employees concerning the original termination.

Sec. 2 RCW 13.34.065 and 2007 c 413 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) When a child is taken into custody, the court shall hold a
shelter care hearing within seventy-two hours, excluding Saturdays,
Sundays, and holidays. The primary purpose of the shelter care hearing
is to determine whether the child can be immediately and safely
returned home while the adjudication of the dependency is pending.
(b) Any parent, guardian, or legal custodian who for good cause is
unable to attend the shelter care hearing may request that a subsequent
shelter care hearing be scheduled. The request shall be made to the
clerk of the court where the petition is filed prior to the initial
shelter care hearing. Upon the request of the parent, the court shall
schedule the hearing within seventy-two hours of the request, excluding
Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays. The clerk shall notify all other
parties of the hearing by any reasonable means.
(2)(a) The department of social and health services shall submit a
recommendation to the court as to the further need for shelter care in
all cases in which it is the petitioner. In all other cases, the
recommendation shall be submitted by the juvenile court probation
counselor.
(b) All parties have the right to present testimony to the court
regarding the need or lack of need for shelter care.
(c) Hearsay evidence before the court regarding the need or lack of
need for shelter care must be supported by sworn testimony, affidavit,
or declaration of the person offering such evidence.
(3)(a) At the commencement of the hearing, the court shall notify
the parent, guardian, or custodian of the following:
(i) The parent, guardian, or custodian has the right to a shelter
care hearing;
(ii) The nature of the shelter care hearing, the rights of the
parents, and the proceedings that will follow; and
(iii) If the parent, guardian, or custodian is not represented by
counsel, the right to be represented. If the parent, guardian, or
custodian is indigent, the court shall appoint counsel as provided in
RCW 13.34.090; and
(b) If a parent, guardian, or legal custodian desires to waive the
shelter care hearing, the court shall determine, on the record and with
the parties present, whether such waiver is knowing and voluntary. A
parent may not waive his or her right to the shelter care hearing
unless he or she appears in court and the court determines that the
waiver is knowing and voluntary. Regardless of whether the court
accepts the parental waiver of the shelter care hearing, the court must
provide notice to the parents of their rights required under (a) of
this subsection and make the finding required under subsection (4) of
this section.
(4) At the shelter care hearing the court shall examine the need
for shelter care and inquire into the status of the case. The
paramount consideration for the court shall be the health, welfare, and
safety of the child. At a minimum, the court shall inquire into the
following:
(a) Whether the notice required under RCW 13.34.062 was given to
all known parents, guardians, or legal custodians of the child. The
court shall make an express finding as to whether the notice required
under RCW 13.34.062 was given to the parent, guardian, or legal
custodian. If actual notice was not given to the parent, guardian, or
legal custodian and the whereabouts of such person is known or can be
ascertained, the court shall order the supervising agency or the
department of social and health services to make reasonable efforts to
advise the parent, guardian, or legal custodian of the status of the
case, including the date and time of any subsequent hearings, and their
rights under RCW 13.34.090;
(b) Whether the child can be safely returned home while the
adjudication of the dependency is pending;
(c) What efforts have been made to place the child with a relative;
(d) What services were provided to the family to prevent or
eliminate the need for removal of the child from the child's home;
(e) Is the placement proposed by the agency the least disruptive
and most family-like setting that meets the needs of the child;
(f) Whether it is in the best interest of the child to remain
enrolled in the school, developmental program, or child care the child
was in prior to placement and what efforts have been made to maintain
the child in the school, program, or child care if it would be in the
best interest of the child to remain in the same school, program, or
child care;
(g) Appointment of a guardian ad litem or attorney;
(h) Whether the child is or may be an Indian child as defined in 25
U.S.C. Sec. 1903, whether the provisions of the Indian child welfare
act apply, and whether there is compliance with the Indian child
welfare act, including notice to the child's tribe;
(i) Whether, as provided in RCW 26.44.063, restraining orders, or
orders expelling an allegedly abusive ((parent)) household member from
the home of a nonabusive parent, guardian, or legal custodian, will
allow the child to safely remain in the home;
(j) Whether any orders for examinations, evaluations, or immediate
services are needed. ((However,)) The court may not order a parent to
undergo examinations, evaluation, or services at the shelter care
hearing unless the parent agrees to the examination, evaluation, or
service;
(k) The terms and conditions for parental, sibling, and family
visitation.
(5)(a) The court shall release a child alleged to be dependent to
the care, custody, and control of the child's parent, guardian, or
legal custodian unless the court finds there is reasonable cause to
believe that:
(i) After consideration of the specific services that have been
provided, reasonable efforts have been made to prevent or eliminate the
need for removal of the child from the child's home and to make it
possible for the child to return home; and
(ii)(A) The child has no parent, guardian, or legal custodian to
provide supervision and care for such child; or
(B) The release of such child would present a serious threat of
substantial harm to such child, notwithstanding an order entered
pursuant to RCW 26.44.063; or
(C) The parent, guardian, or custodian to whom the child could be
released has been charged with violating RCW 9A.40.060 or 9A.40.070.
(b) If the court does not release the child to his or her parent,
guardian, or legal custodian, and the child was initially placed with
a relative pursuant to RCW 13.34.060(1), the court shall order
continued placement with a relative, unless there is reasonable cause
to believe the health, safety, or welfare of the child would be
jeopardized or that the efforts to reunite the parent and child will be
hindered. The relative must be willing and available to:
(i) Care for the child and be able to meet any special needs of the
child;
(ii) Facilitate the child's visitation with siblings, if such
visitation is part of the supervising agency's plan or is ordered by
the court; and
(iii) Cooperate with the department in providing necessary
background checks and home studies.
(c) If the child was not initially placed with a relative, and the
court does not release the child to his or her parent, guardian, or
legal custodian, the supervising agency shall make reasonable efforts
to locate a relative pursuant to RCW 13.34.060(1).
(d) If a relative is not available, the court shall order continued
shelter care or order placement with another suitable person, and the
court shall set forth its reasons for the order. If the court orders
placement of the child with a person not related to the child and not
licensed to provide foster care, the placement is subject to all terms
and conditions of this section that apply to relative placements.
(e) Any placement with a relative, or other person approved by the
court pursuant to this section, shall be contingent upon cooperation
with the agency case plan and compliance with court orders related to
the care and supervision of the child including, but not limited to,
court orders regarding parent-child contacts, sibling contacts, and any
other conditions imposed by the court. Noncompliance with the case
plan or court order is grounds for removal of the child from the home
of the relative or other person, subject to review by the court.
(f) Uncertainty by a parent, guardian, legal custodian, relative,
or other suitable person that the alleged abuser has in fact abused the
child shall not, alone, be the basis upon which a child is removed from
the care of a parent, guardian, or legal custodian under (a) of this
subsection, nor shall it be a basis, alone, to preclude placement with
a relative under (b) of this subsection or with another suitable person
under (d) of this subsection.
(6)(a) A shelter care order issued pursuant to this section shall
include the requirement for a case conference as provided in RCW
13.34.067. However, if the parent is not present at the shelter care
hearing, or does not agree to the case conference, the court shall not
include the requirement for the case conference in the shelter care
order.
(b) If the court orders a case conference, the shelter care order
shall include notice to all parties and establish the date, time, and
location of the case conference which shall be no later than thirty
days before the fact-finding hearing.
(c) The court may order another conference, case staffing, or
hearing as an alternative to the case conference required under RCW
13.34.067 so long as the conference, case staffing, or hearing ordered
by the court meets all requirements under RCW 13.34.067, including the
requirement of a written agreement specifying the services to be
provided to the parent.
(7)(a) A shelter care order issued pursuant to this section may be
amended at any time with notice and hearing thereon. The shelter care
decision of placement shall be modified only upon a showing of change
in circumstances. No child may be placed in shelter care for longer
than thirty days without an order, signed by the judge, authorizing
continued shelter care.
(b)(i) An order releasing the child on any conditions specified in
this section may at any time be amended, with notice and hearing
thereon, so as to return the child to shelter care for failure of the
parties to conform to the conditions originally imposed.
(ii) The court shall consider whether nonconformance with any
conditions resulted from circumstances beyond the control of the
parent, guardian, or legal custodian and give weight to that fact
before ordering return of the child to shelter care.
(8)(a) If a child is returned home from shelter care a second time
in the case, or if the supervisor of the caseworker deems it necessary,
the multidisciplinary team may be reconvened.
(b) If a child is returned home from shelter care a second time in
the case a law enforcement officer must be present and file a report to
the department.

Sec. 3 RCW 13.34.136 and 2007 c 413 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever a child is ordered removed from the home, a permanency
plan shall be developed no later than sixty days from the time the
supervising agency assumes responsibility for providing services,
including placing the child, or at the time of a hearing under RCW
13.34.130, whichever occurs first. The permanency planning process
continues until a permanency planning goal is achieved or dependency is
dismissed. The planning process shall include reasonable efforts to
return the child to the parent's home.
(2) The agency supervising the dependency shall submit a written
permanency plan to all parties and the court not less than fourteen
days prior to the scheduled hearing. Responsive reports of parties not
in agreement with the supervising agency's proposed permanency plan
must be provided to the supervising agency, all other parties, and the
court at least seven days prior to the hearing.
The permanency plan shall include:
(a) A permanency plan of care that shall identify one of the
following outcomes as a primary goal and may identify additional
outcomes as alternative goals: Return of the child to the home of the
child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian; adoption; guardianship;
permanent legal custody; long-term relative or foster care, until the
child is age eighteen, with a written agreement between the parties and
the care provider; successful completion of a responsible living skills
program; or independent living, if appropriate and if the child is age
sixteen or older. The department shall not discharge a child to an
independent living situation before the child is eighteen years of age
unless the child becomes emancipated pursuant to chapter 13.64 RCW;
(b) Unless the court has ordered, pursuant to RCW 13.34.130(((4)))
(5), that a termination petition be filed, a specific plan as to where
the child will be placed, what steps will be taken to return the child
home, what steps the agency will take to promote existing appropriate
sibling relationships and/or facilitate placement together or contact
in accordance with the best interests of each child, and what actions
the agency will take to maintain parent-child ties. All aspects of the
plan shall include the goal of achieving permanence for the child.
(i) The agency plan shall specify what services the parents will be
offered to enable them to resume custody, what requirements the parents
must meet to resume custody, and a time limit for each service plan and
parental requirement.
(ii) Visitation is the right of the family, including the child and
the parent, in cases in which visitation is in the best interest of the
child. Early, consistent, and frequent visitation is crucial for
maintaining parent-child relationships and making it possible for
parents and children to safely reunify. The agency shall encourage the
maximum parent and child and sibling contact possible, when it is in
the best interest of the child, including regular visitation and
participation by the parents in the care of the child while the child
is in placement. Visitation shall not be limited as a sanction for a
parent's failure to comply with court orders or services where the
health, safety, or welfare of the child is not at risk as a result of
the visitation. Visitation may be limited or denied only if the court
determines that such limitation or denial is necessary to protect the
child's health, safety, or welfare. The court and the agency should
rely upon community resources, relatives, foster parents, and other
appropriate persons to provide transportation and supervision for
visitation to the extent that such resources are available, and
appropriate, and the child's safety would not be compromised.
(iii) A child shall be placed as close to the child's home as
possible, preferably in the child's own neighborhood, unless the court
finds that placement at a greater distance is necessary to promote the
child's or parents' well-being.
(iv) The plan shall state whether both in-state and, where
appropriate, out-of-state placement options have been considered by the
department.
(v) Unless it is not in the best interests of the child, whenever
practical, the plan should ensure the child remains enrolled in the
school the child was attending at the time the child entered foster
care.
(vi) The agency charged with supervising a child in placement shall
provide all reasonable services that are available within the agency,
or within the community, or those services which the department has
existing contracts to purchase. It shall report to the court if it is
unable to provide such services; and
(c) If the court has ordered, pursuant to RCW 13.34.130(((4))) (5),
that a termination petition be filed, a specific plan as to where the
child will be placed, what steps will be taken to achieve permanency
for the child, services to be offered or provided to the child, and, if
visitation would be in the best interests of the child, a
recommendation to the court regarding visitation between parent and
child pending a fact-finding hearing on the termination petition. The
agency shall not be required to develop a plan of services for the
parents or provide services to the parents if the court orders a
termination petition be filed. However, reasonable efforts to ensure
visitation and contact between siblings shall be made unless there is
reasonable cause to believe the best interests of the child or siblings
would be jeopardized.
(3) Permanency planning goals should be achieved at the earliest
possible date, preferably before the child has been in out-of-home care
for fifteen months. In cases where parental rights have been
terminated, the child is legally free for adoption, and adoption has
been identified as the primary permanency planning goal, it shall be a
goal to complete the adoption within six months following entry of the
termination order.
(4) If the court determines that the continuation of reasonable
efforts to prevent or eliminate the need to remove the child from his
or her home or to safely return the child home should not be part of
the permanency plan of care for the child, reasonable efforts shall be
made to place the child in a timely manner and to complete whatever
steps are necessary to finalize the permanent placement of the child.
(5) The identified outcomes and goals of the permanency plan may
change over time based upon the circumstances of the particular case.
(6) The court shall consider the child's relationships with the
child's siblings in accordance with RCW 13.34.130(3).
(7) For purposes related to permanency planning:
(a) "Guardianship" means a dependency guardianship or a legal
guardianship pursuant to chapter 11.88 RCW or equivalent laws of
another state or a federally recognized Indian tribe.
(b) "Permanent custody order" means a custody order entered
pursuant to chapter 26.10 RCW.
(c) "Permanent legal custody" means legal custody pursuant to
chapter 26.10 RCW or equivalent laws of another state or a federally
recognized Indian tribe.

Sec. 4 RCW 26.44.063 and 2000 c 119 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the legislature to minimize trauma to a
child involved in an allegation of sexual or physical abuse. The
legislature declares that removing the child from the home or the care
of a parent, guardian, or legal custodian often has the effect of
further traumatizing the child. It is, therefore, the legislature's
intent that the alleged ((offender)) abuser, rather than the child,
shall be removed or restrained from the ((home)) child's residence and
that this should be done at the earliest possible point of intervention
in accordance with RCW 10.31.100, ((13.34.130)) chapter 13.34 RCW, this
section, and RCW 26.44.130.
(2) In any judicial proceeding in which it is alleged that a child
has been subjected to sexual or physical abuse, if the court finds
reasonable grounds to believe that an incident of sexual or physical
abuse has occurred, the court may, on its own motion, or the motion of
the guardian ad litem or other parties, issue a temporary restraining
order or preliminary injunction restraining or enjoining the person
accused of committing the abuse from:
(a) Molesting or disturbing the peace of the alleged victim;
(b) Entering the family home of the alleged victim except as
specifically authorized by the court;
(c) Having any contact with the alleged victim, except as
specifically authorized by the court;
(d) Knowingly coming within, or knowingly remaining within, a
specified distance of a specified location.
(3) If the caretaker is willing, and does comply with the
restraining order entered pursuant to this section, uncertainty that
the alleged abuser has in fact abused the alleged victim shall not,
alone, be a basis to remove the alleged victim from the caretaker, nor
shall it be considered neglect.
(4) In issuing a temporary restraining order or preliminary
injunction, the court may impose any additional restrictions that the
court in its discretion determines are necessary to protect the child
from further abuse or emotional trauma pending final resolution of the
abuse allegations.
(((4))) (5) The court shall issue a temporary restraining order
prohibiting a person from entering the family home if the court finds
that the order would eliminate the need for an out-of-home placement to
protect the child's right to nurturance, health, and safety and is
sufficient to protect the child from further sexual or physical abuse
or coercion.
(((5))) (6) The court may issue a temporary restraining order
without requiring notice to the party to be restrained or other parties
only if it finds on the basis of the moving affidavit or other evidence
that irreparable injury could result if an order is not issued until
the time for responding has elapsed.
(((6))) (7) A temporary restraining order or preliminary
injunction:
(a) Does not prejudice the rights of a party or any child which are
to be adjudicated at subsequent hearings in the proceeding; and
(b) May be revoked or modified.
(((7))) (8) The person having physical custody of the child shall
have an affirmative duty to assist in the enforcement of the
restraining order including but not limited to a duty to notify the
court as soon as practicable of any violation of the order, a duty to
request the assistance of law enforcement officers to enforce the
order, and a duty to notify the department of social and health
services of any violation of the order as soon as practicable if the
department is a party to the action. Failure by the custodial party to
discharge these affirmative duties shall be subject to contempt
proceedings.
(((8))) (9) Willful violation of a court order entered under this
section is a misdemeanor. A written order shall contain the court's
directive and shall bear the legend: "Violation of this order with
actual notice of its terms is a criminal offense under chapter 26.44
RCW, is also subject to contempt proceedings, and will subject a
violator to arrest."
(((9))) (10) If a restraining order issued under this section is
modified or terminated, the clerk of the court shall notify the law
enforcement agency specified in the order on or before the next
judicial day. Upon receipt of notice that an order has been
terminated, the law enforcement agency shall remove the order from any
computer-based criminal intelligence system.

Sec. 5 RCW 74.13.031 and 2007 c 413 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall have the duty to provide child welfare
services and shall:
(1) Develop, administer, supervise, and monitor a coordinated and
comprehensive plan that establishes, aids, and strengthens services for
the protection and care of runaway, dependent, or neglected children.
(2) Within available resources, recruit an adequate number of
prospective adoptive and foster homes, both regular and specialized,
i.e. homes for children of ethnic minority, including Indian homes for
Indian children, sibling groups, handicapped and emotionally disturbed,
teens, pregnant and parenting teens, and annually report to the
governor and the legislature concerning the department's success in:
(a) Meeting the need for adoptive and foster home placements; (b)
reducing the foster parent turnover rate; (c) completing home studies
for legally free children; and (d) implementing and operating the
passport program required by RCW 74.13.285. The report shall include
a section entitled "Foster Home Turn-Over, Causes and Recommendations."
(3) Investigate complaints of any recent act or failure to act on
the part of a parent or caretaker that results in death, serious
physical or emotional harm, or sexual abuse or exploitation, or that
presents an imminent risk of serious harm, and on the basis of the
findings of such investigation, offer child welfare services in
relation to the problem to such parents, legal custodians, or persons
serving in loco parentis, and/or bring the situation to the attention
of an appropriate court, or another community agency((: PROVIDED,
That)). An investigation is not required of nonaccidental injuries
which are clearly not the result of a lack of care or supervision by
the child's parents, legal custodians, or persons serving in loco
parentis. If the investigation reveals that a crime against a child
may have been committed, the department shall notify the appropriate
law enforcement agency.
(4) Offer, on a voluntary basis, family reconciliation services to
families who are in conflict.
(5)(a) Monitor out-of-home placements((, on a timely and routine
basis,)) and conduct face-to-face meetings with children in out-of-home
care and their caregivers on a monthly basis to assure the safety,
well-being, and quality of care being provided is within the scope of
the intent of the legislature as defined in RCW 74.13.010 and
74.15.010((, and annually submit a report measuring the extent to which
the department achieved the specified goals to the governor and the
legislature)).
(b) Within existing funds for this purpose, when a child's case is
being managed under a contract between the department and a private
agency that has been accredited by a national child welfare accrediting
entity, the private agency shall conduct the monthly face-to-face
meetings with the child and the child's caregiver. The agency shall
provide the department with a written report of the meeting within
fifteen days of the meeting. In these cases, the department need only
have a face-to-face meeting with the child and the child's caretaker on
a quarterly basis.
(6) Have authority to accept custody of children from parents and
to accept custody of children from juvenile courts, where authorized to
do so under law, to provide child welfare services including placement
for adoption, to provide for the routine and necessary medical, dental,
and mental health care, or necessary emergency care of the children,
and to provide for the physical care of such children and make payment
of maintenance costs if needed. Except where required by Public Law
95-608 (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1915), no private adoption agency which receives
children for adoption from the department shall discriminate on the
basis of race, creed, or color when considering applications in their
placement for adoption.
(7) Have authority to provide temporary shelter to children who
have run away from home and who are admitted to crisis residential
centers.
(8) Have authority to purchase care for children; and shall follow
in general the policy of using properly approved private agency
services for the actual care and supervision of such children insofar
as they are available, paying for care of such children as are accepted
by the department as eligible for support at reasonable rates
established by the department.
(9) Establish a children's services advisory committee which shall
assist the secretary in the development of a partnership plan for
utilizing resources of the public and private sectors, and advise on
all matters pertaining to child welfare, licensing of child care
agencies, adoption, and services related thereto. At least one member
shall represent the adoption community.
(10)(a) Have authority to provide continued foster care or group
care as needed to participate in or complete a high school or
vocational school program.
(b)(i) Beginning in 2006, the department has the authority to allow
up to fifty youth reaching age eighteen to continue in foster care or
group care as needed to participate in or complete a posthigh school
academic or vocational program, and to receive necessary support and
transition services.
(ii) In 2007 and 2008, the department has the authority to allow up
to fifty additional youth per year reaching age eighteen to remain in
foster care or group care as provided in (b)(i) of this subsection.
(iii) A youth who remains eligible for such placement and services
pursuant to department rules may continue in foster care or group care
until the youth reaches his or her twenty-first birthday. Eligibility
requirements shall include active enrollment in a posthigh school
academic or vocational program and maintenance of a 2.0 grade point
average.
(11) Refer cases to the division of child support whenever state or
federal funds are expended for the care and maintenance of a child,
including a child with a developmental disability who is placed as a
result of an action under chapter 13.34 RCW, unless the department
finds that there is good cause not to pursue collection of child
support against the parent or parents of the child. Cases involving
individuals age eighteen through twenty shall not be referred to the
division of child support unless required by federal law.
(12) Have authority within funds appropriated for foster care
services to purchase care for Indian children who are in the custody of
a federally recognized Indian tribe or tribally licensed child-placing
agency pursuant to parental consent, tribal court order, or state
juvenile court order; and the purchase of such care shall be subject to
the same eligibility standards and rates of support applicable to other
children for whom the department purchases care.
Notwithstanding any other provision of RCW 13.32A.170 through
13.32A.200 and 74.13.032 through 74.13.036, or of this section all
services to be provided by the department of social and health services
under subsections (4), (6), and (7) of this section, subject to the
limitations of these subsections, may be provided by any program
offering such services funded pursuant to Titles II and III of the
federal juvenile justice and delinquency prevention act of 1974.
(13) Within amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, provide
preventive services to families with children that prevent or shorten
the duration of an out-of-home placement.
(14) Have authority to provide independent living services to
youths, including individuals who have attained eighteen years of age,
and have not attained twenty-one years of age who are or have been in
foster care.
(15) Consult at least quarterly with foster parents, including
members of the foster parent association of Washington state, for the
purpose of receiving information and comment regarding how the
department is performing the duties and meeting the obligations
specified in this section and RCW 74.13.250 and 74.13.320 regarding the
recruitment of foster homes, reducing foster parent turnover rates,
providing effective training for foster parents, and administering a
coordinated and comprehensive plan that strengthens services for the
protection of children. Consultation shall occur at the regional and
statewide levels.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 74.15 RCW
to read as follows:
To be eligible for placement in a HOPE center, a minor must be
either a street youth, as that term is defined in this chapter, or a
youth who, without placement in a HOPE center, will continue to
participate in increasingly risky behavior. Youth may also self-refer
to a HOPE center. Payment for a HOPE center bed is not contingent upon
prior approval by the department.

Sec. 7 RCW 74.15.240 and 1999 c 267 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
To be eligible for placement in a responsible living skills
program, the minor must be dependent under chapter 13.34 RCW and must
have lived in a HOPE center or in a secure crisis residential center.
However, if the minor's caseworker determines that placement in a
responsible living skills program would be the most appropriate
placement given the minor's current circumstances, prior residence in
a HOPE center or secure crisis residential center before placement in
a responsible living program is not required. Responsible living
skills centers are intended as a placement alternative for dependent
youth that the department chooses for the youth because no other
services or alternative placements have been successful. Responsible
living skills centers are not for dependent youth whose permanency plan
includes return to home or family reunification.

--- END ---