BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The deficit reduction act of 2005 gives
states the option, through a state plan amendment process, to provide
alternative benefits packages to medicaid beneficiaries as a means of
controlling taxpayer funded health care costs and improving quality of
care. The legislature finds that the state must do more to control
health care costs to ensure a sustainable public health care system.
The options available to the state will enable the state to leverage
employer-sponsored coverage of medicaid benefits and change our
medicaid benefit package to mirror certain commercial insurance
packages through the use of benchmark plans. Our state medicaid
package does not do enough to contain cost controls and lead to high
quality care. The goal for Washington must be to reduce the cost of
health care, expand the use of affordable private coverage, promote
personal responsibility for health, and improve quality and
coordination of care. Washington has not yet taken advantage of this
option to any real extent. The centers for medicare and medicaid would
look favorably on future Washington waivers and programs if our state
made greater efforts to control health care costs in both our medicaid
and our state children's health insurance program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The department of social and health services
shall submit a medicaid state plan amendment by July 1, 2008, as
authorized under the deficit reduction act of 2005, P.L. number 109-171.
(1) The state plan amendment shall require that all healthy adults
and children who are currently enrolled in medicaid be enrolled in one
or more commercially available plans or a health savings account with
a high deductible health plan that meets all coverage requirements of
the federal law with regard to alternative benefits packages.
(a) The state shall use medicaid funds and state funds to pay the
deductible and fund the health savings accounts.
(b) Appropriate and engaging education on how to use insurance and
health savings accounts and the rights and responsibilities of the
enrollee shall be available. This education and training must be
available on the internet, as well as in other forms.
(2) The state plan amendment shall require that all children
enrolled in and funded through the state children's health insurance
plan be offered a health savings account with a high deductible health
plan that meets all coverage requirements of the federal law with
regard to alternative benefits packages. Appropriate and engaging
education on how to use health savings accounts and the rights and
responsibilities of the enrollee shall be available. This education
and training must be available on the internet, as well as in other
forms.
(3) The state plan amendment shall provide for the voluntary
enrollment of children and youth in foster care in one or more
commercially available plans or a health savings account with a high
deductible health plan that meets all coverage requirements of the
federal law with regard to alternative benefits packages.
(a) The state shall use medicaid funds and state funds to pay the
deductible and fund the health savings accounts while the child is in
foster care and eligible for medicaid.
(b) Appropriate and engaging education on how to use insurance and
health savings accounts, the portability of benefits of health savings
accounts, and the rights and responsibilities of the enrollee shall be
available. This education and training must be available on the
internet, as well as in other forms.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The department of social and health services
shall submit necessary changes in state law to the governor and the
appropriate committees of the legislature to implement the new benefits
packages specifically related to eligibility, benefits, services or
delivery systems, and other areas as needed.

--- END ---