BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of an eligible county may impose a
sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The
tax is in addition to other taxes authorized by law and must be
collected from those persons who are taxable by the state under
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event
within the county. The rate of tax may not exceed 0.09 percent of the
selling price in the case of a sales tax or value of the article used
in the case of a use tax.
(2) The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section must be
deducted from the amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or
paid over to the department of revenue under chapter 82.08 or 82.12
RCW. The department of revenue must perform the collection of such
taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the county.
(3)(a) Distributions of the tax imposed under the authority of this
section may not exceed five million dollars in any county in any
calendar year. Any revenue generated by the tax in excess of five
million dollars belongs to the state.
(b) If the limit in (a) of this subsection is met in any calendar
year, the department will resume distributions in January of the
following calendar year.
(4)(a) Moneys collected under this section must only be used to
finance public facilities that support traded services and serve
economic development purposes in eligible counties. The public
facility must be listed as an item in the officially adopted county
overall economic development plan, or the economic development section
of the county's comprehensive plan, or the comprehensive plan of a city
or town located within the county for those counties planning under RCW
36.70A.040. For those counties that do not have an adopted overall
economic development plan and do not plan under the growth management
act, the public facility must be listed in the county's capital
facilities plan or the capital facilities plan of a city or town
located within the county.
(b) In implementing this section, the county must engage in a
process that provides the opportunity for the legislative authority of
the county and each city in the county in which a prospective project
is located, a port, and representatives of the local associate
development organization to review and approve project selection.
Selected projects must meet the requirements of (a) of this subsection.
Each county collecting money under this section must report, as
follows, to the office of the state auditor, within one hundred fifty
days after the close of each fiscal year: (i) A list of new projects
begun during the fiscal year, showing that the county has used the
funds for those projects consistent with the requirements of (a) of
this subsection; and (ii) expenditures during the fiscal year on
projects begun in a previous year. Justice system facilities may not
be funded with money collected under this section.
(c) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(i) "Public facilities" means bridges, roads, domestic and
industrial water facilities, sanitary sewer facilities, earth
stabilization, storm sewer facilities, railroad, electricity, natural
gas, buildings, structures, telecommunications infrastructure,
transportation infrastructure, or commercial infrastructure, and port
facilities in the state of Washington.
(ii) "Economic development purposes" means those purposes which
facilitate the creation or retention of businesses and jobs in a
county.
(iii) "Traded services" means those businesses, sectors, or
clusters that produce products or services that are exported out of the
local market and thereby bring new dollars into the market.
(5) No tax may be collected under this section before July 1, 2009.
No tax may be collected under this section by a county more than
twenty-five years after the date that a tax is first imposed under this
section.
(6) For purposes of this section, "eligible county" means a county
with a population density of one hundred persons or greater per square
mile and with a population that exceeds one hundred fifty thousand
persons as determined by RCW 36.13.100.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2009.

--- END ---