BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 As used in this chapter, "railroad
infrastructure" includes any trackage, railroad appurtenance, passenger
boarding platform or station, switching yard, siding, grade crossing
device, or signalization device.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A local government, port district, rail
district, or other special purpose district may not remove or
disassemble railroad infrastructure that it owns, operates, or controls
within the state of Washington, except: (a) To comply with statutory
obligations; (b) if the removal or disassembly is incident to a fully
funded plan to realign or improve the railroad infrastructure within
five years; (c) to remove unused rail infrastructure incident to
legislatively authorized capital construction; (d) incident to a
project for which thirty percent or more of the preliminary engineering
is complete as of the effective date of this act; or (e) as authorized
by express, prior approval of the legislature.
(2) A local government, port district, rail district, or other
special purpose district may not sell, lease, assign, or otherwise
dispose of the whole or any part of railroad infrastructure that it
owns, operates, or controls within the state of Washington, unless the
sale, lease, assignment, or disposal is: (a) To a local government,
port district, rail district, or other special purpose district, and
subject to the restrictions of this section; (b) pursuant to an
interlocal agreement among local governments, port districts, rail
districts, or other special purpose districts regarding the sustained
use of the railroad infrastructure; (c) incident to legislatively
authorized capital construction; (d) incident to a project for which
thirty percent or more of the preliminary engineering is complete as of
the effective date of this act; or (e) authorized by express, prior
approval of the legislature.
(3) Subsections (1) and (2) of this section apply to railroad
infrastructure: (a) That is not subject to the jurisdiction of the
federal surface transportation board or its successor entity; (b) for
which the jurisdiction of the federal surface transportation board, or
its successor entity, has terminated; or (c) where regulation of the
railroad infrastructure by the state of Washington does not interfere
with interstate rail operations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The department of transportation shall
notify the office of financial management and the transportation
committees of the house of representatives and senate if railroad
infrastructure is removed, disassembled, sold, leased, assigned, or
disposed of in violation of section 2 of this act.
(2) The office of financial management shall report to the
transportation committees of the house of representatives and senate
the sources and amounts, if any, of state revenue or funding provided
to any entity that violates section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) If a local government, port district,
rail district, or other special district violates section 2 of this
act, the department of transportation shall determine the replacement
cost of the rail infrastructure removed, disassembled, sold, leased,
assigned, or otherwise disposed of.
(2) Any local government, port district, rail district, or other
special district that violates section 2 of this act shall pay a
monetary penalty equal to double the amount of the replacement cost
determined by the department of transportation under subsection (1) of
this section.
(3) Any monetary penalty paid under this section must be deposited
into the transportation infrastructure account created under RCW
82.44.190 and distributed for rail capital improvements only.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 81 RCW.

--- END ---