BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that communities
surrounding Washington's military bases should reflect our state's
appreciation of the armed forces and the value of the sacrifice of
military personnel stationed in our region. Declining resources for
new infrastructure has increased pressure on cities and counties and,
as urban areas have grown near Washington's military bases, these areas
have often developed in a pattern that has not supported the needs of
the military for housing and services.
The legislature finds that local governments can implement funding
options to encourage high-quality redevelopment of the neighborhoods
nearest the state's military bases, and infrastructure consistent with
the highest public health, safety, and welfare standards in a manner
supportive to the military's esprit de corps.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The military improvement zone program is created in the
department. The principal purpose of the program is to authorize and
promote financing tools that encourage high quality development and
affordable housing in the areas nearest to federal military bases. The
program must be administered by the department with the advice of the
department of revenue.
(2) The department must designate qualifying areas as military
improvement zones. Applications to designate qualifying areas as
improvement zones may be submitted by counties or cities. To be
eligible for designation as an improvement zone, an area must:
(a) Be a defined geographic area consisting of a neighborhood or
contiguous neighborhoods;
(b) Be within ten miles of a federal military base; and
(c) Demonstrate a need for infrastructure improvements that result
from population growth, a limited property tax base, a low-income
population, a lack of affordable housing, or a designation of a
majority of the area as qualified census tracts by the United States
department of housing and urban development.
(3) As used in this section, "affordable housing" has the same
meaning as in RCW 43.185A.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the requirements of this section, the estimated
taxes collected under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW on the sale or use
of tangible personal property and labor and services used in the
construction of affordable housing projects in military improvement
zones, less any credits allowed for local governments, must be
deposited in the account established in section 5 of this act.
(2) To be eligible for distributions under section 5 of this act,
the county or city must:
(a) Submit an application to the department prior to the initiation
of construction of the affordable housing project. The application
must be in a form and manner required by the department and must
include provisions verifying that:
(i) The project is in a military improvement zone designated by the
department under section 2 of this act;
(ii) The expected completion date of the construction of the
affordable housing project is consistent with the requirements of the
department;
(iii) The proceeds distributed under section 5 of this act will be
used for infrastructure that is required for the development to occur;
(iv) At least fifteen percent of the housing units in the project
qualify as affordable housing; and
(v) A development agreement has been made between the developer and
the applicable county or city providing for: (A) The number of
affordable housing units to be developed; (B) site and building design
specifications; and (C) the infrastructure necessary for the project to
be constructed. The department must rule on the application within
forty-five days of its receipt;
(b) Submit an expenditure plan to the department within one hundred
twenty days of the date the application is submitted under (a) of this
subsection (2). The plan must specify the intended use of proceeds
distributed under section 5 of this act. The department must notify
the county or city of any deficiencies in the expenditure plan within
ninety days of its submittal.
(3) Jurisdictions participating in the pilot program authorized
under section 6 of this act are eligible to receive proceeds from the
account established in section 5 of this act.
(4) Proceeds distributed under section 5 of this act may only be
used for public infrastructure projects related to a qualifying
affordable housing project. Authorized uses include, but are not
limited to: (a) Street and road construction necessary to serve the
improvement zone; (b) water and sewer system construction; and (c)
construction of storm water and drainage management systems.
(5) As used in this section, "affordable housing" has the same
meaning as in RCW 43.185A.010.
(6) As used in this section, "department" means the department of
community, trade, and economic development.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department must conduct an examination of land use tools
and funding options that local governments can implement to encourage:
(a) High-quality development of the neighborhoods nearest the state's
military bases; (b) affordable housing for military personnel; and (c)
infrastructure for this housing that is consistent with the highest
public health, safety, and welfare standards.
(2) As used in this section, "affordable housing" has the same
meaning as in RCW 43.185A.010.
(3) The department must report its findings and recommendations to
the governor and the appropriate committees of the house of
representatives and the senate by January 30, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The military improvement zone account is created in the custody
of the state treasurer. All receipts from section 3(1) of this act
must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may
be used by a county or city only for public infrastructure projects
authorized under sections 3(4) and 6(4) of this act. Only the director
or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account.
The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW,
but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.
(2) The department of revenue must distribute proceeds under this
section annually at no cost to the receiving county or city. Proceeds
must be distributed to a city or county by July 1st of each year,
beginning in the state fiscal year following the fiscal year in which
initiation of construction of the affordable housing project begins.
(3) The department of revenue may not distribute proceeds under
this section for construction occurring after the date of completion
specified in section 3(2)(a)(ii) of this act. However, the department
of revenue, in consultation with the department, may extend the date of
completion for good cause shown.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department must conduct a military improvement zone pilot
program. The pilot program must promote the development of high-quality infrastructure and affordable housing in improvement zones.
The program must also determine the effectiveness of the program in
increasing the development of high-quality infrastructure and
additional affordable housing in improvement zones.
(2)(a) Applications to designate qualifying areas as improvement
zones may be submitted by counties or cities. To be eligible for
designation as an improvement zone, an area must:
(i) Be a defined geographic area consisting of a neighborhood or
contiguous neighborhoods;
(ii) Be within ten miles of a federal military base; and
(iii) Demonstrate a need for infrastructure improvements that
result from population growth, a limited property tax base, a
low-income population, a lack of affordable housing, or a designation
of a majority of the area as qualified census tracts by the United
States department of housing and urban development.
(b) Only areas within ten miles of two military bases with over
thirty thousand personnel combined that are wholly contained within
tract 720 as designated by the United States census bureau may be
considered for inclusion within the pilot program.
(3) The department must: (a) Develop operational guidelines and
criteria for the pilot program; and (b) provide technical assistance to
counties and cities participating in the pilot program.
(4) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this
specific purpose, the department must provide grants to counties and
cities participating in the pilot program authorized under this
section. The department must also use receipts collected under section
3(1) of this act for counties and cities participating in the pilot
program authorized under this section. The grants and collected
receipts must only be for public infrastructure projects related to
affordable housing projects for the improvement zone. Authorized uses
include, but are not limited to: (a) Street and road construction
necessary to serve the improvement zone; (b) water and sewer system
construction; and (c) construction of storm water and drainage
management systems.
(5)(a) The department must provide a comprehensive pilot program
status report to the governor and appropriate committees of the house
of representatives and the senate by September 30, 2010.
(b) The department must report its pilot program findings and
recommendations to the governor and appropriate committees of the house
of representatives and the senate by September 30, 2012.
(6) This section expires December 31, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Section 2 of this act takes effect January
1, 2013.

--- END ---