BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.20A.320 and 1997 c 58 s 802 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department may serve upon a responsible parent a notice
informing the responsible parent of the department's intent to submit
the parent's name to the department of licensing and any appropriate
licensing entity as a licensee who is not in compliance with a child
support order. The department shall attach a copy of the responsible
parent's child support order to the notice. Service of the notice must
be by certified mail, return receipt requested. If service by
certified mail is not successful, service shall be by personal service.
(2) The notice of noncompliance must include the address and
telephone number of the department's division of child support office
that issues the notice and must inform the responsible parent that:
(a) The parent may request an adjudicative proceeding to contest
the issue of compliance with the child support order. The only issues
that may be considered at the adjudicative proceeding are whether the
parent is required to pay child support under a child support order and
whether the parent is in compliance with that order;
(b) A request for an adjudicative proceeding shall be in writing
and must be received by the department within twenty days of the date
of service of the notice;
(c) If the parent requests an adjudicative proceeding within twenty
days of service, the department will stay action to certify the parent
to the department of licensing and any licensing entity for
noncompliance with a child support order pending entry of a written
decision after the adjudicative proceeding;
(d) If the parent does not request an adjudicative proceeding
within twenty days of service and remains in noncompliance with a child
support order, the department will certify the parent's name to the
department of licensing and any appropriate licensing entity for
noncompliance with a child support order;
(e) The department will stay action to certify the parent to the
department of licensing and any licensing entity for noncompliance if
the parent agrees to make timely payments of current support and agrees
to a reasonable payment schedule for payment of the arrears. It is the
parent's responsibility to contact in person or by mail the
department's division of child support office indicated on the notice
within twenty days of service of the notice to arrange for a payment
schedule. The department may stay certification for up to thirty days
after contact from a parent to arrange for a payment schedule;
(f) If the department certifies the responsible parent to the
department of licensing and a licensing entity for noncompliance with
a child support order, the licensing entity will issue a restricted
license for a period of not less than ninety days. The license shall
permit the obligor to:
(i) Drive to and from his or her place of employment;
(ii) Perform duties in the course of his or her employment; and
(iii) Drive during any period of time in which he or she has
custody of his or her child or children pursuant to a parenting plan;
(g) After receiving notice of a restricted license, the obligor may
work with the division of child support for a period of thirty days to
reach an agreement by which his or her license will be returned;
(h) An obligor who is unable to reach agreement with the division
of child support for return of his or her license is entitled to a
hearing in front of an administrative law judge to determine whether
the continued suspension will create undue hardship or interfere with
the obligor's ability to comply with a child support order or perform
typical parental functions and duties. If it is found such suspension
will create undue hardship or interference, the licensing entity shall
extend the obligor's restricted license to drive until the obligor is
in compliance with the child support order. If no undue hardship or
interference is found, the restricted license will expire, as
scheduled. In making this determination, the administrative law judge
shall consider, among other factors:
(i) Availability of public transportation near the obligor's place
of residence including consideration of transportation: To and from
work; as it affects obligations to children; in relation to medical
concerns; and as it relates to the ability to comply with court-ordered
obligations; and
(ii) Any other responsibilities the obligor may have to dependents,
including children;
(i) Upon expiration of the restricted license, the licensing entity
will suspend or not renew the parent's license and the department of
licensing will suspend or not renew any driver's license that the
parent holds until the parent provides the department of licensing and
the licensing entity with a release from the department stating that
the responsible parent is in compliance with the child support order;
(((g))) (j) If the department certifies the responsible parent as
a person who is in noncompliance with a child support order, the
department of fish and wildlife will suspend the fishing license,
hunting license, commercial fishing license, or any other license
issued under chapters 77.32((, 77.28 [75.28], and 75.25)) and 77.65 RCW
that the responsible parent may possess. Notice from the department of
licensing that a responsible parent's driver's license has been
suspended shall serve as notice of the suspension of a license issued
under chapters 77.32 and ((75.25)) 77.65 RCW. If suspension of any of
the above licenses affects the obligor's ability to comply with a child
support order or parenting plan, (f), (g), and (h) of this subsection
shall apply before any license suspension is ordered;
(((h))) (k) Suspension of a license will affect insurability if the
responsible parent's insurance policy excludes coverage for acts
occurring after the suspension of a license;
(((i))) (l) If after receiving the notice of noncompliance with a
child support order, the responsible parent files a motion to modify
support with the court or requests the department to amend a support
obligation established by an administrative decision, or if a motion
for modification of a court or administrative order for child support
is pending, the department or the court may stay action to certify the
parent to the department of licensing and any licensing entity for
noncompliance with a child support order. A stay shall not exceed six
months unless the department finds good cause. The responsible parent
has the obligation to notify the department that a modification
proceeding is pending and provide a copy of the motion or request for
modification; and
(((j))) (m) If the responsible parent subsequently becomes in
compliance with the child support order, the department will promptly
provide the parent with a release stating that the parent is in
compliance with the order, and the parent may request that the
licensing entity or the department of licensing reinstate the suspended
license.
(3) A responsible parent may request an adjudicative proceeding
upon service of the notice described in subsection (1) of this section.
The request for an adjudicative proceeding must be received by the
department within twenty days of service. The request must be in
writing and indicate the current mailing address and daytime phone
number, if available, of the responsible parent. The proceedings under
this subsection shall be conducted in accordance with the requirements
of chapter 34.05 RCW. The issues that may be considered at the
adjudicative proceeding are limited to whether:
(a) The person named as the responsible parent is the responsible
parent;
(b) The responsible parent is required to pay child support under
a child support order; and
(c) The responsible parent is in compliance with the order.
(4) The decision resulting from the adjudicative proceeding must be
in writing and inform the responsible parent of his or her rights to
review. The parent's copy of the decision may be sent by regular mail
to the parent's most recent address of record.
(5) If a responsible parent contacts the department's division of
child support office indicated on the notice of noncompliance within
twenty days of service of the notice and requests arrangement of a
payment schedule, the department shall stay the certification of
noncompliance during negotiation of the schedule for payment of
arrears. In no event shall the stay continue for more than thirty days
from the date of contact by the parent. The department shall establish
a schedule for payment of arrears that is fair and reasonable, and that
considers the financial situation of the responsible parent and the
needs of all children who rely on the responsible parent for support.
At the end of the thirty days, if no payment schedule has been agreed
to in writing and the department has acted in good faith, the
department shall proceed with certification of noncompliance.
(6) If a responsible parent timely requests an adjudicative
proceeding pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, the department
may not certify the name of the parent to the department of licensing
or a licensing entity for noncompliance with a child support order
unless the adjudicative proceeding results in a finding that the
responsible parent is not in compliance with the order.
(7) The department may certify to the department of licensing and
any appropriate licensing entity the name of a responsible parent who
is not in compliance with a child support order or a residential or
visitation order if:
(a) The responsible parent does not timely request an adjudicative
proceeding upon service of a notice issued under subsection (1) of this
section and is not in compliance with a child support order twenty-one
days after service of the notice;
(b) An adjudicative proceeding results in a decision that the
responsible parent is not in compliance with a child support order;
(c) The court enters a judgment on a petition for judicial review
that finds the responsible parent is not in compliance with a child
support order;
(d) The department and the responsible parent have been unable to
agree on a fair and reasonable schedule of payment of the arrears; or
(e) The responsible parent fails to comply with a payment schedule
established pursuant to subsection (5) of this section((; or)).
The department shall send by regular mail a copy of any
certification of noncompliance filed with the department of licensing
or a licensing entity to the responsible parent at the responsible
parent's most recent address of record.
(8) The department of licensing and a licensing entity shall,
without undue delay, notify a responsible parent certified by the
department under subsection (7) of this section that the parent's
driver's license or other license has been suspended and a restricted
license issued because the parent's name has been certified by the
department as a responsible parent who is not in compliance with a
child support order or a residential or visitation order.
(9) When a responsible parent who is served notice under subsection
(1) of this section subsequently complies with the child support order,
or when the department receives a court order ((under section 886 of
this act)) stating that the parent is in compliance with a residential
or visitation order, the department shall promptly provide the parent
with a release stating that the responsible parent is in compliance
with the order. A copy of the release shall be transmitted by the
department to the appropriate licensing entities.
(10) The department may adopt rules to implement and enforce the
requirements of this section. The department shall deliver a copy of
rules adopted to implement and enforce this section to the legislature
by June 30, 1998.
(11) Nothing in this section prohibits a responsible parent from
filing a motion to modify support with the court or from requesting the
department to amend a support obligation established by an
administrative decision. If there is a reasonable likelihood that a
pending motion or request will significantly change the amount of the
child support obligation, the department or the court may stay action
to certify the responsible parent to the department of licensing and
any licensing entity for noncompliance with a child support order. A
stay shall not exceed six months unless the department finds good cause
to extend the stay. The responsible parent has the obligation to
notify the department that a modification proceeding is pending and
provide a copy of the motion or request for modification.
(12) The department of licensing and a licensing entity may renew,
reinstate, or otherwise extend a license in accordance with the
licensing entity's or the department of licensing's rules after the
licensing entity or the department of licensing receives a copy of the
release specified in subsection (9) of this section. The department of
licensing and a licensing entity may waive any applicable requirement
for reissuance, renewal, or other extension if it determines that the
imposition of that requirement places an undue burden on the person and
that waiver of the requirement is consistent with the public interest.
(13) The procedures in chapter 58, Laws of 1997, constitute the
exclusive administrative remedy for contesting the establishment of
noncompliance with a child support order and suspension of a license
under this section, and satisfy the requirements of RCW 34.05.422.

--- END ---