BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Farmers and small forest landowners should be encouraged
through the use of incentives to conserve and restore natural areas on
their farms and small tree farming operations in ways that improve the
long-term viability of these operations by providing ongoing revenue to
these operations without taking whole farms or significant amounts of
farmland or small tree farming operations out of production;
(b) Farmers and small forest landowners have the ability to produce
restoration products as well as implement conservation practices on
their productive agricultural lands and small tree farms in a way that
is likely to be useful to fulfill the mitigation, compliance, and other
environmental needs of public agencies such as the Washington state
department of transportation, and to meet other market demands such as
the availability of feed or conditions for overwintering of migratory
waterfowl or for conserving and enhancing fish and wildlife habitat;
(c) Family farmers and family-owned small tree farming operations
currently produce environmental benefits that would cost millions of
dollars to replace with man-made infrastructure. Among these benefits
are water filtration, floodwater dispersal, fish and wildlife habitat,
open spaces, and scenic views;
(d) Other communities in the United States have established
conservation markets in which landowners are paid to produce such
restoration products; and
(e) The use of such markets could provide much needed income to
sustain the viability of Washington farmers and small forest
landowners, meet mitigation and compliance needs, accelerate permitting
of public infrastructure, and provide environmental benefits.
(2) Therefore, the legislature finds that it is good public policy
to evaluate the feasibility and potential effectiveness of conservation
markets in Washington state that provide dual benefits of improving the
viability of agriculture and providing environmental or fish and
wildlife benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Subject to the availability of amounts
appropriated for this purpose, the commission shall conduct a study to
evaluate the feasibility and desirability of establishing farm-based or
forest-based conservation markets in Washington. The commission may
enter into a contract with an entity that has the knowledge and
experience of agriculture and of conservation markets for this effort.
The commission, entity, or both shall:
(a) Evaluate other conservation markets in operation in the United
States that provide ongoing revenue to improve the long-term viability
of family farms and small forestry operations, including those focused
on water quality trading, endangered species conservation banking,
rental of environmental benefits, and wetland banking, to determine
relevant lessons for Washington conservation markets;
(b) Collaborate with Washington farm organizations, small forestry
landowner organizations, key farm community leaders, agricultural
special purpose districts, local governments, and relevant natural
resource agencies to:
(i) Determine interests, needs, and concerns about participating in
a conservation market;
(ii) Assess the market-ready environmental maintenance,
restoration, and enhancement products that could profitably and
dependably be produced on farms and small forestry operations,
including endangered species habitat, wetlands, water quality
treatment, carbon sequestration, biodiversity, and other fish and
wildlife habitat; and
(iii) Identify opportunities for conservation markets that could
provide ongoing revenue to improve the long-term viability of family
farming and small forestry operations and could supplement existing
conservation programs currently used by landowners, such as the
conservation reserve enhancement program, and increased use of the
public benefit rating system;
(c) Work with the Washington state department of transportation,
utility districts, local road departments, and other public agencies to
determine potential demand for restoration products produced on farms
and small forestry operations to fulfill upcoming mitigation and
compliance needs. The underlying analysis shall emphasize demand
associated with construction of roads, utilities, and other public
structures, as well as periodic repermitting of wastewater and other
public utilities;
(d) Forecast market activity, including the potential supply of
restoration products, including those produced through existing
restoration programs, and the potential demand for such products to
address mitigation, compliance, and other environmental needs and other
market demands. This analysis shall also identify services, materials,
technical assistance, financing, and other support that would
facilitate the use of conservation markets;
(e) Consult with the Washington departments of ecology and fish and
wildlife, the United States army corps of engineers, and local
government permitting agencies to determine their willingness to use
farm-produced restoration products to fulfill mitigation and compliance
needs and also evaluate changes in rules and policy that would
facilitate permitting of conservation market activities;
(f) Consult with the Northwest Indian fisheries commission and
individual Indian tribes to determine their interest in and potential
support of conservation markets;
(g) Coordinate with the department of agriculture regarding the
"Future of Farming" project, the William D. Ruckelshaus Center on its
activities relating to chapter 353, Laws of 2007, the office of
farmland preservation and the office's efforts to retain farmland in
agricultural production, the Washington biodiversity project, the
department of ecology regarding its "Mitigation that Works" project,
and the office of regulatory assistance on its integrated project
review and mitigation project to ensure consistency with these efforts;
and
(h) Develop findings and recommendations on the feasibility and
desirability of creating farm-based and forest-based conservation
markets in Washington state.
(2) If the study determines that farm-based conservation markets
are feasible and desirable, the commission, contracting entity, or
both, shall conduct two demonstration projects in Washington farm
communities. The commission, entity, or both shall:
(a) Select demonstration project areas that have a combination of
enthusiastic farmers, a substantial supply of potential restoration
products from farms, potential for public and private cost-sharing of
project costs, and upcoming development or permitting activity that is
likely to trigger significant mitigation and compliance demands;
(b) Identify and map areas of highly productive agricultural
activity and work with the departments of ecology and fish and wildlife
to identify locations of high-priority wetland and habitat restoration
or water quality improvement to ensure that market-driven restoration
does not infringe on highly productive farmland;
(c) Identify up to three potential credit transactions in each
demonstration project area and work with relevant farmers, permittees,
and permitting agencies to facilitate transactions in mitigation and
compliance credits;
(d) Work with the department of ecology and other relevant
permitting agencies to develop standards for approval of conservation
market transactions to fulfill mitigation and compliance requirements
and to identify priority areas for focusing conservation market sites
based on the highest ecological benefits for the watershed and the
restoration of ecosystem processes that minimize impacts to high
quality agricultural lands;
(e) Work with conservation districts to determine district interest
in participation in a conservation markets program, including a
determination of district capacity and resources to participate in such
a program;
(f) Evaluate options for facilitating market transactions,
including the use of farmer cooperatives, brokerage services, and
banks; and
(g) Develop findings on the results of the demonstration projects
and the implications for broader use of farm-based conservation markets
in Washington state.
(3) As used in this act:
(a) "Commission" means the Washington state conservation
commission.
(b) "Conservation market" means a market for selling credits for
wetland or habitat restoration or water quality cleanup to agencies in
need of such credits to fulfill environmental mitigation, compliance
requirements, and other environmental needs. The term shall also be
broadly interpreted to include any program that provides ongoing
revenue to sustain the long-term viability of farms and small forestry
operations as a result of maintaining or enhancing environmental
benefits such as open space, fish and wildlife habitat, floodwater
dispersal, water filtration, buffers from more intense development, or
any other environmental benefit resulting from the ongoing operation of
the farm.
(c) "Small forest landowner" has the same meaning as in RCW
76.09.450.
(4) The commission shall present findings and recommendations from
the conservation markets study to the governor and appropriate
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2008. The findings and
recommendations shall include:
(a) Findings regarding the match between the availability of farm-produced and forestry-produced restoration products and the demand for
such products associated with mitigation and compliance for public
agency projects and activities in the demonstration project area;
(b) Findings regarding the interests and capabilities of farmers,
small forest landowners, public development agencies, and permitting
agencies to participate in the demonstration conservation market;
(c) Findings regarding the likelihood that farm-based and
forest-based conservation markets could provide a successful mechanism
for addressing mitigation, compliance, and other environmental needs
for public construction projects and permitting of public utilities;
and
(d) Recommendations on whether to proceed to the initiation of
demonstration projects.
(5) If the project proceeds into the demonstration project phase,
the commission shall present findings and recommendations regarding the
conservation markets' demonstration projects to the governor and
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2009. The
findings and recommendations shall include:
(a) Findings on the ability to produce market-ready restoration and
clean-up projects without infringing on high-quality farmland;
(b) Findings on standards for review and approval of market
transactions in permitting processes;
(c) Findings on potential market transactions in the demonstration
project areas;
(d) Recommendations on measures that the Washington state
department of transportation and other state agencies can take to
facilitate their use of conservation markets to fulfill mitigation and
compliance needs and waterfowl or wildlife habitat enhancement goals;
(e) Recommendations on support services that could be provided by
state agencies to facilitate conservation markets throughout
Washington, including but not limited to financing, permit assistance,
technical assistance, materials, and other services.
(6) This section expires December 31, 2009.

--- END ---