BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A boarding home's voluntary withdrawal from participation in
the medicaid program for residential care and services, while
continuing to provide services of the type provided by boarding homes,
is not an acceptable basis for the transfer or discharge of
medicaid-eligible persons who were residing in the boarding home on the
day before the effective date of the withdrawal.
(2)(a) A boarding home that voluntarily withdraws from
participation in the medicaid program for residential care and services
must provide notice to any person who begins residence in the boarding
home on or after the effective date of the medicaid withdrawal that:
(i) The boarding home will not participate in the medicaid program
with respect to that person; and
(ii) The boarding home may transfer or discharge the person,
following notice, if the person is unable to pay the charges of the
facility, even if the person becomes eligible for medicaid assistance
for boarding home services while residing at the boarding home.
(b) The boarding home shall provide notice orally and in writing in
a prominent manner on a separate page before the person begins
residence, and must obtain the person's signed, written acknowledgement
of receipt of the information.
(c) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed as affecting any
requirement that a boarding home provide advance notice to the
department of its intention to voluntarily terminate the facility's
medicaid contract with the department.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a medicaid
contract between the department and a boarding home is deemed to
continue in effect after the effective date of the facility's voluntary
withdrawal from participation in the medicaid program for purposes of:
(a) Receiving payments under the medicaid program for boarding home
services provided to persons who were residing in the boarding home on
the day before the effective date of the withdrawal;
(b) Maintaining compliance with all requirements of the medicaid
contract between the department and the facility; and
(c) Continuing to apply the oversight and enforcement authority
provided under the department's contract, regulations, and the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---