BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 While most locally owned bridges are
inspected, rated, and reported on every two years, as required under
federal law, there is insufficient federal and local funding to provide
for the immediate repair or replacement of all structurally deficient
bridges. Given that bridges found to be severely compromised or
deficient may pose a danger to lives, and could result in a disruption
to commerce and quality of life, the legislature finds that a priority
must be given to the repair, rehabilitation, or replacement of these
bridges, especially deficient bridges.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.58 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Bridge" means a structure: Located on a public road,
including supports erected over a depression or an obstruction, such as
water, a highway, or a railway; having a track or passageway for
carrying traffic or other moving loads; and having an opening measured
along the center of the roadway of more than twenty feet between
undercopings of abutments or spring lines of arches, or extreme ends of
openings for multiple boxes, and may also include multiple pipes, where
the clear distance between openings is less than half of the smaller
contiguous opening. "Bridge" includes any bridge that is subject to
the national bridge inspection standards. However, "bridge" does not
include any bridge that has a traffic count of less than fifty motor
vehicles per day.
(b) "National bridge inspection standards" means the federal
highway administration standards for the mandatory inspection and
evaluation of all structures defined as highway bridges located on all
public roads (23 C.F.R. Sec. 650, subpart C; 23 U.S.C. Sec. 151).
(c) "Public road" means any road or street under the jurisdiction
of and maintained by a public authority and open to public travel.
(d) "Sufficiency rating" means a value of zero through one hundred,
based on the national bridge inspection standards, that is used to
evaluate all state and locally owned bridges and establishes
eligibility and priority for replacement or rehabilitation of bridges
with federal highway bridge replacement and rehabilitation program
funds.
(e) "Sufficiency rating report" means the most recent bridge
inspection report and supporting documentation that establishes a
bridge's sufficiency rating.
(2) For each city-owned or county-owned bridge, including bridges
jointly owned by cities and counties, that has a sufficiency rating of
less than ten, the bridge owner or owners shall, within six months from
the date of the most recent sufficiency rating report:
(a) Begin to repair or rehabilitate the bridge, excluding any
preconstruction design, environmental, or other analyses, such that the
bridge's sufficiency rating exceeds eighty; or
(b) Develop and adopt a finance plan to fully fund the (i) repair
or rehabilitation of the bridge to achieve a sufficiency rating in
excess of eighty, or (ii) replacement of the bridge. The finance plan
may include federal funds if such funds have been secured. Until the
finance plan is implemented and work has begun on the repair,
rehabilitation, or replacement of the bridge, the bridge owner or
owners shall appropriate from their funding sources at least fifty
percent of the total estimated cost to repair, rehabilitate, or replace
the bridge into a dedicated account.
(3) In the case of bridges jointly owned by local jurisdictions,
the owners shall share responsibility equally under this section unless
an interlocal agreement establishes otherwise.
(4) By December 2008, and each December thereafter, the department
shall submit an annual report to the legislature, the state treasurer,
and the county road administration board on the status of all bridges
subject to the requirements of this section. At a minimum, the report
must identify each bridge and its sufficiency rating, and include a
determination of whether the bridge owners are in compliance with
subsection (2) of this section.
(5) Except as provided in subsections (6) and (7) of this section,
upon receipt of a determination from the department that a city or
county is in noncompliance with this section:
(a) For city-owned bridges, the state treasurer shall withhold
twenty-five percent of the motor vehicle fuel tax revenues, as provided
in RCW 46.68.110(4), to which the city is entitled, until fifty percent
of the estimated cost to replace the bridge, or to repair or
rehabilitate the bridge such that the sufficiency rating exceeds
eighty, has been secured in a dedicated account by the owner of the
bridge.
(b) For county-owned bridges, the county road administration board
shall withhold twenty-five percent of the motor vehicle fuel tax
revenues, as provided in RCW 36.78.090 and 46.68.120(4), to which the
county is entitled, until fifty percent of the estimated cost to
replace the bridge, or to repair or rehabilitate the bridge such that
the sufficiency rating exceeds eighty, has been secured in a dedicated
account by the owner of the bridge.
(c) For bridges jointly owned by local jurisdictions, the state
treasurer and the county road administration board shall withhold the
funds identified in (a) and (b) of this subsection consistent with the
parties' relative responsibility for repairs, rehabilitation, or
replacement costs as provided in the interlocal agreement. If an
interlocal agreement does not exist or if the interlocal agreement
fails to clearly provide for the parties' responsibilities for such
costs, the state treasurer and the county road administration board
shall withhold equal amounts.
(6) If load-carrying restrictions are imposed, posted, and enforced
on any bridge subject to the requirements of this section such that the
useful life of the bridge is substantially extended, as determined by
the department:
(a) For city-owned bridges, the state treasurer shall withhold
fifteen percent of the motor vehicle fuel tax revenues, as provided in
RCW 46.68.110(4), to which the city is entitled, until forty percent of
the estimated cost to replace the bridge, or to repair or rehabilitate
the bridge such that the sufficiency rating exceeds eighty, has been
secured in a dedicated account by the owner of the bridge.
(b) For county-owned bridges, the county road administration board
shall withhold fifteen percent of the motor vehicle fuel tax revenues,
as provided in RCW 36.78.090 and 46.68.120(4), to which the county is
entitled, until forty percent of the estimated cost to replace the
bridge, or to repair or rehabilitate the bridge such that the
sufficiency rating exceeds eighty, has been secured in a dedicated
account by the owner of the bridge.
(c) For bridges jointly owned by local jurisdictions, the state
treasurer and the county road administration board shall withhold the
funds identified in (a) and (b) of this subsection consistent with the
parties' relative responsibility for repairs, rehabilitation, or
replacement costs as provided in the interlocal agreement. If an
interlocal agreement does not exist or if the interlocal agreement
fails to clearly provide for the parties' responsibilities for such
costs, the state treasurer and the county road administration board
shall withhold equal amounts.
(7) If the bridge is closed without a funding plan in place that
fully funds either the replacement of the bridge or the repair or
rehabilitation of the bridge such that the sufficiency rating exceeds
eighty:
(a) For city-owned bridges, the state treasurer shall withhold
forty percent of the motor vehicle fuel tax revenues, as provided in
RCW 46.68.110(4), to which the city is entitled, until seventy-five
percent of the estimated cost to replace the bridge, or to repair or
rehabilitate the bridge such that the sufficiency rating exceeds
eighty, has been secured in a dedicated account by the owner of the
bridge.
(b) For county-owned bridges, the county road administration board
shall withhold forty percent of the motor vehicle fuel tax revenues, as
provided in RCW 36.78.090 and 46.68.120(4), to which the county is
entitled, until seventy-five percent of the estimated cost to replace
the bridge, or to repair or rehabilitate the bridge such that the
sufficiency rating exceeds eighty, has been secured in a dedicated
account by the owner of the bridge.
(c) For bridges jointly owned by local jurisdictions, the state
treasurer and the county road administration board shall withhold the
funds identified in (a) and (b) of this subsection consistent with the
parties' relative responsibility for repairs, rehabilitation, or
replacement costs as provided in the interlocal agreement. If an
interlocal agreement does not exist or if the interlocal agreement
fails to clearly provide for the parties' responsibilities for such
costs, the state treasurer and the county road administration board
shall withhold equal amounts.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.78.090 and 1984 c 7 s 33 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Before May 1st of each year the board shall transmit to the
state treasurer certificates of good practice on behalf of the counties
which during the preceding calendar year:
(a) Have submitted to the state department of transportation or to
the board all reports required by law or regulation of the board;
((and))
(b) Have reasonably complied with provisions of law relating to
county road administration and with the standards of good practice as
formulated and adopted by the board; and
(c) Beginning by May 1, 2009, and before May 1st of each year
thereafter, have been found to be in compliance with section 2(2) of
this act by the department of transportation.
(2) The board shall not transmit to the state treasurer a
certificate of good practice on behalf of any county failing to meet
the requirements of subsection (1) of this section or section 2(2) of
this act, but the board shall, in such case and before May 1st, notify
the county and the state treasurer of its reasons for withholding the
certificate.
(3)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the state
treasurer, upon receiving a notice that a certificate of good practice
will not be issued on behalf of a county, or that a previously issued
certificate of good practice has been revoked, shall, effective the
first day of the month after that in which notice is received, withhold
from such county its share of motor vehicle fuel taxes distributable
pursuant to RCW 46.68.120 until the board thereafter issues on behalf
of such county a certificate of good practice or a conditional
certificate. After withholding or revoking a certificate of good
practice with respect to any county, the board may thereafter at any
time issue such a certificate or a conditional certificate when the
board is satisfied that the county has complied or is diligently
attempting to comply with the requirements of subsection (1) of this
section.
(b) The state treasurer, upon receiving a notice that a certificate
of good practice will not be issued on behalf of a county for
noncompliance with section 2(2) of this act, shall, effective the first
day of the month after the notice is received, withhold from the county
its share of motor vehicle fuel taxes distributable pursuant to RCW
46.68.120(4) as directed in section 2 of this act.
(4) The board may, upon notice and a hearing, revoke a previously
issued certificate of good practice or substitute a conditional
certificate therefor when, after issuance of a certificate of good
practice, any county fails to meet the requirements of subsection
(1)(a) and (b) of this section, but the board shall in such case notify
the county and the state treasurer of its reasons for the revocation or
substitution.
(5) Motor vehicle fuel taxes withheld from any county pursuant to
this section shall not be distributed to any other county, but shall be
retained in the motor vehicle fund to the credit of the county
originally entitled thereto. Whenever the state treasurer receives
from the board a certificate of good practice issued on behalf of such
county he shall distribute to such county all of the funds theretofore
retained in the motor vehicle fund to the credit of such county.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.68.110 and 2007 c 148 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Funds credited to the incorporated cities and towns of the state as
set forth in RCW 46.68.090 shall be subject to deduction and
distribution as follows:
(1) One and one-half percent of such sums distributed under RCW
46.68.090 shall be deducted monthly as such sums are credited and set
aside for the use of the department of transportation for the
supervision of work and expenditures of such incorporated cities and
towns on the city and town streets thereof, including the supervision
and administration of federal-aid programs for which the department of
transportation has responsibility: PROVIDED, That any moneys so
retained and not expended shall be credited in the succeeding biennium
to the incorporated cities and towns in proportion to deductions herein
made;
(2) Thirty-three one-hundredths of one percent of such funds
distributed under RCW 46.68.090 shall be deducted monthly, as such
funds accrue, and set aside for the use of the department of
transportation for the purpose of funding the cities' share of the
costs of highway jurisdiction studies and other studies. Any funds so
retained and not expended shall be credited in the succeeding biennium
to the cities in proportion to the deductions made;
(3) One percent of such funds distributed under RCW 46.68.090 shall
be deducted monthly, as such funds accrue, to be deposited in the small
city pavement and sidewalk account, to implement the city hardship
assistance program, as provided in RCW 47.26.164. However, any moneys
so retained and not required to carry out the program under this
subsection as of July 1st of each odd-numbered year thereafter, shall
be retained in the account and used for maintenance, repair, and
resurfacing of city and town streets for cities and towns with a
population of less than five thousand;
(4) Except as provided in section 2 of this act, after making the
deductions under subsections (1) through (3) of this section and RCW
35.76.050, the balance remaining to the credit of incorporated cities
and towns shall be apportioned monthly as such funds accrue among the
several cities and towns within the state ratably on the basis of the
population last determined by the office of financial management.

--- END ---