BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that many Washington
families do not earn enough annually to keep pace with increasing
health care, child care, and work-related expenses. Because the state
relies so heavily on sales tax revenue, families in Washington with the
lowest incomes pay proportionately four or five times as much in state
taxes as the most affluent households. The legislature finds that
higher-income families are able to recover some of the sales and use
taxes that they pay to support state and local government through the
federal income tax deduction for sales and use taxes, but that lower-income people, who are not able to itemize, receive no benefit.
Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to provide a sales and
use tax exemption, in the form of a remittance, to lower-income working
families in Washington, and to use the federal earned income tax credit
as a proxy for the amount of sales tax paid.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A working families' tax exemption, in the form of a remittance
tax due under this chapter and chapter 82.12 RCW, is provided to
eligible low-income persons for sales taxes paid under this chapter
after January 1, 2008.
(2) For purposes of the exemption in this section, an eligible low-income person is:
(a) An individual, or an individual and that individual's spouse if
they file a federal joint income tax return;
(b) Who is eligible for, and is granted, the credit provided in
Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 32; and
(c) Who properly files a federal income tax return as a Washington
resident, and has been a resident of the state of Washington more than
one hundred eighty days of the year for which the exemption is claimed.
(3) For remittances made in 2009 and 2010, the working families'
tax exemption for the prior year is a retail sales tax exemption equal
to the greater of five percent of the credit granted as a result of
Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 32 in the most recent year for which data is
available or twenty-five dollars. For 2011 and thereafter, the working
families' tax exemption for the prior year is equal to the greater of
ten percent of the credit granted as a result of Title 26 U.S.C. Sec.
32 in the most recent year for which data is available or fifty
dollars.
(4) For any fiscal period, the remittance required by this section
shall be suspended if the suspension is directed by the state omnibus
appropriations act.
(5) The working families' tax exemption shall be administered as
provided in this subsection.
(a) An eligible low-income person claiming an exemption under this
section must pay the tax imposed under chapters 82.08, 82.12, and 82.14
RCW in the year for which the exemption is claimed. The eligible low-income person may then apply to the department for the remittance as
calculated under subsection (3) of this section.
(b) Application shall be made to the department in a form and
manner determined by the department, but the department must provide
alternative filing methods for applicants who do not have access to
electronic filing.
(c) Application for the exemption remittance under this section
must be made in the year following the year for which the federal
return was filed, but in no case may any remittance be provided for any
period before January 1, 2008. The department may use the best
available data to process the exemption remittance. The department
shall begin accepting applications October 1, 2009.
(d) The department shall review the application and determine
eligibility for the working families tax exemption based on information
provided by the applicant and through audit and other administrative
records, including, when it deems it necessary, verification through
internal revenue service data.
(e) The department shall remit the exempted amounts to eligible
low-income persons who submitted applications. Remittances may be made
by electronic funds transfer or other means.
(f) The department may, in conjunction with other agencies or
organizations, design and implement a public information campaign to
inform potentially eligible persons of the existence of and
requirements for this exemption.
(g) The department may contact persons who appear to be eligible
low-income persons as a result of information received from the
internal revenue service under such conditions and requirements as the
internal revenue service may by law require.
(6) The provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW apply to the exemption in
this section.
(7) The department may adopt rules necessary to implement this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
The department must assess the implementation of the working
families' tax exemption in a report to the legislature to identify
administrative or resource issues that require legislative action. The
department must submit the report to the finance committee of the house
of representatives and the ways and means committee of the senate by
December 1, 2012.

--- END ---