BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that autism spectrum
disorders are not rare, and are, in fact, chronic conditions that
affect nearly one of every one hundred fifty children and require
ongoing medical and nonmedical interventions. The legislature further
finds that, while not rare, access to accurate and efficient diagnostic
services to identify the clinical characteristics of these disorders
are. Despite increased access to service with the establishment by the
legislature of the Tacoma satellite in 2005, there exists a six month
to one-year waiting list for diagnosis across the state. It is
critically important to children and families that they have timely and
reliable access to providers who can recognize the signs and symptoms
of autism spectrum disorders and have a strategy for screening,
surveillance, and assessing them systematically. While forty-four
percent of physicians say they care for more than ten children with
autism spectrum disorder, only eight percent say they routinely screen
for it. Physicians must also know about local resources that can
assist in making a definitive diagnosis of and in managing autism
spectrum disorders. To assist children, families, and the providers
caring for these children and their families, the legislature finds
that early and accurate diagnosis of autism spectrum disorders should
be made available and accessible to the majority of people within their
local communities through public hospital districts.
The legislature also finds that public hospital districts enjoy the
benefits of not-for-profit status. Public hospital districts also
enjoy the benefit of additional revenue raised from taxing residents
who live within their boundaries. While residents who live within
those taxing boundaries benefit from access to the health care services
provided, so do those that live outside the taxing boundaries. The
legislature finds that all residents in the taxing district should
receive meaningful remuneration from the benefits that accrue to these
health care entities.
The legislature finds that early, accurate, and efficient diagnosis
of autism spectrum disorders should be made available through public
hospital districts because such a diagnosis will enable the primary
goal of treatment. Children with autism can be accurately diagnosed as
early as sixteen months of age, and professionals have the ability to
identify those who are at risk as early as ten months of age, but
children of all ages shall be served. Treatment of autism spectrum
disorder is to maximize the child's ultimate functional independence
and quality of life by minimizing the core autism spectrum disorder
features, facilitating development and learning, promoting
socialization and functional independence and quality of life, reducing
maladaptive behaviors, and educating and supporting families and
reducing family distress. Without an accurate diagnosis, children and
families may not receive empirically supportive health care treatment
and interventions which are likely to have a positive effect on
habilitative progress, functional outcomes, and quality of life.
Timely diagnosis and intervention can result in a significant
increase in intelligence quotient and language ability and a decrease
in special education services needed later in childhood. The average
intelligence quotient of children receiving intensive early
intervention is twenty-eight points. Many children who had severe
below-normal cognition at the beginning of intervention were
functioning in the normal cognitive range and attending regular
education classrooms by five years of age. These results stand in
stark contrast to the very poor outcomes of children who do not receive
early diagnosis, treatment, and intervention.
Access to diagnosis and intervention are also critical to financial
health and well-being. Because of the remarkable response to
intervention, cost savings are substantial to individuals with autism,
their families, and society. Cost-benefit analyses published in peer-reviewed journals estimate that the lifetime net financial cost savings
to society per individual who receives intensive early intervention is
two and one-half to three million dollars. The impact of timely
diagnosis and intervention on the quality of life for individuals with
autism and their families is immeasurable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Public hospital districts, as defined in RCW
70.44.007, shall, within existing revenue, develop a team of qualified
diagnosticians prepared to assess and diagnose autism spectrum
disorders for free for people living within the taxing borders of a
public hospital district and at reduced cost for people living outside
the taxing borders of the public hospital district. Once the diagnosis
is made or suspected, the child and his or her family shall be referred
to treatment and early intensive intervention services.
(1) The diagnostic team's composition will include at a minimum a
core provider team made up of a psychologist, a pediatrician, and
another primary care provider with expertise in pediatrics, but may
also include a psychiatrist, and a master degree social worker. The
addition of the diagnostic team is intended to make a public hospital
district a comprehensive center for children with autism and their
families. The diagnostic team shall regularly travel in the region
served by the public hospital district and host clinics accessible to
children and their families.
(2) The diagnostic team shall provide the following services to
children from the ages of ten months to twenty-one years:
(a) Assessment of a child's cognitive/developmental skills;
(b) Semistructured assessment of their social, language, and
play/recreational skills;
(c) Thorough history using standardized tools;
(d) A neurodevelopmental evaluation by a developmental
pediatrician, neurologist, or pediatrician well-versed in autism
spectrum disorders; and
(e) Comorbid risk for sleep, gastrointestinal, psychiatric,
genetic, and metabolic disorders.
Access to intervention and services is best provided with the
inclusion of social work to help a family navigate initial diagnosis
and community supports.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The autism centers at Tacoma and Seattle
shall provide the evidence-based standard model for diagnosis and
access to intervention to be used by the public hospital districts.

--- END ---