BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 In order to support the families of military
personnel serving in military conflicts, and to assure that these
families are able to spend time together during a military member's
leave from deployment, the legislature intends to provide fifteen days
paid leave.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 49.86 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The definitions in this section apply throughout this section
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Employer" means: (i) Any person, firm, corporation,
partnership, business trust, legal representative, or other business
entity which engages in any business, industry, profession, or activity
in this state; (ii) the state, state institutions, and state agencies;
and (iii) any unit of local government including, but not limited to,
a county, city, town, municipal corporation, quasi-municipal
corporation, or political subdivision.
(b) "Employee" means a person who performs service for hire for an
employer, for an average of twenty or more hours per week, and includes
all individuals employed at any site owned or operated by an employer,
but does not include an independent contractor.
(c) "Spouse" means a husband or wife.
(d) "Period of military conflict" means a period of war declared by
the United States congress, declared by executive order of the
president, or in which a member of a reserve component of the armed
forces is ordered to active duty pursuant to either sections 12301 and
12302 of Title 10 of the United States Code or Title 32 of the United
States Code.
(2) The spouse of a member of the armed forces of the United
States, national guard, or reserves who has been deployed during a
period of military conflict shall be allowed up to fifteen days of
benefits under RCW 49.86.060 when their military spouse is on leave
from deployment during a period of military conflict.
(3) The employee spouse must provide his or her employer with
notice, within five business days of receiving official notice that the
military spouse will be on leave from deployment, of his or her
intention to take the family military leave.
(4) The leave provided for in this section is in addition to any
vacation, sick, or other leave the employee may be entitled.
(5) An employer shall not retaliate against an employee for
requesting or taking the leave provided for in this section.
(6) The director shall adopt rules as necessary to implement this
section.

Sec. 3 RCW 49.86.050 and 2007 c 357 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except under section 2 of this act, the maximum number of weeks
during which family leave insurance benefits are payable in an
application year is five weeks. ((However,)) Except under section 2 of
this act, benefits are not payable during a waiting period consisting
of the first seven calendar days of family leave taken in an
application year, whether the first seven calendar days of family leave
are employer paid or unpaid.
(2)(a) The first payment of benefits must be made to an individual
within two weeks after the claim is filed or the family leave began,
whichever is later, and subsequent payments must be made semimonthly
thereafter.
(b) The payment of benefits under this chapter shall not be
considered a binding determination of the obligations of the department
under this chapter. The acceptance of compensation by the individual
shall likewise not be considered a binding determination of his or her
rights under this chapter. Whenever any payment of benefits under this
chapter has been made and timely appeal therefrom has been made where
the final decision is that the payment was improper, the individual
shall repay it and recoupment may be made from any future payment due
to the individual on any claim under this chapter. The director may
exercise his or her discretion to waive, in whole or in part, the
amount of any such payments where the recovery would be against equity
and good conscience.
(c) If an individual dies before he or she receives a payment of
benefits, the payment shall be made by the department and distributed
consistent with the terms of the decedent's will or, if the decedent
dies intestate, consistent with the terms of RCW 11.04.015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect July 1, 2008.

--- END ---