BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.05.008 and 2005 c 143 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every employing agency shall fully cooperate with the authority
and shall carry out all actions necessary for the operation of benefit
plans, education of employees, claims administration, appeals process,
and other activities that may be required by the authority for
administration of this chapter, and shall accept and carry out all
other duties as required by law, regulation, or administrative
instruction from the authority.
(2) Employing agencies shall report all data relating to employees
eligible to participate in benefits or plans administered by the
authority in a format designed and communicated by the authority.
(3) The authority may delegate to employing agencies the task of
determining individual employees' eligibility for benefits.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.05.065 and 2007 c 156 s 10 and 2007 c 114 s 5 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The board shall study all matters connected with the provision
of health care coverage, life insurance, liability insurance,
accidental death and dismemberment insurance, and disability income
insurance or any of, or a combination of, the enumerated types of
insurance for employees and their dependents on the best basis possible
with relation both to the welfare of the employees and to the state.
However, liability insurance shall not be made available to dependents.
(2) The board shall develop employee benefit plans that include
comprehensive health care benefits for all employees. In developing
these plans, the board shall consider the following elements:
(a) Methods of maximizing cost containment while ensuring access to
quality health care;
(b) Development of provider arrangements that encourage cost
containment and ensure access to quality care, including but not
limited to prepaid delivery systems and prospective payment methods;
(c) Wellness incentives that focus on proven strategies, such as
smoking cessation, injury and accident prevention, reduction of alcohol
misuse, appropriate weight reduction, exercise, automobile and
motorcycle safety, blood cholesterol reduction, and nutrition
education;
(d) Utilization review procedures including, but not limited to a
cost-efficient method for prior authorization of services, hospital
inpatient length of stay review, requirements for use of outpatient
surgeries and second opinions for surgeries, review of invoices or
claims submitted by service providers, and performance audit of
providers;
(e) Effective coordination of benefits;
(f) Minimum standards for insuring entities; and
(g) Minimum scope and content of public employee benefit plans to
be offered to enrollees participating in the employee health benefit
plans. To maintain the comprehensive nature of employee health care
benefits, employee eligibility criteria related to the number of hours
worked and the benefits provided to employees shall be substantially
equivalent to the state employees' health benefits plan and eligibility
criteria in effect on January 1, 1993. Nothing in this subsection
(2)(g) shall prohibit changes or increases in employee point-of-service
payments or employee premium payments for benefits or the
administration of a high deductible health plan in conjunction with a
health savings account.
(3) The board shall design benefits and has the exclusive authority
to determine the terms and conditions of employee and retired employee
participation and coverage, including establishment of eligibility
criteria subject to the requirements of RCW 41.05.066. The same terms
and conditions of participation and coverage, including eligibility
criteria, shall apply to state employees and to school district
employees and educational service district employees. The
administrator shall adopt rules setting forth criteria for determining
employee eligibility for benefits and the appeal process by which
employees may appeal benefits and eligibility determinations.
(4) The board may authorize premium contributions for an employee
and the employee's dependents in a manner that encourages the use of
cost-efficient managed health care systems. During the 2005-2007
fiscal biennium, the board may only authorize premium contributions for
an employee and the employee's dependents that are the same, regardless
of an employee's status as represented or nonrepresented by a
collective bargaining unit under the personnel system reform act of
2002. The board shall require participating school district and
educational service district employees to pay at least the same
employee premiums by plan and family size as state employees pay.
(5) The board shall develop a health savings account option for
employees that conform to section 223, Part VII of subchapter B of
chapter 1 of the internal revenue code of 1986. The board shall comply
with all applicable federal standards related to the establishment of
health savings accounts.
(6) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the board
shall develop a high deductible health plan to be offered in
conjunction with a health savings account developed under subsection
(5) of this section.
(7) Employees shall choose participation in one of the health care
benefit plans developed by the board and may be permitted to waive
coverage under terms and conditions established by the board.
(8) The board shall review plans proposed by insuring entities that
desire to offer property insurance and/or accident and casualty
insurance to state employees through payroll deduction. The board may
approve any such plan for payroll deduction by insuring entities
holding a valid certificate of authority in the state of Washington and
which the board determines to be in the best interests of employees and
the state. The board shall adopt rules setting forth criteria by which
it shall evaluate the plans.
(9) Before January 1, 1998, the public employees' benefits board
shall make available one or more fully insured long-term care insurance
plans that comply with the requirements of chapter 48.84 RCW. Such
programs shall be made available to eligible employees, retired
employees, and retired school employees as well as eligible dependents
which, for the purpose of this section, includes the parents of the
employee or retiree and the parents of the spouse of the employee or
retiree. Employees of local governments, political subdivisions, and
tribal governments not otherwise enrolled in the public employees'
benefits board sponsored medical programs may enroll under terms and
conditions established by the administrator, if it does not jeopardize
the financial viability of the public employees' benefits board's long-term care offering.
(a) Participation of eligible employees or retired employees and
retired school employees in any long-term care insurance plan made
available by the public employees' benefits board is voluntary and
shall not be subject to binding arbitration under chapter 41.56 RCW.
Participation is subject to reasonable underwriting guidelines and
eligibility rules established by the public employees' benefits board
and the health care authority.
(b) The employee, retired employee, and retired school employee are
solely responsible for the payment of the premium rates developed by
the health care authority. The health care authority is authorized to
charge a reasonable administrative fee in addition to the premium
charged by the long-term care insurer, which shall include the health
care authority's cost of administration, marketing, and consumer
education materials prepared by the health care authority and the
office of the insurance commissioner.
(c) To the extent administratively possible, the state shall
establish an automatic payroll or pension deduction system for the
payment of the long-term care insurance premiums.
(d) The public employees' benefits board and the health care
authority shall establish a technical advisory committee to provide
advice in the development of the benefit design and establishment of
underwriting guidelines and eligibility rules. The committee shall
also advise the board and authority on effective and cost-effective
ways to market and distribute the long-term care product. The
technical advisory committee shall be comprised, at a minimum, of
representatives of the office of the insurance commissioner, providers
of long-term care services, licensed insurance agents with expertise in
long-term care insurance, employees, retired employees, retired school
employees, and other interested parties determined to be appropriate by
the board.
(e) The health care authority shall offer employees, retired
employees, and retired school employees the option of purchasing long-term care insurance through licensed agents or brokers appointed by the
long-term care insurer. The authority, in consultation with the public
employees' benefits board, shall establish marketing procedures and may
consider all premium components as a part of the contract negotiations
with the long-term care insurer.
(f) In developing the long-term care insurance benefit designs, the
public employees' benefits board shall include an alternative plan of
care benefit, including adult day services, as approved by the office
of the insurance commissioner.
(g) The health care authority, with the cooperation of the office
of the insurance commissioner, shall develop a consumer education
program for the eligible employees, retired employees, and retired
school employees designed to provide education on the potential need
for long-term care, methods of financing long-term care, and the
availability of long-term care insurance products including the
products offered by the board.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.05.021 and 2007 c 274 s 1 and 2007 c 114 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The Washington state health care authority is created within
the executive branch. The authority shall have an administrator
appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate. The
administrator shall serve at the pleasure of the governor. The
administrator may employ up to seven staff members, who shall be exempt
from chapter 41.06 RCW, and any additional staff members as are
necessary to administer this chapter. The administrator may delegate
any power or duty vested in him or her by this chapter, including
authority to make final decisions and enter final orders in hearings
conducted under chapter 34.05 RCW. The primary duties of the authority
shall be to: Administer state employees' insurance benefits and
retired or disabled school employees' insurance benefits; administer
the basic health plan pursuant to chapter 70.47 RCW; study state-purchased health care programs in order to maximize cost containment in
these programs while ensuring access to quality health care; implement
state initiatives, joint purchasing strategies, and techniques for
efficient administration that have potential application to all state-purchased health services; and administer grants that further the
mission and goals of the authority. The authority's duties include,
but are not limited to, the following:
(a) To administer health care benefit programs for employees and
retired or disabled school employees as specifically authorized in RCW
41.05.065 and in accordance with the methods described in RCW
41.05.075, 41.05.140, and other provisions of this chapter;
(b) To analyze state-purchased health care programs and to explore
options for cost containment and delivery alternatives for those
programs that are consistent with the purposes of those programs,
including, but not limited to:
(i) Creation of economic incentives for the persons for whom the
state purchases health care to appropriately utilize and purchase
health care services, including the development of flexible benefit
plans to offset increases in individual financial responsibility;
(ii) Utilization of provider arrangements that encourage cost
containment, including but not limited to prepaid delivery systems,
utilization review, and prospective payment methods, and that ensure
access to quality care, including assuring reasonable access to local
providers, especially for employees residing in rural areas;
(iii) Coordination of state agency efforts to purchase drugs
effectively as provided in RCW 70.14.050;
(iv) Development of recommendations and methods for purchasing
medical equipment and supporting services on a volume discount basis;
(v) Development of data systems to obtain utilization data from
state-purchased health care programs in order to identify cost centers,
utilization patterns, provider and hospital practice patterns, and
procedure costs, utilizing the information obtained pursuant to RCW
41.05.031; and
(vi) In collaboration with other state agencies that administer
state purchased health care programs, private health care purchasers,
health care facilities, providers, and carriers:
(A) Use evidence-based medicine principles to develop common
performance measures and implement financial incentives in contracts
with insuring entities, health care facilities, and providers that:
(I) Reward improvements in health outcomes for individuals with
chronic diseases, increased utilization of appropriate preventive
health services, and reductions in medical errors; and
(II) Increase, through appropriate incentives to insuring entities,
health care facilities, and providers, the adoption and use of
information technology that contributes to improved health outcomes,
better coordination of care, and decreased medical errors;
(B) Through state health purchasing, reimbursement, or pilot
strategies, promote and increase the adoption of health information
technology systems, including electronic medical records, by hospitals
as defined in RCW 70.41.020(4), integrated delivery systems, and
providers that:
(I) Facilitate diagnosis or treatment;
(II) Reduce unnecessary duplication of medical tests;
(III) Promote efficient electronic physician order entry;
(IV) Increase access to health information for consumers and their
providers; and
(V) Improve health outcomes;
(C) Coordinate a strategy for the adoption of health information
technology systems using the final health information technology report
and recommendations developed under chapter 261, Laws of 2005;
(c) To analyze areas of public and private health care interaction;
(d) To provide information and technical and administrative
assistance to the board;
(e) To review and approve or deny applications from counties,
municipalities, and other political subdivisions of the state to
provide state-sponsored insurance or self-insurance programs to their
employees in accordance with the provisions of RCW 41.04.205 and (g) of
this subsection, setting the premium contribution for approved groups
as outlined in RCW 41.05.050;
(f) To review and approve or deny the application when the
governing body of a tribal government applies to transfer their
employees to an insurance or self-insurance program administered under
this chapter. In the event of an employee transfer pursuant to this
subsection (1)(f), members of the governing body are eligible to be
included in such a transfer if the members are authorized by the tribal
government to participate in the insurance program being transferred
from and subject to payment by the members of all costs of insurance
for the members. The authority shall: (i) Establish the conditions
for participation; (ii) have the sole right to reject the application;
and (iii) set the premium contribution for approved groups as outlined
in RCW 41.05.050. Approval of the application by the authority
transfers the employees and dependents involved to the insurance,
self-insurance, or health care program approved by the authority;
(g) To ensure the continued status of the employee insurance or
self-insurance programs administered under this chapter as a
governmental plan under section 3(32) of the employee retirement income
security act of 1974, as amended, the authority shall limit the
participation of employees of a county, municipal, school district,
educational service district, or other political subdivision, or a
tribal government, including providing for the participation of those
employees whose services are substantially all in the performance of
essential governmental functions, but not in the performance of
commercial activities;
(h) To establish billing procedures and collect funds from school
districts in a way that minimizes the administrative burden on
districts;
(i) To publish and distribute to nonparticipating school districts
and educational service districts by October 1st of each year a
description of health care benefit plans available through the
authority and the estimated cost if school districts and educational
service district employees were enrolled;
(j) To apply for, receive, and accept grants, gifts, and other
payments, including property and service, from any governmental or
other public or private entity or person, and make arrangements as to
the use of these receipts to implement initiatives and strategies
developed under this section;
(k) To issue, distribute, and administer grants that further the
mission and goals of the authority; ((and))
(l) To adopt rules consistent with this chapter as described in RCW
41.05.160, including, but not limited to:
(i) Setting forth criteria for determining benefits eligibility as
authorized in RCW 41.05.065, including determining individual
employees' eligibility for benefits and any delegation of authority to
employing agencies; and
(ii) Establishing and maintaining an appeal process by which
employees may appeal benefits and eligibility determinations.
(2) On and after January 1, 1996, the public employees' benefits
board may implement strategies to promote managed competition among
employee health benefit plans. Strategies may include but are not
limited to:
(a) Standardizing the benefit package;
(b) Soliciting competitive bids for the benefit package;
(c) Limiting the state's contribution to a percent of the lowest
priced qualified plan within a geographical area;
(d) Monitoring the impact of the approach under this subsection
with regards to: Efficiencies in health service delivery, cost shifts
to subscribers, access to and choice of managed care plans statewide,
and quality of health services. The health care authority shall also
advise on the value of administering a benchmark employer-managed plan
to promote competition among managed care plans.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect January 1, 2009.

--- END ---