BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 50.12.220 and 2007 c 146 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If an employer fails to file a timely report as required by RCW
50.12.070, or the rules adopted pursuant thereto, the employer is
subject to a penalty of twenty-five dollars per violation, unless the
penalty is waived by the commissioner.
(2) An employer who files an incomplete or incorrectly formatted
tax and wage report as required by RCW 50.12.070 must receive a warning
letter ((for the first occurrence)). The warning letter will provide
instructions for accurate reporting or notify the employer how to
obtain technical assistance from the department. The letter will also
notify the employer that the employer has thirty days to correct the
inaccuracy before penalties may be assessed. Except as provided in
subsections (3) and (4) of this section, when an employer has failed to
correct an inaccuracy within thirty days, and for subsequent
occurrences within five years of the last occurrence, the employer is
subject to a penalty as follows:
(a) When no contributions are due: For the ((second)) first
occurrence, the penalty is seventy-five dollars; for the ((third))
second occurrence, the penalty is one hundred fifty dollars; and for
the ((fourth)) third occurrence and for each occurrence thereafter, the
penalty is two hundred fifty dollars.
(b) When contributions are due: For the ((second)) first
occurrence, the penalty is ten percent of the quarterly contributions
due, but not less than seventy-five dollars and not more than two
hundred fifty dollars; for the ((third)) second occurrence, the penalty
is ten percent of the quarterly contributions due, but not less than
one hundred fifty dollars and not more than two hundred fifty dollars;
and for the ((fourth)) third occurrence and each occurrence thereafter,
the penalty is two hundred fifty dollars.
(3) If an employer knowingly misrepresents to the employment
security department the amount of his or her payroll upon which
contributions under this title are based, the employer shall be liable
to the state for up to ten times the amount of the difference in
contributions paid, if any, and the amount the employer should have
paid and for the reasonable expenses of auditing his or her books and
collecting such sums. Such liability may be enforced in the name of
the department.
(4) If contributions are not paid on the date on which they are due
and payable as prescribed by the commissioner, there shall be assessed
a penalty of five percent of the amount of the contributions for the
first month or part thereof of delinquency; there shall be assessed a
total penalty of ten percent of the amount of the contributions for the
second month or part thereof of delinquency; and there shall be
assessed a total penalty of twenty percent of the amount of the
contributions for the third month or part thereof of delinquency. No
penalty so added shall be less than ten dollars. These penalties are
in addition to the interest charges assessed under RCW 50.24.040.
(5) Penalties shall not accrue on contributions from an estate in
the hands of a receiver, executor, administrator, trustee in
bankruptcy, common law assignee, or other liquidating officer
subsequent to the date when such receiver, executor, administrator,
trustee in bankruptcy, common law assignee, or other liquidating
officer qualifies as such, but contributions accruing with respect to
employment of persons by a receiver, executor, administrator, trustee
in bankruptcy, common law assignee, or other liquidating officer shall
become due and shall be subject to penalties in the same manner as
contributions due from other employers.
(6) Where adequate information has been furnished to the department
and the department has failed to act or has advised the employer of no
liability or inability to decide the issue, penalties shall be waived
by the commissioner. Penalties may also be waived for good cause if
the commissioner determines that the failure to file timely, complete,
and correctly formatted reports or pay timely contributions was not due
to the employer's fault.
(7) Any decision to assess a penalty as provided by this section
shall be made by the chief administrative officer of the tax branch or
his or her designee.
(8) Nothing in this section shall be construed to deny an employer
the right to appeal the assessment of any penalty. Such appeal shall
be made in the manner provided in RCW 50.32.030.

--- END ---