BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The intent of the legislature is to make
state revenue and expenditure data as open, transparent, and publicly
accessible as possible. Increasing the ease of public access to state
budget data, particularly where the data are currently available from
disparate internal government sources but are difficult for the public
to collect and efficiently aggregate, significantly contributes to
governmental accountability, public participation, agency efficiency,
and open government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 44.48 RCW
to read as follows:
By January 1, 2009, in collaboration with the office of financial
management, using existing databases and structures currently shared,
the office of the legislative evaluation and accountability program
committee shall establish and make available to the public a state
expenditure information web site. The state expenditure information
web site shall provide access to current budget data, access to current
accounting data for budgeted expenditures and staff, and access to
historical data. At a minimum, the web site will provide access or
links to the following information as data are available:
(1) State expenditures by fund or account;
(2) State expenditures by agency, program, and subprogram;
(3) State revenues by major source and source;
(4) State expenditures by object and subobject;
(5) State agency workloads, caseloads, and performance measures;
and
(6) State agency budget data by activity.
"State agency," as used in this section, includes every state
agency, office, board, commission, or institution of the executive,
legislative, or judicial branches, including institutions of higher
education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.88 RCW
to read as follows:
The office of financial management, in conjunction with the public
disclosure commission, shall establish a database that links (1) the
database of state agency contracts for personal services and purchased
services required to be filed with the office of financial management
under chapter 39.29 RCW, and (2) the database of campaign contributions
required to be reported to the public disclosure commission under
chapter 42.17 RCW. The database established under this section shall
be accessible to the public, without charge, on the internet.

--- END ---