BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 By August 1, 2008, the code reviser shall
provide the state government committees of the senate and house of
representatives with a list of all statutes that contain definitions or
references that are inconsistent with this act.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.105.020 and 2003 c 18 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context indicates otherwise,
the following definitions shall apply:
(1) "Department" means the department of information services;
(2) "Board" means the information services board;
(3) "Committee" means the state interoperability executive
committee;
(4) "Local governments" includes all municipal and quasi municipal
corporations and political subdivisions, and all agencies of such
corporations and subdivisions authorized to contract separately;
(5) "Director" means the director of the department;
(6) "Purchased services" means services provided by a vendor to
accomplish routine, continuing, and necessary functions. This term
includes, but is not limited to, services acquired for equipment
maintenance and repair, operation of a physical plant, security,
computer hardware and software installation and maintenance,
telecommunications installation and maintenance, data entry, keypunch
services, programming services, and computer time-sharing;
(7) "Backbone network" means the shared high-density portions of
the state's telecommunications transmission facilities. It includes
specially conditioned high-speed communications carrier lines,
multiplexors, switches associated with such communications lines, and
any equipment and software components necessary for management and
control of the backbone network;
(8) "Telecommunications" ((means the transmission of information by
wire, radio, optical cable, electromagnetic, or other means;
(9) "Information" includes, but is not limited to, data, text,
voice, and video)) has the same meaning as contained in RCW 80.04.010;
(((10))) (9) "Information processing" means the electronic capture,
collection, storage, manipulation, transmission, retrieval, and
presentation of information in the form of data, text, voice, or image
and includes telecommunications and office automation functions;
(((11))) (10) "Information services" means data processing,
telecommunications, office automation, and computerized information
systems;
(((12))) (11) "Equipment" means the machines, devices, and
transmission facilities used in information processing, such as
computers, word processors, terminals, telephones, wireless
communications system facilities, cables, and any physical facility
necessary for the operation of such equipment;
(((13))) (12) "Information technology portfolio" or "portfolio"
means a strategic management process documenting relationships between
agency missions and information technology and telecommunications
investments;
(((14))) (13) "Oversight" means a process of comprehensive risk
analysis and management designed to ensure optimum use of information
technology resources and telecommunications;
(((15))) (14) "Proprietary software" means that software offered
for sale or license;
(((16))) (15) "Video telecommunications" means the electronic
interconnection of two or more sites for the purpose of transmitting
and/or receiving visual and associated audio information. Video
telecommunications shall not include existing public television
broadcast stations as currently designated by the department of
community, trade, and economic development under chapter 43.330 RCW;
(((17))) (16) "K-20 educational network board" or "K-20 board"
means the K-20 educational network board created in RCW 43.105.800;
(((18))) (17) "K-20 network technical steering committee" or
"committee" means the K-20 network technical steering committee created
in RCW 43.105.810;
(((19))) (18) "K-20 network" means the network established in RCW
43.105.820;
(((20))) (19) "Educational sectors" means those institutions of
higher education, school districts, and educational service districts
that use the network for distance education, data transmission, and
other uses permitted by the K-20 board.

Sec. 3 RCW 9A.36.080 and 1993 c 127 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of malicious harassment if he or she
maliciously and intentionally commits one of the following acts because
of his or her perception of the victim's race, color, religion,
ancestry, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, or mental,
physical, or sensory handicap:
(a) Causes physical injury to the victim or another person;
(b) Causes physical damage to or destruction of the property of the
victim or another person; or
(c) Threatens a specific person or group of persons and places that
person, or members of the specific group of persons, in reasonable fear
of harm to person or property. The fear must be a fear that a
reasonable person would have under all the circumstances. For purposes
of this section, a "reasonable person" is a reasonable person who is a
member of the victim's race, color, religion, ancestry, national
origin, gender, or sexual orientation, or who has the same mental,
physical, or sensory handicap as the victim. Words alone do not
constitute malicious harassment unless the context or circumstances
surrounding the words indicate the words are a threat. Threatening
words do not constitute malicious harassment if it is apparent to the
victim that the person does not have the ability to carry out the
threat.
(2) In any prosecution for malicious harassment, unless evidence
exists which explains to the trier of fact's satisfaction that the
person did not intend to threaten the victim or victims, the trier of
fact may infer that the person intended to threaten a specific victim
or group of victims because of the person's perception of the victim's
or victims' race, color, religion, ancestry, national origin, gender,
sexual orientation, or mental, physical, or sensory handicap if the
person commits one of the following acts:
(a) Burns a cross on property of a victim who is or whom the actor
perceives to be of African American heritage; or
(b) Defaces property of a victim who is or whom the actor perceives
to be of Jewish heritage by defacing the property with a swastika.
This subsection only applies to the creation of a reasonable
inference for evidentiary purposes. This subsection does not restrict
the state's ability to prosecute a person under subsection (1) of this
section when the facts of a particular case do not fall within (a) or
(b) of this subsection.
(3) It is not a defense that the accused was mistaken that the
victim was a member of a certain race, color, religion, ancestry,
national origin, gender, or sexual orientation, or had a mental,
physical, or sensory handicap.
(4) Evidence of expressions or associations of the accused may not
be introduced as substantive evidence at trial unless the evidence
specifically relates to the crime charged. Nothing in this chapter
shall affect the rules of evidence governing impeachment of a witness.
(5) Every person who commits another crime during the commission of
a crime under this section may be punished and prosecuted for the other
crime separately.
(6) "Sexual orientation" for the purposes of this section ((means
heterosexuality, homosexuality, or bisexuality)) shall have the same
meaning as in RCW 49.60.040.
(7) Malicious harassment is a class C felony.
(8) The penalties provided in this section for malicious harassment
do not preclude the victims from seeking any other remedies otherwise
available under law.
(9) Nothing in this section confers or expands any civil rights or
protections to any group or class identified under this section, beyond
those rights or protections that exist under the federal or state
Constitution or the civil laws of the state of Washington.

--- END ---