BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Given that transportation is the source of
nearly half of Washington's greenhouse gas emissions, and
transportation-related emissions are expected to grow by more than
twenty-five percent by 2020, the legislature finds that significant
reductions in transportation-related emissions are required to meet the
climate pollution reduction goals in Executive Order 07-02.
To reduce transportation-related emissions, the state must
implement multiple strategies. New technologies and cleaner fuels are
vital to reducing greenhouse gas emissions. However, as long as annual
vehicle miles traveled continue to grow, those climate change goals
will remain out of reach.
The state's ability to achieve significant vehicle miles traveled
reductions depends, in large part, on the implementation and use of
expanded regional and local multimodal design, tools, innovations, and
investments. The legislature further finds that the reduction of
vehicle miles traveled, through a partnership at the state, regional,
and local levels, is critical to reaching the state's climate pollution
reduction goals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To support the implementation of RCW 47.04.280 and
47.01.078(4), the department shall adopt broad statewide goals to
reduce annual per capita vehicle miles traveled by 2050 consistent with
the stated goals of Executive Order 07-02. Consistent with these
goals, the department shall:
(a) Establish the following benchmarks using a statewide baseline
of seventy-five billion vehicle miles traveled less the vehicle miles
traveled attributable to vehicles licensed under RCW 46.16.070 and
weighing 10,000 pounds or more, which are exempt from this section:
(i) Decrease the annual per capita vehicle miles traveled by
eighteen percent by 2020;
(ii) Decrease the annual per capita vehicle miles traveled by
thirty percent by 2035; and
(iii) Decrease the annual per capita vehicle miles traveled by
fifty percent by 2050;
(b) By July 1, 2008, establish and convene a collaborative process
to develop a set of tools and best practices to assist state, regional,
and local entities in making progress towards the benchmarks
established in subsection (1) of this section. The collaborative
process must:
(i) Be jointly facilitated by the department and the department of
community, trade, and economic development;
(ii) Provide for participation from regional transportation
planning organizations, the Washington state transit association, the
Puget Sound clean air agency, and at least one major private employer
that participates in the commute trip reduction program;
(iii) Identify current strategies to reduce vehicle miles traveled
in the state as well as successful strategies in other jurisdictions
that may be applicable in the state;
(iv) Identify potential new revenue options for local and regional
governments to authorize to finance vehicle miles traveled reduction
efforts;
(v) Provide for the development of measurement tools that can, with
a high level of confidence, measure annual progress toward the
benchmarks at the local, regional, and state levels and can adequately
distinguish between common travel purposes, such as moving freight or
commuting to work;
(vi) Establish a process for the department to periodically
evaluate progress toward the vehicle miles traveled benchmarks, measure
achieved and projected emissions reductions, and recommend whether the
benchmarks should be adjusted to meet the state's overall goals for the
reduction of greenhouse gas emissions;
(vii) Estimate the projected reductions in greenhouse gas emissions
if the benchmarks are achieved, taking into account the expected
implementation of existing state and federal mandates for vehicle
technology and fuels, as well as expected growth in population and
vehicle travel; and
(viii) By December 1, 2008, provide a report to the transportation
committees of the legislature on the collaborative process and
resulting recommended tools and best practices to achieve the reduction
in annual per capita vehicle miles traveled goals.
(2) Associations representing those vehicles provided an exemption
under subsection (1) of this section are encouraged to continue to
pursue emission reduction efforts including use of cleaner fuels, more
efficient and cleaner vehicle fleets, development of electrification at
idle opportunities, and off-peak delivery schedules.

--- END ---