BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The sum of fifty million dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2008, from the emergency reserve fund solely for expenditure
into the disaster recovery account in response to the emergency caused
by a natural disaster and declared a statewide flood emergency by the
governor on December 3, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The sum of fifty million dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the biennium ending
June 30, 2009, from the disaster response account to the department of
transportation solely for the Chehalis-Centralia flood control project.
The office of financial management shall not allot funds for the
project until an agreement between nonfederal project partners has been
signed and submitted to the governor, the majority and minority leaders
of the senate, and the speaker and minority leader of the house of
representatives. The agreement must delineate responsibility for the
ongoing maintenance of the improved levees and operations of the dam.
The agreement must also include a plan to limit future land use
development in the floodplain in accordance with federal and state
floodplain management requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---