BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.180.010 and 1992 c 125 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person who serves legal process for a fee in the state of
Washington shall be a resident of the state of Washington and shall
register as a process server with the auditor of the county in which
the process server resides or operates his or her principal place of
business.
(2) The requirement to register under subsection (1) of this
section does not apply to any of the following persons:
(a) A sheriff, deputy sheriff, marshal, constable, or government
employee who is acting in the course of employment;
(b) An attorney or the attorney's employees, who are not serving
process on a fee basis;
(c) A person who is court appointed to serve the court's process;
(d) An employee of a person who is registered under this section;
(e) A person who does not receive a fee or wage for serving
process.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.12.370 and 2005 c 340 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to any other authority which it may have, the
department of licensing may furnish lists of registered and legal
owners of motor vehicles only for the purposes specified in this
section to:
(1) The manufacturers of motor vehicles, or their authorized
agents, to be used to enable those manufacturers to carry out the
provisions of the National Traffic and Motor Vehicle Safety Act of 1966
(15 U.S.C. sec. 1382-1418), including amendments or additions thereto,
respecting safety-related defects in motor vehicles;
(2) Any governmental agency of the United States or Canada, or
political subdivisions thereof, to be used by it or by its authorized
commercial agents or contractors only in connection with the
enforcement of motor vehicle or traffic laws by, or programs related to
traffic safety of, that government agency. Only such parts of the list
as are required for completion of the work required of the agent or
contractor shall be provided to such agent or contractor;
(3) A commercial parking company requiring the names and addresses
of registered owners to notify them of outstanding parking violations.
Subject to the disclosure agreement provisions of RCW 46.12.380 and the
requirements of Executive Order 97-01, the department may provide only
the parts of the list that are required for completion of the work
required of the company;
(4) An authorized agent or contractor of the department, to be used
only in connection with providing motor vehicle excise tax, licensing,
title, and registration information to motor vehicle dealers;
(5) Any business regularly making loans to other persons to finance
the purchase of motor vehicles, to be used to assist the person
requesting the list to determine ownership of specific vehicles for the
purpose of determining whether or not to provide such financing; ((or))
(6) A company or its agents operating a toll facility under chapter
47.46 RCW or other applicable authority requiring the names, addresses,
and vehicle information of motor vehicle registered owners to identify
toll violators; or
(7) Process servers registered under RCW 18.180.010.
Where both a mailing address and residence address are recorded on
the vehicle record and are different, only the mailing address will be
disclosed. Both addresses will be disclosed in response to requests
for disclosure from courts, law enforcement agencies, or government
entities with enforcement, investigative, or taxing authority, or
process servers, and only for use in the normal course of conducting
their business.
If a list of registered and legal owners of motor vehicles is used
for any purpose other than that authorized in this section, the
manufacturer, governmental agency, commercial parking company,
authorized agent, contractor, financial institution, toll facility
operator, or process server, or their authorized agents or contractors
responsible for the unauthorized disclosure or use will be denied
further access to such information by the department of licensing.

--- END ---