BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) A fee charged by a financial institution
for the processing of a credit card transaction to a small business
owner must be set at a percentage rate of no higher than the rate
established in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) By no later than January 2, 2009, the department of financial
institutions must negotiate, on behalf of small business owners
licensed within Washington state, a written agreement limiting the
maximum transaction fee that financial institutions doing business with
small business owners licensed in this state may charge such business
owners for the processing of a credit card transaction.
(a) The agreement must include a maximum percentage rate, as
provided in (b) of this subsection (2), that financial institutions may
charge small business owners licensed in the state of Washington.
(b) The department of financial institutions must negotiate a
maximum percentage rate that is no higher than the maximum percentage
rate that is allowed to be charged to state agencies by financial
institutions for the processing of similar credit card transactions.
For the purposes of this subsection (2)(b), the department of general
administration must notify the department of financial institutions of
the maximum percentage rate that financial institutions are allowed to
charge state agencies as of the effective date of this act, and
annually every year thereafter.
(c) The percentage rate established by agreement under this section
must be adjusted annually to reflect any changes in the credit card
transaction fee percentage rate charged to state agencies, as reported
to the department of financial institutions by the department of
general administration under subsection (2)(b) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Small business owner" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
19.85.020.
(2) "Financial institution" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
31.45.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---