BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.08.100 and 1961 c 23 s 51.08.100 are each amended
to read as follows:
"Injury" means a sudden and tangible happening((,)) of a traumatic
nature((, producing)) that produces an immediate or prompt result((,
and occurring from without, and such physical conditions as result
therefrom)). For a worker to receive benefits for an injury under this
title, there must be a specific medical diagnosis directly related to
the injury that must contribute by a factor of at least fifty percent
to the worker's inability to work.

Sec. 2 RCW 51.08.160 and 1977 ex.s. c 350 s 13 are each amended
to read as follows:
"Permanent total disability" means the loss of both legs((,)) or
arms, or one leg and one arm, total loss of eyesight, or paralysis ((or
other condition)) resulting from a work-related injury or occupational
disease and permanently incapacitating the worker from performing ((any
work at any gainful occupation)) sedentary work or any other work
within a fifty mile radius of the worker's residence.

Sec. 3 RCW 51.32.020 and 1995 c 160 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) If injury or death results to a worker from the deliberate
intention of the worker himself or herself to produce such injury or
death, or while the worker is engaged in the attempt to commit, or the
commission of, a felony, neither the worker nor the widow, widower,
child, or dependent of the worker shall receive any payment under this
title.
(b) If injury or death results to a worker from the deliberate
intention of a beneficiary of that worker to produce the injury or
death, or if injury or death results to a worker as a consequence of a
beneficiary of that worker engaging in the attempt to commit, or the
commission of, a felony, the beneficiary shall not receive any payment
under this title.
(2) An invalid child, while being supported and cared for in a
state institution, shall not receive compensation under this chapter.
(3) No payment shall be made to or for a natural child of a
deceased worker and, at the same time, as the stepchild of a deceased
worker.
(4) Except for proper and necessary medical and surgical care
directly related to an injury or occupational disease, no payment shall
be made under this title to a worker, his or her spouse, or his or her
dependents if the worker used false or fraudulently obtained documents
to misrepresent his or her identity to obtain employment or his or her
ability to legally work in the United States.
(5) No payment shall be made under this title to a worker, his or
her spouse, or his or her dependents if the injury or occupational
disease sustained while in the course of employment resulted from a
preexisting medical condition such as, but not limited to, epilepsy or
diabetes that cause a seizure.
(6) No payment shall be made under this title to a worker, his or
her spouse, or his or her dependents if the worker was under the
influence of a controlled substance for which the worker did not have
a valid prescription at the time of the injury or occupational disease.
(7)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, no payment
shall be made under this title to a worker, his or her spouse, or his
or her dependents if:
(i) Under a prior claim, the worker was permanently restricted from
returning to the job held at the time of his or her injury or
occupational disease by his or her attending physician;
(ii) The worker received vocational rehabilitation services under
the prior claim; and
(iii) The worker sustained the new injury or occupational disease
while performing the job from which he or she was restricted.
(b) A worker not entitled to payment under (a) of this subsection
shall receive proper and necessary medical and surgical care directly
related to the new injury or occupational disease.
(8) No payment shall be made under this title to a worker, his or
her spouse, or his or her dependents for pain or other subjective
complaints alone, in the absence of objective relevant medical
findings.

Sec. 4 RCW 51.32.060 and 2007 c 284 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When the supervisor of industrial insurance ((shall))
determines that the worker's permanent total disability results from
the injury, the worker shall receive monthly during the period of such
disability, but not to exceed one hundred four weeks, the following
compensation:
(a) If married at the time of injury, sixty-five percent of his or
her wages.
(b) If married with one child at the time of injury, sixty-seven
percent of his or her wages.
(c) If married with two children at the time of injury, sixty-nine
percent of his or her wages.
(d) If married with three children at the time of injury,
seventy-one percent of his or her wages.
(e) If married with four children at the time of injury,
seventy-three percent of his or her wages.
(f) If married with five or more children at the time of injury,
seventy-five percent of his or her wages.
(g) If unmarried at the time of the injury, sixty percent of his or
her wages.
(h) If unmarried with one child at the time of injury, sixty-two
percent of his or her wages.
(i) If unmarried with two children at the time of injury,
sixty-four percent of his or her wages.
(j) If unmarried with three children at the time of injury,
sixty-six percent of his or her wages.
(k) If unmarried with four children at the time of injury,
sixty-eight percent of his or her wages.
(l) If unmarried with five or more children at the time of injury,
seventy percent of his or her wages.
(2) For any period of time where both husband and wife are entitled
to compensation as temporarily or totally disabled workers, only that
spouse having the higher wages of the two shall be entitled to claim
their child or children for compensation purposes.
(3) In case of permanent total disability, if the character of the
injury is such as to render the worker so physically helpless as to
require the hiring of the services of an attendant, the department
shall make monthly payments to such attendant for such services as long
as such requirement continues, but such payments shall not obtain or be
operative while the worker is receiving care under or pursuant to the
provisions of chapter 51.36 RCW and RCW 51.04.105.
(4) Should any further accident result in the permanent total
disability of an injured worker, he or she shall receive the pension to
which he or she would be entitled, notwithstanding the payment of a
lump sum for his or her prior injury.
(5) In no event shall the monthly payments provided in this
section:
(a) Exceed the applicable percentage of the average monthly wage in
the state as computed under the provisions of RCW 51.08.018 as follows:

AFTER PERCENTAGE

June 30, 1993 105%

June 30, 1994 110%

June 30, 1995 115%

June 30, 1996 120%

(b) For dates of injury or disease manifestation after July 1,
2008, be less than fifteen percent of the average monthly wage in the
state as computed under RCW 51.08.018 plus an additional ten dollars
per month if a worker is married and an additional ten dollars per
month for each child of the worker up to a maximum of five children.
However, if the monthly payment computed under this subsection (5)(b)
is greater than one hundred percent of the wages of the worker as
determined under RCW 51.08.178, the monthly payment due to the worker
shall be equal to the greater of the monthly wages of the worker or the
minimum benefit set forth in this section on June 30, 2008.
The limitations under this subsection shall not apply to the
payments provided for in subsection (3) of this section.
(6) In the case of new or reopened claims, if the supervisor of
industrial insurance determines that, at the time of filing or
reopening, the worker is voluntarily retired and is no longer attached
to the workforce, benefits shall not be paid under this section.
(7) The benefits provided by this section are subject to
modification under RCW 51.32.067.

Sec. 5 RCW 51.32.075 and 1988 c 161 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The compensation or death benefits payable pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter for temporary total disability, permanent
total disability, or death arising out of injuries or occupational
diseases shall be adjusted as follows:
(1) On July 1, 1982, there shall be an adjustment for those whose
right to compensation was established on or after July 1, 1971, and
before July 1, 1982. The adjustment shall be determined by multiplying
the amount of compensation to which they are entitled by a fraction,
the denominator of which shall be the average monthly wage in the state
under RCW 51.08.018 for the fiscal year in which such person's right to
compensation was established, and the numerator of which shall be the
average monthly wage in the state under RCW 51.08.018 on July 1, 1982.
(2) In addition to the adjustment established by subsection (1) of
this section, there shall be another adjustment on July 1, 1983, for
those whose right to compensation was established on or after July 1,
1971, and before July 1983, which shall be determined by multiplying
the amount of compensation to which they are entitled by a fraction,
the denominator of which shall be the average monthly wage in the state
under RCW 51.08.018 for the fiscal year in which such person's right to
compensation was established, and the numerator of which shall be the
average monthly wage in the state under RCW 51.08.018 on July 1, 1983.
(3) In addition to the adjustments under subsections (1) and (2) of
this section, further adjustments shall be made beginning on July 1,
1984, and on each July 1st thereafter for those whose right to
compensation was established on or after July 1, 1971. The adjustment
shall be determined by multiplying the amount of compensation to which
they are entitled by a fraction, the denominator of which shall be the
average monthly wage in the state under RCW 51.08.018 for the fiscal
year in which such person's right to compensation was established, and
the numerator of which shall be the average monthly wage in the state
under RCW 51.08.018 on July 1st of the year in which the adjustment is
being made. The department or self-insurer shall adjust the resulting
compensation rate to the nearest whole cent, not to exceed the average
monthly wage in the state as computed under RCW 51.08.018.
(4) For any awards made under RCW 51.32.060 on or after July 1,
2009, the benefits shall cease when the worker reaches the age of
seventy-five if the worker is receiving retirement benefits from social
security, an employer-sponsored pension plan, or any other retirement
plan.

Sec. 6 RCW 51.32.090 and 2007 c 284 s 3 and 2007 c 190 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) When the total disability is only temporary, the schedule of
payments contained in RCW 51.32.060 (1) and (2) shall apply, so long as
the total disability continues, but in no event for longer than one
hundred four weeks.
(2) Any compensation payable under this section for children not in
the custody of the injured worker as of the date of injury shall be
payable only to such person as actually is providing the support for
such child or children pursuant to the order of a court of record
providing for support of such child or children.
(3)(a) As soon as recovery is so complete that the present earning
power of the worker, at any kind of work, is restored to that existing
at the time of the occurrence of the injury, the payments shall cease.
If and so long as the present earning power is only partially restored,
the payments shall:
(i) For claims for injuries that occurred before May 7, 1993,
continue in the proportion which the new earning power shall bear to
the old; or
(ii) For claims for injuries occurring on or after May 7, 1993,
equal eighty percent of the actual difference between the worker's
present wages and earning power at the time of injury, but: (A) The
total of these payments and the worker's present wages may not exceed
one hundred fifty percent of the average monthly wage in the state as
computed under RCW 51.08.018; (B) the payments may not exceed one
hundred percent of the entitlement as computed under subsection (1) of
this section; and (C) the payments may not be less than the worker
would have received if (a)(i) of this subsection had been applicable to
the worker's claim.
(b) No compensation shall be payable under this subsection (3)
unless the loss of earning power shall exceed five percent.
(c) No compensation shall be payable under this subsection for
longer than one hundred four weeks.
(d) The prior closure of the claim or the receipt of permanent
partial disability benefits shall not affect the rate at which loss of
earning power benefits are calculated upon reopening the claim.
(4)(a) Whenever the employer of injury requests that a worker who
is entitled to temporary total disability under this chapter be
certified by a physician or licensed advanced registered nurse
practitioner as able to perform available work other than his or her
usual work, the employer shall furnish to the physician or licensed
advanced registered nurse practitioner, with a copy to the worker, a
statement describing the work available with the employer of injury in
terms that will enable the physician or licensed advanced registered
nurse practitioner to relate the physical activities of the job to the
worker's disability. The physician or licensed advanced registered
nurse practitioner shall then determine whether the worker is
physically able to perform the work described. The worker's temporary
total disability payments shall continue until the worker is released
by his or her physician or licensed advanced registered nurse
practitioner for the work, and begins the work with the employer of
injury. If the work thereafter comes to an end before the worker's
recovery is sufficient in the judgment of his or her physician or
licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner to permit him or her to
return to his or her usual job, or to perform other available work
offered by the employer of injury, the worker's temporary total
disability payments shall be resumed. Should the available work
described, once undertaken by the worker, impede his or her recovery to
the extent that in the judgment of his or her physician or licensed
advanced registered nurse practitioner he or she should not continue to
work, the worker's temporary total disability payments shall be resumed
when the worker ceases such work.
(b) Once the worker returns to work under the terms of this
subsection (4), he or she shall not be assigned by the employer to work
other than the available work described without the worker's written
consent, or without prior review and approval by the worker's physician
or licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner.
(c) If the worker returns to work under this subsection (4), any
employee health and welfare benefits that the worker was receiving at
the time of injury shall continue or be resumed at the level provided
at the time of injury. Such benefits shall not be continued or resumed
if to do so is inconsistent with the terms of the benefit program, or
with the terms of the collective bargaining agreement currently in
force.
(d) In the event of any dispute as to the worker's ability to
perform the available work offered by the employer, the department
shall make the final determination.
(5) No worker shall receive compensation for or during the day on
which injury was received or the three days following the same, unless
his or her disability shall continue for a period of fourteen
consecutive calendar days from date of injury: PROVIDED, That attempts
to return to work in the first fourteen days following the injury shall
not serve to break the continuity of the period of disability if the
disability continues fourteen days after the injury occurs.
(6) Should a worker suffer a temporary total disability and should
his or her employer at the time of the injury continue to pay him or
her the wages which he or she was earning at the time of such injury,
such injured worker shall not receive any payment provided in
subsection (1) of this section during the period his or her employer
shall so pay such wages: PROVIDED, That holiday pay, vacation pay,
sick leave, or other similar benefits shall not be deemed to be
payments by the employer for the purposes of this subsection.
(7) In no event shall the monthly payments provided in this
section:
(a) Exceed the applicable percentage of the average monthly wage in
the state as computed under the provisions of RCW 51.08.018 as follows:

AFTER
PERCENTAGE

June 30, 1993 105%

June 30, 1994 110%

June 30, 1995 115%

June 30, 1996 120%

(b) For dates of injury or disease manifestation after July 1,
2008, be less than fifteen percent of the average monthly wage in the
state as computed under RCW 51.08.018 plus an additional ten dollars
per month if the worker is married and an additional ten dollars per
month for each child of the worker up to a maximum of five children.
However, if the monthly payment computed under this subsection (7)(b)
is greater than one hundred percent of the wages of the worker as
determined under RCW 51.08.178, the monthly payment due to the worker
shall be equal to the greater of the monthly wages of the worker or the
minimum benefit set forth in this section on June 30, 2008.
(8) If the supervisor of industrial insurance determines that the
worker is voluntarily retired and is no longer attached to the
workforce, benefits shall not be paid under this section.

Sec. 7 RCW 51.32.100 and 1977 ex.s. c 350 s 49 are each amended
to read as follows:
If it is determined that an injured worker had, at the time of his
or her injury, ((a preexisting disease and that such disease delays or
prevents complete recovery from such injury, it shall be ascertained,
as nearly as possible, the period over which the injury would have
caused disability were it not for the diseased condition and the extent
of permanent partial disability which the injury would have caused were
it not for the disease, and compensation shall be awarded only
therefor)) a preexisting medical or health condition, only the
treatment directly related to the work-related injury or illness is
compensable under this title. Any treatment related to the preexisting
medical or health condition is not compensable under this title.

Sec. 8 RCW 51.32.160 and 1995 c 253 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in section 9 of this act, if aggravation,
diminution, or termination of disability takes place, the director or
his or her designee may, ((upon the application of the beneficiary,
made within seven years from the date the first closing order becomes
final, or at any time upon his or her own motion,)) readjust the rate
of compensation in accordance with the rules in this section provided
for the same, or in a proper case terminate the payment((: PROVIDED,
That)). The director may, upon application of the worker made ((at any
time, provide proper and)) within seven years from the date of claim
closure, authorize necessary medical and surgical services ((as
authorized under RCW 51.36.010)) as may be needed unless the claim was
closed under section 9 of this act. Under no circumstances shall a
worker who is requesting a claim be reopened for further medical or
surgical treatment be entitled to time-loss compensation from the
accident fund. The department shall promptly mail a copy of the
application to the employer at the employer's last known address as
shown by the records of the department.
(b) "Closing order" as used in this section means an order based on
factors which include medical recommendation, advice, or examination.
(c) Applications for benefits where the claim has been closed
without medical recommendation, advice, or examination are not subject
to the seven year limitation of this section. The preceding sentence
shall not apply to any closing order issued prior to July 1, 1981.
First closing orders issued between July 1, 1981, and July 1, 1985,
shall, for the purposes of this section only, be deemed issued on July
1, 1985. The time limitation of this section shall be ten years in
claims involving loss of vision or function of the eyes.
(d) If an order denying an application to reopen filed on or after
July 1, 1988, is not issued within ninety days of receipt of such
application by the self-insured employer or the department, such
application shall be deemed granted. However, for good cause, the
department may extend the time for making the final determination on
the application for an additional sixty days.
(2) If a worker receiving a pension for total disability returns to
gainful employment for wages, the director may suspend or terminate the
rate of compensation established for the disability without producing
medical evidence that shows that a diminution of the disability has
occurred.
(3) No act done or ordered to be done by the director, or the
department prior to the signing and filing in the matter of a written
order for such readjustment shall be grounds for such readjustment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 51.32 RCW
to read as follows:
The department or a self-insurer may offer the worker, or the
worker's beneficiary if the worker is deceased, a lump sum settlement
to close a claim that has been allowed. A settlement offer accepted by
the worker or his or her beneficiary shall discharge the employer of
record from any further obligation concerning the claim and release the
state and self-insurer from further benefit obligations. A claim that
has been closed under this section shall not be reopened for additional
compensation under this title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 51.36 RCW
to read as follows:
When a worker has submitted to a medical examination at the request
of the director or the self-insurer to resolve a medical issue, the
director or self-insurer shall give the findings of such examination
greater weight than the findings of the worker's attending physician.

Sec. 11 RCW 51.52.120 and 2007 c 490 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It shall be unlawful for an attorney engaged in the
representation of any worker or beneficiary to charge ((for services in
the department any fee in excess of a reasonable fee, of not more than
thirty percent of the increase in the award secured by the attorney's
services. Such reasonable fee shall be fixed by the director or the
director's designee for services performed by an attorney for such
worker or beneficiary, if written application therefor is made by the
attorney, worker, or beneficiary within one year from the date the
final decision and order of the department is communicated to the party
making the application)) an amount in excess of twenty percent for the
first five thousand dollars of benefits awarded, fifteen percent for
the next five thousand dollars of benefits awarded, and ten percent for
the balance of any benefits awarded. For purposes of this subsection,
"benefits awarded" means the increase in the award secured by the
attorney's services.
(2) If, on appeal to the board, the order, decision, or award of
the department is reversed or modified and additional relief is granted
to a worker or beneficiary, or in cases where a party other than the
worker or beneficiary is the appealing party and the worker's or
beneficiary's right to relief is sustained by the board, the board
shall fix a reasonable fee for the services of his or her attorney in
proceedings before the board if written application therefor is made by
the attorney, worker, or beneficiary within one year from the date the
final decision and order of the board is communicated to the party
making the application. In fixing the amount of such attorney's fee,
the board shall take into consideration the fee allowed, if any, by the
director, for services before the department, and the board may review
the fee fixed by the director. Any attorney's fee set by the
department or the board may be reviewed by the superior court upon
application of such attorney, worker, or beneficiary. The department
or self-insured employer, as the case may be, shall be served a copy of
the application and shall be entitled to appear and take part in the
proceedings. Where the board, pursuant to this section, fixes the
attorney's fee, it shall be unlawful for an attorney to charge or
receive any fee for services before the board in excess of that fee
fixed by the board.
(3) In an appeal to the board involving the presumption established
under RCW 51.32.185, the attorney's fee shall be payable as set forth
under ((RCW 51.32.185)) subsection (1) of this section.
(4) Any person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor
and shall be subject to a civil penalty of up to ten thousand dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 This act takes effect July 1, 2008.

--- END ---