BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.24.230 and 2004 c 160 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every domestic winery, wine certificate of approval holder,
wine importer, and wine distributor licensed under this title shall
make monthly reports to the board pursuant to the regulations, unless
provided otherwise in subsection (2) of this section. Such domestic
winery, wine certificate of approval holder, wine importer, and wine
distributor shall make no sales of wine within the state of Washington
except to the board, or as otherwise provided in this title.
(2) Reports required under subsection (1) of this section,
including without limitation tax returns pursuant to RCW 66.24.210, may
not be required more frequently than annually from any domestic winery,
which did not withdraw from its premises more than one hundred thousand
gallons of wine subject to federal excise tax during the tax year
preceding the date on which the report would otherwise be due. For the
purposes of this subsection: (a) "Returns" has the same meaning as
"return" in RCW 82.32.050; and (b) "tax year" has the same meaning as
provided in RCW 82.04.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2008.

--- END ---