BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Employee" includes any employee of an employer and is not
limited to the employees of a particular employer, unless this chapter
explicitly states otherwise, and shall include any individual whose
work has ceased as a consequence of, or in connection with, any current
labor dispute or because of any unfair labor practice, and who has not
obtained any other regular and substantially equivalent employment.
(2)(a) "Employer" means a symphony orchestra, opera, or performing
arts theater, that does not meet the jurisdictional standards of the
national labor relations board, and includes any person acting as an
agent of an employer, directly or indirectly.
(b) In determining whether any person is acting as an "agent" of
another person so as to make such other person responsible for his or
her acts, the question of whether the specific acts performed were
actually authorized or subsequently ratified shall not be controlling.
(3) "Labor dispute" includes any controversy concerning terms,
tenure, or conditions of employment, or concerning the association of
representation of persons in negotiating, fixing, maintaining,
changing, or seeking to arrange terms or conditions of employment,
regardless of whether the disputants stand in the proximate relation of
employer and employee. In the event of a dispute between an employer
and an exclusive bargaining representative over the matters that are
terms and conditions of employment, the commission shall decide which
items are mandatory subjects for bargaining.
(4) "Labor organization" means an organization of any kind, or an
agency or employee representation committee or plan, in which employees
participate and which exists for the primary purpose of dealing with
employers concerning grievances, labor disputes, wages, rates of pay,
hours of employment, or conditions of employment.
(5) "Person" includes one or more individuals, labor organizations,
partnerships, associations, corporations, legal representatives,
trustees in bankruptcy, or receivers.
(6) "Public employment relations commission" or "commission" means
the public employment relations commission created in chapter 41.58
RCW.
(7) "Representative" includes any individual or labor organization.
(8) "Supervisor" means any individual having authority, in the
interest of the employer, to hire, transfer, suspend, lay off, recall,
promote, discharge, assign, reward, or discipline other employees, or
responsibly to direct them, or to adjust their grievances, or
effectively to recommend such action, if in connection with the
foregoing the exercise of such authority is not of a merely routine or
clerical nature, but requires the use of independent judgment.
(9) "Unfair labor practice" means any activity listed in section 8
of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The employee organization that has been
determined by the commission to be the exclusive bargaining
representative of a bargaining unit shall be required to represent all
the members within the bargaining unit without regard to membership in
that employee organization. However, any bargaining unit member may at
any time present his or her complaints or concerns to the employer and
have such complaints or concerns adjusted without intervention of the
exclusive bargaining representative, as long as the exclusive
bargaining representative has been given an opportunity to be present
at the adjustment and to make its views known, and as long as the
adjustment is not inconsistent with the terms of a collective
bargaining agreement then in effect.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The commission shall certify exclusive
bargaining representatives in accordance with the procedures specified
in this section.
(1) The commission, after hearing upon reasonable notice, shall
decide the unit appropriate for the purpose of collective bargaining.
In determining, modifying, or combining the bargaining unit, the
commission shall consider the duties, skills, and working conditions of
the employees; the history of collective bargaining by the employees
and their bargaining representatives; the extent of organization among
the employees; and the desire of the employees to be represented.
Supervisors shall not be included in the same bargaining unit as
nonsupervisory employees, but shall be included in a bargaining unit
containing only supervisors.
(2) No question concerning representation may be raised within one
year following issuance of a certification under this section.
(3) If there is a valid collective bargaining agreement in effect,
no question concerning representation may be raised except during the
period not more than ninety nor less than sixty days prior to the
expiration date of the agreement. However, in the event a valid
collective bargaining agreement, together with any renewals or
extensions thereof, has been or will be in existence for more than
three years, then a question concerning representation may be raised
not more than ninety nor less than sixty days prior to the third
anniversary date or any subsequent anniversary date of the agreement;
and if the exclusive bargaining representative is removed as the result
of such procedure, the collective bargaining agreement shall be deemed
to be terminated as of the date of the certification or the anniversary
date following the filing of the petition, whichever is later.
(4) An employee organization seeking certification as the exclusive
bargaining representative of a bargaining unit, or employees seeking
decertification of their exclusive bargaining representative, must make
a confidential showing to the commission of credible evidence
demonstrating that at least thirty percent of the employees in the
bargaining unit are in support of the petition. The petition must
indicate the name, address, and telephone number of any employee
organization known to claim an interest in the bargaining unit.
(5) A petition filed by an employer must be supported by credible
evidence demonstrating the good faith basis on which the employer
claims the existence of a question concerning the representation.
(6) Any employee organization which makes a confidential showing to
the commission of credible evidence demonstrating that it has the
support of at least ten percent of the employees in the bargaining unit
involved is entitled to intervene in proceedings under this section and
to have its name listed as a choice on the ballot in an election
conducted by the commission.
(7) The commission shall determine any question concerning
representation by conducting a secret ballot election among the
employees in the bargaining unit, except under the following
circumstances:
(a) If only one employee organization is seeking certification as
exclusive bargaining representative of a bargaining unit for which
there is no incumbent exclusive bargaining representative, the
commission may, upon the concurrence of the employer and the employee
organization, determine the question concerning representation by
conducting a cross-check comparing the employee organization's
membership records or bargaining authorization cards against the
employment records of the employer; or
(b) If the commission determines that a serious unfair labor
practice has been committed that interfered with the election process
and precludes the holding of a fair election, the commission may
determine the question concerning representation by conducting a cross-check comparing the employee organization's membership records or
bargaining authorization cards against the employment records of the
employer.
(8) The representation election ballot must contain a choice for
each employee organization qualifying under subsection (3) or (5) of
this section, together with a choice for no representation. The
representation election shall be determined by the majority of the
valid ballots cast. If there are three or more choices on the ballot
and none of the three or more choices receives a majority of the valid
ballots cast, a runoff election shall be conducted between the two
choices receiving the highest and second highest numbers of votes.
(9) The commission shall certify as the exclusive bargaining
representative the employee organization that has been determined to
represent a majority of employees in a bargaining unit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 In any dispute concerning inclusion in the
bargaining unit or the allocation of employees or positions to a
bargaining unit, the commission, after a hearing or hearings, shall
determine the dispute.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The commission shall conduct mediation
activities upon the request of either party as a means of assisting in
the settlement of unresolved matters considered under this chapter.
(2) If any matter being jointly considered by the exclusive
bargaining representative and the employer is not settled by the means
provided in this chapter, either party may request the assistance of
the commission. Nothing in this section prohibits an employer and an
employee organization from agreeing to substitute, at their own
expense, some other impasse procedure or other means of resolving
matters considered under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A collective bargaining agreement negotiated
under this chapter may include procedures for final and binding
grievance arbitration of the disputes arising about the interpretation
or application of the agreement.
(1) The parties to a collective bargaining agreement may agree on
one or more permanent umpires to serve as arbitrator, may agree on any
impartial person to serve as arbitrator, or may agree to select
arbitrators from any source available to them, including federal and
private agencies, in addition to the staff and dispute resolution panel
maintained by the commission.
(2) An arbitrator may require any person to attend as a witness,
and to bring with him or her any book, record, document, or other
evidence. Subpoenas shall issue and be signed by the arbitrator and
shall be served in the same manner as subpoenas to testify before a
court of record in this state. The fees for such attendance shall be
paid by the party requesting issuance of the subpoena and shall be the
same as the fees of witnesses in the superior court. If any person so
summoned to testify refuses or neglects to obey such subpoena, upon
petition authorized by the arbitrator, the superior court may compel
the attendance of such person before the arbitrator, or punish the
person for contempt in the same manner provided for the attendance of
witnesses or the punishment of them in the courts of this state.
(3) The arbitrator shall appoint a time and place for the hearing
and notify the parties thereof, may adjourn the hearing from time to
time as may be necessary, and, on application of either party and for
good cause, may postpone the hearing to a time not extending beyond a
date fixed by the collective bargaining agreement for making the award.
The arbitrator has the power to administer oaths. The arbitration
award shall be in writing and signed by the arbitrator or a majority of
the members of the arbitration panel. The arbitrator shall, promptly
upon its rendition, serve a true copy of the award on each of the
parties or their attorneys.
(4) If a party to a collective bargaining agreement negotiated
under this chapter refuses to submit a grievance for arbitration, the
other party to the collective bargaining agreement may invoke the
jurisdiction of the superior court for any county in which the labor
dispute exists, and such court has jurisdiction to issue an order
compelling arbitration. Arbitration shall be ordered if the grievance
states a claim which on its face is covered by the collective
bargaining agreement, and doubts as to the coverage of the arbitration
clause shall be resolved in favor of arbitration. Disputes concerning
compliance with grievance procedures shall be reserved for
determination by the arbitrator.
(5) If a party to a collective bargaining agreement negotiated
under this chapter refuses to comply with the award of an arbitrator
determining a grievance arising under such collective bargaining
agreement, the other party to the collective bargaining agreement, or
any affected employee, may invoke the jurisdiction of the superior
court for any county in which the labor dispute exists, and such court
has jurisdiction to issue an order enforcing the arbitration award.
The court shall not substitute its judgment for that of the arbitrator
and shall enforce any arbitration award which is based on the
collective bargaining agreement, except that an arbitration award shall
not be enforced and a new arbitration proceeding may be ordered:
(a) If the arbitration award was procured by corruption, fraud, or
undue means;
(b) If there was evident partiality or corruption in the arbitrator
or arbitrators;
(c) If the arbitrator or arbitrators were guilty of misconduct, in
refusing to postpone a hearing upon sufficient cause shown, in refusing
to hear evidence pertinent and material to the controversy, or of any
other misbehavior by which the rights of any party have been
prejudiced; or
(d) If the arbitrator or arbitrators have exceeded their powers or
so imperfectly executed their powers that a final and definite award on
the subject matter was not made, in which event the court also has
discretion to remand the matter to the arbitrator or arbitrators who
issued the defective award.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) Upon filing with the employer the
voluntary written authorization of a bargaining unit member under this
chapter, the employee organization that is the exclusive bargaining
representative of the bargaining unit shall have the right to have
deducted from the salary of the bargaining unit member the periodic
dues and initiation fees uniformly required as a condition of acquiring
or retaining membership in the employee organization. Such employee
authorization shall not be irrevocable for a period of more than one
year. Such dues and fees shall be deducted from the pay of all
bargaining unit members who have given authorization for such
deduction, and shall be transmitted by the employer to the employee
organization or to the depository designated by the employee
organization.
(2) A collective bargaining agreement may include union security
provisions, but not a closed shop. If an agency shop or other union
security provision is agreed to, the employer shall enforce any such
provision by deductions from the salary of bargaining unit members
affected thereby and shall transmit such funds to the employee
organization or to the depository designated by the employee
organization.
(3) A bargaining unit member who is covered by a union security
provision and who asserts a right of nonassociation based on bona fide
religious tenets or teachings of a church or religious body of which
such bargaining unit member is a member shall pay to a nonreligious
charity or other charitable organization an amount of money equivalent
to the periodic dues and initiation fees uniformly required as a
condition of acquiring or retaining membership in the employee
organization. The charity shall be agreed upon by the bargaining unit
member and the employee organization to which such bargaining unit
member would otherwise pay the dues and fees. The bargaining unit
member shall furnish written proof that such payments have been made.
If the bargaining unit member and the employee organization do not
reach agreement on such matter, the dispute shall be submitted to the
commission for determination.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) It is an unfair labor practice for an
employer to:
(a) Interfere with, restrain, or coerce bargaining unit members in
the exercise of the rights guaranteed by this chapter;
(b) Dominate or interfere with the formation or administration of
any employee organization or contribute financial or other support to
it. However, subject to rules adopted by the commission, an employer
is not prohibited from permitting bargaining unit members to confer
with it or its representatives or agents during working hours without
loss of time or pay;
(c) Encourage or discourage membership in any employee organization
by discrimination in regard to hire, tenure of employment, or any term
or condition of employment;
(d) Discharge or discriminate otherwise against a bargaining unit
member because that member has filed charges or given testimony under
this chapter; or
(e) Refuse to bargain collectively with the exclusive bargaining
representative of its employees.
(2) It is an unfair labor practice for an employee organization to:
(a) Restrain or coerce a bargaining unit member in the exercise of
the rights guaranteed by this chapter. However, this subsection does
not impair the rights of (i) an employee organization to prescribe its
own rules with respect to the acquisition or retention of membership in
the employee organization or (ii) an employer in the selection of its
representatives for the purpose of bargaining or the adjustment of
grievances;
(b) Cause or attempt to cause an employer to discriminate against
a bargaining unit member in violation of subsection (1)(c) of this
section;
(c) Discriminate against a bargaining unit member because that
member has filed charges or given testimony under this chapter; or
(d) Refuse to bargain collectively with an employer.
(3) The expressing of any view, arguments, or opinion, or the
dissemination thereof to the public, whether in written, printed,
graphic, or visual form, shall not constitute or be evidence of an
unfair labor practice under this chapter, if such expression contains
no threat of reprisal or force or promise of benefit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) The commission is empowered to prevent
any person from engaging in any unfair labor practice as defined in
this chapter; however, a complaint shall not be processed for any
unfair labor practice occurring more than six months before the filing
of the complaint with the commission. This power shall not be affected
by any other means of adjustment or prevention that has been or may be
established by agreement, law, equity, or otherwise.
(2) If the commission determines that any person has engaged in or
is engaging in any unfair labor practice as defined in this chapter,
then the commission shall issue and cause to be served upon the person
an order requiring the person to cease and desist the unfair labor
practice, and to take such affirmative action as will effectuate the
purposes and policy of this chapter, including ordering the payment of
damages, the reinstatement of employees, or both.
(3) The commission may petition the superior court for the county
in which the main office of the employer is located or wherein the
person who has engaged or is engaging in such unfair labor practice
resides or transacts business, for the enforcement of its order and for
appropriate temporary relief.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The commission may adopt rules necessary to
carry out the provisions of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Nothing in this chapter prohibits covered
employees from engaging in lawful strikes against their employers,
provided that the employee organization gives the employer and the
commission at least thirty days' notice prior to the commencement of
the strike. Nothing in this chapter prohibits covered employers from
lawfully locking out employees, provided the employer gives the
employee organization and the commission at least thirty days' notice
prior to the commencement of the lockout.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Whenever a collective bargaining agreement
between an employer and an exclusive bargaining representative is
concluded after the termination date of the previous collective
bargaining agreement between the same parties, the effective date of
the collective bargaining agreement may be the day after the
termination date of the previous collective bargaining agreement, and
all benefits included in the new collective bargaining agreement,
including wage or salary increases, may accrue beginning with the
effective date as established by this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Nothing in this chapter shall be construed
to annul, modify, or preclude the renewal or continuation of any lawful
agreement entered into before the effective date of this act, between
an employer and an employee organization covering wages, hours, and
terms and conditions of employment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Sections 1 through 14 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 49 RCW.

--- END ---