BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.12.120 and 1999 c 394 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If a worker, while working outside the territorial limits of
this state, suffers an injury on account of which he or she, or his or
her beneficiaries, would have been entitled to compensation under this
title had the injury occurred within this state, the worker, or his or
her beneficiaries, shall be entitled to compensation under this title
if at the time of the injury:
(a) His or her employment is principally localized in this state;
or
(b) He or she is working under a contract of hire made in this
state for employment not principally localized in any state; or
(c) He or she is working under a contract of hire made in this
state for employment principally localized in another state whose
workers' compensation law is not applicable to his or her employer; or
(d) He or she is working under a contract of hire made in this
state for employment outside the United States and Canada.
(2) The payment or award of compensation or other recoveries,
including settlement proceeds, under the workers' compensation law of
another state, territory, province, or foreign nation to a worker or
his or her beneficiaries otherwise entitled on account of such injury
to compensation under this title shall not be a bar to a claim for
compensation under this title if that claim under this title is timely
filed. If compensation is paid or awarded under this title, the total
amount of compensation or other recoveries, including settlement
proceeds, paid or awarded the worker or beneficiary under such other
workers' compensation law shall be credited against the compensation
due the worker or beneficiary under this title.
(3)(a) An employer not domiciled in this state who is employing
workers in this state in work for which the employer must be registered
under chapter 18.27 RCW or licensed under chapter 19.28 RCW, or
prequalified under RCW 47.28.070, must secure the payment of
compensation under this title by:
(i) Insuring the employer's workers' compensation obligation under
this title with the department;
(ii) Being qualified as a self-insurer under this title; or
(iii) For employers domiciled in a state or province of Canada
subject to an agreement entered into under subsection (7) of this
section, as permitted by the agreement, filing with the department a
certificate of coverage issued by the agency that administers the
workers' compensation law in the employer's state or province of
domicile certifying that the employer has secured the payment of
compensation under the other state's or province's workers'
compensation law.
(b) The department shall adopt rules to implement this subsection.
(4) If a worker or beneficiary is entitled to compensation under
this title by reason of an injury sustained in this state while in the
employ of an employer who is domiciled in another state or province of
Canada and the employer:
(a) Is not subject to subsection (3) of this section and has
neither opened an account with the department nor qualified as a self-insurer under this title, the employer or his or her insurance carrier
shall file with the director a certificate issued by the agency that
administers the workers' compensation law in the state of the
employer's domicile, certifying that the employer has secured the
payment of compensation under the workers' compensation law of the
other state and that with respect to the injury the worker or
beneficiary is entitled to the benefits provided under the other
state's law.
(b) Has filed a certificate under subsection (3)(a)(iii) of this
section or (a) of this subsection (4):
(i) The filing of the certificate constitutes appointment by the
employer or his or her insurance carrier of the director as its agent
for acceptance of the service of process in any proceeding brought by
any claimant to enforce rights under this title;
(ii) The director shall send to such employer or his or her
insurance carrier, by registered or certified mail to the address shown
on such certificate, a true copy of any notice of claim or other
process served on the director by the claimant in any proceeding
brought to enforce rights under this title;
(iii) If the employer is a self-insurer under the workers'
compensation law of the other state or province of Canada, the employer
shall, upon submission of evidence or security, satisfactory to the
director, of his or her ability to meet his or her liability to the
claimant under this title, be deemed to be a qualified self-insurer
under this title; and
(iv) If the employer's liability under the workers' compensation
law of the other state or province of Canada is insured:
(A) The employer's carrier, as to such claimant only, shall be
deemed to be subject to this title. However, unless the insurer's
contract with the employer requires the insurer to pay an amount
equivalent to the compensation benefits provided by this title, the
insurer's liability for compensation shall not exceed the insurer's
liability under the workers' compensation law of the other state or
province; and
(B) If the total amount for which the employer's insurer is liable
under (b)(iv)(A) of this subsection is less than the total of the
compensation to which the claimant is entitled under this title, the
director may require the employer to file security satisfactory to the
director to secure the payment of compensation under this title.
(c) If subject to subsection (3) of this section, has not complied
with subsection (3) of this section or, if not subject to subsection
(3) of this section, has neither qualified as a self-insurer nor
secured insurance coverage under the workers' compensation law of
another state or province of Canada, the claimant shall be paid
compensation by the department and the employer shall have the same
rights and obligations, and is subject to the same penalties, as other
employers subject to this title.
(5) As used in this section:
(a) A person's employment is principally localized in this or
another state when: (i) His or her employer has a place of business in
this or the other state and he or she regularly works at or from the
place of business; or (ii) if (a)(i) of this subsection is not
applicable, he or she is domiciled in and spends a substantial part of
his or her working time in the service of his or her employer in this
or the other state;
(b) "Workers' compensation law" includes "occupational disease law"
for the purposes of this section.
(6) A worker whose duties require him or her to travel regularly in
the service of his or her employer in this and one or more other states
may agree in writing with his or her employer that his or her
employment is principally localized in this or another state, and,
unless the other state refuses jurisdiction, the agreement shall govern
as to any injury occurring after the effective date of the agreement.
(7) The director is authorized to enter into agreements with the
appropriate agencies of other states and provinces of Canada that
administer their workers' compensation law with respect to conflicts of
jurisdiction and the assumption of jurisdiction in cases where the
contract of employment arises in one state or province and the injury
occurs in another. If the other state's or province's law requires
Washington employers to secure the payment of compensation under the
other state's or province's workers' compensation laws for work
performed in that state or province, then employers domiciled in that
state or province must purchase compensation covering their workers
engaged in that work in this state under this state's industrial
insurance law. When an agreement under this subsection has been
executed and adopted as a rule of the department under chapter 34.05
RCW, it binds all employers and workers subject to this title and the
jurisdiction of this title is governed by this rule.
(8) Washington employers who are not self-insured under chapter
51.14 RCW shall obtain workers' compensation coverage from the state
fund for temporary and incidental work performed on jobs or at jobsites
in another state by their Washington workers. The department is
authorized to adopt rules governing premium liability and reporting
requirements for hours of work in excess of temporary and incidental as
defined in this chapter.
(9) "Temporary and incidental" means work performed by Washington
employers on jobs or at jobsites in another state for thirty or fewer
consecutive or nonconsecutive full or partial days within a calendar
year. Temporary and incidental days are considered on a per state
basis.
(10) By December 1, 2011, the department shall report to the
workers' compensation advisory committee on the effect of subsections
(8) and (9) of this section and the rules developed under subsection
(8) of this section have on the revenue and costs to the state fund.

--- END ---