BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.86.080 and 2007 c 66 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The attorney general, county prosecutors, or city attorneys may
bring an action in the name of ((the state)) their jurisdiction, or as
parens patriae on behalf of persons residing in ((the state)) their
jurisdiction, against any person to restrain and prevent the doing of
any act herein prohibited or declared to be unlawful within their
jurisdiction; and the prevailing party may, in the discretion of the
court, recover the costs of said action including a reasonable
attorney's fee.
(2) The court may make such additional orders or judgments as may
be necessary to restore to any person in interest any moneys or
property, real or personal, which may have been acquired by means of
any act herein prohibited or declared to be unlawful.
(3) Upon a violation of RCW 19.86.030, 19.86.040, 19.86.050, or
19.86.060, the court may also make such additional orders or judgments
as may be necessary to restore to any person in interest any moneys or
property, real or personal, which may have been acquired, regardless of
whether such person purchased or transacted for goods or services
directly with the defendant or indirectly through resellers. The court
shall exclude from the amount of monetary relief awarded in an action
pursuant to this subsection any amount that duplicates amounts that
have been awarded for the same violation. The court should consider
consolidation or coordination with other related actions, to the extent
practicable, to avoid duplicate recovery.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.86.110 and 1993 c 125 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Whenever the attorney general, a county prosecutor, or a
city attorney believes that any person (((a))) (i) may be in
possession, custody, or control of any original or copy of any book,
record, report, memorandum, paper, communication, tabulation, map,
chart, photograph, mechanical transcription, or other tangible document
or recording, wherever situate, which he or she believes to be relevant
to the subject matter of an investigation of a possible violation of
RCW 19.86.020, 19.86.030, 19.86.040, 19.86.050, or 19.86.060, or
federal statutes dealing with the same or similar matters that the
attorney general, county prosecutor, or city attorney is authorized to
enforce, or (((b))) (ii) may have knowledge of any information which
the attorney general, county prosecutor, or city attorney believes
relevant to the subject matter of such an investigation, he or she may,
prior to the institution of a civil proceeding thereon, execute in
writing and cause to be served upon such a person, a civil
investigative demand requiring such person to produce such documentary
material and permit inspection and copying, to answer in writing
written interrogatories, to give oral testimony, or any combination of
such demands pertaining to such documentary material or information:
PROVIDED, That this section shall not be applicable to criminal
prosecutions.
(b) A copy of any civil investigative demand issued or complaint
filed by a county prosecutor or city attorney under this chapter must
be promptly delivered to the attorney general.
(2) Each such demand shall:
(a) State the statute and section or sections thereof, the alleged
violation of which is under investigation, and the general subject
matter of the investigation;
(b) If the demand is for the production of documentary material,
describe the class or classes of documentary material to be produced
thereunder with reasonable specificity so as fairly to indicate the
material demanded;
(c) Prescribe a return date within which the documentary material
is to be produced, the answers to written interrogatories are to be
made, or a date, time, and place at which oral testimony is to be
taken; and
(d) Identify the members of the ((attorney general's)) staff of the
attorney general, county prosecutor, or city attorney to whom such
documentary material is to be made available for inspection and
copying, to whom answers to written interrogatories are to be made, or
who are to conduct the examination for oral testimony.
(3) No such demand shall:
(a) Contain any requirement which would be unreasonable or improper
if contained in a subpoena duces tecum, a request for answers to
written interrogatories, or a request for deposition upon oral
examination issued by a court of this state; or
(b) Require the disclosure of any documentary material which would
be privileged, or which for any other reason would not be required by
a subpoena duces tecum issued by a court of this state.
(4) Service of any such demand may be made by:
(a) Delivering a duly executed copy thereof to the person to be
served, or, if such person is not a natural person, to any officer or
managing agent of the person to be served; or
(b) Delivering a duly executed copy thereof to the principal place
of business in this state of the person to be served; or
(c) Mailing by registered or certified mail a duly executed copy
thereof addressed to the person to be served at the principal place of
business in this state, or, if said person has no place of business in
this state, to his or her principal office or place of business.
(5)(a) Documentary material demanded pursuant to the provisions of
this section shall be produced for inspection and copying during normal
business hours at the principal office or place of business of the
person served, or at such other times and places as may be agreed upon
by the person served and the attorney general, county prosecutor, or
city attorney;
(b) Written interrogatories in a demand served under this section
shall be answered in the same manner as provided in the civil rules for
superior court;
(c) The oral testimony of any person obtained pursuant to a demand
served under this section shall be taken in the same manner as provided
in the civil rules for superior court for the taking of depositions.
In the course of the deposition, the assistant attorney general,
assistant county prosecutor, or assistant city attorney conducting the
examination may exclude from the place where the examination is held
all persons other than the person being examined, the person's counsel,
and the officer before whom the testimony is to be taken;
(d) Any person compelled to appear pursuant to a demand for oral
testimony under this section may be accompanied by counsel;
(e) The oral testimony of any person obtained pursuant to a demand
served under this section shall be taken in the county within which the
person resides, is found, or transacts business, or in such other place
as may be agreed upon between the person served and the attorney
general, county prosecutor, or city attorney.
(6) If, after prior court approval, a civil investigative demand
specifically prohibits disclosure of the existence or content of the
demand, unless otherwise ordered by a superior court for good cause
shown, it shall be a misdemeanor for any person if not a bank, trust
company, mutual savings bank, credit union, or savings and loan
association organized under the laws of the United States or of any one
of the United States to disclose to any other person the existence or
content of the demand, except for disclosure to counsel for the
recipient of the demand or unless otherwise required by law.
(7) No documentary material, answers to written interrogatories, or
transcripts of oral testimony produced pursuant to a demand, or copies
thereof, shall, unless otherwise ordered by a superior court for good
cause shown, be produced for inspection or copying by, nor shall the
contents thereof be disclosed to, other than an authorized employee of
the attorney general, county prosecutor, or city attorney, without the
consent of the person who produced such material, answered written
interrogatories, or gave oral testimony, except as otherwise provided
in this section: PROVIDED, That:
(a) Under such reasonable terms and conditions as the attorney
general, county prosecutor, or city attorney shall prescribe, the
copies of such documentary material, answers to written
interrogatories, or transcripts of oral testimony shall be available
for inspection and copying by the person who produced such material,
answered written interrogatories, or gave oral testimony, or any duly
authorized representative of such person;
(b) The attorney general, county prosecutor, or city attorney may
provide copies of such documentary material, answers to written
interrogatories, or transcripts of oral testimony to an official of
this state, the federal government, or other state, who is charged with
the enforcement of federal or state antitrust or consumer protection
laws, if before the disclosure the receiving official agrees in writing
that the information may not be disclosed to anyone other than that
official or the official's authorized employees. The county prosecutor
or city attorney shall provide copies of such documentary material,
answers to written interrogatories, or transcripts of oral testimony to
an appropriate member of the attorney general's staff, unless the
attorney general directs otherwise. The material provided under this
subsection (7)(b) is subject to the confidentiality restrictions set
forth in this section and may not be introduced as evidence in a
criminal prosecution; and
(c) The attorney general or any assistant attorney general, or
attorneys authorized by the county prosecutor or city attorney, may use
such copies of documentary material, answers to written
interrogatories, or transcripts of oral testimony as ((he)) they
determine((s)) necessary in the enforcement of this chapter, including
presentation before any court: PROVIDED, That any such material,
answers to written interrogatories, or transcripts of oral testimony
which contain trade secrets shall not be presented except with the
approval of the court in which action is pending after adequate notice
to the person furnishing such material, answers to written
interrogatories, or oral testimony.
(8) At any time before the return date specified in the demand, or
within twenty days after the demand has been served, whichever period
is shorter, a petition to extend the return date for, or to modify or
set aside a demand issued pursuant to subsection (1) of this section,
stating good cause, may be filed in the superior court for Thurston
county, or in such other county where the county prosecutor, city
attorney, or parties reside. A petition, by the person on whom the
demand is served, stating good cause, to require the attorney general,
county prosecutor, or city attorney or any person to perform any duty
imposed by the provisions of this section, and all other petitions in
connection with a demand, may be filed in the superior court for
Thurston county, or in the county where the county prosecutor, city
attorney, or parties reside. The court shall have jurisdiction to
impose such sanctions as are provided for in the civil rules for
superior court with respect to discovery motions.
(9) Whenever any person fails to comply with any civil
investigative demand for documentary material, answers to written
interrogatories, or oral testimony duly served upon him or her under
this section, or whenever satisfactory copying or reproduction of any
such material cannot be done and such person refuses to surrender such
material, the attorney general, county prosecutor, or city attorney may
file, in the trial court of general jurisdiction of the county in which
such person resides, is found, or transacts business, and serve upon
such person a petition for an order of such court for the enforcement
of this section, except that if such person transacts business in more
than one county such petition shall be filed in the county in which
such person maintains his or her principal place of business, or in
such other county as may be agreed upon by the parties to such
petition. Whenever any petition is filed in the trial court of general
jurisdiction of any county under this section, such court shall have
jurisdiction to hear and determine the matter so presented and to enter
such order or orders as may be required to carry into effect the
provisions of this section, and may impose such sanctions as are
provided for in the civil rules for superior court with respect to
discovery motions.

--- END ---