BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act is intended to simplify the
provisions of the sentencing reform act relating to supervision of
offenders. The existing sentencing reform act contains numerous
provisions for supervision of different types of offenders. This
duplication has caused great confusion for judges, lawyers, offenders,
and the department of corrections.
The purpose of this act is to simplify the sentencing reform act
and to increase the uniformity of its application. This act is not
intended to either increase or decrease the authority of sentencing
courts or the department, except for provisions instructing the court
to apply the provisions of the current community custody law to
offenders sentenced after July 1, 2009, but who committed their crime
prior to the effective date of this section to the extent that such
application is constitutionally permissible.
This will effect a change for offenders who committed their crimes
prior to the offender accountability act, chapter 196, Laws of 1999.
These offenders will be ordered to a term of community custody rather
than community placement or community supervision. To the extent
constitutionally permissible, the terms of the offender's supervision
will be as provided in current law. With the exception of this change,
the legislature does not intend to make, and no provision of this act
may be construed as making, a substantive change in the sentencing
reform act.

PART I
COMMUNITY CUSTODY
NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If an offender is sentenced to the custody of the department
for one of the following crimes, the court shall impose a term of
community custody for the community custody range established under RCW
9.94A.850 or up to the period of earned release awarded pursuant to RCW
9.94A.728 (1) and (2), whichever is longer:
(a) A sex offense not sentenced under RCW 9.94A.712;
(b) A violent offense;
(c) A crime against persons under RCW 9.94A.411(2);
(d) A felony offender under chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW.
(2) If an offender is sentenced to a term of confinement of one
year or less for a violation of RCW 9A.44.130(11)(a), the court shall
impose a term of community custody for the community custody range
established under RCW 9.94A.850 or up to the period of earned release
awarded pursuant to RCW 9.94A.728 (1) and (2), whichever is longer.
(3) If an offender is sentenced under the drug offender sentencing
alternative, the court shall impose community custody as provided in
RCW 9.94A.660.
(4) If an offender is sentenced under the special sexual offender
sentencing alternative, the court shall impose community custody as
provided in RCW 9.94A.670.
(5) If an offender is sentenced to a work ethic camp, the court
shall impose community custody as provided in RCW 9.94A.690.
(6) If a sex offender is sentenced as a nonpersistent offender
pursuant to RCW 9.94A.712, the court shall impose community custody as
provided in that section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If an offender is sentenced to a term of confinement for one
year or less for one of the following offenses, the court may impose up
to one year of community custody:
(a) A sex offense, other than failure to register under RCW
9A.44.130(1);
(b) A violent offense;
(c) A crime against a person under RCW 9.94A.411; or
(d) A felony violation of chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW, or an
attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation to commit such a crime.
(2) If an offender is sentenced to a first-time offender waiver,
the court may impose community custody as provided in RCW 9.94A.650.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
When a court sentences a person to a term of community custody, the
court shall impose conditions of community custody as provided in this
section.
(1) Mandatory conditions. As part of any term of community
custody, the court shall:
(a) Require the offender to inform the department of court-ordered
treatment upon request by the department;
(b) Require the offender to comply with any conditions imposed by
the department under section 5 of this act;
(c) If the offender was sentenced under RCW 9.94A.712 for an
offense listed in RCW 9.94A.712(1)(a), and the victim of the offense
was under eighteen years of age at the time of the offense, prohibit
the offender from residing in a community protection zone.
(2) Waivable conditions. Unless waived by the court, as part of
any term of community custody, the court shall order an offender to:
(a) Report to and be available for contact with the assigned
community corrections officer as directed;
(b) Work at department-approved education, employment, or community
restitution, or any combination thereof;
(c) Refrain from possessing or consuming controlled substances
except pursuant to lawfully issued prescriptions;
(d) Pay supervision fees as determined by the department; and
(e) Obtain prior approval of the department for the offender's
residence location and living arrangements.
(3) Discretionary conditions. As part of any term of community
custody, the court may order an offender to:
(a) Remain within, or outside of, a specified geographical
boundary;
(b) Refrain from direct or indirect contact with the victim of the
crime or a specified class of individuals;
(c) Participate in crime-related treatment or counseling services;
(d) Participate in rehabilitative programs or otherwise perform
affirmative conduct reasonably related to the circumstances of the
offense, the offender's risk of reoffending, or the safety of the
community;
(e) Refrain from consuming alcohol; or
(f) Comply with any crime-related prohibitions.
(4) Special conditions.
(a) In sentencing an offender convicted of a crime of domestic
violence, as defined in RCW 10.99.020, if the offender has a minor
child, or if the victim of the offense for which the offender was
convicted has a minor child, the court may order the offender to
participate in a domestic violence perpetrator program approved under
RCW 26.50.150.
(b)(i) In sentencing an offender convicted of an alcohol or drug
related traffic offense, the court shall require the offender to
complete a diagnostic evaluation by an alcohol or drug dependency
agency approved by the department of social and health services or a
qualified probation department, defined under RCW 46.61.516, that has
been approved by the department of social and health services. If the
offense was pursuant to chapter 46.61 RCW, the report shall be
forwarded to the department of licensing. If the offender is found to
have an alcohol or drug problem that requires treatment, the offender
shall complete treatment in a program approved by the department of
social and health services under chapter 70.96A RCW. If the offender
is found not to have an alcohol or drug problem that requires
treatment, the offender shall complete a course in an information
school approved by the department of social and health services under
chapter 70.96A RCW. The offender shall pay all costs for any
evaluation, education, or treatment required by this section, unless
the offender is eligible for an existing program offered or approved by
the department of social and health services.
(ii) For purposes of this section, "alcohol or drug related traffic
offense" means the following: Driving while under the influence as
defined by RCW 46.61.502, actual physical control while under the
influence as defined by RCW 46.61.504, vehicular homicide as defined by
RCW 46.61.520(1)(a), vehicular assault as defined by RCW
46.61.522(1)(b), homicide by watercraft as defined by RCW 79A.60.050,
or assault by watercraft as defined by RCW 79A.60.060.
(iii) This subsection (4)(b) does not require the department of
social and health services to add new treatment or assessment
facilities nor affect its use of existing programs and facilities
authorized by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Every person who is sentenced to a period of community custody
shall report to and be placed under the supervision of the department,
subject to RCW 9.94A.501.
(2)(a) The department shall assess the offender's risk of reoffense
and may establish and modify additional conditions of community custody
based upon the risk to community safety.
(b) Within the funds available for community custody, the
department shall determine conditions and duration of community custody
on the basis of risk to community safety, and shall supervise offenders
during community custody on the basis of risk to community safety and
conditions imposed by the court. The secretary shall adopt rules to
implement the provisions of this subsection (2)(b).
(3) If the offender is supervised by the department, the department
shall at a minimum instruct the offender to:
(a) Report as directed to a community corrections officer;
(b) Remain within prescribed geographical boundaries;
(c) Notify the community corrections officer of any change in the
offender's address or employment;
(d) Pay the supervision fee assessment; and
(e) Disclose the fact of supervision to any mental health or
chemical dependency treatment provider, as required by RCW 9.94A.722.
(4) The department may require the offender to participate in
rehabilitative programs, or otherwise perform affirmative conduct, and
to obey all laws.
(5) If the offender was sentenced pursuant to a conviction for a
sex offense, the department may impose electronic monitoring. Within
the resources made available by the department for this purpose, the
department shall carry out any electronic monitoring using the most
appropriate technology given the individual circumstances of the
offender. As used in this section, "electronic monitoring" means the
monitoring of an offender using an electronic offender tracking system
including, but not limited to, a system using radio frequency or active
or passive global positioning system technology.
(6) The department may not impose conditions that are contrary to
those ordered by the court and may not contravene or decrease court
imposed conditions.
(7)(a) The department shall notify the offender in writing of any
additional conditions or modifications.
(b) By the close of the next business day after receiving notice of
a condition imposed or modified by the department, an offender may
request an administrative review under rules adopted by the department.
The condition shall remain in effect unless the reviewing officer finds
that it is not reasonably related to the crime of conviction, the
offender's risk of reoffending, or the safety of the community.
(8) The department may require offenders to pay for special
services rendered including electronic monitoring, day reporting, and
telephone reporting, dependent on the offender's ability to pay. The
department may pay for these services for offenders who are not able to
pay.
(9)(a) When a sex offender has been sentenced pursuant to RCW
9.94A.712, the board shall exercise the authority prescribed in RCW
9.95.420 through 9.95.435.
(b) The department shall assess the offender's risk of recidivism
and shall recommend to the board any additional or modified conditions
based upon the risk to community safety. The board must consider and
may impose department-recommended conditions.
(c) If the department finds that an emergency exists requiring the
immediate imposition of additional conditions in order to prevent the
offender from committing a crime, the department may impose such
conditions. The department may not impose conditions that are contrary
to those set by the board or the court and may not contravene or
decrease court-imposed or board-imposed conditions. Conditions imposed
under this subsection shall take effect immediately after notice to the
offender by personal service, but shall not remain in effect longer
than seven working days unless approved by the board.
(10) In setting, modifying, and enforcing conditions of community
custody, the department shall be deemed to be performing a
quasi-judicial function.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
No offender sentenced to a term of community custody under the
supervision of the department may own, use, or possess firearms or
ammunition. Offenders who own, use, or are found to be in actual or
constructive possession of firearms or ammunition shall be subject to
the violation process and sanctions under sections 10 and 16 of this
act and RCW 9.94A.737.
"Constructive possession" as used in this section means the power
and intent to control the firearm or ammunition. "Firearm" as used in
this section has the same definition as in RCW 9.41.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Community custody shall begin: (a) Upon completion of the term
of confinement; (b) at such time as the offender is transferred to
community custody in lieu of earned release in accordance with RCW
9.94A.728 (1) or (2); or (c) at the time of sentencing if no term of
confinement is ordered.
(2) When an offender is sentenced to community custody, the
offender is subject to the conditions of community custody as of the
date of sentencing, unless otherwise ordered by the court.
(3) When an offender is sentenced to a community custody range
pursuant to section 2 (1) or (2) of this act, the department shall
discharge the offender from community custody on a date determined by
the department, which the department may modify, based on risk and
performance of the offender, within the range or at the end of the
period of earned release, whichever is later.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When an offender is under community custody, the community
corrections officer may obtain information from the offender's mental
health treatment provider on the offender's status with respect to
evaluation, application for services, registration for services, and
compliance with the supervision plan, without the offender's consent,
as described under RCW 71.05.630.
(2) An offender under community custody who is civilly detained
under chapter 71.05 RCW, and subsequently discharged or conditionally
released to the community, shall be under the supervision of the
department for the duration of his or her period of community custody.
During any period of inpatient mental health treatment that falls
within the period of community custody, the inpatient treatment
provider and the supervising community corrections officer shall notify
each other about the offender's discharge, release, and legal status,
and shall share other relevant information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) At any time prior to the completion or termination of a sex
offender's term of community custody, if the court finds that public
safety would be enhanced, the court may impose and enforce an order
extending any or all of the conditions of community custody for a
period up to the maximum allowable sentence for the crime as it is
classified in chapter 9A.20 RCW, regardless of the expiration of the
offender's term of community custody.
(2) If a violation of a condition extended under this section
occurs after the expiration of the offender's term of community
custody, it shall be deemed a violation of the sentence for the
purposes of RCW 9.94A.631 and may be punishable as contempt of court as
provided for in RCW 7.21.040.
(3) If the court extends a condition beyond the expiration of the
term of community custody, the department is not responsible for
supervision of the offender's compliance with the condition.

PART II
SANCTIONS FOR SENTENCE VIOLATIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) An offender who violates any condition or requirement of a
sentence may be sanctioned with up to sixty days' confinement for each
violation.
(b) In lieu of confinement, an offender may be sanctioned with work
release, home detention with electronic monitoring, work crew,
community restitution, inpatient treatment, daily reporting, curfew,
educational or counseling sessions, supervision enhanced through
electronic monitoring, or any other sanctions available in the
community.
(2) If an offender was under community custody pursuant to one of
the following statutes, the offender may be sanctioned as follows:
(a) If the offender was transferred to community custody in lieu of
earned early release in accordance with RCW 9.94A.728(2), the offender
may be transferred to a more restrictive confinement status to serve up
to the remaining portion of the sentence, less credit for any period
actually spent in community custody or in detention awaiting
disposition of an alleged violation.
(b) If the offender was sentenced under the drug offender
sentencing alternative set out in RCW 9.94A.660, the offender may be
sanctioned in accordance with that section.
(c) If the offender was sentenced under the special sexual offender
sentencing alternative set out in RCW 9.94A.670, the suspended sentence
may be revoked and the offender committed to serve the original
sentence of confinement.
(d) If the offender was sentenced to a work ethic camp pursuant to
RCW 9.94A.690, the offender may be reclassified to serve the unexpired
term of his or her sentence in total confinement.
(e) If a sex offender was sentenced pursuant to RCW 9.94A.712, the
offender may be transferred to a more restrictive confinement status to
serve up to the remaining portion of the sentence, less credit for any
period actually spent in community custody or in detention awaiting
disposition of an alleged violation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If an offender has not completed his or her maximum term of
total confinement and is subject to a third violation hearing pursuant
to RCW 9.94A.737 for any violation of community custody and is found to
have committed the violation, the department shall return the offender
to total confinement in a state correctional facility to serve up to
the remaining portion of his or her sentence, unless it is determined
that returning the offender to a state correctional facility would
substantially interfere with the offender's ability to maintain
necessary community supports or to participate in necessary treatment
or programming and would substantially increase the offender's
likelihood of reoffending.
(2) The department may work with the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs to establish and operate an electronic
monitoring program for low-risk offenders who violate the terms of
their community custody.
(3) Local governments, their subdivisions and employees, the
department and its employees, and the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs and its employees are immune from civil
liability for damages arising from incidents involving low-risk
offenders who are placed on electronic monitoring unless it is shown
that an employee acted with gross negligence or bad faith.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If a sanction of confinement is imposed by the court, the
following applies:
(a) If the sanction was imposed pursuant to section 10(1) of this
act, the sanction shall be served in a county facility.
(b) If the sanction was imposed pursuant to section 10(2) of this
act, the sanction shall be served in a state facility.
(2) If a sanction of confinement is imposed by the department, and
if the offender is an inmate as defined by RCW 72.09.015, no more than
eight days of the sanction, including any credit for time served, may
be served in a county facility. The balance of the sanction shall be
served in a state facility. In computing the eight-day period,
weekends and holidays shall be excluded.
(3) If a sanction of confinement is imposed by the board, it shall
be served in a state facility.
(4) As used in this section, "county facility" means a facility
operated, licensed, or utilized under contract by the county, and
"state facility" means a facility operated, licensed, or utilized under
contract by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
The procedure for imposing sanctions for violations of sentence
conditions or requirements is as follows:
(1) If the offender was sentenced under the drug offender
sentencing alternative, any sanctions shall be imposed by the
department or the court pursuant to RCW 9.94A.660.
(2) If the offender was sentenced under the special sexual offender
sentencing alternative, any sanctions shall be imposed by the
department or the court pursuant to RCW 9.94A.670.
(3) If a sex offender was sentenced pursuant to RCW 9.94A.712, any
sanctions shall be imposed by the board pursuant to RCW 9.95.435.
(4) In any other case, if the offender is being supervised by the
department, any sanctions shall be imposed by the department pursuant
to RCW 9.94A.737.
(5) If the offender is not being supervised by the department, any
sanctions shall be imposed by the court pursuant to section 14 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If an offender violates any condition or requirement of a
sentence, and the offender is not being supervised by the department,
the court may modify its order of judgment and sentence and impose
further punishment in accordance with this section.
(2) If an offender fails to comply with any of the conditions or
requirements of a sentence the following provisions apply:
(a) The court, upon the motion of the state, or upon its own
motion, shall require the offender to show cause why the offender
should not be punished for the noncompliance. The court may issue a
summons or a warrant of arrest for the offender's appearance;
(b) The state has the burden of showing noncompliance by a
preponderance of the evidence;
(c) If the court finds that a violation has been proved, it may
impose the sanctions specified in section 10(1) of this act.
Alternatively, the court may:
(i) Convert a term of partial confinement to total confinement;
(ii) Convert community restitution obligation to total or partial
confinement; or
(iii) Convert monetary obligations, except restitution and the
crime victim penalty assessment, to community restitution hours at the
rate of the state minimum wage as established in RCW 49.46.020 for each
hour of community restitution;
(d) If the court finds that the violation was not willful, the
court may modify its previous order regarding payment of legal
financial obligations and regarding community restitution obligations;
and
(e) If the violation involves a failure to undergo or comply with
a mental health status evaluation and/or outpatient mental health
treatment, the court shall seek a recommendation from the treatment
provider or proposed treatment provider. Enforcement of orders
concerning outpatient mental health treatment must reflect the
availability of treatment and must pursue the least restrictive means
of promoting participation in treatment. If the offender's failure to
receive care essential for health and safety presents a risk of serious
physical harm or probable harmful consequences, the civil detention and
commitment procedures of chapter 71.05 RCW shall be considered in
preference to incarceration in a local or state correctional facility.
(3) Any time served in confinement awaiting a hearing on
noncompliance shall be credited against any confinement ordered by the
court.
(4) Nothing in this section prohibits the filing of escape charges
if appropriate.

Sec. 15 RCW 9.94A.737 and 2007 c 483 s 305 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((If an offender violates any condition or requirement of
community custody, the department may transfer the offender to a more
restrictive confinement status to serve up to the remaining portion of
the sentence, less credit for any period actually spent in community
custody or in detention awaiting disposition of an alleged violation
and subject to the limitations of subsection (3) of this section.
(2) If an offender has not completed his or her maximum term of
total confinement and is subject to a third violation hearing for any
violation of community custody and is found to have committed the
violation, the department shall return the offender to total
confinement in a state correctional facility to serve up to the
remaining portion of his or her sentence, unless it is determined that
returning the offender to a state correctional facility would
substantially interfere with the offender's ability to maintain
necessary community supports or to participate in necessary treatment
or programming and would substantially increase the offender's
likelihood of reoffending.
(3)(a) For a sex offender sentenced to a term of community custody
under RCW 9.94A.670 who violates any condition of community custody,
the department may impose a sanction of up to sixty days' confinement
in a local correctional facility for each violation. If the department
imposes a sanction, the department shall submit within seventy-two
hours a report to the court and the prosecuting attorney outlining the
violation or violations and the sanctions imposed.
(b) For a sex offender sentenced to a term of community custody
under RCW 9.94A.710 who violates any condition of community custody
after having completed his or her maximum term of total confinement,
including time served on community custody in lieu of earned release,
the department may impose a sanction of up to sixty days in a local
correctional facility for each violation.
(c) For an offender sentenced to a term of community custody under
RCW 9.94A.505(2)(b), 9.94A.650, or 9.94A.715, or under RCW 9.94A.545,
for a crime committed on or after July 1, 2000, who violates any
condition of community custody after having completed his or her
maximum term of total confinement, including time served on community
custody in lieu of earned release, the department may impose a sanction
of up to sixty days in total confinement for each violation. The
department may impose sanctions such as work release, home detention
with electronic monitoring, work crew, community restitution, inpatient
treatment, daily reporting, curfew, educational or counseling sessions,
supervision enhanced through electronic monitoring, or any other
sanctions available in the community.
(d) For an offender sentenced to a term of community placement
under RCW 9.94A.705 who violates any condition of community placement
after having completed his or her maximum term of total confinement,
including time served on community custody in lieu of earned release,
the department may impose a sanction of up to sixty days in total
confinement for each violation. The department may impose sanctions
such as work release, home detention with electronic monitoring, work
crew, community restitution, inpatient treatment, daily reporting,
curfew, educational or counseling sessions, supervision enhanced
through electronic monitoring, or any other sanctions available in the
community.
(4) If an offender has been arrested for a new felony offense while
under community supervision, community custody, or community placement,
the department shall hold the offender in total confinement until a
hearing before the department as provided in this section or until the
offender has been formally charged for the new felony offense,
whichever is earlier. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed as
to permit the department to hold an offender past his or her maximum
term of total confinement if the offender has not completed the maximum
term of total confinement or to permit the department to hold an
offender past the offender's term of community supervision, community
custody, or community placement.
(5) The department shall be financially responsible for any portion
of the sanctions authorized by this section that are served in a local
correctional facility as the result of action by the department.
(6))) If an offender is accused of violating any condition or
requirement of community custody, he or she is entitled to a hearing
before the department prior to the imposition of sanctions. The
hearing shall be considered as offender disciplinary proceedings and
shall not be subject to chapter 34.05 RCW. The department shall
develop hearing procedures and a structure of graduated sanctions.
(((7))) (2) The hearing procedures required under subsection
(((6))) (1) of this section shall be developed by rule and include the
following:
(a) Hearing officers shall report through a chain of command
separate from that of community corrections officers;
(b) The department shall provide the offender with written notice
of the violation, the evidence relied upon, and the reasons the
particular sanction was imposed. The notice shall include a statement
of the rights specified in this subsection, and the offender's right to
file a personal restraint petition under court rules after the final
decision of the department;
(c) The hearing shall be held unless waived by the offender, and
shall be electronically recorded. For offenders not in total
confinement, the hearing shall be held within fifteen working days, but
not less than twenty-four hours, after notice of the violation. For
offenders in total confinement, the hearing shall be held within five
working days, but not less than twenty-four hours, after notice of the
violation;
(d) The offender shall have the right to: (i) Be present at the
hearing; (ii) have the assistance of a person qualified to assist the
offender in the hearing, appointed by the hearing officer if the
offender has a language or communications barrier; (iii) testify or
remain silent; (iv) call witnesses and present documentary evidence;
and (v) question witnesses who appear and testify; and
(e) The sanction shall take effect if affirmed by the hearing
officer. Within seven days after the hearing officer's decision, the
offender may appeal the decision to a panel of three reviewing officers
designated by the secretary or by the secretary's designee. The
sanction shall be reversed or modified if a majority of the panel finds
that the sanction was not reasonably related to any of the following:
(i) The crime of conviction; (ii) the violation committed; (iii) the
offender's risk of reoffending; or (iv) the safety of the community.
(((8))) (3) For purposes of this section, no finding of a violation
of conditions may be based on unconfirmed or unconfirmable allegations.
(((9) The department shall work with the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs to establish and operate an electronic
monitoring program for low-risk offenders who violate the terms of
their community custody. Between January 1, 2006, and December 31,
2006, the department shall endeavor to place at least one hundred low-risk community custody violators on the electronic monitoring program
per day if there are at least that many low-risk offenders who qualify
for the electronic monitoring program.
(10) Local governments, their subdivisions and employees, the
department and its employees, and the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs and its employees shall be immune from civil
liability for damages arising from incidents involving low-risk
offenders who are placed on electronic monitoring unless it is shown
that an employee acted with gross negligence or bad faith.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 (1) The secretary may issue warrants for
the arrest of any offender who violates a condition of community
custody. The arrest warrants shall authorize any law enforcement or
peace officer or community corrections officer of this state or any
other state where such offender may be located, to arrest the offender
and place him or her in total confinement pending disposition of the
alleged violation.
(2) A community corrections officer, if he or she has reasonable
cause to believe an offender has violated a condition of community
custody, may suspend the person's community custody status and arrest
or cause the arrest and detention in total confinement of the offender,
pending the determination of the secretary as to whether the violation
has occurred. The community corrections officer shall report to the
secretary all facts and circumstances and the reasons for the action of
suspending community custody status.
(3) If an offender has been arrested for a new felony offense while
under community custody the department shall hold the offender in total
confinement until a hearing before the department as provided in this
section or until the offender has been formally charged for the new
felony offense, whichever is earlier. Nothing in this subsection shall
be construed as to permit the department to hold an offender past his
or her maximum term of total confinement if the offender has not
completed the maximum term of total confinement or to permit the
department to hold an offender past the offender's term of community
custody.
(4) A violation of a condition of community custody shall be deemed
a violation of the sentence for purposes of RCW 9.94A.631. The
authority granted to community corrections officers under this section
shall be in addition to that set forth in RCW 9.94A.631.

Sec. 17 RCW 9.94A.740 and 1999 c 196 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((The secretary may issue warrants for the arrest of any
offender who violates a condition of community placement or community
custody. The arrest warrants shall authorize any law enforcement or
peace officer or community corrections officer of this state or any
other state where such offender may be located, to arrest the offender
and place him or her in total confinement pending disposition of the
alleged violation.)) When an offender is arrested pursuant to section
16 of this act, the department shall compensate the local jurisdiction
at the office of financial management's adjudicated rate, in accordance
with RCW 70.48.440. ((A community corrections officer, if he or she
has reasonable cause to believe an offender in community placement or
community custody has violated a condition of community placement or
community custody, may suspend the person's community placement or
community custody status and arrest or cause the arrest and detention
in total confinement of the offender, pending the determination of the
secretary as to whether the violation has occurred. The community
corrections officer shall report to the secretary all facts and
circumstances and the reasons for the action of suspending community
placement or community custody status. A violation of a condition of
community placement or community custody shall be deemed a violation of
the sentence for purposes of RCW 9.94A.631. The authority granted to
community corrections officers under this section shall be in addition
to that set forth in RCW 9.94A.631.))
(2) Inmates, as defined in RCW 72.09.015, who have been transferred
to community custody and who are detained in a local correctional
facility are the financial responsibility of the department of
corrections, except as provided in subsection (3) of this section.
((The community custody inmate shall be removed from the local
correctional facility, except as provided in subsection (3) of this
section, not later than eight days, excluding weekends and holidays,
following admittance to the local correctional facility and
notification that the inmate is available for movement to a state
correctional institution.))
(3) ((The department may negotiate with local correctional
authorities for an additional period of detention; however, sex
offenders sanctioned for community custody violations under RCW
9.94A.737(2) to a term of confinement shall remain in the local
correctional facility for the complete term of the sanction.)) For
confinement sanctions imposed by the department under RCW
((9.94A.737(2)(a))) 9.94A.670, the local correctional facility shall be
financially responsible. ((For confinement sanctions imposed under RCW
9.94A.737(2)(b), the department of corrections shall be financially
responsible for that portion of the sanction served during the time in
which the sex offender is on community custody in lieu of earned
release, and the local correctional facility shall be financially
responsible for that portion of the sanction served by the sex offender
after the time in which the sex offender is on community custody in
lieu of earned release.))
(4) The department, in consultation with the Washington association
of sheriffs and police chiefs and those counties in which the sheriff
does not operate a correctional facility, shall establish a methodology
for determining the department's local correctional facilities bed
utilization rate, for each county in calendar year 1998, for offenders
being held for violations of conditions of community custody((,
community placement, or community supervision)). ((For confinement
sanctions imposed under RCW 9.94A.737(2) (c) or (d)))
(5) Except as provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this section,
the local correctional facility shall continue to be financially
responsible to the extent of the calendar year 1998 bed utilization
rate for confinement sanctions imposed by the department pursuant to
RCW 9.94A.737. If the department's use of bed space in local
correctional facilities of any county for such confinement sanctions
((imposed on offenders sentenced to a term of community custody under
RCW 9.94A.737(2) (c) or (d))) exceeds the 1998 bed utilization rate for
the county, the department shall compensate the county for the excess
use at the per diem rate equal to the lowest rate charged by the county
under its contract with a municipal government during the year in which
the use occurs.

PART III
TERMINOLOGY CHANGES AND TECHNICAL AMENDMENTS--CHAPTER 9.94A RCW
Sec. 18 RCW 9.94A.030 and 2006 c 139 s 5, 2006 c 124 s 1, 2006 c
122 s 7, 2006 c 73 s 5, and 2005 c 436 s 1 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Board" means the indeterminate sentence review board created
under chapter 9.95 RCW.
(2) "Collect," or any derivative thereof, "collect and remit," or
"collect and deliver," when used with reference to the department,
means that the department, either directly or through a collection
agreement authorized by RCW 9.94A.760, is responsible for monitoring
and enforcing the offender's sentence with regard to the legal
financial obligation, receiving payment thereof from the offender, and,
consistent with current law, delivering daily the entire payment to the
superior court clerk without depositing it in a departmental account.
(3) "Commission" means the sentencing guidelines commission.
(4) "Community corrections officer" means an employee of the
department who is responsible for carrying out specific duties in
supervision of sentenced offenders and monitoring of sentence
conditions.
(5) "Community custody" means that portion of an offender's
sentence of confinement in lieu of earned release time or imposed
((pursuant to RCW 9.94A.505(2)(b), 9.94A.650 through 9.94A.670,
9.94A.690, 9.94A.700 through 9.94A.715, or 9.94A.545,)) as part of a
sentence and served in the community subject to controls placed on the
offender's movement and activities by the department. ((For offenders
placed on community custody for crimes committed on or after July 1,
2000, the department shall assess the offender's risk of reoffense and
may establish and modify conditions of community custody, in addition
to those imposed by the court, based upon the risk to community
safety.))
(6) "Community custody range" means the minimum and maximum period
of community custody included as part of a sentence under RCW
9.94A.715, as established by the commission or the legislature under
RCW 9.94A.850 ((for crimes committed on or after July 1, 2000)).
(7) (("Community placement" means that period during which the
offender is subject to the conditions of community custody and/or
postrelease supervision, which begins either upon completion of the
term of confinement (postrelease supervision) or at such time as the
offender is transferred to community custody in lieu of earned release.
Community placement may consist of entirely community custody, entirely
postrelease supervision, or a combination of the two.
(8))) "Community protection zone" means the area within eight
hundred eighty feet of the facilities and grounds of a public or
private school.
(((9))) (8) "Community restitution" means compulsory service,
without compensation, performed for the benefit of the community by the
offender.
(((10) "Community supervision" means a period of time during which
a convicted offender is subject to crime-related prohibitions and other
sentence conditions imposed by a court pursuant to this chapter or RCW
16.52.200(6) or 46.61.524. Where the court finds that any offender has
a chemical dependency that has contributed to his or her offense, the
conditions of supervision may, subject to available resources, include
treatment. For purposes of the interstate compact for out-of-state
supervision of parolees and probationers, RCW 9.95.270, community
supervision is the functional equivalent of probation and should be
considered the same as probation by other states.
(11))) (9) "Confinement" means total or partial confinement.
(((12))) (10) "Conviction" means an adjudication of guilt pursuant
to Titles 10 or 13 RCW and includes a verdict of guilty, a finding of
guilty, and acceptance of a plea of guilty.
(((13))) (11) "Crime-related prohibition" means an order of a court
prohibiting conduct that directly relates to the circumstances of the
crime for which the offender has been convicted, and shall not be
construed to mean orders directing an offender affirmatively to
participate in rehabilitative programs or to otherwise perform
affirmative conduct. However, affirmative acts necessary to monitor
compliance with the order of a court may be required by the department.
(((14))) (12) "Criminal history" means the list of a defendant's
prior convictions and juvenile adjudications, whether in this state, in
federal court, or elsewhere.
(a) The history shall include, where known, for each conviction (i)
whether the defendant has been placed on probation and the length and
terms thereof; and (ii) whether the defendant has been incarcerated and
the length of incarceration.
(b) A conviction may be removed from a defendant's criminal history
only if it is vacated pursuant to RCW 9.96.060, 9.94A.640, 9.95.240, or
a similar out-of-state statute, or if the conviction has been vacated
pursuant to a governor's pardon.
(c) The determination of a defendant's criminal history is distinct
from the determination of an offender score. A prior conviction that
was not included in an offender score calculated pursuant to a former
version of the sentencing reform act remains part of the defendant's
criminal history.
(((15))) (13) "Day fine" means a fine imposed by the sentencing
court that equals the difference between the offender's net daily
income and the reasonable obligations that the offender has for the
support of the offender and any dependents.
(((16))) (14) "Day reporting" means a program of enhanced
supervision designed to monitor the offender's daily activities and
compliance with sentence conditions, and in which the offender is
required to report daily to a specific location designated by the
department or the sentencing court.
(((17))) (15) "Department" means the department of corrections.
(((18))) (16) "Determinate sentence" means a sentence that states
with exactitude the number of actual years, months, or days of total
confinement, of partial confinement, of community ((supervision))
custody, the number of actual hours or days of community restitution
work, or dollars or terms of a legal financial obligation. The fact
that an offender through earned release can reduce the actual period of
confinement shall not affect the classification of the sentence as a
determinate sentence.
(((19))) (17) "Disposable earnings" means that part of the earnings
of an offender remaining after the deduction from those earnings of any
amount required by law to be withheld. For the purposes of this
definition, "earnings" means compensation paid or payable for personal
services, whether denominated as wages, salary, commission, bonuses, or
otherwise, and, notwithstanding any other provision of law making the
payments exempt from garnishment, attachment, or other process to
satisfy a court-ordered legal financial obligation, specifically
includes periodic payments pursuant to pension or retirement programs,
or insurance policies of any type, but does not include payments made
under Title 50 RCW, except as provided in RCW 50.40.020 and 50.40.050,
or Title 74 RCW.
(((20))) (18) "Drug offender sentencing alternative" is a
sentencing option available to persons convicted of a felony offense
other than a violent offense or a sex offense and who are eligible for
the option under RCW 9.94A.660.
(((21))) (19) "Drug offense" means:
(a) Any felony violation of chapter 69.50 RCW except possession of
a controlled substance (RCW 69.50.4013) or forged prescription for a
controlled substance (RCW 69.50.403);
(b) Any offense defined as a felony under federal law that relates
to the possession, manufacture, distribution, or transportation of a
controlled substance; or
(c) Any out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws
of this state would be a felony classified as a drug offense under (a)
of this subsection.
(((22))) (20) "Earned release" means earned release from
confinement as provided in RCW 9.94A.728.
(((23))) (21) "Escape" means:
(a) Sexually violent predator escape (RCW 9A.76.115), escape in the
first degree (RCW 9A.76.110), escape in the second degree (RCW
9A.76.120), willful failure to return from furlough (RCW 72.66.060),
willful failure to return from work release (RCW 72.65.070), or willful
failure to be available for supervision by the department while in
community custody (RCW 72.09.310); or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as an escape
under (a) of this subsection.
(((24))) (22) "Felony traffic offense" means:
(a) Vehicular homicide (RCW 46.61.520), vehicular assault (RCW
46.61.522), eluding a police officer (RCW 46.61.024), felony hit-and-run injury-accident (RCW 46.52.020(4)), felony driving while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.502(6)), or
felony physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.504(6)); or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a felony
traffic offense under (a) of this subsection.
(((25))) (23) "Fine" means a specific sum of money ordered by the
sentencing court to be paid by the offender to the court over a
specific period of time.
(((26))) (24) "First-time offender" means any person who has no
prior convictions for a felony and is eligible for the first-time
offender waiver under RCW 9.94A.650.
(((27))) (25) "Home detention" means a program of partial
confinement available to offenders wherein the offender is confined in
a private residence subject to electronic surveillance.
(((28))) (26) "Legal financial obligation" means a sum of money
that is ordered by a superior court of the state of Washington for
legal financial obligations which may include restitution to the
victim, statutorily imposed crime victims' compensation fees as
assessed pursuant to RCW 7.68.035, court costs, county or interlocal
drug funds, court-appointed attorneys' fees, and costs of defense,
fines, and any other financial obligation that is assessed to the
offender as a result of a felony conviction. Upon conviction for
vehicular assault while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug, RCW 46.61.522(1)(b), or vehicular homicide while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.520(1)(a),
legal financial obligations may also include payment to a public agency
of the expense of an emergency response to the incident resulting in
the conviction, subject to RCW 38.52.430.
(((29))) (27) "Most serious offense" means any of the following
felonies or a felony attempt to commit any of the following felonies:
(a) Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or
criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a class A
felony;
(b) Assault in the second degree;
(c) Assault of a child in the second degree;
(d) Child molestation in the second degree;
(e) Controlled substance homicide;
(f) Extortion in the first degree;
(g) Incest when committed against a child under age fourteen;
(h) Indecent liberties;
(i) Kidnapping in the second degree;
(j) Leading organized crime;
(k) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(l) Manslaughter in the second degree;
(m) Promoting prostitution in the first degree;
(n) Rape in the third degree;
(o) Robbery in the second degree;
(p) Sexual exploitation;
(q) Vehicular assault, when caused by the operation or driving of
a vehicle by a person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor
or any drug or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a reckless
manner;
(r) Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of
any vehicle by any person while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of
any vehicle in a reckless manner;
(s) Any other class B felony offense with a finding of sexual
motivation;
(t) Any other felony with a deadly weapon verdict under RCW
9.94A.602;
(u) Any felony offense in effect at any time prior to December 2,
1993, that is comparable to a most serious offense under this
subsection, or any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense
that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a
most serious offense under this subsection;
(v)(i) A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW
9A.88.100(1) (a), (b), and (c), chapter 260, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess.
as it existed until July 1, 1979, RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (c) as
it existed from July 1, 1979, until June 11, 1986, and RCW 9A.44.100(1)
(a), (b), and (d) as it existed from June 11, 1986, until July 1, 1988;
(ii) A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW
9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from June 11, 1986, until July 1, 1988,
if: (A) The crime was committed against a child under the age of
fourteen; or (B) the relationship between the victim and perpetrator is
included in the definition of indecent liberties under RCW
9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from July 1, 1988, through July 27, 1997,
or RCW 9A.44.100(1) (d) or (e) as it existed from July 25, 1993,
through July 27, 1997.
(((30))) (28) "Nonviolent offense" means an offense which is not a
violent offense.
(((31))) (29) "Offender" means a person who has committed a felony
established by state law and is eighteen years of age or older or is
less than eighteen years of age but whose case is under superior court
jurisdiction under RCW 13.04.030 or has been transferred by the
appropriate juvenile court to a criminal court pursuant to RCW
13.40.110. Throughout this chapter, the terms "offender" and
"defendant" are used interchangeably.
(((32))) (30) "Partial confinement" means confinement for no more
than one year in a facility or institution operated or utilized under
contract by the state or any other unit of government, or, if home
detention or work crew has been ordered by the court, in an approved
residence, for a substantial portion of each day with the balance of
the day spent in the community. Partial confinement includes work
release, home detention, work crew, and a combination of work crew and
home detention.
(((33))) (31) "Persistent offender" is an offender who:
(a)(i) Has been convicted in this state of any felony considered a
most serious offense; and
(ii) Has, before the commission of the offense under (a) of this
subsection, been convicted as an offender on at least two separate
occasions, whether in this state or elsewhere, of felonies that under
the laws of this state would be considered most serious offenses and
would be included in the offender score under RCW 9.94A.525; provided
that of the two or more previous convictions, at least one conviction
must have occurred before the commission of any of the other most
serious offenses for which the offender was previously convicted; or
(b)(i) Has been convicted of: (A) Rape in the first degree, rape
of a child in the first degree, child molestation in the first degree,
rape in the second degree, rape of a child in the second degree, or
indecent liberties by forcible compulsion; (B) any of the following
offenses with a finding of sexual motivation: Murder in the first
degree, murder in the second degree, homicide by abuse, kidnapping in
the first degree, kidnapping in the second degree, assault in the first
degree, assault in the second degree, assault of a child in the first
degree, assault of a child in the second degree, or burglary in the
first degree; or (C) an attempt to commit any crime listed in this
subsection (((33))) (31)(b)(i); and
(ii) Has, before the commission of the offense under (b)(i) of this
subsection, been convicted as an offender on at least one occasion,
whether in this state or elsewhere, of an offense listed in (b)(i) of
this subsection or any federal or out-of-state offense or offense under
prior Washington law that is comparable to the offenses listed in
(b)(i) of this subsection. A conviction for rape of a child in the
first degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this subsection
only when the offender was sixteen years of age or older when the
offender committed the offense. A conviction for rape of a child in
the second degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this
subsection only when the offender was eighteen years of age or older
when the offender committed the offense.
(((34) "Postrelease supervision" is that portion of an offender's
community placement that is not community custody.
(35))) (32) "Predatory" means: (a) The perpetrator of the crime
was a stranger to the victim, as defined in this section; (b) the
perpetrator established or promoted a relationship with the victim
prior to the offense and the victimization of the victim was a
significant reason the perpetrator established or promoted the
relationship; or (c) the perpetrator was: (i) A teacher, counselor,
volunteer, or other person in authority in any public or private school
and the victim was a student of the school under his or her authority
or supervision. For purposes of this subsection, "school" does not
include home-based instruction as defined in RCW 28A.225.010; (ii) a
coach, trainer, volunteer, or other person in authority in any
recreational activity and the victim was a participant in the activity
under his or her authority or supervision; or (iii) a pastor, elder,
volunteer, or other person in authority in any church or religious
organization, and the victim was a member or participant of the
organization under his or her authority.
(((36))) (33) "Private school" means a school regulated under
chapter 28A.195 or 28A.205 RCW.
(((37))) (34) "Public school" has the same meaning as in RCW
28A.150.010.
(((38))) (35) "Restitution" means a specific sum of money ordered
by the sentencing court to be paid by the offender to the court over a
specified period of time as payment of damages. The sum may include
both public and private costs.
(((39))) (36) "Risk assessment" means the application of an
objective instrument supported by research and adopted by the
department for the purpose of assessing an offender's risk of
reoffense, taking into consideration the nature of the harm done by the
offender, place and circumstances of the offender related to risk, the
offender's relationship to any victim, and any information provided to
the department by victims. The results of a risk assessment shall not
be based on unconfirmed or unconfirmable allegations.
(((40))) (37) "Serious traffic offense" means:
(a) Nonfelony driving while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.502), nonfelony actual physical control
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW
46.61.504), reckless driving (RCW 46.61.500), or hit-and-run an
attended vehicle (RCW 46.52.020(5)); or
(b) Any federal, out-of-state, county, or municipal conviction for
an offense that under the laws of this state would be classified as a
serious traffic offense under (a) of this subsection.
(((41))) (38) "Serious violent offense" is a subcategory of violent
offense and means:
(a)(i) Murder in the first degree;
(ii) Homicide by abuse;
(iii) Murder in the second degree;
(iv) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(v) Assault in the first degree;
(vi) Kidnapping in the first degree;
(vii) Rape in the first degree;
(viii) Assault of a child in the first degree; or
(ix) An attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to
commit one of these felonies; or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a serious
violent offense under (a) of this subsection.
(((42))) (39) "Sex offense" means:
(a)(i) A felony that is a violation of chapter 9A.44 RCW other than
RCW 9A.44.130(((11))) (12);
(ii) A violation of RCW 9A.64.020;
(iii) A felony that is a violation of chapter 9.68A RCW other than
RCW 9.68A.080; or
(iv) A felony that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt,
criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit such crimes;
(b) Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior
to July 1, 1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a sex
offense in (a) of this subsection;
(c) A felony with a finding of sexual motivation under RCW
9.94A.835 or 13.40.135; or
(d) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a sex
offense under (a) of this subsection.
(((43))) (40) "Sexual motivation" means that one of the purposes
for which the defendant committed the crime was for the purpose of his
or her sexual gratification.
(((44))) (41) "Standard sentence range" means the sentencing
court's discretionary range in imposing a nonappealable sentence.
(((45))) (42) "Statutory maximum sentence" means the maximum length
of time for which an offender may be confined as punishment for a crime
as prescribed in chapter 9A.20 RCW, RCW 9.92.010, the statute defining
the crime, or other statute defining the maximum penalty for a crime.
(((46))) (43) "Stranger" means that the victim did not know the
offender twenty-four hours before the offense.
(((47))) (44) "Total confinement" means confinement inside the
physical boundaries of a facility or institution operated or utilized
under contract by the state or any other unit of government for twenty-four hours a day, or pursuant to RCW 72.64.050 and 72.64.060.
(((48))) (45) "Transition training" means written and verbal
instructions and assistance provided by the department to the offender
during the two weeks prior to the offender's successful completion of
the work ethic camp program. The transition training shall include
instructions in the offender's requirements and obligations during the
offender's period of community custody.
(((49))) (46) "Victim" means any person who has sustained
emotional, psychological, physical, or financial injury to person or
property as a direct result of the crime charged.
(((50))) (47) "Violent offense" means:
(a) Any of the following felonies:
(i) Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or an
attempt to commit a class A felony;
(ii) Criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a
class A felony;
(iii) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(iv) Manslaughter in the second degree;
(v) Indecent liberties if committed by forcible compulsion;
(vi) Kidnapping in the second degree;
(vii) Arson in the second degree;
(viii) Assault in the second degree;
(ix) Assault of a child in the second degree;
(x) Extortion in the first degree;
(xi) Robbery in the second degree;
(xii) Drive-by shooting;
(xiii) Vehicular assault, when caused by the operation or driving
of a vehicle by a person while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a
reckless manner; and
(xiv) Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of
any vehicle by any person while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of
any vehicle in a reckless manner;
(b) Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior
to July 1, 1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a violent
offense in (a) of this subsection; and
(c) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a violent
offense under (a) or (b) of this subsection.
(((51))) (48) "Work crew" means a program of partial confinement
consisting of civic improvement tasks for the benefit of the community
that complies with RCW 9.94A.725.
(((52))) (49) "Work ethic camp" means an alternative incarceration
program as provided in RCW 9.94A.690 designed to reduce recidivism and
lower the cost of corrections by requiring offenders to complete a
comprehensive array of real-world job and vocational experiences,
character-building work ethics training, life management skills
development, substance abuse rehabilitation, counseling, literacy
training, and basic adult education.
(((53))) (50) "Work release" means a program of partial confinement
available to offenders who are employed or engaged as a student in a
regular course of study at school.

Sec. 19 RCW 9.94A.501 and 2005 c 362 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When the department performs a risk assessment pursuant to RCW
9.94A.500, or to determine a person's conditions of supervision, the
risk assessment shall classify the offender or a probationer sentenced
in superior court into one of at least four risk categories.
(2) The department shall supervise every offender sentenced to a
term of community custody((, community placement, or community
supervision)) and every misdemeanor and gross misdemeanor probationer
ordered by a superior court to probation under the supervision of the
department pursuant to RCW 9.92.060, 9.95.204, or 9.95.210:
(a) Whose risk assessment places that offender or probationer in
one of the two highest risk categories; or
(b) Regardless of the offender's or probationer's risk category if:
(i) The offender's or probationer's current conviction is for:
(A) A sex offense;
(B) A violent offense;
(C) A crime against persons as defined in RCW 9.94A.411;
(D) A felony that is domestic violence as defined in RCW 10.99.020;
(E) A violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary);
(F) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.401 by manufacture or delivery or possession with
intent to deliver methamphetamine; or
(G) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled substance to a minor);
(ii) The offender or probationer has a prior conviction for:
(A) A sex offense;
(B) A violent offense;
(C) A crime against persons as defined in RCW 9.94A.411;
(D) A felony that is domestic violence as defined in RCW 10.99.020;
(E) A violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary);
(F) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.401 by manufacture or delivery or possession with
intent to deliver methamphetamine; or
(G) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled substance to a minor);
(iii) The conditions of the offender's community custody((,
community placement, or community supervision)) or the probationer's
supervision include chemical dependency treatment;
(iv) The offender was sentenced under RCW 9.94A.650 or 9.94A.670;
or
(v) The offender is subject to supervision pursuant to RCW
9.94A.745.
(3) The department is not authorized to, and may not, supervise any
offender sentenced to a term of community custody((, community
placement, or community supervision)) or any probationer unless the
offender or probationer is one for whom supervision is required under
subsection (2) of this section.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2010.

Sec. 20 RCW 9.94A.505 and 2006 c 73 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When a person is convicted of a felony, the court shall impose
punishment as provided in this chapter.
(2)(a) The court shall impose a sentence as provided in the
following sections and as applicable in the case:
(i) Unless another term of confinement applies, ((the court shall
impose)) a sentence within the standard sentence range established in
RCW 9.94A.510 or 9.94A.517;
(ii) ((RCW 9.94A.700 and 9.94A.705, relating to community
placement)) Sections 2 and 3 of this act, relating to community
custody;
(iii) ((RCW 9.94A.710 and 9.94A.715, relating to community custody;
(iv) RCW 9.94A.545, relating to community custody for offenders
whose term of confinement is one year or less;
(v))) RCW 9.94A.570, relating to persistent offenders;
(((vi))) (iv) RCW 9.94A.540, relating to mandatory minimum terms;
(((vii))) (v) RCW 9.94A.650, relating to the first-time offender
waiver;
(((viii))) (vi) RCW 9.94A.660, relating to the drug offender
sentencing alternative;
(((ix))) (vii) RCW 9.94A.670, relating to the special sex offender
sentencing alternative;
(((x))) (viii) RCW 9.94A.712, relating to certain sex offenses;
(((xi))) (ix) RCW 9.94A.535, relating to exceptional sentences;
(((xii))) (x) RCW 9.94A.589, relating to consecutive and concurrent
sentences;
(((xiii))) (xi) RCW 9.94A.603, relating to felony driving while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug and felony
physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug.
(b) If a standard sentence range has not been established for the
offender's crime, the court shall impose a determinate sentence which
may include not more than one year of confinement; community
restitution work; ((until July 1, 2000,)) a term of community
((supervision)) custody not to exceed one year ((and on and after July
1, 2000, a term of community custody not to exceed one year, subject to
conditions and sanctions as authorized in RCW 9.94A.710 (2) and (3)));
and/or other legal financial obligations. The court may impose a
sentence which provides more than one year of confinement if the court
finds reasons justifying an exceptional sentence as provided in RCW
9.94A.535.
(3) If the court imposes a sentence requiring confinement of thirty
days or less, the court may, in its discretion, specify that the
sentence be served on consecutive or intermittent days. A sentence
requiring more than thirty days of confinement shall be served on
consecutive days. Local jail administrators may schedule court-ordered
intermittent sentences as space permits.
(4) If a sentence imposed includes payment of a legal financial
obligation, it shall be imposed as provided in RCW 9.94A.750,
9.94A.753, 9.94A.760, and 43.43.7541.
(5) Except as provided under RCW 9.94A.750(4) and 9.94A.753(4), a
court may not impose a sentence providing for a term of confinement or
((community supervision, community placement, or)) community custody
((which)) that exceeds the statutory maximum for the crime as provided
in chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(6) The sentencing court shall give the offender credit for all
confinement time served before the sentencing if that confinement was
solely in regard to the offense for which the offender is being
sentenced.
(7) The court shall order restitution as provided in RCW 9.94A.750
and 9.94A.753.
(8) As a part of any sentence, the court may impose and enforce
crime-related prohibitions and affirmative conditions as provided in
this chapter.
(9) ((The court may order an offender whose sentence includes
community placement or community supervision to undergo a mental status
evaluation and to participate in available outpatient mental health
treatment, if the court finds that reasonable grounds exist to believe
that the offender is a mentally ill person as defined in RCW 71.24.025,
and that this condition is likely to have influenced the offense. An
order requiring mental status evaluation or treatment must be based on
a presentence report and, if applicable, mental status evaluations that
have been filed with the court to determine the offender's competency
or eligibility for a defense of insanity. The court may order
additional evaluations at a later date if deemed appropriate.
(10))) In any sentence of partial confinement, the court may
require the offender to serve the partial confinement in work release,
in a program of home detention, on work crew, or in a combined program
of work crew and home detention.
(((11) In sentencing an offender convicted of a crime of domestic
violence, as defined in RCW 10.99.020, if the offender has a minor
child, or if the victim of the offense for which the offender was
convicted has a minor child, the court may, as part of any term of
community supervision, community placement, or community custody, order
the offender to participate in a domestic violence perpetrator program
approved under RCW 26.50.150.))

Sec. 21 RCW 9.94A.525 and 2007 c 199 s 8 and 2007 c 116 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The offender score is measured on the horizontal axis of the
sentencing grid. The offender score rules are as follows:
The offender score is the sum of points accrued under this section
rounded down to the nearest whole number.
(1) A prior conviction is a conviction which exists before the date
of sentencing for the offense for which the offender score is being
computed. Convictions entered or sentenced on the same date as the
conviction for which the offender score is being computed shall be
deemed "other current offenses" within the meaning of RCW 9.94A.589.
(2)(a) Class A and sex prior felony convictions shall always be
included in the offender score.
(b) Class B prior felony convictions other than sex offenses shall
not be included in the offender score, if since the last date of
release from confinement (including full-time residential treatment)
pursuant to a felony conviction, if any, or entry of judgment and
sentence, the offender had spent ten consecutive years in the community
without committing any crime that subsequently results in a conviction.
(c) Except as provided in (e) of this subsection, class C prior
felony convictions other than sex offenses shall not be included in the
offender score if, since the last date of release from confinement
(including full-time residential treatment) pursuant to a felony
conviction, if any, or entry of judgment and sentence, the offender had
spent five consecutive years in the community without committing any
crime that subsequently results in a conviction.
(d) Except as provided in (e) of this subsection, serious traffic
convictions shall not be included in the offender score if, since the
last date of release from confinement (including full-time residential
treatment) pursuant to a felony conviction, if any, or entry of
judgment and sentence, the offender spent five years in the community
without committing any crime that subsequently results in a conviction.
(e) If the present conviction is felony driving while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.502(6)) or
felony physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.504(6)), prior convictions
of felony driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug, felony physical control of a vehicle while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, and serious traffic
offenses shall be included in the offender score if: (i) The prior
convictions were committed within five years since the last date of
release from confinement (including full-time residential treatment) or
entry of judgment and sentence; or (ii) the prior convictions would be
considered "prior offenses within ten years" as defined in RCW
46.61.5055.
(f) This subsection applies to both adult and juvenile prior
convictions.
(3) Out-of-state convictions for offenses shall be classified
according to the comparable offense definitions and sentences provided
by Washington law. Federal convictions for offenses shall be
classified according to the comparable offense definitions and
sentences provided by Washington law. If there is no clearly
comparable offense under Washington law or the offense is one that is
usually considered subject to exclusive federal jurisdiction, the
offense shall be scored as a class C felony equivalent if it was a
felony under the relevant federal statute.
(4) Score prior convictions for felony anticipatory offenses
(attempts, criminal solicitations, and criminal conspiracies) the same
as if they were convictions for completed offenses.
(5)(a) In the case of multiple prior convictions, for the purpose
of computing the offender score, count all convictions separately,
except:
(i) Prior offenses which were found, under RCW 9.94A.589(1)(a), to
encompass the same criminal conduct, shall be counted as one offense,
the offense that yields the highest offender score. The current
sentencing court shall determine with respect to other prior adult
offenses for which sentences were served concurrently or prior juvenile
offenses for which sentences were served consecutively, whether those
offenses shall be counted as one offense or as separate offenses using
the "same criminal conduct" analysis found in RCW 9.94A.589(1)(a), and
if the court finds that they shall be counted as one offense, then the
offense that yields the highest offender score shall be used. The
current sentencing court may presume that such other prior offenses
were not the same criminal conduct from sentences imposed on separate
dates, or in separate counties or jurisdictions, or in separate
complaints, indictments, or informations;
(ii) In the case of multiple prior convictions for offenses
committed before July 1, 1986, for the purpose of computing the
offender score, count all adult convictions served concurrently as one
offense, and count all juvenile convictions entered on the same date as
one offense. Use the conviction for the offense that yields the
highest offender score.
(b) As used in this subsection (5), "served concurrently" means
that: (i) The latter sentence was imposed with specific reference to
the former; (ii) the concurrent relationship of the sentences was
judicially imposed; and (iii) the concurrent timing of the sentences
was not the result of a probation or parole revocation on the former
offense.
(6) If the present conviction is one of the anticipatory offenses
of criminal attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy, count each prior
conviction as if the present conviction were for a completed offense.
When these convictions are used as criminal history, score them the
same as a completed crime.
(7) If the present conviction is for a nonviolent offense and not
covered by subsection (11), (12), or (13) of this section, count one
point for each adult prior felony conviction and one point for each
juvenile prior violent felony conviction and 1/2 point for each
juvenile prior nonviolent felony conviction.
(8) If the present conviction is for a violent offense and not
covered in subsection (9), (10), (11), (12), or (13) of this section,
count two points for each prior adult and juvenile violent felony
conviction, one point for each prior adult nonviolent felony
conviction, and 1/2 point for each prior juvenile nonviolent felony
conviction.
(9) If the present conviction is for a serious violent offense,
count three points for prior adult and juvenile convictions for crimes
in this category, two points for each prior adult and juvenile violent
conviction (not already counted), one point for each prior adult
nonviolent felony conviction, and 1/2 point for each prior juvenile
nonviolent felony conviction.
(10) If the present conviction is for Burglary 1, count prior
convictions as in subsection (8) of this section; however count two
points for each prior adult Burglary 2 or residential burglary
conviction, and one point for each prior juvenile Burglary 2 or
residential burglary conviction.
(11) If the present conviction is for a felony traffic offense
count two points for each adult or juvenile prior conviction for
Vehicular Homicide or Vehicular Assault; for each felony offense count
one point for each adult and 1/2 point for each juvenile prior
conviction; for each serious traffic offense, other than those used for
an enhancement pursuant to RCW 46.61.520(2), count one point for each
adult and 1/2 point for each juvenile prior conviction; count one point
for each adult and 1/2 point for each juvenile prior conviction for
operation of a vessel while under the influence of intoxicating liquor
or any drug.
(12) If the present conviction is for homicide by watercraft or
assault by watercraft count two points for each adult or juvenile prior
conviction for homicide by watercraft or assault by watercraft; for
each felony offense count one point for each adult and 1/2 point for
each juvenile prior conviction; count one point for each adult and 1/2
point for each juvenile prior conviction for driving under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, actual physical control
of a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug, or operation of a vessel while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug.
(13) If the present conviction is for manufacture of
methamphetamine count three points for each adult prior manufacture of
methamphetamine conviction and two points for each juvenile manufacture
of methamphetamine offense. If the present conviction is for a drug
offense and the offender has a criminal history that includes a sex
offense or serious violent offense, count three points for each adult
prior felony drug offense conviction and two points for each juvenile
drug offense. All other adult and juvenile felonies are scored as in
subsection (8) of this section if the current drug offense is violent,
or as in subsection (7) of this section if the current drug offense is
nonviolent.
(14) If the present conviction is for Escape from Community
Custody, RCW 72.09.310, count only prior escape convictions in the
offender score. Count adult prior escape convictions as one point and
juvenile prior escape convictions as 1/2 point.
(15) If the present conviction is for Escape 1, RCW 9A.76.110, or
Escape 2, RCW 9A.76.120, count adult prior convictions as one point and
juvenile prior convictions as 1/2 point.
(16) If the present conviction is for Burglary 2 or residential
burglary, count priors as in subsection (7) of this section; however,
count two points for each adult and juvenile prior Burglary 1
conviction, two points for each adult prior Burglary 2 or residential
burglary conviction, and one point for each juvenile prior Burglary 2
or residential burglary conviction.
(17) If the present conviction is for a sex offense, count priors
as in subsections (7) through (11) and (13) through (16) of this
section; however count three points for each adult and juvenile prior
sex offense conviction.
(18) If the present conviction is for failure to register as a sex
offender under RCW 9A.44.130(((10))), count priors as in subsections
(7) through (11) and (13) through (16) of this section; however count
three points for each adult and juvenile prior sex offense conviction,
excluding prior convictions for failure to register as a sex offender
under RCW 9A.44.130(((10))), which shall count as one point.
(19) If the present conviction is for an offense committed while
the offender was under community ((placement)) custody, add one point.
For purposes of this subsection, community custody includes community
placement or postrelease supervision, as defined in chapter 9.-- RCW
(the new chapter created in section 52 of this act).
(20) If the present conviction is for Theft of a Motor Vehicle,
Possession of a Stolen Vehicle, Taking a Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 1, or Taking a Motor Vehicle Without Permission 2, count
priors as in subsections (7) through (18) of this section; however
count one point for prior convictions of Vehicle Prowling 2, and three
points for each adult and juvenile prior Theft 1 (of a motor vehicle),
Theft 2 (of a motor vehicle), Possession of Stolen Property 1 (of a
motor vehicle), Possession of Stolen Property 2 (of a motor vehicle),
Theft of a Motor Vehicle, Possession of a Stolen Vehicle, Taking a
Motor Vehicle Without Permission 1, or Taking a Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 2 conviction.
(21) The fact that a prior conviction was not included in an
offender's offender score or criminal history at a previous sentencing
shall have no bearing on whether it is included in the criminal history
or offender score for the current offense. Accordingly, prior
convictions that were not counted in the offender score or included in
criminal history under repealed or previous versions of the sentencing
reform act shall be included in criminal history and shall count in the
offender score if the current version of the sentencing reform act
requires including or counting those convictions.

Sec. 22 RCW 9.94A.610 and 2003 c 53 s 61 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) At the earliest possible date, and in no event later than ten
days before release except in the event of escape or emergency
furloughs as defined in RCW 72.66.010, the department of corrections
shall send written notice of parole, community ((placement)) custody,
work release placement, furlough, or escape about a specific inmate
convicted of a serious drug offense to the following if such notice has
been requested in writing about a specific inmate convicted of a
serious drug offense:
(a) Any witnesses who testified against the inmate in any court
proceedings involving the serious drug offense; and
(b) Any person specified in writing by the prosecuting attorney.
Information regarding witnesses requesting the notice, information
regarding any other person specified in writing by the prosecuting
attorney to receive the notice, and the notice are confidential and
shall not be available to the inmate.
(2) If an inmate convicted of a serious drug offense escapes from
a correctional facility, the department of corrections shall
immediately notify, by the most reasonable and expedient means
available, the chief of police of the city and the sheriff of the
county in which the inmate resided immediately before the inmate's
arrest and conviction. If previously requested, the department shall
also notify the witnesses who are entitled to notice under this
section. If the inmate is recaptured, the department shall send notice
to the persons designated in this subsection as soon as possible but in
no event later than two working days after the department learns of
such recapture.
(3) If any witness is under the age of sixteen, the notice required
by this section shall be sent to the parents or legal guardian of the
child.
(4) The department of corrections shall send the notices required
by this section to the last address provided to the department by the
requesting party. The requesting party shall furnish the department
with a current address.
(5) For purposes of this section, "serious drug offense" means an
offense under RCW 69.50.401(2) (a) or (b) or 69.50.4011(2) (a) or (b).

Sec. 23 RCW 9.94A.612 and 1996 c 215 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) At the earliest possible date, and in no event later than
thirty days before release except in the event of escape or emergency
furloughs as defined in RCW 72.66.010, the department of corrections
shall send written notice of parole, release, community ((placement))
custody, work release placement, furlough, or escape about a specific
inmate convicted of a violent offense, a sex offense as defined by RCW
9.94A.030, or a felony harassment offense as defined by RCW 9A.46.060
or 9A.46.110, to the following:
(a) The chief of police of the city, if any, in which the inmate
will reside or in which placement will be made in a work release
program; and
(b) The sheriff of the county in which the inmate will reside or in
which placement will be made in a work release program.
The sheriff of the county where the offender was convicted shall be
notified if the department does not know where the offender will
reside. The department shall notify the state patrol of the release of
all sex offenders, and that information shall be placed in the
Washington crime information center for dissemination to all law
enforcement.
(2) The same notice as required by subsection (1) of this section
shall be sent to the following if such notice has been requested in
writing about a specific inmate convicted of a violent offense, a sex
offense as defined by RCW 9.94A.030, or a felony harassment offense as
defined by RCW 9A.46.060 or 9A.46.110:
(a) The victim of the crime for which the inmate was convicted or
the victim's next of kin if the crime was a homicide;
(b) Any witnesses who testified against the inmate in any court
proceedings involving the violent offense;
(c) Any person specified in writing by the prosecuting attorney;
and
(d) Any person who requests such notice about a specific inmate
convicted of a sex offense as defined by RCW 9.94A.030 from the
department of corrections at least sixty days prior to the expected
release date of the offender.
Information regarding victims, next of kin, or witnesses requesting
the notice, information regarding any other person specified in writing
by the prosecuting attorney to receive the notice, and the notice are
confidential and shall not be available to the inmate. Whenever the
department of corrections mails notice pursuant to this subsection and
the notice is returned as undeliverable, the department shall attempt
alternative methods of notification, including a telephone call to the
person's last known telephone number.
(3) The existence of the notice requirements contained in
subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall not require an extension
of the release date in the event that the release plan changes after
notification.
(4) If an inmate convicted of a violent offense, a sex offense as
defined by RCW 9.94A.030, or a felony harassment offense as defined by
RCW 9A.46.060 or 9A.46.110, escapes from a correctional facility, the
department of corrections shall immediately notify, by the most
reasonable and expedient means available, the chief of police of the
city and the sheriff of the county in which the inmate resided
immediately before the inmate's arrest and conviction. If previously
requested, the department shall also notify the witnesses and the
victim of the crime for which the inmate was convicted or the victim's
next of kin if the crime was a homicide. If the inmate is recaptured,
the department shall send notice to the persons designated in this
subsection as soon as possible but in no event later than two working
days after the department learns of such recapture.
(5) If the victim, the victim's next of kin, or any witness is
under the age of sixteen, the notice required by this section shall be
sent to the parents or legal guardian of the child.
(6) The department of corrections shall send the notices required
by this chapter to the last address provided to the department by the
requesting party. The requesting party shall furnish the department
with a current address.
(7) The department of corrections shall keep, for a minimum of two
years following the release of an inmate, the following:
(a) A document signed by an individual as proof that that person is
registered in the victim or witness notification program; and
(b) A receipt showing that an individual registered in the victim
or witness notification program was mailed a notice, at the
individual's last known address, upon the release or movement of an
inmate.
(8) For purposes of this section the following terms have the
following meanings:
(a) "Violent offense" means a violent offense under RCW 9.94A.030;
(b) "Next of kin" means a person's spouse, parents, siblings and
children.
(9) Nothing in this section shall impose any liability upon a chief
of police of a city or sheriff of a county for failing to request in
writing a notice as provided in subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 24 RCW 9.94A.625 and 2000 c 226 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A term of confinement ordered in a sentence pursuant to this
chapter shall be tolled by any period of time during which the offender
has absented himself or herself from confinement without the prior
approval of the entity in whose custody the offender has been placed.
A term of partial confinement shall be tolled during any period of time
spent in total confinement pursuant to a new conviction or pursuant to
sanctions for violation of sentence conditions on a separate felony
conviction.
(2) Any term of community custody((, community placement, or
community supervision)) shall be tolled by any period of time during
which the offender has absented himself or herself from supervision
without prior approval of the entity under whose supervision the
offender has been placed.
(3) Any period of community custody((, community placement, or
community supervision)) shall be tolled during any period of time the
offender is in confinement for any reason. However, if an offender is
detained pursuant to RCW 9.94A.740 or 9.94A.631 and is later found not
to have violated a condition or requirement of community custody((,
community placement, or community supervision)), time spent in
confinement due to such detention shall not toll the period of
community custody((, community placement, or community supervision)).
(4) For terms of confinement or community custody((, community
placement, or community supervision)), the date for the tolling of the
sentence shall be established by the entity responsible for the
confinement or supervision.

Sec. 25 RCW 9.94A.650 and 2006 c 73 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This section applies to offenders who have never been
previously convicted of a felony in this state, federal court, or
another state, and who have never participated in a program of deferred
prosecution for a felony, and who are convicted of a felony that is
not:
(a) Classified as a violent offense or a sex offense under this
chapter;
(b) Manufacture, delivery, or possession with intent to manufacture
or deliver a controlled substance classified in Schedule I or II that
is a narcotic drug or flunitrazepam classified in Schedule IV;
(c) Manufacture, delivery, or possession with intent to deliver a
methamphetamine, its salts, isomers, and salts of its isomers as
defined in RCW 69.50.206(d)(2);
(d) The selling for profit of any controlled substance or
counterfeit substance classified in Schedule I, RCW 69.50.204, except
leaves and flowering tops of marihuana; or
(e) Felony driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor
or any drug or felony physical control of a vehicle while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug.
(2) In sentencing a first-time offender the court may waive the
imposition of a sentence within the standard sentence range and impose
a sentence which may include up to ninety days of confinement in a
facility operated or utilized under contract by the county and a
requirement that the offender refrain from committing new offenses.
((The sentence may also include a term of community supervision or
community custody as specified in subsection (3) of this section,
which, in addition to crime-related prohibitions, may include
requirements that the offender perform any one or more of the
following:
(a) Devote time to a specific employment or occupation;
(b) Undergo available outpatient treatment for up to the period
specified in subsection (3) of this section, or inpatient treatment not
to exceed the standard range of confinement for that offense;
(c) Pursue a prescribed, secular course of study or vocational
training;
(d) Remain within prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the
community corrections officer prior to any change in the offender's
address or employment;
(e) Report as directed to a community corrections officer; or
(f) Pay all court-ordered legal financial obligations as provided
in RCW 9.94A.030 and/or perform community restitution work.))
(3) ((The terms and statuses applicable to sentences under
subsection (2) of this section are:
(a) For sentences imposed on or after July 25, 1999, for crimes
committed before July 1, 2000, up to one year of community supervision.
If treatment is ordered, the period of community supervision may
include up to the period of treatment, but shall not exceed two years;
and
(b) For crimes committed on or after July 1, 2000,)) The court may
impose up to one year of community custody unless treatment is ordered,
in which case the period of community custody may include up to the
period of treatment, but shall not exceed two years. ((Any term of
community custody imposed under this section is subject to conditions
and sanctions as authorized in this section and in RCW 9.94A.715 (2)
and (3).))
(4) ((The department shall discharge from community supervision any
offender sentenced under this section before July 25, 1999, who has
served at least one year of community supervision and has completed any
treatment ordered by the court.)) As a condition of community custody,
in addition to any conditions authorized in section 4 of this act, the
court may order the offender to pay all court-ordered legal financial
obligations and/or perform community restitution work.

Sec. 26 RCW 9.94A.660 and 2006 c 339 s 302 and 2006 c 73 s 10 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) An offender is eligible for the special drug offender
sentencing alternative if:
(a) The offender is convicted of a felony that is not a violent
offense or sex offense and the violation does not involve a sentence
enhancement under RCW 9.94A.533 (3) or (4);
(b) The offender is convicted of a felony that is not a felony
driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug
under RCW 46.61.502(6) or felony physical control of a vehicle while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug under RCW
46.61.504(6);
(c) The offender has no current or prior convictions for a sex
offense at any time or violent offense within ten years before
conviction of the current offense, in this state, another state, or the
United States;
(d) For a violation of the Uniform Controlled Substances Act under
chapter 69.50 RCW or a criminal solicitation to commit such a violation
under chapter 9A.28 RCW, the offense involved only a small quantity of
the particular controlled substance as determined by the judge upon
consideration of such factors as the weight, purity, packaging, sale
price, and street value of the controlled substance;
(e) The offender has not been found by the United States attorney
general to be subject to a deportation detainer or order and does not
become subject to a deportation order during the period of the
sentence;
(f) The standard sentence range for the current offense is greater
than one year; and
(g) The offender has not received a drug offender sentencing
alternative more than once in the prior ten years before the current
offense.
(2) A motion for a sentence under this section may be made by the
court, the offender, or the state. If the sentencing court determines
that the offender is eligible for this alternative, the court may order
an examination of the offender. The examination shall, at a minimum,
address the following issues:
(a) Whether the offender suffers from drug addiction;
(b) Whether the addiction is such that there is a probability that
criminal behavior will occur in the future;
(c) Whether effective treatment for the offender's addiction is
available from a provider that has been licensed or certified by the
division of alcohol and substance abuse of the department of social and
health services; and
(d) Whether the offender and the community will benefit from the
use of the alternative.
(3) The examination report must contain:
(a) Information on the issues required to be addressed in
subsection (2) of this section; and
(b) A proposed treatment plan that must, at a minimum, contain:
(i) A proposed treatment provider that has been licensed or
certified by the division of alcohol and substance abuse of the
department of social and health services;
(ii) The recommended frequency and length of treatment, including
both residential chemical dependency treatment and treatment in the
community;
(iii) A proposed monitoring plan, including any requirements
regarding living conditions, lifestyle requirements, and monitoring by
family members and others; and
(iv) Recommended crime-related prohibitions and affirmative
conditions.
(4) After receipt of the examination report, if the court
determines that a sentence under this section is appropriate, the court
shall waive imposition of a sentence within the standard sentence range
and impose a sentence consisting of either a prison-based alternative
under subsection (5) of this section or a residential chemical
dependency treatment-based alternative under subsection (6) of this
section. The residential chemical dependency treatment-based
alternative is only available if the midpoint of the standard range is
twenty-four months or less.
(5) The prison-based alternative shall include:
(a) A period of total confinement in a state facility for one-half
of the midpoint of the standard sentence range or twelve months,
whichever is greater. During incarceration in the state facility,
offenders sentenced under this subsection shall undergo a comprehensive
substance abuse assessment and receive, within available resources,
treatment services appropriate for the offender. The treatment
services shall be designed by the division of alcohol and substance
abuse of the department of social and health services, in cooperation
with the department of corrections;
(b) The remainder of the midpoint of the standard range as a term
of community custody which must include appropriate substance abuse
treatment in a program that has been approved by the division of
alcohol and substance abuse of the department of social and health
services. If the department finds that conditions of community custody
have been willfully violated, the offender may be reclassified to serve
the remaining balance of the original sentence. An offender who fails
to complete the program or who is administratively terminated from the
program shall be reclassified to serve the unexpired term of his or her
sentence as ordered by the sentencing court;
(c) Crime-related prohibitions including a condition not to use
illegal controlled substances;
(d) A requirement to submit to urinalysis or other testing to
monitor that status; and
(e) A term of community custody pursuant to ((RCW 9.94A.715))
section 2 of this act to be imposed upon failure to complete or
administrative termination from the special drug offender sentencing
alternative program.
(6) The residential chemical dependency treatment-based alternative
shall include:
(a) A term of community custody equal to one-half of the midpoint
of the standard sentence range or two years, whichever is greater,
conditioned on the offender entering and remaining in residential
chemical dependency treatment certified under chapter 70.96A RCW for a
period set by the court between three and six months. If the court
imposes a term of community custody, the department shall, within
available resources, make chemical dependency assessment and treatment
services available to the offender during the term of community
custody. The court shall impose, as conditions of community custody,
treatment and other conditions as proposed in the plan under subsection
(3)(b) of this section. ((The department may impose conditions and
sanctions as authorized in RCW 9.94A.715 (2), (3), (6), and (7),
9.94A.737, and 9.94A.740.)) The court shall schedule a progress
hearing during the period of residential chemical dependency treatment,
and schedule a treatment termination hearing for three months before
the expiration of the term of community custody;
(b) Before the progress hearing and treatment termination hearing,
the treatment provider and the department shall submit written reports
to the court and parties regarding the offender's compliance with
treatment and monitoring requirements, and recommendations regarding
termination from treatment. At the hearing, the court may:
(i) Authorize the department to terminate the offender's community
custody status on the expiration date determined under (a) of this
subsection; or
(ii) Continue the hearing to a date before the expiration date of
community custody, with or without modifying the conditions of
community custody; or
(iii) Impose a term of total confinement equal to one-half the
midpoint of the standard sentence range, followed by a term of
community custody under ((RCW 9.94A.715)) section 2 of this act;
(c) If the court imposes a term of total confinement under (b)(iii)
of this subsection, the department shall, within available resources,
make chemical dependency assessment and treatment services available to
the offender during the terms of total confinement and community
custody.
(7) ((If the court imposes a sentence under this section, the court
may prohibit the offender from using alcohol or controlled substances
and may require that the monitoring for controlled substances be
conducted by the department or by a treatment alternatives to street
crime program or a comparable court or agency-referred program.)) The
offender may be required to pay thirty dollars per month while on
community custody to offset the cost of monitoring for alcohol or
controlled substances. ((In addition,))
(8) The court may impose any of the following conditions:
(a) ((Devote time to a specific employment or training;
(b) Remain within prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the
court or the community corrections officer before any change in the
offender's address or employment;
(c) Report as directed to a community corrections officer;
(d))) Pay all court-ordered legal financial obligations; or
(((e))) (b) Perform community restitution work((;
(f) Stay out of areas designated by the sentencing court;
(g) Such other conditions as the court may require such as
affirmative conditions)).
(((8))) (9)(a) The court may bring any offender sentenced under
this section back into court at any time on its own initiative to
evaluate the offender's progress in treatment or to determine if any
violations of the conditions of the sentence have occurred.
(b) If the offender is brought back to court, the court may modify
the ((terms)) conditions of the community custody or impose sanctions
under (c) of this subsection.
(c) The court may order the offender to serve a term of total
confinement within the standard range of the offender's current offense
at any time during the period of community custody if the offender
violates the conditions or requirements of the sentence or if the
offender is failing to make satisfactory progress in treatment.
(d) An offender ordered to serve a term of total confinement under
(c) of this subsection shall receive credit for any time previously
served under this section.
(((9))) (10) In serving a term of community custody imposed upon
failure to complete, or administrative termination from, the special
drug offender sentencing alternative program, the offender shall
receive no credit for time served in community custody prior to
termination of the offender's participation in the program.
(11) If an offender sentenced to the prison-based alternative under
subsection (5) of this section is found by the United States attorney
general to be subject to a deportation order, a hearing shall be held
by the department unless waived by the offender, and, if the department
finds that the offender is subject to a valid deportation order, the
department may administratively terminate the offender from the program
and reclassify the offender to serve the remaining balance of the
original sentence.
(((10))) (12) An offender sentenced under this section shall be
subject to all rules relating to earned release time with respect to
any period served in total confinement.
(((11))) (13) Costs of examinations and preparing treatment plans
under subsections (2) and (3) of this section may be paid, at the
option of the county, from funds provided to the county from the
criminal justice treatment account under RCW 70.96A.350.

Sec. 27 RCW 9.94A.670 and 2006 c 133 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this subsection apply to this section only.
(a) "Sex offender treatment provider" or "treatment provider" means
a certified sex offender treatment provider or a certified affiliate
sex offender treatment provider as defined in RCW 18.155.020.
(b) "Substantial bodily harm" means bodily injury that involves a
temporary but substantial disfigurement, or that causes a temporary but
substantial loss or impairment of the function of any body part or
organ, or that causes a fracture of any body part or organ.
(c) "Victim" means any person who has sustained emotional,
psychological, physical, or financial injury to person or property as
a result of the crime charged. "Victim" also means a parent or
guardian of a victim who is a minor child unless the parent or guardian
is the perpetrator of the offense.
(2) An offender is eligible for the special sex offender sentencing
alternative if:
(a) The offender has been convicted of a sex offense other than a
violation of RCW 9A.44.050 or a sex offense that is also a serious
violent offense. If the conviction results from a guilty plea, the
offender must, as part of his or her plea of guilty, voluntarily and
affirmatively admit he or she committed all of the elements of the
crime to which the offender is pleading guilty. This alternative is
not available to offenders who plead guilty to the offense charged
under North Carolina v. Alford, 400 U.S. 25, 91 S.Ct. 160, 27 L.Ed.2d
162 (1970) and State v. Newton, 87 Wash.2d 363, 552 P.2d 682 (1976);
(b) The offender has no prior convictions for a sex offense as
defined in RCW 9.94A.030 or any other felony sex offenses in this or
any other state;
(c) The offender has no prior adult convictions for a violent
offense that was committed within five years of the date the current
offense was committed;
(d) The offense did not result in substantial bodily harm to the
victim;
(e) The offender had an established relationship with, or
connection to, the victim such that the sole connection with the victim
was not the commission of the crime; and
(f) The offender's standard sentence range for the offense includes
the possibility of confinement for less than eleven years.
(3) If the court finds the offender is eligible for this
alternative, the court, on its own motion or the motion of the state or
the offender, may order an examination to determine whether the
offender is amenable to treatment.
(a) The report of the examination shall include at a minimum the
following:
(i) The offender's version of the facts and the official version of
the facts;
(ii) The offender's offense history;
(iii) An assessment of problems in addition to alleged deviant
behaviors;
(iv) The offender's social and employment situation; and
(v) Other evaluation measures used.
The report shall set forth the sources of the examiner's
information.
(b) The examiner shall assess and report regarding the offender's
amenability to treatment and relative risk to the community. A
proposed treatment plan shall be provided and shall include, at a
minimum:
(i) Frequency and type of contact between offender and therapist;
(ii) Specific issues to be addressed in the treatment and
description of planned treatment modalities;
(iii) Monitoring plans, including any requirements regarding living
conditions, lifestyle requirements, and monitoring by family members
and others;
(iv) Anticipated length of treatment; and
(v) Recommended crime-related prohibitions and affirmative
conditions, which must include, to the extent known, an identification
of specific activities or behaviors that are precursors to the
offender's offense cycle, including, but not limited to, activities or
behaviors such as viewing or listening to pornography or use of alcohol
or controlled substances.
(c) The court on its own motion may order, or on a motion by the
state shall order, a second examination regarding the offender's
amenability to treatment. The examiner shall be selected by the party
making the motion. The offender shall pay the cost of any second
examination ordered unless the court finds the defendant to be indigent
in which case the state shall pay the cost.
(4) After receipt of the reports, the court shall consider whether
the offender and the community will benefit from use of this
alternative, consider whether the alternative is too lenient in light
of the extent and circumstances of the offense, consider whether the
offender has victims in addition to the victim of the offense, consider
whether the offender is amenable to treatment, consider the risk the
offender would present to the community, to the victim, or to persons
of similar age and circumstances as the victim, and consider the
victim's opinion whether the offender should receive a treatment
disposition under this section. The court shall give great weight to
the victim's opinion whether the offender should receive a treatment
disposition under this section. If the sentence imposed is contrary to
the victim's opinion, the court shall enter written findings stating
its reasons for imposing the treatment disposition. The fact that the
offender admits to his or her offense does not, by itself, constitute
amenability to treatment. If the court determines that this
alternative is appropriate, the court shall then impose a sentence or,
pursuant to RCW 9.94A.712, a minimum term of sentence, within the
standard sentence range. If the sentence imposed is less than eleven
years of confinement, the court may suspend the execution of the
sentence ((and impose the following conditions of suspension:)) as
provided in this section.
(5) As conditions of the suspended sentence, the court must impose
the following:
(a) ((The court shall order the offender to serve)) A term of
confinement of up to twelve months or the maximum term within the
standard range, whichever is less. The court may order the offender to
serve a term of confinement greater than twelve months or the maximum
term within the standard range based on the presence of an aggravating
circumstance listed in RCW 9.94A.535(3). In no case shall the term of
confinement exceed the statutory maximum sentence for the offense. The
court may order the offender to serve all or part of his or her term of
confinement in partial confinement. An offender sentenced to a term of
confinement under this subsection is not eligible for earned release
under RCW 9.92.151 or 9.94A.728.
(b) ((The court shall place the offender on)) A term of community
custody ((for)) equal to the length of the suspended sentence, the
length of the maximum term imposed pursuant to RCW 9.94A.712, or three
years, whichever is greater, and require the offender to comply with
any conditions imposed by the department under ((RCW 9.94A.720))
section 4 of this act.
(c) ((The court shall order)) Treatment for any period up to five
years in duration. The court, in its discretion, shall order
outpatient sex offender treatment or inpatient sex offender treatment,
if available. A community mental health center may not be used for
such treatment unless it has an appropriate program designed for sex
offender treatment. The offender shall not change sex offender
treatment providers or treatment conditions without first notifying the
prosecutor, the community corrections officer, and the court. If any
party or the court objects to a proposed change, the offender shall not
change providers or conditions without court approval after a hearing.
(d) ((As conditions of the suspended sentence, the court shall
impose)) Specific prohibitions and affirmative conditions relating to
the known precursor activities or behaviors identified in the proposed
treatment plan under subsection (3)(b)(v) of this section or identified
in an annual review under subsection (((7))) (8)(b) of this section.
(((5))) (6) As conditions of the suspended sentence, the court may
impose one or more of the following:
(a) Crime-related prohibitions;
(b) Require the offender to devote time to a specific employment or
occupation;
(c) Require the offender to remain within prescribed geographical
boundaries and notify the court or the community corrections officer
prior to any change in the offender's address or employment;
(d) Require the offender to report as directed to the court and a
community corrections officer;
(e) Require the offender to pay all court-ordered legal financial
obligations as provided in RCW 9.94A.030;
(f) Require the offender to perform community restitution work; or
(g) Require the offender to reimburse the victim for the cost of
any counseling required as a result of the offender's crime.
(((6))) (7) At the time of sentencing, the court shall set a
treatment termination hearing for three months prior to the anticipated
date for completion of treatment.
(((7))) (8)(a) The sex offender treatment provider shall submit
quarterly reports on the offender's progress in treatment to the court
and the parties. The report shall reference the treatment plan and
include at a minimum the following: Dates of attendance, offender's
compliance with requirements, treatment activities, the offender's
relative progress in treatment, and any other material specified by the
court at sentencing.
(b) The court shall conduct a hearing on the offender's progress in
treatment at least once a year. At least fourteen days prior to the
hearing, notice of the hearing shall be given to the victim. The
victim shall be given the opportunity to make statements to the court
regarding the offender's supervision and treatment. At the hearing,
the court may modify conditions of community custody including, but not
limited to, crime-related prohibitions and affirmative conditions
relating to activities and behaviors identified as part of, or relating
to precursor activities and behaviors in, the offender's offense cycle
or revoke the suspended sentence.
(((8))) (9) At least fourteen days prior to the treatment
termination hearing, notice of the hearing shall be given to the
victim. The victim shall be given the opportunity to make statements
to the court regarding the offender's supervision and treatment. Prior
to the treatment termination hearing, the treatment provider and
community corrections officer shall submit written reports to the court
and parties regarding the offender's compliance with treatment and
monitoring requirements, and recommendations regarding termination from
treatment, including proposed community custody conditions. The court
may order an evaluation regarding the advisability of termination from
treatment by a sex offender treatment provider who may not be the same
person who treated the offender under subsection (((4))) (5) of this
section or any person who employs, is employed by, or shares profits
with the person who treated the offender under subsection (((4))) (5)
of this section unless the court has entered written findings that such
evaluation is in the best interest of the victim and that a successful
evaluation of the offender would otherwise be impractical. The
offender shall pay the cost of the evaluation. At the treatment
termination hearing the court may: (a) Modify conditions of community
custody, and either (b) terminate treatment, or (c) extend treatment in
two-year increments for up to the remaining period of community
custody.
(((9))) (10)(a) If a violation of conditions other than a second
violation of the prohibitions or affirmative conditions relating to
precursor behaviors or activities imposed under subsection (((4)))
(5)(d) or (((7))) (8)(b) of this section occurs during community
custody, the department shall either impose sanctions as provided for
in ((RCW 9.94A.737(2)(a))) section 10(1) of this act or refer the
violation to the court and recommend revocation of the suspended
sentence as provided for in subsections (((6))) (7) and (((8))) (9) of
this section.
(b) If a second violation of the prohibitions or affirmative
conditions relating to precursor behaviors or activities imposed under
subsection (((4))) (5)(d) or (((7))) (8)(b) of this section occurs
during community custody, the department shall refer the violation to
the court and recommend revocation of the suspended sentence as
provided in subsection (((10))) (11) of this section.
(((10))) (11) The court may revoke the suspended sentence at any
time during the period of community custody and order execution of the
sentence if: (a) The offender violates the conditions of the suspended
sentence, or (b) the court finds that the offender is failing to make
satisfactory progress in treatment. All confinement time served during
the period of community custody shall be credited to the offender if
the suspended sentence is revoked.
(((11))) (12) If the offender violates a requirement of the
sentence that is not a condition of the suspended sentence pursuant to
subsection (5) or (6) of this section, the department may impose
sanctions pursuant to section 10(1) of this act.
(13) The offender's sex offender treatment provider may not be the
same person who examined the offender under subsection (3) of this
section or any person who employs, is employed by, or shares profits
with the person who examined the offender under subsection (3) of this
section, unless the court has entered written findings that such
treatment is in the best interests of the victim and that successful
treatment of the offender would otherwise be impractical. Examinations
and treatment ordered pursuant to this subsection shall only be
conducted by certified sex offender treatment providers or certified
affiliate sex offender treatment providers under chapter 18.155 RCW
unless the court finds that:
(a) The offender has already moved to another state or plans to
move to another state for reasons other than circumventing the
certification requirements; or
(b)(i) No certified sex offender treatment providers or certified
affiliate sex offender treatment providers are available for treatment
within a reasonable geographical distance of the offender's home; and
(ii) The evaluation and treatment plan comply with this section and
the rules adopted by the department of health.
(((12))) (14) If the offender is less than eighteen years of age
when the charge is filed, the state shall pay for the cost of initial
evaluation and treatment.

Sec. 28 RCW 9.94A.690 and 2006 c 73 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) An offender is eligible to be sentenced to a work ethic camp
if the offender:
(i) Is sentenced to a term of total confinement of not less than
twelve months and one day or more than thirty-six months;
(ii) Has no current or prior convictions for any sex offenses or
for violent offenses; and
(iii) Is not currently subject to a sentence for, or being
prosecuted for, a violation of felony driving while under the influence
of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.502(6)), a violation of
physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.504(6)), a violation of the uniform
controlled substances act, or a criminal solicitation to commit such a
violation under chapter 9A.28 or 69.50 RCW.
(b) The length of the work ethic camp shall be at least one hundred
twenty days and not more than one hundred eighty days.
(2) If the sentencing court determines that the offender is
eligible for the work ethic camp and is likely to qualify under
subsection (3) of this section, the judge shall impose a sentence
within the standard sentence range and may recommend that the offender
serve the sentence at a work ethic camp. In sentencing an offender to
the work ethic camp, the court shall specify: (a) That upon completion
of the work ethic camp the offender shall be released on community
custody for any remaining time of total confinement; (b) the applicable
conditions of ((supervision on)) community custody ((status)) as
((required by RCW 9.94A.700(4) and)) authorized by ((RCW 9.94A.700(5)))
section 4 of this act; and (c) that violation of the conditions may
result in a return to total confinement for the balance of the
offender's remaining time of confinement.
(3) The department shall place the offender in the work ethic camp
program, subject to capacity, unless: (a) The department determines
that the offender has physical or mental impairments that would prevent
participation and completion of the program; (b) the department
determines that the offender's custody level prevents placement in the
program; (c) the offender refuses to agree to the terms and conditions
of the program; (d) the offender has been found by the United States
attorney general to be subject to a deportation detainer or order; or
(e) the offender has participated in the work ethic camp program in the
past.
(4) An offender who fails to complete the work ethic camp program,
who is administratively terminated from the program, or who otherwise
violates any conditions of supervision, as defined by the department,
shall be reclassified to serve the unexpired term of his or her
sentence as ordered by the sentencing court and shall be subject to all
rules relating to earned release time.
(5) During the last two weeks prior to release from the work ethic
camp program the department shall provide the offender with
comprehensive transition training.

Sec. 29 RCW 9.94A.712 and 2006 c 124 s 3, 2006 c 122 s 5, and
2005 c 436 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) An offender who is not a persistent offender shall be sentenced
under this section if the offender:
(a) Is convicted of:
(i) Rape in the first degree, rape in the second degree, rape of a
child in the first degree, child molestation in the first degree, rape
of a child in the second degree, or indecent liberties by forcible
compulsion;
(ii) Any of the following offenses with a finding of sexual
motivation: Murder in the first degree, murder in the second degree,
homicide by abuse, kidnapping in the first degree, kidnapping in the
second degree, assault in the first degree, assault in the second
degree, assault of a child in the first degree, assault of a child in
the second degree, or burglary in the first degree; or
(iii) An attempt to commit any crime listed in this subsection
(1)(a);
((committed on or after September 1, 2001;)) or
(b) Has a prior conviction for an offense listed in RCW
9.94A.030(((33))) (31)(b), and is convicted of any sex offense ((which
was committed after September 1, 2001.
For purposes of this subsection (1)(b),)) other than failure to
register ((is not a sex offense)).
(2) An offender convicted of rape of a child in the first or second
degree or child molestation in the first degree who was seventeen years
of age or younger at the time of the offense shall not be sentenced
under this section.
(3)(a) Upon a finding that the offender is subject to sentencing
under this section, the court shall impose a sentence to a maximum term
and a minimum term.
(b) The maximum term shall consist of the statutory maximum
sentence for the offense.
(c)(i) Except as provided in (c)(ii) of this subsection, the
minimum term shall be either within the standard sentence range for the
offense, or outside the standard sentence range pursuant to RCW
9.94A.535, if the offender is otherwise eligible for such a sentence.
(ii) If the offense that caused the offender to be sentenced under
this section was rape of a child in the first degree, rape of a child
in the second degree, or child molestation in the first degree, and
there has been a finding that the offense was predatory under RCW
9.94A.836, the minimum term shall be either the maximum of the standard
sentence range for the offense or twenty-five years, whichever is
greater. If the offense that caused the offender to be sentenced under
this section was rape in the first degree, rape in the second degree,
indecent liberties by forcible compulsion, or kidnapping in the first
degree with sexual motivation, and there has been a finding that the
victim was under the age of fifteen at the time of the offense under
RCW 9.94A.837, the minimum term shall be either the maximum of the
standard sentence range for the offense or twenty-five years, whichever
is greater. If the offense that caused the offender to be sentenced
under this section is rape in the first degree, rape in the second
degree with forcible compulsion, indecent liberties with forcible
compulsion, or kidnapping in the first degree with sexual motivation,
and there has been a finding under RCW 9.94A.838 that the victim was,
at the time of the offense, developmentally disabled, mentally
disordered, or a frail elder or vulnerable adult, the minimum sentence
shall be either the maximum of the standard sentence range for the
offense or twenty-five years, whichever is greater.
(d) The minimum terms in (c)(ii) of this subsection do not apply to
a juvenile tried as an adult pursuant to RCW 13.04.030(1)(e) (i) or
(v). The minimum term for such a juvenile shall be imposed under
(c)(i) of this subsection.
(4) A person sentenced under subsection (3) of this section shall
serve the sentence in a facility or institution operated, or utilized
under contract, by the state.
(5) When a court sentences a person to the custody of the
department under this section, the court shall, in addition to the
other terms of the sentence, sentence the offender to community custody
under the supervision of the department and the authority of the board
for any period of time the person is released from total confinement
before the expiration of the maximum sentence.
(6)(a)(((i) Unless a condition is waived by the court, the
conditions of community custody shall include those provided for in RCW
9.94A.700(4). The conditions may also include those provided for in
RCW 9.94A.700(5). The court may also order the offender to participate
in rehabilitative programs or otherwise perform affirmative conduct
reasonably related to the circumstances of the offense, the offender's
risk of reoffending, or the safety of the community, and the department
and the board shall enforce such conditions pursuant to RCW 9.94A.713,
9.95.425, and 9.95.430.
(ii) If the offense that caused the offender to be sentenced under
this section was an offense listed in subsection (1)(a) of this section
and the victim of the offense was under eighteen years of age at the
time of the offense, the court shall, as a condition of community
custody, prohibit the offender from residing in a community protection
zone.
(b))) As part of any sentence under this section, the court shall
also require the offender to comply with any conditions imposed by the
board under RCW ((9.94A.713 and)) 9.95.420 through 9.95.435.
(b) An offender released by the board under RCW 9.95.420 is subject
to the supervision of the department until the expiration of the
maximum term of the sentence. The department shall monitor the
offender's compliance with conditions of community custody imposed by
the court, department, or board, and promptly report any violations to
the board. Any violation of conditions of community custody
established or modified by the board are subject to the provisions of
RCW 9.95.425 through 9.95.440.

Sec. 30 RCW 9.94A.728 and 2007 c 483 s 304 are each amended to
read as follows:
No person serving a sentence imposed pursuant to this chapter and
committed to the custody of the department shall leave the confines of
the correctional facility or be released prior to the expiration of the
sentence except as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided for in subsection (2) of this
section, the term of the sentence of an offender committed to a
correctional facility operated by the department may be reduced by
earned release time in accordance with procedures that shall be
developed and promulgated by the correctional agency having
jurisdiction in which the offender is confined. The earned release
time shall be for good behavior and good performance, as determined by
the correctional agency having jurisdiction. The correctional agency
shall not credit the offender with earned release credits in advance of
the offender actually earning the credits. Any program established
pursuant to this section shall allow an offender to earn early release
credits for presentence incarceration. If an offender is transferred
from a county jail to the department, the administrator of a county
jail facility shall certify to the department the amount of time spent
in custody at the facility and the amount of earned release time. An
offender who has been convicted of a felony committed after July 23,
1995, that involves any applicable deadly weapon enhancements under RCW
9.94A.533 (3) or (4), or both, shall not receive any good time credits
or earned release time for that portion of his or her sentence that
results from any deadly weapon enhancements.
(a) In the case of an offender convicted of a serious violent
offense, or a sex offense that is a class A felony, committed on or
after July 1, 1990, and before July 1, 2003, the aggregate earned
release time may not exceed fifteen percent of the sentence. In the
case of an offender convicted of a serious violent offense, or a sex
offense that is a class A felony, committed on or after July 1, 2003,
the aggregate earned release time may not exceed ten percent of the
sentence.
(b)(i) In the case of an offender who qualifies under (b)(ii) of
this subsection, the aggregate earned release time may not exceed fifty
percent of the sentence.
(ii) An offender is qualified to earn up to fifty percent of
aggregate earned release time under this subsection (1)(b) if he or
she:
(A) Is classified in one of the two lowest risk categories under
(b)(iii) of this subsection;
(B) Is not confined pursuant to a sentence for:
(I) A sex offense;
(II) A violent offense;
(III) A crime against persons as defined in RCW 9.94A.411;
(IV) A felony that is domestic violence as defined in RCW
10.99.020;
(V) A violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary);
(VI) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.401 by manufacture or delivery or possession with
intent to deliver methamphetamine; or
(VII) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled substance to a minor);
(C) Has no prior conviction for:
(I) A sex offense;
(II) A violent offense;
(III) A crime against persons as defined in RCW 9.94A.411;
(IV) A felony that is domestic violence as defined in RCW
10.99.020;
(V) A violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary);
(VI) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.401 by manufacture or delivery or possession with
intent to deliver methamphetamine; or
(VII) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled substance to a minor);
(D) Participates in programming or activities as directed by the
offender's individual reentry plan as provided under RCW 72.09.270 to
the extent that such programming or activities are made available by
the department; and
(E) Has not committed a new felony after July 22, 2007, while under
((community supervision, community placement, or)) community custody.
(iii) For purposes of determining an offender's eligibility under
this subsection (1)(b), the department shall perform a risk assessment
of every offender committed to a correctional facility operated by the
department who has no current or prior conviction for a sex offense, a
violent offense, a crime against persons as defined in RCW 9.94A.411,
a felony that is domestic violence as defined in RCW 10.99.020, a
violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary), a violation of, or
an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to violate, RCW 69.50.401 by
manufacture or delivery or possession with intent to deliver
methamphetamine, or a violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or
conspiracy to violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled
substance to a minor). The department must classify each assessed
offender in one of four risk categories between highest and lowest
risk.
(iv) The department shall recalculate the earned release time and
reschedule the expected release dates for each qualified offender under
this subsection (1)(b).
(v) This subsection (1)(b) applies retroactively to eligible
offenders serving terms of total confinement in a state correctional
facility as of July 1, 2003.
(vi) This subsection (1)(b) does not apply to offenders convicted
after July 1, 2010.
(c) In no other case shall the aggregate earned release time exceed
one-third of the total sentence;
(2)(a) ((A person convicted of a sex offense or an offense
categorized as a serious violent offense, assault in the second degree,
vehicular homicide, vehicular assault, assault of a child in the second
degree, any crime against persons where it is determined in accordance
with RCW 9.94A.602 that the offender or an accomplice was armed with a
deadly weapon at the time of commission, or any felony offense under
chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW, committed before July 1, 2000, may become
eligible, in accordance with a program developed by the department, for
transfer to community custody status in lieu of earned release time
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section;
(b))) A person convicted of a sex offense, a violent offense, any
crime against persons under RCW 9.94A.411(2), or a felony offense under
chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW, ((committed on or after July 1, 2000,)) may
become eligible, in accordance with a program developed by the
department, for transfer to community custody ((status)) in lieu of
earned release time pursuant to subsection (1) of this section;
(((c))) (b) The department shall, as a part of its program for
release to the community in lieu of earned release, require the
offender to propose a release plan that includes an approved residence
and living arrangement. All offenders with ((community placement or))
community custody terms eligible for release to community custody
((status)) in lieu of earned release shall provide an approved
residence and living arrangement prior to release to the community;
(((d))) (c) The department may deny transfer to community custody
((status)) in lieu of earned release time pursuant to subsection (1) of
this section if the department determines an offender's release plan,
including proposed residence location and living arrangements, may
violate the conditions of the sentence or conditions of supervision,
place the offender at risk to violate the conditions of the sentence,
place the offender at risk to reoffend, or present a risk to victim
safety or community safety. The department's authority under this
section is independent of any court-ordered condition of sentence or
statutory provision regarding conditions for community custody ((or
community placement));
(((e))) (d) If the department denies transfer to community custody
((status)) in lieu of earned early release pursuant to (((d))) (c) of
this subsection, the department may transfer an offender to partial
confinement in lieu of earned early release up to three months. The
three months in partial confinement is in addition to that portion of
the offender's term of confinement that may be served in partial
confinement as provided in this section;
(((f))) (e) An offender serving a term of confinement imposed under
RCW 9.94A.670(((4))) (5)(a) is not eligible for earned release credits
under this section;
(3) An offender may leave a correctional facility pursuant to an
authorized furlough or leave of absence. In addition, offenders may
leave a correctional facility when in the custody of a corrections
officer or officers;
(4)(a) The secretary may authorize an extraordinary medical
placement for an offender when all of the following conditions exist:
(i) The offender has a medical condition that is serious enough to
require costly care or treatment;
(ii) The offender poses a low risk to the community because he or
she is physically incapacitated due to age or the medical condition;
and
(iii) Granting the extraordinary medical placement will result in
a cost savings to the state.
(b) An offender sentenced to death or to life imprisonment without
the possibility of release or parole is not eligible for an
extraordinary medical placement.
(c) The secretary shall require electronic monitoring for all
offenders in extraordinary medical placement unless the electronic
monitoring equipment interferes with the function of the offender's
medical equipment or results in the loss of funding for the offender's
medical care. The secretary shall specify who shall provide the
monitoring services and the terms under which the monitoring shall be
performed.
(d) The secretary may revoke an extraordinary medical placement
under this subsection at any time;
(5) The governor, upon recommendation from the clemency and pardons
board, may grant an extraordinary release for reasons of serious health
problems, senility, advanced age, extraordinary meritorious acts, or
other extraordinary circumstances;
(6) No more than the final six months of the offender's term of
confinement may be served in partial confinement designed to aid the
offender in finding work and reestablishing himself or herself in the
community. This is in addition to that period of earned early release
time that may be exchanged for partial confinement pursuant to
subsection (2)(((e))) (d) of this section;
(7) The governor may pardon any offender;
(8) The department may release an offender from confinement any
time within ten days before a release date calculated under this
section; ((and))
(9) An offender may leave a correctional facility prior to
completion of his or her sentence if the sentence has been reduced as
provided in RCW 9.94A.870((.)); and
(10) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, an
offender sentenced for a felony crime listed in RCW 9.94A.540 as
subject to a mandatory minimum sentence of total confinement shall not
be released from total confinement before the completion of the listed
mandatory minimum sentence for that felony crime of conviction unless
allowed under RCW 9.94A.540, however persistent offenders are not
eligible for extraordinary medical placement.

Sec. 31 RCW 9.94A.760 and 2005 c 263 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever a person is convicted in superior court, the court may
order the payment of a legal financial obligation as part of the
sentence. The court must on either the judgment and sentence or on a
subsequent order to pay, designate the total amount of a legal
financial obligation and segregate this amount among the separate
assessments made for restitution, costs, fines, and other assessments
required by law. On the same order, the court is also to set a sum
that the offender is required to pay on a monthly basis towards
satisfying the legal financial obligation. If the court fails to set
the offender monthly payment amount, the department shall set the
amount if the department has active supervision of the offender,
otherwise the county clerk shall set the amount. Upon receipt of an
offender's monthly payment, restitution shall be paid prior to any
payments of other monetary obligations. After restitution is
satisfied, the county clerk shall distribute the payment proportionally
among all other fines, costs, and assessments imposed, unless otherwise
ordered by the court.
(2) If the court determines that the offender, at the time of
sentencing, has the means to pay for the cost of incarceration, the
court may require the offender to pay for the cost of incarceration at
a rate of fifty dollars per day of incarceration, if incarcerated in a
prison, or the court may require the offender to pay the actual cost of
incarceration per day of incarceration, if incarcerated in a county
jail. In no case may the court require the offender to pay more than
one hundred dollars per day for the cost of incarceration. Payment of
other court-ordered financial obligations, including all legal
financial obligations and costs of supervision shall take precedence
over the payment of the cost of incarceration ordered by the court.
All funds recovered from offenders for the cost of incarceration in the
county jail shall be remitted to the county and the costs of
incarceration in a prison shall be remitted to the department.
(3) The court may add to the judgment and sentence or subsequent
order to pay a statement that a notice of payroll deduction is to be
issued immediately. If the court chooses not to order the immediate
issuance of a notice of payroll deduction at sentencing, the court
shall add to the judgment and sentence or subsequent order to pay a
statement that a notice of payroll deduction may be issued or other
income-withholding action may be taken, without further notice to the
offender if a monthly court-ordered legal financial obligation payment
is not paid when due, and an amount equal to or greater than the amount
payable for one month is owed.
If a judgment and sentence or subsequent order to pay does not
include the statement that a notice of payroll deduction may be issued
or other income-withholding action may be taken if a monthly legal
financial obligation payment is past due, the department or the county
clerk may serve a notice on the offender stating such requirements and
authorizations. Service shall be by personal service or any form of
mail requiring a return receipt.
(4) Independent of the department or the county clerk, the party or
entity to whom the legal financial obligation is owed shall have the
authority to use any other remedies available to the party or entity to
collect the legal financial obligation. These remedies include
enforcement in the same manner as a judgment in a civil action by the
party or entity to whom the legal financial obligation is owed.
Restitution collected through civil enforcement must be paid through
the registry of the court and must be distributed proportionately
according to each victim's loss when there is more than one victim.
The judgment and sentence shall identify the party or entity to whom
restitution is owed so that the state, party, or entity may enforce the
judgment. If restitution is ordered pursuant to RCW 9.94A.750(6) or
9.94A.753(6) to a victim of rape of a child or a victim's child born
from the rape, the Washington state child support registry shall be
identified as the party to whom payments must be made. Restitution
obligations arising from the rape of a child in the first, second, or
third degree that result in the pregnancy of the victim may be enforced
for the time periods provided under RCW 9.94A.750(6) and 9.94A.753(6).
All other legal financial obligations for an offense committed prior to
July 1, 2000, may be enforced at any time during the ten-year period
following the offender's release from total confinement or within ten
years of entry of the judgment and sentence, whichever period ends
later. Prior to the expiration of the initial ten-year period, the
superior court may extend the criminal judgment an additional ten years
for payment of legal financial obligations including crime victims'
assessments. All other legal financial obligations for an offense
committed on or after July 1, 2000, may be enforced at any time the
offender remains under the court's jurisdiction. For an offense
committed on or after July 1, 2000, the court shall retain jurisdiction
over the offender, for purposes of the offender's compliance with
payment of the legal financial obligations, until the obligation is
completely satisfied, regardless of the statutory maximum for the
crime. The department may only supervise the offender's compliance
with payment of the legal financial obligations during any period in
which the department is authorized to supervise the offender in the
community under RCW 9.94A.728, 9.94A.501, or in which the offender is
confined in a state correctional institution or a correctional facility
pursuant to a transfer agreement with the department, and the
department shall supervise the offender's compliance during any such
period. The department is not responsible for supervision of the
offender during any subsequent period of time the offender remains
under the court's jurisdiction. The county clerk is authorized to
collect unpaid legal financial obligations at any time the offender
remains under the jurisdiction of the court for purposes of his or her
legal financial obligations.
(5) In order to assist the court in setting a monthly sum that the
offender must pay during the period of supervision, the offender is
required to report to the department for purposes of preparing a
recommendation to the court. When reporting, the offender is required,
under oath, to respond truthfully and honestly to all questions
concerning present, past, and future earning capabilities and the
location and nature of all property or financial assets. The offender
is further required to bring all documents requested by the department.
(6) After completing the investigation, the department shall make
a report to the court on the amount of the monthly payment that the
offender should be required to make towards a satisfied legal financial
obligation.
(7)(a) During the period of supervision, the department may make a
recommendation to the court that the offender's monthly payment
schedule be modified so as to reflect a change in financial
circumstances. If the department sets the monthly payment amount, the
department may modify the monthly payment amount without the matter
being returned to the court. During the period of supervision, the
department may require the offender to report to the department for the
purposes of reviewing the appropriateness of the collection schedule
for the legal financial obligation. During this reporting, the
offender is required under oath to respond truthfully and honestly to
all questions concerning earning capabilities and the location and
nature of all property or financial assets. The offender shall bring
all documents requested by the department in order to prepare the
collection schedule.
(b) Subsequent to any period of supervision, or if the department
is not authorized to supervise the offender in the community, the
county clerk may make a recommendation to the court that the offender's
monthly payment schedule be modified so as to reflect a change in
financial circumstances. If the county clerk sets the monthly payment
amount, or if the department set the monthly payment amount and the
department has subsequently turned the collection of the legal
financial obligation over to the county clerk, the clerk may modify the
monthly payment amount without the matter being returned to the court.
During the period of repayment, the county clerk may require the
offender to report to the clerk for the purpose of reviewing the
appropriateness of the collection schedule for the legal financial
obligation. During this reporting, the offender is required under oath
to respond truthfully and honestly to all questions concerning earning
capabilities and the location and nature of all property or financial
assets. The offender shall bring all documents requested by the county
clerk in order to prepare the collection schedule.
(8) After the judgment and sentence or payment order is entered,
the department is authorized, for any period of supervision, to collect
the legal financial obligation from the offender. Subsequent to any
period of supervision or, if the department is not authorized to
supervise the offender in the community, the county clerk is authorized
to collect unpaid legal financial obligations from the offender. Any
amount collected by the department shall be remitted daily to the
county clerk for the purpose of disbursements. The department and the
county clerks are authorized, but not required, to accept credit cards
as payment for a legal financial obligation, and any costs incurred
related to accepting credit card payments shall be the responsibility
of the offender.
(9) The department or any obligee of the legal financial obligation
may seek a mandatory wage assignment for the purposes of obtaining
satisfaction for the legal financial obligation pursuant to RCW
9.94A.7701. Any party obtaining a wage assignment shall notify the
county clerk. The county clerks shall notify the department, or the
administrative office of the courts, whichever is providing the monthly
billing for the offender.
(10) The requirement that the offender pay a monthly sum towards a
legal financial obligation constitutes a condition or requirement of a
sentence and the offender is subject to the penalties for noncompliance
as provided in RCW 9.94A.634 (as recodified by this act), 9.94A.737, or
9.94A.740.
(11)(a) Until January 1, 2004, the department shall mail
individualized monthly billings to the address known by the department
for each offender with an unsatisfied legal financial obligation.
(b) Beginning January 1, 2004, the administrative office of the
courts shall mail individualized monthly billings to the address known
by the office for each offender with an unsatisfied legal financial
obligation.
(c) The billing shall direct payments, other than outstanding cost
of supervision assessments under RCW 9.94A.780, parole assessments
under RCW 72.04A.120, and cost of probation assessments under RCW
9.95.214, to the county clerk, and cost of supervision, parole, or
probation assessments to the department.
(d) The county clerk shall provide the administrative office of the
courts with notice of payments by such offenders no less frequently
than weekly.
(e) The county clerks, the administrative office of the courts, and
the department shall maintain agreements to implement this subsection.
(12) The department shall arrange for the collection of unpaid
legal financial obligations during any period of supervision in the
community through the county clerk. The department shall either
collect unpaid legal financial obligations or arrange for collections
through another entity if the clerk does not assume responsibility or
is unable to continue to assume responsibility for collection pursuant
to subsection (4) of this section. The costs for collection services
shall be paid by the offender.
(13) The county clerk may access the records of the employment
security department for the purposes of verifying employment or income,
seeking any assignment of wages, or performing other duties necessary
to the collection of an offender's legal financial obligations.
(14) Nothing in this chapter makes the department, the state, the
counties, or any state or county employees, agents, or other persons
acting on their behalf liable under any circumstances for the payment
of these legal financial obligations or for the acts of any offender
who is no longer, or was not, subject to supervision by the department
for a term of community custody, ((community placement, or community
supervision,)) and who remains under the jurisdiction of the court for
payment of legal financial obligations.

Sec. 32 RCW 9.94A.775 and 2003 c 379 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
If an offender with an unsatisfied legal financial obligation is
not subject to supervision by the department for a term of ((community
placement,)) community custody, ((or community supervision,)) or has
not completed payment of all legal financial obligations included in
the sentence at the expiration of his or her term of ((community
placement,)) community custody, ((or community supervision,)) the
department shall notify the administrative office of the courts of the
termination of the offender's supervision and provide information to
the administrative office of the courts to enable the county clerk to
monitor payment of the remaining obligations. The county clerk is
authorized to monitor payment after such notification. The secretary
of corrections and the administrator for the courts shall enter into an
interagency agreement to facilitate the electronic transfer of
information about offenders, unpaid obligations, and payees to carry
out the purposes of this section.

Sec. 33 RCW 9.94A.780 and 2003 c 379 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Whenever a punishment imposed under this chapter requires
supervision services to be provided, the offender shall pay to the
department of corrections the monthly assessment, prescribed under
subsection (2) of this section, which shall be for the duration of the
terms of supervision and which shall be considered as payment or part
payment of the cost of providing supervision to the offender. The
department may exempt or defer a person from the payment of all or any
part of the assessment based upon any of the following factors:
(a) The offender has diligently attempted but has been unable to
obtain employment that provides the offender sufficient income to make
such payments.
(b) The offender is a student in a school, college, university, or
a course of vocational or technical training designed to fit the
student for gainful employment.
(c) The offender has an employment handicap, as determined by an
examination acceptable to or ordered by the department.
(d) The offender's age prevents him or her from obtaining
employment.
(e) The offender is responsible for the support of dependents and
the payment of the assessment constitutes an undue hardship on the
offender.
(f) Other extenuating circumstances as determined by the
department.
(2) The department of corrections shall adopt a rule prescribing
the amount of the assessment. The department may, if it finds it
appropriate, prescribe a schedule of assessments that shall vary in
accordance with the intensity or cost of the supervision. The
department may not prescribe any assessment that is less than ten
dollars nor more than fifty dollars.
(3) All amounts required to be paid under this section shall be
collected by the department of corrections and deposited by the
department in the dedicated fund established pursuant to RCW 72.11.040.
(4) This section shall not apply to probation services provided
under an interstate compact pursuant to chapter 9.95 RCW or to
probation services provided for persons placed on probation prior to
June 10, 1982.
(5) If a county clerk assumes responsibility for collection of
unpaid legal financial obligations under RCW 9.94A.760, or under any
agreement with the department under that section, whether before or
after the completion of any period of ((community placement,))
community custody, ((or community supervision,)) the clerk may impose
a monthly or annual assessment for the cost of collections. The amount
of the assessment shall not exceed the actual cost of collections. The
county clerk may exempt or defer payment of all or part of the
assessment based upon any of the factors listed in subsection (1) of
this section. The offender shall pay the assessment under this
subsection to the county clerk who shall apply it to the cost of
collecting legal financial obligations under RCW 9.94A.760.

Sec. 34 RCW 9.94A.820 and 2004 c 38 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Sex offender examinations and treatment ordered as a special
condition of ((community placement or)) community custody under this
chapter shall be conducted only by certified sex offender treatment
providers or certified affiliate sex offender treatment providers under
chapter 18.155 RCW unless the court or the department finds that: (a)
The offender has already moved to another state or plans to move to
another state for reasons other than circumventing the certification
requirements; (b) the treatment provider is employed by the department;
or (c)(i) no certified sex offender treatment providers or certified
affiliate sex offender treatment providers are available to provide
treatment within a reasonable geographic distance of the offender's
home, as determined in rules adopted by the secretary; and (ii) the
evaluation and treatment plan comply with the rules adopted by the
department of health. A treatment provider selected by an offender
under (c) of this subsection, who is not certified by the department of
health shall consult with a certified sex offender treatment provider
during the offender's period of treatment to ensure compliance with the
rules adopted by the department of health. The frequency and content
of the consultation shall be based on the recommendation of the
certified sex offender treatment provider.
(2) A sex offender's failure to participate in treatment required
as a condition of ((community placement or)) community custody is a
violation that will not be excused on the basis that no treatment
provider was located within a reasonable geographic distance of the
offender's home.

PART IV
TERMINOLOGY CHANGES AND TECHNICAL AMENDMENTS--OTHER CHAPTERS
Sec. 35 RCW 4.24.556 and 2004 c 38 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A certified sex offender treatment provider, or a certified
affiliate sex offender treatment provider who has completed at least
fifty percent of the required hours under the supervision of a
certified sex offender treatment provider, acting in the course of his
or her duties, providing treatment to a person who has been released to
a less restrictive alternative under chapter 71.09 RCW or to a level
III sex offender on community custody as a court ((or)), department, or
board ordered condition of sentence is not negligent because he or she
treats a high risk offender; sex offenders are known to have a risk of
reoffense. The treatment provider is not liable for civil damages
resulting from the reoffense of a client unless the treatment
provider's acts or omissions constituted gross negligence or willful or
wanton misconduct. This limited liability provision does not eliminate
the treatment provider's duty to warn of and protect from a client's
threatened violent behavior if the client communicates a serious threat
of physical violence against a reasonably ascertainable victim or
victims. In addition to any other requirements to report violations,
the sex offender treatment provider is obligated to report an
offender's expressions of intent to harm or other predatory behavior,
whether or not there is an ascertainable victim, in progress reports
and other established processes that enable courts and supervising
entities to assess and address the progress and appropriateness of
treatment. This limited liability provision applies only to the
conduct of certified sex offender treatment providers, and certified
affiliate sex offender treatment providers who have completed at least
fifty percent of the required hours under the supervision of a
certified sex offender treatment provider, and not the conduct of the
state.
(2) Sex offender treatment providers who provide services to the
department of corrections by identifying risk factors and notifying the
department of risks for the subset of high risk offenders who are not
amenable to treatment and who are under court order for treatment or
supervision are practicing within the scope of their profession.

Sec. 36 RCW 9.95.017 and 2003 c 218 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board shall cause to be prepared criteria for duration of
confinement, release on parole, and length of parole for persons
committed to prison for crimes committed before July 1, 1984.
The proposed criteria should take into consideration RCW
9.95.009(2). Before submission to the governor, the board shall
solicit comments and review on their proposed criteria for parole
release.
(2) Persons committed to the department of corrections and who are
under the authority of the board for crimes committed on or after
September 1, 2001, are subject to the provisions for duration of
confinement, release to community custody, and length of community
custody established in RCW 9.94A.712, ((9.94A.713)) section 4 of this
act, 72.09.335, and 9.95.420 through 9.95.440.

Sec. 37 RCW 9.95.064 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 326 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) In order to minimize the trauma to the victim, the court may
attach conditions on release of an offender under RCW 9.95.062,
convicted of a crime committed before July 1, 1984, regarding the
whereabouts of the defendant, contact with the victim, or other
conditions.
(2) Offenders released under RCW 9.95.420 are subject to crime-related prohibitions and affirmative conditions established by the
court, the department of corrections, or the board pursuant to RCW
((9.94A.715 and)) 9.94A.712, ((9.94A.713)) section 4 of this act,
72.09.335, and 9.95.420 through 9.95.440.

Sec. 38 RCW 9.95.110 and 2003 c 218 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board may permit an offender convicted of a crime committed
before July 1, 1984, to leave the buildings and enclosures of a state
correctional institution on parole, after such convicted person has
served the period of confinement fixed for him or her by the board,
less time credits for good behavior and diligence in work: PROVIDED,
That in no case shall an inmate be credited with more than one-third of
his or her sentence as fixed by the board.
The board may establish rules and regulations under which an
offender may be allowed to leave the confines of a state correctional
institution on parole, and may return such person to the confines of
the institution from which he or she was paroled, at its discretion.
(2) The board may permit an offender convicted of a crime committed
on or after September 1, 2001, and sentenced under RCW 9.94A.712, to
leave a state correctional institution on community custody according
to the provisions of RCW 9.94A.712, ((9.94A.713)) section 4 of this
act, 72.09.335, and 9.95.420 through 9.95.440. The person may be
returned to the institution following a violation of his or her
conditions of release to community custody pursuant to the hearing
provisions of RCW 9.95.435.

Sec. 39 RCW 9.95.123 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 336 are each
amended to read as follows:
In conducting on-site parole hearings or community custody
revocation ((hearings or community custody)) or violations hearings,
the board shall have the authority to administer oaths and
affirmations, examine witnesses, receive evidence, and issue subpoenas
for the compulsory attendance of witnesses and the production of
evidence for presentation at such hearings. Subpoenas issued by the
board shall be effective throughout the state. Witnesses in attendance
at any on-site parole or community custody revocation hearing shall be
paid the same fees and allowances, in the same manner and under the
same conditions as provided for witnesses in the courts of the state in
accordance with chapter 2.40 RCW. If any person fails or refuses to
obey a subpoena issued by the board, or obeys the subpoena but refuses
to testify concerning any matter under examination at the hearing, the
board may petition the superior court of the county where the hearing
is being conducted for enforcement of the subpoena: PROVIDED, That an
offer to pay statutory fees and mileage has been made to the witness at
the time of the service of the subpoena. The petition shall be
accompanied by a copy of the subpoena and proof of service, and shall
set forth in what specific manner the subpoena has not been complied
with, and shall ask an order of the court to compel the witness to
appear and testify before the board. The court, upon such petition,
shall enter an order directing the witness to appear before the court
at a time and place to be fixed in such order and then and there to
show cause why he or she has not responded to the subpoena or has
refused to testify. A copy of the order shall be served upon the
witness. If it appears to the court that the subpoena was properly
issued and that the particular questions which the witness refuses to
answer are reasonable and relevant, the court shall enter an order that
the witness appear at the time and place fixed in the order and testify
or produce the required papers, and on failing to obey the order, the
witness shall be dealt with as for contempt of court.

Sec. 40 RCW 9.95.420 and 2007 c 363 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in (c) of this subsection, before the
expiration of the minimum term, as part of the end of sentence review
process under RCW 72.09.340, 72.09.345, and where appropriate,
72.09.370, the department shall conduct, and the offender shall
participate in, an examination of the offender, incorporating
methodologies that are recognized by experts in the prediction of
sexual dangerousness, and including a prediction of the probability
that the offender will engage in sex offenses if released.
(b) The board may contract for an additional, independent
examination, subject to the standards in this section.
(c) If at the time the sentence is imposed by the superior court
the offender's minimum term has expired or will expire within one
hundred twenty days of the sentencing hearing, the department shall
conduct, within ninety days of the offender's arrival at a department
of corrections facility, and the offender shall participate in, an
examination of the offender, incorporating methodologies that are
recognized by experts in the prediction of sexual dangerousness, and
including a prediction of the probability that the offender will engage
in sex offenses if released.
(2) The board shall impose the conditions and instructions provided
for in ((RCW 9.94A.720)) section 5 of this act. The board shall
consider the department's recommendations and may impose conditions in
addition to those recommended by the department. The board may impose
or modify conditions of community custody following notice to the
offender.
(3)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, no later than
ninety days before expiration of the minimum term, but after the board
receives the results from the end of sentence review process and the
recommendations for additional or modified conditions of community
custody from the department, the board shall conduct a hearing to
determine whether it is more likely than not that the offender will
engage in sex offenses if released on conditions to be set by the
board. The board may consider an offender's failure to participate in
an evaluation under subsection (1) of this section in determining
whether to release the offender. The board shall order the offender
released, under such affirmative and other conditions as the board
determines appropriate, unless the board determines by a preponderance
of the evidence that, despite such conditions, it is more likely than
not that the offender will commit sex offenses if released. If the
board does not order the offender released, the board shall establish
a new minimum term as provided in RCW 9.95.011.
(b) If at the time the offender's minimum term has expired or will
expire within one hundred twenty days of the offender's arrival at a
department of correction's facility, then no later than one hundred
twenty days after the offender's arrival at a department of corrections
facility, but after the board receives the results from the end of
sentence review process and the recommendations for additional or
modified conditions of community custody from the department, the board
shall conduct a hearing to determine whether it is more likely than not
that the offender will engage in sex offenses if released on conditions
to be set by the board. The board may consider an offender's failure
to participate in an evaluation under subsection (1) of this section in
determining whether to release the offender. The board shall order the
offender released, under such affirmative and other conditions as the
board determines appropriate, unless the board determines by a
preponderance of the evidence that, despite such conditions, it is more
likely than not that the offender will commit sex offenses if released.
If the board does not order the offender released, the board shall
establish a new minimum term as provided in RCW 9.95.011.
(4) In a hearing conducted under subsection (3) of this section,
the board shall provide opportunities for the victims of any crimes for
which the offender has been convicted to present oral, video, written,
or in-person testimony to the board. The procedures for victim input
shall be developed by rule. To facilitate victim involvement, county
prosecutor's offices shall ensure that any victim impact statements and
known contact information for victims of record are forwarded as part
of the judgment and sentence.

Sec. 41 RCW 9.95.440 and 2003 c 218 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
In the event the board suspends the release status of an offender
released under RCW 9.95.420 by reason of an alleged violation of a
condition of release, or pending disposition of a new criminal charge,
the board may nullify the suspension order and reinstate release under
previous conditions or any new conditions the board determines
advisable under ((RCW 9.94A.713(5))) section 5 of this act. Before the
board may nullify a suspension order and reinstate release, it shall
determine that the best interests of society and the offender shall be
served by such reinstatement rather than return to confinement.

Sec. 42 RCW 46.61.524 and 2006 c 73 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1) A person convicted under RCW 46.61.502(6), 46.61.504(6),
46.61.520(1)(a), or 46.61.522(1)(b) shall, as a condition of community
custody imposed under RCW 9.94A.545 or community placement imposed
under RCW 9.94A.660, complete a diagnostic evaluation by an alcohol or
drug dependency agency approved by the department of social and health
services or a qualified probation department, as defined under RCW
46.61.516 that has been approved by the department of social and health
services. This report shall be forwarded to the department of
licensing. If the person is found to have an alcohol or drug problem
that requires treatment, the person shall complete treatment in a
program approved by the department of social and health services under
chapter 70.96A RCW. If the person is found not to have an alcohol or
drug problem that requires treatment, he or she shall complete a course
in an information school approved by the department of social and
health services under chapter 70.96A RCW. The convicted person shall
pay all costs for any evaluation, education, or treatment required by
this section, unless the person is eligible for an existing program
offered or approved by the department of social and health services.
Nothing in chapter 348, Laws of 1991 requires the addition of new
treatment or assessment facilities nor affects the department of social
and health services use of existing programs and facilities authorized
by law.
(2))) As provided for under RCW 46.20.285, the department shall
revoke the license, permit to drive, or a nonresident privilege of a
person convicted of vehicular homicide under RCW 46.61.520 or vehicular
assault under RCW 46.61.522. The department shall determine the
eligibility of a person convicted of vehicular homicide under RCW
46.61.520(1)(a) or vehicular assault under RCW 46.61.522(1)(b) to
receive a license based upon the report provided by the designated
alcoholism treatment facility or probation department designated
pursuant to section 4(4)(b) of this act, and shall deny reinstatement
until satisfactory progress in an approved program has been established
and the person is otherwise qualified.

Sec. 43 RCW 72.09.015 and 2007 c 483 s 202 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Adult basic education" means education or instruction designed
to achieve general competence of skills in reading, writing, and oral
communication, including English as a second language and preparation
and testing services for obtaining a high school diploma or a general
equivalency diploma.
(2) "Base level of correctional services" means the minimum level
of field services the department of corrections is required by statute
to provide for the supervision and monitoring of offenders.
(3) "Community custody" has the same meaning as that provided in
RCW 9.94A.030 and also includes community placement and community
supervision as defined in section 48 of this act.
(4) "Contraband" means any object or communication the secretary
determines shall not be allowed to be: (a) Brought into; (b) possessed
while on the grounds of; or (c) sent from any institution under the
control of the secretary.
(((4))) (5) "County" means a county or combination of counties.
(((5))) (6) "Department" means the department of corrections.
(((6))) (7) "Earned early release" means earned release as
authorized by RCW 9.94A.728.
(((7))) (8) "Evidence-based" means a program or practice that has
had multiple-site random controlled trials across heterogeneous
populations demonstrating that the program or practice is effective in
reducing recidivism for the population.
(((8))) (9) "Extended family visit" means an authorized visit
between an inmate and a member of his or her immediate family that
occurs in a private visiting unit located at the correctional facility
where the inmate is confined.
(((9))) (10) "Good conduct" means compliance with department rules
and policies.
(((10))) (11) "Good performance" means successful completion of a
program required by the department, including an education, work, or
other program.
(((11))) (12) "Immediate family" means the inmate's children,
stepchildren, grandchildren, great grandchildren, parents, stepparents,
grandparents, great grandparents, siblings, and a person legally
married to an inmate. "Immediate family" does not include an inmate
adopted by another inmate or the immediate family of the adopted or
adopting inmate.
(((12))) (13) "Indigent inmate," "indigent," and "indigency" mean
an inmate who has less than a ten-dollar balance of disposable income
in his or her institutional account on the day a request is made to
utilize funds and during the thirty days previous to the request.
(((13))) (14) "Individual reentry plan" means the plan to prepare
an offender for release into the community. It should be developed
collaboratively between the department and the offender and based on an
assessment of the offender using a standardized and comprehensive tool
to identify the ((offenders' [offender's])) offender's risks and needs.
The individual reentry plan describes actions that should occur to
prepare individual offenders for release from prison or jail, specifies
the supervision and services they will experience in the community, and
describes an offender's eventual discharge to aftercare upon successful
completion of supervision. An individual reentry plan is updated
throughout the period of an offender's incarceration and supervision to
be relevant to the offender's current needs and risks.
(((14))) (15) "Inmate" means a person committed to the custody of
the department, including but not limited to persons residing in a
correctional institution or facility and persons released from such
facility on furlough, work release, or community custody, and persons
received from another state, state agency, county, or federal
jurisdiction.
(((15))) (16) "Privilege" means any goods or services, education or
work programs, or earned early release days, the receipt of which are
directly linked to an inmate's (a) good conduct; and (b) good
performance. Privileges do not include any goods or services the
department is required to provide under the state or federal
Constitution or under state or federal law.
(((16))) (17) "Promising practice" means a practice that presents,
based on preliminary information, potential for becoming a
research-based or consensus-based practice.
(((17))) (18) "Research-based" means a program or practice that has
some research demonstrating effectiveness, but that does not yet meet
the standard of evidence-based practices.
(((18))) (19) "Secretary" means the secretary of corrections or his
or her designee.
(((19))) (20) "Significant expansion" includes any expansion into
a new product line or service to the class I business that results from
an increase in benefits provided by the department, including a
decrease in labor costs, rent, or utility rates (for water, sewer,
electricity, and disposal), an increase in work program space, tax
advantages, or other overhead costs.
(((20))) (21) "Superintendent" means the superintendent of a
correctional facility under the jurisdiction of the Washington state
department of corrections, or his or her designee.
(((21))) (22) "Unfair competition" means any net competitive
advantage that a business may acquire as a result of a correctional
industries contract, including labor costs, rent, tax advantages,
utility rates (water, sewer, electricity, and disposal), and other
overhead costs. To determine net competitive advantage, the
correctional industries board shall review and quantify any expenses
unique to operating a for-profit business inside a prison.
(((22))) (23) "Vocational training" or "vocational education" means
"vocational education" as defined in RCW 72.62.020.
(((23))) (24) "Washington business" means an in-state manufacturer
or service provider subject to chapter 82.04 RCW existing on June 10,
2004.
(((24))) (25) "Work programs" means all classes of correctional
industries jobs authorized under RCW 72.09.100.

Sec. 44 RCW 72.09.270 and 2007 c 483 s 203 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department of corrections shall develop an individual
reentry plan as defined in RCW 72.09.015 for every offender who is
committed to the jurisdiction of the department except:
(a) Offenders who are sentenced to life without the possibility of
release or sentenced to death under chapter 10.95 RCW; and
(b) Offenders who are subject to the provisions of 8 U.S.C. Sec.
1227.
(2) The individual reentry plan may be one document, or may be a
series of individual plans that combine to meet the requirements of
this section.
(3) In developing individual reentry plans, the department shall
assess all offenders using standardized and comprehensive tools to
identify the criminogenic risks, programmatic needs, and educational
and vocational skill levels for each offender. The assessment tool
should take into account demographic biases, such as culture, age, and
gender, as well as the needs of the offender, including any learning
disabilities, substance abuse or mental health issues, and social or
behavior deficits.
(4)(a) The initial assessment shall be conducted as early as
sentencing, but, whenever possible, no later than forty-five days of
being sentenced to the jurisdiction of the department of corrections.
(b) The offender's individual reentry plan shall be developed as
soon as possible after the initial assessment is conducted, but,
whenever possible, no later than sixty days after completion of the
assessment, and shall be periodically reviewed and updated as
appropriate.
(5) The individual reentry plan shall, at a minimum, include:
(a) A plan to maintain contact with the inmate's children and
family, if appropriate. The plan should determine whether parenting
classes, or other services, are appropriate to facilitate successful
reunification with the offender's children and family;
(b) An individualized portfolio for each offender that includes the
offender's education achievements, certifications, employment, work
experience, skills, and any training received prior to and during
incarceration; and
(c) A plan for the offender during the period of incarceration
through reentry into the community that addresses the needs of the
offender including education, employment, substance abuse treatment,
mental health treatment, family reunification, and other areas which
are needed to facilitate a successful reintegration into the community.
(6)(a) Prior to discharge of any offender, the department shall:
(i) Evaluate the offender's needs and, to the extent possible,
connect the offender with existing services and resources that meet
those needs; and
(ii) Connect the offender with a community justice center and/or
community transition coordination network in the area in which the
offender will be residing once released from the correctional system if
one exists.
(b) If the department recommends partial confinement in an
offender's individual reentry plan, the department shall maximize the
period of partial confinement for the offender as allowed pursuant to
RCW 9.94A.728 to facilitate the offender's transition to the community.
(7) The department shall establish mechanisms for sharing
information from individual reentry plans to those persons involved
with the offender's treatment, programming, and reentry, when deemed
appropriate. When feasible, this information shall be shared
electronically.
(8)(a) In determining the county of discharge for an offender
released to community custody ((or community placement)), the
department may not approve a residence location that is not in the
offender's county of origin unless it is determined by the department
that the offender's return to his or her county of origin would be
inappropriate considering any court-ordered condition of the offender's
sentence, victim safety concerns, negative influences on the offender
in the community, or the location of family or other sponsoring persons
or organizations that will support the offender.
(b) If the offender is not returned to his or her county of origin,
the department shall provide the law and justice council of the county
in which the offender is placed with a written explanation.
(c) For purposes of this section, the offender's county of origin
means the county of the offender's first felony conviction in
Washington.
(9) Nothing in this section creates a vested right in programming,
education, or other services.

Sec. 45 RCW 72.09.345 and 1997 c 364 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to any other information required to be released
under this chapter, the department is authorized, pursuant to RCW
4.24.550, to release relevant information that is necessary to protect
the public concerning offenders convicted of sex offenses.
(2) In order for public agencies to have the information necessary
to notify the public as authorized in RCW 4.24.550, the secretary shall
establish and administer an end-of-sentence review committee for the
purposes of assigning risk levels, reviewing available release plans,
and making appropriate referrals for sex offenders. The committee
shall assess, on a case-by-case basis, the public risk posed by sex
offenders who are: (a) Preparing for their release from confinement
for sex offenses committed on or after July 1, 1984; and (b) accepted
from another state under a reciprocal agreement under the interstate
compact authorized in chapter 72.74 RCW.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the committee shall
have access to all relevant records and information in the possession
of public agencies relating to the offenders under review, including
police reports; prosecutors' statements of probable cause; presentence
investigations and reports; complete judgments and sentences; current
classification referrals; criminal history summaries; violation and
disciplinary reports; all psychological evaluations and psychiatric
hospital reports; sex offender treatment program reports; and juvenile
records. Records and information obtained under this subsection shall
not be disclosed outside the committee unless otherwise authorized by
law.
(4) The committee shall review each sex offender under its
authority before the offender's release from confinement or start of
the offender's term of ((community placement or)) community custody in
order to: (a) Classify the offender into a risk level for the purposes
of public notification under RCW 4.24.550; (b) where available, review
the offender's proposed release plan in accordance with the
requirements of RCW 72.09.340; and (c) make appropriate referrals.
(5) The committee shall classify as risk level I those sex
offenders whose risk assessments indicate a low risk of reoffense
within the community at large. The committee shall classify as risk
level II those offenders whose risk assessments indicate a moderate
risk of reoffense within the community at large. The committee shall
classify as risk level III those offenders whose risk assessments
indicate a high risk of reoffense within the community at large.
(6) The committee shall issue to appropriate law enforcement
agencies, for their use in making public notifications under RCW
4.24.550, narrative notices regarding the pending release of sex
offenders from the department's facilities. The narrative notices
shall, at a minimum, describe the identity and criminal history
behavior of the offender and shall include the department's risk level
classification for the offender. For sex offenders classified as
either risk level II or III, the narrative notices shall also include
the reasons underlying the classification.

Sec. 46 RCW 72.09.580 and 1999 c 196 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except as specifically prohibited by other law, and for purposes of
determining, modifying, or monitoring compliance with conditions of
community custody((, community placement, or community supervision as
authorized under RCW 9.94A.505 and 9.94A.545)), the department:
(1) Shall have access to all relevant records and information in
the possession of public agencies relating to offenders, including
police reports, prosecutors' statements of probable cause, complete
criminal history information, psychological evaluations and psychiatric
hospital reports, sex offender treatment program reports, and juvenile
records; and
(2) May require periodic reports from providers of treatment or
other services required by the court or the department, including
progress reports, evaluations and assessments, and reports of
violations of conditions imposed by the court or the department.

PART V
RECODIFICATION OF OBSOLETE PROVISIONS.
NEW SECTION. Sec. 47 (1) This chapter codifies sentencing
provisions that may be applicable to sentences for crimes committed
prior to July 1, 2000.
(2) This chapter supplements chapter 9.94A RCW and should be read
in conjunction with that chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 48 In addition to the definitions set out in
RCW 9.94A.030, the following definitions apply for purposes of this
chapter:
(1) "Community placement" means that period during which the
offender is subject to the conditions of community custody and/or
postrelease supervision, which begins either upon completion of the
term of confinement (postrelease supervision) or at such time as the
offender is transferred to community custody in lieu of earned release.
Community placement may consist of entirely community custody, entirely
postrelease supervision, or a combination of the two.
(2) "Community supervision" means a period of time during which a
convicted offender is subject to crime-related prohibitions and other
sentence conditions imposed by a court pursuant to this chapter or RCW
16.52.200(6) or 46.61.524. Where the court finds that any offender has
a chemical dependency that has contributed to his or her offense, the
conditions of supervision may, subject to available resources, include
treatment. For purposes of the interstate compact for out-of-state
supervision of parolees and probationers, RCW 9.95.270, community
supervision is the functional equivalent of probation and should be
considered the same as probation by other states.
(3) "Postrelease supervision" is that portion of an offender's
community placement that is not community custody.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 49 The court may order an offender whose
sentence includes community placement or community supervision to
undergo a mental status evaluation and to participate in available
outpatient mental health treatment, if the court finds that reasonable
grounds exist to believe that the offender is a mentally ill person as
defined in RCW 71.24.025, and that this condition is likely to have
influenced the offense. An order requiring mental status evaluation or
treatment must be based on a presentence report and, if applicable,
mental status evaluations that have been filed with the court to
determine the offender's competency or eligibility for a defense of
insanity. The court may order additional evaluations at a later date
if deemed appropriate

NEW SECTION. Sec. 50 A person convicted of a sex offense or an
offense categorized as a serious violent offense, assault in the second
degree, vehicular homicide, vehicular assault, assault of a child in
the second degree, any crime against persons where it is determined in
accordance with RCW 9.94A.602 that the offender or an accomplice was
armed with a deadly weapon at the time of commission, or any felony
offense under chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW, committed before July 1,
2000, may become eligible, in accordance with a program developed by
the department, for transfer to community custody status in lieu of
earned release time pursuant to RCW 9.94A.728(1).

PART VI
EFFECTIVE DATES AND TRANSITIONAL PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 51 (1) This act applies to all sentences
imposed or reimposed on or after August 1, 2009, for any crime
committed on or after the effective date of this section.
(2) This act also applies to all sentences imposed or reimposed on
or after August 1, 2009, for crimes committed prior to the effective
date of this section, to the extent that such application is
constitutionally permissible.
(3) To the extent that application of this act is not
constitutionally permissible with respect to any offender, the sentence
for such offender shall be governed by the law as it existed before the
effective date of this section, or on such prior date as may be
constitutionally required, notwithstanding any amendment or repeal of
provisions of such law.
(4) If application of any portion of this act is not
constitutionally permissible with respect to any offender, the judgment
and sentence shall specify the particular sentencing provisions that
will not apply to such offender. Whenever practical, the judgment and
sentence shall use the terminology set out in this act.
(5) The sentencing guidelines commission shall prepare a summary of
the circumstances under which application of this act is not
constitutionally permissible. The summary should include
recommendations of conditions that could be included in judgments and
sentences in order to prevent unconstitutional application of the act.
This summary shall be incorporated into the Adult Sentencing Guidelines
Manual.
(6) This act shall not affect the enforcement of any sentence that
was imposed prior to August 1, 2009, unless the offender is resentenced
after that date.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 52 (1) The following sections are recodified
as part of a new chapter in Title 9 RCW: RCW 9.94A.628, 9.94A.634,
9.94A.700, 9.94A.705, and 9.94A.710.
(2) RCW 9.94A.610 (as amended by this act), 9.94A.612 (as amended
by this act), 9.94A.614, 9.94A.616, 9.94A.618, and 9.94A.620 are each
recodified as sections in chapter 72.09 RCW.
(3) Sections 47 through 50 of this act are added to the new chapter
created in subsection (1) of this section.
(4) The code reviser is authorized to improve the organization of
chapter 9.94A RCW by renumbering existing sections and adding
subchapter headings.
(5) The code reviser shall correct any cross-references to sections
affected by this section in other sections of the code.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 53 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 9.94A.545 (Community custody) and 2006 c 128 s 4, 2003 c
379 s 8, 2000 c 28 s 13, 1999 c 196 s 10, 1988 c 143 s 23, & 1984 c 209
s 22;
(2) RCW 9.94A.713 (Nonpersistent offenders -- Conditions) and 2006 c
130 s 1 & 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 304;
(3) RCW 9.94A.715 (Community custody for specified offenders--Conditions) and 2006 c 130 s 2, 2006 c 128 s 5, 2003 c 379 s 6, 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 302, 2001 c 10 s 5, & 2000 c 28 s 25;
(4) RCW 9.94A.720 (Supervision of offenders) and 2003 c 379 s 7,
2002 c 175 s 14, & 2000 c 28 s 26;
(5) RCW 9.94A.800 (Sex offender treatment in correctional facility)
and 2000 c 28 s 34;
(6) RCW 9.94A.830 (Legislative finding and intent -- Commitment of
felony sexual offenders after July 1, 1987) and 1987 c 402 s 2 & 1986
c 301 s 1; and
(7) RCW 79A.60.070 (Conviction under RCW 79A.60.050 or 79A.60.060--Community supervision or community placement -- Conditions) and 2000 c 11
s 96 & 1998 c 219 s 3.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 54 The repealers in section 53 of this act
shall not affect the validity of any sentence that was imposed prior to
the effective date of this section or the authority of the department
of corrections to supervise any offender pursuant to such sentence.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 55 The code reviser shall report to the 2009
legislature on any amendments necessary to accomplish the purposes of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 56 Part headings used in this act are not any
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 57 Section 19 of this act expires July 1,
2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 58 This act takes effect August 1, 2009.

--- END ---