BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.15 RCW
to read as follows:
To be eligible for placement in a HOPE center, a minor must be
either a street youth, as that term is defined in this chapter, or a
youth who, without placement in a HOPE center, will continue to
participate in increasingly risky behavior. Youth may also self-refer
to a HOPE center. Payment for a HOPE center bed is not contingent upon
prior approval by the department.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.15.240 and 1999 c 267 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
To be eligible for placement in a responsible living skills
program, the minor must be dependent under chapter 13.34 RCW and must
have lived in a HOPE center or in a secure crisis residential center.
However, if the minor's caseworker determines that placement in a
responsible living skills program would be the most appropriate
placement given the minor's current circumstances, prior residence in
a HOPE center or secure crisis residential center before placement in
a responsible living program is not required. Responsible living
skills centers are intended as a placement alternative for dependent
youth that the department chooses for the youth because no other
services or alternative placements have been successful. Responsible
living skills centers are not for dependent youth whose permanency plan
includes return to home or family reunification.

--- END ---