BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that presently
persons and entities who facilitate like-kind exchanges pursuant to
section 1031 of the internal revenue code and the treasury regulations
promulgated under that section are not monitored and licensed as
exchange facilitators. The purpose of this chapter is to create a law
that imposes safeguards ensuring that persons or entities acting as
qualified escrows, qualified trusts, qualified intermediaries, and
exchange accommodation titleholders as defined under treasury
regulation section 1.1031(k) through 1(g)(3) and (g)(4) and internal
revenue service revenue procedure 2000-37, respectively, are regulated
while they are acting as exchange facilitators in exchanges under
section 1031 of the internal revenue code.
(2) The legislature further finds that exchange facilitators must
be licensed, thereby providing taxpayers with legal recourse if the
exchange facilitator fails to fulfill the facilitator's material
contractual obligations to deliver property or funds to a taxpayer or
misappropriates taxpayers' funds. This chapter ensures users of
exchange facilitator services that their exchange facilitator has been
duly licensed in this state and that there are legal channels to follow
in the event of a material breach of contractual provisions to deliver
property or funds to a taxpayer or misappropriation of funds by the
exchange facilitator during the exchange process. This chapter also
requires that exchange facilitators possess a level of competency
defined in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of financial institutions.
(2) "Director" means the director of financial institutions.
(3)(a) "Exchange facilitator" means a person who:
(i) For a fee facilitates an exchange of like-kind property by
entering into an agreement with a taxpayer by which the exchange
facilitator acquires from the taxpayer the contractual rights to sell
the taxpayer's relinquished property located in this state and transfer
a replacement property to the taxpayer as a qualified intermediary as
that term is defined under treasury regulation section 1.1031(k)
through 1(g)(4), or enters into an agreement with a taxpayer to take
title to a property in this state as an exchange accommodation
titleholder as that term is defined in internal revenue service revenue
procedure 2000-37, or enters into an agreement with a taxpayer to act
as a qualified trustee or qualified escrow holder as those terms are
defined under treasury regulation section 1.1031(k) through 1(g)(3);
(ii) Maintains an office in this state for the purpose of
soliciting business as an exchange facilitator; or
(iii) Holds themselves out as a qualified intermediary as that term
is defined under treasury regulation section 1.1031(k) through 1(g)(4)
in any manner including but not limited to by advertising their
services or soliciting customers in printed publications, direct mail,
television or radio advertisements, telephone calls, facsimile
transmissions, or other electronic communications directed to the
general public in this state; and
(iv) Is not the taxpayer or disqualified person as that term is
defined under treasury regulation section 1.1031(k) through 1(k)
seeking to qualify for the nonrecognition provisions of section 1031 of
the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended.
(b) "Exchange facilitator" does not include any financial
institution as defined in this section or title insurer or title
company that is (i) merely acting as a depository for exchange funds
and is not facilitating exchanges or that is (ii) acting solely as a
qualified escrow holder or as a qualified trustee as those terms are
defined under treasury regulation section 1.1031(k) through (g)(3) and
is not otherwise facilitating an exchange.
(c) "Exchange facilitator" does not include advertising for and
teaching seminars or classes, or otherwise giving presentations to
attorneys, accountants, real estate professionals, tax professionals,
or other professionals where the primary purpose is to teach the
professionals about tax deferred exchanges or train them to act as
exchange facilitators.
(d) "Exchange facilitator" does not include:
(i)(A) A qualified intermediary as defined under treasury
regulation section 1.1031(k) through (g)(4) that holds exchange funds
from the disposition of relinquished property that is located outside
the state.
(B) The exception under (d)(i)(A) of this subsection does not apply
when the qualified intermediary maintains an office in this state for
the purpose of soliciting business as an exchange facilitator as
provided in (a)(ii) of this subsection.
(C) The exception under (d)(i)(A) of this subsection does not apply
when the person holds themselves out as a qualified intermediary as
that term is defined under treasury regulation section 1.1031(k)
through 1(g)(4) in any manner including but not limited to by
advertising their services or soliciting customers in printed
publications, direct mail, television or radio advertisements,
telephone calls, facsimile transmissions, or other electronic
communications directed to the general public in this state;
(ii) An entity that is owned entirely by a licensed exchange
facilitator; or
(iii) An entity that is owned entirely by the same persons as a
licensed exchange facilitator and is used by the licensee to facilitate
exchanges or to take title to property in this state as an exchange
accommodation titleholder.
(e) For the purposes of (a)(i) of this subsection, "fee" means
compensation of any nature, direct or indirect, monetary or in-kind,
that is received by a person or a related person as defined in section
267(b) or 707(b) of the internal revenue code for any services relating
to or incidental to the exchange of like-kind property.
(4) "Financial institution" means:
(a) Any person doing business under the laws of the state of
Washington or the United States, and any federally insured depository
institution doing business under the laws of any other state, relating
to commercial banks, bank holding companies, savings banks, trust
companies, savings and loan associations, credit unions, or real estate
investment trusts as defined in 26 U.S.C. Sec. 856 and the affiliates,
subsidiaries, and service corporations thereof; and
(b) Subject to the director's written approval, the exclusive
agents of an affiliate of a bank that is wholly owned by the bank
holding company that owns the bank.
(5) "Financial regulator" means a state or federal agency that
regulates financial institutions, insurance, or securities.
(6) "Licensee" means any person duly licensed by this state under
this chapter to conduct business as an exchange facilitator.
(7) "Person" means, in addition to the singular, persons, groups of
persons, cooperative associations, limited liability companies, firms,
partnerships, corporations, or other legal entities, and includes the
agents and employees of such a person.
(8) "Principal" or "principal stockholder" means any person who
controls, directly or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, or
alone or in concert with others, a ten percent or greater interest in
a licensed exchange facilitator partnership, company, association, or
corporation, and the owner of a sole proprietorship.
(9) "Publicly traded company" means a corporation whose securities
are publicly traded on the New York stock exchange, the American stock
exchange, or the national association of securities dealers automated
quotations tier 1, and the subsidiaries of the corporation.
(10) "Related company" means any cooperative associations, limited
liability companies, firms, partnerships, corporations, or other legal
entities owned by a licensee to further the licensee's business as an
exchange facilitator and at least ten percent in value of the
outstanding stock, shares, or similar certificates of ownership in the
related company are owned, directly or indirectly, by or for the
licensee.
(11) "Taxpayer" means the owner of property that is or is intended
to be exchanged for the purposes of section 1031 of the internal
revenue code.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A person, unless specifically exempted
from this chapter, may not engage in the business of an exchange
facilitator without first obtaining and maintaining a license under
this chapter.
(2) A person may not bring a suit or action for the collection of
compensation in connection with duties performed as an exchange
facilitator unless the plaintiff alleges and proves that he or she was
a duly licensed exchange facilitator, or exempt from the license
requirement of this chapter, at the time of offering to perform or
performing such an act or service regulated by this chapter.
(3) An exchange facilitator license must be prominently displayed
in the exchange facilitator's place of business.
(4) Every licensed exchange facilitator must at all times have a
designated exchange facilitator officer responsible for all activities
of the exchange facilitator in conducting the business of an exchange
facilitator. A designated exchange facilitator officer, principal, or
owner who has supervisory authority over an exchange facilitator is
responsible for a licensee's, employee's, or independent contractor's
violations of this chapter and its rules if:
(a) The designated exchange facilitator officer, principal, or
owner directs or instructs the conduct or, with knowledge of the
specific conduct, approves or allows the conduct; or
(b) The designated exchange facilitator officer, principal, or
owner who has supervisory authority over the licensed exchange
facilitator knows or by the exercise of reasonable care and inquiry
should have known of the conduct, at a time when its consequences can
be avoided or mitigated and fails to take reasonable remedial action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Applications for an exchange facilitator
license under this chapter shall be in writing and in the form
prescribed by the director. The application shall contain at least the
following information:
(a) The name, address, date of birth, and social security number
of the applicant, and any other names, dates of birth, or social
security numbers previously used by the applicant, unless waived by the
director;
(b) If the applicant is a partnership or association, the name,
address, date of birth, and social security number of each general
partner or principal of the association, and any other names, dates of
birth, or social security numbers previously used by the members,
unless waived by the director;
(c) If the applicant is a corporation, other than a publicly traded
company, the name, address, date of birth, and social security number
of each officer, director, registered agent, and principal, and any
other names, dates of birth, or social security numbers previously used
by the officers, directors, registered agents, and principals unless
waived by the director;
(d) The name, address, date of birth, and social security number of
the applicant's designated exchange facilitator officer, and any other
names, dates of birth, or social security numbers previously used by
the designated exchange facilitator officer;
(e) A complete set of fingerprints taken by an authorized law
enforcement officer for each officer, director, principal, and the
designated exchange facilitator officer and for each person who has the
authority to deposit, transfer, and disburse exchange funds. The
fingerprint information for an officer, director, or principal is not
required if the corporation is a publicly traded company; and
(f) Other information regarding the applicant's or designated
exchange facilitator officer's background, financial responsibility,
experience, character, and general fitness as the director may require
by rule.
(2) As a part of or in connection with an application for any
license under this section, the applicant shall furnish information
concerning the identity of the designated exchange facilitator, each
officer that will be conducting the business of the applicant in this
state, and each person who has the authority to deposit, transfer, and
disburse exchange funds held by the applicant. This information must
include the fingerprints required in subsection (1)(e) of this section
for submission to the Washington state patrol, the federal bureau of
investigation, and any governmental agency or entity authorized to
receive this information for (a) a state and national criminal history
background check; (b) personal history, experience, or business record
purposes; and (c) other pertinent facts, as the director may reasonably
require. As part of or in connection with an application for a license
under this chapter, the director is authorized to receive criminal
history record information that includes nonconviction data as defined
in RCW 10.97.030. The department may only disseminate nonconviction
data obtained under this section to criminal justice agencies. This
section does not apply to financial institutions regulated under
chapters 31.12 and 31.13 RCW and Titles 30, 32, and 33 RCW or insurers
regulated under Title 48 RCW.
(3) Each applicant for an exchange facilitator's license shall:
(a) File and maintain a fidelity bond, in an amount of not less
than one million dollars executed by an insurer authorized to transact
that business in this state and approved by the director; or
(b) Deposit an amount of cash and securities or irrevocable letters
of credit equivalent to one million dollars under the terms and
conditions acceptable to the director. The deposit must be made into
an interest-bearing deposit or money market account of the
facilitator's choice and the interest earned accrues to the
facilitator.
(4) An applicant for an exchange facilitator's license shall:
(a) Have and maintain a policy of errors and omissions of not less
than five hundred thousand dollars issued by an insurer authorized to
transact that insurance in this state and approved by the director; or
(b) Deposit an amount of cash and securities or irrevocable letters
of credit equivalent to five hundred thousand dollars under the terms
and conditions acceptable to the director. The deposit must be made
into an interest-bearing deposit or money market account of the
facilitator's choice and the interest earned accrues to the
facilitator.
(5) An exchange facilitator may maintain a bond or insurance or
deposits in greater amounts than required in subsections (3) and (4) of
this section.
(6) If the director determines that the bonds or insurance are not
commercially, reasonably available, the director may waive or modify
the requirement for the bonds or insurance for a period of time to be
determined by the director. Any waiver or modification must be made by
rule.
(7) The bonds or insurance required in this section may not be
canceled without thirty days prior notice to the director. If the
licensee has approved deposits in lieu of the bond or insurance, those
deposits may not be withdrawn without thirty days prior notice to the
director. The director must suspend the license of the licensee unless
the licensee has secured an adequate replacement for the required
amount of bonds, insurance, or deposits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The director or any person claiming to have
sustained damage by reason of the failure of an exchange facilitator to
comply with this chapter, may file a claim against the exchange
facilitator and seek to recover damages from the bonds, insurance,
deposits, or letters of credit required in section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The director shall issue and deliver an
exchange facilitator license to an applicant if, after investigation,
the director makes the following findings:
(a) The applicant has complied with section 5 of this act;
(b) Neither the applicant, any of its principals, or the designated
exchange facilitator have had a license issued under this chapter or
any similar state statute suspended or revoked within five years of the
filing of the present application;
(c) Neither the applicant, any of its principals, or the designated
exchange facilitator officer have been convicted of a gross misdemeanor
involving dishonesty or financial misconduct or a felony within seven
years of the filing of the present application;
(d) The designated exchange facilitator officer (i) is an attorney
or certified public accountant admitted to practice in any state or
territory of the United States or (ii) the designated exchange
facilitator officer has been actively conducting the business of
exchange facilitation on a full-time basis for the last three years and
has passed a written examination whose content is established or
approved by the director;
(e) The applicant, its principals, and the designated exchange
facilitator officer have demonstrated financial responsibility,
character, and general fitness such as to command the confidence of the
community and to warrant a belief that the business will be operated
honestly, fairly, and efficiently within the purposes of this chapter;
and
(f) Neither the applicant, any of its principals, or the designated
exchange facilitator officer have been found to be in violation of this
chapter or rules.
(2) If the designated exchange facilitator officer terminates
employment with the licensee, the licensee shall immediately notify the
director in writing of the termination of the exchange facilitator
officer. The licensee shall also immediately inform the director in
writing of any newly designated exchange facilitator officer for the
licensee, setting forth the experience, integrity, and competency of
the newly designated exchange facilitator officer in facilitating
exchange transactions, and shall provide any other information required
by the director, including current fingerprint cards for the exchange
facilitator officer.
(3) If the director does not find the conditions of subsection (1)
of this section have been met, the director shall not issue the
license. The director shall notify the applicant of the denial and
return to the applicant the bond or approved alternative.
(4) A license issued under this section expires on the date one
year from the date of issuance which, for license renewal purposes, is
also the renewal date. The director shall adopt rules establishing the
process for renewal of licenses.
(5) A licensee may surrender a license by delivering to the
director written notice of surrender, but the surrender does not affect
the licensee's civil or criminal liability or any administrative
actions arising from acts or omissions occurring before such surrender.
(6) To prevent undue delay in the issuance of a license, an interim
license with a fixed date of expiration may be issued when the director
determines that the exchange facilitator has substantially fulfilled
the requirements for licensing as defined by rule.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) A licensee shall file with the director
within thirty business days any material changes in information
provided in a licensee's application as prescribed in rule by the
director. If this information indicates that the licensee is no longer
in compliance with this chapter, the director may take any action
authorized under this chapter to ensure that the licensee operates in
compliance with this chapter.
(2) A licensee shall file a report with the director within one
business day after the licensee has reason to know of the occurrence of
any of the following events:
(a) The filing of a petition by or against the licensee, or any
authorized delegate of the licensee, under the United States bankruptcy
code (11 U.S.C. Sec. 101-110) for bankruptcy or reorganization;
(b) The filing of a petition by or against the licensee, or any
authorized delegate of the licensee, for receivership, the commencement
of any other judicial or administrative proceeding for its dissolution
or reorganization, or the making of a general assignment for the
benefit of its creditors;
(c) The commencement of a proceeding to revoke, suspend, restrict,
or condition its license, or otherwise discipline or sanction the
licensee, in a state or country in which the licensee engages in
business or is licensed;
(d) The cancellation or other impairment of the licensee's bond or
other security; or
(e) A felony charge or felony conviction of an officer, director,
principal, or the designated exchange facilitator officer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A licensee may apply to the director for
authority to establish one or more branch offices under the same or
different name as the main office. Provided that the applicant is in
good standing with the department, as defined in rule by the director,
the director shall promptly issue a duplicate license for each of the
branch offices showing the location of the main office and the
particular branch. Each duplicate license shall be prominently
displayed in the office for which it is issued.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) Every licensee under this chapter has
the responsibility to act as a custodian for all exchange funds,
including money, property, other consideration, or instruments received
by the licensee from, or on behalf of, the client, except funds
received as the licensee's compensation. Every licensee shall invest
exchange funds in investments that meet a prudent person standard and
satisfy investment goals of liquidity and preservation of principal.
For purposes of this section, a prudent person standard is violated if:
(a) Exchange funds are knowingly commingled by the exchange
facilitator with the operating accounts of the exchange facilitator;
(b) Exchange funds are loaned or otherwise transferred to any
related company or person or entity affiliated with or related to the
exchange facilitator except that this subsection (1)(b) does not apply
to a transfer or loan made to a financial institution that is the
parent of or related to the exchange facilitator; or
(c) Exchange funds are invested in a manner that does not provide
sufficient liquidity to meet the exchange facilitator's contractual
obligations to its clients or does not preserve the principal of the
exchange funds.
(2) A person who, without doing more, performs the act of an
exchange facilitator is not performing a trust service or acting as a
trustee for a taxpayer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A licensed exchange facilitator is liable
for any conduct violating this chapter by the designated exchange
facilitator officer or other person while employed or engaged by the
licensed exchange facilitator.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) A license issued under this chapter
does not authorize any person other than the person to whom it is
issued to do any act by virtue thereof nor to operate in any other
manner than under his or her own name except:
(a) A licensed exchange facilitator may operate or advertise under
a name other than the one under which the license is issued by
obtaining the written consent of the director to do so; and
(b) An exchange facilitator may establish one or more branch
offices under a name or names different from that of the main office if
the name or names are approved by the director, so long as each branch
office is clearly identified as a branch or division of the main
office. Both the name of the branch office and of the main office must
clearly appear on the sign identifying the office, if any, and in any
advertisement or on any letterhead of any stationery or any forms, or
signs used by the mortgage firm on which either the name of the main or
branch offices appears.
(2) Exchange funds are not subject to execution or attachment on
any claim against the exchange facilitator. An exchange facilitator
shall not knowingly keep or cause to be kept any money in any financial
institution under any name designating the money as being set aside for
the benefits of the clients of any exchange facilitator, unless the
money was actually entrusted to the exchange facilitator by the client.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) An exchange facilitator shall use
consistent and accurate accounting procedures to account for exchange
funds. The director may adopt rules regarding trust fund accounting.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section,
an exchange facilitator shall maintain accurate and current books and
records which must be readily available at a location available to the
director until at least twenty-five months have elapsed following the
effective period to which the books and records relate.
(3) Where the usual business location of an exchange facilitator is
outside the state of Washington, the exchange facilitator shall, as
determined by the director by rule, either maintain its books and
records at a location in this state, or reimburse the director for his
or her expenses, including but not limited to transportation, food, and
lodging expenses, relating to any examination or investigation
resulting under this chapter.
(4) "Books and records" includes but is not limited to:
(a) Copies of all advertisements placed by or at the request of the
exchange facilitator that mention rates or fees. In the case of radio
or television advertisements, or advertisements placed on a telephonic
information line or other electronic source of information including
but not limited to a computer database or electronic bulletin board, an
exchange facilitator shall keep copies of the precise script for the
advertisement. All advertisement records shall include for each
advertisement the date or dates of publication and name of each
periodical, broadcast station, or telephone information line which
published the advertisement or, in the case of a flyer or other
material distributed by the exchange facilitator, the dates, methods,
and areas of distribution; and
(b) Copies of all documents, notes, computer records if not stored
in printed form, correspondence, or memoranda relating to a person from
whom the exchange facilitator has accepted a deposit or other funds, or
accepted property, or with whom the exchange facilitator has entered
into an agreement to assist in facilitating an exchange.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 (1) For the purpose of discovering
violations of this chapter or securing information lawfully required
under this chapter, the director may at any time, either personally or
by designees, investigate or examine the exchanges and business and,
wherever located, the books, accounts, records, papers, documents,
files, and other information used in the business of every licensee and
of every person who is engaged in the business of facilitating
exchanges under this chapter, whether the person acts or claims to act
as principal or agent, or under or without the authority of this
chapter. For these purposes, the director or designated
representatives shall have free access to the offices and places of
business, books, accounts, papers, documents, other information,
records, files, safes, and vaults of such a person. The director or
persons designated by the director may require the attendance of and
examine under oath all persons whose testimony may be required about
the loans or the business or the subject matter of any investigation,
examination, or hearing and may require such a person to produce books,
accounts, papers, records, files, and any other information the
director or designated persons deem relevant to the inquiry. The
director may require the production of original books, accounts,
papers, records, files, and other information; may require that the
original books, accounts, papers, records, files, and other information
be copied; or may make copies himself or herself or by designee of the
original books, accounts, papers, records, files, or other information.
If a licensee or person does not attend and testify, or does not
produce the requested books, accounts, papers, records, files, or other
information, then the director or designated representatives may issue
a subpoena or subpoena duces tecum requiring attendance or compelling
production of the books, accounts, papers, records, files, or other
information.
(2) The director shall make periodic examinations of the affairs,
business, office, and records of each licensee as determined by rule.
(3) Every licensee examined or investigated by the director or the
director's designee shall pay to the director the cost of the
examination or investigation of each licensed place of business as
determined by rule by the director.
(4) The director may enter into cooperative and reciprocal
agreements with the appropriate financial regulatory authorities of the
United States, any state, the District of Columbia, or any trust
territory of the United States for the periodic examination of exchange
facilitators and their subsidiaries or holding companies in other
states, the District of Columbia, or trust territories. The director
may accept reports of examination and other records from such
authorities in lieu of conducting his or her own examinations. The
director may enter into joint actions with other regulatory bodies
having concurrent jurisdiction or may enter into such actions
independently to carry out his or her responsibilities under this
chapter and assure compliance with the laws of this state.
(5) As a part of the examination process, a licensee shall provide
the director with an annual report of exchange facilitator activity.
The director may by rule create a schedule and format for the annual
report. The annual report may only include the following for exchange
facilitator activities in Washington state:
(a) The total number of property exchanges facilitated by the
licensee; and
(b) The total dollar volume of property exchanges facilitated by
the licensee.
Any information provided by an exchange facilitator in an annual
report that constitutes a trade secret as defined in RCW 19.108.010 is
exempt from the disclosure requirements in chapters 42.17 and 42.56
RCW, unless aggregated with information supplied by other exchange
facilitators in such a manner that the individual information of an
exchange facilitator is not identifiable.
(6) Financial information, business plans, examination reports, and
any information produced or obtained in examining an exchange
facilitator under this chapter is exempt from disclosure as provided in
RCW 42.56.270.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 It is a violation of this chapter for a
person required to be licensed under this chapter as an exchange
facilitator to:
(1) Directly or indirectly employ any scheme, device, or artifice
to defraud or mislead any person;
(2) Engage in any unfair or deceptive practice toward any person;
(3) Obtain property by fraud or misrepresentation;
(4) Fail to account for any moneys or property belonging to others
that may be in the possession or under the control of the licensee;
(5) Fail to fulfill its contractual duties to the taxpayer to
deliver property or funds to the taxpayer in a material way unless such
a failure is due to circumstances beyond the control of the licensee;
(6) Fail to make disclosures required by any applicable state or
federal law;
(7) Make, in any manner, any false or deceptive statement or
representation;
(8) Negligently make any false statement or knowingly and willfully
make any omission of material fact in connection with any reports filed
by an exchange facilitator or in connection with any investigation
conducted by the department;
(9) Commit, in the case of an entity, including commission by its
owners, officers, directors, employees, agents, or independent
contractors, any crime involving fraud, misrepresentation, deceit,
embezzlement, misappropriation of funds, robbery, or other theft of
property;
(10) Knowingly commingle funds held for a taxpayer in any account
which holds the licensee's own funds;
(11) Fail to get a license as required by this chapter;
(12) Fail to comply with a final order issued by the director; or
(13) Fail to comply with this chapter or any rule adopted under
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 (1) The director may enforce all laws and
rules relating to the licensing of exchange facilitators, grant or deny
licenses to exchange facilitators, and hold hearings.
(2) The director may impose fines or order restitution against
licensees or other persons subject to this chapter, or deny, suspend,
decline to renew, or revoke licenses for:
(a) Violations of orders, including cease and desist orders;
(b) False statements or omission of material information on the
application that, if known, would have allowed the director to deny the
application for the original license;
(c) Failure to maintain the required insurance or maintain the
required bond;
(d) Failure to comply with any directive, order, or subpoena of the
director; or
(e) Any violation of this chapter.
(3) The director may impose fines on an employee, independent
contractor, or agent of the licensee, or other person subject to this
chapter for:
(a) Any violations of this chapter; or
(b) Failure to comply with any directive or order of the director.
(4) The director may issue orders directing a licensee, its
employee, independent contractor, agent, or other person subject to
this chapter to cease and desist from conducting business.
(5) The director may issue orders removing from office or
prohibiting from participation in the conduct of the affairs of a
licensed exchange facilitator, any officer, principal, designated
exchange facilitator officer, employee of any licensed exchange
facilitator or any person subject to licensing under this chapter for:
(a) Any violation of this chapter;
(b) False statements or omission of material information on the
application that, if known, would have allowed the director to deny the
application for the original license;
(c) Conviction of a gross misdemeanor involving dishonesty or
financial misconduct or a felony after obtaining a license; or
(d) Failure to comply with any directive or order of the director.
(6) Each day's continuance of a violation or failure to comply with
any directive or order of the director is a separate and distinct
violation or failure.
(7)(a) The director may adopt reciprocity standards for licensure
of applicants licensed in other jurisdictions that meet the following
requirements:
(i) The applicant is licensed in a jurisdiction that grants
reciprocal licensing to exchange facilitators licensed in this state;
(ii) The reciprocal jurisdiction has requirements for licensing
that are equal to or greater than the requirements set forth in this
chapter;
(iii) The applicant provides evidence to the director of the
financial security requirements in section 4 of this act;
(iv) The applicant has designated the director as its
representative to receive service of process for matters arising in
this state;
(v) The applicant does not maintain an office in this state in
connection with the conduct of an exchange facilitator.
(b) The director shall undertake necessary and sufficient measures
to identify reciprocal jurisdictions as they meet the reciprocity
standards in (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection. From time to time,
the director shall publish a list of those reciprocal jurisdictions.
(c) Each reciprocal license under this section may be renewed
annually if:
(i) The applicant remains licensed in good standing in the
reciprocal jurisdiction; and
(ii) The reciprocal jurisdiction continues to meet the reciprocity
standards in (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection.
(8) The director shall immediately suspend the license or
certificate of a person who has been certified under RCW 74.20A.320 by
the department of social and health services as a person who is not in
compliance with a support order. If the person has continued to meet
all other requirements for reinstatement during the suspension,
reissuance of the license or certificate shall be automatic upon the
director's receipt of a release issued by the department of social and
health services stating that the licensee is in compliance with the
order.
(9) In the event that the director suspends or revokes the license
of a licensee, the director may appoint a receiver licensee or
successor licensee for the purpose of winding up and completing the
existing exchanges but that receiver licensee or successor licensee
does not have the authority to accept any new business as an exchange
facilitator.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 The director may, at his or her discretion
and as provided for in section 15 of this act, take any action
specified in this chapter. If the person subject to such an action
does not appear in person or by counsel at the time and place
designated for any administrative hearing that may be held on the
action then the person has consented to the action. If the person
subject to the action consents, or if after hearing the director finds
by a preponderance of the evidence that any grounds for sanctions under
this chapter exist, then the director may impose any sanction
authorized by this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A person that intentionally violates
section 14 (1) through (5) and (9) through (12) of this act is guilty
of a class B felony under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 The administrative procedure act, chapter
34.05 RCW, governs the processes and the proceedings for:
(1) Denying license applications;
(2) Suspending or revoking licenses;
(3) Issuing cease and desist orders;
(4) Imposing civil penalties or other remedies issued under this
chapter;
(5) Any appeal or review of an action; and
(6) Rule making.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 (1) The director may make necessary public
or private investigations within or outside of this state to:
(a) Determine whether any person has violated or is about to
violate this chapter or any rule or order under this chapter, or to aid
in the enforcement of this chapter or in the prescribing of rules and
forms under this chapter; or
(b) Require or permit any person to file a statement in writing,
under oath or otherwise as the director determines, as to all facts and
circumstances concerning the matter to be investigated.
(2) For the purpose of any investigation or proceeding under this
chapter, the director or any officer designated by the director may
administer oaths or affirmations, and upon his or her own motion or
upon request of any party, may subpoena witnesses, compel their
attendance, take evidence, and require the production of any matter
which is relevant to the investigation, including the existence,
description, nature, custody, condition, and location of any books,
documents, or other tangible things and the identity and location of
persons having knowledge or relevant facts, or any other matter
reasonably calculated to lead to the discovery of material evidence.
(3) Upon failure to obey a subpoena or to answer questions
propounded by the investigating officer and upon reasonable notice to
all persons affected thereby, the director may apply to the superior
court for an order compelling compliance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 Whenever the director determines that the
public is likely to be substantially injured by delay in issuing a
cease and desist order, the director may immediately issue a temporary
cease and desist order. The order shall become effective at the time
specified in the order. Every temporary cease and desist order shall
include a provision that a hearing will be held, within fourteen days
unless otherwise specified in chapter 34.05 RCW, upon request to
determine whether the order will become permanent.
If it appears that a person has engaged in an act or practice
constituting a violation of this chapter, or a rule or order under this
chapter, the director, with or without prior administrative
proceedings, may bring an action in the superior court to enjoin the
acts or practices and to enforce compliance with this chapter or any
rule or order under this chapter. Upon proper showing, injunctive
relief or temporary restraining orders shall be granted. The director
shall not be required to post a bond in any court proceedings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 Every licensed exchange facilitator that
does not maintain a physical office within the state must maintain a
registered agent within the state to receive service of any lawful
process in any judicial or administrative noncriminal suit, action, or
proceeding against the licensed exchange facilitator which arises under
this chapter or any rule or order under this chapter, with the same
force and validity as if served personally on the licensed exchange
facilitator. Service upon the registered agent is not effective unless
the plaintiff, who may be the director in a suit, action, or proceeding
instituted by him or her, no later than the next business day sends
notice of the service and a copy of the process by registered mail to
the defendant or respondent at the last address of the respondent or
defendant on file with the director. In any judicial action, suit, or
proceeding arising under this chapter or any rule or order adopted
under this chapter between the department or director and a licensed
exchange facilitator who does not maintain a physical office in this
state, venue is exclusively in the superior court of Thurston county.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 The legislature finds that the practices in
section 14 of this act are matters vitally affecting the public
interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW. Any violation of section 14 (1) through (12) of
this act is not reasonable in relation to the development and
preservation of business and is an unfair or deceptive act or practice
and unfair method of competition in the conduct of trade or commerce in
violation of RCW 19.86.020. Remedies provided by chapter 19.86 RCW are
cumulative and not exclusive.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 (1) There is established an exchange
facilitator commission of the state of Washington, to consist of the
director or his or her designee as chair, and five other members who
shall act as advisors to the director as to the needs of the exchange
facilitator profession, including but not limited to the design and
conduct of tests to be administered to applicants, educational
programs, audits and investigations of the profession designed to
protect the consumer, and any other matters determined appropriate.
(2) The director shall appoint the other members, each of whom has
been a resident of this state for at least five years and has at least
five years' experience as an exchange facilitator.
(3) The members of the first commission shall serve for the
following terms: One member for one year, one member for two years,
one member for three years, one member for four years, and one member
for five years, from the date of their appointment, or until their
successors are duly appointed and qualified. Every member of the
commission shall receive a certificate of appointment from the director
and before beginning the member's term of office shall file with the
secretary of state a written oath or affirmation for the faithful
discharge of the member's official duties. On the expiration of the
term of each member, the director shall appoint a successor to serve
for a term of five years or until the member's successor has been
appointed and qualified.
(4) The director may remove any member of the commission for cause.
Vacancies in the commission for any reason shall be filled by
appointment for the unexpired term.
(5) Members shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240,
and shall be reimbursed for their travel expenses incurred in carrying
out the provisions of this chapter in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 If the federal government changes a federal
rule or statute cited in this chapter, the director may determine if a
successor section has been adopted by federal law or rule for the
purposes of this chapter. The director is urged to pursue correcting
legislation for the citation at a time when that is expedient and
appropriate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 The director may adopt rules to implement
and administer this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 The director of the department of financial
institutions or the director's designee may take such steps as are
necessary to ensure this act is implemented on January 1, 2009.

Sec. 27 RCW 42.56.270 and 2007 c 470 s 2, 2007 c 251 s 13, and
2007 c 197 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:
The following financial, commercial, and proprietary information is
exempt from disclosure under this chapter:
(1) Valuable formulae, designs, drawings, computer source code or
object code, and research data obtained by any agency within five years
of the request for disclosure when disclosure would produce private
gain and public loss;
(2) Financial information supplied by or on behalf of a person,
firm, or corporation for the purpose of qualifying to submit a bid or
proposal for (a) a ferry system construction or repair contract as
required by RCW 47.60.680 through 47.60.750 or (b) highway construction
or improvement as required by RCW 47.28.070;
(3) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
private persons pertaining to export services provided under chapters
43.163 and 53.31 RCW, and by persons pertaining to export projects
under RCW 43.23.035;
(4) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
businesses or individuals during application for loans or program
services provided by chapters ((15.110)) 43.325, 43.163, 43.160,
43.330, and 43.168 RCW, or during application for economic development
loans or program services provided by any local agency;
(5) Financial information, business plans, examination reports, and
any information produced or obtained in evaluating or examining a
business and industrial development corporation organized or seeking
certification under chapter 31.24 RCW;
(6) Financial information, business plans, examination reports, and
any information produced or obtained in examining an exchange
facilitator under chapter 19.--- RCW (sections 1 through 25, 28, 29,
and 31 of this act);
(7) Financial and commercial information supplied to the state
investment board by any person when the information relates to the
investment of public trust or retirement funds and when disclosure
would result in loss to such funds or in private loss to the providers
of this information;
(((7))) (8) Financial and valuable trade information under RCW
51.36.120;
(((8))) (9) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and
research information and data submitted to or obtained by the clean
Washington center in applications for, or delivery of, program services
under chapter 70.95H RCW;
(((9))) (10) Financial and commercial information requested by the
public stadium authority from any person or organization that leases or
uses the stadium and exhibition center as defined in RCW 36.102.010;
(((10))) (11)(a) Financial information, including but not limited
to account numbers and values, and other identification numbers
supplied by or on behalf of a person, firm, corporation, limited
liability company, partnership, or other entity related to an
application for a horse racing license submitted pursuant to RCW
67.16.260(1)(b), liquor license, gambling license, or lottery retail
license;
(b) Independent auditors' reports and financial statements of
house-banked social card game licensees required by the gambling
commission pursuant to rules adopted under chapter 9.46 RCW;
(((11))) (12) Proprietary data, trade secrets, or other information
that relates to: (a) A vendor's unique methods of conducting business;
(b) data unique to the product or services of the vendor; or (c)
determining prices or rates to be charged for services, submitted by
any vendor to the department of social and health services for purposes
of the development, acquisition, or implementation of state purchased
health care as defined in RCW 41.05.011;
(((12))) (13)(a) When supplied to and in the records of the
department of community, trade, and economic development:
(i) Financial and proprietary information collected from any person
and provided to the department of community, trade, and economic
development pursuant to RCW 43.330.050(8) ((and 43.330.080(4))); and
(ii) Financial or proprietary information collected from any person
and provided to the department of community, trade, and economic
development or the office of the governor in connection with the
siting, recruitment, expansion, retention, or relocation of that
person's business and until a siting decision is made, identifying
information of any person supplying information under this subsection
and the locations being considered for siting, relocation, or expansion
of a business;
(b) When developed by the department of community, trade, and
economic development based on information as described in (a)(i) of
this subsection, any work product is not exempt from disclosure;
(c) For the purposes of this subsection, "siting decision" means
the decision to acquire or not to acquire a site;
(d) If there is no written contact for a period of sixty days to
the department of community, trade, and economic development from a
person connected with siting, recruitment, expansion, retention, or
relocation of that person's business, information described in (a)(ii)
of this subsection will be available to the public under this chapter;
(((13))) (14) Financial and proprietary information submitted to or
obtained by the department of ecology or the authority created under
chapter 70.95N RCW to implement chapter 70.95N RCW;
(((14))) (15) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and
research information and data submitted to or obtained by the life
sciences discovery fund authority in applications for, or delivery of,
grants under chapter 43.350 RCW, to the extent that such information,
if revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in private loss to
the providers of this information;
(((15))) (16) Financial and commercial information provided as
evidence to the department of licensing as required by RCW 19.112.110
or 19.112.120, except information disclosed in aggregate form that does
not permit the identification of information related to individual fuel
licensees;
(((16))) (17) Any production records, mineral assessments, and
trade secrets submitted by a permit holder, mine operator, or landowner
to the department of natural resources under RCW 78.44.085;
(((17))) (18)(a) Farm plans developed by conservation districts,
unless permission to release the farm plan is granted by the landowner
or operator who requested the plan, or the farm plan is used for the
application or issuance of a permit;
(b) Farm plans developed under chapter 90.48 RCW and not under the
federal clean water act, 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq., are subject to
RCW 42.56.610 and 90.64.190;
(((18))) (19) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and
research information and data submitted to or obtained by a health
sciences and services authority in applications for, or delivery of,
grants under RCW 35.104.010 through 35.104.060, to the extent that such
information, if revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in
private loss to providers of this information; and
(((19))) (20) Information gathered under chapter 19.85 RCW or RCW
34.05.328 that can be identified to a particular business.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29 This act may be known and cited as the
exchange facilitator act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 30 Sections 1 through 25, 28, 29, and 31 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 31 This act takes effect January 1, 2009.

--- END ---