BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.290.090 and 2007 c 377 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply to transactions
conducted by the following:
(1) Motor vehicle dealers licensed under chapter 46.70 RCW;
(2) Metal and other materials from vehicles acquired by vehicle
wreckers or hulk haulers licensed under chapter 46.79 or 46.80 RCW, and
acquired in accordance with those laws;
(3) Persons in the business of operating an automotive repair
facility as defined under RCW 46.71.011; and
(4) Persons in the business of buying or selling empty food and
beverage containers, including metal food and beverage containers.

--- END ---