BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.45 RCW
to read as follows:
In order to receive an exemption from the tax in this chapter on
real property transferred as a result of inheritance under RCW
82.45.010(3)(a), the following documentation must be provided:
(1) If the property is being transferred under the terms of a
community property agreement, a copy of the recorded agreement and a
certified copy of the death certificate;
(2) If the property is being transferred under the terms of a trust
instrument, a certified copy of the death certificate and a copy of the
trust instrument showing the authority of the grantor;
(3) If the property is being transferred under the terms of a
probated will, a certified copy of the letters testamentary or in the
case of intestate administration, a certified copy of the letters of
administration showing that the grantor is the court-appointed
executor, executrix, or administrator, and a certified copy of the
death certificate;
(4) In the case of joint tenants with right of survivorship and
remainder interests, a certified copy of the death certificate is
recorded to perfect title;
(5) If the property is being transferred pursuant to a court order,
a certified copy of the court order requiring the transfer, and
confirming that the grantor is required to do so under the terms of the
order; or
(6) If the community property interest of the decedent is being
transferred to a surviving spouse absent the documentation set forth in
subsections (1) through (5) of this section, a certified copy of the
death certificate and a signed affidavit from the surviving spouse
affirming that he or she is the sole and rightful heir to the property.

--- END ---