BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 59.18.060 and 2005 c 465 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The landlord will at all times during the tenancy keep the premises
fit for human habitation, and shall in particular:
(1) Maintain the premises to substantially comply with any
applicable code, statute, ordinance, or regulation governing their
maintenance or operation, which the legislative body enacting the
applicable code, statute, ordinance or regulation could enforce as to
the premises rented if such condition substantially endangers or
impairs the health or safety of the tenant;
(2) Maintain the roofs, floors, walls, chimneys, fireplaces,
foundations, and all other structural components in reasonably good
repair so as to be usable and capable of resisting any and all normal
forces and loads to which they may be subjected;
(3) Keep any shared or common areas reasonably clean, sanitary, and
safe from defects increasing the hazards of fire or accident;
(4) Provide a reasonable program for the control of infestation by
insects, rodents, and other pests at the initiation of the tenancy and,
except in the case of a single family residence, control infestation
during tenancy except where such infestation is caused by the tenant;
(5) Except where the condition is attributable to normal wear and
tear, make repairs and arrangements necessary to put and keep the
premises in as good condition as it by law or rental agreement should
have been, at the commencement of the tenancy;
(6) Provide reasonably adequate locks and furnish keys to the
tenant;
(7) Maintain all electrical, plumbing, heating, and other
facilities and appliances supplied by him in reasonably good working
order;
(8) Maintain the dwelling unit in reasonably weathertight
condition;
(9) Except in the case of a single family residence, provide and
maintain appropriate receptacles in common areas for the removal of
ashes, rubbish, and garbage, incidental to the occupancy and arrange
for the reasonable and regular removal of such waste;
(10) Except where the building is not equipped for the purpose,
provide facilities adequate to supply heat and water and hot water as
reasonably required by the tenant;
(11)(a) Provide a written notice to all tenants disclosing fire
safety and protection information. The landlord or his or her
authorized agent must provide a written notice to the tenant that the
dwelling unit is equipped with a smoke detection device as required in
RCW ((48.48.140)) 43.44.110. The notice shall inform the tenant of the
tenant's responsibility to maintain the smoke detection device in
proper operating condition and of penalties for failure to comply with
the provisions of RCW ((48.48.140)) 43.44.110(3). The notice must be
signed by the landlord or the landlord's authorized agent and tenant
with copies provided to both parties. Further, except with respect to
a single-family residence, the written notice must also disclose the
following:
(i) Whether the smoke detection device is hard-wired or battery
operated;
(ii) Whether the building has a fire sprinkler system;
(iii) Whether the building has a fire alarm system;
(iv) Whether the building has a smoking policy, and what that
policy is;
(v) Whether the building has an emergency notification plan for the
occupants and, if so, provide a copy to the occupants;
(vi) Whether the building has an emergency relocation plan for the
occupants and, if so, provide a copy to the occupants; and
(vii) Whether the building has an emergency evacuation plan for the
occupants and, if so, provide a copy to the occupants.
(b) The information required under this subsection may be provided
to a tenant in a multifamily residential building either as a written
notice or as a checklist that discloses whether the building has fire
safety and protection devices and systems. The checklist shall include
a diagram showing the emergency evacuation routes for the occupants.
(c) The written notice or checklist must be provided to new tenants
at the time the lease or rental agreement is signed, and must be
provided to current tenants as soon as possible, but not later than
January 1, 2004;
(12) Provide tenants with information provided or approved by the
department of health about the health hazards associated with exposure
to indoor mold. Information may be provided in written format
individually to each tenant((,)) or ((may be)) posted in a visible,
public location at the dwelling unit property, and must be translated
into the top five languages spoken in Washington state, as determined
by the department of health. If the tenant's primary language is one
other than English, and the department of health has translated the
information into the tenant's primary language, the landlord must
either post the information or provide a written copy of the
information in the tenant's primary language. The information must
detail how tenants can control mold growth in their dwelling units to
minimize the health risks associated with indoor mold. Landlords may
obtain the information from the department's web site or, if requested
by the landlord, the department must mail the information to the
landlord in a printed format. When developing or changing the
information, the department of health must include representatives of
landlords in the development process. The information must be provided
by the landlord to new tenants at the time the lease or rental
agreement is signed, and must be provided to current tenants no later
than January 1, ((2006, or must be posted in a visible, public location
at the dwelling unit property beginning July 24, 2005)) 2009;
(13) The landlord and his or her agents and employees are immune
from civil liability for failure to comply with subsection (12) of this
section except where the landlord and his or her agents and employees
knowingly and intentionally do not comply with subsection (12) of this
section; and
(14) Designate to the tenant the name and address of the person who
is the landlord by a statement on the rental agreement or by a notice
conspicuously posted on the premises. The tenant shall be notified
immediately of any changes by certified mail or by an updated posting.
If the person designated in this section does not reside in the state
where the premises are located, there shall also be designated a person
who resides in the county who is authorized to act as an agent for the
purposes of service of notices and process, and if no designation is
made of a person to act as agent, then the person to whom rental
payments are to be made shall be considered such agent;
No duty shall devolve upon the landlord to repair a defective
condition under this section, nor shall any defense or remedy be
available to the tenant under this chapter, where the defective
condition complained of was caused by the conduct of such tenant, his
family, invitee, or other person acting under his control, or where a
tenant unreasonably fails to allow the landlord access to the property
for purposes of repair. When the duty imposed by subsection (1) of
this section is incompatible with and greater than the duty imposed by
any other provisions of this section, the landlord's duty shall be
determined pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
As part of the children's health immunizations linkages and
development profile, the department shall provide to qualifying parents
and children through regular mailings information on the health hazards
of exposure to indoor mold as disclosed to residential tenants under
RCW 59.18.060(12).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Recent evidence demonstrates that toxic
indoor mold as well as household and workplace toxins cause
contaminated air and are under-recognized health problems. Exposure to
toxic indoor mold and household and workplace toxins is linked to a
variety of health problems, especially in vulnerable populations such
as infants, young children, and the elderly.
(2) The legislature finds that it is necessary to assess the
current body of knowledge on toxic indoor mold and household and
workplace toxins and determine the status of toxic indoor mold and
household and workplace toxins in the state. It is also necessary to
assess the feasibility of any actions to be taken by the legislature or
state agencies, including methods to assist state residents to identify
toxic indoor mold and household and workplace toxins and develop the
best strategies to address infestations, and to investigate the health
effects of and effective cleanup methods for infestations of toxic
indoor mold and household and workplace toxins.
(3) The department of health shall convene and support the
Washington state toxic mold and toxins task force to study and make
recommendations to the legislature concerning:
(a) Standards to assess the health threat posed by the presence of
toxic indoor mold and household and workplace toxins;
(b) Guidelines for the identification and sampling of toxic mold
and household and workplace toxins, visible or hidden in an indoor
environment;
(c) Remediation standards, methods, guidance, and costs for toxic
indoor mold removal and abatement of water intrusion in residential and
commercial properties, as well as facilities for vulnerable populations
such as hospitals, nursing homes, child care facilities, and elementary
and secondary schools;
(d) Primary prevention related to building construction and
maintenance;
(e) The availability and adequacy of commercial and residential
property coverage for toxic indoor mold and household and workplace
toxin damage in the insurance industry;
(f) Public education and outreach regarding toxic indoor mold and
household and workplace toxin health effects and remediation;
(g) The prevalence of insurance industry claims regarding toxic
indoor mold-related and household and workplace toxin-related claims to
determine the incidence of such claims in Washington state, and the
geographic distribution and other characteristics of such related
claims;
(h) The development of a program to examine and test indoor
residential air quality;
(i) The feasibility of adopting permissible exposure limits for
toxic indoor molds and household and workplace toxins;
(j) Appropriate disclosure of the presence of toxic indoor mold
growth and household and workplace toxins in real property at rental or
sale; and
(k) The need to authorize the issuance of bonds to finance capital
improvements for toxic indoor mold remediation and prevention.
(4) The task force shall include the following members:
(a) The secretary of the department of health or the secretary's
designee;
(b) A representative of a nonprofit organization whose work
involves public education regarding environmental health;
(c) A person whose primary field of expertise is environmental
science;
(d) A person whose primary field of expertise is public health;
(e) A physician whose primary field of expertise is pediatrics;
(f) A person whose primary field of expertise is related to indoor
environmental systems;
(g) The director of the department of ecology or the director's
designee;
(h) The insurance commissioner or the insurance commissioner's
designee;
(i) The director of the department of labor and industries or the
director's designee;
(j) A person who represents a provider of homeowner's insurance;
(k) A person who represents residential building contractors;
(l) A person who represents commercial building contractors;
(m) Two persons who represent homeowners;
(n) A landlord association representative;
(o) A representative of a nonprofit organization who works with
underrepresented minority communities; and
(p) A representative of building officials.
(5) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from each
of the two largest caucuses of the senate.
(6) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one
member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of
representatives.
(7) The task force shall elect cochairs from among its members at
its first meeting.
(8) Legislative members of the task force must be reimbursed for
travel expenses under RCW 44.04.120.
(9) The task force shall report its findings and conclusions,
including recommendations for legislative action if necessary, to the
governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December
1, 2009, with a preliminary report, if available, presented by June 30,
2009.
(10) This section expires December 31, 2009.

--- END ---