BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.155.010 and 1996 c 168 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
((The legislature finds that there exists in the state of
Washington over four billion dollars worth of critical projects for the
planning, acquisition, construction, repair, replacement,
rehabilitation, or improvement of streets and roads, bridges, water
systems, and storm and sanitary sewage systems. The December, 1983
Washington state public works report prepared by the planning and
community affairs agency documented that local governments expect to be
capable of financing over two billion dollars worth of the costs of
those critical projects but will not be able to fund nearly half of the
documented needs.
The legislature further finds that Washington's local governments
have unmet financial needs for solid waste disposal, including
recycling, and encourages the board to make an equitable geographic
distribution of the funds.))
It is the policy of the state of Washington to encourage self-reliance by local governments in meeting their public works needs and
to assist in the financing of critical public works projects ((by
making loans, financing guarantees, and technical assistance available
to local governments for these projects)) when those projects also
achieve state policy goals.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.155.020 and 2001 c 131 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions
in this section shall apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the public works board created in RCW 43.155.030.
(2) "Capital facility plan" means a capital facility plan required
by the growth management act under chapter 36.70A RCW or, for local
governments not fully planning under the growth management act, a plan
required by the public works board.
(3) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(4) (("Financing guarantees" means the pledge of money in the
public works assistance account, or money to be received by the public
works assistance account, to the repayment of all or a portion of the
principal of or interest on obligations issued by local governments to
finance public works projects.
(5))) "Local governments" means cities, towns, counties, special
purpose districts, and any other municipal corporations or quasi-municipal corporations in the state excluding school districts and port
districts.
(((6))) (5) "Public works project" means a project of a local
government for the planning, acquisition, construction, repair,
reconstruction, replacement, rehabilitation, or improvement of streets
and roads, bridges, water systems, or storm and sanitary sewage systems
((and)), solid waste facilities, including recycling facilities, and
other categories of local infrastructure projects as specified in the
capital budget appropriations act. A planning project may include the
compilation of biological, hydrological, or other data on a county,
drainage basin, or region necessary to develop a base of information
for a capital facility plan.
(((7))) (6) "Solid waste or recycling project" means remedial
actions necessary to bring abandoned or closed landfills into
compliance with regulatory requirements and the repair, restoration,
and replacement of existing solid waste transfer, recycling facilities,
and landfill projects limited to the opening of landfill cells that are
in existing and permitted landfills.
(((8))) (7) "Technical assistance" means training and other
services provided to local governments to: (a) Help such local
governments plan, apply, and qualify for loans ((and financing
guarantees)) from the board, and (b) help local governments improve
their ability to plan for, finance, acquire, construct, repair,
replace, rehabilitate, and maintain public facilities.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.155.050 and 2007 c 520 s 6036 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The public works assistance account is hereby established in
the state treasury. Money may be placed in the public works assistance
account from the proceeds of bonds when authorized by the legislature
or from any other lawful source. Money in the public works assistance
account shall be used to make loans ((and to give financial
guarantees)) to local governments for public works projects, within
categories and according to state policy priorities specified in the
capital budget appropriations act. In specifying the infrastructure
categories and state policy priorities, the legislature may not specify
funding for individual projects to individual jurisdictions. Moneys in
the account may also be appropriated to provide for state match
requirements under federal law for projects and activities conducted
and financed by the board under the drinking water assistance account.
((Not more than fifteen percent of the biennial capital budget
appropriation to the public works board from this account may be
expended or obligated for preconstruction loans, emergency loans, or
loans for capital facility planning under this chapter; of this amount,
not more than ten percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation
may be expended for emergency loans and not more than one percent of
the biennial capital budget appropriation may be expended for capital
facility planning loans.)) For the 2007-2009 biennium, moneys in the
account may be used for grants for projects identified in section 138,
chapter 488, Laws of 2005.
(2) The job development fund is hereby established in the state
treasury. Up to fifty million dollars each biennium from the public
works assistance account may be transferred into the job development
fund. Money in the job development fund may be used solely for job
development fund program grants, administrative expenses related to the
administration of the job development fund program created in RCW
43.160.230, and for the report prepared by the joint legislative audit
and review committee pursuant to RCW 44.28.801(2). Moneys in the job
development fund may be spent only after appropriation. The board
shall prepare a prioritized list of proposed projects of up to fifty
million dollars as part of the department's 2007-09 biennial budget
request. The board may provide an additional alternate job development
fund project list of up to ten million dollars. The legislature may
remove projects from the list recommended by the board. The
legislature may not change the prioritization of projects recommended
for funding by the board, but may add projects from the alternate list
in order of priority, as long as the total funding does not exceed
fifty million dollars.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.155.050 and 2007 c 520 s 6037 are each amended to
read as follows:
The public works assistance account is hereby established in the
state treasury. Money may be placed in the public works assistance
account from the proceeds of bonds when authorized by the legislature
or from any other lawful source. Money in the public works assistance
account shall be used to make loans ((and to give financial
guarantees)) to local governments for public works projects, within
categories and according to state policy priorities specified in the
capital budget appropriations act. In specifying the infrastructure
categories and state policy priorities, the legislature may not specify
funding for individual projects to individual jurisdictions. Moneys in
the account may also be appropriated to provide for state match
requirements under federal law for projects and activities conducted
and financed by the board under the drinking water assistance account.
((Not more than fifteen percent of the biennial capital budget
appropriation to the public works board from this account may be
expended or obligated for preconstruction loans, emergency loans, or
loans for capital facility planning under this chapter; of this amount,
not more than ten percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation
may be expended for emergency loans and not more than one percent of
the biennial capital budget appropriation may be expended for capital
facility planning loans.)) For the 2007-2009 biennium, moneys in the
account may be used for grants for projects identified in section 138,
chapter 488, Laws of 2005 and section 1033, chapter 520, Laws of 2007.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.155.060 and 1988 c 93 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
In order to aid the financing of public works projects, the board
may:
(1) Make low-interest or interest-free loans to local governments
from the public works assistance account or other funds and accounts
for the purpose of assisting local governments in financing public
works projects. The board may require such terms and conditions and
may charge such rates of interest on its loans consistent with the
categories and priorities specified in the capital budget
appropriations act and as it deems necessary or convenient to carry out
the purposes of this chapter. Money received from local governments in
repayment of loans made under this section shall be paid into the
public works assistance account for uses consistent with this chapter.
The board may not authorize loans in excess of the projected balance in
the account taking into consideration the expected pace of draws
against authorized loans and the anticipated amount of loan repayments.
If the total amount of the appropriation from the account exceeds the
projected available funds, the board shall reduce allocations from the
various categories in the capital budget by an equal percentage.
(2) ((Pledge money in the public works assistance account, or money
to be received by the public works assistance account, to the repayment
of all or a portion of the principal of or interest on obligations
issued by local governments to finance public works projects. The
board shall not pledge any amount greater than the sum of money in the
public works assistance account plus money to be received from the
payment of the debt service on loans made from that account, nor shall
the board pledge the faith and credit or the taxing power of the state
or any agency or subdivision thereof to the repayment of obligations
issued by any local government.
(3))) Create such subaccounts in the public works assistance
account as the board deems necessary to carry out the purposes of this
chapter.
(((4))) (3) Provide a method for the allocation of loans ((and
financing guarantees)) consistent with the categories and priorities
specified in the capital budget appropriations act and the provision of
technical assistance under this chapter.
All local public works projects aided in whole or in part under the
provisions of this chapter shall be put out for competitive bids,
except for emergency public works under RCW 43.155.065 for which the
recipient jurisdiction shall comply with this requirement to the extent
feasible and practicable. The competitive bids called for shall be
administered in the same manner as all other public works projects put
out for competitive bidding by the local governmental entity aided
under this chapter.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.155.065 and 2001 c 131 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Consistent with the categories and priorities specified in the
capital budget appropriations act, the board may make low-interest or
interest-free loans to local governments for emergency public works
projects. Emergency public works projects shall include the
construction, repair, reconstruction, replacement, rehabilitation, or
improvement of a public water system that is in violation of health and
safety standards and is being operated by a local government on a
temporary basis. The loans may be used to help fund all or part of an
emergency public works project less any reimbursement from any of the
following sources: (1) Federal disaster or emergency funds, including
funds from the federal emergency management agency; (2) state disaster
or emergency funds; (3) insurance settlements; or (4) litigation.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.155.068 and 2001 c 131 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Consistent with the categories and priorities specified in the
capital budget appropriations act, the board may make low-interest or
interest-free loans to local governments for preconstruction activities
on public works projects ((before the legislature approves the
construction phase of the project)). Preconstruction activities
include design, engineering, bid-document preparation, environmental
studies, right-of-way acquisition, and other preliminary phases of
public works projects as determined by the board. The purpose of the
loans authorized in this section is to accelerate the completion of
public works projects by allowing preconstruction activities to be
performed before the approval of the construction phase of the project
by the legislature.
(2) Projects receiving loans for preconstruction activities under
this section must be evaluated using the priority process and factors
in RCW 43.155.070(((2))) (4). The receipt of a loan for
preconstruction activities does not ensure the receipt of a
construction loan for the project under this chapter. ((Construction
loans for projects receiving a loan for preconstruction activities
under this section are subject to legislative approval under RCW
43.155.070 (4) and (5).)) The board shall adopt a single application
process for local governments seeking both a loan for preconstruction
activities under this section and a construction loan for the project.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.155.070 and 2007 c 341 s 24 and 2007 c 231 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) To qualify for loans or pledges under this chapter the board
must determine that a local government meets all of the following
conditions:
(a) The city or county must be imposing a tax under chapter 82.46
RCW at a rate of at least one-quarter of one percent; and
(b) The local government must have developed a capital facility
plan((; and
(c) The local government must be using all local revenue sources
which are reasonably available for funding public works, taking into
consideration local employment and economic factors)).
(2) Except where necessary to address a public health need or
substantial environmental degradation, a county, city, or town planning
under RCW 36.70A.040 must have adopted a comprehensive plan, including
a capital facilities plan element, and development regulations as
required by RCW 36.70A.040. This subsection does not require any
county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 to adopt a
comprehensive plan or development regulations before requesting or
receiving a loan or loan guarantee under this chapter if such request
is made before the expiration of the time periods specified in RCW
36.70A.040. A county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040
which has not adopted a comprehensive plan and development regulations
within the time periods specified in RCW 36.70A.040 is not prohibited
from receiving a loan or loan guarantee under this chapter if the
comprehensive plan and development regulations are adopted as required
by RCW 36.70A.040 before submitting a request for a loan ((or loan
guarantee)).
(3) In considering awarding loans for public facilities to special
districts requesting funding for a proposed facility located in a
county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040, the board shall
consider whether the county, city, or town planning under RCW
36.70A.040 in whose planning jurisdiction the proposed facility is
located has adopted a comprehensive plan and development regulations as
required by RCW 36.70A.040.
(4) Consistent with the categories and priorities specified in the
capital budget appropriations act, the board shall develop a priority
process for public works projects as provided in this section. The
intent of the priority process is to maximize the ((value of public
works projects)) achievement of state policy goals accomplished with
assistance under this chapter. The board shall attempt to assure a
geographical balance in assigning priorities to projects. In addition
to the policy goals and priorities specified in the capital budget
appropriations act, the board shall consider at least the following
factors in assigning a priority to a project:
(a) Whether the local government receiving assistance has
experienced severe fiscal distress resulting from natural disaster or
emergency public works needs;
(b) Except as otherwise conditioned by RCW 43.155.110, whether the
entity receiving assistance is a Puget Sound partner, as defined in RCW
90.71.010;
(c) Whether the project is referenced in the action agenda
developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310;
(d) Whether the project is critical in nature and would affect the
health and safety of a great number of citizens;
(e) Whether the applicant has developed and adhered to guidelines
regarding its permitting process for those applying for development
permits consistent with section 1(2), chapter 231, Laws of 2007;
(f) The cost of the project compared to the ((size of the local
government and amount of loan money available)) fiscal capacity of the
local government, including whether there remains unused local taxing
authority and how the applicant's utility rates as a percent of median
household income compare to similar measures for the state and
comparable regions. The cost of the project must include all phases
for which the local government anticipates seeking state assistance;
(g) The number of communities served by or funding the project;
(h) Whether the project is located in an area of high unemployment,
compared to the average state unemployment;
(i) Whether the project is the acquisition, expansion, improvement,
or renovation by a local government of a public water system that is in
violation of health and safety standards, including the cost of
extending existing service to such a system;
(j) The relative benefit of the project to the community,
considering the present level of economic activity in the community and
the existing local capacity to increase local economic activity in
communities that have low economic growth; and
(k) Other criteria that the board considers advisable.
(5) Existing debt or financial obligations of local governments
shall not be refinanced under this chapter. Each local government
applicant shall provide documentation of attempts to secure additional
local or other sources of funding for each public works project for
which financial assistance is sought under this chapter.
(6) Before November 1st of each year, the board shall develop and
submit to the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives a ((description of the loans made under RCW 43.155.065,
43.155.068, and subsection (9) of this section during the preceding
fiscal year and a prioritized list of projects which are recommended
for funding by the legislature, including one copy to the staff of each
of the committees. The list shall include, but not be limited to, a
description of each project and recommended financing, the terms and
conditions of the loan or financial guarantee, the local government
jurisdiction and unemployment rate, demonstration of the jurisdiction's
critical need for the project and documentation of local funds being
used to finance the public works project. The list shall also include
measures of fiscal capacity for each jurisdiction recommended for
financial assistance, compared to authorized limits and state averages,
including local government sales taxes; real estate excise taxes;
property taxes; and charges for or taxes on sewerage, water, garbage,
and other utilities.
(7) The board shall not sign contracts or otherwise financially
obligate funds from the public works assistance account before the
legislature has appropriated funds for a specific list of public works
projects. The legislature may remove projects from the list
recommended by the board. The legislature shall not change the order
of the priorities recommended for funding by the board.
(8) Subsection (7) of this section does not apply to loans made
under RCW 43.155.065, 43.155.068, and subsection (9) of this section.
(9) Loans made for the purpose of capital facilities plans shall be
exempted from subsection (7) of this section.
(10))) report describing the financial assistance provided in the
prior fiscal year, and a status report on all uncompleted projects.
The report of projects receiving assistance in the prior fiscal year
must include a description of the scoring used to prioritize the
applications for assistance within the categories and priorities
specified in the capital budget appropriations act and other factors
considered by the board. The report must specify all state funding and
the terms of that assistance provided for the project by the department
and other state agencies in the current and prior biennia. The status
report of all uncompleted projects must describe the percentage of the
project that is complete, the percentage of total state funding from
all sources that has been disbursed to the project, a brief description
of reasons for any significant delays in the project plan, and
significant changes in the project budget and the level of state
funding authorized.
(7) To qualify for loans or pledges for solid waste or recycling
facilities under this chapter, a city or county must demonstrate that
the solid waste or recycling facility is consistent with and necessary
to implement the comprehensive solid waste management plan adopted by
the city or county under chapter 70.95 RCW.
(((11))) (8) After January 1, 2010, any project designed to address
the effects of storm water or wastewater on Puget Sound may be funded
under this section only if the project is not in conflict with the
action agenda developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW
90.71.310.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Section 3 of this act expires June 30, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Section 4 of this act takes effect June 30,
2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 1 through 3 and 5 through 8 of
this act take effect July 1, 2009.

--- END ---