BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.63A.125 and 2006 c 371 s 233 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish a competitive process to solicit
proposals for and prioritize projects that assist nonprofit
organizations in acquiring, constructing, or rehabilitating facilities
used for the delivery of nonresidential ((social)) community services
including:
(a) Social service centers; and
(b) Multipurpose community and cultural centers.
(2) The department shall establish a competitive process to
prioritize applications for the assistance as follows:
(a) The department shall conduct a statewide solicitation of
project applications from local governments, nonprofit organizations,
and other entities, as determined by the department. The department
shall evaluate and rank applications in consultation with a citizen
advisory committee using objective criteria. At a minimum, applicants
must demonstrate that the ((requested assistance)) proposed project
will increase the range, efficiency, or quality of the ((social))
services it provides to citizens. The department and the citizen
advisory committee shall prioritize projects located in distressed
communities defined in (b) of this subsection. The evaluation and
ranking process shall also include an examination of existing assets
that applicants may apply to projects. Grant assistance under this
section shall not exceed twenty-five percent of the total cost of the
project. The nonstate portion of the total project cost may include
cash, the value of real property when acquired solely for the purpose
of the project, and in-kind contributions.
(b) For the purposes of this section, "distressed community" means
a community that meets at least one of the following criteria:
(i) A significant percentage of local elementary students receive
free and reduced-price meals;
(ii) The county unemployment rate is one hundred twenty percent
above the state average for the previous three years; or
(iii) The small business administration historically underutilized
business zones criteria.
(c) The department shall submit a prioritized list of recommended
projects to the governor and the legislature in the department's
biennial capital budget request ((beginning with the 2001-2003 biennium
and thereafter. For the 1999-2001 biennium, the department shall
conduct a solicitation and ranking process, as described in (a) of this
subsection, for projects to be funded by appropriations provided for
this program in the 1999-2001 capital budget)). The list shall include
a description of each project, the amount of recommended state funding,
and documentation of nonstate funds to be used for the project. ((The
total amount of recommended state funding for projects on a biennial
project list shall not exceed ten million dollars. Except for the
1999-2001 biennium,)) The department shall not sign contracts or
otherwise financially obligate funds under this section until the
legislature has approved a specific list of projects.
(((c))) (d) In contracts for grants authorized under this section
the department shall include provisions which require that capital
improvements shall be held by the grantee for a specified period of
time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities shall
be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found
to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee
shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant
plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington
general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of
authorization of the grant.
(e) If cash funds are appropriated, up to five million dollars may
be used for technical assistance and planning.

--- END ---