BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds it is in the interest
of the state to increase infrastructure funding in order to ensure the
public health and safety of its citizens. The legislature also finds
it is in the interest of the state to increase infrastructure funding
in support of the requirements of the growth management act, other
state regulatory requirements, and state administered federal
requirements.
The legislature also finds that state investment in public
infrastructure requires local governments to administer maintenance and
preservation plans for public infrastructure it owns and operates. The
legislature further finds that state investment in public
infrastructure is a contributor to the economic development of
Washington state and its communities by encouraging private investment
and the creation and retention of high-wage jobs. Finally, the
legislature finds that providing dedicated funding for economic
development programs will lead to greater certainty in economic
development decisions and further encourage private investment.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.16.020 and 1996 c 150 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is levied and there shall be collected from every person
a tax for the act or privilege of engaging within this state in any one
or more of the businesses herein mentioned. The tax shall be equal to
the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate set out after
the business, as follows:
(a) Express, sewerage collection, and telegraph businesses:
((Three and six-tenths)) six percent;
(b) Light and power business: Three and sixty-two one-hundredths
percent;
(c) Gas distribution business: Three and six-tenths percent;
(d) Urban transportation business: Six-tenths of one percent;
(e) Vessels under sixty-five feet in length, except tugboats,
operating upon the waters within the state: Six-tenths of one percent;
(f) Motor transportation, railroad, railroad car, and tugboat
businesses, and all public service businesses other than ones mentioned
above: One and eight-tenths of one percent;
(g) Water distribution business: ((Four and seven-tenths)) Seven
and twenty-nine one-hundredths percent.
(2) An additional tax is imposed equal to the rate specified in RCW
82.02.030 multiplied by the tax payable under subsection (1) of this
section.
(3) ((Twenty)) Forty-three percent of the moneys collected under
subsection (1) of this section on water distribution businesses and
((sixty)) seventy-four percent of the moneys collected under subsection
(1) of this section on sewerage collection businesses shall be
deposited in the public works assistance account created in RCW
43.155.050.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.18.020 and 1989 c 431 s 79 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is imposed on each person using the solid waste services of
a solid waste collection business a solid waste collection tax equal to
((three and six-tenths)) seven and two-tenths percent of the
consideration charged for the services.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.155.020 and 2001 c 131 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section shall apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Board" means the public works board created in RCW 43.155.030.
(2) "Capital facility plan" means a capital facility plan required
by the growth management act under chapter 36.70A RCW or, for local
governments not fully planning under the growth management act, a plan
required by the public works board.
(3) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(4) "Financing guarantees" means the pledge of money in the public
works assistance account, or money to be received by the public works
assistance account, to the repayment of all or a portion of the
principal of or interest on obligations issued by local governments to
finance public works projects.
(5) "Local governments" means cities, towns, counties, special
purpose districts, and any other municipal corporations or quasi-municipal corporations in the state excluding school districts and port
districts.
(6) "Public works project" means a project of a local government
for the planning, acquisition, construction, repair, reconstruction,
replacement, rehabilitation, or improvement of streets and roads,
bridges, water systems, or storm and sanitary sewage systems and solid
waste facilities, including recycling facilities. A planning project
may include the compilation of biological, hydrological, or other data
on a county, drainage basin, or region necessary to develop a base of
information for a capital facility plan.
(7) "Solid waste or recycling project" means remedial actions
necessary to bring abandoned or closed landfills into compliance with
regulatory requirements and the repair, restoration, and replacement of
existing solid waste transfer, recycling facilities, and landfill
projects limited to the opening of landfill cells that are in existing
and permitted landfills.
(8) "Technical assistance" means training and other services
provided to local governments to: (a) Help such local governments
plan, apply, and qualify for loans and financing guarantees from the
board, and (b) help local governments improve their ability to plan
for, finance, acquire, construct, repair, replace, rehabilitate, and
maintain public facilities.
(9) "High growth area" means an area in a city or county
comprehensive plan that is:
(a) Within city boundaries of a county planning under chapter
36.70A RCW and is zoned for:
(i) Residential development of at least a gross area wide average
of four dwelling units per acre; and/or
(ii) Nonresidential development;
(b) Eligible to be annexed to a city under chapter 35.13 or 35A.14
RCW; or
(c) Eligible for annexation by an interlocal agreement, established
by the city and county, that identifies levels and types of municipal
services needed in the area to facilitate growth.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.155.050 and 2007 c 520 s 6036 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The public works assistance account is hereby established in
the state treasury. Money may be placed in the public works assistance
account from the proceeds of bonds when authorized by the legislature
or from any other lawful source. Money in the public works assistance
account shall be used to make loans and to give financial guarantees to
local governments for public works projects. Moneys in the account may
also be appropriated to provide for state match requirements under
federal law for projects and activities conducted and financed by the
board under the drinking water assistance account. Not more than
fifteen percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation to the
public works board from this account may be expended or obligated for
preconstruction loans, emergency loans, or loans for capital facility
planning under this chapter; of this amount, not more than ten percent
of the biennial capital budget appropriation may be expended for
emergency loans and not more than one percent of the biennial capital
budget appropriation may be expended for capital facility planning
loans. For the 2007-2009 biennium, moneys in the account may be used
for grants for projects identified in section 138, chapter 488, Laws of
2005.
(2) The job development fund is hereby established in the state
treasury. Up to fifty million dollars each biennium from the public
works assistance account may be transferred into the job development
fund. Money in the job development fund may be used solely for job
development fund program grants, administrative expenses related to the
administration of the job development fund program created in RCW
43.160.230, and for the report prepared by the joint legislative audit
and review committee pursuant to RCW 44.28.801(2). Moneys in the job
development fund may be spent only after appropriation. The board
shall prepare a prioritized list of proposed projects of up to fifty
million dollars as part of the department's 2007-09 biennial budget
request. The board may provide an additional alternate job development
fund project list of up to ten million dollars. The legislature may
remove projects from the list recommended by the board. The
legislature may not change the prioritization of projects recommended
for funding by the board, but may add projects from the alternate list
in order of priority, as long as the total funding does not exceed
fifty million dollars.
(3) The growth management infrastructure account is hereby created
in the state treasury. Eight percent of the public works assistance
account must be deposited into the growth management infrastructure
account. Money in the growth management infrastructure account may be
used solely for grants in high growth areas identified in RCW
43.155.020(9) and administrative expenses related to the administration
of high growth area projects. The board must prepare a prioritized
list of proposed projects as part of the department's biennial budget
request. The legislature may remove projects from the list recommended
by the board. The legislature may not change the prioritization of
projects recommended for funding by the board, but may add projects
from the alternate list in order of priority, provided that the total
funding does not exceed eight percent of the public works assistance
account.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.155.050 and 2007 c 520 s 6037 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The public works assistance account is hereby established in
the state treasury. Money may be placed in the public works assistance
account from the proceeds of bonds when authorized by the legislature
or from any other lawful source. Money in the public works assistance
account shall be used to make loans and to give financial guarantees to
local governments for public works projects. Moneys in the account may
also be appropriated to provide for state match requirements under
federal law for projects and activities conducted and financed by the
board under the drinking water assistance account. Not more than
fifteen percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation to the
public works board from this account may be expended or obligated for
preconstruction loans, emergency loans, or loans for capital facility
planning under this chapter; of this amount, not more than ten percent
of the biennial capital budget appropriation may be expended for
emergency loans and not more than one percent of the biennial capital
budget appropriation may be expended for capital facility planning
loans. For the 2007-2009 biennium, moneys in the account may be used
for grants for projects identified in section 138, chapter 488, Laws of
2005 and section 1033, chapter 520, Laws of 2007.
(2) The growth management infrastructure account is hereby created
in the state treasury. Eight percent of the public works assistance
account must be deposited into the growth management infrastructure
account. Money in the growth management infrastructure account may be
used solely for grants in high growth areas identified in RCW
43.155.020(9) and administrative expenses related to the administration
of high growth area projects. The board must prepare a prioritized
list of proposed projects as part of the department's biennial budget
request. The legislature may remove projects from the list recommended
by the board. The legislature may not change the prioritization of
projects recommended for funding by the board, but may add projects
from the alternate list in order of priority, provided that the total
funding does not exceed eight percent of the public works assistance
account.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.155.070 and 2007 c 341 s 24 and 2007 c 231 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) To qualify for loans or pledges under this chapter the board
must determine that a local government meets all of the following
conditions:
(a) The city or county must be imposing a tax under chapter 82.46
RCW at a rate of at least one-quarter of one percent;
(b) The local government must have developed a capital facility
plan; and
(c) The local government must be using all local revenue sources
which are reasonably available for funding public works, taking into
consideration local employment and economic factors.
(2) Except where necessary to address a public health need or
substantial environmental degradation, a county, city, or town planning
under RCW 36.70A.040 must have adopted a comprehensive plan, including
a capital facilities plan element, and development regulations as
required by RCW 36.70A.040. This subsection does not require any
county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 to adopt a
comprehensive plan or development regulations before requesting or
receiving a loan or loan guarantee under this chapter if such request
is made before the expiration of the time periods specified in RCW
36.70A.040. A county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040
which has not adopted a comprehensive plan and development regulations
within the time periods specified in RCW 36.70A.040 is not prohibited
from receiving a loan or loan guarantee under this chapter if the
comprehensive plan and development regulations are adopted as required
by RCW 36.70A.040 before submitting a request for a loan or loan
guarantee.
(3) In considering awarding loans for public facilities to special
districts requesting funding for a proposed facility located in a
county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040, the board shall
consider whether the county, city, or town planning under RCW
36.70A.040 in whose planning jurisdiction the proposed facility is
located has adopted a comprehensive plan and development regulations as
required by RCW 36.70A.040.
(4) The board shall develop a priority process for public works
projects as provided in this section. The intent of the priority
process is to maximize the value of public works projects accomplished
with assistance under this chapter. The board shall attempt to assure
a geographical balance in assigning priorities to projects. The board
shall consider at least the following factors in assigning a priority
to a project:
(a) Whether the local government receiving assistance has
experienced severe fiscal distress resulting from natural disaster or
emergency public works needs;
(b) Except as otherwise conditioned by RCW 43.155.110, whether the
entity receiving assistance is a Puget Sound partner, as defined in RCW
90.71.010;
(c) Whether the project is referenced in the action agenda
developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310;
(d) Whether the project is critical in nature and would affect the
health and safety of a great number of citizens;
(e) Whether the applicant has developed and adhered to guidelines
regarding its permitting process for those applying for development
permits consistent with section 1(2), chapter 231, Laws of 2007;
(f) The cost of the project compared to the size of the local
government and amount of loan money available;
(g) The number of communities served by or funding the project;
(h) Whether the project is located in an area of high unemployment,
compared to the average state unemployment;
(i) Whether the project is the acquisition, expansion, improvement,
or renovation by a local government of a public water system that is in
violation of health and safety standards, including the cost of
extending existing service to such a system;
(j) The relative benefit of the project to the community,
considering the present level of economic activity in the community and
the existing local capacity to increase local economic activity in
communities that have low economic growth; and
(k) Other criteria that the board considers advisable.
(5) To qualify for grants under RCW 43.155.020(9) the board must
determine that a local government meets all of the following
conditions:
(a)(i) The city or county is imposing a tax under chapter 82.46 RCW
at a rate of at least one quarter of one percent; or
(ii) The city or county is imposing a tax under chapter 82.46 RCW
at a rate of at least one-half of one percent if planning under RCW
36.70A.040.
(b) The local government has developed a capital facility plan.
(c) Except where necessary to address a public health need or
substantial environmental degradation, a county, city, or town planning
under RCW 36.70A.040 has adopted a comprehensive plan, including a
capital facilities plan element, and development regulations as
required by RCW 36.70A.040. This subsection (5)(c) does not require
any county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 to adopt a
comprehensive plan or development regulations before requesting or
receiving a loan or loan guarantee under this chapter, if such request
is made before the expiration of the time periods specified in RCW
36.70A.040. A county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040
which has not adopted a comprehensive plan and development regulations
within the time periods specified in RCW 36.70A.040 is not prohibited
from receiving a loan or loan guarantee under this chapter if the
comprehensive plan and development regulations are adopted as required
by RCW 36.70A.040 before submitting a request for a loan or loan
guarantee.
(d) The board must develop a priority process for public works
projects as provided in this section based on factors such as whether:
(i) The proposed project is within city boundaries of a county
planning under RCW 36.70A.040 and is zoned for:
(A) Residential development of at least a gross area wide average
of four dwelling units per acre; and/or
(B) Nonresidential development; or
(ii) The proposed project is eligible to be annexed to a city under
chapter 35.13 or 35A.14 RCW; and
(iii) The city and county have established an interlocal agreement
for the area eligible for annexation that identifies levels and types
of municipal services needed in the area to facilitate growth.
(e) The project is critical in nature and would affect the health
and safety of a great number of citizens.
(f) The applicant has developed and adhered to guidelines regarding
its permitting process for those applying for development permits
consistent with section 1(2), chapter 231, Laws of 2007.
(g) The cost of the project compared to the size of the local
government and amount of grant money available.
(h) The project is the acquisition, expansion, improvement, or
renovation by a local government of a public water system that is in
violation of health and safety standards, including the cost of
extending existing service to such a system.
(i) Other criteria that the board considers advisable.
(6) Existing debt or financial obligations of local governments
shall not be refinanced under this chapter. Each local government
applicant shall provide documentation of attempts to secure additional
local or other sources of funding for each public works project for
which financial assistance is sought under this chapter.
(((6))) (7) Before November 1st of each year, the board shall
develop and submit to the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate
and house of representatives a description of the loans made under RCW
43.155.065, 43.155.068, and subsection (((9))) (10) of this section
during the preceding fiscal year and a prioritized list of projects
which are recommended for funding by the legislature, including one
copy to the staff of each of the committees. The list shall include,
but not be limited to, a description of each project and recommended
financing, the terms and conditions of the loan or financial guarantee,
the local government jurisdiction and unemployment rate, demonstration
of the jurisdiction's critical need for the project and documentation
of local funds being used to finance the public works project. The
list shall also include measures of fiscal capacity for each
jurisdiction recommended for financial assistance, compared to
authorized limits and state averages, including local government sales
taxes; real estate excise taxes; property taxes; and charges for or
taxes on sewerage, water, garbage, and other utilities.
(((7))) (8) The board shall not sign contracts or otherwise
financially obligate funds from the public works assistance account
before the legislature has appropriated funds for a specific list of
public works projects. The legislature may remove projects from the
list recommended by the board. The legislature shall not change the
order of the priorities recommended for funding by the board.
(((8))) (9) Subsection (((7))) (8) of this section does not apply
to loans made under RCW 43.155.065, 43.155.068, and subsection (((9)))
(10) of this section.
(((9))) (10) Loans made for the purpose of capital facilities plans
shall be exempted from subsection (((7))) (8) of this section.
(((10))) (11) To qualify for loans or pledges for solid waste or
recycling facilities under this chapter, a city or county must
demonstrate that the solid waste or recycling facility is consistent
with and necessary to implement the comprehensive solid waste
management plan adopted by the city or county under chapter 70.95 RCW.
(((11))) (12) After January 1, 2010, any project designed to
address the effects of storm water or wastewater on Puget Sound may be
funded under this section only if the project is not in conflict with
the action agenda developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW
90.71.310.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.84.092 and 2007 c 514 s 3, 2007 c 513 s 1, 2007 c
484 s 4, and 2007 c 356 s 9 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate
share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily
balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search
and rescue account, the budget stabilization account, the capitol
building construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the Columbia river basin water supply development
account, the common school construction fund, the county arterial
preservation account, the county criminal justice assistance account,
the county sales and use tax equalization account, the data processing
building construction account, the deferred compensation administrative
account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of
licensing services account, the department of retirement systems
expense account, the developmental disabilities community trust
account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking water
assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the education construction fund, the education legacy trust
account, the election account, the energy freedom account, the
essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital
projects account, the federal forest revolving account, the ferry bond
retirement fund, the freight congestion relief account, the freight
mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account,
the grade crossing protective fund, the growth management
infrastructure account, the health services account, the public health
services account, the health system capacity account, the personal
health services account, the high capacity transportation account, the
state higher education construction account, the higher education
construction account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway
infrastructure account, the highway safety account, the high-occupancy
toll lanes operations account, the industrial insurance premium refund
account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the
local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax
account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account,
the mobile home park relocation fund, the motor vehicle fund, the
motorcycle safety education account, the multimodal transportation
account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources
deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding
stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance
account, the pilotage account, the public employees' retirement system
plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan
2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan revolving
account beginning July 1, 2004, the public health supplemental account,
the public transportation systems account, the public works assistance
account, the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound
ferry operations account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the
real estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle
account, the regional mobility grant program account, the resource
management cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural
Washington loan fund, the safety and education account, the site
closure account, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the
special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state
employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve
account, the state investment board expense account, the state
investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol
highway account, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows
toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account,
the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the
tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account,
the transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation
equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation improvement
account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account,
the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation
partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tuition
recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund,
the University of Washington building account, the urban arterial trust
account, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and
pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve
officers' administrative fund, the Washington fruit express account,
the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety
employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state
health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement
account, the Washington State University building account, the
Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution
control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital
projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the
agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the
permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the
state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective
beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act takes effect July 1, 2009, except
for section 6 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Section 5 of this act expires June 30,
2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Section 6 of this act takes effect June 30,
2011.

--- END ---