BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.41.290 and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 428 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state of Washington hereby fully occupies and preempts the
entire field of firearms regulation within the boundaries of the state,
including the registration, licensing, possession, purchase, sale,
acquisition, transfer, discharge, and transportation of firearms, or
any other element relating to firearms or parts thereof, including
ammunition and reloader components. Cities, towns, and counties or
other municipalities may enact only those laws and ordinances relating
to firearms that are specifically authorized by state law, as in RCW
9.41.300, and are consistent with this chapter. Such local ordinances
shall have the same penalty as provided for by state law. Local laws
and ordinances that are inconsistent with, more restrictive than, or
exceed the requirements of state law shall not be enacted and are
preempted and repealed, regardless of the nature of the code, charter,
or home rule status of such city, town, county, or municipality.
(2) Institutions of higher education, as defined in RCW
28B.10.016(4), shall not adopt any rules restricting or prohibiting the
possession of firearms in any institutionally owned or controlled
lands, buildings, or facilities by any person licensed to carry a
concealed pistol.

--- END ---