BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.41.073 and 2004 c 148 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A person licensed to carry a pistol in a state the laws of
which recognize and give effect in that state to a concealed pistol
license issued under the laws of the state of Washington is authorized
to carry a concealed pistol in this state if:
(i) The ((licensing state does not issue concealed pistol licenses
to persons under)) person is at least twenty-one years of age; and
(ii) The licensing state requires mandatory fingerprint-based
background checks of criminal and mental health history for all persons
who apply for a concealed pistol license.
(b) This section applies to a license holder from another state
only while the license holder is not a resident of this state. A
license holder from another state must carry the handgun in compliance
with the laws of this state.
(2) The attorney general shall periodically publish a list of
states the laws of which recognize and give effect in that state to a
concealed pistol license issued under the laws of the state of
Washington and which meet the requirements of subsection (1)(a)(i) and
(ii) of this section.

--- END ---