BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.08.010 and 2006 c 320 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter: "Information required for voter
registration" means the minimum information provided on a voter
registration application that is required by the county auditor in
order to place a voter registration applicant on the voter registration
rolls. This information includes:
(1) Name;
(2) Residential address;
(3) Date of birth;
(4) Washington state driver's license number or Washington state
identification card number, or the last four digits of the applicant's
Social Security number if the applicant does not have a Washington
state driver's license or Washington state identification card;
(5) A signature attesting to the truth of the information provided
on the application; and
(6) A ((check or indication in the box confirming the individual is
a United States citizen)) statement that the applicant shall submit
evidence of United States citizenship with the application and that the
auditor shall reject the application if no evidence of citizenship is
attached.
The residential address provided must identify the actual physical
residence of the voter in Washington, as defined in RCW 29A.04.151,
with detail sufficient to allow the voter to be assigned to the proper
precinct and to locate the voter to confirm his or her residence for
purposes of verifying qualification to vote under Article VI, section
1 of the state Constitution. A residential address may be either a
traditional address or a nontraditional address. A traditional address
consists of a street number and name, optional apartment number or unit
number, and city or town, as assigned by a local government, which
serves to identify the parcel or building of residence and the unit if
a multiunit residence. A nontraditional address consists of a
narrative description of the location of the voter's residence, and may
be used when a traditional address has not been assigned to the voter's
residence. If the postal service does not deliver mail to the voter's
residential address, or the voter prefers to receive mail at a
different address, the voter may separately provide the mailing address
at which they receive mail. Any mailing address provided shall be used
only for mail delivery purposes and not for precinct assignment or
confirmation of residence for voter qualification purposes.
If the individual does not have a driver's license, state
identification card, or Social Security number, the registrant must be
issued a unique voter registration number in order to be placed on the
voter registration rolls. All other information supplied is ancillary
and not to be used as grounds for not registering an applicant to vote.
Modification of the language of the official Washington state voter
registration form by the voter will not be accepted and will cause the
rejection of the registrant's application.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.08.110 and 2005 c 246 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An application is considered complete only if it contains the
applicant's name, complete valid residence address, date of birth,
signature attesting to the truth of the information provided, ((a mark
in the check-off box confirming)) satisfactory evidence of United
States citizenship, and an indication that the provided driver's
license number, state identification card number, or Social Security
number has been confirmed by the secretary of state. If it is not
complete, the auditor shall promptly mail a verification notice of the
deficiency to the applicant. This verification notice shall require
the applicant to provide the missing information. If the verification
notice is not returned by the applicant within forty-five days or is
returned as undeliverable, the name of the applicant shall not be
placed on the official list of registered voters. If the applicant
provides the required verified information, the applicant shall be
registered to vote as of the original date of mailing or date of
delivery, whichever is applicable.
(2) If the information required in subsection (1) of this section
is complete, the applicant is considered to be registered to vote as of
the original date of mailing or date of delivery, whichever is
applicable. The auditor shall record the appropriate precinct
identification, taxing district identification, and date of
registration on the voter's record in the state voter registration
list. Within forty-five days after the receipt of an application but
no later than seven days before the next primary, special election, or
general election, the auditor shall send to the applicant, by first-class mail, an acknowledgment notice identifying the registrant's
precinct and containing such other information as may be required by
the secretary of state. The postal service shall be instructed not to
forward a voter registration card to any other address and to return to
the auditor any card which is not deliverable.
(3) If an acknowledgment notice card is properly mailed as required
by this section to the address listed by the voter as being the voter's
mailing address and the notice is subsequently returned to the auditor
by the postal service as being undeliverable to the voter at that
address, the auditor shall promptly send the voter a confirmation
notice. The auditor shall place the voter's registration on inactive
status pending a response from the voter to the confirmation notice.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.08.210 and 2005 c 246 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
An applicant for voter registration shall complete an application
providing the following information concerning his or her
qualifications as a voter in this state:
(1) The address of the last former registration of the applicant as
a voter in the state;
(2) The applicant's full name;
(3) The applicant's date of birth;
(4) The address of the applicant's residence for voting purposes;
(5) The mailing address of the applicant if that address is not the
same as the address in subsection (4) of this section;
(6) The sex of the applicant;
(7) The applicant's Washington state driver's license number or
Washington state identification card number, or the last four digits of
the applicant's Social Security number if he or she does not have a
Washington state driver's license or Washington state identification
card;
(8) A check box for the applicant to indicate that he or she does
not have a Washington state driver's license, Washington state
identification card, or Social Security number;
(9) A check box allowing the applicant to indicate that he or she
is a member of the armed forces, national guard, or reserves, or that
he or she is an overseas voter;
(10) A check box allowing the applicant to confirm that he or she
is at least eighteen years of age;
(11) Clear and conspicuous language, designed to draw the
applicant's attention, stating that the applicant must be a United
States citizen in order to register to vote;
(12) A ((check box and declaration confirming that the applicant is
a citizen of the United States)) statement that the applicant shall
submit satisfactory evidence of United States citizenship with the
application and that the auditor shall reject the application if
satisfactory evidence of citizenship is not attached;
(13) The following warning:
"If you knowingly provide false information on this voter
registration form or knowingly make a false declaration about your
qualifications for voter registration you will have committed a class
C felony that is punishable by imprisonment for up to five years, a
fine of up to ten thousand dollars, or both."
(14) The following affirmation by the applicant:
"By signing this document, I hereby assert, under penalty of
perjury, that I am legally eligible to vote. If I am found to have
voted illegally, I may be prosecuted and/or fined for this illegal act.
In addition, I hereby acknowledge that my name and last known address
will be forwarded to the appropriate state and/or federal authorities
if I am found to have voted illegally."
(15) The oath required by RCW 29A.08.230 and a space for the
applicant's signature; and
(16) Any other information that the secretary of state determines
is necessary to establish the identity of the applicant and prevent
duplicate or fraudulent voter registrations.
This information shall be recorded on a single registration form to
be prescribed by the secretary of state.
If the applicant fails to provide the information required for
voter registration, the auditor shall send the applicant a verification
notice. The applicant may not be registered until the required
information is provided. If a verification notice is returned as
undeliverable or the applicant fails to respond to the notice within
forty-five days, the applicant shall not be registered to vote.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 29A.08 RCW
to read as follows:
Satisfactory evidence of United States citizenship includes the
following:
(1) A legible photocopy of the applicant's birth certificate that
verifies citizenship to the satisfaction of the county auditor;
(2) A legible photocopy of pertinent pages of the applicant's
United States passport identifying the applicant and the applicant's
passport number or presentation to the county auditor of the
applicant's United States passport;
(3) A presentation to the county auditor of the applicant's United
States naturalization documents or the number of the certificate of
naturalization. If only the number of the certificate of
naturalization is provided, the applicant shall not be included in the
registration rolls until the number of the certificate of
naturalization is verified with the United States citizenship and
immigration services by the county auditor;
(4) Other documents or methods of proof that are established
pursuant to the immigration reform and control act of 1986 (100 Stat.
3359); or
(5) The applicant's bureau of Indian affairs card number, tribal
treaty card number, or tribal enrollment number.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 29A.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Proof of citizenship is required for those who submit a voter
registration application after the effective date of this act.
(2) Proof of voter registration from another state or county is not
satisfactory evidence of citizenship.
(3) A person who modifies voter registration records with a new
residence shall not be required to submit evidence of citizenship if
the new residence is in the same county.
(4) After citizenship has been demonstrated to the county auditor,
the person is not required to resubmit satisfactory evidence of
citizenship in that county.

--- END ---