BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.290.020 and 2007 c 377 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) At the time of a transaction, every scrap metal business doing
business in this state shall produce wherever that business is
conducted an accurate and legible record of each transaction involving
nonferrous metal property. This record must be written in the English
language, documented on a standardized form or in electronic form, and
contain the following information:
(a) The signature of the person with whom the transaction is made;
(b) The time, date, location, and value of the transaction;
(c) The name of the employee representing the scrap metal business
in the transaction;
(d) The name, street address or post office address, and telephone
number of the person with whom the transaction is made;
(e) The license plate number and state of issuance of the license
plate on the motor vehicle used to deliver the nonferrous metal
property subject to the transaction;
(f) A description of the motor vehicle used to deliver the
nonferrous metal property subject to the transaction;
(g) The current driver's license number or other government-issued
picture identification card number of the seller or a copy of the
seller's government-issued picture identification card; and
(h) A description of the predominant types of nonferrous metal
property subject to the transaction, including the property's
classification code as provided in the institute of scrap recycling
industries scrap specifications circular, 2006, and weight, quantity,
or volume.
(2) For every transaction that involves nonferrous metal property,
every scrap metal business doing business in the state shall require
the person with whom a transaction is being made to sign a declaration.
The declaration may be included as part of the transactional record
required under subsection (1) of this section, or on a receipt for the
transaction. The declaration must state substantially the following:
"I, the undersigned, affirm under penalty of law that the property
that is subject to this transaction is not to the best of my knowledge
stolen property."
The declaration must be signed and dated by the person with whom
the transaction is being made. An employee of the scrap metal business
must witness the signing and dating of the declaration and sign the
declaration accordingly before any transaction may be consummated.
(3) The record and declaration required under this section must be
open to the inspection of any commissioned law enforcement officer of
the state or any of its political subdivisions at all times during the
ordinary hours of business, or at reasonable times if ordinary hours of
business are not kept, and must be maintained wherever that business is
conducted for one year following the date of the transaction.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.290.030 and 2007 c 377 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No scrap metal business may enter into a transaction to
purchase or receive nonferrous metal property from any person who
cannot produce at least one piece of current government-issued picture
identification, including a valid driver's license or identification
card issued by any state.
(2) No scrap metal business may purchase or receive commercial
metal property unless the seller: (a) Has a commercial account with
the scrap metal business; (b) can prove ownership of the property by
producing written documentation that the seller is the owner of the
property; or (c) can produce written documentation that the seller is
an employee or agent authorized to sell the property on behalf of a
commercial enterprise.
(3) No scrap metal business may enter into a transaction to
purchase or receive metallic wire that was burned in whole or in part
to remove insulation unless the seller can produce written proof to the
scrap metal business that the wire was lawfully burned.
(4) No transaction involving nonferrous metal property valued at
greater than thirty dollars may be made in cash or with any person who
does not provide a street address or post office address under the
requirements of RCW 19.290.020. For transactions valued at greater
than thirty dollars, the person with whom the transaction is being made
may only be paid by a nontransferable check, mailed by the scrap metal
business to a street address or post office address provided under RCW
19.290.020, no earlier than ten days after the transaction was made.
A transaction occurs on the date provided in the record required under
RCW 19.290.020.
(5) No scrap metal business may purchase or receive beer kegs from
anyone except a manufacturer of beer kegs or licensed brewery.

--- END ---