BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.41.073 and 2004 c 148 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A person licensed to carry a pistol in a state the laws of
which recognize and give effect in that state to a concealed pistol
license issued under the laws of the state of Washington is authorized
to carry a concealed pistol in this state if:
(i) The licensing state does not issue concealed pistol licenses to
persons under twenty-one years of age; and
(ii) The licensing state requires mandatory fingerprint-based
background checks of criminal and mental health history for all persons
who apply for a concealed pistol license.
(b) This section applies to a license holder from another state
only while the license holder is not a resident of this state. ((A
license holder from another state must carry the handgun in compliance
with the laws of this state.))
(2) An active duty member of the United States armed forces,
including the national guard and armed forces reserves stationed in the
state, who is licensed to carry a concealed pistol in another state, is
authorized to carry a concealed pistol in this state.
(3) A license holder from another state must carry the handgun in
compliance with the laws of this state.
(4) The attorney general shall periodically publish a list of
states the laws of which recognize and give effect in that state to a
concealed pistol license issued under the laws of the state of
Washington and which meet the requirements of subsection (1)(a)(i) and
(ii) of this section.

--- END ---