BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The department of early learning and the
early learning advisory council shall jointly report to the governor
and the appropriate committees of the legislature regarding the
implementation of current activities to improve the quality and safety
of child care licensed pursuant to chapter 43.215 RCW.
(2) The joint report shall report on the status and progress of the
department's and the early learning advisory council's work in the
following areas:
(a) The implementation of Washington's quality rating and
improvement system created pursuant to RCW 43.215.100;
(b) The implementation of the state training and registry system;
(c) The implementation of practices to enhance outreach and
education to consumers and the general public regarding: The
department's toll-free number established under RCW 43.215.520; the
department's web site regarding child care licensing and enforcement
actions as provided in RCW 43.215.525, 43.215.530 and 43.215.370; and
any other items related to parent and consumer access to accurate
information about child care;
(d) Efforts concerning public education regarding unlicensed child
care;
(e) The results of negotiated rule making for family child care
licensees as provided in RCW 43.215.350 and, if applicable, negotiated
rule making for child day care centers;
(f) If applicable, any evaluation of the roles and responsibilities
of the child care resource and referral network in providing
information to assist parents in making informed child care decisions;
and
(g) If applicable, efforts regarding the establishment of statewide
standards for licensed child care provider preservice and continuing
training and education.
(3) The preliminary joint report shall be provided to the
governor's office and the appropriate committees of the legislature by
December 1, 2008, with a final report, presented by June 30, 2009.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2009.

--- END ---