BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a
manufacturer of polysilicon may claim a credit for its qualified
preproduction development expenditures occurring after January 1, 2008.
(b) Any credits earned under this section must be accrued and
carried forward and may not be used until July 1, 2009 and until a
polysilicon manufacturer expends five hundred million dollars on a
polysilicon manufacturing plant located in a county along the boundary
line between Washington and Oregon with a population greater than fifty
thousand but less than one hundred thousand. A polysilicon
manufacturer may not claim a credit under this section in excess of one
million dollars in any calendar year. Carryover credits may be used at
any time after June 30, 2009, and may be carried over until used.
Refunds may not be granted in the place of a credit.
(2) The credit is equal to the amount of qualified preproduction
development expenditures, multiplied by the rate of seven and one-half
percent.
(3) Credit earned on or after July 1, 2009, may be carried over
until used. The credit claimed against taxes due for each calendar
year must not exceed the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter
for the calendar year. Refunds may not be granted in the place of a
credit.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a)(i) "Preproduction development" means: (A) Research, design,
and engineering activities performed in relation to the development of
a product or product line; (B) the design and engineering of the
facility in which the product or product line will be manufactured; and
(C) training of production employees where the training is directly
related to the manufacturing of the product or product line.
(ii) The term "preproduction development" includes the discovery of
technological information, the translating of technological information
into new or improved products, processes, techniques, formulas, or
inventions, and the adaptation of existing products into new products
or derivatives of products or models. The term does not include
manufacturing activities or other production-oriented activities other
than tool design and engineering design for the manufacturing process
and the training identified in (a)(i)(C) of this subsection (4). The
term also does not include surveys and studies, social science and
humanities research, market research or testing, quality control, sale
promotion and service, computer software developed for internal use,
and research in areas such as improved style, taste, and seasonal
design.
(b)(i) Except as provided in (ii) of this subsection (4)(b),
"qualified preproduction development" means preproduction development
performed in the field of polysilicon manufacturing in a county along
the boundary line between Washington and Oregon with a population
greater than fifty thousand but less than one hundred thousand.
(ii) "Qualified preproduction development" also includes
preproduction development as defined in (a)(i)(B) of this subsection
(4) occurring outside of this state in relation to a polysilicon
manufacturing facility located, or to be located, in a county along the
boundary line between Washington and Oregon with a population greater
than fifty thousand but less than one hundred thousand.
(c) "Qualified preproduction development expenditures" means
operating expenses including wages, benefits, supplies, and computer
expenses directly incurred in qualified preproduction development by a
person claiming the credit provided in this section. The term does not
include amounts paid to a person or to the state or any of its
departments or institutions, other than a public educational or
research institution, to conduct preproduction development in the field
of polysilicon manufacturing. The term also does not include capital
costs and overhead, such as expenses for land, structures, or
depreciable property. For purposes of this subsection (4)(c), capital
costs do not include costs incurred for the design and engineering of
a manufacturing facility as provided in (a)(i)(B) of this subsection
(4).
(5) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person claiming the credit under this section must report as required
under RCW 82.32.545 and provide such additional information as the
department may prescribe.
(6) Credit may not be claimed for expenditures for which a credit
is claimed under RCW 82.04.4452.
(7) This section expires July 1, 2024.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.32.545 and 2007 c 54 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that accountability and effectiveness are
important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to make policy
choices regarding the best use of limited state resources the
legislature needs information on how a tax incentive is used.
(2)(a) A person who reports taxes under RCW 82.04.260(11) or who
claims an exemption or credit under RCW 82.04.4461, 82.08.980,
82.12.980, 82.29A.137, 84.36.655, ((and)) 82.04.4463, or section 1 of
this act shall make an annual report to the department detailing
employment, wages, and employer-provided health and retirement benefits
per job at the manufacturing site. The report shall not include names
of employees. The report shall also detail employment by the total
number of full-time, part-time, and temporary positions. The first
report filed under this subsection shall include employment, wage, and
benefit information for the twelve-month period immediately before
first use of a preferential tax rate under RCW 82.04.260(11), or tax
exemption or credit under RCW 82.04.4461, 82.08.980, 82.12.980,
82.29A.137, 84.36.655, ((and)) 82.04.4463, or section 1 of this act.
The report is due by March 31st following any year in which a
preferential tax rate under RCW 82.04.260(11) is used, or tax exemption
or credit under RCW 82.04.4461, 82.08.980, 82.12.980, 82.29A.137,
84.36.655, ((and)) 82.04.4463, or section 1 of this act is taken. This
information is not subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW
82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon request.
(b) If a person fails to submit an annual report under (a) of this
subsection by the due date of the report, the department shall declare
the amount of taxes exempted or credited, or reduced in the case of the
preferential business and occupation tax rate, for that year to be
immediately due and payable. Excise taxes payable under this
subsection are subject to interest but not penalties, as provided under
this chapter. This information is not subject to the confidentiality
provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon
request.
(3) By November 1, 2010, for chapter 1, Laws of 2003 2nd sp. sess.,
and by November 1, 2014, for section 1 of this act, and by November 1,
((2023)) 2022, for chapter 1, Laws of 2003 2nd sp. sess. and section 1
of this act, the ((fiscal committees of the house of representatives
and the senate, in consultation with the department,)) joint
legislative audit and review committee shall report to the legislature
on the effectiveness of chapter 1, Laws of 2003 2nd sp. sess. and
section 1 of this act in regard to keeping Washington competitive. The
report shall measure the effect of chapter 1, Laws of 2003 2nd sp.
sess. and section 1 of this act on job retention, net jobs created for
Washington residents, company growth, diversification of the state's
economy, cluster dynamics, and other factors as the committees select.
The reports shall include a discussion of principles to apply in
evaluating whether the legislature should reenact any or all of the tax
preferences in chapter 1, Laws of 2003 2nd sp. sess. and section 1 of
this act. The department shall maintain information from the annual
reports submitted under subsection (2) of this section necessary for
the committee to prepare its reports under this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If a port in a county along the boundary
line between Washington and Oregon with a population greater than fifty
thousand but less than one hundred thousand and a polysilicon
manufacturer do not sign a memorandum of understanding to site a
polysilicon manufacturing plant that is expected to cost at least five
hundred million dollars by October 1, 2008, this act is null and void.

--- END ---