BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.67.370 and 2003 c 297 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, cities,
towns, or counties may not require existing mobile home parks to
replace existing, functional septic systems with a sewer system within
the community unless the local board of health determines that the
septic system is failing.
(2) Cities, towns, and counties are prohibited from requiring
existing mobile home parks to pay a sewer service availability charge,
standby charge, consumption charge, or any other similar types of
charges associated with available but unused sewer service, including
any interest or penalties for nonpayment or enforcement charges, until
the mobile home park connects to the sewer service. When a mobile home
park connects to a sewer, cities, towns, and counties may only charge
mobile home parks prospectively from the date of connection for their
sewer service. Chapter 297, Laws of 2003 is remedial in nature and
applies retroactively to 1993.
(3) Any county lying east of the crest of the Cascade mountains
with a population greater than four hundred thousand, and any city
within such county, may require a mobile home park to connect to a
sewer system, when the city or county legislative authority determines
that:
(a) The mobile home park lies above a federally designated sole
source aquifer;
(b) The sewer system is available for connection by the mobile home
park;
(c) Replacement of existing on-site septic systems by connection to
a sewer system is needed to ensure the protection of drinking water
supplies from the aquifer; and
(d) The cost of connecting the mobile home park to the sewer system
on a per unit basis is reasonable and comparable to the current
estimated average cost of connecting single-family residences to the
sewer system.
(4) The county or city legislative authority requiring a mobile
home park to connect to a sewer system, as provided in subsection (3)
of this section, should identify and extend, as applicable, those
financial assistance programs it can access and provide to that mobile
home park. This may include, but not be limited to, local, state, or
federal affordable housing programs, water quality protection grant and
loan programs, and public health, safety, and welfare programs.

--- END ---