BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.70.250 and 2006 c 72 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, it shall
be the policy of the state of Washington that the cost of each
professional, occupational, or business licensing program be fully
borne by the members of that profession, occupation, or business. The
secretary shall from time to time establish the amount of all
application fees, license fees, registration fees, examination fees,
permit fees, renewal fees, and any other fee associated with licensing
or regulation of professions, occupations, or businesses administered
by the department. Except as provided in subsection (2) of this
section, in fixing said fees, the secretary shall set the fees for each
program at a sufficient level to defray the costs of administering that
program and the cost of regulating licensed volunteer medical workers
in accordance with RCW 18.130.360, except as provided in RCW 18.79.202
until June 30, 2013. All such fees shall be fixed by rule adopted by
the secretary in accordance with the provisions of the administrative
procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.
(2)(a) For any profession that the secretary determines meets the
criteria in (b) of this subsection, the secretary shall establish the
amount of license fees and renewal fees at a rate not to exceed the
lesser of ten percent of the cost of administering credentialing and
disciplinary activities for the program or one hundred dollars per
year.
(b) The secretary shall determine that a profession qualifies for
the alternative fee when the profession:
(i) Is a licensed profession;
(ii) Has fewer than two hundred fifty license holders in the
profession;
(iii) The total cost of administering credentialing and
disciplinary activities for the profession exceeds two thousand five
hundred dollars for each license holder in the profession; and
(iv) The secretary finds that the services provided by the
profession result in proven cost savings to the health care system.

--- END ---