BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.190.060 and 2005 c 274 s 345 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature authorizes community public health and safety
networks to reconnect parents and other citizens with children, youth,
families, and community institutions which support health and safety.
The networks have only those powers and duties expressly authorized
under this chapter. The networks should empower parents and other
citizens by being a means of expressing their attitudes, spirit, and
perspectives regarding safe and healthy family and community life. The
legislature intends that parent and other citizen perspectives exercise
a controlling influence over policy and program operations of
professional organizations concerned with children and family issues
within networks in a manner consistent with the Constitution and state
law. It is not the intent of the legislature that health, social
service, or educational professionals dominate community public health
and safety network processes or programs, but rather that these
professionals use their skills to lend support to parents and other
citizens in expressing their values as parents and other citizens
identify community needs and establish community priorities. To this
end, the legislature intends full participation of parents and other
citizens in community public health and safety networks. The intent is
that local community values are reflected in the operations of the
network. The legislature also intends that the family policy council
encourage the formation of a new network in areas previously served by
a disbanded network.
(2) A group of persons described in subsection (3) of this section
may apply to be a community public health and safety network.
(3) Each community public health and safety network shall be
composed of twenty-three people, thirteen of whom shall be citizens who
live within the network boundary with no fiduciary interest. In
selecting these members, first priority shall be given to members of
community mobilization advisory boards, city or county children's
services commissions, human services advisory boards, or other such
organizations. The thirteen persons shall be selected as follows:
Three by chambers of commerce, three by school board members, three by
county legislative authorities, three by city legislative authorities,
and one high school student, selected by student organizations. The
remaining ten members shall live or work within the network boundary
and shall include local representation selected by the following groups
and entities: Cities; counties; federally recognized Indian tribes;
parks and recreation programs; law enforcement agencies; state
children's service workers; employment assistance workers; private
social service providers, broad-based nonsecular organizations, or
health service providers; and public education.
(4) Each of the twenty-three people who are members of each
community public health and safety network must sign an annual
declaration under penalty of perjury or a notarized statement that
clearly, in plain and understandable language, states whether or not he
or she has a fiduciary interest. If a member has a fiduciary interest,
the nature of that interest must be made clear, in plain understandable
language, on the signed statement.
(5) Members of the network shall serve terms of three years.
The terms of the initial members of each network shall be as
follows: (a) One-third shall serve for one year; (b) one-third shall
serve for two years; and (c) one-third shall serve for three years.
Initial members may agree which shall serve fewer than three years or
the decision may be made by lot. Any vacancy occurring during the term
may be filled by the chair for the balance of the unexpired term.
(6) Not less than sixty days before the expiration of a network
member's term, the chair shall submit the name of a nominee to the
network for its approval. The network shall comply with subsection (3)
of this section.
(7) Networks are subject to the open public meetings act under
chapter 42.30 RCW and the public records provisions of chapter 42.56
RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.190.100 and 1998 c 245 s 123 are each amended to
read as follows:
The family policy council shall:
(1) Establish network boundaries no later than July 1, 1994. There
is a presumption that no county may be divided between two or more
community networks and no network shall have fewer than forty thousand
population. When approving multicounty networks, considering dividing
a county between networks, or creating a network with a population of
less than forty thousand, the council must consider: (a) Common
economic, geographic, and social interests; (b) historical and existing
shared governance; and (c) the size and location of population centers.
Individuals and groups within any area shall be given ample opportunity
to propose network boundaries in a manner designed to assure full
consideration of their expressed wishes;
(2) Develop a technical assistance and training program to assist
communities in creating and developing community networks and
comprehensive plans;
(3) Approve the structure, purpose, goals, plan, and performance
measurements of each community network;
(4) Identify all prevention and early intervention programs and
funds, including all programs funded under RCW 69.50.520, in addition
to the programs set forth in RCW 70.190.110, which could be
transferred, in all or part, to the community networks, and report
their findings and recommendations to the governor and the legislature
regarding any appropriate program transfers by January 1 of each year;
(5) Encourage the formation of a new network in areas previously
served by a disbanded network;
(6) Reward community networks that show exceptional success as
provided in RCW 43.41.195;
(((6))) (7) Seek every opportunity to maximize federal and other
funding that is consistent with the plans approved by the council for
the purpose and goals of this chapter;
(((7))) (8) Review the state-funded out-of-home placement rate
before the end of each contract to determine whether the region has
sufficiently reduced the rate. If the council determines that there
has not been a sufficient reduction in the rate, it may reduce the
immediately succeeding grant to the network;
(((8))) (9)(a) The council shall monitor the implementation of
programs contracted by participating state agencies by reviewing
periodic reports on the extent to which services were delivered to
intended populations, the quality of services, and the extent to which
service outcomes were achieved at the conclusion of service
interventions. This monitoring shall include provision for periodic
feedback to community networks;
(b) The legislature intends that this monitoring be used by the
Washington state institute for public policy, together with public
health data on at-risk behaviors and risk and protective factors, to
produce an external evaluation of the effectiveness of the networks and
their programs. For this reason, and to conserve public funds, the
council shall not conduct or contract for the conduct of control group
studies, quasi-experimental design studies, or other analysis efforts
to attempt to determine the impact of network programs on at-risk
behaviors or risk and protective factors; and
(((9))) (10) Review the implementation of chapter 7, Laws of 1994
sp. sess. The report shall use measurable performance standards to
evaluate the implementation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The sum of forty-nine thousand nine hundred
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2009, from the general fund to the
family policy council to provide a grant to the Skagit county child and
family consortium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect July 1, 2008.

--- END ---