BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act shall be known as the community
schools act of 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The legislature finds that young people need
a wide range of opportunities and a strong support system to succeed.
A quality academic program is necessary, but is not sufficient given
societal factors, family circumstances, poverty, and health problems.
All children regardless of their economic, racial, or family
circumstances deserve access to a full array of opportunities. The
legislature also finds that cooperative partnerships and joint use of
facilities between public schools, local governments, early learning
providers, health and social service providers, and postsecondary
institutions can result in the effective use of federal, state, local,
and community resources. Such partnerships build on community
strengths, foster family and community engagement, share accountability
for results, and set high expectations for all. The legislature
further finds that surplus schools are community assets that should be
reused for maximum public good to benefit communities. Therefore, it
is the intent of the legislature to provide capital grant funds for the
development of community schools and to convert empty school buildings
into community facilities. Grants may be used for the acquisition,
construction, rehabilitation, and improvement of facilities to assist
with the implementation of this act. The goal is to: (1) Improve the
coordination, availability, and effectiveness of services for children
and families; (2) ensure that children come to school ready to learn
every day; (3) enable families to participate in the education of their
children; and (4) enable more efficient use of federal, state, local,
and private sector resources that serve children and families.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.63A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Advisory board" means an independent advisory board including,
but not limited to, a representative from the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, an early learning expert, a youth
recreational facility expert, a social service facility expert, a local
school district representative, and a public higher education
representative.
(b) "Community school" means both a place and a set of partnerships
between eligible entities including, but not limited to, public
schools, postsecondary institutions, local governments, early learning
providers, and other nonprofit community resources with an integrated
focus on academics, health and social services, youth and community
development, and community engagement.
(c) "Eligible entity" means public school districts, local
governments, nonprofit organizations, early learning providers,
postsecondary institutions, and tribal governments.
(d) "Qualified services" means the following:
(i) Early childhood education;
(ii) Remedial education activities and academic enrichment
activities;
(iii) Programs that promote parental involvement and family
literacy;
(iv) Youth development programs;
(v) Parent leadership development activities;
(vi) Parenting education activities;
(vii) Child care services;
(viii) Community service opportunities;
(ix) Programs that provide assistance to students who have been
truant, suspended, or expelled;
(x) Job training and career counseling services;
(xi) Nutrition services;
(xii) Primary health and dental care;
(xiii) Mental health prevention and treatment services;
(xiv) Adult education, including instruction in English as a second
language; and
(xv) Other services as determined by the advisory board.
(e) "Surplus school" means a facility that is determined to be
surplus to the needs of a district by the local school board.
(2) The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall:
(a) Establish a competitive process to solicit project proposals
that assist eligible entities in acquiring, constructing,
rehabilitating, or improving facilities, including surplus schools, to
be used for the delivery of nonresidential qualified services;
(b) Evaluate and rank applications in consultation with an
independent advisory board using objective criteria;
(c) Establish a tiered system to determine the amount of matching
funds required from a grantee based on financial need, taking into
consideration:
(i) Community purpose; and
(ii) The ability of the applicant to obtain matching funds; and
(d) Establish a prioritized list of capital projects in
consultation with the advisory board and submit the list annually to
the governor and the legislature in the department's capital budget
request beginning with the 2009-2011 biennium. The list must include
a description of each project, the amount of recommended state funding,
and documentation of nonstate funds to be used for the project.
(3) Nonstate matching funds may include cash, the value of real
property when acquired solely for the purpose of the project, and in-kind contributions.
(4) The department of community, trade, and economic development
may not: (a) Require that state funds be the last to be spent on a
project; or (b) set a monetary limit to funding requests.
(5) The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall not sign contracts or otherwise financially obligate funds under
this section until the legislature has approved a specific list of
projects.
(6) In contracts for grants authorized under this act, the
department of community, trade, and economic development shall include
provisions that require that capital improvements must be held by the
grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the
grant and that facilities must be used for the express purpose of the
grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions
of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the
principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of
interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most
closely to the date of authorization of the grant.
(7) As part of the application process, applicants must submit a
comprehensive plan that includes information on the following:
(a) A list of partner entities that will assist the lead eligible
entity to provide or coordinate qualified services;
(b) A memorandum of understanding between the lead eligible entity
and each partner entity describing the role each entity will assume;
(c) Plans for joint utilization and maintenance of school and
community facilities by the lead eligible entity and its partner
entities, as well as liability considerations;
(d) The student, family, and school community to be served,
including information about the number of students, families, and
community residents to be served, frequency of services, and
information related to the percent of local elementary students that
receive free and reduced-price meals in the target area;
(e) Existing qualified services available at each school to be
served and in the community involved;
(f) Qualified services to be provided or coordinated by the lead
eligible entity and its partner entities; and
(g) An examination of capital and operating funding sources that
applicants intend to apply to the project and qualified services at
each school to be served, whether such funding is derived from grants
under this act or from other federal, state, local, or private sources.
(8) Project applicants must also demonstrate that the proposed
project is ready to proceed, will make timely use of the funds, and
requires state funding to accomplish a discrete, usable phase of the
project.
(9) If state grant funds under this act are used for the
acquisition of surplus school facilities, the sale proceeds must be
used by the local school board disposing of such property for
renovation, replacement, or new construction of school facilities in
the district.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.63A.135 and 2006 c 371 s 234 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department of community, trade, and economic development
must establish a competitive process to solicit proposals for and
prioritize projects whose primary objective is to assist nonprofit
youth organizations in acquiring, constructing, or rehabilitating
facilities used for the delivery of nonresidential services, excluding
outdoor athletic fields.
(2) The department of community, trade, and economic development
must establish a competitive process to prioritize applications for the
assistance as follows:
(a) The department of community, trade, and economic development
must conduct a statewide solicitation of project applications from
local governments, nonprofit organizations, and other entities, as
determined by the department of community, trade, and economic
development. The department of community, trade, and economic
development must evaluate and rank applications in consultation with a
citizen advisory committee using objective criteria. Projects must
have a major recreational component, and must have either an
educational or social service component. At a minimum, applicants must
demonstrate that the requested assistance will increase the efficiency
or quality of the services it provides to youth. The evaluation and
ranking process must also include an examination of existing assets
that applicants may apply to projects. Priority consideration must be
given to projects that include cooperative partnerships or joint use
agreements for facilities shared with public school districts, early
learning providers, local governments, postsecondary institutions,
tribal governments, or other entities as determined by the department
of community, trade, and economic development. Grant assistance under
this section may not exceed twenty-five percent of the total cost of
the project. The nonstate portion of the total project cost may
include cash, the value of real property when acquired solely for the
purpose of the project, and in-kind contributions.
(b) The department of community, trade, and economic development
must submit a prioritized list of recommended projects to the governor
and the legislature in the department of community, trade, and economic
development's biennial capital budget request beginning with the
((2005-2007)) 2009-2011 biennium and thereafter. The list must include
a description of each project, the amount of recommended state funding,
and documentation of nonstate funds to be used for the project. The
total amount of recommended state funding for projects on a biennial
project list must not exceed eight million dollars. The department of
community, trade, and economic development may not sign contracts or
otherwise financially obligate funds under this section until the
legislature has approved a specific list of projects.
(c) In contracts for grants authorized under this section the
department of community, trade, and economic development must include
provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the
grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the
grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant.
If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the
contract, the grantee must repay to the state general fund the
principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of
interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most
closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.525.050 and 2006 c 263 s 303 are each amended to
read as follows:
All applications by school districts for state assistance in
providing school plant facilities shall be made to the superintendent
of public instruction. Studies and surveys shall be conducted by the
superintendent for the purpose of securing information relating to (1)
the kind and extent of the school plant facilities required and the
urgency of need for such facilities in districts that seek state
assistance, (2) the ability of such districts to provide capital outlay
funds by local effort, (3) the need for improvement of school
administrative units and school attendance areas among or within such
districts, and (4) any other pertinent matters. Studies and surveys
must also include an inventory of school district facilities jointly
used, or that could potentially be used for other community purposes,
including detail on cooperative partnerships. School districts shall
submit a long-term comprehensive plan for community use of school
buildings. Recommendations respecting action on the applications shall
be submitted to the superintendent of public instruction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 28A.525
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall provide a ten
percent enhancement to the area cost allowance for school districts
requesting state assistance under this chapter if the district can
certify and provide documentation that they have a comprehensive plan
for cooperative partnerships that include the joint use of school
facilities for qualified services for the facility proposed for
assistance. Documentation must include:
(a) A list of other eligible entities that will assist the school
district to provide or coordinate qualified services;
(b) A memorandum of understanding between the school district and
the other eligible entities describing the role each entity will
assume;
(c) Plans for joint utilization and maintenance of the school
facility by the school district and its other eligible entities, as
well as liability considerations;
(d) The student, family, and school community to be served,
including information about the number of students, families, and
community residents to be served, frequency of services, and
information related to the percent of local elementary students that
receive free and reduced-price meals in the target area;
(e) Qualified services to be provided or coordinated by the school
district and its other eligible entities; and
(f) A description of capital and operating funding sources that the
school district intends to apply to the project and qualified services
at the school to be served, whether such funding is derived from grants
under this act or from other federal, state, local, or private sources.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
develop rules for implementation of this section by September 1, 2008.
(3) For the purposes of this section, the terms "eligible entity"
and "qualified services" have the same meaning as defined in section
3(1) of this act.

--- END ---