BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that many Washington
residents are impacted by the laws governing condominium associations
found in chapter 64.34 RCW. The legislature further finds that the
impact of these laws is of significant importance because these laws
affect both a unit owner's property values and his or her sense of
security and happiness in his or her home and community. The
legislature recognizes that the provisions regulating condominium
governance in chapter 64.34 RCW should be thoroughly reviewed to ensure
transparency and openness in condominium governance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The condominium act governance task
force is created with ten members as provided in this subsection.
(a) The majority leader of the senate shall appoint one member from
the senate.
(b) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one
member from the house of representatives.
(c) The majority leader of the senate and the speaker of the house
of representatives jointly shall appoint eight nonlegislative members
of the task force, which shall include three condominium board members
representing three different condominium associations, three unit
owners who own a unit that is their primary residence in a condominium
that is governed by chapter 64.34 RCW, and two attorneys with expertise
in condominium governance.
(2) The task force shall:
(a) Convene as soon as possible upon the appointment of its
members;
(b) Elect a chair and adopt rules for conducting the business of
the task force;
(c) Thoroughly study condominium association governance law
including, but not limited to, the following:
(i) The provisions regulating condominium association governance
contained in chapter 64.34 RCW;
(ii) Statutes regulating condominium associations in other states;
and
(iii) Other model statutes the task force deems relevant;
(d) Determine and document perceived and actual shortcomings of the
condominium governance statutes contained in chapter 64.34 RCW;
(e) Draft proposed legislation revising the condominium governance
statutes in chapter 64.34 RCW if the task force determines that the
statutes could be improved in any way; and
(f) Take public testimony for at least thirty minutes at every
second meeting.
(3) Staff support for the task force must be provided by the senate
committee services and the house of representatives office of program
research.
(4) Legislative members of the task force must be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120.
(5) The task force shall report its findings and any proposed
legislation to the legislature by September 10, 2008.
(6) This section expires December 31, 2008.

--- END ---