BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 2007 c 399 s 2 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
(1) The joint task force on basic education finance established
under this section, with research support from the Washington state
institute for public policy, shall review the definition of basic
education and all current basic education funding formulas, develop
options for a new funding structure and all necessary formulas, and
propose a new definition of basic education that is realigned with the
new expectations of the state's education system as established in the
November 2006 final report of the Washington learns steering committee
and the basic education provisions established in chapter 28A.150 RCW.
In light of recent court decisions, the task force shall specifically
consider issues related to equalizing school employee salary
allocations among school districts. By December 1, 2008, the task
force shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature on
all of the information required under this subsection.
(2) The joint task force on basic education finance shall consist
of fourteen members:
(a) A chair of the task force with experience with Washington
finance issues including knowledge of the K-12 funding formulas,
appointed by the governor;
(b) Eight legislators, with two members from each of the two
largest caucuses of the senate appointed by the president of the senate
and two members from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of
representatives appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives;
(c) A representative of the governor's office or the office of
financial management, designated by the governor;
(d) The superintendent of public instruction or the
superintendent's designee; and
(e) Three individuals with significant experience with Washington
K-12 finance issues, including the use and application of the current
basic education funding formulas, appointed by the governor. Each of
the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives and the senate
may submit names to the governor for consideration.
(3) In conducting research directed by the task force and
developing options for consideration by the task force, the Washington
state institute for public policy shall consult with stakeholders and
experts in the field. The institute may also request assistance from
the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, the office of
financial management, the house office of program research, and senate
committee services.
(4) In developing recommendations, the joint task force shall
review and build upon the following:
(a) Reports related to K-12 finance produced at the request of or
as a result of the Washington learns study, including reports completed
for or by the K-12 advisory committee;
(b) High-quality studies that are available; and
(c) Research and evaluation of the cost-benefits of various K-12
programs and services developed by the institute as directed by the
legislature in section 607(15), chapter 372, Laws of 2006.
(5) The Washington state institute for public policy shall provide
the following reports to the joint task force:
(a) An initial report by September 15, 2007, proposing an initial
plan of action, reporting dates, timelines for fulfilling the
requirements of section 3 ((of this act)), chapter 399, Laws of 2007,
and an initial timeline for a phased-in implementation of a new funding
system that does not exceed six years;
(b) A second report by December 1, 2007, including implementing
legislation as necessary, for at least two but no more than four
options for allocating school employee compensation. One of the
options must be a redirection and prioritization within existing
resources based on research-proven education programs. The report must
also include a projection of the expected effect of the investment made
under the new funding structure. The second report shall also include
a finalized timeline and plan for addressing the remaining components
of a new funding system; and
(c) A final report with at least two but no more than four options
for revising the remaining K-12 funding structure, including
implementing legislation as necessary, and a timeline for phasing in
full adoption of the new funding structure. The final report shall be
submitted to the joint task force by September 15, 2008. One of the
options must be a redirection and prioritization within existing
resources based on research-proven education programs. The final
report must also include a projection of the expected effect of the
investment made under the new funding structure.

--- END ---