BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that recent storm
events, including flooding and high winds, have affected significant
areas of western Washington. In particular, the people, resources, and
economy of the Chehalis basin now face great challenges as a result of
the recent storm.
The Chehalis basin is the second largest drainage in the state of
Washington, draining over two thousand square miles. Approximately
eighty-five percent of this area is forest land, with approximately ten
percent used for agriculture. The four major population centers of the
Chehalis basin are Chehalis, Centralia, Aberdeen, and Hoquiam.
As private individuals and organizations and federal, state, and
local governments address storm damages and mitigation at the regional
level, the legislature intends to help facilitate a collaborative
process to promote flood control and mitigation in the Chehalis basin.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The Chehalis basin partnership is the
watershed planning unit under chapter 90.82 RCW for water resource
inventory areas twenty-two and twenty-three, as established in chapter
173-500 WAC as it exists on the effective date of this section.
(2) The Chehalis basin partnership may conduct preliminary work for
and initiate development of a comprehensive flood control management
plan for the Chehalis basin that meets the requirements of RCW
86.12.200 and 86.26.105.
(3) If the Chehalis basin partnership acts pursuant to this
section, the partnership must:
(a) Seek to maintain its current membership balance, which reflects
a broad spectrum of local public and private interests;
(b) Work collaboratively and consider a wide array of options to
avoid and minimize impacts from future flood events; and
(c) Keep in its consideration other recent and ongoing flood damage
and mitigation processes and efforts.
(4) If the Chehalis basin partnership acts pursuant to this
section, the department of ecology must provide technical and funding
assistance to the partnership under chapter 86.26 RCW.
(5) If the Chehalis basin partnership acts pursuant to this
section, it must provide brief progress summaries to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2008, and December 1,
2009, respectively. The Chehalis basin partnership may also recommend
to the legislature additional authorities necessary to carry out its
work, including an extension of the expiration date in section 4 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If, by December 31, 2008, Grays Harbor,
Lewis, and Thurston counties create a joint flood control district or
exercise equivalent flood control authority under Title 86 RCW covering
a substantial portion of the Chehalis basin:
(1) The Chehalis basin partnership may not act, or must cease
acting, under section 2 of this act;
(2) The department of ecology must redirect subsequent technical or
funding assistance provided under section 2 of this act to the joint
flood control district or equivalent authority; and
(3) The joint flood control district or equivalent authority
assumes all authority and associated responsibility provided to the
Chehalis basin partnership under section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act expires July 1, 2010.

--- END ---