BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.06.550 and 2007 c 112 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
An agency must allow an employee who is a volunteer firefighter to
respond((, without pay,)) to a fire, natural disaster, or medical
emergency when called to duty. The agency ((may choose to grant leave
with pay)) shall continue to pay the employee's salary, without loss of
seniority, benefits, annual leave, or sick leave.

--- END ---