BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) The state community and technical colleges hold a significant
place in our higher education system by providing citizens with high
quality instruction;
(2) The retention of excellent college professors is an integral
part to the success of our community and technical college system;
(3) Our state's colleges and universities are dedicated to the free
and open discussion of ideas that encourages the plurality of opinions
that has been the hallmark of the concept of academic freedom;
(4) Nearly half of the courses offered by the two-year colleges are
currently taught by nontenure track, part-time faculty who lack the job
security and academic freedom safeguards normally associated with
tenure;
(5) Job security for experienced faculty has long been a hallmark
of high-quality higher education and results in a more stable workforce
of professionals dedicated to serving their students; and
(6) Good business practice and faculty morale is best served by the
time-honored labor practice of rewarding professors for their
seniority, continuing education, and experience.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each community and technical college shall develop a new senior
faculty position for nontenure track, part-time professors to be
officially called associate faculty.
(2) Nontenure track faculty are eligible for associate faculty
status after having taught at least fifty percent of a full-time load
for at least nine quarters.
(3) At a minimum, associate faculty shall have the following
privileges conferred on them as a result of their seniority:
(a) The right of first refusal on available departmental courses
based on seniority;
(b) The right to bump less senior nontenure track faculty in the
event the associate faculty member's course is canceled;
(c) The right to be paid thirty-three percent of their contract by
the college in the event there is no one with less seniority to bump
and the associate faculty member's class is canceled;
(d) Their names and qualifications appearing in the college's
biennial catalogs;
(e) The right to receive annual contracts that are presumed to be
automatically renewable;
(f) The right to their accustomed minimum teaching workload as part
of their annual contracts;
(g) The right to increase this accustomed minimum workload up to a
full-time teaching workload when additional teaching hours become
available for which the associate faculty is qualified; and
(h) The right to be considered qualified to teach available
teaching hours in the same manner that tenured faculty are considered
qualified in the same department.
(4) Associate faculty status shall be revocable for probable cause,
as outlined in the procedures for terminating full-time tenure track
faculty. The associate faculty member may appeal the decision, at his
or her option, including the right to a hearing and standard grievance
procedures afforded to full-time faculty by contract.
(5) All nontenure track faculty who have taught at least fifty
percent of a full-time load for at least nine quarters before June 30,
2008, shall automatically be conferred associate faculty status.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.50.873 and 1991 c 238 s 72 are each amended to
read as follows:
The college board may declare a financial emergency under the
following conditions: (1) Reduction of allotments by the governor
pursuant to RCW 43.88.110(((2))) (3), or (2) reduction by the
legislature from one biennium to the next or within a biennium of
appropriated funds based on constant dollars using the implicit price
deflator. When a district board of trustees determines that a
reduction in force of tenured ((or)), probationary, or associate
faculty members may be necessary due to financial emergency as declared
by the state board, written notice of the reduction in force and
separation from employment shall be given the faculty members so
affected by the president or district president as the case may be.
Said notice shall clearly indicate that separation is not due to the
job performance of the employee and hence is without prejudice to such
employee and need only state in addition the basis for the reduction in
force as one or more of the reasons enumerated in subsections (1) and
(2) of this section.
Said tenured ((or)), probationary, or associate faculty members
will have a right to request a formal hearing when being dismissed
pursuant to subsections (1) and (2) of this section. The only issue to
be determined shall be whether under the applicable policies, rules or
collective bargaining agreement the particular faculty member or
members advised of severance are the proper ones to be terminated.
Said hearing shall be initiated by filing a written request therefor
with the president or district president, as the case may be, within
ten days after issuance of such notice. At such formal hearing the
tenure review committee provided for in RCW 28B.50.863 may observe the
formal hearing procedure and after the conclusion of such hearing offer
its recommended decision for consideration by the hearing officer.
Failure to timely request such a hearing shall cause separation from
service of such faculty members so notified on the effective date as
stated in the notice, regardless of the duration of any individual
employment contract.
The hearing required by this section shall be an adjudicative
proceeding pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure
act, conducted by a hearing officer appointed by the board of trustees
and shall be concluded by the hearing officer within sixty days after
written notice of the reduction in force has been issued. Ten days
written notice of the formal hearing will be given to faculty members
who have requested such a hearing by the president or district
president as the case may be. The hearing officer within ten days
after conclusion of such formal hearing shall prepare findings,
conclusions of law and a recommended decision which shall be forwarded
to the board of trustees for its final action thereon. Any such
determination by the hearing officer under this section shall not be
subject to further tenure review committee action as otherwise provided
in this chapter.
Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, at the time of
a faculty member or members request for formal hearing said faculty
member or members may ask for participation in the choosing of the
hearing officer in the manner provided in RCW 28A.405.310(4), said
employee therein being a faculty member for the purposes hereof and
said board of directors therein being the board of trustees for the
purposes hereof: PROVIDED, That where there is more than one faculty
member affected by the board of trustees' reduction in force such
faculty members requesting hearing must act collectively in making such
request: PROVIDED FURTHER, That costs incurred for the services and
expenses of such hearing officer shall be shared equally by the
community or technical college and the faculty member or faculty
members requesting hearing.
When more than one faculty member is notified of termination
because of a reduction in force as provided in this section, hearings
for all such faculty members requesting formal hearing shall be
consolidated and only one such hearing for the affected faculty members
shall be held, and such consolidated hearing shall be concluded within
the time frame set forth herein.
Separation from service without prejudice after formal hearing
under the provisions of this section shall become effective upon final
action by the board of trustees.
It is the intent of the legislature by enactment of this section
and in accordance with RCW 28B.52.035, to modify any collective
bargaining agreements in effect, or any conflicting board policies or
rules, so that any reductions in force which take place after December
21, 1981, whether in progress or to be initiated, will comply solely
with the provisions of this section: PROVIDED, That any applicable
policies, rules, or provisions contained in a collective bargaining
agreement related to lay-off units, seniority and re-employment rights
shall not be affected by the provisions of this paragraph.
Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect the right of
the board of trustees or its designated appointing authority not to
renew a probationary faculty appointment pursuant to RCW 28B.50.857.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each community and technical college shall develop its
associate faculty positions by means of collective bargaining.
(2) Each community and technical college shall have its associate
faculty positions in place no later than September 30, 2008.

--- END ---