BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that a private-public
partnership is required to bring health care costs under control and to
improve the quality of care that is delivered to residents of this
state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.38 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A standing work group is established to develop, with local and
national experts on health care quality data collection and management,
an accessible secure internet-based format of reliable, state of the
art, evidence-based, and accurate information that will enable each
resident in the state, regardless of where he or she lives, to access
and understand his or her health care records and the quality of
performance of the provider from whom he or she is receiving or seeking
care and how he or she can use this information to improve his or her
personal health and to improve the outcome of the care that he or she
receives. The web site will also help providers operate more
efficiently and deliver high quality care at lower costs.
(2) The initial duties of the standing work group are as follows,
but the work group is authorized to develop additional strategies to
achieve the goals of this act:
(a) Develop a method to promote provider behavior change for a set
of carefully selected measures for which there is sufficient evidence
of need of improvement and organize the provider community in each area
around a specific set of behaviors that are known to have a direct
impact on outcomes;
(b) Develop a method to communicate to providers, in the most
transparent manner possible, the insurance plan's management data
related to total patient episode cost so that they can accurately see
where better collaboration could occur to reduce care and costs;
(c) Develop a method so that all of the providers caring for a
patient are assigned the cost of the patient episode so that there is
an incentive for providers to talk with each other about how to
minimize care and costs;
(d) Develop a method to communicate to the public accurate
comparison data that motivates providers to improve performance,
stimulates payers to reward quality and efficiency, and provides
information to patients so that they can decide from whom to seek care
and what outcomes they may expect and how best to adhere to the
treatment and care recommended.
(3) The work group shall be chaired and appointed jointly by the
attorney general and the governor and shall be made up of individuals
who are issue and technical experts; culturally competent individuals
from a variety of communities; and representatives of tribes, business,
labor, insurance, providers groups, health care consumer groups, and
higher education health professional training centers. The Washington
state health care authority quality forum shall report to the standing
work group quarterly on recommendations and findings from the Puget
Sound health alliance, the LeapFrog group, and others that would
improve access to meaningful information to enable each resident of the
state to learn about the quality performance of his or her provider.
(4) Staff support for the work group shall come from the
legislature with assistance from all state agencies that purchase
health care and the attorney general's office.
(5) The work group shall be responsible for recommending to the
legislature on November 1st of each year any state law changes and
appropriate levels of state funding needed in the following years to
reach the ultimate goal of this act.

--- END ---