BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.320.175 and 2007 c 401 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
No later than the beginning of the ((2008-09)) 2009-10 school year
and thereafter, each school district shall collect and electronically
submit to the office of the superintendent of public instruction, in a
format and according to a schedule prescribed by the office, the
following data for each class or course offered in each school:
(1) The certification number or other unique identifier associated
with the teacher's certificate for each teacher assigned to teach the
class or course, including reassignments that may occur during the
school year; and
(2) The statewide student identifier for each student enrolled in
or being provided services through the class or course.

--- END ---