BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 In November 2007, the Washington state
children's administration workload study was released. The study's
authors recommended several areas for improved efficiency, including
facilitation of data processing, covering "uncovered" caseloads, and
compliance with mandatory obligations.
In January 2008, the joint legislative audit and review committee
issued its report entitled "children's administration social worker
qualifications." The report noted that while the children's
administration has four social worker classifications, the social
worker 1 and 2 classifications are largely unfilled. While these
classifications encompass those social workers not yet able or
permitted to carry a caseload, the legislature finds that both of these
classifications, while training to become case-carrying social workers,
can assist other social workers with their cases in a variety of ways.
The legislature finds that a more expansive use of social worker 1 and
2 classifications should have a positive effect on the ability of the
children's administration to address the recommendations of the
workload study.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.20A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When hiring children's administration social workers, the
department shall ensure that fifteen percent of those hired at any
given time are either social worker 1s or 2s.
(2) The department shall establish a training process for social
worker 1s and 2s that includes a pathway for these social workers to
become social worker 3s.
(3) The training process shall include, but is not limited to,
assigning tasks and duties that:
(a) Are required preparation for the duties of social worker 3s;
(b) Include data processing responsibilities necessary to use the
information system used by case-carrying social workers; and
(c) Require attendance at meetings on behalf of case-carrying
social workers which provide instruction both on individual cases and
social worker administrative responsibilities.
(4) The training process shall also be designed to remediate the
current workload of social worker 3s including but not limited to the
tasks and duties provided in subsection (3) of this section. The
department may assign social worker 1s and 2s to other tasks within
their department of personnel classification that will relieve case-carrying social workers of their workload.

--- END ---