BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Institutions of higher education shall promote intellectual
diversity on their campuses.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "intellectual diversity"
includes, but is not limited to, a learning environment that exposes
students to a variety of political and ideological perspectives that
relate to the subject matter being taught or issues being discussed.
(3) Each institution of higher education shall take the following
steps, at a minimum, to ensure that intellectual diversity is occurring
on its campus:
(a) Incorporate intellectual diversity into the institution's
statements, grievance procedures, and activities on diversity;
(b) Encourage a balanced approach to panels and speakers that
appear on campus;
(c) Establish campus policies that ensure speakers are not
prevented from speaking due to hecklers or threats of violence;
(d) Include intellectual diversity in the institution's guidelines
on teaching and program development; and
(e) Develop a procedure in which a student may present his or her
objection to a classroom assignment due to its opposition with the
student's conscience.
(4) The higher education coordinating board shall require each
institution of higher education to report to the legislature on the
steps the institution is taking to promote intellectual diversity on
campus. The report shall be submitted to the legislature no later than
December 1, 2008.

--- END ---