BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to show
gratitude to our combat troops and military families for their
outstanding service to our country. The legislature strives to be
committed to our combat troops and military families. The legislature
recognizes that military service entails many sacrifices, including
significant personal and family financial sacrifices. The legislature
acknowledges that military families often bear the emotional and
financial costs of relocating to new areas, transferring homes,
changing schools, and starting new jobs, all in the call of service.
The legislature finds that a combat bonus will help assist military
families in their time of need. The legislature intends that the money
appropriated in this act will be used as a one-time service bonus to
assist combat veterans and their families.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 73.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Within funds appropriated for this purpose, the department of
veterans affairs shall pay each combat veteran a one-time service bonus
in the amount of three thousand five hundred dollars.
(2) As used in this section, "combat veteran" means a person who:
(a) Served or is serving in any branch of the armed forces of the
United States in the following conflicts: Operation Enduring Freedom,
Persian Gulf, or Operation Iraqi Freedom; and
(b) Can show proof of receiving one of the following: (i) The
global war on terrorism expeditionary medal; (ii) award of hostile fire
pay; or (iii) a leave and earning statement listing hostile fire pay.
(3) The veteran must show proof that Washington state is his or her
home of record. Documentation may include a copy of the military
discharge papers or enlistment papers showing Washington state as the
home of record.
(4) If the veteran is no longer serving in the military, he or she
must have been honorably separated or discharged in order to receive
the bonus.
(5) A person who has already received extra compensation or other
benefits based upon claimed residence at the time of entry into such
active service from any other state or territory is not entitled to
compensation under this section.
(6) If the veteran is deceased, payment shall be made to his or her
beneficiary.
(7) No claim for payment under this section is subject to
garnishment, attachment, levy, or execution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The sum of . . . . dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the biennium ending
June 30, 2009, from the general fund to the department of veterans
affairs for the purposes of this act.

--- END ---