BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Dependency proceedings are complicated and
have significant impacts on a child's life. Although guardian ad
litems and court-appointed special advocates are appointed to represent
a child's best interests in dependency proceedings, they have different
skills than attorneys. Attorneys for children age twelve and over in
dependency proceedings can help explain legal proceedings to the child,
form confidential relationships with the child, and assist the child in
understanding what services are available to the child upon aging out
of care.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The dependent youth representation pilot
program is established to promote adequate and effective legal
representation for children age twelve and over in dependency
proceedings. The pilot program shall be administered by the University
of Washington school of law, children and youth advocacy clinic.
(1) The pilot program shall consist of at least two counties
selected by the children and youth advocacy clinic, as determined by:
(a) The presence and strength of a parents' representation project;
(b) The presence and strength of a CASA or GAL program; and
(c) The presence and strength of a system appointing attorneys to
represent adolescents' stated interests.
(2) Counties that are chosen shall be provided funding through the
pilot program for and establish a program in which:
(a) Attorneys are provided for all children age twelve and over who
are the subject of dependency proceeding under chapter 13.34 RCW;
(b) Attorneys are provided for all children age twelve and over who
are placed out-of-home under chapter 13.34 RCW during the program. For
those children placed out-of-home, attorneys are appointed prior to the
first hearing in the child's dependency case;
(c) All attorneys are highly trained in dependency matters;
(d) Attorneys maintain a caseload no larger than eighty ongoing
cases;
(e) Judges and commissioners in the pilot counties will receive
training on dependency matters and how an attorney for the child
affects the dynamics of the proceedings;
(f) Guardian ad litem or CASA programs in the pilot counties will
receive training on the different, but complementary roles of attorneys
and GALs/CASAs and how the "best interest" standard differs from the
"stated interest" standard; and
(g) There is coordination with existing legal training offered
within the county and in the state.
(3) The children and youth advocacy clinic shall measure the
performance and outcomes of the program related to the health and
well-being of the child in dependency, including whether there was:
(a) An increase in monthly private and individual face-to-face
visits between the caseworker and the child;
(b) An increase in regular visits between siblings placed apart and
between children and parents;
(c) An increase in completed mental health and educational
screening and assessments within the required times of a child entering
dependency;
(d) An increase in shared planning meetings occurring within the
required time of the child entering dependency;
(e) An increase in completion of screening, diagnosis, and
treatment exams addressing the child's health care and other needs
within the required times and at regular intervals during the child's
dependency;
(f) An increase in timely enrollment in school if the child was
removed from his or her school of origin because of change in
placement; and
(g) A decrease in the median number of days that an adolescent was
on runaway status.
(4) The children and youth advocacy clinic shall measure the
performance and outcomes of the program related to the attorney's
activities, including:
(a) The amount of time that passed between when the child entered
care and when the attorney was assigned the case;
(b) Whether the attorney's presence increased the involvement of
children in their court proceedings;
(c) Whether the attorney's efforts increased the number, and
appropriateness, of services ordered for and completed by children; and
(d) Whether the attorney made the child's information available to
the court.
(5) The children and youth advocacy clinic shall issue a
preliminary report to the legislature by December 31, 2008, and shall
issue a final report and include findings, by September 30, 2009.

--- END ---