BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the Pacific
Northwest has unique geological features that include significant
geothermal resources, and that other states and provinces in this
region are actively exploring and developing these resources for energy
production purposes. The legislature further finds that existing data
and analyses of these resources is now largely outdated and that
advances in technology, increased energy prices, and increased interest
in low-carbon energy sources has increased interest by electric
utilities and independent power producers in the state's geothermal
resources.
(2) The legislature therefore intends to authorize a comprehensive
review of the state's geothermal resources and make recommendations
regarding policy measures to facilitate environmentally responsible
development of these resources for electric generation and concentrated
heating purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The geothermal resource assessment
committee is created.
(2) The committee is composed of the following members:
(a) The commissioner of public lands, or the commissioner's
designee;
(b) The energy policy division of the department of community,
trade, and economic development;
(c) The chair of the energy facility site evaluation council;
(d) The state geologist within the department of natural resources;
(e) The chair of the utilities and transportation commission;
(f) Representatives of publicly owned and privately owned
utilities;
(g) Representatives of independent power producers;
(h) Representatives of geologists from academic, research, and
private sectors;
(i) Representatives of other interested sectors, including
agriculture, forestry, and environmental;
(j) Representatives of tribal governments with significant
geothermal resource interests; and
(k) Representatives of federal agencies with regulatory or land
management responsibilities relating to the development of geothermal
interests.
(3) The commissioner of public lands, or the commissioner's
designee, shall chair the committee. The commissioner of public lands
shall select the committee members described in subsection (2)(f)
through (k) of this section.
(4) The department of natural resources shall provide necessary
staff and administrative support to the committee.
(5) The committee shall conduct a comprehensive assessment of the
geothermal resources in the state and their potential for
environmentally responsible development for power production purposes.
The assessment must include at least the following:
(a) A characterization of the geothermal resources in the state and
the potential for development for electrical generation and
concentrated heating purposes based upon currently employed and
projected technologies;
(b) The economic implications of this development potential,
including community economic development, job creation, and state and
local revenue benefits, including an assessment for each county in the
state;
(c) A review of current lease payments on federal lands in the
state for geothermal leasing, described by county;
(d) A review of state lands with geothermal development potential;
(e) A review of the effect of the state's water resource laws and
policies on the development of geothermal resources; and
(f) Recommendations for legislative and administrative actions
based upon this assessment to encourage environmentally responsible
geothermal resource development in the state.
(6) The committee shall provide the assessment and recommendations
to the energy and fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives by December 1, 2008.

--- END ---