BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.17 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A vehicle engine displacement fee must be paid and collected
annually for motor vehicles subject to the fee under RCW 46.16.0621,
except motor homes. The amount of the fee must be based upon the
vehicle engine size in liters, which is correlated with vehicle size
and vehicle emissions. The fee imposed under this section must be used
for transportation purposes, and may not be used for the general
support of state government. The vehicle engine displacement fee is
that portion of the fee, as reflected on the engine size in liters set
forth in the schedule provided in this section, that is in excess of
the fees imposed under RCW 46.16.0621 and 46.17.010. For vehicles
registered on or after January 1, 2009, the vehicle engine displacement
fee under this section is due at the time of initial vehicle
registration and any subsequent renewal of vehicle registration.

Engine Size (liters) Rate Schedule

Up to 1.9 $0

2.0 - 2.9 $70

3.0 - 3.9 $225

4.0 - 4.9 $275

5.0 - 5.9 $325

6.0 - 7.9 $400

8.0 or over $600

(2) For the purpose of administering this section, the department
shall rely on the vehicle engine size in liters as provided by vehicle
manufacturers, or other sources defined by the department, to determine
the engine size in liters of each vehicle. The department shall adopt
rules for determining engine size in liters for vehicles that do not
have a manufacturer-provided engine size in liters.
(3) The vehicle engine displacement fee under this section is
imposed to provide funds to mitigate the impact of vehicle loads on the
state roads and highways, as well as encourage the reduction of vehicle
emissions and is separate and distinct from other vehicle license fees.
(4) The vehicle engine displacement fee collected under this
section must be deposited into the multimodal transportation account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.17 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A vehicle emissions fee must be paid and collected annually for
motor vehicles subject to the fee under RCW 46.16.0621, except motor
homes. The amount of the fee must be based upon the grams of carbon
dioxide (CO2) emission per mile. Fees imposed under this section must
be used for transportation purposes, and may not be used for the
general support of state government. The vehicle emissions fee is that
portion of the fee, as reflected on the grams of carbon dioxide (CO2)
emission per mile set forth in the schedule provided in this section,
that is in excess of the fees imposed under RCW 46.16.0621 and
46.17.010. On or after January 1, 2012, the vehicle emissions fee
under this section is due at the time of initial vehicle registration
and any subsequent renewal of vehicle registration.

CO2 Emissions (grams/mile) Rate Schedule

Up to 161 $0

162 - 193 $70

194 - 241 $225

242 - 266 $275

267 - 298 $325

299 - 362 $400

Over 362 $600

(2) For the purpose of administering this section, the department
shall rely on the grams of carbon dioxide (CO2) emission per mile as
provided by vehicle manufacturers, or other sources defined by the
department, to determine the grams of carbon dioxide (CO2) emission per
mile of each vehicle. The department shall adopt rules for determining
grams of carbon dioxide (CO2) emission per mile for vehicles without
manufacturer-provided information on grams of carbon dioxide (CO2)
emission per mile.
(3) The vehicle emissions fee under this section is imposed to
provide funds to mitigate the impact of vehicle loads on the state
roads and highways, as well as encourage the reduction of vehicle
emissions and is separate and distinct from other vehicle license fees.
(4) The vehicle emissions fee collected under this section must be
deposited into the multimodal transportation account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 1 of this act takes effect January
1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 2 of this act takes effect January
1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 1 of this act expires January 1,
2012.

--- END ---