BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the state's
public four-year institutions and the higher education coordinating
board have made progress in developing a process to create a single
prioritized list of capital project requests as required under RCW
28B.76.220. The legislature also finds the goal of creating
additional, innovative facilities and programs that meet the learning
needs of students throughout the state in a timely and cost-effective
fashion requires a new approach to facility prioritization that
emphasizes strategic planning. The legislature therefore intends to
establish a new process for prioritizing capital project requests by
the four-year institutions that utilizes the expertise and government-wide perspective of the office of financial management, and that is
based upon the model that has been used successfully by the community
and technical college system. The new process must emphasize objective
analysis, a statewide perspective, and a strategic balance among
facility preservation, new construction, and innovative delivery
mechanisms. The legislature further recognizes that institutions of
higher education are likely to require substantial new capital
investments in order to continue to provide a wide range of high
quality programs to students and the community, and that the state's
ability to provide such resources is constrained by increasing capital
expenditure needs within the K-12, public safety, social services, and
community economic development arenas. The legislature therefore
intends to identify and assess potential alternative means for
increasing the capacity of public higher education institutions to meet
the demands of the twenty-first century.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) By October 15th of each even-numbered
year, the office of financial management shall complete an objective
analysis and scoring of all capital budget projects proposed by the
public four-year institutions of higher education and submit the
results of the scoring process to the legislative fiscal committees,
the higher education coordinating board, and the four-year
institutions, except that, for 2008, the office of financial management
shall complete the objective analysis and scoring by November 1st.
Each project must be reviewed and scored within one of the following
categories, according to the project's principal purpose. Each project
may be scored in only one category. The categories are:
(a) Access-related projects to accommodate enrollment growth.
Growth projects should provide significant additional student capacity.
Proposed projects must demonstrate that they are based on solid
enrollment demand projections and make cost-effective use of existing
and proposed new space;
(b) Projects that replace failing permanent buildings or renovate
facilities to restore building life and upgrade space to meet current
program requirements. Facilities that cannot be economically renovated
are considered replacement projects. Renovation projects should
represent a complete renovation of a total facility or an isolated wing
of a facility. A reasonable renovation project should cost between
sixty to eighty percent of current replacement value and restore the
renovated area to at least twenty-five years of useful life. New space
may be programmed for the same or a different use than the space being
replaced or renovated and may include additions to improve access and
enhance the relationship of program or support space;
(c) Major stand-alone campus infrastructure projects;
(d) Projects that promote economic growth and innovation through
expanded research activity. The acquisition and installation of
specialized equipment is authorized under this category; and
(e) Other project categories as determined by the office of
financial management in consultation with the legislative fiscal
committees.
(2) The office of financial management, in consultation with the
legislative fiscal committees and the joint legislative audit and
review committee, shall establish a scoring system and process for each
four-year project category that is based on the framework used in the
community and technical college system of prioritization. Staff from
the state board for community and technical colleges, the higher
education coordinating board, and the four-year institutions shall
provide technical assistance on the development of a scoring system and
process.
(3) The office of financial management shall consult with the
legislative fiscal committees in the scoring of four-year institution
project proposals, and may also solicit participation by the joint
legislative audit and review committee and independent experts.
(a) For each four-year project category, the scoring system must,
at a minimum, include an evaluation of enrollment trends,
reasonableness of cost, the ability of the project to enhance specific
strategic master plan goals, age and condition of the facility if
applicable, and impact on space utilization.
(b) Each four-year project category may include projects at the
predesign, design, or construction funding phase.
(4) In evaluating and scoring four-year institution projects, the
office of financial management shall take into consideration project
schedules that result in realistic, balanced, and predictable
expenditure patterns over the ensuing three biennia.
(5) The office of financial management shall distribute common
definitions, the scoring system, and other information required for the
project proposal and scoring process as part of its biennial budget
instructions, except that, for the 2009-2011 budget development cycle,
this information must be distributed by July 1, 2008. The office of
financial management, in consultation with the legislative fiscal
committees and the joint legislative audit and review committee, shall
develop common definitions that four-year institutions must use in
developing their project proposals and lists under this section.
(6) In developing any scoring system for capital projects proposed
by the four-year institutions, the office of financial management:
(a) Shall be provided with all required information by the four-year institutions as deemed necessary by the office of financial
management;
(b) May utilize independent services to verify, sample, or evaluate
information provided to the office of financial management by the four-year institutions; and
(c) Shall have full access to all data maintained by the higher
education coordinating board and the joint legislative audit and review
committee concerning the condition of higher education facilities.
(7) By August 15th of each even-numbered year, beginning in 2008,
each public four-year higher education institution shall prepare and
submit prioritized lists of the individual projects proposed by the
institution for the ensuing six-year period in each category. The
lists must be submitted to the office of financial management and the
legislative fiscal committees. The four-year institutions may
aggregate minor works project proposals by primary purpose for ranking
purposes. Proposed minor works projects must be prioritized within the
aggregated proposal, and supporting documentation, including project
descriptions and cost estimates, must be provided to the office of
financial management and the legislative fiscal committees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The office of financial management shall
submit a higher education capital facility financing study to the
governor and the appropriate legislative fiscal committees by December
1, 2008. In designing and conducting the study, the office of
financial management shall consult with legislative and fiscal
committee leadership, the department of revenue, the state investment
board, the higher education coordinating board, the state board for
community and technical colleges, and the public four-year institutions
of higher education. The study must include:
(1) A review of the methods that are used to fund higher education
facility expansion and improvements in other states, with particular
emphasis on Washington's global challenge states, and the relative
portions of such expenditures that are borne by students, state
taxpayers, federal grants, and private contributions;
(2) An examination of alternatives for reducing facility
construction and maintenance expenditures per student through
strategies such as expansion of distance learning opportunities,
increased scheduling of classes during evenings and weekends, the
establishment of expected cost benchmarks by facility type, and other
means; and
(3) An assessment of the strengths and weaknesses of potential new
revenue sources that might be applied to the funding of higher
education facilities. These alternative sources must include, but not
be limited to, adjusting student fees to support a larger share of the
cost of such facilities, bonding against student fee revenues,
utilizing local tax revenues to support local higher education capital
needs, promoting business participation in the financing of programs
strongly linked to area economic development, and other means.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.76.210 and 2007 c 458 s 202 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board shall collaborate with the four-year institutions
including the council of presidents, the community and technical
college system, and when appropriate the workforce training and
education coordinating board, the superintendent of public instruction,
and the independent higher educational institutions to identify budget
priorities and levels of funding for higher education, including the
two and four-year institutions of higher education and state financial
aid programs. It is the intent of the legislature that recommendations
from the board reflect not merely the sum of budget requests from
multiple institutions, but prioritized funding needs for the overall
system of higher education.
(2) By December of each odd-numbered year, the board shall
distribute guidelines which outline the board's fiscal priorities to
the institutions and the state board for community and technical
colleges.
(a) The institutions and the state board for community and
technical colleges shall submit an outline of their proposed operating
budgets to the board no later than July 1st of each even-numbered year.
Pursuant to guidelines developed by the board, operating budget
outlines submitted by the institutions and the state board for
community and technical colleges after January 1, 2007, shall include
all policy changes and enhancements that will be requested by the
institutions and the state board for community and technical colleges
in their respective biennial budget requests. Operating budget
outlines shall include a description of each policy enhancement, the
dollar amount requested, and the fund source being requested.
(b) Capital budget outlines for the two-year institutions shall be
submitted by August 15th of each even-numbered year, and shall include
the prioritized ranking of the capital projects being requested ((by
two-year and four-year institutions, respectively.)), a description of
each capital project, and the amount and fund source being requested((,
shall be included for each capital project appearing in the prioritized
ranking)).
(c) Capital budget outlines for the four-year institutions must be
submitted by August 15th of each even-numbered year, and must include:
The institutions' priority ranking of the project; the capital budget
category within which the project will be submitted to the office of
financial management in accordance with section 2 of this act; a
description of each capital project; and the amount and fund source
being requested.
(d) The office of financial management shall reference these
reporting requirements in its budget instructions.
(3) The board shall review and evaluate the operating and capital
budget requests from four-year institutions and the community and
technical college system based on how the requests align with the
board's budget priorities, the missions of the institutions, and the
statewide strategic master plan for higher education under RCW
28B.76.200.
(4) The board shall submit recommendations on the proposed
((budgets)) operating budget and ((on the board's budget)) priorities
to the office of financial management ((before)) by October 1st of each
even-numbered year, and to the legislature by January 1st of each odd-numbered year. The board's capital budget recommendations for the
community and technical college system and the four-year institutions
must be submitted to the office of financial management by November
15th of each even-numbered year and to the legislature by January 1st
of each odd-numbered year. The board's recommendations for the four-year institutions must include the relative share of the higher
education capital budget that the board recommends be assigned to each
project category, as defined in section 2 of this act, and to minor
works program and preservation.
(5) Institutions and the state board for community and technical
colleges shall submit any supplemental budget requests and revisions to
the board at the same time they are submitted to the office of
financial management. The board shall submit recommendations on the
proposed supplemental budget requests to the office of financial
management by November 1st and to the legislature by January 1st.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 RCW 28B.76.220 (Prioritized capital project
lists for higher education institutions) and 2004 c 275 s 8 & 2003 1st
sp.s. c 8 s 2 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Section 2 of this act constitutes a new
chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---