BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.55.271 and 1997 c 424 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall not require mitigation for:
(a) Sediment dredging or capping actions that result in a cleaner
aquatic environment and equal or better habitat functions and values,
if the actions are taken under a state or federal cleanup action; or
(b) Emergency oral permits issued under RCW 77.55.021(8) issued in
response to a flood event.
(2) This chapter shall not be construed to require habitat
mitigation for navigation and maintenance dredging of existing channels
and berthing areas.

--- END ---