BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that electronic
devices, such as computers, pagers, and personal digital assistants,
play an ever increasing role in managing and balancing the workloads
and private lives of state employees. More workers find that
requirements of their jobs necessitate that they spend personal time
checking for work-related electronic mail, reviewing information, and
responding to work inquiries. Generally, ordinary use of a computer or
similar electronic device does not cause the device to degrade
significantly, and the resource of an electronic device is not expended
by limited personal use. It is not in the best interest of the state
to effectively require its employees to carry two such devices, one for
work purposes and another for personal use.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A state officer or state employee may use a state-owned
electronic device for personal use, so long as such use does not
materially diminish the value of the device or devices, use of the
device does not consume tangible resources such as paper or ink, and
such use occurs during the officer's or employee's breaks and meal
periods, or outside of the officer's or employee's regular work hours.
(2) For purposes of this section, "electronic device" includes
computers, laptop computers, cellular phones, personal digital
assistants, and any similar device that does not require the
consumption of tangible resources.
(3) This section does not limit the exceptions authorized under RCW
42.52.160(3), nor does it affect the prohibition of the use of state
resources in campaign activity in RCW 42.52.180 and 42.52.185.

--- END ---