BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.230.140 and 1981 c 130 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board of directors of every school district shall cause a
United States flag being in good condition to be displayed during
school hours upon or near every public school plant, except during
inclement weather. They shall cause appropriate flag exercises to be
held in each classroom at the beginning of the school day, and in every
school at the opening of all school assemblies, at which exercises
those pupils so desiring shall recite the following salute to the flag:
"I pledge allegiance to the flag of the United States of America and to
the republic for which it stands, one nation under God, indivisible,
with liberty and justice for all". Students not reciting the pledge
shall maintain a respectful silence. The salute to the flag or the
national anthem shall be rendered immediately preceding interschool
events when feasible.
(2) Educators are encouraged to annually teach the meaning and
history of the pledge of allegiance. The superintendent of public
instruction shall adopt rules to provide guidance for complying with
this subsection.

--- END ---