BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.46.431 and 2007 c 508 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Effective July 1, 1999, nursing facility medicaid payment rate
allocations shall be facility-specific and shall have seven components:
Direct care, therapy care, support services, operations, property,
financing allowance, and variable return. The department shall
establish and adjust each of these components, as provided in this
section and elsewhere in this chapter, for each medicaid nursing
facility in this state.
(2) Component rate allocations in therapy care, support services,
variable return, operations, property, and financing allowance for
essential community providers as defined in this chapter shall be based
upon a minimum facility occupancy of eighty-five percent of licensed
beds, regardless of how many beds are set up or in use. For all
facilities other than essential community providers, effective July 1,
2001, component rate allocations in direct care, therapy care, support
services, variable return, operations, property, and financing
allowance shall continue to be based upon a minimum facility occupancy
of eighty-five percent of licensed beds. For all facilities other than
essential community providers, effective July 1, 2002, through June 30,
2008, the component rate allocations in operations, property, and
financing allowance shall be based upon a minimum facility occupancy of
ninety percent of licensed beds, regardless of how many beds are set up
or in use. For all facilities, effective July 1, 2006, the component
rate allocation in direct care shall be based upon actual facility
occupancy. For all facilities, effective July 1, 2008, all component
rate allocations shall be based upon actual facility occupancy in the
base year and in no instance shall the rate be adjusted based on
imputed occupancy.
(3) Information and data sources used in determining medicaid
payment rate allocations, including formulas, procedures, cost report
periods, resident assessment instrument formats, resident assessment
methodologies, and resident classification and case mix weighting
methodologies, may be substituted or altered from time to time as
determined by the department.
(4)(a) Direct care component rate allocations shall be established
using adjusted cost report data covering at least six months. Adjusted
cost report data from 1996 will be used for October 1, 1998, through
June 30, 2001, direct care component rate allocations; adjusted cost
report data from 1999 will be used for July 1, 2001, through June 30,
2006, direct care component rate allocations. Adjusted cost report
data from 2003 will be used for July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007,
direct care component rate allocations. Adjusted cost report data from
2005 will be used for July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2009, direct care
component rate allocations. Effective July 1, 2009, the direct care
component rate allocation shall be rebased biennially, and thereafter
for each odd-numbered year beginning July 1st, using the adjusted cost
report data for the calendar year two years immediately preceding the
rate rebase period, so that adjusted cost report data for calendar year
2007 is used for July 1, 2009, through June 30, 2011, and so forth.
(b) Direct care component rate allocations based on 1996 cost
report data shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and
conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial
appropriations act. A different economic trends and conditions
adjustment factor or factors may be defined in the biennial
appropriations act for facilities whose direct care component rate is
set equal to their adjusted June 30, 1998, rate, as provided in RCW
74.46.506(5)(i).
(c) Direct care component rate allocations based on 1999 cost
report data shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and
conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial
appropriations act. A different economic trends and conditions
adjustment factor or factors may be defined in the biennial
appropriations act for facilities whose direct care component rate is
set equal to their adjusted June 30, 1998, rate, as provided in RCW
74.46.506(5)(i).
(d) Direct care component rate allocations based on 2003 cost
report data shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and
conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial
appropriations act. A different economic trends and conditions
adjustment factor or factors may be defined in the biennial
appropriations act for facilities whose direct care component rate is
set equal to their adjusted June 30, 2006, rate, as provided in RCW
74.46.506(5)(i).
(e) Through June 30, 2008, direct care component rate allocations
shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and conditions by a
factor or factors defined in the biennial appropriations act.
(5)(a) Therapy care component rate allocations shall be established
using adjusted cost report data covering at least six months. Adjusted
cost report data from 1996 will be used for October 1, 1998, through
June 30, 2001, therapy care component rate allocations; adjusted cost
report data from 1999 will be used for July 1, 2001, through June 30,
2005, therapy care component rate allocations. Adjusted cost report
data from 1999 will continue to be used for July 1, 2005, through June
30, 2007, therapy care component rate allocations. Adjusted cost
report data from 2005 will be used for July 1, 2007, through June 30,
2009, therapy care component rate allocations. Effective July 1, 2009,
and thereafter for each odd-numbered year beginning July 1st, the
therapy care component rate allocation shall be cost rebased
biennially, using the adjusted cost report data for the calendar year
two years immediately preceding the rate rebase period, so that
adjusted cost report data for calendar year 2007 is used for July 1,
2009, through June 30, 2011, and so forth.
(b) Through June 30, 2008, therapy care component rate allocations
shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and conditions by a
factor or factors defined in the biennial appropriations act.
(6)(a) Support services component rate allocations shall be
established using adjusted cost report data covering at least six
months. Adjusted cost report data from 1996 shall be used for October
1, 1998, through June 30, 2001, support services component rate
allocations; adjusted cost report data from 1999 shall be used for July
1, 2001, through June 30, 2005, support services component rate
allocations. Adjusted cost report data from 1999 will continue to be
used for July 1, 2005, through June 30, 2007, support services
component rate allocations. Adjusted cost report data from 2005 will
be used for July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2009, support services
component rate allocations. Effective July 1, 2009, and thereafter for
each odd-numbered year beginning July 1st, the support services
component rate allocation shall be cost rebased biennially, using the
adjusted cost report data for the calendar year two years immediately
preceding the rate rebase period, so that adjusted cost report data for
calendar year 2007 is used for July 1, 2009, through June 30, 2011, and
so forth.
(b) Through June 30, 2008, support services component rate
allocations shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and
conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial
appropriations act.
(7)(a) Operations component rate allocations shall be established
using adjusted cost report data covering at least six months. Adjusted
cost report data from 1996 shall be used for October 1, 1998, through
June 30, 2001, operations component rate allocations; adjusted cost
report data from 1999 shall be used for July 1, 2001, through June 30,
2006, operations component rate allocations. Adjusted cost report data
from 2003 will be used for July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007,
operations component rate allocations. Adjusted cost report data from
2005 will be used for July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2009, operations
component rate allocations. Effective July 1, 2009, and thereafter for
each odd-numbered year beginning July 1st, the operations component
rate allocation shall be cost rebased biennially, using the adjusted
cost report data for the calendar year two years immediately preceding
the rate rebase period, so that adjusted cost report data for calendar
year 2007 is used for July 1, 2009, through June 30, 2011, and so
forth.
(b) Through June 30, 2008, operations component rate allocations
shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and conditions by a
factor or factors defined in the biennial appropriations act. A
different economic trends and conditions adjustment factor or factors
may be defined in the biennial appropriations act for facilities whose
operations component rate is set equal to their adjusted June 30, 2006,
rate, as provided in RCW 74.46.521(4).
(8) Component rate allocations in direct care, therapy care,
support services, and operations shall be adjusted for economic trends
and conditions by three and seven-tenths percent for the July 1, 2008,
rate setting.
(a) Beginning on July 1, 2009, and for subsequent odd-numbered July
1st rate periods, direct care, therapy care, support services, and
operations rate allocations shall be adjusted for economic trends and
conditions by the factor determined by sum of the United States
consumer price indicator, as is published by the Washington economic
and revenue forecast, from the midpoint of the cost year through
December 31st of the rate year; so that: For the rate period
commencing July 1, 2009, through June 30, 2010, the adjustment for
economic trends and conditions is the sum of half the United States
consumer price indicator for 2007, plus the United States consumer
price indicator for 2008, plus the projected United States consumer
price indicator for 2009; and so forth for subsequent odd-numbered year
July 1st rate periods.
(b) Beginning on July 1, 2010, and for subsequent even-numbered
July 1st rate periods, direct care, therapy care, support services, and
operations rate allocations shall be adjusted by a factor determined by
the forecasted United States consumer price indicator for the year in
which the rate period commences, as is published by the Washington
economic and revenue forecast; so that: For the rate period commencing
July 1, 2010, the adjustment for economic trends and conditions is the
forecast United States consumer price indicator for 2010; and so forth
for subsequent even-numbered July 1st rate periods. This adjustment
factor shall be multiplied by the direct care, therapy care, support
services, and operations rate allocations existing on June 30, 2010,
and the component rate allocations existing on each subsequent June
30th in even-numbered year periods.
(9) For July 1, 1998, through September 30, 1998, a facility's
property and return on investment component rates shall be the
facility's June 30, 1998, property and return on investment component
rates, without increase. For October 1, 1998, through June 30, 1999,
a facility's property and return on investment component rates shall be
rebased utilizing 1997 adjusted cost report data covering at least six
months of data.
(((9))) (10) Total payment rates under the nursing facility
medicaid payment system shall not exceed facility rates charged to the
general public for comparable services.
(((10))) (11) Medicaid contractors shall pay to all facility staff
a minimum wage of the greater of the state minimum wage or the federal
minimum wage.
(((11))) (12) The department shall establish in rule procedures,
principles, and conditions for determining component rate allocations
for facilities in circumstances not directly addressed by this chapter,
including but not limited to: The need to prorate inflation for
partial-period cost report data, newly constructed facilities, existing
facilities entering the medicaid program for the first time or after a
period of absence from the program, existing facilities with expanded
new bed capacity, existing medicaid facilities following a change of
ownership of the nursing facility business, facilities banking beds or
converting beds back into service, facilities temporarily reducing the
number of set-up beds during a remodel, facilities having less than six
months of either resident assessment, cost report data, or both, under
the current contractor prior to rate setting, and other circumstances.
(((12))) (13) The department shall establish in rule procedures,
principles, and conditions, including necessary threshold costs, for
adjusting rates to reflect capital improvements or new requirements
imposed by the department or the federal government. Any such rate
adjustments are subject to the provisions of RCW 74.46.421.
(((13))) (14) Effective July 1, 2001, through June 30, 2008,
medicaid rates shall continue to be revised downward in all components,
in accordance with department rules, for facilities converting banked
beds to active service under chapter 70.38 RCW, by using the facility's
increased licensed bed capacity to recalculate minimum occupancy for
rate setting. However, for facilities other than essential community
providers which bank beds under chapter 70.38 RCW, after May 25, 2001,
medicaid rates shall be revised upward, in accordance with department
rules, in direct care, therapy care, support services, and variable
return components only, by using the facility's decreased licensed bed
capacity to recalculate minimum occupancy for rate setting, but no
upward revision shall be made to operations, property, or financing
allowance component rates. ((The direct care component rate allocation
shall be adjusted, without using the minimum occupancy assumption, for
facilities that convert banked beds to active service, under chapter
70.38 RCW, beginning on July 1, 2006.
(14))) (15) Facilities obtaining a certificate of need or a
certificate of need exemption under chapter 70.38 RCW after June 30,
2001, must have a certificate of capital authorization in order for (a)
the depreciation resulting from the capitalized addition to be included
in calculation of the facility's property component rate allocation;
and (b) the net invested funds associated with the capitalized addition
to be included in calculation of the facility's financing allowance
rate allocation.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.46.435 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 7 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Effective July 1, 2001, the property component rate allocation
for each facility shall be determined by dividing the sum of the
reported allowable prior period actual depreciation, subject to RCW
74.46.310 through 74.46.380, adjusted for any capitalized additions or
replacements approved by the department, and the retained savings from
such cost center, by the greater of a facility's total resident days
for the facility in the prior period or resident days as calculated on
eighty-five percent facility occupancy. Effective July 1, 2002, the
property component rate allocation for all facilities, except essential
community providers, shall be set by using the greater of a facility's
total resident days from the most recent cost report period or resident
days calculated at ninety percent facility occupancy. Effective July
1, 2008, the property component rate allocation for all facilities
shall be set by using the total resident days from the most recent cost
report period. If a capitalized addition or retirement of an asset
will result in a different licensed bed capacity during the ensuing
period, the prior period total resident days used in computing the
property component rate shall be adjusted to anticipated resident day
level.
(2) A nursing facility's property component rate allocation shall
be rebased annually, effective July 1st, in accordance with this
section and this chapter.
(3) When a certificate of need for a new facility is requested, the
department, in reaching its decision, shall take into consideration
per-bed land and building construction costs for the facility which
shall not exceed a maximum to be established by the secretary.
(4) Effective July 1, 2001, for the purpose of calculating a
nursing facility's property component rate, if a contractor has elected
to bank licensed beds prior to April 1, 2001, or elects to convert
banked beds to active service at any time, under chapter 70.38 RCW, the
department shall use the facility's new licensed bed capacity to
recalculate minimum occupancy for rate setting and revise the property
component rate, as needed, effective as of the date the beds are banked
or converted to active service. However, in no case shall the
department use less than eighty-five percent occupancy of the
facility's licensed bed capacity after banking or conversion.
Effective July 1, 2002, in no case, other than essential community
providers, shall the department use less than ninety percent occupancy
of the facility's licensed bed capacity after conversion.
(5) The property component rate allocations calculated in
accordance with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary
to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 74.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish for each medicaid nursing
facility a financing allowance component rate allocation. The
financing allowance component rate shall be rebased annually, effective
July 1st, in accordance with the provisions of this section and this
chapter.
(2) Effective July 1, 2008, the financing allowance shall be
determined by multiplying the net invested funds of each facility by
one-tenth, and dividing by the nursing facility's total resident days
from the most recent cost report period. However, assets acquired on
or after May 17, 1999, shall be grouped in a separate financing
allowance calculation that shall be multiplied by eighty-five one-thousandths. The financing allowance factor of eighty-five one-thousandths shall not be applied to the net invested funds pertaining
to new construction or major renovations receiving certificate of need
approval or an exemption from certificate of need requirements under
chapter 70.38 RCW, or to working drawings that have been submitted to
the department of health for construction review approval, prior to May
17, 1999.
(3) In computing the portion of net invested funds representing the
net book value of tangible fixed assets, the same assets, depreciation
bases, lives, and methods referred to in RCW 74.46.330, 74.46.350,
74.46.360, 74.46.370, and 74.46.380, including owned and leased assets,
shall be utilized, except that the capitalized cost of land upon which
the facility is located and such other contiguous land which is
reasonable and necessary for use in the regular course of providing
resident care shall also be included. Subject to provisions and
limitations contained in this chapter, for land purchased by owners or
lessors before July 18, 1984, capitalized cost of land shall be the
buyer's capitalized cost. For all partial or whole rate periods after
July 17, 1984, if the land is purchased after July 17, 1984,
capitalized cost shall be that of the owner of record on July 17, 1984,
or buyer's capitalized cost, whichever is lower. In the case of leased
facilities where the net invested funds are unknown or the contractor
is unable to provide necessary information to determine net invested
funds, the secretary shall have the authority to determine an amount
for net invested funds based on an appraisal conducted according to RCW
74.46.360(1).
(4) The financing allowance rate allocation calculated in
accordance with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary
to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

Sec. 4 RCW 74.46.511 and 2007 c 508 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The therapy care component rate allocation corresponds to the
provision of medicaid one-on-one therapy provided by a qualified
therapist as defined in this chapter, including therapy supplies and
therapy consultation, for one day for one medicaid resident of a
nursing facility. The therapy care component rate allocation for
October 1, 1998, through June 30, 2001, shall be based on adjusted
therapy costs and days from calendar year 1996. The therapy component
rate allocation for July 1, 2001, through June 30, 2007, shall be based
on adjusted therapy costs and days from calendar year 1999. Effective
July 1, 2007, the therapy care component rate allocation shall be based
on adjusted therapy costs and days as described in RCW 74.46.431(5).
The therapy care component rate shall be adjusted for economic trends
and conditions as specified in RCW 74.46.431(5), and shall be
determined in accordance with this section.
(2) In rebasing, as provided in RCW 74.46.431(5)(a), the department
shall take from the cost reports of facilities the following reported
information:
(a) Direct one-on-one therapy charges for all residents by payer
including charges for supplies;
(b) The total units or modules of therapy care for all residents by
type of therapy provided, for example, speech or physical. A unit or
module of therapy care is considered to be fifteen minutes of one-on-one therapy provided by a qualified therapist or support personnel; and
(c) Therapy consulting expenses for all residents.
(3) The department shall determine for all residents the total cost
per unit of therapy for each type of therapy by dividing the total
adjusted one-on-one therapy expense for each type by the total units
provided for that therapy type.
(4) The department shall divide medicaid nursing facilities in this
state into two peer groups:
(a) Those facilities located within urban counties; and
(b) Those located within nonurban counties.
The department shall array the facilities in each peer group from
highest to lowest based on their total cost per unit of therapy for
each therapy type. The department shall determine the median total
cost per unit of therapy for each therapy type and add ten percent of
median total cost per unit of therapy. The cost per unit of therapy
for each therapy type at a nursing facility shall be the lesser of its
cost per unit of therapy for each therapy type or the median total cost
per unit plus ten percent for each therapy type for its peer group.
(5) The department shall calculate each nursing facility's therapy
care component rate allocation as follows:
(a) To determine the allowable total therapy cost for each therapy
type, the allowable cost per unit of therapy for each type of therapy
shall be multiplied by the total therapy units for each type of
therapy;
(b) The medicaid allowable one-on-one therapy expense shall be
calculated taking the allowable total therapy cost for each therapy
type times the medicaid percent of total therapy charges for each
therapy type;
(c) The medicaid allowable one-on-one therapy expense for each
therapy type shall be divided by total adjusted medicaid days to arrive
at the medicaid one-on-one therapy cost per patient day for each
therapy type;
(d) The medicaid one-on-one therapy cost per patient day for each
therapy type shall be multiplied by total adjusted patient days for all
residents to calculate the total allowable one-on-one therapy expense.
The lesser of the total allowable therapy consultant expense for the
therapy type or a reasonable percentage of allowable therapy consultant
expense for each therapy type, as established in rule by the
department, shall be added to the total allowable one-on-one therapy
expense to determine the allowable therapy cost for each therapy type;
(e) The allowable therapy cost for each therapy type shall be added
together, the sum of which shall be the total allowable therapy expense
for the nursing facility;
(f) Through June 30, 2008, the total allowable therapy expense will
be divided by the greater of adjusted total patient days from the cost
report on which the therapy expenses were reported, or patient days at
eighty-five percent occupancy of licensed beds. Effective July 1,
2008, the total allowable therapy expense will be divided by adjusted
total patient days from the cost report on which the therapy expenses
were reported. The outcome shall be the nursing facility's therapy
care component rate allocation.
(6) The therapy care component rate allocations calculated in
accordance with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary
to comply with RCW 74.46.421.
(7) The therapy care component rate shall be suspended for medicaid
residents in qualified nursing facilities designated by the department
who are receiving therapy paid by the department outside the facility
daily rate under RCW 74.46.508(2).

Sec. 5 RCW 74.46.521 and 2007 c 508 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The operations component rate allocation corresponds to the
general operation of a nursing facility for one resident for one day,
including but not limited to management, administration, utilities,
office supplies, accounting and bookkeeping, minor building
maintenance, minor equipment repairs and replacements, and other
supplies and services, exclusive of direct care, therapy care, support
services, property, financing allowance, and variable return.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, beginning
October 1, 1998, the department shall determine each medicaid nursing
facility's operations component rate allocation using cost report data
specified by RCW 74.46.431(7)(a). Effective July 1, 2002, through June
30, 2008, operations component rates for all facilities except
essential community providers shall be based upon a minimum occupancy
of ninety percent of licensed beds, and no operations component rate
shall be revised in response to beds banked on or after May 25, 2001,
under chapter 70.38 RCW.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, to
determine each facility's operations component rate the department
shall:
(a) Through June 30, 2008, array facilities' adjusted general
operations costs per adjusted resident day, as determined by dividing
each facility's total allowable operations cost by its adjusted
resident days for the same report period, increased if necessary to a
minimum occupancy of ninety percent; that is, the greater of actual or
imputed occupancy at ninety percent of licensed beds, for each facility
from facilities' cost reports from the applicable report year, for
facilities located within urban counties and for those located within
nonurban counties and determine the median adjusted cost for each peer
group. Effective July 1, 2009, array facilities' adjusted general
operations costs per adjusted resident day, as determined by dividing
each facility's total allowable operations cost by its adjusted
resident days for the same report period, for facilities located within
urban counties and for those located within nonurban counties and
determine the median adjusted cost for each peer group;
(b) Set each facility's operations component rate at the lower of:
(i) The facility's per resident day adjusted operations costs from
the applicable cost report period adjusted if necessary to a minimum
occupancy of eighty-five percent of licensed beds before July 1, 2002,
and ninety percent effective July 1, 2002, but not adjusted for minimum
occupancy effective July 1, 2008; or
(ii) The adjusted median per resident day general operations cost
for that facility's peer group, urban counties or nonurban counties;
and
(c) Adjust each facility's operations component rate for economic
trends and conditions as provided in RCW 74.46.431(((7)(b))).
(4)(((a) Effective July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, for any
facility whose direct care component rate allocation is set equal to
its June 30, 2006, direct care component rate allocation, as provided
in RCW 74.46.506(5), the facility's operations component rate
allocation shall also be set equal to the facility's June 30, 2006,
operations component rate allocation.
(b) The operations component rate allocation for facilities whose
operations component rate is set equal to their June 30, 2006,
operations component rate, shall be adjusted for economic trends and
conditions as provided in RCW 74.46.431(7)(b).
(5))) The operations component rate allocations calculated in
accordance with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary
to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 RCW 74.46.437 (Financing allowance component
rate allocation) and 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 8 & 1999 c 353 s 11 are each
repealed.

--- END ---