BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.35.205 and 1991 c 58 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to all other powers and duties given to them by law,
Central Washington University, Eastern Washington University, and
Western Washington University are hereby authorized to grant any degree
through the master's degree to any student who has completed a program
of study and/or research in those areas which are determined by the
faculty and board of trustees of the college to be appropriate for the
granting of such degree: PROVIDED, That before any degree is
authorized under this section it shall be subject to the review and
approval of the higher education coordinating board.
The board of trustees, upon recommendation of the faculty, may also
confer honorary bachelor's ((or)), master's, or doctorate level degrees
upon persons other than graduates of the institution, in recognition of
their learning or devotion to education, literature, art, or science.
No degree may be conferred in consideration of the payment of money or
the donation of any kind of property.

--- END ---