BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.57A.050 and 2007 c 469 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
Within sixty days of the establishment of the boundaries of the
public transportation benefit area the members of the county
legislative authority and the elected representative of each city
within the area shall provide for the selection of the governing body
of such area, the public transportation benefit area authority, which
shall consist of elected officials selected by and serving at the
pleasure of the governing bodies of component cities within the area
and the county legislative authority of each county within the area.
If at the time a public transportation benefit area authority assumes
the public transportation functions previously provided under the
Interlocal Cooperation Act (chapter 39.34 RCW) there are citizen
positions on the governing board of the transit system, those positions
may be retained as positions on the governing board of the public
transportation benefit area authority.
Within such sixty-day period, any city may by resolution of its
legislative body withdraw from participation in the public
transportation benefit area. The county legislative authority and each
city remaining in the public transportation benefit area may disapprove
and prevent the establishment of any governing body of a public
transportation benefit area if the composition thereof does not meet
its approval.
In no case shall the governing body of a single county public
transportation benefit area be greater than ((nine)) eleven members and
in the case of a multicounty area, fifteen members. Those cities
within the transportation benefit area and excluded from direct
membership on the authority are hereby authorized to designate a member
of the authority who shall be entitled to represent the interests of
such city which is excluded from direct membership on the authority.
The legislative body of such city shall notify the authority as to the
determination of its authorized representative on the authority.
Each member of the authority is eligible to be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 and to
receive compensation, as set by the authority, in an amount not to
exceed forty-four dollars for each day during which the member attends
official meetings of the authority or performs prescribed duties
approved by the chairman of the authority. Except that the authority
may, by resolution, increase the payment of per diem compensation to
each member from forty-four dollars up to ninety dollars per day or
portion of a day for actual attendance at board meetings or for
performance of other official services or duties on behalf of the
authority. In no event may a member be compensated in any year for
more than seventy-five days, except the chairman who may be paid
compensation for not more than one hundred days: PROVIDED, That
compensation shall not be paid to an elected official or employee of
federal, state, or local government who is receiving regular full-time
compensation from such government for attending meetings and performing
prescribed duties of the authority.
The dollar thresholds established in this section must be adjusted
for inflation by the office of financial management every five years,
beginning July 1, 2008, based upon changes in the consumer price index
during that time period. "Consumer price index" means, for any
calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index, for
Washington state, for wage earners and clerical workers, all items,
compiled by the bureau of labor and statistics, United States
department of labor. If the bureau of labor and statistics develops
more than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the
index covering the greatest number of people, covering areas
exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and including all items
shall be used for the adjustments for inflation in this section. The
office of financial management must calculate the new dollar threshold
and transmit it to the office of the code reviser for publication in
the Washington State Register at least one month before the new dollar
threshold is to take effect.
A person holding office as commissioner for two or more special
purpose districts shall receive only that per diem compensation
authorized for one of his or her commissioner positions as compensation
for attending an official meeting or conducting official services or
duties while representing more than one of his or her districts.
However, such commissioner may receive additional per diem compensation
if approved by resolution of all boards of the affected commissions.

--- END ---