BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that: Rising
fuel costs are adversely impacting the Washington state economy;
dependence upon oil imports is a continuing threat to national
security; Washington state residents have a vested interest in
providing environmentally sound energy alternatives and solutions for
low-income residents in heating their homes; Washington state has
developed policies that support recycling and alternative energy
efforts; yellow and brown grease cause a major problem in Washington
state sewage; yellow and brown grease are estimated by the United
States environmental protection agency to cause up to seventy percent
of sewer plant blockages and thirty percent of pump station failures;
and the result of such sewer plant blockages and pump station failures
is that untreated sewage is discharged directly into the rivers, lakes,
and waterways of Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 19.112 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A fund of up to five million dollars shall be made available
for grants for converting yellow or brown grease into biodiesel or
renewable diesel fuel, or both. For purposes of this act, "biodiesel"
shall be defined as a diesel fuel substitute produced from vegetable
oils, animal fats, biomass, or other nonpetroleum renewable resources
that meet the registration requirements for fuels and fuel additives
established by the United States environmental protection agency and
any blending components derived from renewable fuel.
(2) Counties, municipalities, port districts, water districts, or
other special taxation districts may apply for any portion of the grant
to be utilized in developing a facility that produces biodiesel from
waste vegetable oil, known as yellow grease, and brown grease recovered
from grease traps or interceptors of restaurants or other commercial
kitchen facilities.
(3) This grant is limited only to those production facilities that
convert diesel fuel from used vegetable oils, animal fats, biomass, or
other nonpetroleum renewable resources.
(4) To be eligible for grant money, the county, municipality, port
district, water district, or other special taxation district must work
with a company that meets the following minimum criteria:
(a) Licensed as a corporation under the laws of the state of
Washington for a period of one year prior to the date of grant
application; and
(b) Has been in continuous production of biodiesel for a period of
not less than twelve months and has a demonstrated ability in biofuel
production particularly from multisource, nonvirgin, and waste
feedstock.
(5) A county, municipality, port district, water district, or other
special taxation district may seek a grant of funds for use in
establishing a facility that converts yellow or brown grease into
biodiesel if the private company they are collaborating with meets the
criteria in subsection (4) of this section.
(6) Grants shall be available in one million dollar increments to
qualifying public entities who seek to support the construction of a
facility that converts yellow or brown grease to biodiesel, subject to
the following minimum requirements:
(a) A grant of one million dollars shall be available for a
facility that produces a minimum of five hundred thousand gallons of
biodiesel fuel from yellow or brown grease over a one-year period once
the construction of the facility is complete; or
(b) A grant of two million dollars shall be available for a
facility that shall produce a minimum of one million two hundred
thousand gallons of biodiesel fuel from yellow or brown grease over a
one-year period once construction of the facility is complete.
(7) Any facility receiving a grant from this fund through a county,
municipality, water district, port district, or other special taxation
district must engage in one of the following fuel for low-income
residents programs:
(a) The facility shall make available at least seven percent of
that fuel to low-income residents with a minimum discount of one dollar
per gallon for a fifteen-year period once the facility is complete.
For each one million dollars in grant money, there shall be a minimum
of seventy thousand gallons of biofuel, either home heating oil or
biodiesel, made available to low-income residents with the one dollar
per gallon discount. After fifteen years, the facility shall make a
minimum of three percent of fuel produced available with the one dollar
per gallon discount in a fuel for low-income residents programs. This
shall continue for the life of the facility; and
(b) The program must be implemented no later than two years after
the grant has been made. In the event the program is not implemented
within the specified time frame, the state shall have the right to
demand immediate repayment of the grant in full.
(8) The fuel for low-income residents program and the distribution
of funds in the program shall be administered by the office of the
state auditor.

--- END ---