BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds:
(1) The cougar is a beautiful and majestic animal that lives
throughout Washington;
(2) Many schools in Washington use the cougar as their mascot;
(3) About two thousand five hundred cougars live in Washington;
(4) The cougar is the largest cat in Washington; and
(5) Cougars are important to humans because they control the pest
populations, such as crickets and rodents, and overpopulated animals
such as deer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 1.20 RCW
to read as follows:
The cougar, Felis concolor, is hereby designated as the official
mammal of the state of Washington.

--- END ---