BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.94.745 and 1995 c 206 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It shall be the responsibility and duty of the department of
natural resources, department of ecology, department of agriculture,
fire districts, and local air pollution control authorities to
establish, through regulations, ordinances, or policy, a limited
burning permit program.
(2) The permit program shall apply to residential and land clearing
burning in the following areas:
(a) In the nonurban areas of any county with an unincorporated
population of greater than fifty thousand; and
(b) In any city and urban growth area that is not otherwise
prohibited from burning pursuant to RCW 70.94.743.
(3) The permit program shall apply only to land clearing burning in
the nonurban areas of any county with an unincorporated population of
less than fifty thousand.
(4) The permit program may be limited to a general permit by rule,
or by verbal, written, or electronic approval by the permitting entity.
(5) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, neither a
permit nor the payment of a fee shall be required for outdoor burning
for the purpose of disposal of tumbleweeds blown by wind. Such burning
shall not be conducted during an air pollution episode or any stage of
impaired air quality declared under RCW ((70.94.714)) 70.94.715. This
subsection (5) shall only apply within counties with a population less
than two hundred fifty thousand.
(6) Burning shall be prohibited in an area on lots, tracts, or
parcels of up to twenty acres when an alternate technology or method of
disposing of the organic refuse is available, reasonably economical,
and less harmful to the environment. It is the policy of this state to
foster and encourage development of alternate methods or technology for
disposing of or reducing the amount of organic refuse.
(7) Incidental agricultural burning must be allowed without
applying for any permit and without the payment of any fee if:
(a) The burning is incidental to commercial agricultural
activities;
(b) The operator notifies the local fire department within the area
where the burning is to be conducted;
(c) The burning does not occur during an air pollution episode or
any stage of impaired air quality declared under RCW 70.94.715; and
(d) Only the following items are burned:
(i) Orchard prunings;
(ii) Organic debris along fence lines or irrigation or drainage
ditches; or
(iii) Organic debris blown by wind.
(8) ((As used in this section,)) The definitions in this subsection
apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(a) "Available and reasonably economical" means that the area is
served by:
(i) A county or municipally sponsored service for recycling of the
organic refuse; or
(ii) Any other method for disposing of the organic refuse (such as
a public or private chipping or chipper rental service, an energy
recovery or incineration facility, or a solid waste drop box, transfer
station, or landfill) that is located within a reasonable distance and
that will accept the type and volume of organic refuse at a total cost
that is less than or equivalent to the median of all county tipping
fees in the state for disposal of one ton of municipal solid waste.
(b) "Nonurban areas" ((are)) means unincorporated areas within a
county that ((is)) are not designated as an urban growth area under
chapter 36.70A RCW.
(9) Nothing in this section shall require fire districts to enforce
air quality requirements related to outdoor burning, unless the fire
district enters into an agreement with the department of ecology,
department of natural resources, a local air pollution control
authority, or other appropriate entity to provide such enforcement.

--- END ---