BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The aviation division of the department of
transportation, in partnership with the state military department, the
city of Seattle, King county, and the Washington state patrol, shall
form a committee comprised of at least one and no more than three
representatives from each entity to study the adequacy of the
infrastructure in downtown Seattle to support helicopter access to
downtown Seattle. The study must examine the need for helicopter
access to downtown Seattle during a major emergency, the ability to
support that need, how Seattle compares with other major cities in its
ability to accommodate helicopters, and make recommendations for
improvements, with particular emphasis on the city's ability to perform
air evacuations in emergencies. The committee shall report its
findings to the joint transportation committee by January 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The sum of two hundred fifty thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the biennium ending June 30, 2009, from the multimodal transportation
account to the department of transportation for the purposes of this
act.

--- END ---