BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The purpose of this act is to promote public
awareness and education of the general public and potential cord blood
donors on the benefits of public or private cord blood banking, and to
establish safeguards related to effective private banking of cord
blood.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.54.220 and 1988 c 276 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All persons licensed or certified by the state of Washington to
provide prenatal care or to practice medicine shall provide information
to all pregnant women in their care regarding:
(a) The use and availability of prenatal tests ((to all pregnant
women in their care)); and
(b) Using objective and standardized information: (i) The
differences between and potential benefits and risks involved in public
and private cord blood banking that is sufficient to allow a pregnant
woman to make an informed decision before her third trimester of
pregnancy on whether to participate in a private or public cord blood
banking program; and (ii) the opportunity to donate, to a public cord
blood bank, blood and tissue extracted from the placenta and umbilical
cord following delivery of a newborn child.
(2) The information required by this section must be provided
within the time limits prescribed by department rules and in accordance
with standards established by those rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A cord blood bank advertising, offering to provide, or
providing private cord blood banking services to residents in this
state must:
(a) Have all applicable licenses, accreditations, and other
authorizations required under federal and Washington state law to
engage in cord blood banking;
(b) Include, in any advertising or educational materials made
available to the general public or provided to health services
providers or potential cord blood donors: (i) A statement identifying
the cord blood bank's licenses, accreditations, and other
authorizations required in (a) of this subsection; and (ii) information
about the cord blood bank's rate of success in collecting, processing,
and storing sterile cord blood units that have adequate, viable yields
of targeted cells; and
(c)(i) Provide to the cord blood donor the results of appropriate
quality control tests performed on the donor's collected cord blood;
and
(ii) If the test results provided under (c)(i) of this subsection
demonstrate that the collected cord blood may not be recommended for
long-term storage and potential future medical uses because of low cell
yield, foreign contamination, or other reasons determined by the cord
blood bank's medical director, provide the cord blood donor with the
option not to be charged fees for processing or storage services,
including a refund of any fees paid. The cord blood bank must provide
the cord blood donor with sufficient information to make an informed
decision regarding this option.
(2) The legislature finds that the practices covered by this
section are matters vitally affecting the public interest for the
purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. A
violation of this section is not reasonable in relation to the
development and preservation of business and is an unfair or deceptive
act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of competition for the
purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Autologous use" means the transplantation, including
implanting, transplanting, infusion, or transfer, of cord blood into
the individual from whom the cord blood was collected.
(b) "Cord blood bank" means an operation engaged in collecting,
processing, storing, distributing, or transplanting hematopoietic
progenitor cells present in placental or umbilical cord blood.
(c) "Hematopoietic progenitor cells" means pluripotential cells
that may be capable of self-renewal and differentiation into any mature
blood cell.
(d) "Private cord blood banking" means a cord blood bank that
provides, for a fee, cord blood banking services for the autologous use
of the cord blood.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect July 1, 2010.

--- END ---