BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature acknowledges the scientific
consensus that global warming from greenhouse gases threatens
Washington state's economy and environment. The legislature further
recognizes that it is incumbent on the people of Washington state to
take measures to reduce the state's contribution to global warming
pollution. Emissions from road transportation account for
approximately one-third of Washington state's global warming pollution,
and the transportation sector is Washington state's largest contributor
of greenhouse gas emissions. Encouraging the use of fuel-efficient
vehicles and providing transportation alternatives are important
strategies for reducing fuel use and associated greenhouse gas
emissions.
The legislature finds that a greenhouse gas tax is an excise tax on
sources that contribute to global warming. The legislature finds that
the global warming costs associated with automobile emissions are not
included in the existing costs of using a vehicle. Additionally, the
legislature finds more alternatives to single-occupancy vehicle travel
are needed to significantly reduce automobile vehicle miles traveled.
The legislature finds that a greenhouse gas tax is an effective way to
embed some of the global warming costs of automobile emissions into the
cost of using a vehicle, and at the same time provides resources to
fund transportation alternatives.
The legislature finds that an exact measure of a vehicle's
greenhouse gas emissions, though preferred, is not administratively
feasible at this time. The environmental protection agency fuel
economy rating is the best available measure of a vehicle's greenhouse
gas emissions given current technology and data collection practices.
The legislature finds that there is a sufficient relationship between
a vehicle's fuel economy and its greenhouse gas emissions to provide a
rational basis for determining the vehicle green house gas emissions
tax. The legislature assumes that passenger vehicles travel the
national average of twelve thousand miles per year and sets the price
of greenhouse gas emissions at twenty dollars per ton of carbon
dioxide.
Therefore, the legislature finds imposing a vehicle greenhouse gas
emissions tax is a vital part of the state's strategy to reducing
global warming.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of licensing must annually collect a vehicle
excise tax on greenhouse gas emissions in accordance with the schedules
contained in subsection (4) of this section. The annual vehicle
greenhouse gas emissions excise tax will be collected on all motor
vehicles licensed under the passenger use class, as specified in
chapter 308-96A WAC.
(2) The state treasurer must distribute revenues on a monthly
basis, less administrative fees not to exceed one percent of fees
collected, according to the following formula:
(a) Twenty-five percent to the Washington state department of
transportation; and
(b) Seventy-five percent to cities and counties based on a pro-rated share of registered passenger vehicles in incorporated and
unincorporated areas.
(3) The proceeds of this tax must be used for the design,
construction, and operations of transportation facilities and services
that provide alternatives to the use of single-occupant vehicles and
for programs that encourage the use of these facilities and services.
The allowable uses of these revenues include but are not limited to
transit, high-capacity transportation, bicycle and pedestrian
facilities, and transportation demand management programs.
(4) The tax schedule for the vehicle greenhouse gas emissions
excise tax is as follows:
(a) For the purpose of this section, "EPA fuel economy rating"
means the estimated, combined (fifty-five percent city and forty-five
percent highway) fuel economy rating for vehicles, as reported in the
United States environmental protection agency and United States
department of energy "fuel economy guide" since the 1978 model year.
(b) Passenger vehicles that have an established EPA fuel economy
rating must be taxed according to the EPA fuel economy rating as
follows:

EPA Fuel Economy Rating
(Miles Per Gallon) Tax Tons CO2
(12,000 Vehicle Miles Traveled)

10 or fewer MPG $240 12

11 MPG $220 11

12 MPG $200 10

13-14 MPG $180 9

15-16 MPG $160 8

17-18 MPG $140 7

19-21 MPG $120 6

22-26 MPG $100 5

27-34 MPG $80 4

35-48 MPG $60 3

49+ MPG $40 2

(c) Passenger vehicles that do not have an established EPA fuel
economy rating must be taxed according to their engine displacement
size as follows:

Engine Displacement/Size
(Liters) Tax

4.0 L or more $240

3.0 L to less than 4.0 L $180

1.5 L to less than 3.0 L $120

Less than 1.5 L $80

--- END ---