BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Recognizing the indeterminate sentence
review board's vital role in protecting the citizens of Washington
state and the unique offender population for which it is responsible,
the legislature intends for the agency to accept a leadership role in
working collaboratively with the department of corrections, as
appropriate, in managing the risk, supervision, and reentry of the
offenders under its jurisdiction, apart from its quasi-judicial, parole
decision-making responsibilities. Due to the particular roles and
responsibilities of the agency, those selected to serve as the chair
and other members of the board must be those most capable to address
the agency's critical role in increasing public safety.
The legislature also recognizes the quasi-judicial function of the
board as well as the agency's other distinct functions as an executive
agency. The indeterminate sentence review board's chair, in his or her
capacity as director, has the responsibility of managing agency
functions separate and in addition to the quasi-judicial
decision-making responsibility of a board member.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.95.003 and 2007 c 362 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board shall consist of a chair((man)) and four other
members, each of whom shall be appointed by the governor with the
consent of the senate. Each member shall hold office for a term of
five years, and until his or her successor is appointed and qualified.
The terms shall expire on April 15th of the expiration year. Vacancies
in the membership of the board shall be filled by appointment by the
governor with the consent of the senate. In the event of the inability
of any member to act, the governor shall appoint some competent person
to act in his or her stead during the continuance of such inability.
(2) The members shall not be removable during their respective
terms except for cause determined by the superior court of Thurston
county.
(3) The governor in appointing the members shall designate one of
them to serve as chair((man)) at the governor's pleasure. The
appointed chair((man)) shall serve as a fully participating board
member and as the director of the agency.
(4) To be eligible to be appointed for membership on the board, an
individual must have at least six years of professional experience in
the criminal justice system of Washington state in any of the following
areas: Parole, probation, corrections, crime victim advocacy, criminal
court system, or law enforcement. Vacancies on the board shall be
filled by an open competitive process managed by the director of the
agency with recommendations for appointment to the governor. The
competitive process will include a selection criterion which recognizes
the uniqueness of the offender population for which the board is
responsible, including: Knowledge of risk analysis, sentencing laws,
and victim rights. In addition to requirements for board membership,
the chair must have a minimum of five years in an administrative
capacity with responsibility for fiscal management, policy development,
and strategic planning.
(5) The members of the board ((and its officers and employees))
shall not engage in any other business or profession or hold any other
public office without the prior approval of the executive ethics board
indicating compliance with RCW 42.52.020, 42.52.030, 42.52.040 and
42.52.120; nor shall they, at the time of appointment or employment or
during their incumbency, serve as the representative of any political
party on an executive committee or other governing body thereof, or as
an executive officer or employee of any political committee or
association.
(6) The members of the board shall each severally receive salaries
fixed by the governor in accordance with the provisions of RCW
43.03.040, and in addition shall receive travel expenses incurred in
the discharge of their official duties in accordance with RCW 43.03.050
and 43.03.060.
(7) The ((board)) chair, in his or her capacity as the director,
may employ, and fix, with the approval of the governor, the
compensation of and prescribe the duties of a senior administrative
officer and such officers, employees, and assistants as may be
necessary, and provide necessary quarters, supplies, and equipment.

--- END ---