BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.07.010 and 1994 c 81 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Cities and towns may disincorporate through a proposed petition
for disincorporation. The petition for disincorporation must be signed
by a majority of the registered voters thereof and filed with the city
or town council. The council shall initiate an election to be heard on
the proposition of disincorporation. Notice of such election shall be
given as provided in RCW 29A.52.351.
(2) The ballots for the election shall be printed with the words
"for dissolution" in one line and the words "against dissolution" in
another line. In all other respects the ballots shall be in conformity
with the law regulating elections in such cities and towns. The
municipality shall be responsible for the expense of printing the
ballots.
(3) The election shall be conducted as other elections are required
by law to be conducted in the city or town except as otherwise provided
in this chapter. The canvassing authority shall certify the results of
the election, together with the ballots cast, to the council. The
council shall meet within one week after certification and shall
declare the result which shall be made a matter of record in the
journal of the council proceedings. If the vote "for dissolution" is
a majority of the registered voters of such city or town voting at such
election, such corporation shall be deemed dissolved.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.07.090 and 1965 c 7 s 35.07.090 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon disincorporation of a city or town, its powers and
privileges as such, are surrendered to the state and it is absolved
from any further duty to the state or its own inhabitants ((and all the
offices appertaining thereto shall cease to exist immediately upon the
entry of the result: PROVIDED, That if a receiver is required, the
officers shall continue in the exercise of all their powers until a
receiver has qualified as such, and thereupon shall surrender to him
all property, money, vouchers, records and books of the city or town
including those in any manner pertaining to its business)). All
assets, liabilities, and indebtedness of the previously incorporated
city or town will revert back to the originating county. The
originating county treasurer shall take possession of all the money,
vouchers, records, and books of the former municipality.
(2) Disincorporation shall not impair the obligation of any
contract. If any franchise lawfully granted has not expired at the
time of disincorporation, the disincorporation does not impair any
right thereunder and does not imply any authority to interfere
therewith to any greater extent than the city or town might have, if it
had remained incorporated.
(3) Upon disincorporation of a city or town, its streets and
highways pass to the control of the state and shall remain public
highways until closed in pursuance of law; and the territory embraced
therein shall be made into a new road district or annexed to adjoining
districts as may be ordered by the board of county commissioners of the
county embracing such city or town.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 35.07.020 (Petition -- Requisites) and 1965 c 7 s 35.07.020;
(2) RCW 35.07.040 (Calling election -- Receiver) and 1997 c 361 s 4
& 1965 c 7 s 35.07.040;
(3) RCW 35.07.050 (Notice of election) and 1965 c 7 s 35.07.050;
(4) RCW 35.07.060 (Ballots) and 1965 c 7 s 35.07.060;
(5) RCW 35.07.070 (Conduct of election) and 1965 c 7 s 35.07.070;
(6) RCW 35.07.080 (Canvass of returns) and 1965 c 7 s 35.07.080;
(7) RCW 35.07.100 (Effect of disincorporation -- Existing contracts)
and 1965 c 7 s 35.07.100;
(8) RCW 35.07.110 (Effect of disincorporation -- Streets) and 1965 c
7 s 35.07.110;
(9) RCW 35.07.130 (Elected receiver -- Failure to qualify -- Court to
appoint) and 1965 c 7 s 35.07.130;
(10) RCW 35.07.140 (No receiver elected though indebtedness
exists -- Procedure) and 1965 c 7 s 35.07.140;
(11) RCW 35.07.150 (Duties of receiver -- Claims -- Priority) and 1965
c 7 s 35.07.150;
(12) RCW 35.07.160 (Receiver may sue and be sued) and 1965 c 7 s
35.07.160;
(13) RCW 35.07.170 (Receiver -- Power to sell property) and 1965 c 7
s 35.07.170;
(14) RCW 35.07.180 (Receiver -- Power to levy taxes) and 1973 1st
ex.s. c 195 s 11 & 1965 c 7 s 35.07.180;
(15) RCW 35.07.190 (Receiver's compensation) and 1965 c 7 s
35.07.190;
(16) RCW 35.07.200 (Receiver -- Removal for cause) and 1965 c 7 s
35.07.200;
(17) RCW 35.07.210 (Receiver -- Successive appointments) and 1965 c
7 s 35.07.210;
(18) RCW 35.07.220 (Receiver -- Final account and discharge) and 1965
c 7 s 35.07.220; and
(19) RCW 35.07.225 (Applicability of general receivership law) and
2004 c 165 s 43.

--- END ---