BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.105.080 and 1999 c 80 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is created a revolving fund to be known as the data
processing revolving fund in the custody of the state treasurer. The
revolving fund shall be used for the acquisition of equipment,
software, supplies, and services and the payment of salaries, wages,
and other costs incidental to the acquisition, development, operation,
and administration of information services, telecommunications,
systems, software, supplies and equipment, including the payment of
principal and interest on bonds issued for capital projects, by the
department, Washington State University's computer services center, the
department of personnel's personnel information systems division, the
office of financial management's financial systems management group,
and other users as jointly determined by the department and the office
of financial management. The revolving fund is subject to the
allotment procedure provided under chapter 43.88 RCW. Disbursements
from the revolving fund for the services component of the department
are not subject to appropriation. Disbursements for the strategic
planning and policy component of the department are subject to
appropriation. All disbursements from the fund are subject to the
allotment procedures provided under chapter 43.88 RCW. The department
shall establish and implement a billing structure to assure all
agencies except the children's administration in the department of
social and health services pay an equitable share of the costs.
As used in this section, the word "supplies" shall not be
interpreted to delegate or abrogate the division of purchasing's
responsibilities and authority to purchase supplies as described in RCW
43.19.190 and 43.19.200.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.105.170 and 1999 c 80 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each agency shall develop an information technology portfolio
consistent with RCW ((43.105.095)) 43.105.172. The superintendent of
public instruction shall develop its portfolio in conjunction with
educational service districts and statewide or regional providers of K-12 education information technology services.
(2) Agency portfolios shall include, but not be limited to, the
following:
(a) A baseline assessment of the agency's information technology
resources and capabilities that will serve as the benchmark for
subsequent planning and performance measures;
(b) A statement of the agency's mission, goals, and objectives for
information technology, including goals and objectives for achieving
electronic access to agency records, information, and services;
(c) An explanation of how the agency's mission, goals, and
objectives for information technology support and conform to the state
strategic information technology plan developed under RCW 43.105.160;
(d) An implementation strategy to provide electronic access to
public records and information. This implementation strategy must be
assembled to include:
(i) Compliance with Title 40 RCW;
(ii) Adequate public notice and opportunity for comment;
(iii) Consideration of a variety of electronic technologies,
including those that help transcend geographic locations, standard
business hours, economic conditions of users, and disabilities;
(iv) Methods to educate both state employees and the public in the
effective use of access technologies;
(e) Projects and resources required to meet the objectives of the
portfolio; and
(f) Where feasible, estimated schedules and funding required to
implement identified projects.
(3) Portfolios developed under subsection (1) of this section shall
be submitted to the department for review and forwarded along with the
department's recommendations to the board for review and approval. The
board may reject, require modification to, or approve portfolios as
deemed appropriate by the board. Portfolios submitted under this
subsection shall be updated and submitted for review and approval as
necessary.
(4) Each agency shall prepare and submit to the department a
biennial performance report that evaluates progress toward the
objectives articulated in its information technology portfolio. The
superintendent of public instruction shall develop its portfolio in
conjunction with educational service districts and statewide or
regional providers of K-12 education information technology services.
The report shall include:
(a) An evaluation of the agency's performance relating to
information technology;
(b) An assessment of progress made toward implementing the agency
information technology portfolio;
(c) Progress toward electronic access to public information and
enabling citizens to have two-way interaction for obtaining information
and services from agencies; and
(d) An inventory of agency information services, equipment, and
proprietary software.
(5) The department, with the approval of the board, shall establish
standards, elements, form, and format for plans and reports developed
under this section.
(6) Agency activities to increase electronic access to public
records and information, as required by this section, must be
implemented within available resources and existing agency planning
processes.
(7) For purposes of this section, "agency" shall not include the
children's administration within the department of social and health
services.
(8) The board may exempt any agency from any or all of the
requirements of this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.105.180 and 1999 c 80 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon request of the office of financial management, the department
shall evaluate agency budget requests for major information technology
projects identified under RCW 43.105.190, including those proposed by
the superintendent of public instruction, in conjunction with
educational service districts, or statewide or regional providers of K-12 education information technology services. The department shall
submit recommendations for funding all or part of such requests to the
office of financial management.
The department, with the advice and approval of the office of
financial management, shall establish criteria, consistent with
portfolio-based information technology management, for the evaluation
of agency budget requests under this section. These budget requests
shall be made in the context of an agency's information technology
portfolio; technology initiatives underlying budget requests are
subject to board review. Criteria shall include, but not be limited
to: Feasibility of the proposed projects, consistency with the state
strategic information technology plan, consistency with information
technology portfolios, appropriate provision for public electronic
access to information and services, costs, and benefits.
For purposes of this section, "agency" shall not include the
children's administration in the department of social and health
services.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.105.190 and 2005 c 319 s 111 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department, with the approval of the board, shall establish
standards and policies governing the planning, implementation, and
evaluation of major information technology projects, including those
proposed by the superintendent of public instruction, in conjunction
with educational service districts, or statewide or regional providers
of K-12 education information technology services. The standards and
policies shall:
(a) Establish criteria to identify projects which are subject to
this section. Such criteria shall include, but not be limited to,
significant anticipated cost, complexity, or statewide significance of
the project; and
(b) Establish a model process and procedures which agencies shall
follow in developing and implementing projects within their information
technology portfolios. Agencies may propose, for approval by the
department, a process and procedures unique to the agency. The
department may accept or require modification of such agency proposals
or the department may reject such agency proposals and require use of
the model process and procedures established under this subsection.
Any process and procedures developed under this subsection shall
require (i) distinct and identifiable phases upon which funding may be
based, (ii) user validation of products through system demonstrations
and testing of prototypes and deliverables, and (iii) other elements
identified by the board.
The director may terminate a major project if the director
determines that the project is not meeting or is not expected to meet
anticipated performance standards.
(2) The office of financial management shall establish policies and
standards consistent with portfolio-based information technology
management to govern the funding of projects developed under this
section. The policies and standards shall provide for:
(a) Funding of a project under terms and conditions mutually agreed
to by the director, the director of financial management, and the head
of the agency proposing the project. However, the office of financial
management may require incremental funding of a project on a phase-by-phase basis whereby funds for a given phase of a project may be
released only when the office of financial management determines, with
the advice of the department, that the previous phase is satisfactorily
completed;
(b) Acceptance testing of products to assure that products perform
satisfactorily before they are accepted and final payment is made; and
(c) Other elements deemed necessary by the office of financial
management.
(3) The department shall evaluate projects based on the
demonstrated business needs and benefits; cost; technology scope and
feasibility; impact on the agency's information technology portfolio
and on the statewide infrastructure; and final project implementation
plan based upon available funding.
Copies of project evaluations conducted under this subsection shall
be submitted to the office of financial management and the chairs,
ranking minority members, and staff coordinators of the appropriations
committees of the senate and house of representatives.
If there are projects that receive funding from a transportation
fund or account, copies of those projects' evaluations conducted under
this subsection must be submitted to the chairs and ranking minority
members of the transportation committees of the senate and the house of
representatives.
(4) This section shall not apply to the children's administration
of the department of social and health services.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.105.210 and 1993 sp.s. c 1 s 903 are each amended
to read as follows:
No state agency, except the children's administration in the
department of social and health services, may expend any moneys for
major information technology projects subject to review by the
department of information services under RCW 43.105.190 unless
specifically authorized by the legislature. An intentional or
negligent violation of this section constitutes a violation of RCW
43.88.290 and shall subject the head of the agency to forfeiture of
office and other civil penalties as provided under RCW 43.88.300.
If the director of information services intentionally or
negligently approved an expenditure in violation of this section, then
all sanctions described in this section and RCW 43.88.300 shall also
apply to the director of information services.

--- END ---