BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The select committee on repealing
education statutes is created. By December 1, 2010, the committee
shall make recommendations to the legislature regarding state statutes
that should be retained or enacted during the 2011 legislative session.
The recommendations shall meet the constitutional requirements of
Article IX, sections 1 and 2 of the state Constitution.
(2) The select committee consists of:
(a) Two members of the senate appointed by the president of the
senate, one of whom is a member of the majority party and one of whom
is a member of the minority party;
(b) Two members of the house of representatives appointed by the
speaker of the house of representatives, one of whom is a member of the
majority party and one of whom is a member of the minority party;
(c) The superintendent of public instruction or the
superintendent's designee;
(d) A school district director, school district superintendent,
school principal, teacher, classified school employee, parent, and an
educational service district superintendent, each appointed by their
respective professional or statewide associations; and
(e) A representative from each of the following: The state board
of education, the professional educator standards board, and the
workforce training and education coordinating board.
(3) The select committee shall use staff from the house of
representatives office of program research and senate committee
services, in consultation with staff from state agencies, professional
associations, and statewide associations that have members serving on
the select committee.
(4) Nonlegislative members of the select committee serve without
compensation, but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses under RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(5) This section expires May 1, 2011.

--- END ---