BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.08.190 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 927 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Except for revenues generated by the ((2003)) surcharge of
$0.42/liter on retail sales of spirits ((that shall be distributed to
the state general fund during the 2003-2005 biennium)) imposed in RCW
66.16.010(1), when excess funds are distributed, all moneys subject to
distribution shall be disbursed as follows:
(a) Three-tenths of one percent to border areas under RCW
66.08.195; and
(b) From the amount remaining after distribution under (a) of this
subsection, (i) fifty percent to the general fund of the state, (ii)
ten percent to the counties of the state, and (iii) forty percent to
the incorporated cities and towns of the state.
(2) During the months of June, September, December, and March of
each year, prior to disbursing the distribution to incorporated cities
and towns under subsection (1)(b) of this section, the treasurer shall
deduct from that distribution an amount that will fund that quarter's
allotments under RCW 43.88.110 from any legislative appropriation from
the city and town research services account. The treasurer shall
deposit the amount deducted into the city and town research services
account.
(3) The governor may notify and direct the state treasurer to
withhold the revenues to which the counties and cities are entitled
under this section if the counties or cities are found to be in
noncompliance pursuant to RCW 36.70A.340.

Sec. 2 RCW 66.16.010 and 2005 c 518 s 935 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There shall be established at such places throughout the state
as the liquor control board, constituted under this title, shall deem
advisable, stores to be known as "state liquor stores," for the sale of
liquor in accordance with the provisions of this title and the
regulations: PROVIDED, That the prices of all liquor shall be fixed by
the board from time to time so that the net annual revenue received by
the board therefrom shall not exceed thirty-five percent. Effective
((no later than July 1, 2005)) September 1, 2008, the liquor control
board shall add an equivalent surcharge of $0.42 per liter on all
retail sales of spirits, excluding licensee, military, and tribal
sales. ((The intent of this surcharge is to raise revenue for the
general fund-state for the 2003-2005 and 2005-2007 bienniums. The
board shall remove the surcharge June 30, 2007.))
(2) The liquor control board may, from time to time, fix the
special price at which pure ethyl alcohol may be sold to physicians and
dentists and institutions regularly conducted as hospitals, for use or
consumption only in such hospitals; and may also fix the special price
at which pure ethyl alcohol may be sold to schools, colleges and
universities within the state for use for scientific purposes.
Regularly conducted hospitals may have right to purchase pure ethyl
alcohol on a federal permit.
(3) The liquor control board may also fix the special price at
which pure ethyl alcohol may be sold to any department, branch or
institution of the state of Washington, federal government, or to any
person engaged in a manufacturing or industrial business or in
scientific pursuits requiring alcohol for use therein.
(4) The liquor control board may also fix a special price at which
pure ethyl alcohol may be sold to any private individual, and shall
make regulations governing such sale of alcohol to private individuals
as shall promote, as nearly as may be, the minimum purchase of such
alcohol by such persons.

Sec. 3 RCW 69.50.520 and 2005 c 518 s 937, 2005 c 514 s 1107, and
2005 c 514 s 202 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The violence reduction and drug enforcement account is created in
the state treasury. All designated receipts from RCW 9.41.110(8),
66.24.210(4), 66.24.290(2), 69.50.505(9)(a), 82.08.150 (5) and
(7)(b)(iii), 82.24.020(2), 82.24.026(2)(c), 82.64.020, 66.16.010(1),
and section 420, chapter 271, Laws of 1989 shall be deposited into the
account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for funding
services and programs under chapter 271, Laws of 1989 and chapter 7,
Laws of 1994 sp. sess., including state incarceration costs. Funds
from the account may also be appropriated to reimburse local
governments for costs associated with implementing criminal justice
legislation including chapter 338, Laws of 1997. Fifty percent of the
money derived from the surcharge imposed in RCW 66.16.010(1) is to be
appropriated to the department of social and health services, division
of alcohol and substance abuse, for the sole purpose of funding
treatment for the chemically dependent who would otherwise be unable to
obtain treatment. The remaining fifty percent of the money derived
from the surcharge imposed in RCW 66.16.010(1) is to be appropriated to
the traffic safety commission for the sole purpose of providing grants
to local government for the driving under the influence emphasis patrol
programs. Funds from the surcharge imposed in RCW 66.16.010(1) shall
not be used to supplant existing local funding. During the 2003-2005
and 2005-2007 bienniums, funds from the account may also be used for
costs associated with providing grants to local governments in
accordance with chapter 338, Laws of 1997, funding drug offender
treatment services in accordance with RCW 70.96A.350, maintenance and
operating costs of the Washington association of sheriffs and police
chiefs jail reporting system, maintenance and operating costs of the
juvenile rehabilitation administration's client activity tracking
system, civil indigent legal representation, multijurisdictional
narcotics task forces, transfers to the health services account, and
grants to community networks under chapter 70.190 RCW by the family
policy council.

--- END ---