BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.60.005 and 2007 c 512 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Adaptive management" means a systematic process for
continually improving management policies and practices by learning
from the outcomes of operational programs.
(2) "Capital plan" means the state ferry system plan developed by
the department as described in RCW 47.06.050(2) ((and adopted)),
reviewed by the commission, and reported to the transportation
committees of the legislature by the commission.
(3) "Capital project" has the same meaning as used in budget
instructions developed by the office of financial management.
(4) "Commission" means the transportation commission created in RCW
47.01.051.
(5) "Improvement project" has the same meaning as in the budget
instructions developed by the office of financial management. If the
budget instructions do not define improvement project, then it has the
same meaning as "program project" in the budget instructions. If a
project meets both the improvement project and preservation project
definitions in this section it must be defined as an improvement
project. New vessel acquisitions must be defined as improvement
projects.
(6) "Life-cycle cost model" means that portion of a capital asset
inventory system which, among other things, is used to estimate future
preservation needs.
(7) "Maintenance cost" has the same meaning as used in budget
instructions developed by the office of financial management.
(8) "Preservation project" has the same meaning as used in budget
instructions developed by the office of financial management.
(9) "Route" means all ferry sailings from one location to another,
such as the Seattle to Bainbridge route or the Port Townsend to
Keystone route.
(10) "Sailing" means an individual ferry sailing for a specific
route, such as the 5:00 p.m. sailing from Seattle to Bremerton.
(11) "Travel shed" means one or more ferry routes with distinct
characteristics as determined by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall develop and maintain a vessel rebuild and
replacement plan that, at a minimum:
(1) Includes projected retirement dates for all vessels,
distinguishing between active and inactive vessels;
(2) Includes projected rebuild dates for all vessels;
(3) Includes timelines for vessel replacement, including business
decisions, design, procurement, and construction; and
(4) Includes a summary of the condition of all vessels,
distinguishing between active and inactive vessels.

Sec. 3 RCW 47.60.375 and 2007 c 512 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The capital plan must adhere to the following:
(((1))) (a) A current ridership demand forecast;
(((2))) (b) Vehicle level of service standards as described in RCW
47.06.140;
(((3))) (c) Operational strategies as described in RCW 47.60.327;
and
(((4))) (d) Terminal design standards as described in RCW
47.60.365.
(2) The capital plan must include the following:
(a) A current vessel preservation plan;
(b) A current systemwide vessel rebuild and replacement plan;
(c) A current vessel deployment plan; and
(d) A current terminal preservation plan.

Sec. 4 RCW 47.60.345 and 2007 c 512 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall maintain a life-cycle cost model on
capital assets such that:
(a) Available industry standards are used for estimating the life
of an asset, and department-adopted standard life cycles derived from
the experience of similar public and private entities are used when
industry standards are not available;
(b) Standard estimated life is adjusted for asset condition when
inspections are made;
(c) It does not include utilities or other systems that are not
replaced on a standard life cycle; and
(d) It does not include assets not yet built.
(2) All assets in the life-cycle cost model must be inspected and
updated in the life-cycle cost model for asset condition at least every
three years.
(3) The life-cycle cost model shall be used when estimating future
((system)) terminal and vessel preservation needs.
(4) The life-cycle cost model shall be the basis for developing the
budget request for terminal and vessel preservation funding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall develop and maintain a vessel maintenance
and preservation program that meets or exceeds all federal requirements
and, at a minimum:
(a) Includes a bilge and void maintenance program;
(b) Includes a visual inspection/audio gauging steel preservation
program; and
(c) Uses a lowest life-cycle cost method.
(2) The vessel maintenance and preservation program must maximize
cost efficiency by, at a minimum:
(a) Reducing planned out-of-service time to the greatest extent
possible; and
(b) Striving to eliminate planned peak season out-of-service
periods.
(3) When construction is underway for the replacement of a vessel,
the vessel that is scheduled for retirement is exempt from the
requirement in subsection (1)(c) of this section.
(4) The department shall include a plain language status report on
the maintenance and preservation vessel program with each budget
submittal to the office of financial management. This report must
include, at a minimum:
(a) A description of the maintenance and preservation of each
vessel in the fleet;
(b) A highlight and explanation of any significant deviation from
the norm;
(c) A highlight and explanation of any significant deviation from
the vessel preservation plan required under RCW 47.60.375;
(d) A highlight and explanation of decisions not to invest in
vessels; and
(e) A highlight and explanation of decisions to invest early in
vessels.

--- END ---