BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 In Washington, the legislature and the
courts share the responsibility for enacting rules of evidence. The
court's authority for enacting rules of evidence arises from a
statutory delegation of that responsibility to the court and from
Article IV, section 1 of the state Constitution. State v. Fields, 85
Wn.2d 126, 129, 530 P.2d 284 (1975).
The legislature's authority for enacting rules of evidence arises
from the Washington supreme court's prior classification of such rules
as substantive law. See State v. Sears, 4 Wn.2d 200, 215, 103 P.2d 337
(1940) (the legislature has the power to enact laws which create rules
of evidence); State v. Pavelich, 153 Wash. 379, 279 P. 1102 (1929)
("rules of evidence are substantiative law").
The legislature adopts this exception to Evidence Rule 404(b) to
ensure that juries receive the necessary evidence to reach a just and
fair verdict.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 10.58 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In a criminal action in which the defendant is accused of a sex
offense, evidence of the defendant's commission of another sex offense
or sex offenses is admissible, notwithstanding Evidence Rule 404(b),
if the evidence is not inadmissible pursuant to Evidence Rule 403.
(2) In a case in which the state intends to offer evidence under
this rule, the attorney for the state shall disclose the evidence to
the defendant, including statements of witnesses or a summary of the
substance of any testimony that is expected to be offered, at least
fifteen days before the scheduled date of trial or at such later time
as the court may allow for good cause.
(3) This section shall not be construed to limit the admission or
consideration of evidence under any other evidence rule.
(4) For purposes of this section, "sex offense" means:
(a) Any offense defined as a sex offense by RCW 9.94A.030;
(b) Any violation under RCW 9A.44.096 (sexual misconduct with a
minor in the second degree); and
(c) Any violation under RCW 9.68A.090 (communication with a minor
for immoral purposes).
(5) For purposes of this section, uncharged conduct is included in
the definition of "sex offense."
(6) When evaluating whether evidence of the defendant's commission
of another sexual offense or offenses should be excluded pursuant to
Evidence Rule 403, the trial judge shall consider the following
factors:
(a) The similarity of the prior acts to the acts charged;
(b) The closeness in time of the prior acts to the acts charged;
(c) The frequency of the prior acts;
(d) The presence or lack of intervening circumstances;
(e) The necessity of the evidence beyond the testimonies already
offered at trial;
(f) Whether the prior act was a criminal conviction; and
(g) Other facts and circumstances.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Section 2 of this act is based upon
Federal Rules of Evidence Rules 413 and 414, and federal appellate
court cases construing those rules.
(2) Section 2 of this act applies to any case that is tried on or
after its adoption.

--- END ---