BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.93.180 and 1989 c 84 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The decisions of the boundary review board shall ((attempt to))
achieve the following objectives:
(1) Preservation of natural neighborhoods and communities;
(2) Use of physical boundaries, including but not limited to bodies
of water, highways, and land contours;
(3) Creation and preservation of logical service areas;
(4) Prevention of abnormally irregular boundaries;
(5) Discouragement of multiple incorporations of small cities and
encouragement of incorporation of cities in excess of ten thousand
population in heavily populated urban areas;
(6) Dissolution of inactive special purpose districts;
(7) Adjustment of impractical boundaries;
(8) Incorporation as cities or towns or annexation to cities or
towns of unincorporated areas which are urban in character; ((and))
(9) Protection of agricultural and rural lands which are designated
for long term productive agricultural and resource use by a
comprehensive plan adopted by the county legislative authority; and
(10) Protection of the public by preventing the degradation of
services provided by the annexing municipality within the annexed area
and ensure any degradation of services within the remaining unannexed
area are mitigated by the annexing municipality.

--- END ---