BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.15.621 and 2007 c 450 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that active military and naval veterans,
reserve military and naval veterans, and national guard members called
to active duty have served their country and have risked their lives to
defend the lives of all Americans and the freedoms that define and
distinguish our nation. The legislature intends to honor active
military and naval veterans, reserve military and naval veterans, and
national guard members who have served on active military or naval duty
for the public service they have provided to this country.
(2) Subject to the limitations in RCW 28B.15.910, the governing
boards of the state universities, the regional universities, The
Evergreen State College, and the community colleges, may waive all or
a portion of tuition and fees for an eligible veteran ((or national
guard member)).
(3) The governing boards of the state universities, the regional
universities, The Evergreen State College, and the community colleges,
may waive all or a portion of tuition and fees for a military or naval
veteran who is a Washington domiciliary, but who did not serve on
foreign soil or in international waters or in another location in
support of those serving on foreign soil or in international waters and
who does not qualify as an eligible veteran or national guard member
under subsection (8) of this section. However, there shall be no state
general fund support for waivers granted under this subsection.
(4) Subject to the conditions in subsection (5) of this section,
the governing boards of the state universities, the regional
universities, The Evergreen State College, and the community colleges,
shall waive all tuition and fees for the following persons:
(a) A child and the spouse or surviving spouse of an eligible
veteran or national guard member who became totally disabled as defined
in RCW 28B.15.385 while engaged in active federal military or naval
service, or who is determined by the federal government to be a
prisoner of war or missing in action; ((and))
(b) A child and the surviving spouse of an eligible veteran or
national guard member who lost his or her life while engaged in active
federal military or naval service; and
(c) Subject to available funds, an eligible Washington national
guard member.
(5) The conditions in this subsection (5) apply to waivers under
subsection (4) of this section.
(a) A child must be a Washington domiciliary between the age of
seventeen and twenty-six to be eligible for the tuition waiver. A
child's marital status does not affect eligibility.
(b) A surviving spouse must be a Washington domiciliary. A
surviving spouse has ten years from the date of the death, total
disability as defined in RCW 28B.15.385, or federal determination of
prisoner of war or missing in action status of the eligible veteran or
national guard member to receive the benefit. Upon remarriage, the
surviving spouse is ineligible for the waiver of all tuition and fees.
(c) Each recipient's continued participation is subject to the
school's satisfactory progress policy.
(6) Required waivers of all tuition and fees under subsection (4)
of this section shall not affect permissive waivers of tuition and fees
under subsection (3) of this section.
(7) Private vocational schools and private higher education
institutions are encouraged to provide waivers consistent with the
terms in subsections (2) through (5) of this section.
(8) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Eligible veteran ((or national guard member))" means a
Washington domiciliary who was an active or reserve member of the
United States military or naval forces((, or a national guard member
called to active duty,)) who served in active federal service, under
((either)) Title 10 ((or Title 32)) of the United States Code, in a war
or conflict fought on foreign soil or in international waters or in
another location in support of those serving on foreign soil or in
international waters, and if discharged from service, has received an
honorable discharge.
(b) "Eligible Washington national guard member" means a Washington
domiciliary who was a national guard member called to active duty who
served in active federal service, under Title 32 or 10 of the United
States Code, and has served either a national domestic security
response or in a war or conflict fought on foreign soil or in
international waters or in another location in support of those serving
on foreign soil or in international waters, and if discharged from
service, has received an honorable discharge.
(c) "Honorable service fee" means the fee imposed pursuant to
section 2 of this act.
(d) "Institution of higher education" has the same meaning as in
RCW 28B.10.016.
(e) "Washington domiciliary" means a person whose true, fixed, and
permanent house and place of habitation is the state of Washington.
"Washington domiciliary" includes a person who is residing in rental
housing or residing in base housing. In ascertaining whether a child
or surviving spouse is domiciled in the state of Washington, public
institutions of higher education shall, to the fullest extent possible,
rely upon the standards provided in RCW 28B.15.013.
(9) Each institution of higher education shall submit a report to
the legislature by January 1, 2012, and every five years thereafter, on
its implementation of this section, including any recommendations as to
legislative changes or improvements to effectuate the purposes of this
section, including the adjustment of fees established under section 2
of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Beginning with the 2008-09 academic year and for each
academic year thereafter, there is established an honorable service fee
in the amount of one dollar, which shall be charged each quarter, or
one dollar per semester, up to a maximum of four dollars per year, to
all full-time and part-time, resident and nonresident, undergraduate
and graduate students, who are attending any institution of higher
education in this state.
(b) The fee in this subsection may not be imposed on any person
described in RCW 28B.15.621(4).
(c) The fee in this subsection is not waivable, and is not a
tuition fee as defined in RCW 28B.15.020.
(d) To the extent that fee revenues are insufficient to achieve the
fund waivers under RCW 28B.15.621, the legislature may appropriate
additional amounts for any given fiscal year to ensure that the funding
goals are met.
(2) The honorable service fee account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from honorable service fees must be deposited
into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for
costs of waivers for the persons specified in RCW 28B.15.621(4).

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.15.910 and 2007 c 522 s 948 and 2007 c 450 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) For the purpose of providing state general fund support to
public institutions of higher education, except for revenue waived
under programs listed in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, and
unless otherwise expressly provided in the omnibus state appropriations
act, the total amount of operating fees revenue waived, exempted, or
reduced by a state university, a regional university, The Evergreen
State College, or the community colleges as a whole, shall not exceed
the percentage of total gross authorized operating fees revenue in this
subsection. As used in this section, "gross authorized operating fees
revenue" means the estimated gross operating fees revenue as estimated
under RCW 82.33.020 or as revised by the office of financial
management, before granting any waivers. This limitation applies to
all tuition waiver programs established before or after July 1, 1992.
(a) University of Washington 21 percent
(b) Washington State University 20 percent
(c) Eastern Washington University 11 percent
(d) Central Washington University 10 percent
(e) Western Washington University 10 percent
(f) The Evergreen State College 10 percent
(g) Community colleges as a whole 35 percent
(2) The limitations in subsection (1) of this section apply to
waivers, exemptions, or reductions in operating fees contained in the
following:
(a) RCW 28B.15.014;
(b) RCW 28B.15.100;
(c) RCW 28B.15.225;
(d) RCW 28B.15.380;
(e) RCW 28B.15.520;
(f) RCW 28B.15.526;
(g) RCW 28B.15.527;
(h) RCW 28B.15.543;
(i) RCW 28B.15.545;
(j) RCW 28B.15.555;
(k) RCW 28B.15.556;
(l) RCW 28B.15.615;
(m) RCW 28B.15.621(2);
(n) RCW 28B.15.730;
(o) RCW 28B.15.740;
(p) RCW 28B.15.750;
(q) RCW 28B.15.756;
(r) RCW 28B.50.259; and
(s) RCW 28B.70.050.
(3) The limitations in subsection (1) of this section do not apply
to waivers, exemptions, or reductions in services and activities fees
contained in the following:
(a) RCW 28B.15.522;
(b) RCW 28B.15.540;
(c) RCW 28B.15.558; and
(d) RCW 28B.15.621 (3) and (4).
(4) The total amount of operating fees revenue waived, exempted, or
reduced by institutions of higher education participating in the
western interstate commission for higher education western
undergraduate exchange program under RCW 28B.15.544 shall not exceed
the percentage of total gross authorized operating fees revenue in this
subsection.
(a) Washington State University 1 percent
(b) Eastern Washington University 3 percent
(c) Central Washington University 3 percent
(5) The institutions of higher education will participate in
outreach activities to increase the number of veterans who receive
tuition waivers. Colleges and universities shall revise the
application for admissions so that all applicants shall have the
opportunity to advise the institution that they are veterans who need
assistance. ((If a person indicates on the application for admissions
that the person is a veteran who is in need of assistance, then the
institution of higher education shall ask the person whether they have
any funds disbursed in accordance with the Montgomery GI Bill available
to them. Each institution shall encourage veterans to utilize funds
available to them in accordance with the Montgomery GI Bill prior to
providing the veteran a tuition waiver.))

--- END ---