BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.05.030 and 1995 c 43 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In counties without a home rule charter, the board of county
commissioners shall ((constitute the)) establish a local board of
health as provided in subsection (2) of this section, unless the county
is part of a health district pursuant to chapter 70.46 RCW. The
jurisdiction of the local board of health shall be coextensive with the
boundaries of ((said)) the county. The board of county commissioners
may, at its discretion, adopt an ordinance expanding the size and
composition of the board of health to include elected officials from
cities and towns and persons other than elected officials as members
((so long as persons other than elected officials do not constitute a
majority)). An ordinance adopted under this section shall include
provisions for the appointment, term, and compensation, or
reimbursement of expenses.
(2) The local board of health must be comprised of the following:
(a)Two members of the board of county commissioners;
(b) Two local physician representatives nominated by the county
medical society;
(c) A local health care professional chosen by the board of county
commissioners;
(d) Two local business representatives nominated by the local
chamber of commerce, one representing the restaurant industry and one
representing the building industry; and
(e) Two public members chosen by the board of county commissioners.

--- END ---