BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 72.36.160 and 1993 sp.s. c 3 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that to meet the objectives of RCW
72.36.1601, the personal needs allowance for all nursing care residents
of the state veterans' homes shall be an amount approved by the federal
health care financing authority, but not less than ninety dollars or
more than one hundred sixty dollars per month during periods of
residency. For all domiciliary residents, the personal needs allowance
shall be one hundred sixty dollars per month, or a higher amount
defined in rules adopted by the department.
(2) The personal needs allowances established in or pursuant to
this section shall be adjusted for inflation by the department each
year based upon changes in the consumer price index during that time
period. "Consumer price index" means, for any calendar year, the
year's annual average consumer price index for Washington state
compiled by the United States department of labor's bureau of labor
statistics. If the bureau of labor statistics develops more than one
consumer price index for areas within this state, the index covering
the greatest number of people, covering areas exclusively within the
boundaries of the state, and including all items shall be used for the
adjustments for inflation in this section. The department must
calculate the new personal needs allowances and transmit them to the
office of the code reviser for publication in the Washington State
Register at least one month before the new personal needs allowances
are to take effect.

--- END ---