BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.95C.120 and 1991 c 319 s 114 are each amended to
read as follows:
The office of waste reduction shall develop, in consultation with
the superintendent of public instruction, an awards program to achieve
waste reduction and recycling in ((the)) public schools, and to
encourage waste reduction and recycling in private schools, grades
kindergarten through high school. The office shall develop guidelines
for program development and implementation. Each public school shall,
and each private school may, implement a waste reduction and recycling
program conforming to guidelines developed by the office.
For the purpose of granting awards, the office may group all
participating schools into not more than three classes, based upon
student population, distance to markets for recyclable materials, and
other criteria, as deemed appropriate by the office. Except as
otherwise provided, five or more awards shall be granted to each of the
three classes. Each award shall be a sum of not less than two thousand
dollars nor more than five thousand dollars. Awards shall be granted
each year to the schools that achieve the greatest levels of waste
reduction and recycling. A single award of not less than five thousand
dollars shall be presented to the school having the best recycling
program as measured by the total amount of materials recycled,
including materials generated outside of the school. A single award of
not less than five thousand dollars shall be presented to the school
having the best waste reduction program as determined by the office.
The superintendent of public instruction shall distribute
guidelines and other materials developed by the office to implement
programs to reduce and recycle waste generated in administrative
offices, classrooms, laboratories, cafeterias, and maintenance
operations.

--- END ---