BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 2007 c 54 s 29 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) Sections 2 through 8, chapter 84, Laws of 2006 and section
22, chapter 54, Laws of 2007 are contingent upon the siting, expansion,
or renovation, and commercial operation of a significant semiconductor
materials fabrication facility or facilities in the state of
Washington.
(b) For the purposes of this section:
(i) "Commercial operation" means the equipment and process
qualifications in the new, expanded, or renovated building are
completed and production for sale has begun.
(ii) "Semiconductor materials fabrication" means the manufacturing
of silicon crystals, silicon ingots that are at least three hundred
millimeters in diameter, raw polished semiconductor wafers that are at
least three hundred millimeters in diameter, and compound semiconductor
wafers that are at least three hundred millimeters in diameter.
(iii) "Significant" means that the combined investment or
investments by a single person, occurring at any time before December
1, 2006, of new buildings, expansion or renovation of existing
buildings, tenant improvements to buildings, and machinery and
equipment in the buildings, at the commencement of commercial
production, is at least three hundred fifty million dollars based on
actual expenditures by the person.
(iv) "Additional significant investment" means the combined
investment or investments by a single person, occurring at any time
before December 1, 2006, of new buildings, expansion, and machinery and
equipment in the building, at the commencement of commercial production
of at least seven hundred million dollars based on actual expenditures
by the person. This additional investment qualifies the person making
such an investment for a credit against the taxes due under chapter
82.04 RCW equal to 0.068%.
(v) An additional significant investment in excess of one billion
dollars is eligible for a business and occupation tax rate under
chapter 82.04 RCW of 0.138%.
(2) Except for section 1 of this act and this section, this act
takes effect the first day of the month immediately following the
department's determination that the contingency in subsection (1) of
this section has occurred. The department shall make its determination
regarding the contingency in subsection (1) of this section based on
information provided to the department by affected taxpayers or
representatives of affected taxpayers.
(3) The department of revenue shall provide notice of the effective
date of sections 2 through 8, chapter 84, Laws of 2006 [December 1,
2006] to affected taxpayers, the legislature, the office of the code
reviser, and others as deemed appropriate by the department.

--- END ---