BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.06.220 and 2003 c 53 s 222 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The governor after proclaiming a state of emergency and prior
to terminating such, may, in the area described by the proclamation
issue an order prohibiting:
(a) Any person being on the public streets, or in the public parks,
or at any other public place during the hours declared by the governor
to be a period of curfew;
(b) Any number of persons, as designated by the governor, from
assembling or gathering on the public streets, parks, or other open
areas of this state, either public or private;
(c) The manufacture, transfer, use, possession or transportation of
a molotov cocktail or any other device, instrument or object designed
to explode or produce uncontained combustion;
(d) The transporting, possessing or using of gasoline, kerosene, or
combustible, flammable, or explosive liquids or materials in a glass or
uncapped container of any kind except in connection with the normal
operation of motor vehicles, normal home use or legitimate commercial
use;
(e) The possession of firearms or any other deadly weapon by a
person (other than a law enforcement officer) in a place other than
that person's place of residence or business;
(f) The sale, purchase or dispensing of alcoholic beverages;
(g) The sale, purchase or dispensing of other commodities or goods,
as he or she reasonably believes should be prohibited to help preserve
and maintain life, health, property or the public peace;
(h) The use of certain streets, highways or public ways by the
public; and
(i) Such other activities as he or she reasonably believes should
be prohibited to help preserve and maintain life, health, property or
the public peace.
(2) The governor after proclaiming a state of emergency and prior
to terminating such may, in the area described by the proclamation,
issue an order or orders concerning waiver or suspension of statutory
obligations or limitations in any or all of the following areas as
further specified and limited by this act:
(a) Liability for participation in interlocal agreements;
(b) Inspection fees owed to the department of labor and industries;
(c) Application of the family emergency assistance program;
(d) Regulations, tariffs, and notice requirements under the
jurisdiction of the utilities and transportation commission;
(e) Application of tax due dates and penalties relating to
collection of taxes; and
(f) Permits for industrial, business, or medical uses of alcohol.
(3) In imposing the restrictions provided for by RCW 43.06.010, and
43.06.200 through 43.06.270, the governor may impose them for such
times, upon such conditions, with such exceptions and in such areas of
this state he or she from time to time deems necessary.
(((3))) (4) Any person willfully violating any provision of an
order issued by the governor under this section is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor.

PART I
INTERLOCAL AGREEMENTS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 A new section is added to chapter 39.34
RCW to read as follows:
(1) During a covered emergency, the department of community, trade,
and economic development may enter into interlocal agreements under
this chapter with one or more public agencies for the purposes of
providing mutual aid and cooperation to any public agency affected by
the cause of the emergency.
(2) All legal liability by a public agency and its employees for
damage to property or injury or death to persons caused by acts done or
attempted during, or while traveling to or from, a covered emergency,
or in preparation for a covered emergency, pursuant to an interlocal
agreement entered into under this section, or under the color of this
section in a bona fide attempt to comply therewith, shall be the
obligation of the state of Washington. Suits may be instituted and
maintained against the state for the enforcement of such liability, or
for the indemnification of any public agency or its employees for
damage done to their private property, or for any judgment against them
for acts done in good faith in compliance with this chapter: PROVIDED,
That the foregoing shall not be construed to result in indemnification
in any case of willful misconduct, gross negligence, or bad faith on
the part of any public agency or any of a public agency's employees:
PROVIDED, That should the United States or any agency thereof, in
accordance with any federal statute, rule, or regulation, provide for
the payment of damages to property and/or for death or injury as
provided for in this section, then and in that event there shall be no
liability or obligation whatsoever upon the part of the state of
Washington for any such damage, death, or injury for which the United
States government assumes liability.
(3) For purposes of this section, "covered emergency" means an
emergency for which the governor has proclaimed a state of emergency
under RCW 43.06.010, and for which the governor has authorized the
department of community, trade, and economic development to enter into
interlocal agreements under this section.
(4) This section shall not affect the right of any person to
receive benefits to which he or she would otherwise be entitled under
the workers' compensation law, or under any pension or retirement law,
nor the right of any such person to receive any benefits or
compensation under any act of congress.

PART II
INSPECTIONS
Sec. 201 RCW 19.28.101 and 2003 c 399 s 201 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The director shall cause an inspector to inspect all wiring,
appliances, devices, and equipment to which this chapter applies except
for basic electrical work as defined in this chapter. The department
may not require an electrical work permit for class A basic electrical
work unless deficiencies in the installation or repair require
inspection. The department may inspect class B basic electrical work
on a random basis as specified by the department in rule. Nothing
contained in this chapter may be construed as providing any authority
for any subdivision of government to adopt by ordinance any provisions
contained or provided for in this chapter except those pertaining to
cities and towns pursuant to RCW 19.28.010(3).
(2) Upon request, electrical inspections will be made by the
department within forty-eight hours, excluding holidays, Saturdays, and
Sundays. If, upon written request, the electrical inspector fails to
make an electrical inspection within twenty-four hours, the serving
utility may immediately connect electrical power to the installation if
the necessary electrical work permit is displayed: PROVIDED, That if
the request is for an electrical inspection that relates to a mobile
home installation, the applicant shall provide proof of a current
building permit issued by the local government agency authorized to
issue such permits as a prerequisite for inspection approval or
connection of electrical power to the mobile home.
(3) Whenever the installation of any wiring, device, appliance, or
equipment is not in accordance with this chapter, or is in such a
condition as to be dangerous to life or property, the person, firm,
partnership, corporation, or other entity owning, using, or operating
it shall be notified by the department and shall within fifteen days,
or such further reasonable time as may upon request be granted, make
such repairs and changes as are required to remove the danger to life
or property and to make it conform to this chapter. The director,
through the inspector, is hereby empowered to disconnect or order the
discontinuance of electrical service to conductors or equipment that
are found to be in a dangerous or unsafe condition and not in
accordance with this chapter. Upon making a disconnection the
inspector shall attach a notice stating that the conductors have been
found dangerous to life or property and are not in accordance with this
chapter. It is unlawful for any person to reconnect such defective
conductors or equipment without the approval of the department, and
until the conductors and equipment have been placed in a safe and
secure condition, and in a condition that complies with this chapter.
(4) The director, through the electrical inspector, has the right
during reasonable hours to enter into and upon any building or premises
in the discharge of his or her official duties for the purpose of
making any inspection or test of the installation of new construction
or altered electrical wiring, electrical devices, equipment, or
material contained in or on the buildings or premises. No electrical
wiring or equipment subject to this chapter may be concealed until it
has been approved by the inspector making the inspection. At the time
of the inspection, electrical wiring or equipment subject to this
chapter must be sufficiently accessible to permit the inspector to
employ any testing methods that will verify conformance with the
national electrical code and any other requirements of this chapter.
(5) Persons, firms, partnerships, corporations, or other entities
making electrical installations shall obtain inspection and approval
from an authorized representative of the department as required by this
chapter before requesting the electric utility to connect to the
installations. Electric utilities may connect to the installations if
approval is clearly indicated by certification of the electrical work
permit required to be affixed to each installation or by equivalent
means, except that increased or relocated services may be reconnected
immediately at the discretion of the utility before approval if an
electrical work permit is displayed. The permits shall be furnished
upon payment of the fee to the department.
(6) The director, subject to the recommendations and approval of
the board, shall set by rule a schedule of license and electrical work
permit fees that will cover the costs of administration and enforcement
of this chapter. The rules shall be adopted in accordance with the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW. No fee may be charged
for plug-in mobile homes, recreational vehicles, or portable
appliances.
(7) Nothing in this chapter shall authorize the inspection of any
wiring, appliance, device, or equipment, or installations thereof, by
any utility or by any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other
entity employed by a utility in connection with the installation,
repair, or maintenance of lines, wires, apparatus, or equipment owned
by or under the control of the utility. All work covered by the
national electric code not exempted by the 1981 edition of the national
electric code 90-2(B)(5) shall be inspected by the department.
(8) During a state of emergency declared under RCW 43.06.010(12),
the governor may waive or suspend the collection of fees under this
section or any portion of this section or under any administrative
rule, and issue any orders to facilitate the operation of state or
local government or to promote and secure the safety and protection of
the civilian population.

Sec. 202 RCW 43.22.350 and 1999 c 22 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In compliance with any applicable provisions of this chapter,
the director of the department of labor and industries shall establish
a schedule of fees, whether on the basis of plan approval or
inspection, for the issuance of an insigne which indicates that the
mobile home, commercial coach, conversion vending units, medical units,
recreational vehicle, and/or park trailer complies with the provisions
of RCW 43.22.340 through 43.22.410 or for any other purpose
specifically authorized by any applicable provision of this chapter.
(2) Insignia are not required on mobile homes, commercial coaches,
conversion vending units, medical units, recreational vehicles, and/or
park trailers manufactured within this state for sale outside this
state which are sold to persons outside this state.
(3) During a state of emergency declared under RCW 43.06.010(12),
the governor may waive or suspend the collection of fees under this
section or any portion of this section or under any administrative
rule, and issue any orders to facilitate the operation of state or
local government or to promote and secure the safety and protection of
the civilian population.

Sec. 203 RCW 43.22.434 and 2005 c 274 s 296 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The director or the director's authorized representative may
conduct such inspections, investigations, and audits as may be
necessary to adopt or enforce manufactured and mobile home, commercial
coach, conversion vending units, medical units, recreational vehicle,
park trailer, factory built housing, and factory built commercial
structure rules adopted under the authority of this chapter or to carry
out the director's duties under this chapter.
(2) For purposes of enforcement of this chapter, persons duly
designated by the director upon presenting appropriate credentials to
the owner, operator, or agent in charge may:
(a) At reasonable times and without advance notice enter any
factory, warehouse, or establishment in which manufactured and mobile
homes, commercial coaches, conversion vending units, medical units,
recreational vehicles, park trailers, factory built housing, and
factory built commercial structures are manufactured, stored, or held
for sale;
(b) At reasonable times, within reasonable limits, and in a
reasonable manner inspect any factory, warehouse, or establishment as
required to comply with the standards adopted by the secretary of
housing and urban development under the national manufactured home
construction and safety standards act of 1974. Each inspection shall
be commenced and completed with reasonable promptness; and
(c) As requested by an owner of a conversion vending unit or
medical unit, inspect an alteration.
(3) For purposes of determining compliance with this chapter's
permitting requirements for alterations of mobile and manufactured
homes, the department may audit the records of a contractor as defined
in chapter 18.27 RCW or RCW 18.106.020(1) or an electrical contractor
as defined in RCW 19.28.006 when the department has reason to believe
that a violation of the permitting requirements has occurred. The
department shall adopt rules implementing the auditing procedures.
Information obtained from a contractor through an audit authorized by
this subsection is confidential and not open to public inspection under
chapter 42.56 RCW.
(4)(a) The department shall set a schedule of fees by rule which
will cover the costs incurred by the department in the administration
of RCW 43.22.335 through 43.22.490. The department may waive
mobile/manufactured home alteration permit fees for indigent permit
applicants.
(b)(i) Until April 1, 2009, subject to (a) of this subsection, the
department may adopt by rule a temporary statewide fee schedule that
decreases fees for mobile/manufactured home alteration permits and
increases fees for factory-built housing and commercial structures plan
review and inspection services.
(ii) Effective April 1, 2009, the department must adopt a new fee
schedule that is the same as the fee schedule that was in effect
immediately prior to the temporary fee schedule authorized in (b)(i) of
this subsection. However, the new fee schedule must be adjusted by the
fiscal growth factors not applied during the period that the temporary
fee schedule was in effect.
(5) During a state of emergency declared under RCW 43.06.010(12),
the governor may waive or suspend the collection of fees under this
section or any portion of this section or under any administrative
rule, and issue any orders to facilitate the operation of state or
local government or to promote and secure the safety and protection of
the civilian population.

Sec. 204 RCW 43.22.480 and 1998 c 37 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall adopt and enforce rules that protect the
health, safety, and property of the people of this state by assuring
that all factory built housing or factory built commercial structures
are structurally sound and that the plumbing, heating, electrical, and
other components thereof are reasonably safe. The rules shall be
reasonably consistent with recognized and accepted principles of safety
and structural soundness, and in adopting the rules the department
shall consider, so far as practicable, the standards and specifications
contained in the uniform building, plumbing, and mechanical codes,
including the barrier free code and the Washington energy code as
adopted by the state building code council pursuant to chapter 19.27A
RCW, and the national electrical code, including the state rules as
adopted pursuant to chapter 19.28 RCW and published by the national
fire protection association or, when applicable, the temporary worker
building code adopted under RCW 70.114A.081.
(2) The department shall set a schedule of fees which will cover
the costs incurred by the department in the administration and
enforcement of RCW 43.22.450 through 43.22.490.
(3) The director may adopt rules that provide for approval of a
plan that is certified as meeting state requirements or the equivalent
by a professional who is licensed or certified in a state whose
licensure or certification requirements meet or exceed Washington
requirements.
(4) During a state of emergency declared under RCW 43.06.010(12),
the governor may waive or suspend the collection of fees under this
section or any portion of this section or under any administrative
rule, and issue any orders to facilitate the operation of state or
local government or to promote and secure the safety and protection of
the civilian population.

Sec. 205 RCW 70.79.330 and 1977 ex.s. c 175 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
The owner or user of a boiler or pressure vessel required by this
chapter to be inspected by the chief inspector, or his deputy
inspector, shall pay directly to the chief inspector, upon completion
of inspection, fees and expenses in accordance with a schedule adopted
by the board and approved by the director of the department of labor
and industries in accordance with the requirements of the
Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW.
During a state of emergency declared under RCW 43.06.010(12), the
governor may waive or suspend the collection of fees under this section
or any portion of this section or under any administrative rule, and
issue any orders to facilitate the operation of state or local
government or to promote and secure the safety and protection of the
civilian population.

Sec. 206 RCW 70.87.030 and 2003 c 143 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department shall adopt rules governing the mechanical and
electrical operation, acceptance tests, conveyance work, operation, and
inspection that are necessary and appropriate and shall also adopt
minimum standards governing existing installations. In the execution
of this rule-making power and before the adoption of rules, the
department shall consider the rules for safe conveyance work,
operation, and inspection, including the American National Standards
Institute Safety Code for Personnel and Material Hoists, the American
Society of Mechanical Engineers Safety Code for Elevators, Dumbwaiters,
and Escalators, and any amendatory or supplemental provisions thereto.
The department by rule shall establish a schedule of fees to pay the
costs incurred by the department for the work related to administration
and enforcement of this chapter. Nothing in this chapter limits the
authority of the department to prescribe or enforce general or special
safety orders as provided by law.
The department may consult with: Engineering authorities and
organizations concerned with standard safety codes; rules and
regulations governing conveyance work, operation, and inspection; and
the qualifications that are adequate, reasonable, and necessary for the
elevator mechanic, contractor, and inspector.
During a state of emergency declared under RCW 43.06.010(12), the
governor may waive or suspend the collection of fees under this section
or any portion of this section or under any administrative rule, and
issue any orders to facilitate the operation of state or local
government or to promote and secure the safety and protection of the
civilian population.

Sec. 207 RCW 70.87.120 and 1998 c 137 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall appoint and employ inspectors, as may be
necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter, under the
provisions of the rules adopted by the Washington personnel resources
board in accordance with chapter 41.06 RCW.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the department
shall cause all conveyances to be inspected and tested at least once
each year. Inspectors have the right during reasonable hours to enter
into and upon any building or premises in the discharge of their
official duties, for the purpose of making any inspection or testing
any conveyance contained thereon or therein. Inspections and tests
shall conform with the rules adopted by the department. The department
shall inspect all installations before it issues any initial permit for
operation. Permits shall not be issued until the fees required by this
chapter have been paid.
(b)(i) Private residence conveyances operated exclusively for
single-family use shall be inspected and tested only when required
under RCW 70.87.100 or as necessary for the purposes of subsection (4)
of this section and shall be exempt from RCW 70.87.090 unless an annual
inspection and operating permit are requested by the owner.
(ii) The department may perform additional inspections of a private
residence conveyance at the request of the owner of the conveyance.
Fees for these inspections shall be in accordance with the schedule of
fees adopted for operating permits pursuant to RCW 70.87.030. An
inspection requested under this subsection (2)(b)(ii) shall not be
performed until the required fees have been paid.
(3) If inspection shows a conveyance to be in an unsafe condition,
the department shall issue an inspection report in writing requiring
the repairs or alterations to be made to the conveyance that are
necessary to render it safe and may also suspend or revoke a permit
pursuant to RCW 70.87.125 or order the operation of a conveyance
discontinued pursuant to RCW 70.87.145.
(a) A penalty may be assessed under RCW 70.87.185 for failure to
correct a violation within ninety days after the owner is notified in
writing of inspection results.
(b) The owner may be assessed a penalty under RCW 70.87.185 for
failure to submit official notification in writing to the department
that all corrections have been completed.
(4) The department may investigate accidents and alleged or
apparent violations of this chapter.
(5) During a state of emergency declared under RCW 43.06.010(12),
the governor may waive or suspend the collection of fees under this
section or any portion of this section or under any administrative
rule, and issue any orders to facilitate the operation of state or
local government or to promote and secure the safety and protection of
the civilian population.

PART III
FAMILY EMERGENCY ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
Sec. 301 RCW 74.04.660 and 1994 c 296 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department shall establish a consolidated emergency assistance
program for families with children. Assistance may be provided in
accordance with this section.
(1) Benefits provided under this program shall be limited to one
period of time, as determined by the department, within any consecutive
twelve-month period.
(2) Benefits under this program shall be provided to alleviate
emergent conditions resulting from insufficient income and resources to
provide for: Food, shelter, clothing, medical care, or other necessary
items, as defined by the department. Benefits may also be provided for
family reconciliation services, family preservation services, home-based services, short-term substitute care in a licensed agency as
defined in RCW 74.15.020, crisis nurseries, therapeutic child care, or
other necessary services as defined by the department. Benefits shall
be provided only in an amount sufficient to cover the cost of the
specific need, subject to the limitations established in this section.
(3)(a) The department shall, by rule, establish assistance
standards and eligibility criteria for this program in accordance with
this section.
(b) Eligibility for benefits or services under this section does
not automatically entitle a recipient to medical assistance.
(4) The department shall seek federal emergency assistance funds to
supplement the state funds appropriated for the operation of this
program as long as other departmental programs are not adversely
affected by the receipt of federal funds.
(5) If state funds appropriated for the consolidated emergency
assistance program are exhausted, the department may discontinue the
program.
(6) During a state of emergency and pursuant to an order from the
governor, benefits under this program may be extended to individuals
and families without children.

PART IV
UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION REGULATION
Sec. 401 RCW 80.04.130 and 2003 c 189 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, whenever
any public service company shall file with the commission any schedule,
classification, rule, or regulation, the effect of which is to change
any rate, charge, rental, or toll theretofore charged, the commission
shall have power, either upon its own motion or upon complaint, upon
notice, to enter upon a hearing concerning such proposed change and the
reasonableness and justness thereof. Pending such hearing and the
decision thereon, the commission may suspend the operation of such
rate, charge, rental, or toll for a period not exceeding ten months
from the time the same would otherwise go into effect. After a full
hearing, the commission may make such order in reference thereto as
would be provided in a hearing initiated after the same had become
effective.
(2)(a) The commission shall not suspend a tariff that makes a
decrease in a rate, charge, rental, or toll filed by a
telecommunications company pending investigation of the fairness,
justness, and reasonableness of the decrease when the filing does not
contain any offsetting increase to another rate, charge, rental, or
toll and the filing company agrees to not file for an increase to any
rate, charge, rental, or toll to recover the revenue deficit that
results from the decrease for a period of one year.
(i) The filing company shall file with any decrease sufficient
information as the commission by rule may require to demonstrate the
decreased rate, charge, rental, or toll is above the long run
incremental cost of the service. A tariff decrease that results in a
rate that is below long run incremental cost, or is contrary to
commission rule or order, or the requirements of this chapter, shall be
rejected for filing and returned to the company.
(ii) The commission may prescribe a different rate to be effective
on the prospective date stated in its final order after its
investigation, if it concludes based on the record that the originally
filed and effective rate is unjust, unfair, or unreasonable.
(b) The commission shall not suspend a promotional tariff. For the
purposes of this section, "promotional tariff" means a tariff that, for
a period of up to ninety days, waives or reduces charges or conditions
of service for existing or new subscribers for the purpose of retaining
or increasing the number of customers who subscribe to or use a
service.
(3) The commission may suspend the initial tariff filing of any
water company removed from and later subject to commission jurisdiction
because of the number of customers or the average annual gross revenue
per customer provisions of RCW 80.04.010. The commission may allow
temporary rates during the suspension period. These rates shall not
exceed the rates charged when the company was last regulated. Upon a
showing of good cause by the company, the commission may establish a
different level of temporary rates.
(4) At any hearing involving any change in any schedule,
classification, rule, or regulation the effect of which is to increase
any rate, charge, rental, or toll theretofore charged, the burden of
proof to show that such increase is just and reasonable shall be upon
the public service company.
(5) The implementation of mandatory local measured
telecommunications service is a major policy change in available
telecommunications service. The commission shall not accept for filing
a price list, nor shall it accept for filing or approve, prior to June
1, 2004, a tariff filed by a telecommunications company which imposes
mandatory local measured service on any customer or class of customers,
except that, upon finding that it is in the public interest, the
commission may accept for filing a price list or it may accept for
filing and approve a tariff that imposes mandatory measured service for
a telecommunications company's extended area service or foreign
exchange service. This subsection does not apply to land, air, or
marine mobile service, or to pay telephone service, or to any service
which has been traditionally offered on a measured service basis.
(6) The implementation of Washington telephone assistance program
service is a major policy change in available telecommunications
service. The implementation of Washington telephone assistance program
service will aid in achieving the stated goal of universal telephone
service.
(7) If a utility claims a sales or use tax exemption on the
pollution control equipment for an electrical generation facility and
abandons the generation facility before the pollution control equipment
is fully depreciated, any tariff filing for a rate increase to recover
abandonment costs for the pollution control equipment shall be
considered unjust and unreasonable for the purposes of this section.
(8) During a state of emergency declared under RCW 43.06.010(12),
the governor may waive or suspend the operation or enforcement of this
section or any portion of this section or under any administrative
rule, and issue any orders to facilitate the operation of state or
local government or to promote and secure the safety and protection of
the civilian population.

Sec. 402 RCW 80.28.060 and 1989 c 152 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the commission otherwise orders, no change shall be made in
any rate or charge or in any form of contract or agreement or in any
rule or regulation relating to any rate, charge or service, or in any
general privilege or facility which shall have been filed and published
by a gas company, electrical company or water company in compliance
with the requirements of RCW 80.28.050 except after thirty days' notice
to the commission and publication for thirty days, which notice shall
plainly state the changes proposed to be made in the schedule then in
force and the time when the change will go into effect and all proposed
changes shall be shown by printing, filing and publishing new
schedules, or shall be plainly indicated upon the schedules in force at
the time and kept open to public inspection. Proposed changes may be
suspended by the commission within thirty days or before the stated
effective date of the proposed change, whichever is later. The
commission, for good cause shown, may allow changes without requiring
the thirty days' notice by duly filing, in such manner as it may
direct, an order specifying the changes so to be made and the time when
it shall take effect. All such changes shall be immediately indicated
upon its schedules by the company affected. When any change is made in
any rate or charge, form of contract or agreement, or any rule or
regulation relating to any rate or charge or service, or in any general
privilege or facility, the effect of which is to increase any rate or
charge, then in existence, attention shall be directed on the copy
filed with the commission to such increase by some character
immediately preceding or following the item in such schedule, such
character to be in form as designated by the commission.
During a state of emergency declared under RCW 43.06.010(12), the
governor may waive or suspend the operation or enforcement of this
section or any portion of this section or under any administrative
rule, and issue any orders to facilitate the operation of state or
local government or to promote and secure the safety and protection of
the civilian population.

Sec. 403 RCW 80.36.110 and 2006 c 347 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, unless
the commission otherwise orders, no change shall be made in any rate,
toll, rental, or charge, that was filed and published by any
telecommunications company in compliance with the requirements of RCW
80.36.100, except after notice as required in this subsection.
(a) For changes to any rate, toll, rental, or charge filed and
published in a tariff, the company shall provide thirty days' notice to
the commission and publication for thirty days as required in the case
of original schedules in RCW 80.36.100. The notice shall plainly state
the changes proposed to be made in the schedule then in force, and the
time when the changed rate, toll, or charge will go into effect, and
all proposed changes shall be shown by printing, filing and publishing
new schedules, or shall be plainly indicated upon the schedules in
force at the time and kept open to public inspection. Proposed changes
may be suspended by the commission within thirty days or before the
stated effective date of the proposed change, whichever is later.
(b) The commission for good cause shown may allow changes in rates,
charges, tolls, or rentals without requiring the notice and publication
provided for in (a) of this subsection, by an order or rule specifying
the change to be made and the time when it takes effect, and the manner
in which the change will be filed and published.
(c) When any change is made in any rate, toll, rental, or charge,
the effect of which is to increase any rate, toll, rental, or charge
then existing, attention shall be directed on the copy filed with the
commission to the increase by some character immediately preceding or
following the item in the schedule, which character shall be in such a
form as the commission may designate.
(2)(a) A telecommunications company may file a tariff that
decreases any rate, charge, rental, or toll with ten days' notice to
the commission and publication without receiving a special order from
the commission when the filing does not contain an offsetting increase
to another rate, charge, rental, or toll, and the filing company agrees
not to file for an increase to any rate, charge, rental, or toll to
recover the revenue deficit that results from the decrease for a period
of one year.
(b) A telecommunications company may file a promotional offering to
be effective, without receiving a special order from the commission,
upon filing with the commission and publication. For the purposes of
this section, "promotional offering" means a tariff that, for a period
of up to ninety days, waives or reduces charges or conditions of
service for existing or new subscribers for the purpose of retaining or
increasing the number of customers who subscribe to or use a service.
During a state of emergency declared under RCW 43.06.010(12), the
governor may waive or suspend the operation or enforcement of this
section or any portion of this section or under any administrative
rule, and issue any orders to facilitate the operation of state or
local government or to promote and secure the safety and protection of
the civilian population.

Sec. 404 RCW 81.04.130 and 2007 c 234 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever any public service company, subject to regulation by the
commission as to rates and service, files with the commission any
schedule, classification, rule, or regulation, the effect of which is
to change any rate, fare, charge, rental, or toll previously charged,
the commission may, either upon its own motion or upon complaint, upon
notice, hold a hearing concerning the proposed change and the
reasonableness and justness of it. Pending the hearing and the
decision, the commission may suspend the operation of the rate, fare,
charge, rental, or toll, if the change is proposed by a common carrier
other than a solid waste collection company, for a period not exceeding
seven months, and, if proposed by a solid waste collection company, for
a period not exceeding ten months from the time the change would
otherwise go into effect. After a full hearing the commission may make
the order in reference to the change as would be provided in a hearing
initiated after the change had become effective.
At any hearing involving any change in any schedule,
classification, rule, or regulation the effect of which is to increase
any rate, fare, charge, rental, or toll theretofore charged, the burden
of proof to show that the increase is just and reasonable is upon the
public service company. When any common carrier files any tariff,
classification, rule, or regulation the effect of which is to decrease
any rate, fare, or charge, the burden of proof to show that such
decrease is just and reasonable is upon the common carrier.
During a state of emergency declared under RCW 43.06.010(12), the
governor may waive or suspend the operation or enforcement of this
section or any portion of this section or under any administrative
rule, and issue any orders to facilitate the operation of state or
local government or to promote and secure the safety and protection of
the civilian population.

Sec. 405 RCW 81.04.150 and 2007 c 234 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever the commission finds, after a hearing upon its own motion
or upon complaint as provided in this chapter, that any rate, toll,
rental, or charge that has been the subject of complaint and inquiry is
sufficiently remunerative to the public service company subject to
regulation by the commission as to rates and service affected by it,
the commission may order that the rate, toll, rental, or charge must
not be changed, altered, abrogated, or discontinued, nor must there be
any change in the classification that will change or alter the rate,
toll, rental, or charge without first obtaining the consent of the
commission authorizing the change to be made.
During a state of emergency declared under RCW 43.06.010(12), the
governor may waive or suspend the operation or enforcement of this
section or any portion of this section or under any administrative
rule, and issue any orders to facilitate the operation of state or
local government or to promote and secure the safety and protection of
the civilian population.

Sec. 406 RCW 81.28.050 and 2007 c 234 s 26 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the commission otherwise orders, a change may not be made to
any classification, rate, fare, charge, rule, or regulation filed and
published by a common carrier subject to regulation by the commission
as to rates and service, except after thirty days' notice to the
commission and to the public. In the case of a solid waste collection
company, a change may not be made except after forty-five days' notice
to the commission and to the public. The notice must be published as
provided in RCW 81.28.040 and must plainly state the changes proposed
to be made in the schedule then in force and the time when the changed
rate, classification, fare, or charge will go into effect. All
proposed changes must be shown by printing, filing, and publishing new
schedules or must be plainly indicated upon the schedules in force at
the time and kept open to public inspection. The commission, for good
cause shown, may by order allow changes in rates without requiring the
notice and the publication time periods specified in this section.
When any change is made in any rate, fare, charge, classification,
rule, or regulation, attention must be directed to the change by some
character on the schedule. The character and its placement must be
designated by the commission. The commission may, by order, for good
cause shown, allow changes in any rate, fare, charge, classification,
rule, or regulation without requiring any character to indicate each
and every change to be made.
During a state of emergency declared under RCW 43.06.010(12), the
governor may waive or suspend the operation or enforcement of this
section or any portion of this section or under any administrative
rule, and issue any orders to facilitate the operation of state or
local government or to promote and secure the safety and protection of
the civilian population.

Sec. 407 RCW 80.36.145 and 1989 c 101 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature declares that the availability of an
alternative abbreviated formal procedure for use by the commission
instead of a full adjudicative proceeding may in appropriate
circumstances advance the public interest by reducing the time required
by the commission for decision and the costs incurred by interested
parties and ratepayers. Therefore, the commission is authorized to use
formal investigation and fact-finding instead of an adjudicative
proceeding under chapter 34.05 RCW when it determines that its use is
in the public interest and that a full adjudicative hearing is not
necessary to fully develop the facts relevant to the proceeding and the
positions of the parties, including intervenors.
(2) The commission may use formal investigation and fact-finding
instead of the hearing provided in the following circumstances:
(a) A complaint proceeding under RCW 80.04.110 with concurrence of
the respondent when the commission is the complainant or with
concurrence of the complainant and respondent when not the commission;
(b) A tariff suspension under RCW 80.04.130; or
(c) A competitive classification proceeding under RCW 80.36.320 and
80.36.330.
(3) In formal investigation and fact-finding the commission may
limit the record to written submissions by the parties, including
intervenors. The commission shall review the written submissions and,
based thereon, shall enter appropriate findings of fact and conclusions
of law and its order. When there is a reasonable expression of public
interest in the issues under consideration, the commission shall hold
at least one public hearing for the receipt of information from members
of the public that are not formal intervenors in the proceeding and may
elect to convert the proceeding to an adjudicative proceeding at any
stage. The assignment of an agency employee or administrative law
judge to preside at such public hearing shall not require the entry of
an initial order.
(4) The commission shall adopt rules of practice and procedure
including rules for discovery of information necessary for the use of
formal investigation and fact-finding and for the filing of written
submissions. The commission may provide by rule for a number of rounds
of written comments: PROVIDED, That the party with the burden of proof
shall always have the opportunity to file reply comments.
(5) During a state of emergency declared under RCW 43.06.010(12),
the governor may waive or suspend the operation or enforcement of this
section or any portion of this section or under any administrative
rule, and issue any orders to facilitate the operation of state or
local government or to promote and secure the safety and protection of
the civilian population.

Sec. 408 RCW 80.36.320 and 2006 c 347 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The commission shall classify a telecommunications company as
a competitive telecommunications company if the services it offers are
subject to effective competition. Effective competition means that the
company's customers have reasonably available alternatives and that the
company does not have a significant captive customer base. In
determining whether a company is competitive, factors the commission
shall consider include but are not limited to:
(a) The number and sizes of alternative providers of service;
(b) The extent to which services are available from alternative
providers in the relevant market;
(c) The ability of alternative providers to make functionally
equivalent or substitute services readily available at competitive
rates, terms, and conditions; and
(d) Other indicators of market power which may include market
share, growth in market share, ease of entry, and the affiliation of
providers of services.
The commission shall conduct the initial classification and any
subsequent review of the classification in accordance with such
procedures as the commission may establish by rule.
(2) Competitive telecommunications companies shall be subject to
minimal regulation. The commission may waive any regulatory
requirement under this title for competitive telecommunications
companies when it determines that competition will serve the same
purposes as public interest regulation. The commission may waive
different regulatory requirements for different companies if such
different treatment is in the public interest. A competitive
telecommunications company shall at a minimum:
(a) Keep its accounts according to regulations as determined by the
commission;
(b) File financial reports with the commission as required by the
commission and in a form and at times prescribed by the commission; and
(c) Cooperate with commission investigations of customer
complaints.
(3) The commission may revoke any waivers it grants and may
reclassify any competitive telecommunications company if the revocation
or reclassification would protect the public interest.
(4) The commission may waive the requirements of RCW 80.36.170 and
80.36.180 in whole or in part for a competitive telecommunications
company if it finds that competition will serve the same purpose and
protect the public interest.
(5) During a state of emergency declared under RCW 43.06.010(12),
the governor may waive or suspend the operation or enforcement of this
section or any portion of this section or under any administrative
rule, and issue any orders to facilitate the operation of state or
local government or to promote and secure the safety and protection of
the civilian population.

Sec. 409 RCW 80.36.330 and 2007 c 26 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission may classify a telecommunications service
provided by a telecommunications company as a competitive
telecommunications service if the service is subject to effective
competition. Effective competition means that customers of the service
have reasonably available alternatives and that the service is not
provided to a significant captive customer base. In determining
whether a service is competitive, factors the commission shall consider
include but are not limited to:
(a) The number and size of alternative providers of services,
including those not subject to commission jurisdiction;
(b) The extent to which services are available from alternative
providers in the relevant market;
(c) The ability of alternative providers to make functionally
equivalent or substitute services readily available at competitive
rates, terms, and conditions; and
(d) Other indicators of market power, which may include market
share, growth in market share, ease of entry, and the affiliation of
providers of services.
(2) Competitive telecommunications services are subject to minimal
regulation. The commission may waive any regulatory requirement under
this title for companies offering a competitive telecommunications
service when it determines that competition will serve the same
purposes as public interest regulation. The commission may waive
different regulatory requirements for different companies if such
different treatment is in the public interest. A company offering a
competitive telecommunications service shall at a minimum:
(a) Keep its accounts according to rules adopted by the commission;
(b) File financial reports for competitive telecommunications
services with the commission as required by the commission and in a
form and at times prescribed by the commission; and
(c) Cooperate with commission investigations of customer
complaints.
(3) Prices or rates charged for competitive telecommunications
services shall cover their cost. The commission shall determine proper
cost standards to implement this section, provided that in making any
assignment of costs or allocating any revenue requirement, the
commission shall act to preserve affordable universal
telecommunications service.
(4) The commission may investigate prices for competitive
telecommunications services upon complaint. In any complaint
proceeding initiated by the commission, the telecommunications company
providing the service shall bear the burden of proving that the prices
charged cover cost, and are fair, just, and reasonable.
(5) Telecommunications companies shall provide the commission with
all data it deems necessary to implement this section.
(6) No losses incurred by a telecommunications company in the
provision of competitive services may be recovered through rates for
noncompetitive services. The commission may order refunds or credits
to any class of subscribers to a noncompetitive telecommunications
service which has paid excessive rates because of below cost pricing of
competitive telecommunications services.
(7) The commission may reclassify any competitive
telecommunications service if reclassification would protect the public
interest.
(8) The commission may waive the requirements of RCW 80.36.170 and
80.36.180 in whole or in part for a service classified as competitive
if it finds that competition will serve the same purpose and protect
the public interest.
(9) During a state of emergency declared under RCW 43.06.010(12),
the governor may waive or suspend the operation or enforcement of this
section or any portion of this section or under any administrative
rule, and issue any orders to facilitate the operation of state or
local government or to promote and secure the safety and protection of
the civilian population.

Sec. 410 RCW 80.36.350 and 1990 c 10 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each telecommunications company not operating under tariff in
Washington on January 1, 1985, shall register with the commission
before beginning operations in this state. The registration shall be
on a form prescribed by the commission and shall contain such
information as the commission may by rule require, but shall include as
a minimum the name and address of the company; the name and address of
its registered agent, if any; the name, address, and title of each
officer or director; its most current balance sheet; its latest annual
report, if any; and a description of the telecommunications services it
offers or intends to offer.
The commission may require as a precondition to registration the
procurement of a performance bond sufficient to cover any advances or
deposits the telecommunications company may collect from its customers,
or order that such advances or deposits be held in escrow or trust.
The commission may deny registration to any telecommunications
company which:
(1) Does not provide the information required by this section;
(2) Fails to provide a performance bond, if required;
(3) Does not possess adequate financial resources to provide the
proposed service; or
(4) Does not possess adequate technical competency to provide the
proposed service.
The commission shall take action to approve or issue a notice of
hearing concerning any application for registration within thirty days
after receiving the application. The commission may approve an
application with or without a hearing. The commission may deny an
application after a hearing.
A telecommunications company may also submit a petition for
competitive classification under RCW 80.36.310 at the time it applies
for registration. The commission may act on the registration
application and the competitive classification petition at the same
time.
During a state of emergency declared under RCW 43.06.010(12), the
governor may waive or suspend the operation or enforcement of this
section or any portion of this section or under any administrative
rule, and issue any orders to facilitate the operation of state or
local government or to promote and secure the safety and protection of
the civilian population.

Sec. 411 RCW 81.108.050 and 1997 c 243 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The maximum disposal rates that a site operator may charge
generators shall be determined in accordance with this section. The
rates shall include all charges for disposal services at the site.
(2) Initially, the maximum disposal rates shall be the initial
rates established pursuant to RCW 81.108.040.
(3) Subsequently, the maximum disposal rates shall be adjusted in
January of each year to incorporate inflation and volume adjustments.
Such adjustments shall take effect thirty days after filing with the
commission unless the commission authorizes that the adjustments take
effect earlier, or the commission contests the calculation of the
adjustments, in which case the commission may suspend the filing. A
site operator shall provide notice to its customers concurrent with the
filing.
(4)(a) Subsequently, a site operator may also file for revisions to
the maximum disposal rates due to:
(i) Changes in any governmentally imposed fee, surcharge, or tax
assessed on a volume or a gross revenue basis against or collected by
the site operator, including site closure fees, perpetual care and
maintenance fees, business and occupation taxes, site surveillance
fees, leasehold excise taxes, commission regulatory fees, municipal
taxes, and a tax or payment in lieu of taxes authorized by the state to
compensate the county in which a site is located for that county's
legitimate costs arising out of the presence of that site within that
county; or
(ii) Factors outside the control of the site operator such as a
material change in regulatory requirements regarding the physical
operation of the site.
(b) Revisions to the maximum disposal rate shall take effect thirty
days after filing with the commission unless the commission suspends
the filing or authorizes the proposed adjustments to take effect
earlier.
(5) Upon establishment of a contract rate pursuant to RCW
81.108.060 for a disposal fee, the site operator may not collect a
disposal fee that is greater than the effective rate. The effective
rate shall be in effect so long as such contract rate remains in
effect. Adjustments to the maximum disposal rates may be made during
the time an effective rate is in place. Contracts for disposal of
extraordinary volumes pursuant to RCW 81.108.070 shall not be
considered in determining the effective rate.
(6) The site operator may petition the commission for new maximum
disposal rates at any time. Upon receipt of such a petition, the
commission shall set the matter for hearing and shall issue an order
within seven months of the filing of the petition. The petition shall
be accompanied by the documents required to accompany the filing for
initial rates. The hearing on the petition shall be conducted in
accordance with the commission's rules of practice and procedure.
(7) This section shall only take effect following a finding that
the site operator is a monopoly pursuant to RCW 81.108.100.
(8) During a state of emergency declared under RCW 43.06.010(12),
the governor may waive or suspend the operation or enforcement of this
section or any portion of this section or under any administrative
rule, and issue any orders to facilitate the operation of state or
local government or to promote and secure the safety and protection of
the civilian population.

Sec. 412 RCW 81.108.060 and 1991 c 272 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) At any time, a site operator may contract with any person to
provide a contract disposal rate lower than the maximum disposal rate.
(2) A contract or contract amendment shall be submitted to the
commission for approval at least thirty days before its effective date.
The commission may approve the contract or suspend the contract and set
it for hearing. If the commission takes no action within thirty days
of filing, the contract or amendment shall go into effect according to
its terms. Each contract filing shall be accompanied with
documentation to show that the contract does not result in
discrimination between generators receiving like and contemporaneous
service under substantially similar circumstances and provides for the
recovery of all costs associated with the provision of the service.
(3) This section shall only take effect following a finding that
the site operator is a monopoly pursuant to RCW 81.108.100.
(4) During a state of emergency declared under RCW 43.06.010(12),
the governor may waive or suspend the operation or enforcement of this
section or any portion of this section or under any administrative
rule, and issue any orders to facilitate the operation of state or
local government or to promote and secure the safety and protection of
the civilian population.

Sec. 413 RCW 81.108.110 and 1991 c 272 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) At any time after this chapter has been implemented with
respect to a site operator, such site operator may petition the
commission to be classified as competitive. The commission may
initiate classification proceedings on its own motion. The commission
shall enter its final order with respect to classification within seven
months from the date of filing of a company's petition or the
commission's motion.
(2) The commission shall classify a site operator as a competitive
company if the commission finds, after notice and hearing, that the
disposal services offered are subject to competition because the
company's customers have reasonably available alternatives. In
determining whether a company is competitive, the commission's
consideration shall include, but not be limited to:
(a) Whether the system of interstate compacts and regional disposal
sites established by federal law has been implemented so that the
Northwest compact site located near Richland, Washington is the
exclusive site option for disposal by customers within the Northwest
compact states;
(b) Whether waste generated outside the Northwest compact states is
excluded; and
(c) The ability of alternative disposal sites to make functionally
equivalent services readily available at competitive rates, terms, and
conditions.
(3) The commission may reclassify a competitive site operator if
reclassification would protect the public interest as set forth in this
section.
(4) Competitive low-level radioactive waste disposal companies
shall be exempt from commission regulation and fees during the time
they are so classified.
(5) During a state of emergency declared under RCW 43.06.010(12),
the governor may waive or suspend the operation or enforcement of this
section or any portion of this section or under any administrative
rule, and issue any orders to facilitate the operation of state or
local government or to promote and secure the safety and protection of
the civilian population.

Sec. 414 RCW 80.36.135 and 2000 c 82 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature declares that:
(a) Changes in technology and the structure of the
telecommunications industry may produce conditions under which
traditional rate of return, rate base regulation of telecommunications
companies may not in all cases provide the most efficient and effective
means of achieving the public policy goals of this state as declared in
RCW 80.36.300, this section, and RCW 80.36.145. The commission should
be authorized to employ an alternative form of regulation if that
alternative is better suited to achieving those policy goals.
(b) Because of the great diversity in the scope and type of
services provided by telecommunications companies, alternative
regulatory arrangements that meet the varying circumstances of
different companies and their ratepayers may be desirable.
(2) Subject to the conditions set forth in this chapter and RCW
80.04.130, the commission may regulate telecommunications companies
subject to traditional rate of return, rate base regulation by
authorizing an alternative form of regulation. The commission may
determine the manner and extent of any alternative forms of regulation
as may in the public interest be appropriate. In addition to the
public policy goals declared in RCW 80.36.300, the commission shall
consider, in determining the appropriateness of any proposed
alternative form of regulation, whether it will:
(a) Facilitate the broad deployment of technological improvements
and advanced telecommunications services to underserved areas or
underserved customer classes;
(b) Improve the efficiency of the regulatory process;
(c) Preserve or enhance the development of effective competition
and protect against the exercise of market power during its
development;
(d) Preserve or enhance service quality and protect against the
degradation of the quality or availability of efficient
telecommunications services;
(e) Provide for rates and charges that are fair, just, reasonable,
sufficient, and not unduly discriminatory or preferential; and
(f) Not unduly or unreasonably prejudice or disadvantage any
particular customer class.
(3) A telecommunications company or companies subject to
traditional rate of return, rate base regulation may petition the
commission to establish an alternative form of regulation. The company
or companies shall submit with the petition a plan for an alternative
form of regulation. The plan shall contain a proposal for transition
to the alternative form of regulation and the proposed duration of the
plan. The plan must also contain a proposal for ensuring adequate
carrier-to-carrier service quality, including service quality standards
or performance measures for interconnection, and appropriate
enforcement or remedial provisions in the event the company fails to
meet service quality standards or performance measures. The commission
also may initiate consideration of alternative forms of regulation for
a company or companies on its own motion. The commission, after notice
and hearing, shall issue an order accepting, modifying, or rejecting
the plan within nine months after the petition or motion is filed,
unless extended by the commission for good cause. The commission shall
order implementation of the alternative plan of regulation unless it
finds that, on balance, an alternative plan as proposed or modified
fails to meet the considerations stated in subsection (2) of this
section.
(4) Not later than sixty days from the entry of the commission's
order, the company or companies affected by the order may file with the
commission an election not to proceed with the alternative form of
regulation as authorized by the commission.
(5) The commission may waive such regulatory requirements under
Title 80 RCW for a telecommunications company subject to an alternative
form of regulation as may be appropriate to facilitate the
implementation of this section. However, the commission may not waive
any grant of legal rights to any person contained in this chapter and
chapter 80.04 RCW. The commission may waive different regulatory
requirements for different companies or services if such different
treatment is in the public interest.
(6) Upon petition by the company, and after notice and hearing, the
commission may rescind or modify an alternative form of regulation in
the manner requested by the company.
(7) The commission or any person may file a complaint under RCW
80.04.110 alleging that a telecommunications company under an
alternative form of regulation has not complied with the terms and
conditions set forth in the alternative form of regulation. The
complainant shall bear the burden of proving the allegations in the
complaint.
(8) During a state of emergency declared under RCW 43.06.010(12),
the governor may waive or suspend the operation or enforcement of this
section or any portion of this section or under any administrative
rule, and issue any orders to facilitate the operation of state or
local government or to promote and secure the safety and protection of
the civilian population.

Sec. 415 RCW 81.68.046 and 2005 c 121 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
The commission may, with or without a hearing, issue temporary
certificates to engage in the business of operating an auto
transportation company, but only after it finds that the issuance of
the temporary certificate is consistent with the public interest. The
temporary certificate may be issued for a period up to one hundred
eighty days. The commission may prescribe rules and impose terms and
conditions as in its judgment are reasonable and necessary in carrying
out this chapter. The commission may by rule, prescribe a fee for an
application for the temporary certificate. The commission shall not
issue a temporary certificate to operate in a territory: (1) For which
a certificate has been issued, unless the existing certificate holder,
upon twenty days' notice, does not object to the issuance of the
certificate or is not providing service; or (2) for which an
application is pending unless the filing for a temporary certificate is
made by the applicant or the applicant does not object to the issuance
of the certificate.
During a state of emergency declared under RCW 43.06.010(12), the
governor may waive or suspend the operation or enforcement of this
section or any portion of this section or under any administrative
rule, and issue any orders to facilitate the operation of state or
local government or to promote and secure the safety and protection of
the civilian population.

Sec. 416 RCW 81.84.070 and 1993 c 427 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
The commission may, with or without a hearing, issue temporary
certificates to operate under this chapter, but only after it finds
that the issuance of the temporary certificate is necessary due to an
immediate and urgent need and is otherwise consistent with the public
interest. The certificate may be issued for a period of up to one
hundred eighty days. The commission may prescribe such special rules
and impose special terms and conditions on the granting of the
certificate as in its judgment are reasonable and necessary in carrying
out this chapter. The commission shall collect a filing fee, not to
exceed two hundred dollars, for each application for a temporary
certificate. The commission shall not issue a temporary certificate to
operate on a route for which a certificate has been issued or for which
an application by another commercial ferry operator is pending.
During a state of emergency declared under RCW 43.06.010(12), the
governor may waive or suspend the operation or enforcement of this
section or any portion of this section or under any administrative
rule, and issue any orders to facilitate the operation of state or
local government or to promote and secure the safety and protection of
the civilian population.

PART V
COLLECTION OF TAXES
Sec. 501 RCW 82.32.050 and 2007 c 111 s 106 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If upon examination of any returns or from other information
obtained by the department it appears that a tax or penalty has been
paid less than that properly due, the department shall assess against
the taxpayer such additional amount found to be due and shall add
thereto interest on the tax only. The department shall notify the
taxpayer by mail, or electronically as provided in RCW 82.32.135, of
the additional amount and the additional amount shall become due and
shall be paid within thirty days from the date of the notice, or within
such further time as the department may provide.
(a) For tax liabilities arising before January 1, 1992, interest
shall be computed at the rate of nine percent per annum from the last
day of the year in which the deficiency is incurred until the earlier
of December 31, 1998, or the date of payment. After December 31, 1998,
the rate of interest shall be variable and computed as provided in
subsection (2) of this section. The rate so computed shall be adjusted
on the first day of January of each year for use in computing interest
for that calendar year.
(b) For tax liabilities arising after December 31, 1991, the rate
of interest shall be variable and computed as provided in subsection
(2) of this section from the last day of the year in which the
deficiency is incurred until the date of payment. The rate so computed
shall be adjusted on the first day of January of each year for use in
computing interest for that calendar year.
(c) Interest imposed after December 31, 1998, shall be computed
from the last day of the month following each calendar year included in
a notice, and the last day of the month following the final month
included in a notice if not the end of a calendar year, until the due
date of the notice. If payment in full is not made by the due date of
the notice, additional interest shall be computed until the date of
payment. The rate of interest shall be variable and computed as
provided in subsection (2) of this section. The rate so computed shall
be adjusted on the first day of January of each year for use in
computing interest for that calendar year.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the rate of interest to be
charged to the taxpayer shall be an average of the federal short-term
rate as defined in 26 U.S.C. Sec. 1274(d) plus two percentage points.
The rate set for each new year shall be computed by taking an
arithmetical average to the nearest percentage point of the federal
short-term rate, compounded annually. That average shall be calculated
using the rates from four months: January, April, and July of the
calendar year immediately preceding the new year, and October of the
previous preceding year.
(3) During a state of emergency declared under RCW 43.06.010(12),
the department, on its own motion or at the request of any taxpayer
affected by the emergency, may extend the due date of any assessment or
correction of an assessment for additional taxes, penalties, or
interest as the department deems proper.
(4) No assessment or correction of an assessment for additional
taxes, penalties, or interest due may be made by the department more
than four years after the close of the tax year, except (a) against a
taxpayer who has not registered as required by this chapter, (b) upon
a showing of fraud or of misrepresentation of a material fact by the
taxpayer, or (c) where a taxpayer has executed a written waiver of such
limitation. The execution of a written waiver shall also extend the
period for making a refund or credit as provided in RCW 82.32.060(2).
(((4))) (5) For the purposes of this section, "return" means any
document a person is required by the state of Washington to file to
satisfy or establish a tax or fee obligation that is administered or
collected by the department of revenue and that has a statutorily
defined due date.

Sec. 502 RCW 82.32.080 and 1999 c 357 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Payment of the tax may be made by uncertified check under such
regulations as the department shall prescribe, but, if a check so
received is not paid by the bank on which it is drawn, the taxpayer, by
whom such check is tendered, shall remain liable for payment of the tax
and for all legal penalties, the same as if such check had not been
tendered.
(2) Payment of the tax shall be made by electronic funds transfer,
as defined in RCW 82.32.085, if the amount of the tax due in a calendar
year is one million eight hundred thousand dollars or more. The
department may by rule provide for tax thresholds between two hundred
forty thousand dollars and one million eight hundred thousand dollars
for mandatory use of electronic funds transfer. All taxes administered
by this chapter are subject to this requirement except the taxes
authorized by chapters 82.14A, 82.14B, 82.24, 82.27, 82.29A, and 84.33
RCW. It is the intent of this section to require electronic funds
transfer for those taxes reported on the department's combined excise
tax return or any successor return.
(3) A return or remittance which is transmitted to the department
by United States mail shall be deemed filed or received on the date
shown by the post office cancellation mark stamped upon the envelope
containing it, except as otherwise provided in this chapter. The
department is authorized to allow electronic filing of returns or
remittances from any taxpayer. A return or remittance which is
transmitted to the department electronically shall be deemed filed or
received according to procedures set forth by the department.
(4)(a)(i) The department, for good cause shown, may extend the time
for making and filing any return, and may grant such reasonable
additional time within which to make and file returns as it may deem
proper, but any permanent extension granting the taxpayer a reporting
date without penalty more than ten days beyond the due date, and any
extension in excess of thirty days shall be conditional on deposit with
the department of an amount to be determined by the department which
shall be approximately equal to the estimated tax liability for the
reporting period or periods for which the extension is granted. In the
case of a permanent extension or a temporary extension of more than
thirty days the deposit shall be deposited within the state treasury
with other tax funds and a credit recorded to the taxpayer's account
which may be applied to taxpayer's liability upon cancellation of the
permanent extension or upon reporting of the tax liability where an
extension of more than thirty days has been granted.
(ii) The department shall review the requirement for deposit at
least annually and may require a change in the amount of the deposit
required when it believes that such amount does not approximate the tax
liability for the reporting period or periods for which the extension
is granted.
(b) During a state of emergency declared under RCW 43.06.010(12),
the department, on its own motion or at the request of any taxpayer
affected by the emergency, may extend the time for making or filing any
return as the department deems proper. The department may not require
any deposit as a condition for granting an extension under this
subsection (4)(b).
(5) The department shall keep full and accurate records of all
funds received and disbursed by it. Subject to the provisions of RCW
82.32.105 and 82.32.350, the department shall apply the payment of the
taxpayer first against penalties and interest, and then upon the tax,
without regard to any direction of the taxpayer.
(6) The department may refuse to accept any return which is not
accompanied by a remittance of the tax shown to be due thereon. When
such return is not accepted, the taxpayer shall be deemed to have
failed or refused to file a return and shall be subject to the
procedures provided in RCW 82.32.100 and to the penalties provided in
RCW 82.32.090. The above authority to refuse to accept a return shall
not apply when a return is timely filed and a timely payment has been
made by electronic funds transfer.

Sec. 503 RCW 82.32.140 and 2007 c 111 s 109 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Whenever any taxpayer quits business, or sells out, exchanges,
or otherwise disposes of more than fifty percent of the fair market
value of either its tangible or intangible assets, any tax payable
hereunder shall become immediately due and payable, and such taxpayer
shall, within ten days thereafter, make a return and pay the tax due,
unless an extension is granted under RCW 82.32.080.
(2) Any person who becomes a successor shall withhold from the
purchase price a sum sufficient to pay any tax due from the taxpayer
until such time as the taxpayer shall produce a receipt from the
department of revenue showing payment in full of any tax due or a
certificate that no tax is due. If any tax is not paid by the taxpayer
within ten days from the date of such sale, exchange, or disposal, the
successor shall become liable for the payment of the full amount of
tax. If the fair market value of the assets acquired by a successor is
less than fifty thousand dollars, the successor's liability for payment
of the unpaid tax is limited to the fair market value of the assets
acquired from the taxpayer. The burden of establishing the fair market
value of the assets acquired is on the successor.
(3) The payment of any tax by a successor shall, to the extent
thereof, be deemed a payment upon the purchase price; and if such
payment is greater in amount than the purchase price the amount of the
difference shall become a debt due the successor from the taxpayer.
(4) No successor shall be liable for any tax due from the person
from whom the successor has acquired a business or stock of goods if
the successor gives written notice to the department of revenue of such
acquisition and no assessment is issued by the department of revenue
within six months of receipt of such notice against the former operator
of the business and a copy thereof mailed to the successor or provided
electronically to the successor in accordance with RCW 82.32.135.

Sec. 504 RCW 83.100.050 and 2005 c 516 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A Washington return must be filed if: (a) A federal return is
required to be filed; or (b) for decedents dying prior to January 1,
2006, the gross estate exceeds one million five hundred thousand
dollars; or (c) for decedents dying on or after January 1, 2006, the
gross estate exceeds two million dollars.
(2)(a) A person required to file a federal return shall file with
the department on or before the date the federal return is required to
be filed, including any extension of time for filing under subsection
(4) or (6) of this section, a Washington return for the tax due under
this chapter.
(b) If no federal return is required to be filed, a taxpayer shall
file with the department on or before the date a federal return would
have been required to be filed, including any extension of time for
filing under subsection (5) or (6) of this section, a Washington return
for the tax due under this chapter.
(3) A Washington return delivered to the department by United
States mail shall be considered to have been received by the department
on the date of the United States postmark stamped on the cover in which
the return is mailed, if the postmark date is within the time allowed
for filing the Washington return, including extensions.
(4) In addition to the Washington return required to be filed in
subsection (2) of this section, a person, if required to file a federal
return, shall file with the department on or before the date the
federal return((,)) is required to be filed a copy of the federal
return along with all supporting documentation. If the person required
to file the federal return has obtained an extension of time for filing
the federal return, the person shall file the Washington return within
the same time period and in the same manner as provided for the federal
return. A copy of the federal extension shall be filed with the
department on or before the date the Washington return is due, not
including any extension of time for filing, or within thirty days of
issuance, whichever is later.
(5) A person ((who is required to file a Washington return under
subsection (2) of this section, but is not required to file a federal
return,)) may obtain an extension of time for filing the Washington
return as provided by rule of the department, if the person is required
to file a Washington return under subsection (2) of this section, but
is not required to file a federal return.
(6) During a state of emergency declared under RCW 43.06.010(12),
the department, on its own motion or at the request of any taxpayer
affected by the emergency, may extend the time for filing a Washington
return under this section as the department deems proper.

Sec. 505 RCW 82.36.031 and 2007 c 515 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For the purpose of determining the amount of liability for the
tax imposed under this chapter, and to periodically update license
information, each licensee, other than a motor vehicle fuel distributor
or an international fuel tax agreement licensee, shall file monthly tax
reports with the department, on a form prescribed by the department.
An international fuel tax licensee shall file quarterly tax reports
with the department, on a form prescribed by the department.
(2) A report shall be filed with the department even though no
motor vehicle fuel tax is due for the reporting period. Each tax
report shall contain a declaration by the person making the same, to
the effect that the statements contained therein are true and made
under penalties of perjury, which declaration has the same force and
effect as a verification of the report and is in lieu of the
verification. The report shall show information as the department may
require for the proper administration and enforcement of this chapter.
Tax reports shall be filed on or before the twenty-fifth day of the
next succeeding calendar month following the period to which the
reports relate. If the final filing date falls on a Saturday, Sunday,
or legal holiday the next secular or business day shall be the final
filing date.
(3) The department, if it deems it necessary in order to ensure
payment of the tax imposed under this chapter, or to facilitate the
administration of this chapter, may require the filing of reports and
tax remittances at shorter intervals than one month.
(4) During a state of emergency declared under RCW 43.06.010(12),
the department, on its own motion or at the request of any taxpayer
affected by the emergency, may extend the time for filing any report or
the due date for tax remittances as the department deems proper.

Sec. 506 RCW 82.38.150 and 2007 c 515 s 28 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For the purpose of determining the amount of liability for the
tax herein imposed, and to periodically update license information,
each licensee, other than a special fuel distributor, an international
fuel tax agreement licensee, or a dyed special fuel user, shall file
monthly tax reports with the department, on forms prescribed by the
department.
(2) Dyed special fuel users whose estimated yearly tax liability is
two hundred fifty dollars or less, shall file a report yearly, and dyed
special fuel users whose estimated yearly tax liability is more than
two hundred fifty dollars, shall file reports quarterly. Special fuel
users licensed under the international fuel tax agreement shall file
reports quarterly. Heating oil dealers subject to the pollution
liability insurance agency fee and reporting requirements shall remit
pollution liability insurance agency returns and any associated payment
due to the department annually.
(3) The department shall establish the reporting frequency for each
applicant at the time the special fuel license is issued. If it
becomes apparent that any licensee is not reporting in accordance with
the above schedule, the department shall change the licensee's
reporting frequency by giving thirty days' notice to the licensee by
mail to the licensee's address of record. A report shall be filed with
the department even though no special fuel was used, or tax is due, for
the reporting period. Each tax report shall contain a declaration by
the person making the same, to the effect that the statements contained
therein are true and are made under penalties of perjury, which
declaration shall have the same force and effect as a verification of
the report and is in lieu of such verification. The report shall show
such information as the department may reasonably require for the
proper administration and enforcement of this chapter. A licensee
shall file a tax report on or before the twenty-fifth day of the next
succeeding calendar month following the period to which it relates.
(4) Subject to the written approval of the department, tax reports
may cover a period ending on a day other than the last day of the
calendar month. Taxpayers granted approval to file reports in this
manner will file such reports on or before the twenty-fifth day
following the end of the reporting period. No change to this reporting
period will be made without the written authorization of the
department.
(5) If the final filing date falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or legal
holiday the next secular or business day shall be the final filing
date. Such reports shall be considered filed or received on the date
shown by the post office cancellation mark stamped upon an envelope
containing such report properly addressed to the department, or on the
date it was mailed if proof satisfactory to the department is available
to establish the date it was mailed.
(6) The department, if it deems it necessary in order to insure
payment of the tax imposed by this chapter, or to facilitate the
administration of this chapter, has the authority to require the filing
of reports and tax remittances at shorter intervals than one month if,
in its opinion, an existing bond has become insufficient.
(7) During a state of emergency declared under RCW 43.06.010(12),
the department, on its own motion or at the request of any taxpayer
affected by the emergency, may extend the time for filing any report or
the due date for tax remittances as the department deems proper.

Sec. 507 RCW 82.42.040 and 1996 c 104 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
The director shall by rule and regulation adopted as provided in
chapter 34.05 RCW (Administrative Procedure Act) set up the necessary
administrative procedure for collection by the department of the
aircraft fuel excise tax as provided for in RCW 82.42.020, placing the
responsibility of collection of said tax upon every distributor of
aircraft fuel within the state; he may require the licensing of every
distributor of aircraft fuel and shall require such a corporate surety
bond or security of any distributor or person not otherwise bonded
under provisions of chapter 82.36 RCW as is provided for distributors
of motor vehicle fuel under RCW 82.36.060; he shall provide such forms
and may require such reports or statements as in his determination
shall be necessary for the proper administration of this chapter. The
director may require such records to be kept, and for such periods of
time, as deemed necessary for the administration of this chapter, which
records shall be available at all times for the director or his
representative who may require a statement under oath as to the
contents thereof. During a state of emergency declared under RCW
43.06.010(12), the director, on his or her own motion or at the request
of any taxpayer affected by the emergency, may extend the time for
filing any report or the due date for tax remittances as the director
deems proper.
Every application for a distributor's license must contain the
following information to the extent it applies to the applicant:
(1) Proof as the department may require concerning the applicant's
identity, including but not limited to his or her fingerprints or those
of the officers of a corporation making the application;
(2) The applicant's form and place of organization including proof
that the individual, partnership, or corporation is licensed to do
business in this state;
(3) The qualification and business history of the applicant and any
partner, officer, or director;
(4) The applicant's financial condition or history including a bank
reference and whether the applicant or any partner, officer, or
director has ever been adjudged bankrupt or has an unsatisfied judgment
in a federal or state court;
(5) Whether the applicant has been adjudged guilty of a crime that
directly relates to the business for which the license is sought and
the time elapsed since the conviction is less than ten years, or has
suffered a judgment within the preceding five years in a civil action
involving fraud, misrepresentation, or conversion and in the case of a
corporation or partnership, all directors, officers, or partners.
After receipt of an application for a license, the director may
conduct an investigation to determine whether the facts set forth are
true. The director may require a fingerprint record check of the
applicant through the Washington state patrol criminal identification
system and the federal bureau of investigation before issuance of a
license. The results of the background investigation including
criminal history information may be released to authorized department
personnel as the director deems necessary. The department shall charge
a license holder or license applicant a fee of fifty dollars for each
background investigation conducted.
An applicant who makes a false statement of a material fact on the
application may be prosecuted for false swearing as defined by RCW
9A.72.040.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 508 A new section is added to chapter 82.50
RCW to read as follows:
During a state of emergency declared under RCW 43.06.010(12), the
director, on his or her own motion or at the request of any taxpayer
affected by the emergency, may grant extensions of the due date of any
taxes payable under this chapter as the director deems proper.

Sec. 509 RCW 84.56.020 and 2007 c 105 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The county treasurer shall be the receiver and collector of all
taxes extended upon the tax rolls of the county, whether levied for
state, county, school, bridge, road, municipal or other purposes, and
also of all fines, forfeitures or penalties received by any person or
officer for the use of his or her county. No treasurer shall accept
tax payments or issue receipts for the same until the treasurer has
completed the tax roll for the current year's collection and provided
notification of the completion of the roll. Notification may be
accomplished electronically, by posting a notice in the office, or
through other written communication as determined by the treasurer.
All taxes upon real and personal property made payable by the
provisions of this title shall be due and payable to the treasurer on
or before the thirtieth day of April and, except as provided in this
section, shall be delinquent after that date.
(2) Each tax statement shall include a notice that checks for
payment of taxes may be made payable to "Treasurer of . . . . . .
County" or other appropriate office, but tax statements shall not
include any suggestion that checks may be made payable to the name of
the individual holding the office of treasurer nor any other
individual.
(3) When the total amount of tax or special assessments on personal
property or on any lot, block or tract of real property payable by one
person is fifty dollars or more, and if one-half of such tax be paid on
or before the thirtieth day of April, the remainder of such tax shall
be due and payable on or before the thirty-first day of October
following and shall be delinquent after that date.
(4) When the total amount of tax or special assessments on any lot,
block or tract of real property or on any mobile home payable by one
person is fifty dollars or more, and if one-half of such tax be paid
after the thirtieth day of April but before the thirty-first day of
October, together with the applicable interest and penalty on the full
amount of tax payable for that year, the remainder of such tax shall be
due and payable on or before the thirty-first day of October following
and shall be delinquent after that date.
(5) Delinquent taxes under this section are subject to interest at
the rate of twelve percent per annum computed on a monthly basis on the
full year amount of tax unpaid from the date of delinquency until paid.
Interest shall be calculated at the rate in effect at the time of
payment of the tax, regardless of when the taxes were first delinquent.
In addition, delinquent taxes under this section are subject to
penalties as follows:
(a) A penalty of three percent of the full year amount of tax
unpaid shall be assessed on the tax delinquent on June 1st of the year
in which the tax is due.
(b) An additional penalty of eight percent shall be assessed on the
amount of tax delinquent on December 1st of the year in which the tax
is due.
(6) Subsection (5) of this section notwithstanding, no interest or
penalties may be assessed during any period of armed conflict on
delinquent taxes imposed on the personal residences owned by active
duty military personnel who are participating as part of one of the
branches of the military involved in the conflict and assigned to a
duty station outside the territorial boundaries of the United States.
(7) During a state of emergency declared under RCW 43.06.010(12),
the county treasurer, on his or her own motion or at the request of any
taxpayer affected by the emergency, may grant extensions of the due
date of any taxes payable under this section as the treasurer deems
proper.
(8) For purposes of this chapter, "interest" means both interest
and penalties.
(((8))) (9) All collections of interest on delinquent taxes shall
be credited to the county current expense fund; but the cost of
foreclosure and sale of real property, and the fees and costs of
distraint and sale of personal property, for delinquent taxes, shall,
when collected, be credited to the operation and maintenance fund of
the county treasurer prosecuting the foreclosure or distraint or sale;
and shall be used by the county treasurer as a revolving fund to defray
the cost of further foreclosure, distraint and sale for delinquent
taxes without regard to budget limitations.

Sec. 510 RCW 84.56.440 and 1993 c 33 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of revenue shall collect all ad valorem taxes
upon ships and vessels listed with the department in accordance with
RCW 84.40.065 and all applicable interest and penalties.
The taxes shall be due and payable to the department on or before
the thirtieth day of April and shall be delinquent after that date.
(2) If payment of the tax is not received by the department by the
due date, there shall be imposed a penalty of five percent of the
amount of the tax; and if the tax is not received within thirty days
after the due date, there shall be imposed a total penalty of ten
percent of the amount of the tax; and if the tax is not received within
sixty days after the due date, there shall be imposed a total penalty
of twenty percent of the amount of the tax. No penalty so added shall
be less than five dollars.
(3) Delinquent taxes under this section are subject to interest at
the rate set forth in RCW 82.32.050 from the date of delinquency until
paid. Interest or penalties collected on delinquent taxes under this
section shall be paid by the department into the general fund of the
state treasury.
(4) If upon information obtained by the department it appears that
any ship or vessel required to be listed according to the provisions of
RCW 84.40.065 is not so listed, the department shall value the ship or
vessel and assess against the owner of the vessel the taxes found to be
due and shall add thereto interest at the rate set forth in RCW
82.32.050 from the original due date of the tax until the date of
payment. The department shall notify the vessel owner by mail of the
amount and the same shall become due and shall be paid by the vessel
owner within thirty days of the date of the notice. If payment is not
received by the department by the due date specified in the notice, the
department shall add a penalty of ten percent of the tax found due. A
person who willfully gives a false listing or willfully fails to list
a ship or vessel as required by RCW 84.40.065 shall be subject to the
penalty imposed by RCW 84.40.130(2), which shall be assessed and
collected by the department.
(5) Delinquent taxes under this section, along with all penalties
and interest thereon, shall be collected by the department according to
the procedures set forth in chapter 82.32 RCW for the filing and
execution of tax warrants, including the imposition of warrant
interest. In the event a warrant is issued by the department for the
collection of taxes under this section, the department shall add a
penalty of five percent of the amount of the delinquent tax, but not
less than ten dollars.
(6) The department shall also collect all delinquent taxes
pertaining to ships and vessels appearing on the records of the county
treasurers for each of the counties of this state as of December 31,
1993, including any applicable interest or penalties. The provisions
of subsection (5) of this section shall apply to the collection of such
delinquent taxes.
(7) During a state of emergency declared under RCW 43.06.010(12),
the department, on its own motion or at the request of any taxpayer
affected by the emergency, may grant extensions of the due date of any
taxes payable under this section as the department deems proper.

PART VI
INDUSTRIAL ALCOHOL
Sec. 601 RCW 66.20.010 and 1998 c 126 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon application in the prescribed form being made to any employee
authorized by the board to issue permits, accompanied by payment of the
prescribed fee, and upon the employee being satisfied that the
applicant should be granted a permit under this title, the employee
shall issue to the applicant under such regulations and at such fee as
may be prescribed by the board a permit of the class applied for, as
follows:
(1) Where the application is for a special permit by a physician or
dentist, or by any person in charge of an institution regularly
conducted as a hospital or sanitorium for the care of persons in ill
health, or as a home devoted exclusively to the care of aged people, a
special liquor purchase permit, except that the governor may waive the
requirement for a special liquor purchase permit under this subsection
pursuant to an order issued under RCW 43.06.220(2);
(2) Where the application is for a special permit by a person
engaged within the state in mechanical or manufacturing business or in
scientific pursuits requiring alcohol for use therein, or by any
private individual, a special permit to purchase alcohol for the
purpose named in the permit;
(3) Where the application is for a special permit to consume liquor
at a banquet, at a specified date and place, a special permit to
purchase liquor for consumption at such banquet, to such applicants as
may be fixed by the board;
(4) Where the application is for a special permit to consume liquor
on the premises of a business not licensed under this title, a special
permit to purchase liquor for consumption thereon for such periods of
time and to such applicants as may be fixed by the board;
(5) Where the application is for a special permit by a manufacturer
to import or purchase within the state alcohol, malt, and other
materials containing alcohol to be used in the manufacture of liquor,
or other products, a special permit;
(6) Where the application is for a special permit by a person
operating a drug store to purchase liquor at retail prices only, to be
thereafter sold by such person on the prescription of a physician, a
special liquor purchase permit;
(7) Where the application is for a special permit by an authorized
representative of a military installation operated by or for any of the
armed forces within the geographical boundaries of the state of
Washington, a special permit to purchase liquor for use on such
military installation at prices to be fixed by the board;
(8) Where the application is for a special permit by a
manufacturer, importer, or distributor, or representative thereof, to
serve liquor without charge to delegates and guests at a convention of
a trade association composed of licensees of the board, when the said
liquor is served in a hospitality room or from a booth in a board-approved suppliers' display room at the convention, and when the liquor
so served is for consumption in the said hospitality room or display
room during the convention, anything in Title 66 RCW to the contrary
notwithstanding. Any such spirituous liquor shall be purchased from
the board or a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensee and any such
beer and wine shall be subject to the taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.290
and 66.24.210;
(9) Where the application is for a special permit by a
manufacturer, importer, or distributor, or representative thereof, to
donate liquor for a reception, breakfast, luncheon, or dinner for
delegates and guests at a convention of a trade association composed of
licensees of the board, when the liquor so donated is for consumption
at the said reception, breakfast, luncheon, or dinner during the
convention, anything in Title 66 RCW to the contrary notwithstanding.
Any such spirituous liquor shall be purchased from the board or a
spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensee and any such beer and wine
shall be subject to the taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.290 and 66.24.210;
(10) Where the application is for a special permit by a
manufacturer, importer, or distributor, or representative thereof, to
donate and/or serve liquor without charge to delegates and guests at an
international trade fair, show, or exposition held under the auspices
of a federal, state, or local governmental entity or organized and
promoted by a nonprofit organization, anything in Title 66 RCW to the
contrary notwithstanding. Any such spirituous liquor shall be
purchased from the board and any such beer or wine shall be subject to
the taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.290 and 66.24.210;
(11) Where the application is for an annual special permit by a
person operating a bed and breakfast lodging facility to donate or
serve wine or beer without charge to overnight guests of the facility
if the wine or beer is for consumption on the premises of the facility.
"Bed and breakfast lodging facility," as used in this subsection, means
a hotel or similar facility offering from one to eight lodging units
and breakfast to travelers and guests.

Sec. 602 RCW 66.20.010 and 2007 c 370 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon application in the prescribed form being made to any employee
authorized by the board to issue permits, accompanied by payment of the
prescribed fee, and upon the employee being satisfied that the
applicant should be granted a permit under this title, the employee
shall issue to the applicant under such regulations and at such fee as
may be prescribed by the board a permit of the class applied for, as
follows:
(1) Where the application is for a special permit by a physician or
dentist, or by any person in charge of an institution regularly
conducted as a hospital or sanitorium for the care of persons in ill
health, or as a home devoted exclusively to the care of aged people, a
special liquor purchase permit, except that the governor may waive the
requirement for a special liquor purchase permit under this subsection
pursuant to an order issued under RCW 43.06.220(2);
(2) Where the application is for a special permit by a person
engaged within the state in mechanical or manufacturing business or in
scientific pursuits requiring alcohol for use therein, or by any
private individual, a special permit to purchase alcohol for the
purpose named in the permit;
(3) Where the application is for a special permit to consume liquor
at a banquet, at a specified date and place, a special permit to
purchase liquor for consumption at such banquet, to such applicants as
may be fixed by the board;
(4) Where the application is for a special permit to consume liquor
on the premises of a business not licensed under this title, a special
permit to purchase liquor for consumption thereon for such periods of
time and to such applicants as may be fixed by the board;
(5) Where the application is for a special permit by a manufacturer
to import or purchase within the state alcohol, malt, and other
materials containing alcohol to be used in the manufacture of liquor,
or other products, a special permit;
(6) Where the application is for a special permit by a person
operating a drug store to purchase liquor at retail prices only, to be
thereafter sold by such person on the prescription of a physician, a
special liquor purchase permit;
(7) Where the application is for a special permit by an authorized
representative of a military installation operated by or for any of the
armed forces within the geographical boundaries of the state of
Washington, a special permit to purchase liquor for use on such
military installation at prices to be fixed by the board;
(8) Where the application is for a special permit by a
manufacturer, importer, or distributor, or representative thereof, to
serve liquor without charge to delegates and guests at a convention of
a trade association composed of licensees of the board, when the said
liquor is served in a hospitality room or from a booth in a board-approved suppliers' display room at the convention, and when the liquor
so served is for consumption in the said hospitality room or display
room during the convention, anything in Title 66 RCW to the contrary
notwithstanding. Any such spirituous liquor shall be purchased from
the board or a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensee and any such
beer and wine shall be subject to the taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.290
and 66.24.210;
(9) Where the application is for a special permit by a
manufacturer, importer, or distributor, or representative thereof, to
donate liquor for a reception, breakfast, luncheon, or dinner for
delegates and guests at a convention of a trade association composed of
licensees of the board, when the liquor so donated is for consumption
at the said reception, breakfast, luncheon, or dinner during the
convention, anything in Title 66 RCW to the contrary notwithstanding.
Any such spirituous liquor shall be purchased from the board or a
spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensee and any such beer and wine
shall be subject to the taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.290 and 66.24.210;
(10) Where the application is for a special permit by a
manufacturer, importer, or distributor, or representative thereof, to
donate and/or serve liquor without charge to delegates and guests at an
international trade fair, show, or exposition held under the auspices
of a federal, state, or local governmental entity or organized and
promoted by a nonprofit organization, anything in Title 66 RCW to the
contrary notwithstanding. Any such spirituous liquor shall be
purchased from the board and any such beer or wine shall be subject to
the taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.290 and 66.24.210;
(11) Where the application is for an annual special permit by a
person operating a bed and breakfast lodging facility to donate or
serve wine or beer without charge to overnight guests of the facility
if the wine or beer is for consumption on the premises of the facility.
"Bed and breakfast lodging facility," as used in this subsection, means
a facility offering from one to eight lodging units and breakfast to
travelers and guests.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603 Section 601 of this act expires July 1,
2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604 Section 602 of this act takes effect July
1, 2008.

PART VII
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 701 Part headings used in this act are not any
part of the law.

--- END ---