BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.26.010 and 2005 c 180 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Tobacco products" means cigars, cheroots, stogies, periques,
granulated, plug cut, crimp cut, ready rubbed, and other smoking
tobacco, snuff, snuff flour, cavendish, plug and twist tobacco, fine-cut and other chewing tobaccos, shorts, refuse scraps, clippings,
cuttings and sweepings of tobacco, and other kinds and forms of
tobacco, prepared in such manner as to be suitable for chewing or
smoking in a pipe or otherwise, or both for chewing and smoking, but
shall not include cigarettes as defined in RCW 82.24.010.
(2) "Manufacturer" means a person who manufactures and sells
tobacco products.
(3) "Distributor" means (a) any person engaged in the business of
selling tobacco products in this state who brings, or causes to be
brought, into this state from without the state any tobacco products
for sale, (b) any person who makes, manufactures, fabricates, or stores
tobacco products in this state for sale in this state, (c) any person
engaged in the business of selling tobacco products without this state
who ships or transports tobacco products to retailers in this state, to
be sold by those retailers, (d) any person engaged in the business of
selling tobacco products in this state who handles for sale any tobacco
products that are within this state but upon which tax has not been
imposed.
(4) "Retailer" means any person engaged in the business of selling
tobacco products to ultimate consumers.
(5)(a) "Sale" means any transfer, exchange, or barter, in any
manner or by any means whatsoever, for a consideration, and includes
and means all sales made by any person.
(b) The term "sale" includes a gift by a person engaged in the
business of selling tobacco products, for advertising, promoting, or as
a means of evading the provisions of this chapter.
(6) "Business" means any trade, occupation, activity, or enterprise
engaged in for the purpose of selling or distributing tobacco products
in this state.
(7) "Place of business" means any place where tobacco products are
sold or where tobacco products are manufactured, stored, or kept for
the purpose of sale, including any vessel, vehicle, airplane, train, or
vending machine.
(8) "Retail outlet" means each place of business from which tobacco
products are sold to consumers.
(9) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(10) "Person" means any individual, receiver, administrator,
executor, assignee, trustee in bankruptcy, trust, estate, firm,
copartnership, joint venture, club, company, joint stock company,
business trust, municipal corporation, the state and its departments
and institutions, political subdivision of the state of Washington,
corporation, limited liability company, association, society, any group
of individuals acting as a unit, whether mutual, cooperative,
fraternal, nonprofit, or otherwise. The term excludes any person
immune from state taxation, including the United States or its
instrumentalities, and federally recognized Indian tribes and enrolled
tribal members, conducting business within Indian country.
(11) "Indian country" means the same as defined in chapter 82.24
RCW.
(12) "Actual price" means the total amount of consideration for
which tobacco products are sold, valued in money, whether received in
money or otherwise, including any charges by the seller necessary to
complete the sale such as charges for delivery, freight,
transportation, or handling.
(13) "Affiliated" means related in any way by virtue of any form or
amount of common ownership, control, operation, or management.
(14) "Board" means the liquor control board.
(15) "Cigar" means a roll for smoking that is of any size or shape
and that is made wholly or in part of tobacco, irrespective of whether
the tobacco is pure or flavored, adulterated or mixed with any other
ingredient, if the roll has a wrapper made wholly or in greater part of
tobacco. "Cigar" does not include a cigarette.
(16) "Cigarette" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.24.010.
(17) "Manufacturer's representative" means a person hired by a
manufacturer to sell or distribute the manufacturer's tobacco products,
and includes employees and independent contractors.
(18)(a) "Taxable sales price" means:
(i) In the case of a taxpayer that is not affiliated with the
manufacturer, distributor, or other person from whom the taxpayer
purchased tobacco products, the actual price for which the taxpayer
purchased the tobacco products;
(ii) In the case of a taxpayer that purchases tobacco products from
an affiliated manufacturer, affiliated distributor, or other affiliated
person, and that sells those tobacco products to unaffiliated
distributors, unaffiliated retailers, or ultimate consumers, the actual
price for which that taxpayer sells those tobacco products to
unaffiliated distributors, unaffiliated retailers, or ultimate
consumers;
(iii) In the case of a taxpayer that sells tobacco products only to
affiliated distributors or affiliated retailers, the price, determined
as nearly as possible according to the actual price, that other
distributors sell similar tobacco products of like quality and
character to unaffiliated distributors, unaffiliated retailers, or
ultimate consumers;
(iv) In the case of a taxpayer that is a manufacturer selling
tobacco products directly to ultimate consumers, the actual price for
which the taxpayer sells those tobacco products to ultimate consumers;
(v) In the case of a taxpayer that has acquired tobacco products
under a sale as defined in subsection (5)(b) of this section, the
price, determined as nearly as possible according to the actual price,
that the taxpayer or other distributors sell the same tobacco products
or similar tobacco products of like quality and character to
unaffiliated distributors, unaffiliated retailers, or ultimate
consumers; or
(vi) In any case where (a)(i) through (v) of this subsection do not
apply, the price, determined as nearly as possible according to the
actual price, that the taxpayer or other distributors sell the same
tobacco products or similar tobacco products of like quality and
character to unaffiliated distributors, unaffiliated retailers, or
ultimate consumers.
(b) For purposes of (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection only,
"person" includes both persons as defined in subsection (10) of this
section and any person immune from state taxation, including the United
States or its instrumentalities, and federally recognized Indian tribes
and enrolled tribal members, conducting business within Indian country.
(c) The department may adopt rules regarding the determination of
taxable sales price under this subsection.
(19) "Taxpayer" means a person liable for the tax imposed by this
chapter.
(20) "Unaffiliated distributor" means a distributor that is not
affiliated with the manufacturer, distributor, or other person from
whom the distributor has purchased tobacco products.
(21) "Unaffiliated retailer" means a retailer that is not
affiliated with the manufacturer, distributor, or other person from
whom the retailer has purchased tobacco products.
(22) "Moist snuff" means any finely cut, ground, or powdered
tobacco that is not intended to be smoked but does not include any
finely cut, ground, or powdered tobacco that is intended to be placed
in the nasal cavity.
(23) "Unstamped moist snuff" means any container of moist snuff in
respect to which the tax imposed under section 2 of this act applies
but that does not contain a stamp or other department-approved indicia
of payment of the tax.
(24) "Container" means a single unit of moist snuff, including a
can or package.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.26 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to the tax imposed in RCW 82.26.020, a tax is
imposed on the sale, handling, or distribution of moist snuff in an
amount equal to fifty cents per container.
(2) Taxes under this section are imposed at the time the
distributor:
(a) Brings, or causes to be brought, into this state from without
the state moist snuff for sale;
(b) Makes, manufactures, fabricates, or stores moist snuff in this
state for sale in this state;
(c) Ships or transports moist snuff to retailers in this state, to
be sold by those retailers; or
(d) Handles for sale any moist snuff that is within this state but
upon which tax has not been imposed.
(3) Nothing in this section must be construed to exclude from the
tax imposed in subsection (1) of this section the handling or
distribution of moist snuff in this state that is given away free of
charge by the manufacturer or distributor for promotional or any other
purposes.
(4) The revenue collected under this section must be deposited into
the general fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.26 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, any additional
tax liability arising from a tax increase under this chapter, along
with reports and returns prescribed by the department, are due on or
before the last day of the month in which the increase becomes
effective.
(b) The department may require a different due date to coincide
with the due date of the first return that the taxpayer files to report
its business and occupation tax liability after a tax increase under
this chapter becomes effective.
(2) If not paid by the due date, interest applies to any unpaid
tax. Interest is calculated at the rate as computed under RCW
82.32.050(2) from the date the tax became due until the date of
payment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.26 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (4) and (5) of this section,
payment of the tax imposed in section 2 of this act, or exemption from
such tax, must be evidenced by: (a) Stamps affixed to each container
of moist snuff; or (b) some other indicia of tax payment or exemption
applied to each container of moist snuff, as authorized by the
department.
(2)(a) Stamps or other indicia of tax payment or exemption must be
of the designs and specifications as provided or approved by the
department.
(b) The department may require that stamps or other indicia of tax
payment or exemption be capable of being read by a scanning or similar
device. The department may also require that other indicia of tax
payment or exemption contain the name and address of the distributor,
the date the indicia of tax payment or exemption was affixed to the
container of moist snuff, a serial number or other unique number for
the indicia of tax payment or exemption, and other such information as
the department may by rule require.
(c) Stamps or other indicia of tax payment or exemption must allow
the department or the liquor control board to readily ascertain by
inspection whether or not the tax imposed in section 2 of this act has
been paid or whether an exemption from the tax applies.
(3) The department must provide by rule the method and manner in
which stamps or other indicia of tax payment or exemption are to be
affixed to containers of moist snuff and may provide for the
cancellation of stamps or other indicia of tax payment or exemption.
(4) Where it is established to the department's satisfaction that
it is impractical to affix stamps or other indicia of tax payment or
exemption to individual containers of moist snuff, the department may
authorize the affixing of stamps or other indicia of tax payment or
exemption to containers consisting of multiple units of product.
(5) The department may, by rule, provide that the tax imposed in
section 2 of this act may be paid without the use of stamps or other
indicia of tax payment in connection with a particular type of
transaction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 82.26 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Sections 4(1), 6(3)(a), 7, 8, 9, 11, and 12 of this act
apply when the department determines that it is feasible, based on
existing technology, for distributors and manufacturers to meet the
requirements of section 4(1) of this act. The department must make
reasonable efforts to provide all known affected distributors and
manufacturers notice of its determination that it is technologically
feasible for distributors and manufacturers to meet the requirements of
section 4(1) of this act. Such notice must be made at least ninety
days before the department or liquor control board, as applicable, may
enforce the provisions of sections 4(1), 6(3)(a), 7, 8, 9, 11, and 12
of this act.
(b) The department must solicit input from affected distributors
and manufacturers before making a determination that it is
technologically feasible for distributors and manufacturers to meet the
requirements of section 4(1) of this act.
(2) The department must provide a report to the legislature by
December 31, 2009, if the department determines by that date that it is
not feasible, based on existing technology, for distributors and
manufacturers to meet the requirements of section 4(1) of this act.
The report must provide information about the barriers to implementing
the provisions of section 4(1) of this act, whether any other states
have implemented requirements similar to those imposed in section 4(1)
of this act, whether extending the requirements of section 4(1) of this
act to the tax imposed in RCW 82.26.020 would improve tax
administration, and any other information that the department believes
will be useful to the legislature in evaluating legislative options
regarding the requirements in section 4(1) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 82.26 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department must have as many stamps printed as necessary
for distributors to meet the requirements in section 4(1) of this act.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, only a
distributor or manufacturer may cause stamps or other department-approved indicia of tax payment or exemption to be applied to
containers of moist snuff. A manufacturer that is not subject to the
tax imposed in section 2 of this act with respect to any containers of
moist snuff shipped to distributors in this state may voluntarily apply
department-approved indicia of tax payment on such containers, if the
manufacturer agrees to collect the tax imposed in section 2 of this act
from the distributors and remit the tax to the department.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, stamps or other
indicia of tax payment or exemption must be affixed:
(a) To containers before a distributor may sell, handle, or
distribute moist snuff in this state; and
(b) In such a manner that the stamps or other indicia of tax
payment or exemption cannot be removed from the container without being
mutilated or destroyed.
(4) Only distributors licensed under this chapter may purchase or
obtain stamps, and licensed distributors may not sell or provide stamps
to any other licensed distributor or person.
(5) Each roll of stamps, or group of sheets, must have a separate
serial number, which must be legible at the point of sale. The
department must keep records of which distributor purchases each roll
or group of sheets. If the department permits distributors to purchase
partial rolls or sheets, in no case may stamps bearing the same serial
number be sold to more than one distributor. The remainder of the roll
or sheet, if any, must either be retained for later purchases by the
same distributor or destroyed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 82.26 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as authorized by this chapter, no person other than a
licensed distributor may possess unstamped moist snuff within this
state for sale, handling, or distribution.
(2)(a) Every distributor licensed under this chapter may possess
within this state unstamped moist snuff for such period of time after
receipt as is reasonably necessary to affix the stamps or other indicia
of tax payment or exemption as required by this chapter.
(b) Any distributor licensed under this chapter, that has furnished
a surety bond in a sum satisfactory to the department, is permitted to
set aside, without affixing the stamps or other indicia of tax payment
or exemption required by this chapter, such part of the distributor's
stock of moist snuff as may be necessary for the conduct of the
distributor's business in making sales of the type described in RCW
82.26.110(1)(a). Such stock must be kept separate and apart from stock
that is stamped or otherwise contains department-approved indicia of
tax payment or exemption.
(3) Every distributor licensed under this chapter must, at the time
of shipping or delivering moist snuff to a point outside of this state
or to the United States or any of its agencies or instrumentalities or
to any Indian tribal organization as defined in RCW 82.26.110, make a
copy of the invoice or delivery documentation, which must show full and
complete details of the sale or delivery, whether or not stamps or
other indicia of tax payment or exemption were affixed to the moist
snuff, and must transmit the duplicate invoice to the department, not
later than the fifteenth day of the following calendar month. If a
distributor fails to comply with the requirements of this subsection,
the department may revoke the permission granted under subsection
(2)(b) of this section to maintain a stock of unstamped moist snuff.
(4) Unstamped moist snuff possessed by a distributor under
subsection (2) of this section that is transferred by the distributor
to another facility of the distributor within the borders of Washington
must be transferred in compliance with RCW 82.26.140.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 82.26 RCW
to read as follows:
No retailer in this state may possess unstamped moist snuff within
this state unless the person is also a distributor licensed under this
chapter and is in possession of the moist snuff in accordance with
section 7 of this act.

Sec. 9 RCW 82.26.190 and 2005 c 180 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) No person may engage in or conduct business as a distributor
or retailer in this state after September 30, 2005, without a valid
license issued by the department under this chapter. Any person who
sells tobacco products to persons other than ultimate consumers or who
meets the definition of distributor under RCW 82.26.010(3)(d) must
obtain a distributor's license under this chapter. Any person who
sells tobacco products to ultimate consumers must obtain a retailer's
license under this chapter.
(b) It is unlawful to forge or counterfeit any stamp or other
indicia of payment of, or exemption from, the tax imposed in section 2
of this act.
(c) A violation of this subsection (1) is punishable as a class C
felony according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(2)(a) No person engaged in or conducting business as a distributor
or retailer in this state may:
(i) Refuse to allow the department or the board, on demand, to make
a full inspection of any place of business where any of the tobacco
products taxed under this chapter are sold, stored, or handled, or
otherwise hinder or prevent such inspection;
(ii) Make, use, or present or exhibit to the department or the
board any invoice for any of the tobacco products taxed under this
chapter that bears an untrue date or falsely states the nature or
quantity of the goods invoiced; or
(iii) Fail to produce on demand of the department or the board all
invoices of all the tobacco products taxed under this chapter within
five years prior to such demand unless the person can show by
satisfactory proof that the nonproduction of the invoices was due to
causes beyond the person's control.
(b) No person, other than a licensed distributor or retailer, may
transport tobacco products for sale in this state for which the taxes
imposed under this chapter have not been paid unless:
(i) Notice of the transportation has been given as required under
RCW 82.26.140;
(ii) The person transporting the tobacco products actually
possesses invoices or delivery tickets showing the true name and
address of the consignor or seller, the true name and address of the
consignee or purchaser, and the quantity and brands of tobacco products
being transported; and
(iii) The tobacco products are consigned to or purchased by a
person in this state who is licensed under this chapter.
(c) No person, as defined in RCW 82.26.010(18)(b) may:
(i) Possess in this state stamps not affixed to any container of
moist snuff, whether such stamps are genuine or counterfeit, other than
the department, its duly authorized agent, or licensed distributors who
have lawfully purchased or obtained the stamps; or
(ii) Affix any stamp or other indicia of tax payment or exemption
to any container of moist snuff, if the stamp or other indicia of tax
payment or exemption is not genuine.
(d) A violation of this subsection (2) is a gross misdemeanor.
(3) Any person licensed under this chapter as a distributor, and
any person licensed under this chapter as a retailer, shall not operate
in any other capacity unless the additional appropriate license is
first secured. A violation of this subsection (3) is a misdemeanor.
(4) The penalties provided in this section are in addition to any
other penalties provided by law for violating the provisions of this
chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter.

Sec. 10 RCW 82.26.030 and 2005 c 180 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is the intent and purpose of this chapter to levy a tax on
all tobacco products sold, ((used, consumed,)) handled, or distributed
within this state and to collect the tax from the distributor as
defined in RCW 82.26.010. It is the further intent and purpose of this
chapter to impose the tax once, and only once, on all tobacco products
((for sale)) sold, handled, or distributed in this state, but nothing
in this chapter shall be construed to exempt any person taxable under
any other law or under any other tax imposed under Title 82 RCW. It is
the further intent and purpose of this chapter that the distributor who
first possesses the tobacco product in this state shall be the
distributor liable for the tax and that in most instances the tax
imposed in RCW 82.26.020 will be based on the actual price that the
distributor paid for the tobacco product, unless the distributor is
affiliated with the seller.
(2) In the event of a rate or other increase in the tax imposed
under this chapter, it is the intent of the legislature that the first
person who sells, handles, or distributes previously taxed articles
after the effective date of the rate or other tax increase is liable
for the additional tax. The failure to pay the additional tax with
respect to the first taxable event after the effective date of a rate
increase does not prevent tax liability for the additional tax from
arising from a subsequent taxable event.

Sec. 11 RCW 82.26.230 and 2005 c 180 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any tobacco products in the possession of a person selling
tobacco products in this state acting as a distributor or retailer and
who is not licensed as required under RCW 82.26.190, or a person who is
selling tobacco products in violation of RCW 82.26.220(6), may be
seized without a warrant by any agent of the department, agent of the
board, or law enforcement officer of this state. Any tobacco products
seized under this subsection shall be deemed forfeited.
(2) Any tobacco products in the possession of a person who is not
a licensed distributor or retailer and who transports tobacco products
for sale without having provided notice to the board required under RCW
82.26.140, or without invoices or delivery tickets showing the true
name and address of the consignor or seller, the true name and address
of the consignee or purchaser, and the quantity and brands of tobacco
products being transported may be seized and are subject to forfeiture.
(3) Any moist snuff found at any point within this state that does
not have the stamps or other indicia of tax payment or exemption
affixed to the containers in violation of the requirements of this
chapter may be seized and is subject to forfeiture.
(4) All conveyances, including aircraft, vehicles, or vessels that
are used, or intended for use to transport, or in any manner to
facilitate the transportation, for the purpose of sale or receipt of
tobacco products under subsection (2) of this section, may be seized
and are subject to forfeiture except:
(a) A conveyance used by any person as a common or contract carrier
having in actual possession invoices or delivery tickets showing the
true name and address of the consignor or seller, the true name of the
consignee or purchaser, and the quantity and brands of the tobacco
products transported, unless it appears that the owner or other person
in charge of the conveyance is a consenting party or privy to a
violation of this chapter;
(b) A conveyance subject to forfeiture under this section by reason
of any act or omission of which the owner establishes to have been
committed or omitted without his or her knowledge or consent; or
(c) A conveyance encumbered by a bona fide security interest if the
secured party neither had knowledge of nor consented to the act or
omission.
(((4))) (5) Property subject to forfeiture under subsections (2)
and (((3))) (4) of this section may be seized by any agent of the
department, the board, or law enforcement officer of this state upon
process issued by any superior court or district court having
jurisdiction over the property. Seizure without process may be made
if:
(a) The seizure is incident to an arrest or a search warrant or an
inspection under an administrative inspection warrant; or
(b) The department, board, or law enforcement officer has probable
cause to believe that the property was used or is intended to be used
in violation of this chapter and exigent circumstances exist making
procurement of a search warrant impracticable.
(((5))) (6) This section shall not be construed to require the
seizure of tobacco products if the department's agent, board's agent,
or law enforcement officer reasonably believes that the tobacco
products are possessed for personal consumption by the person in
possession of the tobacco products.
(((6))) (7) Any tobacco products seized by a law enforcement
officer shall be turned over to the board as soon as practicable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 82.26 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department may adopt rules providing for the refund to
distributors for tax paid in respect to containers of moist snuff to
which stamps or other indicia of tax payment have been affixed, when
any of the circumstances described in RCW 82.26.110(1)(a) apply to the
moist snuff.
(2) Compensation received under section 13 of this act must be
deducted from any refund provided under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The department may redeem any unused stamps purchased from it
or its authorized agent at the face value of the stamps, less the
affixing compensation authorized under section 13 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 82.26 RCW
to read as follows:
Distributors that are subject to the tax imposed in section 2 of
this act and are required to affix stamps or some other indicia of tax
payment on containers of moist snuff are allowed as compensation for
their services in affixing the stamps or other indicia of tax payment
a sum computed at the rate of six dollars per one thousand stamps or
other indicia affixed by them.

Sec. 14 RCW 82.04.601 and 2007 c 221 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to compensation allowed under:
(a) RCW 82.24.295 for wholesalers and retailers for their services
in affixing the stamps required under chapter 82.24 RCW; and
(b) Section 13 of this act for distributors, as defined in RCW
82.26.010, for their services in affixing the stamps or other indicia
of tax payment required under chapter 82.26 RCW.
(2) For purposes of subsection (1)(a) of this section,
"wholesaler," "retailer," and "stamp" have the same meaning as in
chapter 82.24 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 This act takes effect July 1, 2008.

--- END ---