BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.250.080 and 2007 c 253 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each applicant and license holder must comply with
administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees under
RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280 and subsection (2) of this section. The
secretary shall furnish a license to any person who applies and who has
qualified under the provisions of this chapter.
(2) The secretary must collect fees under this chapter as follows:
(a) Application fee, one hundred seventy-five dollars;
(b) Renewal fee, two hundred dollars;
(c) Late renewal penalty fee, two hundred dollars;
(d) Expired license reactivation fee, one hundred dollars;
(e) Inactive license reactivation fee, forty dollars;
(f) Duplicate license copy fee, fifteen dollars; and
(g) License verification fee, twenty-five dollars.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.260.020 and 2007 c 269 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) No person may practice or represent himself or herself as a
registered dental assistant by use of any title or description without
being registered by the commission as having met the standards
established for registration under this chapter unless he or she is
exempt under RCW 18.260.110.
(b) The secretary must collect the following fees from persons
seeking or maintaining the status of a registered dental assistant
under this chapter:
(i) Application fee, forty dollars; and
(ii) Renewal fee, twenty dollars.
(2)(a) No person may practice or represent himself or herself as a
licensed expanded function dental auxiliary by use of any title or
description without being licensed by the commission under this chapter
unless he or she is exempt under RCW 18.260.110.
(b) The secretary must collect the following fees from persons
seeking or maintaining the status of a licensed expanded function
dental auxiliary under this chapter:
(i) Application fee, one hundred seventy-five dollars; and
(ii) Renewal fee, one hundred sixty dollars.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.74.030 and 2007 c 98 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An applicant for a license as a physical therapist shall have
the following minimum qualifications:
(a) Be of good moral character; and
(b) Have obtained either (i) a baccalaureate degree in physical
therapy from an institution of higher learning approved by the board or
(ii) a baccalaureate degree from an institution of higher learning and
a certificate or advanced degree from a school of physical therapy
approved by the board.
(2) An applicant for a license as a physical therapist assistant
must have the following minimum qualifications:
(a) Be of good moral character; ((and))
(b) Have successfully completed a board-approved physical therapist
assistant program; and
(c) Pay a license application fee of one hundred dollars to the
secretary.
(3) The applicant shall present proof of qualification to the board
in the manner and on the forms prescribed by the board.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.74.070 and 2007 c 98 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every licensed physical therapist and physical therapist
assistant shall apply to the secretary for a renewal of the license and
pay ((to the state treasurer)) a fee determined by the secretary as
provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.
(2) Every physical therapist assistant seeking to renew his or her
license must pay a fee to the secretary as follows:
(a) Renewal fee, one hundred twenty-five dollars;
(b) Late renewal fee, sixty-two dollars and fifty cents; and
(c) Expired license reissuance fee, seventy-five dollars.

Sec. 5 RCW 18.74.073 and 2007 c 98 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any physical therapist or physical therapist assistant licensed
under this chapter not practicing physical therapy or providing
services may place his or her license in an inactive status. The board
shall prescribe requirements for maintaining an inactive status and
converting from an inactive or active status. The secretary may
establish fees for alterations in license status.
(2) The secretary must collect the following fees from a physical
therapist assistant seeking to place his or her license on inactive
status:
(a) Inactive status fee, fifty dollars; and
(b) Expired inactive status reissuance fee, seventy-five dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 18.74 RCW
to read as follows:
The secretary must collect the following fees from physical
therapist assistants under this chapter:
(1) Issuance of a duplicate license fee, fifteen dollars; and
(2) Certification of a license fee, twenty-five dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act takes effect July 1, 2008.

--- END ---