BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.68 RCW
to read as follows:
The one Washington road account is created in the motor vehicle
fund. Money in the account shall be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account shall be used only for highway purposes
identified in the omnibus transportation budget and to pay the
principal and interest on the bonds authorized for one Washington road
account projects or improvements. Because state route number 2 between
Everett and Stevens pass continues to experience a disproportionate
number of fatality and serious injury accidents and has been designated
as a safety corridor by the governor, this corridor must receive
priority consideration for any expenditures from this account. For the
purposes of this section "highway purposes" has the same meaning as in
Article II, section 40 of the Washington state Constitution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall deposit into the one Washington road
account all revenue received from taxes imposed under chapters 82.08
and 82.12 RCW, as provided in subsection (2) of this section, upon the
sale of, use of, or charge made for:
(a) Motor vehicles, trailers, and semitrailers used, or of the type
designed primarily to be used, upon the public streets and highways,
for the convenience or pleasure of the owner, or for the conveyance,
for hire, or otherwise of persons or property, including fixed loads
and facilities for human habitation; but not including: (i) Dock and
warehouse tractors and their cars or trailers, lumber carriers of the
type known as spiders, and all other automotive equipment not designed
primarily for use upon public streets or highways, (ii) motor vehicles
or their trailers used entirely upon private property, or (iii) mobile
homes, as defined in RCW 46.04.302;
(b) Travel trailers, as defined in RCW 46.04.623;
(c) Campers, as defined in RCW 46.04.085;
(d) Materials, labor, equipment, contracts, and components used for
building, repairing, or improving of any publicly owned street, place,
road, highway, easement, right-of-way, mass public transportation
terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle as described
in RCW 82.04.050; and
(e) Construction, improvement, or repair of a ferry, ferry
terminal, or other facility operated by the Washington state ferries or
for the repair, overhaul, or the dry docking of any ferry operated by
the Washington state ferries.
(2) The department must deposit revenue received under subsection
(1) of this section into the one Washington road account, created under
section 1 of this act, as follows:
(a) Twenty percent of all revenue received during fiscal year 2008;
(b) Forty percent of all revenue received during fiscal year 2009;
(c) Sixty percent of all revenue received during fiscal year 2010;
(d) Eighty percent of all revenue received during fiscal year 2011;
and
(e) One hundred percent of all revenue received during fiscal year
2012 and thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2008.

--- END ---