BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that: (a) There
is a resurgence of interest by consumers to buy locally grown and
specialty livestock products and a desire by local livestock producers
to develop readily available mechanisms to provide consumers with these
locally produced products;
(b) It has become increasingly difficult particularly for local,
small, and specialty livestock producers to sell meat products to
consumers in quantities that are convenient to and customarily
purchased by consumers;
(c) There is a lack of local slaughtering facilities in the state
that are approved by the United States department of agriculture that
will readily take in small numbers of livestock from small producers
when these meat products are offered for sale to another;
(d) Having a mobile livestock unit available would reduce the miles
a farmer would have to travel, which reduces cost; and
(e) There are large potential markets in urban communities for
locally grown food products whether provided directly from the
producer, through a farmers market, or from a local retailer.
(2) The purpose of this act is to design and test the feasibility
of making a mobile livestock slaughtering unit available to geographic
areas in this state on a schedule to fulfill this demand.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Subject to the appropriation of funds,
Washington State University shall conduct a mobile livestock unit
demonstration project. In conducting the project, the university shall
contract to obtain the use of a mobile livestock unit that can travel
from county-to-county in counties that have a demand for its services,
that satisfies the requirements for United States department of
agriculture food safety inspection service grants of inspection for
meat products.
(2) In developing the demonstration project, Washington State
University shall establish a mobile livestock unit advisory board. The
advisory board shall consist of:
(a) Interested producers of various species of livestock such as
cattle, goats, hogs, and sheep;
(b) Interested producers of specialty meat products such as
heritage livestock, grass fed, grain fed, and organic;
(c) Representatives of farmers markets;
(d) Retailers interested in obtaining local and specialty meat
products;
(e) Interested organizations representing livestock producers;
(f) The small farms and direct marketing section of the department
of agriculture; and
(g) Other interested persons.
(3) Washington State University may use its network of cooperative
extension offices in each county to advise interested producers of the
availability and schedule of the mobile unit. Additionally, the
university shall also make information available about existing local
slaughtering and meat processing facilities that may provide cutting
and wrapping services to livestock producers either in conjunction with
the mobile unit or on a separate basis.
(4) Washington State University, with assistance from the advisory
board, shall examine whether there is a demand for an expansion in the
number of mobile livestock units available in the state and develop
recommendations as to the appropriate entity to provide this service.
Further, an inquiry shall be made as to whether rural economic
development grants or similar state or federal loan or grant programs
are available for this purpose.
(5) The demonstration project shall be conducted for the fiscal
year beginning July 1, 2009, through June 30, 2010. Washington State
University, with the input and assistance of the advisory board, shall
submit a report of its findings and recommendations to the appropriate
committees of the house of representatives and the senate by December
1, 2010.
(6) This section expires December 31, 2010.

--- END ---