BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Washington State University, in
cooperation with the department of agriculture and the department of
community, trade, and economic development, shall host a working
conference to explore the opportunities and impediments to increasing
local markets for locally produced food products and local agricultural
producers. The objective of the conference shall be to develop a
strategic plan and specific implementing actions that will assist local
producers to meet the preferences of local consumers of food products.
(2) The following, at a minimum, shall be included as topics of the
conference:
(a) Issues of concern to local livestock producers and local
consumers in making locally produced meat products more available to
local consumers, including a discussion of concepts such as a state
meat inspection program and a mobile livestock slaughtering unit as a
means to expand marketing opportunities for local producers and
consumers;
(b) Issues of concern to local fruit and vegetable growers and
local consumers in making locally grown fruit and vegetables more
available to local consumers;
(c) Ways to enhance farm-to-market connections that aid in
enhancing the viability of local agricultural producers and reducing
the distance that agricultural products are transported;
(d) An examination of alternative ways to define and reward
sustainable production of agricultural products;
(e) A consideration of emerging interests of growing urban
populations in nearby agritourism and agricultural-related experiences
for students and adults, and an evaluation of how Washington state can
capitalize on this emerging trend; and
(f) A means of informing farmers about opportunities and procedures
for supplying state agencies and local school districts to supply
Washington grown farm products as a result of the local farms - healthy
kids act, chapter . . . (Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6483), Laws
of 2008.
(3) The conference shall be scheduled at a time that will allow
sufficient time to prepare a summary of the conference proceedings.
The conference proceedings shall include a summary of the topics that
are discussed, and findings and recommendations of the conference
participants. The report shall be submitted to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2010.

--- END ---