BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 3.34.010 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 25 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The number of district judges to be elected in each county shall be: Adams, two; Asotin, one; Benton, five; Chelan, two; Clallam, two; Clark, six; Columbia, one; Cowlitz, three; Douglas, one; Ferry, one; Franklin, one; Garfield, one; Grant, three; Grays Harbor, two; Island, one; Jefferson, one; King, twenty-three in 2009, twenty-five in 2010, and twenty-six in 2011; Kitsap, four; Kittitas, two; Klickitat, two; Lewis, two; Lincoln, one; Mason, one; Okanogan, two; Pacific, two; Pend Oreille, one; Pierce, eleven; San Juan, one; Skagit, three; Skamania, one; Snohomish, ((eight))nine; Spokane, eight; Stevens, one; Thurston, three; Wahkiakum, one; Walla Walla, two; Whatcom, two; Whitman, one; Yakima, four. This number may be increased only as provided in RCW 3.34.020.

--- END ---