BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 23B.01.400 and 2022 c 42 s 101 are each amended to read as follows:

((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the))The definitions in this section apply throughout this title unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Articles of incorporation" include amended and restated articles of incorporation and articles of merger.

(2) "Authorized shares" means the shares of all classes a domestic or foreign corporation is authorized to issue.

(3) "Conspicuous" means so prepared that a reasonable person against whom the writing is to operate should have noticed it. For example, text in italics, boldface, contrasting color, capitals, or underlined is conspicuous.

(4) "Controlling interest" means ownership of an entity's outstanding shares or interests in such number as to entitle the holder at the time to elect a majority of the entity's directors or other governors without regard to voting power which may thereafter exist upon a default, failure, or other contingency.

(5) "Corporate action" means any resolution, act, policy, contract, transaction, plan, adoption or amendment of articles of incorporation or bylaws, or other matter approved by or submitted for approval to a corporation's incorporators, board of directors or a committee thereof, or shareholders.

(6) "Corporation" or "domestic corporation" means a corporation for profit, including a social purpose corporation, which is not a foreign corporation, incorporated under or subject to the provisions of this title.

(7) "Deliver" or "delivery" means any method of delivery used in conventional commercial practice, including delivery by hand, mail, commercial delivery, and, if authorized in accordance with RCW 23B.01.410, by electronic transmission.

(8) "Distribution" means a direct or indirect transfer of money or other property, except its own shares, or incurrence of indebtedness by a corporation to or for the benefit of its shareholders in respect to any of its shares. A distribution may be in the form of a declaration or payment of a dividend; a distribution in partial or complete liquidation, or upon voluntary or involuntary dissolution; a purchase, redemption, or other acquisition of shares; a distribution of indebtedness; or otherwise.

(9) "Document" means:

(a) Any tangible medium on which information is inscribed, and includes handwritten, typed, printed, or similar instruments or copies of such instruments; and

(b) An electronic record.

(10) "Electronic" means relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar capabilities.

(11) "Electronic mail" means an electronic transmission directed to a unique electronic mail address, which electronic mail will be deemed to include any files attached thereto and any information hyperlinked to a website if the electronic mail includes the contact information of an officer or agent of the corporation who is available to assist with accessing such files and information.

(12) "Electronic mail address" means a destination, commonly expressed as a string of characters, consisting of a unique user name or mailbox, commonly referred to as the "local part" of the address, and a reference to an internet domain, commonly referred to as the "domain part" of the address, whether or not displayed, to which electronic mail can be sent or delivered.

(13) "Electronic record" means information that is stored in an electronic or other nontangible medium and: (a) Is retrievable in paper form by the recipient through an automated process used in conventional commercial practice; or (b) if not retrievable in paper form by the recipient through an automated process used in conventional commercial practice, is otherwise authorized in accordance with RCW 23B.01.410(10).

(14) "Electronic transmission" or "electronically transmitted" means internet transmission, telephonic transmission, electronic mail transmission, transmission of a telegram, cablegram, or datagram, the use of, or participation in, one or more electronic networks or databases including one or more distributed electronic networks or databases, or any other form or process of communication, not directly involving the physical transfer of paper or another tangible medium, which:

(a) Is suitable for the retention, retrieval, and reproduction of information by the recipient; and

(b) Is retrievable in paper form by the recipient through an automated process used in conventional commercial practice, or, if not retrievable in paper form by the recipient through an automated process used in conventional commercial practice, is otherwise authorized in accordance with RCW 23B.01.410(10).

(15) "Employee" includes an officer but not a director. A director may accept duties that make the director also an employee.

(16) "Entity" includes a corporation and foreign corporation, not-for-profit corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, two or more persons having a joint or common economic interest, the state, United States, and a foreign governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity.

(17) "Execute," "executes," or "executed" means, with present intent to authenticate or adopt a document:

(a) To sign or adopt a tangible symbol to the document, and includes any manual, facsimile, or conformed signature;

(b) To attach or logically associate with an electronic transmission an electronic sound, symbol, or process, and includes an electronic signature; or

(c) With respect to a document to be filed with the secretary of state, in compliance with the standards for filing with the office of the secretary of state as prescribed by the secretary of state.

(18) "Foreign corporation" means a corporation for profit incorporated under a law other than the law of this state.

(19) "Foreign limited partnership" means a partnership formed under laws other than of this state and having as partners one or more general partners and one or more limited partners.

(20) "General social purpose" means the general social purpose for which a social purpose corporation is organized as set forth in the articles of incorporation of the corporation in accordance with RCW 23B.25.040(1)(c).

(21) "Governmental subdivision" includes authority, county, district, and municipality.

(22) "Governor" has the meaning given that term in RCW 23.95.105.

(23) "Includes" denotes a partial definition.

(24) "Individual" includes the estate of an incompetent or deceased individual.

(25) "Limited partnership" or "domestic limited partnership" means a partnership formed by two or more persons under the laws of this state and having one or more general partners and one or more limited partners.

(26) "Means" denotes an exhaustive definition.

(27) "Notice" has the meaning provided in RCW 23B.01.410.

(28) "Person" means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, government, governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity.

(29) "Principal office" means the office, in or out of this state, so designated in the annual report where the principal executive offices of a domestic or foreign corporation are located.

(30) "Proceeding" includes civil suit and criminal, administrative, and investigatory action.

(31) "Public company" means a corporation that has a class of shares registered with the federal securities and exchange commission pursuant to section 12 or 15 of the securities exchange act of 1934, or section 8 of the investment company act of 1940, or any successor statute.

(32) "Qualified director" means (a) with respect to a director's conflicting interest transaction as defined in RCW 23B.08.700, any director who does not have either (i) a conflicting interest respecting the transaction, or (ii) a familial, financial, professional, or employment relationship with a second director who does have a conflicting interest respecting the transaction, which relationship would, in the circumstances, reasonably be expected to exert an influence on the first director's judgment when voting on the transaction; (b) with respect to RCW 23B.08.735, a qualified director under (a) of this subsection if the business opportunity were a director's conflicting interest transaction; and (c) with respect to RCW 23B.02.020(2)(g), a director who is not a director (i) to whom the limitation or elimination of the duty of an officer to offer potential business opportunities to the corporation would apply, or (ii) who has a familial, financial, professional, or employment relationship with another officer to whom the limitation or elimination would apply, which relationship would, in the circumstances, reasonably be expected to exert an influence on the director's judgment when voting on the limitation or elimination.

(33) "Record date" means the date fixed for determining the identity of a corporation's shareholders and their shareholdings for purposes of this title. The determinations shall be made as of the close of business on the record date unless another time for doing so is specified when the record date is fixed.

(34) "Registered office" means the address of the corporation's registered agent.

(35) "Secretary" means the corporate officer to whom the board of directors has delegated responsibility under RCW 23B.08.400(3) for custody of the minutes of the meetings of the board of directors and of the shareholders and for authenticating records of the corporation.

(36) "Shareholder" means the person in whose name shares are registered in the records of a corporation or the beneficial owner of shares to the extent of the rights granted by a nominee certificate on file with a corporation.

(37) "Shares" means the units into which the proprietary interests in a corporation are divided.

(38) "Social purpose" includes any general social purpose and any specific social purpose.

(39) "Social purpose corporation" means a corporation that has elected to be governed as a social purpose corporation under chapter 23B.25 RCW.

(40) "Specific social purpose" means the specific social purpose or purposes for which a social purpose corporation is organized as set forth in the articles of incorporation of the corporation in accordance with RCW 23B.25.040(2)(a).

(41) "State," when referring to a part of the United States, includes a state and commonwealth, and their agencies and governmental subdivisions, and a territory and insular possession, and their agencies and governmental subdivisions, of the United States.

(42) "Subscriber" means a person who subscribes for shares in a corporation, whether before or after incorporation.

(43) "Subsidiary" means an entity in which the corporation has, directly or indirectly, a controlling interest.

(44) "United States" includes a district, authority, bureau, commission, department, and any other agency of the United States.

(45) "Voting group" means all shares of one or more classes or series that under the articles of incorporation or this title are entitled to vote and be counted together collectively on a matter at a meeting of shareholders. All shares entitled by the articles of incorporation or this title to vote generally on the matter are for that purpose a single voting group.

(46) "Writing" or "written" means any information in the form of a document.

(47) "Forward stock split" means the pro rata division of all the outstanding shares of a class of stock into a greater number of shares of the same class, whether or not the authorized shares of such a class are increased in the same proportion, but does not include a share dividend under RCW 23B.06.230.

(48) "Reverse stock split" means the pro rata combination of all the outstanding shares of a class of stock into a smaller number of shares of the same class, whether or not the authorized shares of such a class are reduced in the same proportion.

(49) "Stock split" means a forward stock split or a reverse stock split.

Sec. 2. RCW 23B.06.210 and 2009 c 189 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The powers granted in this section to the board of directors may be reserved to the shareholders by the articles of incorporation.

(2) Any issuance of shares must be approved by the board of directors. Shares may be issued ((for)):

(a) For consideration determined by the board of directors from time to time consisting of any tangible or intangible property or benefit to the corporation, including cash, promissory notes, services performed, contracts for services to be performed, or other securities of the corporation; or

(b) As a share dividend or upon a stock split, reclassification of outstanding shares into shares of another class or series, or conversion of outstanding shares into shares of another class or series.

(3) A good faith determination by the board of directors that the consideration received or to be received for the shares to be issued is adequate is conclusive insofar as the adequacy of consideration relates to whether the shares are validly issued, fully paid and nonassessable. When the board of directors has made such a determination and the corporation has received the consideration, the shares issued therefor are fully paid and nonassessable. Shares issued as a share dividend or upon a stock split, reclassification of outstanding shares into shares of another class or series, or conversion of outstanding shares into shares of another class or series are fully paid and nonassessable.

(4) The corporation may place in escrow shares issued for a contract for future services or benefits or a promissory note, or make other arrangements to restrict the transfer of the shares, and may credit distributions in respect to the shares against their purchase price, until the services are performed, the benefits are received, or the note is paid. If the services are not performed, the benefits are not received, or the note is not paid, the shares escrowed or restricted and the distributions credited may be canceled in whole or part.

(5) Where it cannot be determined that outstanding shares are fully paid and nonassessable, there shall be a conclusive presumption that such shares are fully paid and nonassessable if the board of directors makes a good faith determination that there is no substantial evidence that the full consideration for such shares has not been paid.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 23B.06 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A corporation may effect a stock split by means of an amendment to the articles of incorporation stating the effect of the stock split on the outstanding shares of the affected class.

(2) An amendment to the articles of incorporation to effect a stock split may, but is not required to, include a change in the authorized shares of the affected class.

(3) Except for a forward stock split that complies with RCW 23B.10.020(4)(a) or a reverse stock split that complies with RCW 23B.10.020(4)(b), an amendment to the articles of incorporation to effect a stock split must be approved in accordance with RCW 23B.10.030 and, if applicable, RCW 23B.10.040.

(4) The board of directors may fix the record date for determining shareholders affected by a stock split, which date may not precede the date on which the amendment to the articles of incorporation effecting the stock split becomes effective in accordance with RCW 23.95.210. If the board of directors does not fix the record date for determining shareholders affected by a stock split, the record date is the date on which the amendment to the articles of incorporation effecting the stock split becomes effective in accordance with RCW 23.95.210.

Sec. 4. RCW 23B.10.020 and 2009 c 189 s 31 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the articles of incorporation provide otherwise, a corporation's board of directors may adopt one or more amendments to the corporation's articles of incorporation without shareholder approval:

(1) If the corporation has only one class of shares outstanding, to provide, change, or eliminate any provision with respect to the par value of any class of shares;

(2) To delete the names and addresses of the initial directors;

(3) To delete the name and address of the initial registered agent or registered office, if a statement of change is on file with the secretary of state;

(4) If the corporation has only one class of shares outstanding, solely to:

(a) Effect a forward stock split of, or change the number of authorized shares of that class in proportion to a forward stock split of, or ((stock))share dividend in, the corporation's outstanding shares; or

(b) Effect a reverse stock split of the corporation's outstanding shares ((and))if the number of authorized shares of that class ((in the same proportions))is proportionately reduced by the amendment;

(5) To change the corporate name; or

(6) To make any other change expressly permitted by this title to be made without shareholder approval.

Sec. 5. RCW 23B.11.030 and 2022 c 42 s 108 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) After ((adopting)) a plan of merger or share exchange has been adopted in accordance with RCW 23B.11.020 or 23B.11.040, the board of directors of each corporation party to the merger, ((and))or the board of directors of the corporation whose shares will be acquired in the share exchange, shall submit the plan of merger, except as provided in subsection (7) or (9) of this section or as provided in RCW 23B.11.040, or plan of share exchange for approval by its shareholders.

(2) For a plan of merger or share exchange to be approved by shareholders:

(a) The board of directors must recommend that the shareholders approve the plan of merger or share exchange ((to the shareholders)), unless (i) the board of directors determines that because of conflict of interest or other special circumstances it should not make ((no))such a recommendation or (ii) RCW 23B.08.245 applies, and in either case the board of directors communicates the basis for so proceeding to the shareholders; and

(b) The shareholders entitled to vote must approve the plan((, except as provided in subsection (7) of this section)).

(3) The board of directors may condition its submission of the proposed plan of merger or share exchange on any basis, including the affirmative vote of holders of a specified percentage of shares held by any group of shareholders not otherwise entitled under this title or the articles of incorporation to vote as a separate voting group on the proposed plan of merger or share exchange.

(4) The corporation shall notify each shareholder, whether or not entitled to vote, of the proposed shareholders' meeting in accordance with RCW 23B.07.050. The notice must also state that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the plan of merger or share exchange and must contain or be accompanied by a copy of the plan or a summary of the material terms and conditions of the proposed merger or share exchange and the consideration to be received by shareholders.

(5) In addition to any other voting conditions imposed by the board of directors under subsection (3) of this section, the plan of merger must be approved by two-thirds of the voting group comprising all the votes entitled to be cast on the plan, and of each other voting group entitled under RCW 23B.11.035 or the articles of incorporation to vote separately on the plan, unless shareholder approval is not required under subsection (7) of this section. The articles of incorporation may require a greater or lesser vote than that provided in this subsection, or a greater or lesser vote by separate voting groups, so long as the required vote is not less than a majority of all the votes entitled to be cast on the plan of merger and of each other voting group entitled to vote separately on the plan. Separate voting by additional voting groups is required on a plan of merger under the circumstances described in RCW 23B.11.035.

(6) In addition to any other voting conditions imposed by the board of directors under subsection (3) of this section, the plan of share exchange must be approved by two-thirds of the voting group comprising all the votes entitled to be cast on the plan, and of each other voting group entitled under RCW 23B.11.035 or the articles of incorporation to vote separately on the plan. The articles of incorporation may require a greater or lesser vote than that provided in this subsection, or a greater or lesser vote by separate voting groups, so long as the required vote is not less than a majority of all the votes entitled to be cast on the plan of share exchange and of each other voting group entitled to vote separately on the plan. Separate voting by additional voting groups is required on a plan of share exchange under the circumstances described in RCW 23B.11.035.

(7) Approval by the shareholders of the surviving corporation on a plan of merger is not required if:

(a) The articles of incorporation of the surviving corporation will not differ, except for amendments enumerated in RCW 23B.10.020, from its articles of incorporation before the merger;

(b) Each shareholder of the surviving corporation whose shares were outstanding immediately before the effective date of the merger will hold the same number of shares, with identical designations, preferences, limitations, and relative rights, immediately after the merger;

(c) The number of voting shares outstanding immediately after the merger, plus the number of voting shares issuable as a result of the merger, either by the conversion of securities issued pursuant to the merger or the exercise of rights and warrants issued pursuant to the merger, will not exceed the total number of voting shares of the surviving corporation authorized by its articles of incorporation immediately before the merger; and

(d) The number of participating shares outstanding immediately after the merger, plus the number of participating shares issuable as a result of the merger, either by the conversion of securities issued pursuant to the merger or the exercise of rights and warrants issued pursuant to the merger, will not exceed the total number of participating shares authorized by its articles of incorporation immediately before the merger.

(8) As used in subsection (7) of this section:

(a) "Participating shares" means shares that entitle their holders to participate without limitation in distributions.

(b) "Voting shares" means shares that entitle their holders to vote unconditionally in elections of directors.

(9) Unless the articles of incorporation provide otherwise, approval by the shareholders of a public company is not required for a plan of merger if:

(a) The plan of merger expressly: (i) Permits or requires the merger to be effected under this subsection; and (ii) provides that, if the merger is to be effected under this subsection, the merger will be effected as soon as practicable following the satisfaction of the requirements of (f) of this subsection;

(b) Another party to the merger or a parent of another party to the merger makes an offer to purchase, on the terms stated in the plan of merger, any and all of the outstanding shares of the corporation that, absent this subsection, would be entitled to vote on the plan of merger, except that the offer may exclude shares of the corporation that are owned at the commencement of the offer by the corporation, the offeror, or any parent of the offeror, or by any wholly owned subsidiary of any of the foregoing;

(c) The offer discloses that the plan of merger states that the merger will be effected as soon as practicable following the satisfaction of the requirements of (f) of this subsection and that the shares of the corporation that are not tendered in response to the offer will be treated as provided in (h) of this subsection;

(d) The offer remains open for at least 10 days;

(e) The offeror purchases all shares properly tendered in response to the offer and not properly withdrawn;

(f) The: (i) Shares purchased by the offeror in accordance with the offer; (ii) shares otherwise owned by the offeror or by any parent of the offeror or any wholly owned subsidiary of any of the foregoing; and (iii) shares subject to an agreement that they are to be transferred, contributed, or delivered to the offeror, any parent of the offeror, or any wholly owned subsidiary of any of the foregoing in exchange for shares or other interests in that offeror, parent, or subsidiary, are collectively entitled to cast at least the minimum number of votes on the merger that, absent this subsection, would be required by this chapter for the approval of the merger by the shareholders entitled to vote on the merger at a meeting at which all shares entitled to vote on the approval were present and voted;

(g) The offeror or a wholly owned subsidiary of the offeror merges with or into the corporation; and

(h) Each outstanding share of each class or series of shares of the corporation that the offeror is offering to purchase in accordance with the offer, and which is not purchased in accordance with the offer, is to be converted in the merger into, or into the right to receive, the same amount and kind of securities, eligible interests, obligations, rights, cash, or other property to be paid or exchanged in accordance with the offer for each share of that class or series of shares that is tendered in response to the offer, except that shares of the corporation that are owned by the corporation or that are described in (f)(ii) or (iii) of this subsection need not be converted into or exchanged for the consideration described in this subsection (9)(h).

(10) As used in subsection (9) of this section:

(a) "Offer" means the offer referred to in subsection (9)(b) of this section.

(b) "Offeror" means the person making the offer.

(c) "Parent" of an entity means a person that owns, directly or indirectly, through one or more wholly owned subsidiaries, all of the outstanding shares of or other interests in that entity.

(d) Shares tendered in response to the offer will be deemed to have been "purchased" in accordance with the offer at the earlier time as of which:

(i) The offeror has irrevocably accepted those shares for payment; and

(ii) Either: (A) In the case of shares represented by certificates, the offeror, or the offeror's designated depository or other agent, has physically received the certificates representing those shares; or (B) in the case of shares without certificates, those shares have been transferred into the account of the offeror or its designated depository or other agent, or an agent's message relating to those shares has been received by the offeror or its designated depository or other agent.

(e) "Wholly owned subsidiary" of a person means an entity of or in which that person owns, directly or indirectly, through one or more wholly owned subsidiaries, all of the outstanding shares or other interests.

(11) After a merger or share exchange is approved, and at any time before articles of merger or share exchange are filed, the planned merger or share exchange may be abandoned, subject to any contractual rights, without further shareholder approval, in accordance with the procedure set forth in the plan of merger or share exchange or, if none is set forth, in the manner determined by the board of directors.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. A new section is added to chapter 23B.11 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Holding company" means the corporation that is or becomes the direct parent of the surviving corporation of a merger accomplished under this section and whose capital stock is issued in that merger.

(b) "Parent constituent corporation" means the parent corporation that merges with or into the subsidiary constituent corporation in the merger.

(c) "Subsidiary constituent corporation" means the subsidiary corporation with or into which the parent constituent corporation merges in the merger.

(2) Unless the articles of incorporation provide otherwise, a parent constituent corporation may merge with or into a single indirect wholly owned subsidiary of the parent constituent corporation without the approval of the plan of merger by the shareholders of the parent constituent corporation if:

(a) The plan expressly permits or requires the merger to be effected under this subsection;

(b) The holding company and the constituent corporations to the merger are each organized under this title;

(c) At all times from its incorporation until consummation of a merger under this section, the holding company was a direct wholly owned subsidiary of the parent constituent corporation;

(d) Immediately before consummation of a merger under this section, the subsidiary constituent corporation is a direct wholly owned subsidiary of the holding company and an indirect wholly owned subsidiary of the parent constituent corporation;

(e) The parent constituent corporation and the subsidiary constituent corporation are the only constituent entities to the merger;

(f) Immediately after the merger becomes effective, the surviving corporation of the merger becomes or remains a direct wholly owned subsidiary of the holding company;

(g) Each share or fraction of a share of the parent constituent corporation outstanding immediately before the merger becomes effective is converted in the merger into a share or equal fraction of a share of the holding company having the same designations and relative preferences, rights, and limitations as the share or fraction of a share of the parent constituent corporation being converted in the merger;

(h) The articles of incorporation and bylaws of the holding company immediately after the merger becomes effective contain provisions identical to the articles of incorporation and bylaws of the parent constituent corporation immediately before the merger becomes effective, other than any provisions regarding the incorporator or incorporators, the corporate name, the registered office and agent, the initial board of directors and the initial subscribers for shares, and the provisions contained in any amendment to the articles of incorporation of the parent constituent corporation that were necessary to effect an exchange, reclassification, or cancellation of shares if the exchange, reclassification, or cancellation has become effective;

(i) The articles of incorporation and bylaws of the surviving corporation immediately after the merger becomes effective contain provisions by specific reference to this subsection requiring that any corporate action by or involving the surviving corporation, other than the election or removal of directors of the surviving corporation, must be approved by the shareholders of the holding company, or any successor by merger, by the same vote as is required by this title or under the articles of incorporation or bylaws of the parent constituent corporation immediately before the merger becomes effective, if that corporate action would have required the approval of the shareholders of the parent constituent corporation under this title or under the articles of incorporation or bylaws of the parent constituent corporation immediately before the merger becomes effective;

(j) The directors of the parent constituent corporation immediately before the merger becomes effective become or remain the directors of the holding company immediately after the merger becomes effective; and

(k) The shareholders of the parent constituent corporation will not recognize gain or loss for United States federal income tax purposes as a result of the merger, as determined by the board of directors of the parent constituent corporation.

(3) The holding company must, promptly after the effective date of a merger effected under subsection (2) of this section, notify each person who was a shareholder of the parent constituent corporation as of the date the board of directors approves the merger that the merger has become effective. The notice must contain or be accompanied by a copy of the plan of merger or a summary of the material terms and conditions of the merger and the consideration to be received by those shareholders.

(4) To the extent restrictions under chapter 23B.19 RCW applied to the parent constituent corporation or any of its shareholders at the effective time of the merger, those restrictions apply to the holding company and its shareholders immediately after the merger becomes effective as though the holding company were the parent constituent corporation, and all shares of stock of the holding company acquired in the merger will, for the purposes of chapter 23B.19 RCW, be deemed to have been acquired at the time that the corresponding shares of stock of the parent constituent corporation were acquired. No shareholder who, immediately before the merger becomes effective, was not an acquiring person of the parent constituent corporation under chapter 23B.19 RCW will, solely by reason of the merger, become an acquiring person of the holding company under chapter 23B.19 RCW.

(5) To the extent a shareholder of the parent constituent corporation immediately before the merger was eligible to commence a proceeding in the right of the parent constituent corporation in accordance with RCW 23B.07.400, nothing in this section is deemed to limit or extinguish that eligibility.

(6) Except as provided in subsections (2), (3), (4), and (5) of this section, a merger between a parent constituent corporation and a subsidiary constituent corporation is governed by the provisions of this chapter applicable to mergers generally.

--- END ---