BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9A.42.100 and 2005 c 218 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty of the crime of endangerment with a controlled substance if the person knowingly or intentionally permits a dependent child or dependent adult to be exposed to, ingest, inhale, or have contact with ((methamphetamine)):

(a) Fentanyl or synthetic opioids, or the smoke of a substance that the person knows, or reasonably should know, contains, or is contaminated with, fentanyl or synthetic opioids, excepting medications administered or provided during the delivery of health care services or pursuant to a valid prescription; or

(b) Methamphetamine or ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or anhydrous ammonia, including their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, that are being used in the manufacture of methamphetamine, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers.

(2) The department of children, youth, and families and any employees, interns, volunteers, or contractors of the department acting in the scope of their role are exempt from any criminal liability within this section.

(3) Endangerment with a controlled substance is a class B felony.

--- END ---