BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. RCW 9.94A.647 (Resentencing—Persistent offenders—Robbery in the second degree) and 2021 c 141 s 1 are each repealed.

Sec. 2. RCW 9.94A.345 and 2021 c 286 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

((Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, any))Any sentence imposed under this chapter shall be determined in accordance with the law in effect when the current offense was committed.

--- END ---