BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature recognizes the negative impact increased travel times have on those in southwest Washington. The legislature also recognizes the need for additional strategies to provide reliable transportation throughout the region. It is the intent of the legislature to begin the analysis and discussion on one additional strategy: A third bridge over the Columbia river between southwest Washington and Oregon.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) The joint transportation committee shall conduct a study of the options and strategies to construct a third bridge over the Columbia river between southwest Washington and Oregon. The study must consider:

(a) Anticipated general purpose traffic demand, including general purpose traffic relief that may be afforded to existing highway routes by the creation of a third bridge;

(b) Anticipated freight traffic demand, including freight traffic relief that may be afforded to existing highway routes by the creation of a third bridge;

(c) A cost-benefit analysis of constructing a third bridge, which must include analysis on the estimated cost to construct a third bridge;

(d) Potential locations for a third bridge across the Columbia river between southwest Washington and Oregon; and

(e) Preliminary design options for a third bridge.

(2) A final report must be submitted to the transportation committees of the legislature by June 30, 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. The sum of $300,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2025, from the motor vehicle account—state appropriation to the joint transportation committee for the purposes of this act.

--- END ---