BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that establishing a minimum age for compulsory school attendance recognizes the importance that education has on the future opportunities of children. The legislature further finds that the state currently provides an opportunity for access to education through public, private, and home-based instruction options. The legislature reaffirms its support for these educational options to fit the needs of individual children and families, including the commitment to allow home-based instruction to be less structured and more experiential than traditional classroom instruction.

(2) The legislature also finds that a majority of states require school attendance beginning with children who are five or six years of age. Washington is the only state that requires school attendance beginning with children who are eight years of age. Therefore, the legislature intends to amend the compulsory attendance laws to ensure that every child residing in Washington begins to receive educational instruction beginning by six years of age.

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.225.010 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 630 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All parents in this state of any child ((eight))six years of age and under ((eighteen))18 years of age shall cause such child to attend either the public school of the district in which the child resides or another public school in the state and such child shall have the responsibility to and therefore shall attend for the full time when such school may be in session unless:

(a) The child is attending an approved private school for the same time or is enrolled in an extension program as provided in RCW 28A.195.010(4);

(b) The child is receiving home-based instruction as provided in subsection (4) of this section;

(c) The child is attending an education center as provided in chapter 28A.205 RCW;

(d) The school district superintendent of the district in which the child resides shall have excused such child from attendance because the child is physically or mentally unable to attend school, is attending a residential school operated by the department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families, is incarcerated in an adult correctional facility, or has been temporarily excused upon the request of his or her parents for purposes agreed upon by the school authorities and the parent: PROVIDED, That such excused absences shall not be permitted if deemed to cause a serious adverse effect upon the student's educational progress: PROVIDED FURTHER, That students excused for such temporary absences may be claimed as full-time equivalent students to the extent they would otherwise have been so claimed for the purposes of RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260 and shall not affect school district compliance with the provisions of RCW 28A.150.220;

(e) The child is excused from school subject to approval by the student's parent for a reason of faith or conscience, or an organized activity conducted under the auspices of a religious denomination, church, or religious organization, for up to two days per school year without any penalty. Such absences may not mandate school closures. Students excused for such temporary absences may be claimed as full-time equivalent students to the extent they would otherwise have been so claimed for the purposes of RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260 and may not affect school district compliance with the provisions of RCW 28A.150.220; or

(f) The child is ((sixteen))16 years of age or older and:

(i) The child is regularly and lawfully employed and either the parent agrees that the child should not be required to attend school or the child is emancipated in accordance with chapter 13.64 RCW;

(ii) The child has already met graduation requirements in accordance with state board of education rules and regulations; or

(iii) The child has received a certificate of educational competence under rules and regulations established by the state board of education under RCW 28A.305.190.

(2) ((A))For the purposes of this chapter, parent ((for the purpose of this chapter)) means a parent, guardian, or person having legal custody of a child.

(3) ((An))For the purposes of this chapter and chapter 28A.200 RCW, approved private school ((for the purposes of this chapter and chapter 28A.200 RCW)) shall be one approved under regulations established by the state board of education pursuant to RCW 28A.305.130.

(4) For the purposes of this chapter and chapter 28A.200 RCW, instruction shall be home-based if it consists of planned and supervised instructional and related educational activities, including a curriculum and instruction in the basic skills of occupational education, science, mathematics, language, social studies, history, health, reading, writing, spelling, and the development of an appreciation of art and music, provided for a number of hours equivalent to the total annual program hours per grade level established for approved private schools under RCW 28A.195.010 and 28A.195.040 and if such activities are:

(a) Provided by a parent who is instructing his or her child only and are supervised by a certificated person. A certificated person for purposes of this chapter and chapter 28A.200 RCW shall be a person certified under chapter 28A.410 RCW. For purposes of this section, "supervised by a certificated person" means: The planning by the certificated person and the parent of objectives consistent with this subsection; a minimum each month of an average of one contact hour per week with the child being supervised by the certificated person; and evaluation of such child's progress by the certificated person. The number of children supervised by the certificated person shall not exceed ((thirty))30 for purposes of this subsection; or

(b) Provided by a parent who is instructing his or her child only and who has either earned ((forty-five))45 college-level quarter credit hours or its equivalent in semester hours or has completed a course in home-based instruction at a postsecondary institution or a vocational-technical institute; or

(c) Provided by a parent who is deemed sufficiently qualified to provide home-based instruction by the superintendent of the local school district in which the child resides.

(5) The legislature recognizes that home-based instruction is less structured and more experiential than the instruction normally provided in a classroom setting. Therefore, the provisions of subsection (4) of this section relating to the nature and quantity of instructional and related educational activities shall be liberally construed.

Sec. 3. RCW 28A.225.018 and 2016 c 205 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, in the event that a child in elementary school is required to attend school under RCW 28A.225.010 ((or 28A.225.015(1))) and has five or more excused absences in a single month during the current school year, or ((ten))10 or more excused absences in the current school year, the school district shall schedule a conference or conferences with the parent and child at a time reasonably convenient for all persons included for the purpose of identifying the barriers to the child's regular attendance, and the supports and resources that may be made available to the family so that the child is able to regularly attend school. If a regularly scheduled parent-teacher conference day is to take place within ((thirty))30 days of the absences, the school district may schedule this conference on that day. To satisfy the requirements of this section, the conference must include at least one school district employee such as a nurse, counselor, social worker, teacher, or community human services provider, except in those instances regarding the attendance of a child who has an individualized education program or a plan developed under section 504 of the rehabilitation act of 1973, in which case the reconvening of the team that created the program or plan is required.

(2) A conference pursuant to subsection (1) of this section is not required in the event of excused absences for which prior notice has been given to the school or a doctor's note has been provided and an academic plan is put in place so that the child does not fall behind.

(3) The requirements in this section created by this act take effect August 1, 2023. However, the requirements in this section created by this act take effect August 1, 2024, if a local school district board of directors determines that it is unable to comply with the August 1, 2023, date. Local school district boards of directors who make this determination and consequently delay the effective date of the requirements in this section created by this act for their district, must inform the office of the superintendent of public instruction of their determination.

Sec. 4. RCW 28A.225.020 and 2021 c 119 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If a child required to attend school under RCW 28A.225.010 fails to attend school without valid justification, the public school in which the child is enrolled shall:

(a) Inform the child's parent by a notice in writing or by telephone whenever the child has failed to attend school after one unexcused absence within any month during the current school year. School officials shall inform the parent of the potential consequences of additional unexcused absences. If the parent is not fluent in English, the school must make reasonable efforts to provide this information in a language in which the parent is fluent;

(b) Schedule a conference or conferences with the parent and child at a time reasonably convenient for all persons included for the purpose of analyzing the causes of the child's absences after three unexcused absences within any month during the current school year. If a regularly scheduled parent-teacher conference day is to take place within ((thirty))30 days of the third unexcused absence, then the school district may schedule this conference on that day. If the child's parent does not attend the scheduled conference, the conference may be conducted with the student and school official. However the parent shall be notified of the steps to be taken to eliminate or reduce the child's absence; and

(c) At some point after the second and before the seventh unexcused absence, take data-informed steps to eliminate or reduce the child's absences.

(i) In middle school and high school, these steps must include application of the Washington assessment of the risks and needs of students (WARNS) or other assessment by a school district's designee under RCW 28A.225.026.

(ii) For any child with an existing individualized education plan or 504 plan, these steps must include the convening of the child's individualized education plan or 504 plan team, including a behavior specialist or mental health specialist where appropriate, to consider the reasons for the absences. If necessary, and if consent from the parent is given, a functional behavior assessment to explore the function of the absence behavior shall be conducted and a detailed behavior plan completed. Time should be allowed for the behavior plan to be initiated and data tracked to determine progress.

(iii) With respect to any child, without an existing individualized education plan or 504 plan, reasonably believed to have a mental or physical disability or impairment, these steps must include informing the child's parent of the right to obtain an appropriate evaluation at no cost to the parent to determine whether the child has a disability or impairment and needs accommodations, related services, or special education services. This includes children with suspected emotional or behavioral disabilities as defined in WAC 392-172A-01035. If the school obtains consent to conduct an evaluation, time should be allowed for the evaluation to be completed, and if the child is found to be eligible for special education services, accommodations, or related services, a plan developed to address the child's needs.

(iv) These steps must include, where appropriate, providing an available approved best practice or research-based intervention, or both, consistent with the WARNS profile or other assessment, if an assessment was applied, adjusting the child's school program or school or course assignment, providing more individualized or remedial instruction, providing appropriate vocational courses or work experience, referring the child to a community engagement board, requiring the child to attend an alternative school or program, or assisting the parent or child to obtain supplementary services that might eliminate or ameliorate the cause or causes for the absence from school.

(2) For purposes of this chapter, an "unexcused absence" means that a child:

(a)(i) Has failed to attend the majority of hours or periods in an average school day or has failed to comply with a more restrictive school district policy; and

(ii) Has failed to meet the school district's policy for excused absences; or

(b) Has failed to comply with alternative learning experience program attendance requirements as described by the superintendent of public instruction.

(3) If a child transfers from one school district to another during the school year, the receiving school or school district shall include the unexcused absences accumulated at the previous school or from the previous school district for purposes of this section((,))and RCW 28A.225.030((, and 28A.225.015)). The sending school district shall provide this information to the receiving school, together with a copy of any previous assessment as required under subsection (1)(c) of this section, history of any best practices or researched-based intervention previously provided to the child by the child's sending school district, and a copy of the most recent truancy information including any online or written acknowledgment by the parent and child, as provided for in RCW 28A.225.005. All school districts must use the standard choice transfer form for releasing a student to a nonresident school district for the purposes of accessing an alternative learning experience program.

(4) The requirements in this section created by this act take effect August 1, 2023. However, the requirements in this section created by this act take effect August 1, 2024, if a local school district board of directors determines that it is unable to comply with the August 1, 2023, date. Local school district boards of directors who make this determination and consequently delay the effective date of the requirements in this section created by this act for their district, must inform the office of the superintendent of public instruction of their determination.

Sec. 5. RCW 28A.225.025 and 2021 c 119 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For purposes of this chapter, "community engagement board" means a board established pursuant to a memorandum of understanding between a juvenile court and a school district and composed of members of the local community in which the child attends school. Community engagement boards must include members who receive training regarding the identification of barriers to school attendance, the use of the Washington assessment of the risks and needs of students (WARNS) or other assessment tools to identify the specific needs of individual children, cultural responsive interactions, trauma-informed approaches to discipline, evidence-based treatments that have been found effective in supporting at-risk youth and their families, and the specific services and treatment available in the particular school, court, community, and elsewhere. Duties of a community engagement board shall include, but not be limited to: Identifying barriers to school attendance, recommending methods for improving attendance such as connecting students and their families with community services, culturally appropriate promising practices, and evidence-based services such as functional family therapy, suggesting to the school district that the child enroll in another school, an alternative education program, an education center, a skill center, a dropout prevention program, or another public or private educational program, or recommending to the juvenile court that a juvenile be offered the opportunity for placement in a HOPE center or crisis residential center, if appropriate.

(2) The legislature finds that utilization of community engagement boards is the preferred means of intervention when preliminary methods to eliminate or reduce unexcused absences as required by RCW 28A.225.020 have not been effective in securing the child's attendance at school. The legislature intends to encourage and support the development and expansion of community engagement boards. Operation of a ((school truancy))community engagement board does not excuse a district from the obligation of filing a petition within the requirements of RCW ((28A.225.015(3)))28A.225.030.

Sec. 6. RCW 28A.225.030 and 2021 c 119 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If a child under the age of ((seventeen))18 is required to attend school under RCW 28A.225.010 and if the actions taken by a school district under RCW 28A.225.020 are not successful in substantially reducing an enrolled student's absences from public school, after the child's seventh unexcused absence within any month during the current school year and not later than the 15th unexcused absence during the current school year the school district shall file a petition and supporting affidavit for a civil action with the juvenile court ((alleging)). For a child who is six or seven years of age, the petition must allege a violation of RCW 28A.225.010 by the parent. For a child who is eight years of age and under the age of 17, the petition must allege a violation of RCW 28A.225.010: (a) By the parent; (b) by the child; or (c) by the parent and the child. The petition must include a list of all interventions that have been attempted as set forth in RCW 28A.225.020, include a copy of any previous truancy assessment completed by the child's current school district, the history of approved best practices intervention or research-based intervention previously provided to the child by the child's current school district, and a copy of the most recent truancy information document provided to the parent, pursuant to RCW 28A.225.005. Except as provided in this subsection, no additional documents need be filed with the petition. Nothing in this subsection requires court jurisdiction to terminate when a child turns seventeen or precludes a school district from filing a petition for a child that is seventeen years of age.

(2) The district shall not later than the seventh unexcused absence in a month:

(a) Enter into an agreement with ((a))the student and parent that establishes school attendance requirements;

(b) Refer ((a))the student to a community engagement board as defined in RCW 28A.225.025. The community engagement board shall enter into an agreement with the student and parent that establishes school attendance requirements and take other appropriate actions to reduce the child's absences; or

(c) File a petition under subsection (1) of this section.

(3) The petition may be filed by a school district employee who is not an attorney.

(4) If the school district fails to file a petition under this section, the parent of a child with seven or more unexcused absences in any month during the current school year or upon the 15th unexcused absence during the current school year may file a petition with the juvenile court alleging a violation of RCW 28A.225.010.

(5) Petitions filed under this section may be served by certified mail, return receipt requested. If such service is unsuccessful, or the return receipt is not signed by the addressee, personal service is required.

(6) The requirements in this section created by this act take effect August 1, 2023. However, the requirements in this section created by this act take effect August 1, 2024, if a local school district board of directors determines that it is unable to comply with the August 1, 2023, date. Local school district boards of directors who make this determination and consequently delay the effective date of the requirements in this section created by this act for their district, must inform the office of the superintendent of public instruction of their determination.

Sec. 7. RCW 28A.225.035 and 2021 c 119 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A petition for a civil action under RCW 28A.225.030 ((or 28A.225.015)) shall consist of a written notification to the court alleging that:

(a) The child has unexcused absences as described in RCW 28A.225.030(1) during the current school year;

(b) Actions taken by the school district have not been successful in substantially reducing the child's absences from school; and

(c) Court intervention and supervision are necessary to assist the school district or parent to reduce the child's absences from school.

(2) The petition shall set forth the name, date of birth, school, address, gender, race, and ethnicity of the child and the names and addresses of the child's parents, and shall set forth the languages in which the child and parent are fluent, whether there is an existing individualized education program, and the child's current academic status in school.

(3) The petition shall set forth facts that support the allegations in this section and shall generally request relief available under this chapter and provide information about what the court might order under RCW 28A.225.090.

(4)(a) When a petition is filed under RCW 28A.225.030 ((or 28A.225.015)), it shall initially be stayed by the juvenile court, and the child and the child's parent must be referred to a community engagement board or other coordinated means of intervention as set forth in the memorandum of understanding under RCW 28A.225.026. The community engagement board must provide to the court a description of the intervention and prevention efforts to be employed to substantially reduce the child's unexcused absences, along with a timeline for completion.

(b) If a community engagement board or other coordinated means of intervention is not in place as required by RCW 28A.225.026, the juvenile court shall schedule a hearing at which the court shall consider the petition.

(5) When a referral is made to a community engagement board, the community engagement board must meet with the child, a parent, and the school district representative and enter into an agreement with the petitioner and respondent regarding expectations and any actions necessary to address the child's truancy within twenty days of the referral. ((If the petition is based on RCW 28A.225.015, the))A child who is six or seven years of age shall not be required to attend and the agreement under this subsection shall be between the community engagement board, the school district, and the child's parent. The court may permit the community engagement board or truancy prevention counselor to provide continued supervision over the student, or parent if the petition ((is based on RCW 28A.225.015))is for a child who is six or seven years of age.

(6) If the community engagement board fails to reach an agreement, or the parent or student does not comply with the agreement within the timeline for completion set by the community engagement board, the community engagement board shall return the case to the juvenile court. The stay of the petition shall be lifted, and the juvenile court shall schedule a hearing at which the court shall consider the petition.

(7)(a) Notwithstanding the provisions in subsection (4)(a) of this section, a hearing shall not be required if other actions by the court would substantially reduce the child's unexcused absences. Such actions may include referral to an existing community engagement board, use of the Washington assessment of risks and needs of students (WARNS) or other assessment tools to identify the specific needs of individual children, the provision of community-based services, and the provision of evidence-based treatments that have been found to be effective in supporting at-risk youth and their families. When a juvenile court hearing is held, the court shall:

(i) Separately notify the child, the parent of the child, and the school district of the hearing. If the parent is not fluent in English, notice should be provided in a language in which the parent is fluent as indicated on the petition pursuant to RCW 28A.225.030(1);

(ii) Notify the parent and the child of their rights to present evidence at the hearing; and

(iii) Notify the parent and the child of the options and rights available under chapter 13.32A RCW.

(b) If the child is not provided with counsel, the advisement of rights must take place in court by means of a colloquy between the court, the child if eight years old or older, and the parent.

(8)(a) The court may require the attendance of the child if eight years old or older, the parents, and the school district at any hearing on a petition filed under RCW 28A.225.030.

(b) The court may not issue a bench warrant for a child for failure to appear at a hearing on an initial truancy petition filed under RCW 28A.225.030. If there has been proper service, the court may instead enter a default order assuming jurisdiction under the terms specified in subsection (12) of this section.

(9) A school district is responsible for determining who shall represent the school district at hearings on a petition filed under RCW 28A.225.030 ((or 28A.225.015)).

(10) The court may permit the first hearing to be held without requiring that either party be represented by legal counsel, and to be held without a guardian ad litem for the child under RCW 4.08.050. At the request of the school district, the court shall permit a school district representative who is not an attorney to represent the school district at any future hearings.

(11) If the child is in a special education program or has a diagnosed mental or emotional disorder, the court shall inquire as to what efforts the school district has made to assist the child in attending school.

(12) If the allegations in the petition are established by a preponderance of the evidence, the court shall grant the petition and enter an order assuming jurisdiction to intervene for the period of time determined by the court, after considering the facts alleged in the petition and the circumstances of the juvenile, to most likely cause the juvenile to return to and remain in school while the juvenile is subject to this chapter. In no case may the order expire before the end of the school year in which it is entered.

(13)(a) If the court assumes jurisdiction, the school district shall periodically report to the court any additional unexcused absences by the child, actions taken by the school district, and an update on the child's academic status in school at a schedule specified by the court.

(b) The first report under this subsection (13) must be received no later than three months from the date that the court assumes jurisdiction.

(14) Community engagement boards and the courts shall coordinate, to the extent possible, proceedings and actions pertaining to children who are subject to truancy petitions and at-risk youth petitions in RCW 13.32A.191 or child in need of services petitions in RCW 13.32A.140.

(15) If after a juvenile court assumes jurisdiction in one county the child relocates to another county, the juvenile court in the receiving county shall, upon the request of a school district or parent, assume jurisdiction of the petition filed in the previous county.

(16) The requirements in this section created by this act take effect August 1, 2023. However, the requirements in this section created by this act take effect August 1, 2024, if a local school district board of directors determines that it is unable to comply with the August 1, 2023, date. Local school district boards of directors who make this determination and consequently delay the effective date of the requirements in this section created by this act for their district, must inform the office of the superintendent of public instruction of their determination.

Sec. 8. RCW 28A.225.090 and 2021 c 119 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A court may order a child subject to a petition under RCW 28A.225.035 to do one or more of the following:

(a) Attend the child's current school, and set forth minimum attendance requirements, which shall not consider a suspension day as an unexcused absence;

(b) If there is space available and the program can provide educational services appropriate for the child, order the child to attend another public school, an alternative education program, center, a skill center, dropout prevention program, or another public educational program;

(c) Attend a private nonsectarian school or program including an education center. Before ordering a child to attend an approved or certified private nonsectarian school or program, the court shall: (i) Consider the public and private programs available; (ii) find that placement is in the best interest of the child; and (iii) find that the private school or program is willing to accept the child and will not charge any fees in addition to those established by contract with the student's school district. If the court orders the child to enroll in a private school or program, the child's school district shall contract with the school or program to provide educational services for the child. The school district shall not be required to contract for a weekly rate that exceeds the state general apportionment dollars calculated on a weekly basis generated by the child and received by the district. A school district shall not be required to enter into a contract that is longer than the remainder of the school year. A school district shall not be required to enter into or continue a contract if the child is no longer enrolled in the district;

(d) Submit to a substance abuse assessment if the court finds on the record that such assessment is appropriate to the circumstances and behavior of the child and will facilitate the child's compliance with the mandatory attendance law and, if any assessment, including a urinalysis test ordered under this subsection indicates the use of controlled substances or alcohol, order the minor to abstain from the unlawful consumption of controlled substances or alcohol and adhere to the recommendations of the substance abuse assessment at no expense to the school; or

(e) Submit to a mental health evaluation or other diagnostic evaluation and adhere to the recommendations of the drug assessment, at no expense to the school, if the court finds on the court records that such evaluation is appropriate to the circumstances and behavior of the child, and will facilitate the child's compliance with the mandatory attendance law.

(2) If the child fails to comply with the court order, the court may impose:

(a) Community restitution;

(b) Nonresidential programs with intensive wraparound services;

(c) A requirement that the child meet with a mentor for a specified number of times; or

(d) Other services and interventions that the court deems appropriate.

(3) Any parent violating any of the provisions of either RCW 28A.225.010((, 28A.225.015,)) or 28A.225.080 shall be fined not more than ((twenty-five dollars))$25 for each day of unexcused absence from school. The court shall remit ((fifty))50 percent of the fine collected under this section to the child's school district. It shall be a defense for a parent charged with violating RCW 28A.225.010 to show that he or she exercised reasonable diligence in attempting to cause a child in his or her custody to attend school or that the child's school did not perform its duties as required in RCW 28A.225.020. The court may order the parent to provide community restitution instead of imposing a fine. Any fine imposed pursuant to this section may be suspended upon the condition that a parent charged with violating RCW 28A.225.010 shall participate with the school and the child in a supervised plan for the child's attendance at school or upon condition that the parent attend a conference or conferences scheduled by a school for the purpose of analyzing the causes of a child's absence.

(4) If a child continues to be truant after entering into a court-approved order with the community engagement board under RCW 28A.225.035, the juvenile court shall find the child in contempt, and the court may impose alternatives to detention consistent with best practice models for reengagement with school.

(5) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the court's inherent contempt power or curtail its exercise.

(6) Subsections (1), (2), and (4) of this section shall not apply to a six or seven year old child required to attend public school under RCW ((28A.225.015))28A.225.010.

Sec. 9. RCW 28A.200.010 and 2019 c 252 s 109 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each parent whose child is receiving home-based instruction under RCW 28A.225.010(4) shall have the duty, beginning when the child is six years of age, to:

(a) File annually a signed declaration of intent that he or she is planning to cause his or her child to receive home-based instruction. The statement shall include the name and age of the child, shall specify whether a certificated person will be supervising the instruction, and shall be written in a format prescribed by the superintendent of public instruction. Each parent shall file the statement by September 15th of the school year or within two weeks of the beginning of any public school quarter, trimester, or semester with the superintendent of the public school district within which the parent resides or the district that accepts the transfer, and the student shall be deemed a transfer student of the nonresident district. Parents may apply for transfer under RCW 28A.225.220; and

(b) Ensure that test scores or annual academic progress assessments and immunization records, together with any other records that are kept relating to the instructional and educational activities provided, are forwarded to any other public or private school to which the child transfers. At the time of a transfer to a public school, the superintendent of the local school district in which the child enrolls may require a standardized achievement test to be administered and shall have the authority to determine the appropriate grade and course level placement of the child after consultation with parents and review of the child's records((; and

(c) Ensure)).

(2) Each parent whose child is receiving home-based instruction as defined in RCW 28A.225.010, and is eight years old or older shall have the duty to ensure that a standardized achievement test approved by the state board of education is administered annually to the child by a qualified individual or that an annual assessment of the student's academic progress is written by a certificated person who is currently working in the field of education. The state board of education shall not require these children to meet the student learning goals, learn the state learning standards, or take the assessments under RCW 28A.655.070. The standardized test administered or the annual academic progress assessment written shall be made a part of the child's permanent records. If, as a result of the annual test or assessment, it is determined that the child is not making reasonable progress consistent with his or her age or stage of development, the parent shall make a good faith effort to remedy any deficiency.

(((2)))(3) Failure of a parent to comply with the duties in this section shall be deemed a failure of such parent's child to attend school without valid justification under RCW 28A.225.020. Parents who do comply with the duties set forth in this section shall be presumed to be providing home-based instruction as set forth in RCW 28A.225.010(4).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. RCW 28A.225.015 (Attendance mandatory—Six or seven year olds—Unexcused absences—Petition) and 2021 c 119 s 4, 2017 c 291 s 1, & 1999 c 319 s 6 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11. This act takes effect August 1, 2023.

--- END ---