BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 48.17.090 and 2009 c 162 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An individual applying for a resident insurance producer license shall make application to the commissioner on the uniform application and declare under penalty of refusal, suspension, or revocation of the license that the statements made in the application are true, correct, and complete to the best of the individual's knowledge and belief. As a part of or in connection with the application, the individual applicant shall furnish information concerning the applicant's identity, including fingerprints for submission to the Washington state patrol, the federal bureau of investigation, and any governmental agency or entity authorized to receive this information for a state and national criminal history background check. If, in the process of verifying fingerprints, business records, or other information, the commissioner's office incurs fees or charges from another governmental agency or from a business firm, the amount of the fees or charges shall be paid to the commissioner's office by the applicant.

(2) Before approving the application, the commissioner shall find that the individual:

(a) Is at least eighteen years of age;

(b) Has not committed any act that is a ground for denial, suspension, or revocation set forth in RCW 48.17.530;

(c) ((Has completed a prelicensing course of study for the lines of authority for which the person has applied;

(d))) Has paid the fees set forth in RCW 48.14.010; and

(((e)))(d) Has successfully passed the examinations for the lines of authority for which the person has applied.

(3) A resident business entity acting as an insurance producer is required to obtain an insurance producer license. Application shall be made using the uniform business entity application, and the individual signing the application shall declare under penalty of refusal, suspension, or revocation of the license that the statements made in the application are true, correct, and complete to the best of the individual's knowledge and belief. Before approving the application, the commissioner shall find that:

(a) The business entity has paid the fees set forth in RCW 48.14.010;

(b) The business entity has designated a licensed insurance producer responsible for the business entity's compliance with the insurance laws and rules of this state; and

(c) The business entity has not committed any act that is a ground for denial, suspension, or revocation set forth in RCW 48.17.530.

(4) A resident business entity acting as a title insurance agent is required to obtain a title insurance agent license. Application shall be made to the commissioner on the uniform business entity application, and the individual submitting the application shall declare under penalty of refusal, suspension, or revocation of the license that the statements made in the application are true, correct, and complete to the best of the individual's knowledge and belief. Before approving the application, the commissioner shall find that the business entity:

(a) Has paid the fees set forth in RCW 48.14.010;

(b) Maintains a lawfully established place of business in this state;

(c) Is empowered to be a title insurance agent under a members' agreement, if a limited liability company, or by its articles of incorporation;

(d) Is appointed as an agent by one or more authorized title insurance companies; and

(e) Has complied with RCW 48.29.155 and 48.29.160.

(5) The commissioner may require any documents reasonably necessary to verify the information contained in an application and may, from time to time, require any licensed insurance producer or title insurance agent to produce the information called for in an application for license.

--- END ---