BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 69.50.4011 and 2021 c 311 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as authorized by this chapter, it is unlawful for:

(a) Any person to create or deliver a counterfeit substance; or

(b) Any person to knowingly possess a counterfeit substance.

(2) Any person who violates subsection (1)(a) of this section with respect to:

(a) A counterfeit substance classified in Schedule I or II which is a narcotic drug, or flunitrazepam classified in Schedule IV, is guilty of a class B felony and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than ten years, fined not more than twenty-five thousand dollars, or both;

(b) A counterfeit substance which is methamphetamine, is guilty of a class B felony and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than ten years, fined not more than twenty-five thousand dollars, or both;

(c) Any other counterfeit substance classified in Schedule I, II, or III, is guilty of a class C felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW;

(d) A counterfeit substance classified in Schedule IV, except flunitrazepam, is guilty of a class C felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW;

(e) A counterfeit substance classified in Schedule V, is guilty of a class C felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(3) A violation of subsection (1)(b) of this section is a ((misdemeanor))class C felony. The prosecutor is encouraged to divert such cases for assessment, treatment, or other services for a person's first two violations under this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 10.31.115 (Drug possession—Referral to assessment and services) and 2021 c 311 s 13;

(2) 2021 c 311 s 15;

(3) 2021 c 311 s 16; and

(4) 2021 c 311 s 29 (uncodified).

--- END ---