BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Beginning on September 1, 2023, institutions of higher education must provide enrollment and registration in college in the high school courses in which a student is eligible to receive college credit available at no cost for students in the ninth, 10th, 11th, or 12th grade at public high schools.

(2) Beginning with the 2023-2025 omnibus operating appropriation act, the legislature must pass an omnibus operating appropriations act that appropriates to the state board of community and technical colleges and each of the public four-year institutions of higher education state funding for college in high school courses administered at public secondary schools.

(3) State appropriations for the college in the high school program to the institutions of higher education shall be calculated as follows: The total college in the high school courses administered in the prior academic year, funded at a rate of:

(a) $6,000 per college in the high school course administered by a state university as defined in RCW 28B.10.016;

(b) $5,500 per college in the high school course administered by a regional university or the state college; or

(c) $3,500 per college in the high school course administered by a community or technical college.

(4) Beginning with fiscal year 2025 the rate per college in the high school course administered must be adjusted annually for inflation as measured by the consumer price index.

(5) State appropriations must be based on the total number of college in the high school courses administered by an institution of higher education for the academic year immediately prior to the current fiscal year. The state appropriation is based on course administration data submitted annually by October 15th to the office of financial management and legislative fiscal staff.

(6) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Community or technical college" has the same meaning as provided for under RCW 28B.50.030.

(b) "Course" means a class taught under a contract between an institution of higher education and a single high school teacher on an articulated subject in which the student is eligible to receive college credit.

(c) "High school" means a public school, as defined in RCW 28A.150.010, that serves students in any of grades nine through 12.

(d) "Institutions of higher education" has the same meaning as provided for under RCW 28B.10.016.

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.600.287 and 2021 c 71 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) College in the high school is a dual credit program located on a high school campus or in a high school environment in which a high school student is able to earn both high school and college credit by completing college level courses with a passing grade. A college in the high school program must meet the accreditation requirements in RCW 28B.10.035 and the requirements in this section.

(2) A college in the high school program may include both academic and career and technical education.

(3) Ninth, 10th, 11th, and 12th grade students, and students who have not yet received a high school diploma or its equivalent and are eligible to be in the ninth, 10th, 11th, or 12th grades, may participate in a college in the high school program.

(4) A college in the high school program must be governed by a local contract between an institution of higher education and a school district, charter school, or state-tribal compact school, in compliance with the rules adopted by the superintendent of public instruction under this section. The local contract must include the qualifications for students to enroll in a program course.

(5)(((a) An institution of higher education may charge tuition fees per credit to each student enrolled in a program course as established in this subsection (5).

(b)(i) The maximum per college credit tuition fee for a program course is $65 per college credit adjusted for inflation using the implicit price deflator for that fiscal year, using fiscal year 2021 as the base, as compiled by the bureau of labor statistics, United States department of labor for the state of Washington.

(ii) Annually by July 1st, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must calculate the maximum per college credit tuition fee and post the fee on its website.

(c) The funds received by an institution of higher education under this subsection (5) are not tuition or operating fees and may be retained by the institution of higher education.

(6))) Enrollment information on persons registered under this section must be maintained by the institution of higher education separately from other enrollment information and may not be included in official enrollment reports, nor may such persons be considered in any enrollment statistics that would affect higher education budgetary determinations.

(((7)))(6) Each school district, charter school, and state-tribal compact school must award high school credit to a student enrolled in a program course if the student successfully completes the course. If no comparable course is offered by the school district, charter school, or state-tribal compact school, the chief administrator shall determine how many credits to award for the successful completion of the program course. The determination must be made in writing before the student enrolls in the program course. The awarded credit must be applied toward graduation requirements and subject area requirements. Evidence of successful completion of each program course must be included in the student's high school records and transcript.

(((8) An))(7) Each institution of higher education ((must award))offering college in the high school must:

(a) Award college credit to a student enrolled in a program course ((if the student successfully completes the course. The awarded college credit must be applied toward general education requirements or degree requirements at the institution of higher education. Evidence of successful completion of each program course must be included in the student's college transcript))and provide evidence of completion of each program course on the student's college transcript;

(b) Grant undergraduate college credit as appropriate and applicable to the student's degree requirements; and

(c) Provide course equivalencies for college in the high school courses and policy for awarding credit on the institution's website.

(((9)))(8)(a) A high school that offers a college in the high school program must provide general information about the program to all students in grades eight through 12 and to the parents and guardians of those students.

(b) A high school that offers a college in the high school program must include the following information about program courses in the high school catalogue or equivalent:

(i) There is no fee for students to enroll in a program course ((to earn only high school credit. Fees apply for students who choose to enroll in a program course to earn both high school and college credit;

(ii) A description and breakdown of the fees charged to students to earn college credit;

(iii) A description of fee payment and financial assistance options available to students; and

(iv)))for high school credit or for students to enroll in a program course for both high school and college credit; and

(ii) A notification that ((paying for))enrolling in a program course for college credit automatically starts an official college transcript with the institution of higher education offering the program course regardless of student performance in the program course, and that college credit earned upon successful completion of a program course may count only as elective credit if transferred to another institution of higher education.

(((10)))(9) Full-time and part-time faculty at institutions of higher education, including adjunct faculty, are eligible to teach program courses.

(((11) Students enrolled in a program course may pay college in the high school fees with advanced college tuition payment program tuition units at a rate set by the advanced college tuition payment program governing body under chapter 28B.95 RCW.

(12)))(10) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules for the administration of this section. The rules must be jointly developed by the superintendent of public instruction, the state board for community and technical colleges, the student achievement council, and the public baccalaureate institutions. The association of Washington school principals must be consulted during the rules development. The rules must outline quality and eligibility standards that are informed by nationally recognized standards or models. In addition, the rules must encourage the maximum use of the program and may not narrow or limit the enrollment options.

(13) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section((.)), unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

(a) "Charter school" means a school established under chapter 28A.710 RCW.

(b) "High school" means a public school, as defined in RCW 28A.150.010, that serves students in any of grades nine through 12.

(c) "Institution of higher education" has the same meaning as in RCW 28B.10.016, and also means a public tribal college located in Washington and accredited by the northwest commission on colleges and universities or another accrediting association recognized by the United States department of education.

(d) "Program course" means a college course offered in a high school under a college in the high school program.

(e) "State-tribal compact school" means a school established under chapter 28A.715 RCW.

Sec. 3. RCW 28B.76.730 and 2021 c 71 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature recognizes that dual credit programs reduce both the cost and time of attendance to obtain a postsecondary degree. The legislature intends to reduce barriers and increase access to postsecondary educational opportunities for low-income students by removing the financial barriers for dual enrollment programs for students.

(2) The office, in consultation with the institutions of higher education and the office of the superintendent of public instruction, shall create the Washington dual enrollment scholarship pilot program. The office shall administer the Washington dual enrollment scholarship pilot program and may adopt rules as necessary.

(3) Eligible students are those who meet the following requirements:

(a) Qualify for the free or reduced-price lunch program;

(b) Are enrolled in one or more dual credit programs, as defined in RCW 28B.15.821, such as ((college in the high school and)) running start; and

(c) Have at least a 2.0 grade point average.

(4) Subject to availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, beginning with the 2019-20 academic year, the office may award scholarships to eligible students. The scholarship award must be as follows((:

(a) For))for eligible students enrolled in running start:

(((i)))(a) Mandatory fees, as defined in RCW 28A.600.310(2), prorated based on credit load;

(((ii)))(b) Course fees or laboratory fees as determined appropriate by college or university policies to pay for specified course related costs;

(((iii)))(c) A textbook voucher to be used at the institution of higher education's bookstore where the student is enrolled. For every credit per quarter the student is enrolled, the student shall receive a textbook voucher for ten dollars, up to a maximum of fifteen credits per quarter, or the equivalent, per year; and

(((iv)))(d) Apprenticeship materials as determined appropriate by the college or university to pay for specific course-related material costs, which may include occupation-specific tools, work clothes, rain gear, or boots.

(((b) An eligible student enrolled in a college in the high school program may receive a scholarship for tuition fees as set forth under RCW 28A.600.287.))

(5) The Washington dual enrollment scholarship pilot program must apply after the fee waivers for low-income students under RCW 28A.600.310 ((and subsidies under RCW 28A.600.290)) are provided for.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. RCW 28A.600.290 (College in the high school program—Funding) and 2021 c 71 s 2, 2015 c 202 s 3, 2012 c 229 s 801, & 2009 c 450 s 3 are each repealed.

--- END ---