BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 70.395.010 (Findings—Intent) and 2021 c 30 s 1;

(2) RCW 70.395.020 (Definitions) and 2021 c 30 s 2;

(3) RCW 70.395.030 (Prohibition on private incarceration) and 2021 c 30 s 3;

(4) RCW 70.395.900 (Construction—2021 c 30) and 2021 c 30 s 4; and

(5) RCW 70.395.901 (Effective date—2021 c 30) and 2021 c 30 s 5.

--- END ---