BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature recognizes that it has previously found that every three minutes an American child or adult is diagnosed with a potentially fatal blood disease. For many of these individuals, bone marrow transplantation is the only chance for survival. The legislature finds that 70 percent of patients do not have a fully matched donor in their family and rely on a registry to find an unrelated donor. The legislature further finds that 40 to 71 percent of individuals with diverse heritage never find a bone marrow match. The ultimate key to survivability lies in increasing the number of bone marrow donors across all ethnicities, which will increase the potential for a suitable match.

(2) It is the intent of the legislature to continue to increase awareness of bone marrow donation by encouraging school districts, charter schools, and state-tribal compact schools to offer instruction on this topic to high school students in at least one health class necessary for graduation. The legislature also intends for this instruction to be optional for elementary and middle school students.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28A.210 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Each school district, charter school, and state-tribal education compact school that serves students in any of grades nine through 12 is encouraged to offer instruction in awareness of bone marrow donation to students as provided in this section. Beginning with the 2023-24 school year, instruction in awareness of bone marrow donation may be included in at least one health class necessary for graduation.

(2)(a) Instruction in awareness of bone marrow donation under this section may be an instructional program provided by the national marrow donor program or other relevant nationally recognized organization.

(b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must post on its website a link to the instructional program described in this subsection (2).

(3) Each school district, charter school, and state-tribal education compact school that serves students in any of grades kindergarten through eight may offer instruction in awareness of bone marrow donation to students. The instruction described in subsection (2) of this section may be adapted to be age appropriate.

(4) School districts, charter schools, and state-tribal education compact schools may offer the instruction in awareness of bone marrow donation directly or arrange for the instruction to be provided by available community-based providers. The instruction does not have to be provided by certificated instructional staff.

--- END ---