BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.330.540 and 2022 c 16 s 36 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The cannabis social equity technical assistance grant program is established and is to be administered by the department.

(2)(a) The cannabis social equity technical assistance grant program must award grants to:

(i) Cannabis license applicants who are social equity applicants submitting social equity plans under RCW 69.50.335; and

(ii) Cannabis licensees holding a license issued after June 30, 2020, and before July 25, 2021, who meet the social equity applicant criteria under RCW 69.50.335.

(b) Grant recipients under this subsection (2) must demonstrate completion of their project within 12 months of receiving a grant, unless a grant recipient requests, and the department approves, additional time to complete the project.

(3) The department must award grants primarily based on the strength of the social equity plans submitted by cannabis license applicants and cannabis licensees holding a license issued after ((June 30, 2020))April 1, 2023, and before ((July 25, 2021))July 1, 2024, but may also consider additional criteria if deemed necessary or appropriate by the department. Technical assistance activities eligible for funding include, but are not limited to:

(a) Assistance navigating the cannabis licensure process;

(b) Cannabis-business specific education and business plan development;

(c) Regulatory compliance training;

(d) Financial management training and assistance in seeking financing;

(e) Strengthening a social equity plan; and

(f) Connecting social equity applicants with established industry members and tribal cannabis enterprises and programs for mentoring and other forms of support.

(4) The department may contract to establish a roster of mentors who are available to support and advise social equity applicants and current licensees who meet the social equity applicant criteria under RCW 69.50.335. Contractors under this section must:

(a) Have knowledge and experience demonstrating their ability to effectively advise eligible applicants and licensees in navigating the state's licensing and regulatory framework or on producing and processing cannabis;

(b) Be a business that is at least 51 percent minority or woman-owned; and

(c) Meet department reporting and invoicing requirements.

(5) Funding for the cannabis social equity technical assistance grant program must be provided ((through the dedicated cannabis account)) under RCW 69.50.540. Additionally, the department may solicit, receive, and expend private contributions to support the grant program.

(6) The department may adopt rules to implement this section.

(7) For the purposes of this section, "cannabis" has the meaning provided under RCW 69.50.101.

Sec. 2. RCW 69.50.331 and 2022 c 16 s 58 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For the purpose of considering any application for a license to produce, process, research, transport, or deliver cannabis, useable cannabis, cannabis concentrates, or cannabis-infused products subject to the regulations established under RCW 69.50.385, or sell cannabis, or for the renewal of a license to produce, process, research, transport, or deliver cannabis, useable cannabis, cannabis concentrates, or cannabis-infused products subject to the regulations established under RCW 69.50.385, or sell cannabis, the board must conduct a comprehensive, fair, and impartial evaluation of the applications timely received.

(a) The board may cause an inspection of the premises to be made, and may inquire into all matters in connection with the construction and operation of the premises. For the purpose of reviewing any application for a license and for considering the denial, suspension, revocation, cancellation, or renewal or denial thereof, of any license, the board may consider any prior criminal arrests or convictions of the applicant, any public safety administrative violation history record with the board, and a criminal history record information check. The board may submit the criminal history record information check to the Washington state patrol and to the identification division of the federal bureau of investigation in order that these agencies may search their records for prior arrests and convictions of the individual or individuals who filled out the forms. The board must require fingerprinting of any applicant whose criminal history record information check is submitted to the federal bureau of investigation. The provisions of RCW 9.95.240 and of chapter 9.96A RCW do not apply to these cases. Subject to the provisions of this section, the board may, in its discretion, grant or deny the renewal or license applied for. Denial may be based on, without limitation, the existence of chronic illegal activity documented in objections submitted pursuant to subsections (7)(c) and (10) of this section. Authority to approve an uncontested or unopposed license may be granted by the board to any staff member the board designates in writing. Conditions for granting this authority must be adopted by rule.

(b) No license of any kind may be issued to:

(i) A person under the age of ((twenty-one))21 years;

(ii) A person doing business as a sole proprietor who has not lawfully resided in the state for at least six months prior to applying to receive a license;

(iii) A partnership, employee cooperative, association, nonprofit corporation, or corporation unless formed under the laws of this state, and unless all of the members thereof are qualified to obtain a license as provided in this section; or

(iv) A person whose place of business is conducted by a manager or agent, unless the manager or agent possesses the same qualifications required of the licensee.

(2)(a) The board may, in its discretion, subject to RCW 43.05.160, 69.50.563, 69.50.562, 69.50.334, and 69.50.342(3) suspend or cancel any license; and all protections of the licensee from criminal or civil sanctions under state law for producing, processing, researching, or selling cannabis, cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, or cannabis-infused products thereunder must be suspended or terminated, as the case may be.

(b) The board must immediately suspend the license of a person who has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social and health services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order. If the person has continued to meet all other requirements for reinstatement during the suspension, reissuance of the license is automatic upon the board's receipt of a release issued by the department of social and health services stating that the licensee is in compliance with the order.

(c) The board may request the appointment of administrative law judges under chapter 34.12 RCW who shall have power to administer oaths, issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of papers, books, accounts, documents, and testimony, examine witnesses, receive testimony in any inquiry, investigation, hearing, or proceeding in any part of the state, and consider mitigating and aggravating circumstances in any case and deviate from any prescribed penalty, under rules the board may adopt.

(d) Witnesses must be allowed fees and mileage each way to and from any inquiry, investigation, hearing, or proceeding at the rate authorized by RCW 34.05.446. Fees need not be paid in advance of appearance of witnesses to testify or to produce books, records, or other legal evidence.

(e) In case of disobedience of any person to comply with the order of the board or a subpoena issued by the board, or any of its members, or administrative law judges, or on the refusal of a witness to testify to any matter regarding which he or she may be lawfully interrogated, the judge of the superior court of the county in which the person resides, on application of any member of the board or administrative law judge, compels obedience by contempt proceedings, as in the case of disobedience of the requirements of a subpoena issued from said court or a refusal to testify therein.

(3) Upon receipt of notice of the suspension or cancellation of a license, the licensee must forthwith deliver up the license to the board. Where the license has been suspended only, the board must return the license to the licensee at the expiration or termination of the period of suspension. The board must notify all other licensees in the county where the subject licensee has its premises of the suspension or cancellation of the license; and no other licensee or employee of another licensee may allow or cause any cannabis, cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, or cannabis-infused products to be delivered to or for any person at the premises of the subject licensee.

(4) Every license issued under this chapter is subject to all conditions and restrictions imposed by this chapter or by rules adopted by the board to implement and enforce this chapter. All conditions and restrictions imposed by the board in the issuance of an individual license must be listed on the face of the individual license along with the trade name, address, and expiration date.

(5) Every licensee must post and keep posted its license, or licenses, in a conspicuous place on the premises.

(6) No licensee may employ any person under the age of ((twenty-one))21 years.

(7)(a) Before the board issues a new or renewed license to an applicant it must give notice of the application to the chief executive officer of the incorporated city or town, if the application is for a license within an incorporated city or town, or to the county legislative authority, if the application is for a license outside the boundaries of incorporated cities or towns, or to the tribal government if the application is for a license within Indian country, or to the port authority if the application for a license is located on property owned by a port authority.

(b) The incorporated city or town through the official or employee selected by it, the county legislative authority or the official or employee selected by it, the tribal government, or port authority has the right to file with the board within twenty days after the date of transmittal of the notice for applications, or at least thirty days prior to the expiration date for renewals, written objections against the applicant or against the premises for which the new or renewed license is asked. The board may extend the time period for submitting written objections upon request from the authority notified by the board.

(c) The written objections must include a statement of all facts upon which the objections are based, and in case written objections are filed, the city or town or county legislative authority may request, and the board may in its discretion hold, a hearing subject to the applicable provisions of Title 34 RCW. If the board makes an initial decision to deny a license or renewal based on the written objections of an incorporated city or town or county legislative authority, the applicant may request a hearing subject to the applicable provisions of Title 34 RCW. If a hearing is held at the request of the applicant, board representatives must present and defend the board's initial decision to deny a license or renewal.

(d) Upon the granting of a license under this title the board must send written notification to the chief executive officer of the incorporated city or town in which the license is granted, or to the county legislative authority if the license is granted outside the boundaries of incorporated cities or towns.

(8)(a) Except as provided in (b) through (e) of this subsection, the board may not issue a license for any premises within ((one thousand))1,000 feet of the perimeter of the grounds of any elementary or secondary school, playground, recreation center or facility, child care center, public park, public transit center, or library, or any game arcade admission to which is not restricted to persons aged ((twenty-one))21 years or older.

(b) A city, county, or town may permit the licensing of premises within ((one thousand))1,000 feet but not less than ((one hundred))100 feet of the facilities described in (a) of this subsection, except elementary schools, secondary schools, and playgrounds, by enacting an ordinance authorizing such distance reduction, provided that such distance reduction will not negatively impact the jurisdiction's civil regulatory enforcement, criminal law enforcement interests, public safety, or public health.

(c) A city, county, or town may permit the licensing of research premises allowed under RCW 69.50.372 within ((one thousand))1,000 feet but not less than ((one hundred))100 feet of the facilities described in (a) of this subsection by enacting an ordinance authorizing such distance reduction, provided that the ordinance will not negatively impact the jurisdiction's civil regulatory enforcement, criminal law enforcement, public safety, or public health.

(d) The board may license premises located in compliance with the distance requirements set in an ordinance adopted under (b) or (c) of this subsection. Before issuing or renewing a research license for premises within ((one thousand))1,000 feet but not less than ((one hundred))100 feet of an elementary school, secondary school, or playground in compliance with an ordinance passed pursuant to (c) of this subsection, the board must ensure that the facility:

(i) Meets a security standard exceeding that which applies to cannabis producer, processor, or retailer licensees;

(ii) Is inaccessible to the public and no part of the operation of the facility is in view of the general public; and

(iii) Bears no advertising or signage indicating that it is a cannabis research facility.

(e) The board must issue a certificate of compliance if the premises met the requirements under (a), (b), (c), or (d) of this subsection on the date of the application. The certificate allows the licensee to operate the business at the proposed location notwithstanding a later occurring, otherwise disqualifying factor.

(f) The board may not issue a license for any premises within Indian country, as defined in 18 U.S.C. Sec. 1151, including any fee patent lands within the exterior boundaries of a reservation, without the consent of the federally recognized tribe associated with the reservation or Indian country.

(9) A city, town, or county may adopt an ordinance prohibiting a cannabis producer or cannabis processor from operating or locating a business within areas zoned primarily for residential use or rural use with a minimum lot size of five acres or smaller.

(10) In determining whether to grant or deny a license or renewal of any license, the board must give substantial weight to objections from an incorporated city or town or county legislative authority based upon chronic illegal activity associated with the applicant's operations of the premises proposed to be licensed or the applicant's operation of any other licensed premises, or the conduct of the applicant's patrons inside or outside the licensed premises. "Chronic illegal activity" means (a) a pervasive pattern of activity that threatens the public health, safety, and welfare of the city, town, or county including, but not limited to, open container violations, assaults, disturbances, disorderly conduct, or other criminal law violations, or as documented in crime statistics, police reports, emergency medical response data, calls for service, field data, or similar records of a law enforcement agency for the city, town, county, or any other municipal corporation or any state agency; or (b) an unreasonably high number of citations for violations of RCW 46.61.502 associated with the applicant's or licensee's operation of any licensed premises as indicated by the reported statements given to law enforcement upon arrest.

(11) The board may not issue a cannabis retail license for any premises not currently licensed if:

(a) The board receives a written objection from an official representative or representatives of an incorporated city or town, or county legislative authority, relating to the physical location of the proposed premises;

(b) The objection to the location from the incorporated city or town, or county legislative authority, is received by the board within 20 days of the board notifying the incorporated city or town, or county legislative authority, of the proposed cannabis retail location; and

(c) The objection to the issuance of a cannabis retail license at the specified location is based on a preexisting local ordinance limiting outlet density in a specific geographic area.

(12) After January 1, 2024, all cannabis licensees are encouraged but are not required to submit a social equity plan to the board. Upon confirmation by the board that a cannabis licensee who is not a social equity applicant, and who does not hold a social equity license issued under RCW 69.50.335, has submitted a social equity plan, the board must within 30 days reimburse such a licensee an amount equal to the cost of the licensee's annual cannabis license renewal fee. The license renewal fee reimbursement authorized under this subsection is subject to the following limitations:

(a) The board may provide reimbursement one time only to any licensed entity; and

(b) Any licensed entity holding more than one cannabis license is eligible for reimbursement of the license renewal fee on only one license.

Sec. 3. RCW 69.50.335 and 2022 c 16 s 60 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Beginning December 1, 2020, and until July 1, ((2029))2032, cannabis retailer licenses, cannabis processor licenses, and cannabis producer licenses that have been subject to forfeiture, revocation, or cancellation by the board, or cannabis retailer licenses that were not previously issued by the board but could have been issued without exceeding the limit on the statewide number of cannabis retailer licenses established before January 1, 2020, by the board, may be issued or reissued to an applicant who meets the cannabis retailer license, cannabis processor license, or cannabis producer license requirements of this chapter.

(b) In accordance with (a) of this subsection, the board may issue or reissue:

(i) Up to 100 cannabis processor licenses immediately; and

(ii) Beginning January 1, 2025, up to 10 cannabis producer licenses, which must be issued in conjunction with a cannabis processor license.

(c) In addition to the cannabis retailer licenses and cannabis producer licenses that may be issued under (a) and (b) of this subsection, beginning January 1, 2023, and continuing every three years until July 1, 2032, the board may, with the approval of the legislature through the passage of a bill, increase the number of cannabis retailer licenses and cannabis producer licenses for the social equity program based on:

(i) The most recent census data available as of January 1, 2023; and

(ii) The annual population estimates published by the office of financial management.

(d) In addition to the cannabis retailer licenses that may be issued under (a) of this subsection, beginning January 1, 2024, and until July 1, 2032, the board may issue up to 52 cannabis retailer licenses for the social equity program.

(e)(i) At the time of licensure, all licenses issued under the social equity program under this section may be located in any city, town, or county in the state that allows cannabis retail or cannabis processing business activity at the proposed location, regardless of:

(A) Whether a cannabis retailer license or cannabis processor license was originally allocated to or issued in another city, town, or county; and

(B) The maximum number of retail cannabis licenses established by the board for each county under RCW 69.50.345.

(ii) The board must adopt rules establishing a threshold of the number of licenses created by this section that can be located in each county.

(f) After a social equity license has been issued under this section for a specific location, the location of the licensed business may not be moved to a city, town, or county different from the city, town, or county for which it was initially licensed.

(2)(a) In order to be considered for a ((retail))cannabis retailer license, cannabis processor license, or cannabis producer license under subsection (1) of this section, an applicant must be a social equity applicant and submit ((a social equity plan along with other cannabis retailer license application requirements))required cannabis license materials to the board. If the application proposes ownership by more than one person, then at least ((fifty-one))51 percent of the proposed ownership structure must reflect the qualifications of a social equity applicant.

(b) Persons holding an existing cannabis retailer license or title certificate for a cannabis retailer business in a local jurisdiction subject to a ban or moratorium on cannabis retail businesses may apply for a license under this section.

(3)(a) In determining the priority for issuance of a license among applicants, the board ((may prioritize applicants based on the extent to which the application addresses the components of the social equity plan))must select a third-party contractor to identify and score social equity applicants, using a scoring rubric developed by the board. The board must rely on the score provided by the third-party contractor in issuing licenses.

(b) The board may deny any application submitted under this subsection if ((the)):

(i) The board determines that((:

(i) The application does not meet social equity goals or does not meet social equity plan requirements; or

(ii) The application does not otherwise meet the licensing requirements of this chapter)), upon the advice of the third-party contractor, the application does not meet the social equity licensing requirements of this chapter; or

(ii) The board determines the application does not otherwise meet licensing requirements.

(4) The board ((may))must adopt rules to implement this section. ((Rules may include strategies for receiving))Prior to adopting any rule implementing this section, the board must consider advice on the social equity program from individuals the program is intended to benefit. Rules may also require that licenses awarded under this section only be transferred to or ((sold only to))assumed by individuals or groups of individuals who comply with the requirements for initial licensure as a social equity applicant ((with a social equity plan under this section))for a period of at least five years from the date of initial licensure.

(5) The annual fee for issuance, reissuance, or renewal for any license under this section must be ((equal to the fee established in RCW 69.50.325))waived through July 1, 2032.

(6) ((For the purposes of this section:))The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Disproportionately impacted area" means a census tract or comparable geographic area ((that satisfies the following criteria, which may be further defined in rule by the board after consultation with the commission on African American affairs and other agencies, commissions, and community members as determined by the board:

(i) The area has a high poverty rate;

(ii) The area has a high rate of participation in income-based federal or state programs))within Washington state where community members were more likely to be impacted by the war on drugs. These areas must be determined in rule by the board, in consultation with the office of equity, using a standardized statistical equation to identify areas with demographic indicators consistent with populations most impacted by the war on drugs. These areas must be assessed to account for demographic changes in the composition of the population over time. Disproportionately impacted areas must include census tracts or comparable geographic areas in the top 15th percentile in at least two of the following demographic indicators of populations most impacted by the war on drugs:

(i) The area has a high rate of people living under the federal poverty level;

(ii) The area has a high rate of people who did not graduate from high school;

(iii) The area has a high rate of unemployment; ((and))or

(iv) The area has a high rate of ((arrest, conviction, or incarceration related to the sale, possession, use, cultivation, manufacture, or transport of cannabis))people receiving public assistance.

(b) "Social equity applicant" means an applicant:

(i) ((An applicant who has at least fifty-one percent ownership and control by one or more individuals who have resided in a disproportionately impacted area for a period of time defined in rule by the board after consultation with the commission on African American affairs and other commissions, agencies, and community members as determined by the board;

(ii) An applicant who has at least fifty-one percent ownership and control by at least one individual who has been convicted of a cannabis offense, a drug offense, or is a family member of such an individual; or

(iii) An applicant who meets criteria defined in rule by the board after consultation with the commission on African American affairs and other commissions, agencies, and community members as determined by the board))who has at least 51 percent ownership and control by one or more individuals who meet at least two of the following qualifications:

(i) Lived in a disproportionately impacted area in Washington state for a minimum of five years between 1980 and 2010;

(ii) Has been arrested or convicted of a cannabis offense or has a family member who has been arrested or convicted of a cannabis offense;

(iii) Had a household income in the year prior to submitting an application under this section that was less than the median household income within the state of Washington as calculated by the United States census bureau; or

(iv) Is both a socially and economically disadvantaged individual as defined by the office of minority and women's business enterprises under chapter 39.19 RCW.

(c) "Social equity goals" means:

(i) Increasing the number of cannabis retailer licenses held by social equity applicants from disproportionately impacted areas; and

(ii) Reducing accumulated harm suffered by individuals, families, and local areas subject to severe impacts from the historical application and enforcement of cannabis prohibition laws.

(d) "Social equity plan" means a plan that addresses at least some of the elements outlined in this subsection (6)(d), along with any additional plan components or requirements approved by the board following consultation with the task force created in RCW 69.50.336. The plan may include:

(i) A statement that ((the social equity applicant qualifies as a social equity applicant and intends to own at least fifty-one percent of the proposed cannabis retail business or applicants representing at least fifty-one percent of the ownership of the proposed business qualify as social equity applicants))indicates how the cannabis licensee will work to promote social equity goals in their community;

(ii) A description of how ((issuing a))the cannabis ((retail license to the social equity applicant))licensee will meet social equity goals;

(iii) ((The social equity applicant's personal or family history with the criminal justice system including any offenses involving cannabis;

(iv))) The composition of the workforce the ((social equity applicant))licensee has employed or intends to hire;

(((v) Neighborhood characteristics of the location where the social equity applicant intends to operate, focusing especially on disproportionately impacted areas;)) and

(((vi)))(iv) Business plans involving partnerships or assistance to organizations or residents with connection to populations with a history of high rates of enforcement of cannabis prohibition.

(7) Except for the process detailed in subsection (1) of this section, the process for creating new cannabis retail licenses under this chapter remains unaltered.

Sec. 4. RCW 69.50.345 and 2022 c 16 s 64 are each amended to read as follows:

The board, subject to the provisions of this chapter, must adopt rules that establish the procedures and criteria necessary to implement the following:

(1) Licensing of cannabis producers, cannabis processors, and cannabis retailers, including prescribing forms and establishing application, reinstatement, and renewal fees.

(a) Application forms for cannabis producers must request the applicant to state whether the applicant intends to produce cannabis for sale by cannabis retailers holding medical cannabis endorsements and the amount of or percentage of canopy the applicant intends to commit to growing plants determined by the department under RCW 69.50.375 to be of a THC concentration, CBD concentration, or THC to CBD ratio appropriate for cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, or cannabis-infused products sold to qualifying patients.

(b) The board must reconsider and increase limits on the amount of square feet permitted to be in production on July 24, 2015, and increase the percentage of production space for those cannabis producers who intend to grow plants for cannabis retailers holding medical cannabis endorsements if the cannabis producer designates the increased production space to plants determined by the department under RCW 69.50.375 to be of a THC concentration, CBD concentration, or THC to CBD ratio appropriate for cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, or cannabis-infused products to be sold to qualifying patients. If current cannabis producers do not use all the increased production space, the board may reopen the license period for new cannabis producer license applicants but only to those cannabis producers who agree to grow plants for cannabis retailers holding medical cannabis endorsements. Priority in licensing must be given to cannabis producer license applicants who have an application pending on July 24, 2015, but who are not yet licensed and then to new cannabis producer license applicants. After January 1, 2017, any reconsideration of the limits on the amount of square feet permitted to be in production to meet the medical needs of qualifying patients must consider information contained in the medical cannabis authorization database established in RCW 69.51A.230;

(2) ((Determining))(a) Except as provided in RCW 69.50.335, determining, in consultation with the office of financial management, the maximum number of retail outlets that may be licensed in each county, taking into consideration:

(((a)))(i) Population distribution;

(((b)))(ii) Security and safety issues;

(((c)))(iii) The provision of adequate access to licensed sources of cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, and cannabis-infused products to discourage purchases from the illegal market; and

(((d)))(iv) The number of retail outlets holding medical cannabis endorsements necessary to meet the medical needs of qualifying patients. The board must reconsider and increase the maximum number of retail outlets it established before July 24, 2015, and allow for a new license application period and a greater number of retail outlets to be permitted in order to accommodate the medical needs of qualifying patients and designated providers. After January 1, 2017, any reconsideration of the maximum number of retail outlets needed to meet the medical needs of qualifying patients must consider information contained in the medical cannabis authorization database established in RCW 69.51A.230.

(b)(i) In making the determination under (a) of this subsection, the board must consider written input from an incorporated city or town, or county legislative authority when evaluating concerns related to outlet density.

(ii) Nothing in this chapter limits an incorporated city or town, or county legislative authority from enacting an ordinance prescribing outlet density limitations.

(iii) The board may adopt rules to identify how local jurisdiction input will be evaluated;

(3) Determining the maximum quantity of cannabis a cannabis producer may have on the premises of a licensed location at any time without violating Washington state law;

(4) Determining the maximum quantities of cannabis, cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, and cannabis-infused products a cannabis processor may have on the premises of a licensed location at any time without violating Washington state law;

(5) Determining the maximum quantities of cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, and cannabis-infused products a cannabis retailer may have on the premises of a retail outlet at any time without violating Washington state law;

(6) In making the determinations required by this section, the board shall take into consideration:

(a) Security and safety issues;

(b) The provision of adequate access to licensed sources of cannabis, cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, and cannabis-infused products to discourage purchases from the illegal market; and

(c) Economies of scale, and their impact on licensees' ability to both comply with regulatory requirements and undercut illegal market prices;

(7) Determining the nature, form, and capacity of all containers to be used by licensees to contain cannabis, cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, and cannabis-infused products, and their labeling requirements;

(8) In consultation with the department of agriculture and the department, establishing classes of cannabis, cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, and cannabis infused products according to grade, condition, cannabinoid profile, THC concentration, CBD concentration, or other qualitative measurements deemed appropriate by the board;

(9) Establishing reasonable time, place, and manner restrictions and requirements regarding advertising of cannabis, cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, and cannabis-infused products that are not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter, taking into consideration:

(a) Federal laws relating to cannabis that are applicable within Washington state;

(b) Minimizing exposure of people under twenty-one years of age to the advertising;

(c) The inclusion of medically and scientifically accurate information about the health and safety risks posed by cannabis use in the advertising; and

(d) Ensuring that retail outlets with medical cannabis endorsements may advertise themselves as medical retail outlets;

(10) Specifying and regulating the time and periods when, and the manner, methods, and means by which, licensees shall transport and deliver cannabis, cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, and cannabis-infused products within the state;

(11) In consultation with the department and the department of agriculture, establishing accreditation requirements for testing laboratories used by licensees to demonstrate compliance with standards adopted by the board, and prescribing methods of producing, processing, and packaging cannabis, cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, and cannabis-infused products; conditions of sanitation; and standards of ingredients, quality, and identity of cannabis, cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, and cannabis-infused products produced, processed, packaged, or sold by licensees;

(12) Specifying procedures for identifying, seizing, confiscating, destroying, and donating to law enforcement for training purposes all cannabis, cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, and cannabis-infused products produced, processed, packaged, labeled, or offered for sale in this state that do not conform in all respects to the standards prescribed by this chapter or the rules of the board.

Sec. 5. RCW 69.50.345 and 2022 c 16 s 65 are each amended to read as follows:

The board, subject to the provisions of this chapter, must adopt rules that establish the procedures and criteria necessary to implement the following:

(1) Licensing of cannabis producers, cannabis processors, and cannabis retailers, including prescribing forms and establishing application, reinstatement, and renewal fees.

(a) Application forms for cannabis producers must request the applicant to state whether the applicant intends to produce cannabis for sale by cannabis retailers holding medical cannabis endorsements and the amount of or percentage of canopy the applicant intends to commit to growing plants determined by the department under RCW 69.50.375 to be of a THC concentration, CBD concentration, or THC to CBD ratio appropriate for cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, or cannabis-infused products sold to qualifying patients.

(b) The board must reconsider and increase limits on the amount of square feet permitted to be in production on July 24, 2015, and increase the percentage of production space for those cannabis producers who intend to grow plants for cannabis retailers holding medical cannabis endorsements if the cannabis producer designates the increased production space to plants determined by the department under RCW 69.50.375 to be of a THC concentration, CBD concentration, or THC to CBD ratio appropriate for cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, or cannabis-infused products to be sold to qualifying patients. If current cannabis producers do not use all the increased production space, the board may reopen the license period for new cannabis producer license applicants but only to those cannabis producers who agree to grow plants for cannabis retailers holding medical cannabis endorsements. Priority in licensing must be given to cannabis producer license applicants who have an application pending on July 24, 2015, but who are not yet licensed and then to new cannabis producer license applicants. After January 1, 2017, any reconsideration of the limits on the amount of square feet permitted to be in production to meet the medical needs of qualifying patients must consider information contained in the medical cannabis authorization database established in RCW 69.51A.230;

(2) ((Determining))(a) Except as provided in RCW 69.50.335, determining, in consultation with the office of financial management, the maximum number of retail outlets that may be licensed in each county, taking into consideration:

(((a)))(i) Population distribution;

(((b)))(ii) Security and safety issues;

(((c)))(iii) The provision of adequate access to licensed sources of cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, and cannabis-infused products to discourage purchases from the illegal market; and

(((d)))(iv) The number of retail outlets holding medical cannabis endorsements necessary to meet the medical needs of qualifying patients. The board must reconsider and increase the maximum number of retail outlets it established before July 24, 2015, and allow for a new license application period and a greater number of retail outlets to be permitted in order to accommodate the medical needs of qualifying patients and designated providers. After January 1, 2017, any reconsideration of the maximum number of retail outlets needed to meet the medical needs of qualifying patients must consider information contained in the medical cannabis authorization database established in RCW 69.51A.230.

(b)(i) In making the determination under (a) of this subsection, the board must consider written input from an incorporated city or town, or county legislative authority when evaluating concerns related to outlet density.

(ii) Nothing in this chapter limits an incorporated city or town, or county legislative authority from enacting an ordinance prescribing outlet density limitations.

(iii) The board may adopt rules to identify how local jurisdiction input will be evaluated;

(3) Determining the maximum quantity of cannabis a cannabis producer may have on the premises of a licensed location at any time without violating Washington state law;

(4) Determining the maximum quantities of cannabis, cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, and cannabis-infused products a cannabis processor may have on the premises of a licensed location at any time without violating Washington state law;

(5) Determining the maximum quantities of cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, and cannabis-infused products a cannabis retailer may have on the premises of a retail outlet at any time without violating Washington state law;

(6) In making the determinations required by this section, the board shall take into consideration:

(a) Security and safety issues;

(b) The provision of adequate access to licensed sources of cannabis, cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, and cannabis-infused products to discourage purchases from the illegal market; and

(c) Economies of scale, and their impact on licensees' ability to both comply with regulatory requirements and undercut illegal market prices;

(7) Determining the nature, form, and capacity of all containers to be used by licensees to contain cannabis, cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, and cannabis-infused products, and their labeling requirements;

(8) In consultation with the department of agriculture and the department, establishing classes of cannabis, cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, and cannabis-infused products according to grade, condition, cannabinoid profile, THC concentration, CBD concentration, or other qualitative measurements deemed appropriate by the board;

(9) Establishing reasonable time, place, and manner restrictions and requirements regarding advertising of cannabis, cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, and cannabis-infused products that are not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter, taking into consideration:

(a) Federal laws relating to cannabis that are applicable within Washington state;

(b) Minimizing exposure of people under ((twenty-one))21 years of age to the advertising;

(c) The inclusion of medically and scientifically accurate information about the health and safety risks posed by cannabis use in the advertising; and

(d) Ensuring that retail outlets with medical cannabis endorsements may advertise themselves as medical retail outlets;

(10) Specifying and regulating the time and periods when, and the manner, methods, and means by which, licensees shall transport and deliver cannabis, cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, and cannabis-infused products within the state;

(11) In consultation with the department and the department of agriculture, prescribing methods of producing, processing, and packaging cannabis, cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, and cannabis-infused products; conditions of sanitation; and standards of ingredients, quality, and identity of cannabis, cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, and cannabis-infused products produced, processed, packaged, or sold by licensees;

(12) Specifying procedures for identifying, seizing, confiscating, destroying, and donating to law enforcement for training purposes all cannabis, cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, and cannabis-infused products produced, processed, packaged, labeled, or offered for sale in this state that do not conform in all respects to the standards prescribed by this chapter or the rules of the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. (1) The joint legislative audit and review committee must review prior canopy studies completed by the liquor and cannabis board and examine whether current levels of cannabis production align with market demand and capacity, including the impact of any additional cannabis producer licenses granted under this act.

(2) The joint legislative audit and review committee must report results of their review to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. Section 4 of this act expires July 1, 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. Section 5 of this act takes effect July 1, 2024.

--- END ---