BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that marine nearshore habitat in Puget Sound is important for the recovery of threatened and endangered species of salmon, orcas, and marine birds. Critical nearshore components include forage fish spawning habitat, submerged aquatic vegetation, benthic substrate, adjacent upland vegetation, and the geomorphic processes that support a healthy ecosystem and food web. Establishing and regularly updating a publicly available baseline survey and map of general shoreline conditions, including the presence, location, and condition of nearshore development, is a critical tool for regulatory planning and restoration and mitigation opportunity identification by state agencies, local jurisdictions, tribal governments, and nongovernmental organizations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 43.21A RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department must conduct and maintain a baseline survey of Puget Sound marine shorelines that utilizes new technology to capture georeferenced oblique aerial and 360 degree on-the-water imagery. Nothing in this section creates a requirement for the department to perform change analysis. However, the software used must have the capacity for change analysis review. These identified technologies are intended to be a minimum requirement and the department may utilize and incorporate additional tools and technologies as they become available. The survey must document and map existing general shoreline conditions, structures, and structure conditions. This information must be available to the public and incorporated into state geographic information system mapping.

(2) The initial marine oblique aerial and on-the-water imagery must be completed and publicly available by June 30, 2024, and updated on a regular two-year cycle thereafter. The survey to document and map existing shoreline conditions, structures, and structure conditions must be completed and publicly available by June 30, 2025, and updated on a regular two-year cycle thereafter.

(3) For the purposes of this section, "Puget Sound" means Puget Sound and related inland salt waters of the state of Washington inside the boundary line between Washington and British Columbia, the Strait of Juan de Fuca, Hood Canal, and the San Juan Islands.

--- END ---