BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.101.200 and 2021 c 334 s 977 and 2021 c 323 s 31 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) All law enforcement personnel((, except))who are not volunteers((,)) and reserve officers whether paid or unpaid, initially employed on or after January 1, 1978, shall engage in basic law enforcement training which complies with standards adopted by the commission pursuant to RCW 43.101.080. ((For personnel initially employed before January 1, 1990, such training shall be successfully completed during the first fifteen months of employment of such personnel unless otherwise extended or waived by the commission and shall be requisite to the continuation of such employment.)) Personnel ((initially employed on or after January 1, 1990,)) shall commence basic training during the first six months of employment unless the basic training requirement is otherwise waived or extended by the commission. Successful completion of basic training is requisite to the continuation of employment ((of such))for all law enforcement personnel ((initially employed on or after January 1, 1990)).

(2) Except as provided in RCW 43.101.170 and subsection (3) of this section, the commission shall provide the aforementioned training and shall have the sole authority to do so. The commission shall provide necessary facilities, supplies, materials, and the board and room of noncommuting attendees for seven days per week, except during the 2017-2019, 2019-2021, and 2021-2023 fiscal biennia when the employing, county, city, or state law enforcement agency shall reimburse the commission for twenty-five percent of the cost of training its personnel. Additionally, to the extent funds are provided for this purpose, the commission shall reimburse to participating law enforcement agencies with ten or less full-time commissioned patrol officers the cost of temporary replacement of each officer who is enrolled in basic law enforcement training: PROVIDED, That such reimbursement shall include only the actual cost of temporary replacement not to exceed the total amount of salary and benefits received by the replaced officer during his or her training period.

(3) Until July 1, 2027, an employing county, city, or state law enforcement agency may provide basic law enforcement training which complies with the standards adopted by the commission pursuant to RCW 43.101.080. Such training must be provided within the budget of the agency with no contribution from the state. To qualify, the agency must be granted a certificate of equivalency from the commission and must:

(a) Have curriculum aligned with and approved by the commission;

(b) Utilize commission certified instructors and officers to train recruits; and

(c) Be subject to periodic compliance audits by the commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) No later than November 1, 2026, the criminal justice training commission, in consultation with participating agencies, shall provide a written report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature analyzing the effectiveness of the delivery of basic law enforcement training through agencies certified pursuant to RCW 43.101.200(3). The report must include a list of the agencies that have been granted a certificate of equivalency; a comparison of the recruit failure rate and length of time to completion for individuals receiving training through the commission and those receiving training through equivalent training programs; the cost to deliver basic law enforcement training in both training programs; and the results of audits completed by the commission.

(2) This section expires July 1, 2027.

--- END ---