BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 49.44 RCW to read as follows:

Unless a criminal or civil remedy is otherwise specified for a violation in this chapter, an employee, applicant, or prospective applicant aggrieved by a violation of a provision in this chapter may bring a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction. The court may award any prevailing employee, applicant, or prospective applicant injunctive relief or other equitable relief, actual damages, and a penalty of no less than $500 and no more than $1,000. The court must award any prevailing employee, applicant, or prospective applicant reasonable attorneys' fees and costs.

--- END ---