BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 71.05.148 and 2022 c 210 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is in need of assisted outpatient treatment if the court finds by ((clear, cogent, and convincing))a preponderance of the evidence pursuant to a petition filed under this section that:

(a) The person has a behavioral health disorder;

(b) Based on a clinical determination and in view of the person's treatment history and current behavior, at least one of the following is true:

(i) The person is unlikely to survive safely in the community without supervision and the person's condition is substantially deteriorating; or

(ii) The person is in need of assisted outpatient treatment in order to prevent a relapse or deterioration that would be likely to result in grave disability or a likelihood of serious harm to the person or to others;

(c) The person has a history of lack of compliance with treatment for his or her behavioral health disorder that has:

(i) At least twice within the 36 months prior to the filing of the petition been a significant factor in necessitating hospitalization of the person, or the person's receipt of services in a forensic or other mental health unit of a state correctional facility or local correctional facility, provided that the 36-month period shall be extended by the length of any hospitalization or incarceration of the person that occurred within the 36-month period;

(ii) At least twice within the 36 months prior to the filing of the petition been a significant factor in necessitating emergency medical care or hospitalization for behavioral health-related medical conditions including overdose, infected abscesses, sepsis, endocarditis, or other maladies, or a significant factor in behavior which resulted in the person's incarceration in a state or local correctional facility; or

(iii) Resulted in one or more violent acts, threats, or attempts to cause serious physical harm to the person or another within the 48 months prior to the filing of the petition, provided that the 48-month period shall be extended by the length of any hospitalization or incarceration of the person that occurred during the 48-month period;

(d) Participation in an assisted outpatient treatment program would be the least restrictive alternative necessary to ensure the person's recovery and stability; and

(e) The person will benefit from assisted outpatient treatment.

(2) The following individuals may directly file a petition for less restrictive alternative treatment on the basis that a person is in need of assisted outpatient treatment:

(a) The director of a hospital where the person is hospitalized or the director's designee;

(b) The director of a behavioral health service provider providing behavioral health care or residential services to the person or the director's designee;

(c) The person's treating mental health professional or substance use disorder professional or one who has evaluated the person;

(d) A designated crisis responder;

(e) A release planner from a corrections facility; or

(f) An emergency room physician.

(3) A court order for less restrictive alternative treatment on the basis that the person is in need of assisted outpatient treatment may be effective for up to 18 months, unless the person is currently detained for inpatient treatment for 14 days or more under RCW 71.05.240 or 71.05.320, in which case the order may be effective for 90 days if the person is currently detained for 14 days of treatment, or 180 days if the person is currently detained for 90 or 180 days of treatment. The petitioner must personally interview the person, unless the person refuses an interview, to determine whether the person will voluntarily receive appropriate treatment.

(4) The petitioner must allege specific facts based on personal observation, evaluation, or investigation, and must consider the reliability or credibility of any person providing information material to the petition.

(5) The petition must include:

(a) A statement of the circumstances under which the person's condition was made known and the basis for the opinion, from personal observation or investigation, that the person is in need of assisted outpatient treatment. The petitioner must state which specific facts come from personal observation and specify what other sources of information the petitioner has relied upon to form this belief;

(b) A declaration from a physician, physician assistant, advanced registered nurse practitioner, ((or)) the person's treating mental health professional or substance use disorder professional, or in the case of a person enrolled in treatment in a behavioral health agency, the person's behavioral health case manager, who has examined the person no more than 10 days prior to the submission of the petition and who is willing to testify in support of the petition, or who alternatively has made appropriate attempts to examine the person within the same period but has not been successful in obtaining the person's cooperation, and who is willing to testify to the reasons they believe that the person meets the criteria for assisted outpatient treatment((. If the declaration is provided by the person's treating mental health professional or substance use disorder professional, it must be cosigned by a supervising physician, physician assistant, or advanced registered nurse practitioner who certifies that they have reviewed the declaration));

(c) The declarations of additional witnesses, if any, supporting the petition for assisted outpatient treatment;

(d) The name of an agency, provider, or facility that agrees to provide less restrictive alternative treatment if the petition is granted by the court; and

(e) If the person is detained in a state hospital, inpatient treatment facility, jail, or correctional facility at the time the petition is filed, the anticipated release date of the person and any other details needed to facilitate successful reentry and transition into the community.

(6)(a) Upon receipt of a petition meeting all requirements of this section, the court shall fix a date for a hearing:

(i) No sooner than three days or later than seven days after the date of service or as stipulated by the parties or, upon a showing of good cause, no later than 30 days after the date of service; or

(ii) If the respondent is hospitalized at the time of filing of the petition, before discharge of the respondent and in sufficient time to arrange for a continuous transition from inpatient treatment to assisted outpatient treatment.

(b) A copy of the petition and notice of hearing shall be served, in the same manner as a summons, on the petitioner, the respondent, the qualified professional whose affidavit accompanied the petition, a current provider, if any, and a surrogate decision maker or agent under chapter 71.32 RCW, if any.

(c) If the respondent has a surrogate decision maker or agent under chapter 71.32 RCW who wishes to provide testimony at the hearing, the court shall afford the surrogate decision maker or agent an opportunity to testify.

(d) The respondent shall be represented by counsel at all stages of the proceedings.

(e) If the respondent fails to appear at the hearing after notice, the court may conduct the hearing in the respondent's absence; provided that the respondent's counsel is present.

(f) If the respondent has refused to be examined by the qualified professional whose affidavit accompanied the petition, the court may order a mental examination of the respondent. The examination of the respondent may be performed by the qualified professional whose affidavit accompanied the petition. If the examination is performed by another qualified professional, the examining qualified professional shall be authorized to consult with the qualified professional whose affidavit accompanied the petition.

(g) If the respondent has refused to be examined by a qualified professional and the court finds reasonable grounds to believe that the allegations of the petition are true, the court may issue a written order directing a peace officer who has completed crisis intervention training to detain and transport the respondent to a provider for examination by a qualified professional. A respondent detained pursuant to this subsection shall be detained no longer than necessary to complete the examination and in no event longer than 24 hours.

(7) If the petition involves a person whom the petitioner or behavioral health administrative services organization knows, or has reason to know, is an American Indian or Alaska Native who receives medical or behavioral health services from a tribe within this state, the behavioral health administrative services organization shall notify the tribe and Indian health care provider. Notification shall be made in person or by telephonic or electronic communication to the tribal contact listed in the authority's tribal crisis coordination plan as soon as possible.

(8) A petition for assisted outpatient treatment filed under this section shall be adjudicated under RCW 71.05.240.

(9) ((After January 1, 2023, a))A petition for assisted outpatient treatment must be filed on forms developed by the administrative office of the courts.

Sec. 2. RCW 71.05.365 and 2022 c 210 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

When a person has been involuntarily committed for treatment to a hospital for a period of 90 or 180 days, and the superintendent or professional person in charge of the hospital determines that the person no longer requires active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient level of care, the behavioral health administrative services organization, managed care organization, or agency providing oversight of long-term care or developmental disability services that is responsible for resource management services for the person must work with the hospital to develop an individualized discharge plan((, including whether a petition should be filed for less restrictive alternative treatment on the basis that the person is in need of assisted outpatient treatment,)) and arrange for a transition to the community in accordance with the person's individualized discharge plan within 14 days of the determination.

Sec. 3. RCW 71.05.590 and 2022 c 210 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((Either an))An agency or facility designated to monitor or provide less restrictive alternative treatment services under a ((less restrictive alternative))court order or conditional release, or a designated crisis responder, may take action to enforce, modify, or revoke ((a))the less restrictive alternative treatment order or conditional release ((order. The))if the agency, facility, or designated crisis responder ((must determine))determines that:

(a) The person is failing to adhere to the terms and conditions of the order;

(b) Substantial deterioration in the person's functioning has occurred;

(c) There is evidence of substantial decompensation with a reasonable probability that the decompensation can be reversed by further evaluation, intervention, or treatment; or

(d) The person poses a likelihood of serious harm.

(2) Actions taken under this section must include a flexible range of responses of varying levels of intensity appropriate to the circumstances and consistent with the interests of the individual and the public in personal autonomy, safety, recovery, and compliance. Available actions may include, but are not limited to, any of the following:

(a) To counsel or advise the person as to their rights and responsibilities under the court order, and to offer incentives to motivate compliance;

(b) To increase the intensity of outpatient services provided to the person by increasing the frequency of contacts with the provider, referring the person for an assessment for assertive community services, or by other means;

(c) To request a court hearing for review and modification of the court order. The request must be directed to the court with jurisdiction over the order and specify the circumstances that give rise to the request and what modification is being sought. The county prosecutor shall assist the entity requesting the hearing and issue an appropriate summons to the person. This subsection does not limit the inherent authority of a treatment provider to alter conditions of treatment for clinical reasons, and is intended to be used only when court intervention is necessary or advisable to secure the person's compliance and prevent decompensation or deterioration;

(d) To detain the person for up to 12 hours for evaluation at an agency, facility providing services under the court order, triage facility, crisis stabilization unit, emergency department, evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility with available space, or an approved substance use disorder treatment program with available space. The purpose of the evaluation is to determine whether modification, revocation, or commitment proceedings are necessary and appropriate to stabilize the person and prevent decompensation, deterioration, or physical harm. Temporary detention for evaluation under this subsection is intended to occur only following a pattern of noncompliance or the failure of reasonable attempts at outreach and engagement, and may occur only when, based on clinical judgment, temporary detention is appropriate. The agency, facility, or designated crisis responder may request assistance from a peace officer for the purposes of temporary detention under this subsection (2)(d). This subsection does not limit the ability or obligation of the agency, facility, or designated crisis responder to pursue revocation procedures under subsection (5) of this section in appropriate circumstances; and

(e) To initiate revocation procedures under subsection (5) of this section.

(3) A court may supervise a person on an order for less restrictive alternative treatment or a conditional release. While the person is under the order, the court may:

(a) Require appearance in court for periodic reviews; and

(b) Modify the order after considering input from the agency or facility designated to provide or facilitate services. The court may not remand the person into inpatient treatment except as provided under subsection (5) of this section, but may take actions under subsection (2)(a) through (d) of this section.

(4) The facility or agency designated to provide outpatient treatment shall notify the secretary of the department of social and health services or designated crisis responder when a person fails to adhere to terms and conditions of court ordered treatment or experiences substantial deterioration in his or her condition and, as a result, presents an increased likelihood of serious harm.

(5)(a) A designated crisis responder or the secretary of the department of social and health services may, upon their own motion or upon request of the facility or agency designated to provide outpatient care, cause a person to be detained in an evaluation and treatment facility, available secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility with adequate space, or available approved substance use disorder treatment program with adequate space in or near the county in which he or she is receiving outpatient treatment for the purpose of a hearing for revocation of a less restrictive alternative treatment order or conditional release order under this chapter. The designated crisis responder or secretary of the department of social and health services shall file a petition for revocation within 24 hours and serve the person, their guardian, if any, and their attorney. A hearing for revocation of a less restrictive alternative treatment order or conditional release order may be scheduled without detention of the person.

(b) A person detained under this subsection (5) must be held until such time, not exceeding five days, as a hearing can be scheduled to determine whether or not the order for less restrictive alternative treatment or conditional release should be revoked, modified, or retained. If the person is not detained, the hearing must be scheduled within five days of service on the person. The designated crisis responder or the secretary of the department of social and health services may withdraw its petition for revocation at any time before the court hearing.

(c) A person detained under this subsection (5) has the same rights with respect to notice, hearing, and counsel as in any involuntary treatment proceeding, except as specifically set forth in this section. There is no right to jury trial. The venue for proceedings is the county where the petition is filed. Notice of the filing must be provided to the court that originally ordered commitment, if different from the court where the petition for revocation is filed, within two judicial days of the person's detention.

(d) The issues for the court to determine are whether: (i) The person adhered to the terms and conditions of the order or conditional release; (ii) substantial deterioration in the person's functioning has occurred; (iii) there is evidence of substantial decompensation with a reasonable probability that the decompensation can be reversed by further inpatient treatment; or (iv) there is a likelihood of serious harm; and, if any of the above conditions apply, whether it is appropriate for the court to reinstate or modify the person's less restrictive alternative treatment order or conditional release ((order)) or order the person's detention for inpatient treatment. The person may waive the court hearing and allow the court to enter a stipulated order upon the agreement of all parties. If the court orders detention for inpatient treatment, the treatment period must be for 14 days from the revocation hearing if the less restrictive alternative treatment order or conditional release ((order)) was based on a petition under RCW 71.05.148, 71.05.160, or 71.05.230. The person must return to less restrictive alternative treatment under the order at the end of the 14-day period unless a petition for further treatment is filed under RCW 71.05.320 or the person accepts voluntary treatment. If the court orders detention for inpatient treatment and the less restrictive alternative treatment order or conditional release ((order)) was based on a petition under RCW 71.05.290 or 71.05.320, the number of days remaining on the order must be converted to days of inpatient treatment. A court may not detain a person for inpatient treatment to a secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program under this subsection unless there is a facility or program available with adequate space for the person.

(6) In determining whether or not to take action under this section the designated crisis responder, agency, or facility must consider the factors specified under RCW 71.05.212 and the court must consider the factors specified under RCW 71.05.245 as they apply to the question of whether to enforce, modify, or revoke a court order for involuntary treatment.

Sec. 4. RCW 71.05.590 and 2022 c 210 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((Either an))An agency or facility designated to monitor or provide less restrictive alternative treatment services under a ((less restrictive alternative))court order or conditional release, or a designated crisis responder, may take action to enforce, modify, or revoke ((a))the less restrictive alternative treatment order or conditional release ((order. The))if the agency, facility, or designated crisis responder ((must determine))determines that:

(a) The person is failing to adhere to the terms and conditions of the order;

(b) Substantial deterioration in the person's functioning has occurred;

(c) There is evidence of substantial decompensation with a reasonable probability that the decompensation can be reversed by further evaluation, intervention, or treatment; or

(d) The person poses a likelihood of serious harm.

(2) Actions taken under this section must include a flexible range of responses of varying levels of intensity appropriate to the circumstances and consistent with the interests of the individual and the public in personal autonomy, safety, recovery, and compliance. Available actions may include, but are not limited to, any of the following:

(a) To counsel or advise the person as to their rights and responsibilities under the court order, and to offer incentives to motivate compliance;

(b) To increase the intensity of outpatient services provided to the person by increasing the frequency of contacts with the provider, referring the person for an assessment for assertive community services, or by other means;

(c) To request a court hearing for review and modification of the court order. The request must be directed to the court with jurisdiction over the order and specify the circumstances that give rise to the request and what modification is being sought. The county prosecutor shall assist (([the]))the entity requesting the hearing and issue an appropriate summons to the person. This subsection does not limit the inherent authority of a treatment provider to alter conditions of treatment for clinical reasons, and is intended to be used only when court intervention is necessary or advisable to secure the person's compliance and prevent decompensation or deterioration;

(d) To detain the person for up to 12 hours for evaluation at an agency, facility providing services under the court order, triage facility, crisis stabilization unit, emergency department, evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or an approved substance use disorder treatment program. The purpose of the evaluation is to determine whether modification, revocation, or commitment proceedings are necessary and appropriate to stabilize the person and prevent decompensation, deterioration, or physical harm. Temporary detention for evaluation under this subsection is intended to occur only following a pattern of noncompliance or the failure of reasonable attempts at outreach and engagement, and may occur only when, based on clinical judgment, temporary detention is appropriate. The agency, facility, or designated crisis responder may request assistance from a peace officer for the purposes of temporary detention under this subsection (2)(d). This subsection does not limit the ability or obligation of the agency, facility, or designated crisis responder to pursue revocation procedures under subsection (5) of this section in appropriate circumstances; and

(e) To initiate revocation procedures under subsection (5) of this section.

(3) A court may supervise a person on an order for less restrictive alternative treatment or a conditional release. While the person is under the order, the court may:

(a) Require appearance in court for periodic reviews; and

(b) Modify the order after considering input from the agency or facility designated to provide or facilitate services. The court may not remand the person into inpatient treatment except as provided under subsection (5) of this section, but may take actions under subsection (2)(a) through (d) of this section.

(4) The facility or agency designated to provide outpatient treatment shall notify the secretary of the department of social and health services or designated crisis responder when a person fails to adhere to terms and conditions of court ordered treatment or experiences substantial deterioration in his or her condition and, as a result, presents an increased likelihood of serious harm.

(5)(a) A designated crisis responder or the secretary of the department of social and health services may, upon their own motion or upon request of the facility or agency designated to provide outpatient care, cause a person to be detained in an evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program in or near the county in which he or she is receiving outpatient treatment for the purpose of a hearing for revocation of a less restrictive alternative treatment order or conditional release ((order)) under this chapter. The designated crisis responder or secretary of the department of social and health services shall file a petition for revocation within 24 hours and serve the person, their guardian, if any, and their attorney. A hearing for revocation of a less restrictive alternative treatment order or conditional release ((order)) may be scheduled without detention of the person.

(b) A person detained under this subsection (5) must be held until such time, not exceeding five days, as a hearing can be scheduled to determine whether or not the order for less restrictive alternative treatment or conditional release should be revoked, modified, or retained. If the person is not detained, the hearing must be scheduled within five days of service on the person. The designated crisis responder or the secretary of the department of social and health services may withdraw its petition for revocation at any time before the court hearing.

(c) A person detained under this subsection (5) has the same rights with respect to notice, hearing, and counsel as in any involuntary treatment proceeding, except as specifically set forth in this section. There is no right to jury trial. The venue for proceedings is the county where the petition is filed. Notice of the filing must be provided to the court that originally ordered commitment, if different from the court where the petition for revocation is filed, within two judicial days of the person's detention.

(d) The issues for the court to determine are whether: (i) The person adhered to the terms and conditions of the order or conditional release; (ii) substantial deterioration in the person's functioning has occurred; (iii) there is evidence of substantial decompensation with a reasonable probability that the decompensation can be reversed by further inpatient treatment; or (iv) there is a likelihood of serious harm; and, if any of the above conditions apply, whether it is appropriate for the court to reinstate or modify the person's less restrictive alternative treatment order or conditional release ((order)) or order the person's detention for inpatient treatment. The person may waive the court hearing and allow the court to enter a stipulated order upon the agreement of all parties. If the court orders detention for inpatient treatment, the treatment period must be for 14 days from the revocation hearing if the less restrictive alternative treatment order or conditional release ((order)) was based on a petition under RCW 71.05.148, 71.05.160, or 71.05.230. The person must return to less restrictive alternative treatment under the order at the end of the 14-day period unless a petition for further treatment is filed under RCW 71.05.320 or the person accepts voluntary treatment. If the court orders detention for inpatient treatment and the less restrictive alternative treatment order or conditional release ((order)) was based on a petition under RCW 71.05.290 or 71.05.320, the number of days remaining on the order must be converted to days of inpatient treatment.

(6) In determining whether or not to take action under this section the designated crisis responder, agency, or facility must consider the factors specified under RCW 71.05.212 and the court must consider the factors specified under RCW 71.05.245 as they apply to the question of whether to enforce, modify, or revoke a court order for involuntary treatment.

Sec. 5. RCW 71.34.020 and 2021 c 264 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Admission" or "admit" means a decision by a physician, physician assistant, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner that a minor should be examined or treated as a patient in a hospital.

(2) "Adolescent" means a minor thirteen years of age or older.

(3) "Alcoholism" means a disease, characterized by a dependency on alcoholic beverages, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning.

(4) "Antipsychotic medications" means that class of drugs primarily used to treat serious manifestations of mental illness associated with thought disorders, which includes, but is not limited to, atypical antipsychotic medications.

(5) "Approved substance use disorder treatment program" means a program for minors with substance use disorders provided by a treatment program licensed or certified by the department of health as meeting standards adopted under chapter 71.24 RCW.

(6) "Attending staff" means any person on the staff of a public or private agency having responsibility for the care and treatment of a minor patient.

(7) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.

(8) "Behavioral health administrative services organization" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 71.24.025.

(9) "Behavioral health disorder" means either a mental disorder as defined in this section, a substance use disorder as defined in this section, or a co-occurring mental disorder and substance use disorder.

(10) "Child psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a physician and surgeon in this state, who has had graduate training in child psychiatry in a program approved by the American Medical Association or the American Osteopathic Association, and who is board eligible or board certified in child psychiatry.

(11) "Children's mental health specialist" means:

(a) A mental health professional who has completed a minimum of one hundred actual hours, not quarter or semester hours, of specialized training devoted to the study of child development and the treatment of children; and

(b) A mental health professional who has the equivalent of one year of full-time experience in the treatment of children under the supervision of a children's mental health specialist.

(12) "Commitment" means a determination by a judge or court commissioner, made after a commitment hearing, that the minor is in need of inpatient diagnosis, evaluation, or treatment or that the minor is in need of less restrictive alternative treatment.

(13) "Conditional release" means a revocable modification of a commitment, which may be revoked upon violation of any of its terms.

(14) "Co-occurring disorder specialist" means an individual possessing an enhancement granted by the department of health under chapter 18.205 RCW that certifies the individual to provide substance use disorder counseling subject to the practice limitations under RCW 18.205.105.

(15) "Crisis stabilization unit" means a short-term facility or a portion of a facility licensed or certified by the department of health under RCW 71.24.035, such as a residential treatment facility or a hospital, which has been designed to assess, diagnose, and treat individuals experiencing an acute crisis without the use of long-term hospitalization.

(16) "Custody" means involuntary detention under the provisions of this chapter or chapter 10.77 RCW, uninterrupted by any period of unconditional release from commitment from a facility providing involuntary care and treatment.

(17) "Department" means the department of social and health services.

(18) "Designated crisis responder" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 71.05.020.

(19) "Detention" or "detain" means the lawful confinement of a person, under the provisions of this chapter.

(20) "Developmental disabilities professional" means a person who has specialized training and three years of experience in directly treating or working with persons with developmental disabilities and is a psychiatrist, physician assistant working with a supervising psychiatrist, psychologist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, or social worker, and such other developmental disabilities professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary of the department.

(21) "Developmental disability" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 71A.10.020.

(22) "Director" means the director of the authority.

(23) "Discharge" means the termination of hospital medical authority. The commitment may remain in place, be terminated, or be amended by court order.

(24) "Evaluation and treatment facility" means a public or private facility or unit that is licensed or certified by the department of health to provide emergency, inpatient, residential, or outpatient mental health evaluation and treatment services for minors. A physically separate and separately operated portion of a state hospital may be designated as an evaluation and treatment facility for minors. A facility which is part of or operated by the state or federal agency does not require licensure or certification. No correctional institution or facility, juvenile court detention facility, or jail may be an evaluation and treatment facility within the meaning of this chapter.

(25) "Evaluation and treatment program" means the total system of services and facilities coordinated and approved by a county or combination of counties for the evaluation and treatment of minors under this chapter.

(26) "Gravely disabled minor" means a minor who, as a result of a behavioral health disorder, (a) is in danger of serious physical harm resulting from a failure to provide for his or her essential human needs of health or safety, or (b) manifests severe deterioration in routine functioning evidenced by repeated and escalating loss of cognitive or volitional control over his or her actions and is not receiving such care as is essential for his or her health or safety.

(27) "Habilitative services" means those services provided by program personnel to assist minors in acquiring and maintaining life skills and in raising their levels of physical, behavioral, social, and vocational functioning. Habilitative services include education, training for employment, and therapy.

(28) "Hearing" means any proceeding conducted in open court that conforms to the requirements of RCW 71.34.910.

(29) "History of one or more violent acts" refers to the period of time five years prior to the filing of a petition under this chapter, excluding any time spent, but not any violent acts committed, in a mental health facility, a long-term substance use disorder treatment facility, or in confinement as a result of a criminal conviction.

(30) "Individualized service plan" means a plan prepared by a developmental disabilities professional with other professionals as a team, for a person with developmental disabilities, which states:

(a) The nature of the person's specific problems, prior charged criminal behavior, and habilitation needs;

(b) The conditions and strategies necessary to achieve the purposes of habilitation;

(c) The intermediate and long-range goals of the habilitation program, with a projected timetable for the attainment;

(d) The rationale for using this plan of habilitation to achieve those intermediate and long-range goals;

(e) The staff responsible for carrying out the plan;

(f) Where relevant in light of past criminal behavior and due consideration for public safety, the criteria for proposed movement to less-restrictive settings, criteria for proposed eventual discharge or release, and a projected possible date for discharge or release; and

(g) The type of residence immediately anticipated for the person and possible future types of residences.

(31)(a) "Inpatient treatment" means twenty-four-hour-per-day mental health care provided within a general hospital, psychiatric hospital, residential treatment facility licensed or certified by the department of health as an evaluation and treatment facility for minors, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility for minors, or approved substance use disorder treatment program for minors.

(b) For purposes of family-initiated treatment under RCW 71.34.600 through 71.34.670, "inpatient treatment" has the meaning included in (a) of this subsection and any other residential treatment facility licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW.

(32) "Intoxicated minor" means a minor whose mental or physical functioning is substantially impaired as a result of the use of alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals.

(33) "Judicial commitment" means a commitment by a court pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

(34) "Kinship caregiver" has the same meaning as in RCW 74.13.031(19)(a).

(35) "Legal counsel" means attorneys and staff employed by county prosecutor offices or the state attorney general acting in their capacity as legal representatives of public behavioral health service providers under RCW 71.05.130.

(36) "Less restrictive alternative" or "less restrictive setting" means outpatient treatment provided to a minor as a program of individualized treatment in a less restrictive setting than inpatient treatment ((that)). This term includes the services described in RCW 71.34.755, including residential treatment, and treatment pursuant to an assisted outpatient treatment order under RCW 71.34.815.

(37) "Licensed physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine or osteopathic medicine and surgery in the state of Washington.

(38) "Likelihood of serious harm" means:

(a) A substantial risk that: (i) Physical harm will be inflicted by a minor upon his or her own person, as evidenced by threats or attempts to commit suicide or inflict physical harm on oneself; (ii) physical harm will be inflicted by a minor upon another individual, as evidenced by behavior which has caused such harm or which places another person or persons in reasonable fear of sustaining such harm; or (iii) physical harm will be inflicted by a minor upon the property of others, as evidenced by behavior which has caused substantial loss or damage to the property of others; or

(b) The minor has threatened the physical safety of another and has a history of one or more violent acts.

(39) "Managed care organization" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 71.24.025.

(40) "Medical clearance" means a physician or other health care provider has determined that a person is medically stable and ready for referral to the designated crisis responder.

(41) "Medical necessity" for inpatient care means a requested service which is reasonably calculated to: (a) Diagnose, correct, cure, or alleviate a mental disorder or substance use disorder; or (b) prevent the progression of a mental disorder or substance use disorder that endangers life or causes suffering and pain, or results in illness or infirmity or threatens to cause or aggravate a disability, or causes physical deformity or malfunction, and there is no adequate less restrictive alternative available.

(42) "Mental disorder" means any organic, mental, or emotional impairment that has substantial adverse effects on an individual's cognitive or volitional functions. The presence of alcohol abuse, drug abuse, juvenile criminal history, antisocial behavior, or intellectual disabilities alone is insufficient to justify a finding of "mental disorder" within the meaning of this section.

(43) "Mental health professional" means a psychiatrist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, physician assistant working with a supervising psychiatrist, psychologist, psychiatric nurse, social worker, and such other mental health professionals as defined by rules adopted by the secretary of the department of health under this chapter.

(44) "Minor" means any person under the age of eighteen years.

(45) "Outpatient treatment" means any of the nonresidential services mandated under chapter 71.24 RCW and provided by licensed or certified behavioral health agencies as identified by RCW 71.24.025.

(46)(a) "Parent" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 26.26A.010, including either parent if custody is shared under a joint custody agreement, or a person or agency judicially appointed as legal guardian or custodian of the child.

(b) For purposes of family-initiated treatment under RCW 71.34.600 through 71.34.670, "parent" also includes a person to whom a parent defined in (a) of this subsection has given a signed authorization to make health care decisions for the adolescent, a stepparent who is involved in caring for the adolescent, a kinship caregiver who is involved in caring for the adolescent, or another relative who is responsible for the health care of the adolescent, who may be required to provide a declaration under penalty of perjury stating that he or she is a relative responsible for the health care of the adolescent pursuant to chapter 5.50 RCW. If a dispute arises between individuals authorized to act as a parent for the purpose of RCW 71.34.600 through 71.34.670, the disagreement must be resolved according to the priority established under RCW 7.70.065(2)(a).

(47) "Peace officer" means a law enforcement official of a public agency or governmental unit, and includes persons specifically given peace officer powers by any state law, local ordinance, or judicial order of appointment.

(48) "Physician assistant" means a person licensed as a physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW.

(49) "Private agency" means any person, partnership, corporation, or association that is not a public agency, whether or not financed in whole or in part by public funds, that constitutes an evaluation and treatment facility or private institution, or hospital, or approved substance use disorder treatment program, that is conducted for, or includes a distinct unit, floor, or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons with mental illness, substance use disorders, or both mental illness and substance use disorders.

(50) "Professional person in charge" or "professional person" means a physician, other mental health professional, or other person empowered by an evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program with authority to make admission and discharge decisions on behalf of that facility.

(51) "Psychiatric nurse" means a registered nurse who has experience in the direct treatment of persons who have a mental illness or who are emotionally disturbed, such experience gained under the supervision of a mental health professional.

(52) "Psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a physician in this state who has completed residency training in psychiatry in a program approved by the American Medical Association or the American Osteopathic Association, and is board eligible or board certified in psychiatry.

(53) "Psychologist" means a person licensed as a psychologist under chapter 18.83 RCW.

(54) "Public agency" means any evaluation and treatment facility or institution, or hospital, or approved substance use disorder treatment program that is conducted for, or includes a distinct unit, floor, or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons with mental illness, substance use disorders, or both mental illness and substance use disorders if the agency is operated directly by federal, state, county, or municipal government, or a combination of such governments.

(55) "Release" means legal termination of the commitment under the provisions of this chapter.

(56) "Resource management services" has the meaning given in chapter 71.24 RCW.

(57) "Responsible other" means the minor, the minor's parent or estate, or any other person legally responsible for support of the minor.

(58) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department or secretary's designee.

(59) "Secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility" means a facility operated by either a public or private agency or by the program of an agency which provides care to voluntary individuals and individuals involuntarily detained and committed under this chapter for whom there is a likelihood of serious harm or who are gravely disabled due to the presence of a substance use disorder. Secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities must:

(a) Provide the following services:

(i) Assessment and treatment, provided by certified substance use disorder professionals or co-occurring disorder specialists;

(ii) Clinical stabilization services;

(iii) Acute or subacute detoxification services for intoxicated individuals; and

(iv) Discharge assistance provided by certified substance use disorder professionals or co-occurring disorder specialists, including facilitating transitions to appropriate voluntary or involuntary inpatient services or to less restrictive alternatives as appropriate for the individual;

(b) Include security measures sufficient to protect the patients, staff, and community; and

(c) Be licensed or certified as such by the department of health.

(60) "Social worker" means a person with a master's or further advanced degree from a social work educational program accredited and approved as provided in RCW 18.320.010.

(61) "Start of initial detention" means the time of arrival of the minor at the first evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program offering inpatient treatment if the minor is being involuntarily detained at the time. With regard to voluntary patients, "start of initial detention" means the time at which the minor gives notice of intent to leave under the provisions of this chapter.

(62) "Store and forward technology" means use of an asynchronous transmission of a person's medical information from a mental health service provider to the designated crisis responder which results in medical diagnosis, consultation, or treatment.

(63) "Substance use disorder" means a cluster of cognitive, behavioral, and physiological symptoms indicating that an individual continues using the substance despite significant substance-related problems. The diagnosis of a substance use disorder is based on a pathological pattern of behaviors related to the use of the substances.

(64) "Substance use disorder professional" means a person certified as a substance use disorder professional by the department of health under chapter 18.205 RCW.

(65) "Therapeutic court personnel" means the staff of a mental health court or other therapeutic court which has jurisdiction over defendants who are dually diagnosed with mental disorders, including court personnel, probation officers, a court monitor, prosecuting attorney, or defense counsel acting within the scope of therapeutic court duties.

(66) "Treatment records" include registration and all other records concerning persons who are receiving or who at any time have received services for mental illness, which are maintained by the department, the department of health, the authority, behavioral health organizations and their staffs, and by treatment facilities. Treatment records include mental health information contained in a medical bill including but not limited to mental health drugs, a mental health diagnosis, provider name, and dates of service stemming from a medical service. Treatment records do not include notes or records maintained for personal use by a person providing treatment services for the department, the department of health, the authority, behavioral health organizations, or a treatment facility if the notes or records are not available to others.

(67) "Triage facility" means a short-term facility or a portion of a facility licensed or certified by the department of health under RCW 71.24.035, which is designed as a facility to assess and stabilize an individual or determine the need for involuntary commitment of an individual, and must meet department of health residential treatment facility standards. A triage facility may be structured as a voluntary or involuntary placement facility.

(68) "Video" means the delivery of behavioral health services through the use of interactive audio and video technology, permitting real-time communication between a person and a designated crisis responder, for the purpose of evaluation. "Video" does not include the use of audio-only telephone, facsimile, email, or store and forward technology.

(69) "Violent act" means behavior that resulted in homicide, attempted suicide, injury, or substantial loss or damage to property.

(70) "In need of assisted outpatient treatment" refers to a minor who meets the criteria for assisted outpatient treatment established under RCW 71.34.815.

Sec. 6. RCW 71.34.020 and 2021 c 264 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Admission" or "admit" means a decision by a physician, physician assistant, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner that a minor should be examined or treated as a patient in a hospital.

(2) "Adolescent" means a minor thirteen years of age or older.

(3) "Alcoholism" means a disease, characterized by a dependency on alcoholic beverages, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning.

(4) "Antipsychotic medications" means that class of drugs primarily used to treat serious manifestations of mental illness associated with thought disorders, which includes, but is not limited to, atypical antipsychotic medications.

(5) "Approved substance use disorder treatment program" means a program for minors with substance use disorders provided by a treatment program licensed or certified by the department of health as meeting standards adopted under chapter 71.24 RCW.

(6) "Attending staff" means any person on the staff of a public or private agency having responsibility for the care and treatment of a minor patient.

(7) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.

(8) "Behavioral health administrative services organization" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 71.24.025.

(9) "Behavioral health disorder" means either a mental disorder as defined in this section, a substance use disorder as defined in this section, or a co-occurring mental disorder and substance use disorder.

(10) "Child psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a physician and surgeon in this state, who has had graduate training in child psychiatry in a program approved by the American Medical Association or the American Osteopathic Association, and who is board eligible or board certified in child psychiatry.

(11) "Children's mental health specialist" means:

(a) A mental health professional who has completed a minimum of one hundred actual hours, not quarter or semester hours, of specialized training devoted to the study of child development and the treatment of children; and

(b) A mental health professional who has the equivalent of one year of full-time experience in the treatment of children under the supervision of a children's mental health specialist.

(12) "Commitment" means a determination by a judge or court commissioner, made after a commitment hearing, that the minor is in need of inpatient diagnosis, evaluation, or treatment or that the minor is in need of less restrictive alternative treatment.

(13) "Conditional release" means a revocable modification of a commitment, which may be revoked upon violation of any of its terms.

(14) "Co-occurring disorder specialist" means an individual possessing an enhancement granted by the department of health under chapter 18.205 RCW that certifies the individual to provide substance use disorder counseling subject to the practice limitations under RCW 18.205.105.

(15) "Crisis stabilization unit" means a short-term facility or a portion of a facility licensed or certified by the department of health under RCW 71.24.035, such as a residential treatment facility or a hospital, which has been designed to assess, diagnose, and treat individuals experiencing an acute crisis without the use of long-term hospitalization.

(16) "Custody" means involuntary detention under the provisions of this chapter or chapter 10.77 RCW, uninterrupted by any period of unconditional release from commitment from a facility providing involuntary care and treatment.

(17) "Department" means the department of social and health services.

(18) "Designated crisis responder" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 71.05.020.

(19) "Detention" or "detain" means the lawful confinement of a person, under the provisions of this chapter.

(20) "Developmental disabilities professional" means a person who has specialized training and three years of experience in directly treating or working with persons with developmental disabilities and is a psychiatrist, physician assistant working with a supervising psychiatrist, psychologist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, or social worker, and such other developmental disabilities professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary of the department.

(21) "Developmental disability" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 71A.10.020.

(22) "Director" means the director of the authority.

(23) "Discharge" means the termination of hospital medical authority. The commitment may remain in place, be terminated, or be amended by court order.

(24) "Evaluation and treatment facility" means a public or private facility or unit that is licensed or certified by the department of health to provide emergency, inpatient, residential, or outpatient mental health evaluation and treatment services for minors. A physically separate and separately operated portion of a state hospital may be designated as an evaluation and treatment facility for minors. A facility which is part of or operated by the state or federal agency does not require licensure or certification. No correctional institution or facility, juvenile court detention facility, or jail may be an evaluation and treatment facility within the meaning of this chapter.

(25) "Evaluation and treatment program" means the total system of services and facilities coordinated and approved by a county or combination of counties for the evaluation and treatment of minors under this chapter.

(26) "Gravely disabled minor" means a minor who, as a result of a behavioral health disorder, (a) is in danger of serious physical harm resulting from a failure to provide for his or her essential human needs of health or safety, or (b) manifests severe deterioration from safe behavior evidenced by repeated and escalating loss of cognitive or volitional control over his or her actions and is not receiving such care as is essential for his or her health or safety.

(27) "Habilitative services" means those services provided by program personnel to assist minors in acquiring and maintaining life skills and in raising their levels of physical, behavioral, social, and vocational functioning. Habilitative services include education, training for employment, and therapy.

(28) "Hearing" means any proceeding conducted in open court that conforms to the requirements of RCW 71.34.910.

(29) "History of one or more violent acts" refers to the period of time five years prior to the filing of a petition under this chapter, excluding any time spent, but not any violent acts committed, in a mental health facility, a long-term substance use disorder treatment facility, or in confinement as a result of a criminal conviction.

(30) "Individualized service plan" means a plan prepared by a developmental disabilities professional with other professionals as a team, for a person with developmental disabilities, which states:

(a) The nature of the person's specific problems, prior charged criminal behavior, and habilitation needs;

(b) The conditions and strategies necessary to achieve the purposes of habilitation;

(c) The intermediate and long-range goals of the habilitation program, with a projected timetable for the attainment;

(d) The rationale for using this plan of habilitation to achieve those intermediate and long-range goals;

(e) The staff responsible for carrying out the plan;

(f) Where relevant in light of past criminal behavior and due consideration for public safety, the criteria for proposed movement to less-restrictive settings, criteria for proposed eventual discharge or release, and a projected possible date for discharge or release; and

(g) The type of residence immediately anticipated for the person and possible future types of residences.

(31)(a) "Inpatient treatment" means twenty-four-hour-per-day mental health care provided within a general hospital, psychiatric hospital, residential treatment facility licensed or certified by the department of health as an evaluation and treatment facility for minors, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility for minors, or approved substance use disorder treatment program for minors.

(b) For purposes of family-initiated treatment under RCW 71.34.600 through 71.34.670, "inpatient treatment" has the meaning included in (a) of this subsection and any other residential treatment facility licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW.

(32) "Intoxicated minor" means a minor whose mental or physical functioning is substantially impaired as a result of the use of alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals.

(33) "Judicial commitment" means a commitment by a court pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

(34) "Kinship caregiver" has the same meaning as in RCW 74.13.031(19)(a).

(35) "Legal counsel" means attorneys and staff employed by county prosecutor offices or the state attorney general acting in their capacity as legal representatives of public behavioral health service providers under RCW 71.05.130.

(36) "Less restrictive alternative" or "less restrictive setting" means outpatient treatment provided to a minor as a program of individualized treatment in a less restrictive setting than inpatient treatment ((that)). This term includes the services described in RCW 71.34.755, including residential treatment, and treatment pursuant to an assisted outpatient treatment order under RCW 71.34.815.

(37) "Licensed physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine or osteopathic medicine and surgery in the state of Washington.

(38) "Likelihood of serious harm" means:

(a) A substantial risk that: (i) Physical harm will be inflicted by a minor upon his or her own person, as evidenced by threats or attempts to commit suicide or inflict physical harm on oneself; (ii) physical harm will be inflicted by a minor upon another individual, as evidenced by behavior which has caused harm, substantial pain, or which places another person or persons in reasonable fear of harm to themselves or others; or (iii) physical harm will be inflicted by a minor upon the property of others, as evidenced by behavior which has caused substantial loss or damage to the property of others; or

(b) The minor has threatened the physical safety of another and has a history of one or more violent acts.

(39) "Managed care organization" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 71.24.025.

(40) "Medical clearance" means a physician or other health care provider has determined that a person is medically stable and ready for referral to the designated crisis responder.

(41) "Medical necessity" for inpatient care means a requested service which is reasonably calculated to: (a) Diagnose, correct, cure, or alleviate a mental disorder or substance use disorder; or (b) prevent the progression of a mental disorder or substance use disorder that endangers life or causes suffering and pain, or results in illness or infirmity or threatens to cause or aggravate a disability, or causes physical deformity or malfunction, and there is no adequate less restrictive alternative available.

(42) "Mental disorder" means any organic, mental, or emotional impairment that has substantial adverse effects on an individual's cognitive or volitional functions. The presence of alcohol abuse, drug abuse, juvenile criminal history, antisocial behavior, or intellectual disabilities alone is insufficient to justify a finding of "mental disorder" within the meaning of this section.

(43) "Mental health professional" means a psychiatrist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, physician assistant working with a supervising psychiatrist, psychologist, psychiatric nurse, social worker, and such other mental health professionals as defined by rules adopted by the secretary of the department of health under this chapter.

(44) "Minor" means any person under the age of eighteen years.

(45) "Outpatient treatment" means any of the nonresidential services mandated under chapter 71.24 RCW and provided by licensed or certified behavioral health agencies as identified by RCW 71.24.025.

(46)(a) "Parent" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 26.26A.010, including either parent if custody is shared under a joint custody agreement, or a person or agency judicially appointed as legal guardian or custodian of the child.

(b) For purposes of family-initiated treatment under RCW 71.34.600 through 71.34.670, "parent" also includes a person to whom a parent defined in (a) of this subsection has given a signed authorization to make health care decisions for the adolescent, a stepparent who is involved in caring for the adolescent, a kinship caregiver who is involved in caring for the adolescent, or another relative who is responsible for the health care of the adolescent, who may be required to provide a declaration under penalty of perjury stating that he or she is a relative responsible for the health care of the adolescent pursuant to chapter 5.50 RCW. If a dispute arises between individuals authorized to act as a parent for the purpose of RCW 71.34.600 through 71.34.670, the disagreement must be resolved according to the priority established under RCW 7.70.065(2)(a).

(47) "Peace officer" means a law enforcement official of a public agency or governmental unit, and includes persons specifically given peace officer powers by any state law, local ordinance, or judicial order of appointment.

(48) "Physician assistant" means a person licensed as a physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW.

(49) "Private agency" means any person, partnership, corporation, or association that is not a public agency, whether or not financed in whole or in part by public funds, that constitutes an evaluation and treatment facility or private institution, or hospital, or approved substance use disorder treatment program, that is conducted for, or includes a distinct unit, floor, or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons with mental illness, substance use disorders, or both mental illness and substance use disorders.

(50) "Professional person in charge" or "professional person" means a physician, other mental health professional, or other person empowered by an evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program with authority to make admission and discharge decisions on behalf of that facility.

(51) "Psychiatric nurse" means a registered nurse who has experience in the direct treatment of persons who have a mental illness or who are emotionally disturbed, such experience gained under the supervision of a mental health professional.

(52) "Psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a physician in this state who has completed residency training in psychiatry in a program approved by the American Medical Association or the American Osteopathic Association, and is board eligible or board certified in psychiatry.

(53) "Psychologist" means a person licensed as a psychologist under chapter 18.83 RCW.

(54) "Public agency" means any evaluation and treatment facility or institution, or hospital, or approved substance use disorder treatment program that is conducted for, or includes a distinct unit, floor, or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons with mental illness, substance use disorders, or both mental illness and substance use disorders if the agency is operated directly by federal, state, county, or municipal government, or a combination of such governments.

(55) "Release" means legal termination of the commitment under the provisions of this chapter.

(56) "Resource management services" has the meaning given in chapter 71.24 RCW.

(57) "Responsible other" means the minor, the minor's parent or estate, or any other person legally responsible for support of the minor.

(58) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department or secretary's designee.

(59) "Secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility" means a facility operated by either a public or private agency or by the program of an agency which provides care to voluntary individuals and individuals involuntarily detained and committed under this chapter for whom there is a likelihood of serious harm or who are gravely disabled due to the presence of a substance use disorder. Secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities must:

(a) Provide the following services:

(i) Assessment and treatment, provided by certified substance use disorder professionals or co-occurring disorder specialists;

(ii) Clinical stabilization services;

(iii) Acute or subacute detoxification services for intoxicated individuals; and

(iv) Discharge assistance provided by certified substance use disorder professionals or co-occurring disorder specialists, including facilitating transitions to appropriate voluntary or involuntary inpatient services or to less restrictive alternatives as appropriate for the individual;

(b) Include security measures sufficient to protect the patients, staff, and community; and

(c) Be licensed or certified as such by the department of health.

(60) "Severe deterioration from safe behavior" means that a person will, if not treated, suffer or continue to suffer severe and abnormal mental, emotional, or physical distress, and this distress is associated with significant impairment of judgment, reason, or behavior.

(61) "Social worker" means a person with a master's or further advanced degree from a social work educational program accredited and approved as provided in RCW 18.320.010.

(62) "Start of initial detention" means the time of arrival of the minor at the first evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program offering inpatient treatment if the minor is being involuntarily detained at the time. With regard to voluntary patients, "start of initial detention" means the time at which the minor gives notice of intent to leave under the provisions of this chapter.

(63) "Store and forward technology" means use of an asynchronous transmission of a person's medical information from a mental health service provider to the designated crisis responder which results in medical diagnosis, consultation, or treatment.

(64) "Substance use disorder" means a cluster of cognitive, behavioral, and physiological symptoms indicating that an individual continues using the substance despite significant substance-related problems. The diagnosis of a substance use disorder is based on a pathological pattern of behaviors related to the use of the substances.

(65) "Substance use disorder professional" means a person certified as a substance use disorder professional by the department of health under chapter 18.205 RCW.

(66) "Therapeutic court personnel" means the staff of a mental health court or other therapeutic court which has jurisdiction over defendants who are dually diagnosed with mental disorders, including court personnel, probation officers, a court monitor, prosecuting attorney, or defense counsel acting within the scope of therapeutic court duties.

(67) "Treatment records" include registration and all other records concerning persons who are receiving or who at any time have received services for mental illness, which are maintained by the department, the department of health, the authority, behavioral health organizations and their staffs, and by treatment facilities. Treatment records include mental health information contained in a medical bill including but not limited to mental health drugs, a mental health diagnosis, provider name, and dates of service stemming from a medical service. Treatment records do not include notes or records maintained for personal use by a person providing treatment services for the department, the department of health, the authority, behavioral health organizations, or a treatment facility if the notes or records are not available to others.

(68) "Triage facility" means a short-term facility or a portion of a facility licensed or certified by the department of health under RCW 71.24.035, which is designed as a facility to assess and stabilize an individual or determine the need for involuntary commitment of an individual, and must meet department of health residential treatment facility standards. A triage facility may be structured as a voluntary or involuntary placement facility.

(69) "Video" means the delivery of behavioral health services through the use of interactive audio and video technology, permitting real-time communication between a person and a designated crisis responder, for the purpose of evaluation. "Video" does not include the use of audio-only telephone, facsimile, email, or store and forward technology.

(70) "Violent act" means behavior that resulted in homicide, attempted suicide, injury, or substantial loss or damage to property.

(71) "In need of assisted outpatient treatment" refers to a minor who meets the criteria for assisted outpatient treatment established under RCW 71.34.815.

Sec. 7. RCW 71.34.740 and 2020 c 302 s 92 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A ((commitment)) hearing shall be held within ((one hundred twenty))120 hours of the minor's admission, excluding Saturday, Sunday, and holidays, or if the hearing is held on a petition filed under RCW 71.34.815, the hearing shall be held at a time scheduled under that section, unless a continuance is ordered under RCW 71.34.735.

(2) The ((commitment)) hearing shall be conducted at the superior court or an appropriate place at the facility in which the minor is being detained.

(3) At the ((commitment)) hearing, the evidence in support of the petition shall be presented by the county prosecutor.

(4) The minor shall be present at the ((commitment)) hearing unless the minor, with the assistance of the minor's attorney, waives the right to be present at the hearing.

(5) If the parents are opposed to the petition, they may be represented at the hearing and shall be entitled to court-appointed counsel if they are indigent.

(6) At the ((commitment)) hearing, the minor shall have the following rights:

(a) To be represented by an attorney;

(b) To present evidence on his or her own behalf;

(c) To question persons testifying in support of the petition.

(7) If the ((hearing))petition is ((for commitment)) for mental health treatment, the court at the time of the ((commitment)) hearing and before an order ((of commitment))making findings is entered shall inform the minor both orally and in writing that the failure to make a good faith effort to seek voluntary treatment as provided in RCW 71.34.730 will result in the loss of his or her firearm rights if the minor is subsequently ((detained for))ordered to receive involuntary treatment under this section.

(8) If the minor has received medication within ((twenty-four))24 hours of the hearing, the court shall be informed of that fact and of the probable effects of the medication.

(9) For a ((fourteen-day))14-day commitment, the court must find by a preponderance of the evidence that:

(a) The minor has a behavioral health disorder and presents a likelihood of serious harm or is gravely disabled;

(b) The minor is in need of evaluation and treatment of the type provided by the inpatient evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program to which continued inpatient care is sought or is in need of less restrictive alternative treatment found to be in the best interests of the minor or others;

(c) The minor is unwilling or unable in good faith to consent to voluntary treatment; and

(d) If commitment is for a substance use disorder, there is an available secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program with adequate space for the minor.

(10)(a) If the court finds that the minor meets the criteria for a ((fourteen-day))14-day commitment, the court shall either authorize commitment of the minor for inpatient treatment or for less restrictive alternative treatment upon such conditions as are necessary. If the court determines that the minor does not meet the criteria for a ((fourteen-day))14-day commitment, the minor shall be released.

(b) If the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the minor is in need of assisted outpatient treatment pursuant to a petition filed under RCW 71.34.815, the court shall order an appropriate less restrictive course of treatment for up to 18 months.

(11)(a) Nothing in this section prohibits the professional person in charge of the facility from releasing the minor at any time, when, in the opinion of the professional person in charge of the facility, further inpatient treatment is no longer necessary. The release may be subject to reasonable conditions if appropriate.

(b) Whenever a minor is released under this section, the professional person in charge shall within three days, notify the court in writing of the release.

(12) A minor who has been committed for fourteen days shall be released at the end of that period unless a petition for ((one hundred eighty-day))180-day commitment is pending before the court.

Sec. 8. RCW 71.34.740 and 2020 c 302 s 93 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A ((commitment)) hearing shall be held within ((one hundred twenty))120 hours of the minor's admission, excluding Saturday, Sunday, and holidays, or if the hearing is held on a petition filed under RCW 71.34.815, the hearing shall be held at a time scheduled under that section, unless a continuance is ordered under RCW 71.34.735.

(2) The ((commitment)) hearing shall be conducted at the superior court or an appropriate place at the facility in which the minor is being detained.

(3) At the ((commitment)) hearing, the evidence in support of the petition shall be presented by the county prosecutor.

(4) The minor shall be present at the ((commitment)) hearing unless the minor, with the assistance of the minor's attorney, waives the right to be present at the hearing.

(5) If the parents are opposed to the petition, they may be represented at the hearing and shall be entitled to court-appointed counsel if they are indigent.

(6) At the ((commitment)) hearing, the minor shall have the following rights:

(a) To be represented by an attorney;

(b) To present evidence on his or her own behalf;

(c) To question persons testifying in support of the petition.

(7) If the ((hearing))petition is for ((commitment for)) mental health treatment, the court at the time of the ((commitment)) hearing and before an order ((of commitment))making findings is entered shall inform the minor both orally and in writing that the failure to make a good faith effort to seek voluntary treatment as provided in RCW 71.34.730 will result in the loss of his or her firearm rights if the minor is subsequently ((detained for))ordered to receive involuntary treatment under this section.

(8) If the minor has received medication within ((twenty-four))24 hours of the hearing, the court shall be informed of that fact and of the probable effects of the medication.

(9) For a ((fourteen-day))14-day commitment, the court must find by a preponderance of the evidence that:

(a) The minor has a behavioral health disorder and presents a likelihood of serious harm or is gravely disabled;

(b) The minor is in need of evaluation and treatment of the type provided by the inpatient evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program to which continued inpatient care is sought or is in need of less restrictive alternative treatment found to be in the best interests of the minor or others; and

(c) The minor is unwilling or unable in good faith to consent to voluntary treatment.

(10)(a) If the court finds that the minor meets the criteria for a ((fourteen-day))14-day commitment, the court shall either authorize commitment of the minor for inpatient treatment or for less restrictive alternative treatment upon such conditions as are necessary. If the court determines that the minor does not meet the criteria for a ((fourteen-day))14-day commitment, the minor shall be released.

(b) If the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the minor is in need of assisted outpatient treatment pursuant to a petition filed under RCW 71.34.815, the court shall order an appropriate less restrictive course of treatment for up to 18 months.

(11)(a) Nothing in this section prohibits the professional person in charge of the facility from releasing the minor at any time, when, in the opinion of the professional person in charge of the facility, further inpatient treatment is no longer necessary. The release may be subject to reasonable conditions if appropriate.

(b) Whenever a minor is released under this section, the professional person in charge shall within three days, notify the court in writing of the release.

(12) A minor who has been committed for fourteen days shall be released at the end of that period unless a petition for ((one hundred eighty-day))180-day commitment is pending before the court.

Sec. 9. RCW 71.34.780 and 2020 c 302 s 97 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An agency or facility designated to monitor or provide less restrictive alternative treatment services to a minor under a court order or conditional release may take a range of actions to enforce the terms of the order or conditional release in the event the minor is not adhering to the terms or is experiencing substantial deterioration, decompensation, or a likelihood of serious harm. Such actions may include:

(a) Counseling the minor and offering incentives for compliance;

(b) Increasing the intensity of services;

(c) Petitioning the court to review the minor's compliance and optionally modify the terms of the order or conditional release while the minor remains in outpatient treatment;

(d) To request assistance from a peace officer for temporarily detaining the minor for up to 12 hours for evaluation at a crisis stabilization unit, evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, facility providing services under a court order, or emergency department to determine if revocation or enforcement proceedings under this section are necessary and appropriate to stabilize the minor, if there has been a pattern of noncompliance or failure of reasonable attempts at outreach and engagement; or

(e) Initiation of revocation proceedings under subsection (2) of this section.

(2) If the professional person in charge of an outpatient treatment program, a designated crisis responder, or the director or secretary, as appropriate, determines that a minor is failing to adhere to the conditions of ((the))a court order for less restrictive alternative treatment or the conditions ((for the))of a conditional release, or that substantial deterioration in the minor's functioning has occurred, the designated crisis responder, or the director or secretary, as appropriate, may order that the minor be taken into custody and transported to an inpatient evaluation and treatment facility, a secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or an approved substance use disorder treatment program. A secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program that has adequate space for the minor must be available.

(((2)))(3)(a) The designated crisis responder, director, or secretary, as appropriate, shall file the order of apprehension and detention and serve it upon the minor and notify the minor's parent and the minor's attorney, if any, of the detention within two days of return. At the time of service the minor shall be informed of the right to a hearing and to representation by an attorney. The designated crisis responder or the director or secretary, as appropriate, may modify or rescind the order of apprehension and detention at any time prior to the hearing.

(b) If the minor is involuntarily detained for revocation at an evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program in a different county from where the minor was initially detained, the facility or program may file the order of apprehension, serve it on the minor and notify the minor's parents and the minor's attorney at the request of the designated crisis responder.

(((3)))(4) A petition for revocation of less restrictive alternative treatment shall be filed by the designated crisis responder or the director, secretary, or facility, as appropriate, with the court in the county where the minor is detained. The court shall conduct the hearing in that county. A petition for revocation of conditional release must be filed in the county where the minor is detained. A petition shall describe the behavior of the minor indicating violation of the conditions or deterioration of routine functioning and a dispositional recommendation. The hearing shall be held within seven days of the minor's return. The issues to be determined are whether the minor did or did not adhere to the conditions of the less restrictive alternative treatment or conditional release, or whether the minor's routine functioning has substantially deteriorated, and, if so, whether the conditions of less restrictive alternative treatment or conditional release should be modified or, subject to subsection (((4)))(5) of this section, whether the ((minor))court should ((be returned to))order the minor's detention for inpatient treatment. Pursuant to the determination of the court, the minor shall be returned to less restrictive alternative treatment or conditional release on the same or modified conditions or shall be ((returned to))detained for inpatient treatment. If the minor is ((returned to))detained for inpatient treatment, RCW 71.34.760 regarding the director's placement responsibility shall apply. The hearing may be waived by the minor and the minor ((returned to))detained for inpatient treatment or returned to less restrictive alternative treatment or conditional release on the same or modified conditions. If the court orders detention for inpatient treatment, the treatment period must be for 14 days from the revocation hearing if the less restrictive alternative treatment order was based on a petition under RCW 71.34.740 or 71.34.815. The minor must return to less restrictive alternative treatment under the order at the end of the 14-day period unless a petition for further treatment is filed under RCW 71.34.750 or the minor accepts voluntary treatment. If the court orders detention for inpatient treatment and the less restrictive alternative treatment order or conditional release was based on a petition under RCW 71.34.750, the number of days remaining on the less restrictive alternative treatment order or conditional release must be converted to days of inpatient treatment.

(((4)))(5) A court may not order the ((return))placement of a minor to inpatient treatment in a secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program unless there is a secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program available with adequate space for the minor.

Sec. 10. RCW 71.34.780 and 2020 c 302 s 98 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An agency or facility designated to monitor or provide less restrictive alternative treatment services to a minor under a court order or conditional release may take a range of actions to enforce the terms of the order or conditional release in the event the minor is not adhering to the terms or is experiencing substantial deterioration, decompensation, or a likelihood of serious harm. Such actions may include:

(a) Counseling the minor and offering incentives for compliance;

(b) Increasing the intensity of services;

(c) Petitioning the court to review the minor's compliance and optionally modify the terms of the order or conditional release while the minor remains in outpatient treatment;

(d) To request assistance from a peace officer for temporarily detaining the minor for up to 12 hours for evaluation at a crisis stabilization unit, evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, facility providing services under a court order, or emergency department to determine if revocation or enforcement proceedings under this section are necessary and appropriate to stabilize the minor, if there has been a pattern of noncompliance or failure of reasonable attempts at outreach and engagement; or

(e) Initiation of revocation proceedings under subsection (2) of this section.

(2) If the professional person in charge of an outpatient treatment program, a designated crisis responder, or the director or secretary, as appropriate, determines that a minor is failing to adhere to the conditions of ((the))a court order for less restrictive alternative treatment or the conditions ((for the))of conditional release, or that substantial deterioration in the minor's functioning has occurred, the designated crisis responder, or the director or secretary, as appropriate, may order that the minor be taken into custody and transported to an inpatient evaluation and treatment facility, a secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or an approved substance use disorder treatment program.

(((2)))(3)(a) The designated crisis responder, director, or secretary, as appropriate, shall file the order of apprehension and detention and serve it upon the minor and notify the minor's parent and the minor's attorney, if any, of the detention within two days of return. At the time of service the minor shall be informed of the right to a hearing and to representation by an attorney. The designated crisis responder or the director or secretary, as appropriate, may modify or rescind the order of apprehension and detention at any time prior to the hearing.

(b) If the minor is involuntarily detained for revocation at an evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program in a different county from where the minor was initially detained, the facility or program may file the order of apprehension, serve it on the minor and notify the minor's parents and the minor's attorney at the request of the designated crisis responder.

(((3)))(4) A petition for revocation of less restrictive alternative treatment shall be filed by the designated crisis responder or the director, secretary, or facility, as appropriate, with the court in the county where the minor is detained. The court shall conduct the hearing in that county. A petition for revocation of conditional release must be filed in the county where the minor is detained. A petition shall describe the behavior of the minor indicating violation of the conditions or deterioration of routine functioning and a dispositional recommendation. The hearing shall be held within seven days of the minor's return. The issues to be determined are whether the minor did or did not adhere to the conditions of the less restrictive alternative treatment or conditional release, or whether the minor's routine functioning has substantially deteriorated, and, if so, whether the conditions of less restrictive alternative treatment or conditional release should be modified or whether the ((minor))court should ((be returned to))order the minor's detention for inpatient treatment. Pursuant to the determination of the court, the minor shall be returned to less restrictive alternative treatment or conditional release on the same or modified conditions or shall be ((returned to))detained for inpatient treatment. If the minor is ((returned to))detained for inpatient treatment, RCW 71.34.760 regarding the director's placement responsibility shall apply. The hearing may be waived by the minor and the minor ((returned to))detained for inpatient treatment or returned to less restrictive alternative treatment or conditional release on the same or modified conditions. If the court orders detention for inpatient treatment, the treatment period must be for 14 days from the revocation hearing if the less restrictive alternative treatment order was based on a petition under RCW 71.34.740 or 71.34.815. The minor must return to less restrictive alternative treatment under the order at the end of the 14-day period unless a petition for further treatment is filed under RCW 71.34.750 or the minor accepts voluntary treatment. If the court orders detention for inpatient treatment and the less restrictive alternative treatment order or conditional release was based on a petition under RCW 71.34.750, the number of days remaining on the less restrictive alternative treatment order or conditional release must be converted to days of inpatient treatment.

Sec. 11. RCW 71.34.815 and 2022 c 210 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An adolescent is in need of assisted outpatient treatment if the court finds by ((clear, cogent, and convincing))a preponderance of the evidence in response to a petition filed under this section that:

(a) The adolescent has a behavioral health disorder;

(b) Based on a clinical determination and in view of the adolescent's treatment history and current behavior, at least one of the following is true:

(i) The adolescent is unlikely to survive safely in the community without supervision and the adolescent's condition is substantially deteriorating; or

(ii) The adolescent is in need of assisted outpatient treatment in order to prevent a relapse or deterioration that would be likely to result in grave disability or a likelihood of serious harm to the adolescent or to others;

(c) The adolescent has a history of lack of compliance with treatment for his or her behavioral health disorder that has:

(i) At least twice within the 36 months prior to the filing of the petition been a significant factor in necessitating hospitalization of the adolescent, or the adolescent's receipt of services in a forensic or other mental health unit of a state ((correctional))juvenile rehabilitation facility or local ((correctional))juvenile detention facility, provided that the 36-month period shall be extended by the length of any hospitalization or incarceration of the adolescent that occurred within the 36-month period;

(ii) At least twice within the 36 months prior to the filing of the petition been a significant factor in necessitating emergency medical care or hospitalization for behavioral health-related medical conditions including overdose, infected abscesses, sepsis, endocarditis, or other maladies, or a significant factor in behavior which resulted in the adolescent's incarceration in a state or local correctional facility; or

(iii) Resulted in one or more violent acts, threats, or attempts to cause serious physical harm to the adolescent or another within the 48 months prior to the filing of the petition, provided that the 48-month period shall be extended by the length of any hospitalization or incarceration of the person that occurred during the 48-month period;

(d) Participation in an assisted outpatient treatment program would be the least restrictive alternative necessary to ensure the adolescent's recovery and stability; and

(e) The adolescent will benefit from assisted outpatient treatment.

(2) The following individuals may directly file a petition for less restrictive alternative treatment on the basis that an adolescent is in need of assisted outpatient treatment:

(a) The director of a hospital where the adolescent is hospitalized or the director's designee;

(b) The director of a behavioral health service provider providing behavioral health care or residential services to the adolescent or the director's designee;

(c) The adolescent's treating mental health professional or substance use disorder professional or one who has evaluated the person;

(d) A designated crisis responder;

(e) A release planner from a juvenile detention or rehabilitation facility; or

(f) An emergency room physician.

(3) A court order for less restrictive alternative treatment on the basis that the adolescent is in need of assisted outpatient treatment may be effective for up to 18 months, unless the adolescent is currently detained for inpatient treatment for 14 days or more under RCW 71.34.740 or 71.34.750, in which case the order may be effective for 180 days. The petitioner must personally interview the adolescent, unless the adolescent refuses an interview, to determine whether the adolescent will voluntarily receive appropriate treatment.

(4) The petitioner must allege specific facts based on personal observation, evaluation, or investigation, and must consider the reliability or credibility of any person providing information material to the petition.

(5) The petition must include:

(a) A statement of the circumstances under which the adolescent's condition was made known and the basis for the opinion, from personal observation or investigation, that the adolescent is in need of assisted outpatient treatment. The petitioner must state which specific facts come from personal observation and specify what other sources of information the petitioner has relied upon to form this belief;

(b) A declaration from a physician, physician assistant, or advanced registered nurse practitioner, ((or)) the adolescent's treating mental health professional or substance use disorder professional, or in the case of a person enrolled in treatment in a behavioral health agency, the person's behavioral health case manager, who has examined the adolescent no more than 10 days prior to the submission of the petition and who is willing to testify in support of the petition, or who alternatively has made appropriate attempts to examine the adolescent within the same period but has not been successful in obtaining the adolescent's cooperation, and who is willing to testify to the reasons they believe that the adolescent meets the criteria for assisted outpatient treatment((. If the declaration is provided by the adolescent's treating mental health professional or substance use disorder professional, it must be cosigned by a supervising physician, physician assistant, or advanced registered nurse practitioner who certifies that they have reviewed the declaration));

(c) The declarations of additional witnesses, if any, supporting the petition for assisted outpatient treatment;

(d) The name of an agency, provider, or facility that agrees to provide less restrictive alternative treatment if the petition is granted by the court; and

(e) If the adolescent is detained in a state hospital, inpatient treatment facility, or juvenile detention or rehabilitation facility at the time the petition is filed, the anticipated release date of the adolescent and any other details needed to facilitate successful reentry and transition into the community.

(6)(a) Upon receipt of a petition meeting all requirements of this section, the court shall fix a date for a hearing:

(i) No sooner than three days or later than seven days after the date of service or as stipulated by the parties or, upon a showing of good cause, no later than 30 days after the date of service; or

(ii) If the adolescent is hospitalized at the time of filing of the petition, before discharge of the adolescent and in sufficient time to arrange for a continuous transition from inpatient treatment to assisted outpatient treatment.

(b) A copy of the petition and notice of hearing shall be served, in the same manner as a summons, on the petitioner, the adolescent, the qualified professional whose affidavit accompanied the petition, a current provider, if any, and a surrogate decision maker or agent under chapter 71.32 RCW, if any.

(c) If the adolescent has a surrogate decision maker or agent under chapter 71.32 RCW who wishes to provide testimony at the hearing, the court shall afford the surrogate decision maker or agent an opportunity to testify.

(d) The adolescent shall be represented by counsel at all stages of the proceedings.

(e) If the adolescent fails to appear at the hearing after notice, the court may conduct the hearing in the adolescent's absence; provided that the adolescent's counsel is present.

(f) If the adolescent has refused to be examined by the qualified professional whose affidavit accompanied the petition, the court may order a mental examination of the adolescent. The examination of the adolescent may be performed by the qualified professional whose affidavit accompanied the petition. If the examination is performed by another qualified professional, the examining qualified professional shall be authorized to consult with the qualified professional whose affidavit accompanied the petition.

(g) If the adolescent has refused to be examined by a qualified professional and the court finds reasonable grounds to believe that the allegations of the petition are true, the court may issue a written order directing a peace officer who has completed crisis intervention training to detain and transport the adolescent to a provider for examination by a qualified professional. An adolescent detained pursuant to this subsection shall be detained no longer than necessary to complete the examination and in no event longer than 24 hours. All papers in the court file must be provided to the adolescent's designated attorney.

(7) If the petition involves an adolescent whom the petitioner or behavioral health administrative services organization knows, or has reason to know, is an American Indian or Alaska Native who receives medical or behavioral health services from a tribe within this state, the behavioral health administrative services organization shall notify the tribe and Indian health care provider. Notification shall be made in person or by telephonic or electronic communication to the tribal contact listed in the authority's tribal crisis coordination plan as soon as possible.

(8) A petition for assisted outpatient treatment filed under this section shall be adjudicated under RCW 71.34.740.

(9) ((After January 1, 2023, a))A petition for assisted outpatient treatment must be filed on forms developed by the administrative office of the courts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12. Sections 3, 7, and 9 of this act expire July 1, 2026.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13. Sections 4, 8, and 10 of this act take effect July 1, 2026.

Sec. 14. 2021 c 264 s 29 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

(1) Sections 64 and 81, chapter 302, Laws of 2020 ((and, until July 1, 2022, section 27, chapter 264, Laws of 2021 and, beginning July 1, 2022)), section 28, chapter 264, Laws of 2021, and section 6, chapter . . ., Laws of 2023 (section 6 of this act) take effect when the average wait time for children's long-term inpatient placement admission is 30 days or less for two consecutive quarters.

(2) The health care authority must provide written notice of the effective date of sections 64 and 81, chapter 302, Laws of 2020 ((and)), section((s 27 and)) 28, chapter 264, Laws of 2021, and section 6, chapter . . ., Laws of 2023 (section 6 of this act) to affected parties, the chief clerk of the house of representatives, the secretary of the senate, the office of the code reviser, and others as deemed appropriate by the authority.

--- END ---