BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.07.020 and 2009 c 549 s 5025 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary of state may have one assistant secretary of state ((and)), one deputy secretary of state, and one chief of staff each of whom shall have signing authority and be appointed by ((him or her))the secretary in writing, and continue ((during his or her))serving at the pleasure of the secretary. The assistant secretary of state ((and)), deputy secretary of state, and chief of staff shall have the power to perform any act or duty relating to the secretary of state's office, that the secretary of state has, and the secretary of state shall be responsible for the acts of said assistant ((and)), deputy, and chief of staff.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---