BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 2.06.040 and 2007 c 34 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The court shall sit in panels of three judges and decisions shall be rendered by not less than a majority of the panel. In the determination of causes all decisions of the court shall be given in writing and the grounds of the decisions shall be stated. All decisions of the court having precedential value shall be published as opinions of the court. Each panel shall determine whether a decision of the court has sufficient precedential value to be published as an opinion of the court. Decisions determined not to have precedential value shall not be published. ((Panels in the first division shall be comprised of such judges as the chief judge thereof shall from time to time direct.)) Judges of the respective divisions may sit in other divisions ((and)), causes may be transferred between divisions, ((as directed by written order of the chief justice. The))and the court may hold sessions in cities, as ((may be designated))provided by rule.

The court may establish rules supplementary to and not in conflict with rules of the supreme court.

--- END ---