BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 43.131.419 (Medicaid fraud false claims act—Termination) and 2016 c 147 s 1 & 2012 c 241 s 216; and

(2) RCW 43.131.420 (Medicaid fraud false claims act—Repeal) and 2016 c 147 s 2 & 2012 c 241 s 217.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---