BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

2021-2023 FISCAL BIENNIUM

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES—OPERATING

Sec. 101. 2022 c 186 s 206 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE FREIGHT MOBILITY STRATEGIC INVESTMENT BOARD

Freight Mobility Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($843,000))

$895,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: Within appropriated funds, the freight mobility strategic investment board may opt in as provided under RCW 70A.02.030 to assume all of the substantive and procedural requirements of covered agencies under chapter 70A.02 RCW. The board shall include in its 2022 annual report to the legislature a progress report on opting into the healthy environment for all act and a status report on diversity, equity, and inclusion within the board's jurisdiction.

Sec. 102. 2022 c 186 s 207 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

State Patrol Highway Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($524,348,000))

$526,335,000

State Patrol Highway Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$16,433,000

State Patrol Highway Account—Private/Local

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,314,000

Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,292,000

Ignition Interlock Device Revolving Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,243,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$293,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$433,000

Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$77,000

I-405 and SR 167 Express Toll Lanes Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,348,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($550,781,000))

$552,768,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Washington state patrol officers engaged in off-duty uniformed employment providing traffic control services to the department of transportation or other state agencies may use state patrol vehicles for the purpose of that employment, subject to guidelines adopted by the chief of the Washington state patrol. The Washington state patrol must be reimbursed for the use of the vehicle at the prevailing state employee rate for mileage and hours of usage, subject to guidelines developed by the chief of the Washington state patrol.

(2) $580,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for the operation of and administrative support to the license investigation unit to enforce vehicle registration laws in southwestern Washington. The Washington state patrol, in consultation with the department of revenue, shall maintain a running estimate of the additional vehicle registration fees, sales and use taxes, and local vehicle fees remitted to the state pursuant to activity conducted by the license investigation unit. Beginning October 1, 2021, and quarterly thereafter, the Washington state patrol shall submit a report detailing the additional revenue amounts generated since January 1, 2021, to the director of the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature. At the end of the calendar quarter in which it is estimated that more than $625,000 in state sales and use taxes have been remitted to the state since January 1, 2021, the Washington state patrol shall notify the state treasurer and the state treasurer shall transfer funds pursuant to section 406, chapter 333, Laws of 2021.

(3) $4,000,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for a third arming and a third trooper basic training class. The cadet class is expected to graduate in June 2023.

(4) By December 1st of each year during the 2021-2023 biennium, the Washington state patrol must report to the house and senate transportation committees on the status of recruitment and retention activities as follows:

(a) A summary of recruitment and retention strategies;

(b) The number of transportation funded staff vacancies by major category;

(c) The number of applicants for each of the positions by these categories;

(d) The composition of workforce;

(e) Other relevant outcome measures with comparative information with recent comparable months in prior years; and

(f) Activities related to the implementation of the agency's workforce diversity plan, including short-term and long-term, specific comprehensive outreach and recruitment strategies to increase populations underrepresented within both commissioned and noncommissioned employee groups.

(5) $493,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for aerial criminal investigation tools, including software licensing and maintenance, and annual certification, and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701, chapter 333, Laws of 2021.

(6) $6,422,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for the land mobile radio system replacement, upgrade, and other related activities. Beginning January 1, 2022, the Washington state patrol must report semiannually to the office of the state chief information officer on the progress related to the projects and activities associated with the land mobile radio system, including the governance structure, outcomes achieved in the prior six month time period, and how the activities are being managed holistically as recommended by the office of the chief information officer. At the time of submittal to the office of the state chief information officer, this report shall be transmitted to the office of financial management and the house and senate transportation committees.

(7) $510,000 of the ignition interlock device revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the ignition interlock program at the Washington state patrol to provide funding for two staff to work and provide support for the program in working with manufacturers, service centers, technicians, and participants in the program.

(8) $1,348,000 of the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account—state appropriation, $433,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation, and $77,000 of the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account—state appropriation are provided solely for the Washington state patrol's proportional share of time spent supporting tolling operations and enforcement for the respective tolling facilities.

(9) $289,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for the replacement of 911 workstations.

(10) $35,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for the replacement of bomb response equipment.

(11) $713,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for information technology infrastructure maintenance.

(12) The Washington state patrol must provide a report to the office of financial management and the house and senate transportation committees on its plan for implementing a transition to cloud computing and storage with its 2023-2025 budget submittal.

(13) $945,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 329, Laws of 2021 (custodial interrogations).

(14) $46,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 320, Laws of 2021 (peace officer tactics).

(15) $46,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 324, Laws of 2021 (use of force by officers).

(16)(a) The legislature finds that the water connection extension constructed by the Washington state patrol from the city of Shelton's water facilities to the Washington state patrol academy was necessary to meet the water supply needs of the academy. The legislature also finds that the water connection provides an ongoing water supply that is necessary to the operation of the training facility, that the state is making use of the water connection for these public activities, and that any future incidental use of the municipal infrastructure put in place to support these activities will not impede the Washington state patrol's ongoing use of the water connection extension.

(b) $2,220,000 of the transfer from the waste tire removal account to the motor vehicle fund, as required under RCW 70A.205.425, reimburses the motor vehicle fund for the portion of the water project costs assigned by the agreement to properties, other than the Washington state patrol academy, that make use of the water connection while the agreement remains in effect. This reimbursement to the motor vehicle fund is intended to address any possibility that the termination of this agreement could be determined to result in the unconstitutional use of 18th amendment designated funds for nonhighway purposes under the constitution of the state of Washington; however, this transfer is not intended to indicate that the incidental use of this infrastructure by these properties necessarily requires such reimbursement under the state Constitution. Immediately following the transfer of funds, Washington state patrol and the city of Shelton shall meet to formally update the terms of their "Agreement for Utility Connection and Reimbursement of Water Extension Expenses" executed on June 12, 2017, to reflect the intent of the proviso.

(17) The appropriations in this section provide sufficient funding for state patrol staffing assuming vacancy savings which may change over time. Funding for staffing will be monitored and adjusted in the 2023 supplemental budget to restore funding as authorized staffing levels are achieved.

(18) $331,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for the state patrol's diversity, equity, and inclusion program and a contract with an external psychologist to perform exams. If chapter 146, Laws of 2022 is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(19) $793,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for the tenant improvements and higher than expected equipment costs for the toxicology lab in Federal Way, and preparing a report on the current cost recovery mechanisms and opportunities for expanding these cost recovery mechanisms in the future. The report must be submitted to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature by November 1, 2022.

(20) $14,788,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for contingency funding to address emergent issues related to mitigating negative impacts of the high level of commissioned and noncommissioned staff vacancies. Potential uses of the funding include, but are not limited to, the following: Operating a miniacademy and training opportunities for lateral transfers from other agencies; increased overtime, travel, and other related costs; increased contracting to maintain adequate service levels; and unanticipated facility and equipment needs. By January 1, 2023, the state patrol must submit a report to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature detailing the specific expenditures made from the contingency funding provided in this subsection. The report must also include a description of the miniacademy training, including the number of lateral transfers that entered the training, the number which completed training, the cost of the miniacademy, and a comparison of how the training was different from a conventional academy class.

(21) $122,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation, $1,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation, and $4,000 of the ignition interlock account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of chapter . . . (House Bill No. 1804), Laws of 2022 (interruptive military service credit for members of the state retirement systems). If chapter . . . (House Bill No. 1804), Laws of 2022 is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(22) $250,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 80, Laws of 2022 (peace officers/use of force). If chapter 80, Laws of 2022 is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(23) $949,000 of the state patrol highway account—state is provided solely for vehicle identification number inspection staff to reduce the backlog of inspections and a study of how to incorporate best practices into the program, including the timeliness of inspections.

Sec. 103. 2022 c 186 s 208 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING

Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$34,000

Motorcycle Safety Education Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$5,016,000

Limited Fish and Wildlife Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$922,000

Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($242,712,000))

$243,238,000

Highway Safety Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,294,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$80,449,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$400,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$1,336,000

Ignition Interlock Device Revolving Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$6,123,000

Department of Licensing Services Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$7,964,000

License Plate Technology Account—State Appropriation

. . . .
$4,092,000

Abandoned Recreational Vehicle Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,078,000

Limousine Carriers Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$110,000

Electric Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$425,000

DOL Technology Improvement & Data Management

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$874,000

Agency Financial Transaction Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$22,257,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($377,086,000))

$377,612,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,100,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide an interagency transfer to the department of social and health services, children's administration division for the purpose of providing driver's license support to a larger population of foster youth than is already served within existing resources. Support services include reimbursement of driver's license issuance costs, fees for driver training education, and motor vehicle liability insurance costs.

(2) The appropriations in this section assume implementation by the department of cost recovery mechanisms to recoup at least $21,257,000 during the 2021-2023 biennium in credit card and other financial transaction costs as part of charges imposed for driver and vehicle fee transactions. During the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the department must report any amounts recovered to the office of financial management and appropriate committees of the legislature on a quarterly basis.

(3)(a) For the 2021-2023 biennium, the department shall charge $1,336,000 for the administration and collection of a motor vehicle excise tax on behalf of a regional transit authority, as authorized under RCW 82.44.135. The amount in this subsection must be deducted before distributing any revenues to a regional transit authority.

(b) $100,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to work with the regional transit authority imposing a motor vehicle excise tax pursuant to RCW 81.104.160 and transportation benefit districts imposing vehicle fees pursuant to RCW 82.80.140, and other relevant parties, to determine cost recovery options for the administration and collection of the taxes and fees. The options must include:

(i) Full cost recovery for the direct and indirect expenses by the department of licensing, subagents, and counties;

(ii) Marginal cost recovery for the direct and indirect expenses by the department of licensing, subagents, and counties;

(iii) The estimated costs if the regional transit authority or transportation benefit districts had to contract out the entire collection and administrative activity with a nongovernmental entity.

(4) $12,000 of the motorcycle safety education account—state appropriation, $2,000 of the limited fish and wildlife account—state appropriation, $728,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation, $238,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation, $10,000 of the ignition interlock device revolving account—state appropriation, and $10,000 of the department of licensing services account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department to redesign and improve its online services and website, and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701, chapter 333, Laws of 2021.

(5) $28,636,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for costs necessary to accommodate increased demand for enhanced drivers' licenses and enhanced identicards. The department shall report on a quarterly basis on the use of these funds, associated workload, and information with comparative information with recent comparable months in prior years. The report must include detailed statewide and by licensing service office information on staffing levels, average monthly wait times, the number of enhanced drivers' licenses and enhanced identicards issued/renewed, and the number of primary drivers' licenses and identicards issued/renewed. Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the department shall implement efficiency measures to reduce the time for licensing transactions and wait times including, but not limited to, the installation of additional cameras at licensing service offices that reduce bottlenecks and align with the "keep your customer" initiative.

(6) $500,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for communication and outreach activities necessary to inform the public of federally acceptable identification options including, but not limited to, enhanced drivers' licenses and enhanced identicards. The department shall continue the outreach plan that includes informational material that can be effectively communicated to all communities and populations in Washington. To accomplish this work, the department shall contract with an external vendor with demonstrated experience and expertise in outreach and marketing to underrepresented communities in a culturally responsive fashion.

(7) $523,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 158, Laws of 2021 (DOL issued documents).

(8) $929,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 240, Laws of 2021 (suspension of licenses for traffic infractions).

(9) $23,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 10, Laws of 2021 (restoring voter eligibility after felony conviction).

(10) $3,074,000 of the abandoned recreational vehicle disposal account—state appropriation is provided solely for providing reimbursements in accordance with the department's abandoned recreational vehicle disposal reimbursement program. It is the intent of the legislature that the department prioritize this funding for allowable and approved reimbursements and not to build a reserve of funds within the account. During the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the department must report any amounts recovered to the office of financial management and appropriate committees of the legislature on a quarterly basis.

(11)(a) $54,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the issuance of nonemergency medical transportation vehicle decals to implement the high occupancy vehicle lane access pilot program established in section 216, chapter 333, Laws of 2021. A for hire nonemergency medical transportation vehicle is a vehicle that is a "for hire vehicle" under RCW 46.04.190 that provides nonemergency medical transportation, including for life-sustaining transportation purposes, to meet the medical transportation needs of individuals traveling to medical practices and clinics, cancer centers, dialysis facilities, hospitals, and other care providers.

(b) As part of this pilot program, the owner of a for hire nonemergency medical transportation vehicle may apply to the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director, for a high occupancy vehicle exempt decal for a for hire nonemergency medical transportation vehicle. The high occupancy vehicle exempt decal allows the for hire nonemergency medical transportation vehicle to use a high occupancy vehicle lane as specified in RCW 46.61.165 and 47.52.025 during the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.

(c) For the exemption in this subsection to apply to a for hire nonemergency medical transportation vehicle, the decal:

(i) Must be displayed on the vehicle so that it is clearly visible from outside the vehicle;

(ii) Must identify that the vehicle is exempt from the high occupancy vehicle requirements; and

(iii) Must be visible from the rear of the vehicle.

(d) The owner of a for hire nonemergency medical transportation vehicle or the owner's representative must apply for a high occupancy vehicle exempt decal on a form provided or approved by the department. The application must include:

(i) The name and address of the person who is the owner of the vehicle;

(ii) A full description of the vehicle, including its make, model, year, and the vehicle identification number;

(iii) The purpose for which the vehicle is principally used;

(iv) An attestation signed by the vehicle's owner or the owner's representative that the vehicle's owner has a minimum of one contract or service agreement to provide for hire transportation services for medical purposes with one or more of the following entities: A health insurance company; a hospital, clinic, dialysis center, or other medical institution; a day care center, retirement home, or group home; a federal, state, or local agency or jurisdiction; or a broker who negotiates these services on behalf of one or more of these entities; and

(v) Other information as required by the department upon application.

(e) The department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director shall collect the fee required under (f) of this subsection when issuing a high occupancy vehicle exempt decal.

(f) The department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent, is required to collect a $5 fee when issuing a decal under this subsection, in addition to any other fees and taxes required by law.

(g) A high occupancy vehicle exempt decal expires June 30, 2023, and must be marked to indicate its expiration date. The decal may be renewed if the pilot program is continued past the date of a decal's expiration. The status as an exempt vehicle continues until the high occupancy vehicle exempt decal is suspended or revoked for misuse, the vehicle is no longer used as a for hire nonemergency medical transportation vehicle, or the pilot program established in section 216, chapter 333, Laws of 2021 is terminated.

(h) The department may adopt rules to implement this subsection.

(12) $434,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of the Thurston county superior court order in Pierce et al. v. Department of Licensing.

(13) The department shall consult with the department of corrections and state board for community and technical colleges to develop a pilot program that allows incarcerated individuals who are not prohibited by state or federal law from receiving a commercial driver's license upon release to participate in a prerelease commercial driver training program. The department must submit a report to the legislature by June 30, 2023, detailing the status of the program.

(14) $100,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to lead a study on the potential impacts that current licensing requirements, including required training hours, and testing requirements may have on the shortage of commercial drivers, and whether adjustments to these requirements may be warranted to help alleviate the shortage. In completing the study, the department must consult with the workforce training board, state board for community and technical colleges, federal motor carrier safety officials, organizations representing veterans, organizations representing commercial drivers, and organizations representing businesses or government entities that rely on commercial drivers. The report must be submitted to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2022.

(15) $965,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the increased costs associated with delays in the production of license plates, and to provide a report detailing license plate inventory practices and whether those practices should be changed to guard against potential future plate production delays. The report must be submitted to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2022.

(16) $28,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 96, Laws of 2022 (state leadership board) and making improvements to the annual information submitted by special license plate sponsoring organizations pursuant to RCW 46.18.120(2). The improvements must include, but are not limited to, the following: An annual budget for the sponsoring organization's activities in the preceding year; information regarding private and other governmental support for the activities of the sponsoring organization; and a description of the number of people served or services delivered, as appropriate, by the sponsoring organization in the preceding year. If chapter 96, Laws of 2022 is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(17) (($268,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter . . . (Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5054), Laws of 2022 (impaired driving). If chapter . . . (Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5054), Laws of 2022 is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(18))) $113,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 51, Laws of 2022 (human trafficking disqualification for a commercial driver's license). If chapter 51, Laws of 2022 is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(((19)))(18) $18,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 239, Laws of 2022 (Patches pal special license plates). If chapter 239, Laws of 2022 is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(((20)))(19) $350,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely to expand driver's license assistance and support services in King county with an existing provider that is already providing these services to low-income immigrant and refugee women. By March 1, 2023, the contracted provider must submit information on the annual budget in the preceding year; information regarding private and other governmental support for the activities of the provider; and a description of the number of people served, services delivered, and outcome measures.

(((21)))(20) $6,139,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation, $1,849,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation, $203,000 of the department of licensing services account—state appropriation, and $105,000 of the department of licensing technology improvement and data management account—state appropriation are provided solely for contingency funding to address emergent issues related to mitigating negative impacts of the high level of staff vacancies and agency operations and customer service levels. Potential uses of the funding include, but are not limited to, the following: Increased overtime, travel, and other related costs; increased contracting to maintain adequate service levels; and unanticipated facility and equipment needs. By January 1, 2023, the department shall submit a report to the governor and the legislative transportation committees detailing the specific expenditures made from the contingency funding provided in this subsection.

(((22)))(21) $28,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 191, Laws of 2022 (veterans and military suicide). If chapter 191, Laws of 2022 is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(((23)))(22) $83,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 36, Laws of 2022 (vehicle registration certificate addresses). If chapter 36, Laws of 2022 is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(((24)))(23) $57,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 40, Laws of 2022 (off-road vehicles fees). If chapter 40, Laws of 2022 is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(((25)))(24) $18,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 117, Laws of 2022 (wine special license plate). If chapter 117, Laws of 2022 is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(((26)))(25) $316,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 132, Laws of 2022 (temporary license plates). If chapter 132, Laws of 2022 is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(((27)))(26) $251,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to: (a) Provide each driver's license, identicard, instruction permit, intermediate license, and commercial driver's license applicant with written materials regarding the contents and requirements of RCW 46.61.212, the slow down and move over law, at the completion of the applicant's licensing transaction; (b) place signage in each of the licensing service offices that provide background on the written materials that the applicant will receive regarding the slow down and move over law; and (c) initiate the development of an appropriate training module relating to the requirements of RCW 46.61.212, for inclusion in all new driver training curricula.

Sec. 104. 2022 c 186 s 209 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—TOLL OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE—PROGRAM B

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($58,356,000))

$55,324,000

State Route Number 520 Civil Penalties Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,163,000

Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($31,102,000))

$33,330,000

Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
(($21,806,000))

$23,725,000

Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 Express

Toll Lanes Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($24,647,000))

$23,146,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($140,074,000))

$139,688,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,300,000 of the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account—state appropriation and $12,484,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation are provided solely for the purposes of addressing unforeseen operations and maintenance costs on the Tacoma Narrows bridge and the state route number 520 bridge, respectively. The office of financial management shall place the amounts provided in this subsection, which represent a portion of the required minimum fund balance under the policy of the state treasurer, in unallotted status. The office may release the funds only when it determines that all other funds designated for operations and maintenance purposes have been exhausted.

(2) As long as the facility is tolled, the department must provide annual reports to the transportation committees of the legislature on the Interstate 405 express toll lane project performance measures listed in RCW 47.56.880(4). These reports must include:

(a) Information on the travel times and travel time reliability (at a minimum, average and 90th percentile travel times) maintained during peak and nonpeak periods in the express toll lanes and general purpose lanes for both the entire corridor and commonly made trips in the corridor including, but not limited to, northbound from Bellevue to Rose Hill, state route number 520 at NE 148th to Interstate 405 at state route number 522, Bellevue to Bothell (both NE 8th to state route number 522 and NE 8th to state route number 527), and a trip internal to the corridor (such as NE 85th to NE 160th) and similar southbound trips;

(b) A month-to-month comparison of travel times and travel time reliability for the entire corridor and commonly made trips in the corridor as specified in (a) of this subsection since implementation of the express toll lanes and, to the extent available, a comparison to the travel times and travel time reliability prior to implementation of the express toll lanes;

(c) Total express toll lane and total general purpose lane traffic volumes, as well as per lane traffic volumes for each type of lane (i) compared to total express toll lane and total general purpose lane traffic volumes, as well as per lane traffic volumes for each type of lane, on this segment of Interstate 405 prior to implementation of the express toll lanes and (ii) compared to total express toll lane and total general purpose lane traffic volumes, as well as per lane traffic volumes for each type of lane, from month to month since implementation of the express toll lanes; and

(d) Underlying congestion measurements, that is, speeds, that are being used to generate the summary graphs provided, to be made available in a digital file format.

(3)(a) (($1,189,000))$875,000 of the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account—state appropriation, (($2,783,000))$2,049,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation, (($1,218,000))$903,000 of the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account—state appropriation, and (($1,568,000))$1,155,000 of the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account—state appropriation are provided solely for the reappropriation of unspent funds on the new tolling back office system from the 2019-2021 biennium.

(b) The office of financial management shall place the amounts provided in this subsection in unallotted status until the department submits a detailed progress report on the progress of the new tolling back office system. The director of the office of financial management or their designee shall consult with the chairs and ranking members of the transportation committees of the legislature prior to making a decision to allot these funds.

(4) $121,000 of the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account—state appropriation, $288,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation, $128,000 of the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account—state appropriation, and $163,000 of the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department to contract with the state auditor's office for a performance audit of the department's project to replace its electronic toll collection system. The audit should include an evaluation of the department's project planning, vendor procurement, contract management and project oversight. The final report is to be issued by December 31, 2022. The state auditor will transmit copies of the report to the jurisdictional committees of the legislature and the department.

(5) The department shall make detailed annual reports to the transportation committees of the legislature and the public on the department's web site on the following:

(a) The use of consultants in the tolling program, including the name of the contractor, the scope of work, the type of contract, timelines, deliverables, any new task orders, and any extensions to existing consultant contracts;

(b) The nonvendor costs of administering toll operations, including the costs of staffing the division, consultants, and other personal service contracts required for technical oversight and management assistance, insurance, payments related to credit card processing, transponder purchases and inventory management, facility operations and maintenance, and other miscellaneous nonvendor costs;

(c) The vendor-related costs of operating tolled facilities, including the costs of the customer service center, cash collections on the Tacoma Narrows bridge, electronic payment processing, and toll collection equipment maintenance, renewal, and replacement;

(d) The toll adjudication process, including a summary table for each toll facility that includes:

(i) The number of notices of civil penalty issued;

(ii) The number of recipients who pay before the notice becomes a penalty;

(iii) The number of recipients who request a hearing and the number who do not respond;

(iv) Workload costs related to hearings;

(v) The cost and effectiveness of debt collection activities; and

(vi) Revenues generated from notices of civil penalty; and

(e) A summary of toll revenue by facility on all operating toll facilities and express toll lane systems, and an itemized depiction of the use of that revenue.

(6) During the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the department plans to issue a request for proposals as the first stage of a competitive procurement process that will replace the toll equipment and select a new tolling operator for the Tacoma Narrows Bridge. The request for proposals and subsequent competitive procurement must incorporate elements that prioritize the overall goal of lowering costs per transaction for the facility, such as incentives for innovative approaches which result in lower transactional costs, requests for efficiencies on the part of the bidder that lower operational costs, and incorporation of technologies such as self-serve credit card machines or other point-of-payment technologies that lower costs or improve operational efficiencies.

(7) $19,908,000 of the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account—state appropriation is provided solely for the new state route number 99 tunnel toll facility's expected share of collecting toll revenues, operating customer services, and maintaining toll collection systems. The legislature expects to see appropriate reductions to the other toll facility accounts once tolling on the new state route number 99 tunnel toll facility stabilizes and any previously incurred costs for start-up of the new facility are charged back to the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account. The office of financial management shall closely monitor the application of the cost allocation model and ensure that the new state route number 99 tunnel toll facility is adequately sharing costs and the other toll facility accounts are not being overspent or subsidizing the new state route number 99 tunnel toll facility.

(8) The department shall submit a plan to the legislature for the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account detailing how bond proceeds can cover the proposed construction plan on the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lane corridor outlined ((on LEAP Transportation Document 2021-1 as developed April 23, 2021,)) by January 1, 2022.

(9) (($4,554,000))$5,779,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation and (($580,000))$744,000 of the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account—state appropriation are provided solely for the increased costs of insurance for the state route number 520 floating bridge and the Tacoma Narrows bridge, respectively. The department shall conduct an evaluation of the short and long-term costs and benefits including risk mitigation of self-insurance as compared to the commercial insurance option for the state route number 520 floating bridge, as allowed under the terms of the state route number 520 master bond resolution. By December 15, 2021, the department shall report to the legislature on the results of this evaluation.

(10) As part of the department's 2023-2025 biennial budget request, the department shall update the cost allocation recommendations that assign appropriate costs to each of the toll funds for services provided by relevant Washington state department of transportation programs, the Washington state patrol, and the transportation commission. The recommendations shall be based on updated traffic and toll transaction patterns and other relevant factors.

(11) All amounts provided for operations and maintenance expenses on the SR 520 facility from the state route number 520 corridor account during the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium in this act, up to a maximum of $59,567,000, are derived from the receipt of federal American rescue plan act of 2021 funds and not toll revenues.

(12) $14,000 of the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account—state appropriation, $32,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation, $22,000 of the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account—state appropriation, and $27,000 of the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account—state appropriation are provided solely to implement chapter 132, Laws of 2022 (temporary license plates). If chapter 132, Laws of 2022 is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amounts provided in this subsection lapse.

Sec. 105. 2022 c 186 s 210 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY—PROGRAM C

Transportation Partnership Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,461,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($101,010,000))

$101,026,000

Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$307,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$7,013,000

Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,461,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($111,252,000))

$111,268,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $4,273,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation and $4,273,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department's cost related to the one Washington project, and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701, chapter 333, Laws of 2021.

(2) $2,404,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation and $119,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation are provided solely for contingency funding to address emergent issues related to mitigating negative impacts of the high level of staff vacancies. Potential uses of the funding include, but are not limited to, the following: Increased overtime, travel, and other related costs; increased contracting to maintain adequate service levels; and unanticipated facility and equipment needs. By January 1, 2023, the department must submit a report to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature detailing the specific expenditures made from the contingency funding provided in this subsection.

Sec. 106. 2022 c 186 s 211 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—FACILITY MAINTENANCE, OPERATIONS, AND CONSTRUCTION—PROGRAM D—OPERATING

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($36,843,000))

$37,931,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$34,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($36,877,000))

$37,965,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $780,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for contingency funding to address emergent issues related to mitigating negative impacts of the high level of staff vacancies. Potential uses of the funding include, but are not limited to, the following: Increased overtime, travel, and other related costs; increased contracting to maintain adequate service levels; and unanticipated facility and equipment needs. By January 1, 2023, the department must submit a report to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature detailing the specific expenditures made from the contingency funding provided in this subsection.

Sec. 107. 2022 c 186 s 212 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—TRANSPORTATION EQUIPMENT FUND—PROGRAM E

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($12,396,000))

$13,860,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($10,396,000))$11,860,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department's costs related to replacing obsolete transportation equipment. The appropriations to the department in this section must be expended to maximize the amount of obsolete equipment replaced in the 2021-2023 biennium.

(2) $2,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department's costs related to replacing snow removal equipment. The appropriations to the department in this section must be expended to maximize the amount of snow removal equipment replaced in the 2021-2023 biennium.

Sec. 108. 2022 c 186 s 213 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—AVIATION—PROGRAM F

Aeronautics Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($8,127,000))

$8,130,000

Aeronautics Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$3,916,000

Aeronautics Account—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$60,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$150,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($12,253,000))

$12,256,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $2,888,000 of the aeronautics account—state appropriation is provided solely for the airport aid grant program, which provides competitive grants to public use airports for pavement, safety, maintenance, planning, and security.

(2) $257,000 of the aeronautics account—state appropriation is provided solely for supporting the commercial aviation coordinating commission, pursuant to section 718, chapter 333, Laws of 2021.

(3) $280,000 of the aeronautics account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 131, Laws of 2021 (unpiloted aircraft system state coordinator). If chapter 131, Laws of 2021 is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(4)(a) $150,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the aviation program to continue the community engagement associated with the work of the commercial aviation coordinating commission to increase aviation capacity and provide a single preferred location for a new primary commercial aviation facility by June 15, 2023. The work of the commission shall include, but is not limited to, recommendations to the legislature on future Washington state long-range commercial aviation facility needs including possible additional aviation facilities or expansion of current aviation facilities.

(b) Community engagement efforts may include:

(i) Raising awareness among aviation stakeholders and the public on the complex issues that must be addressed by the commission;

(ii) Obtaining input from a representative cross section of the public on the construction of a new airport and the expansion of existing airports to meet future aviation demand;

(iii) Keeping people informed as the commission's work progresses, including diverse communities that are often underrepresented in processes to inform decision making;

(iv) Providing opportunities for members of the public to provide direct input to the commission during the pandemic that limits opportunities for direct social contact;

(v) Using surveys, open houses, focus groups, translation services, informational handouts, advertisements, social media, and other appropriate means of communicating with the public; and

(vi) Providing a focus on the demographics or people in the geographical areas most impacted by expanding aviation capacity or developing a new aviation facility.

(c) The department may use a communications consultant or community-based organizations to assist with community engagement efforts in (b) of this subsection.

Sec. 109. 2022 c 186 s 214 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—PROGRAM DELIVERY MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT—PROGRAM H

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($58,254,000))

$57,866,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$500,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$758,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($59,512,000))

$59,124,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The legislature recognizes that the trail known as the Rocky Reach Trail, and its extensions, serve to separate motor vehicle traffic from pedestrians and bicyclists, increasing motor vehicle safety on state route number 2 and the coincident section of state route number 97. Consistent with chapter 47.30 RCW and pursuant to RCW 47.12.080, the legislature declares that transferring portions of WSDOT Inventory Control (IC) No. 2-09-04686 containing the trail and associated buffer areas to the Washington state parks and recreation commission is consistent with the public interest. The legislature directs the department to transfer the property to the Washington state parks and recreation commission.

(a) The department must be paid fair market value for any portions of the transferred real property that is later abandoned, vacated, or ceases to be publicly maintained for trail purposes.

(b) Prior to completing the transfer in this subsection (1), the department must ensure that provisions are made to accommodate private and public utilities and any facilities that predate the department's acquisition of the property, at no cost to those entities. Prior to completing the transfer, the department shall also ensure that provisions, by fair market assessment, are made to accommodate other private and public utilities and any facilities that have been legally allowed by permit or other instrument.

(c) The department may sell any adjoining property that is not necessary to support the Rocky Reach Trail and adjacent buffer areas only after the transfer of trail-related property to the Washington state parks and recreation commission is complete. Adjoining property owners must be given the first opportunity to acquire such property that abuts their property, and applicable boundary line or other adjustments must be made to the legal descriptions for recording purposes.

(2) With respect to Parcel 12 of the real property conveyed by the state of Washington to the city of Mercer Island under that certain quitclaim deed, dated April 19, 2000, recorded in King county under recording no. 20000425001234, the requirement in the deed that the property be used for road/street purposes only will be deemed satisfied by the department of transportation so long as commuter parking, as part of the vertical development of the property, is one of the significant uses of the property.

(3) The department shall report to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2021, on the status of its efforts to consolidate franchises for broadband facilities across the state, including plans for increasing the number of consolidated franchises in the future.

(4) During the 2021-2023 biennium, if the department takes possession of the property situated in the city of Edmonds for which a purchase agreement was executed between Unocal and the department in 2005 (Tax Parcel Number 262703-2-003-0009), and if the department confirms that the property is still no longer needed for transportation purposes, the department shall provide the city of Edmonds with the right of first purchase at fair market value in accordance with RCW 47.12.063(3) for the city's intended use of the property to rehabilitate near-shore habitat for salmon and related species.

(5) (($535,000))$125,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 217, Laws of 2021 (noxious weeds).

(6) $1,026,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 314, Laws of 2021 (environmental justice task force).

(7) $2,399,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for contingency funding to address emergent issues related to mitigating negative impacts of the high level of staff vacancies. Potential uses of the funding include, but are not limited to, the following: Increased overtime, travel, and other related costs; increased contracting to maintain adequate service levels; and unanticipated facility and equipment needs. By January 1, 2023, the department must submit a report to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature detailing the specific expenditures made from the contingency funding provided in this subsection.

(8) The department shall offer to sell the northern parcel of site 14 on the Puget Sound Gateway Program SR 509 Completion Project Surplus Property list, located immediately south of S. 216th Street and adjacent to the Barnes Creek Nature Trail in Des Moines, to Seattle Goodwill Industries, a nonprofit organization with tax ID 91-05688708, located at 700 Dearborn Place S., Seattle, WA 98144, in accordance with RCW 47.12.063 at fair market value because the legislature finds it in the public interest to do so for the public benefit that will result from Goodwill's redevelopment of the property it owns at Rainier Ave. South and South Dearborn Street to increase the supply of affordable housing.

Sec. 110. 2022 c 187 s 205 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—PUBLIC-PRIVATE PARTNERSHIPS—PROGRAM K

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$10,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
(($9,822,000))

$10,172,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$10,182,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: (($9,822,000))$10,172,000 of the multimodal transportation account—federal appropriation is provided solely to implement the national electric vehicle program, established in the federal infrastructure investment and jobs act (P.L. 117-58), as directed by the interagency electric vehicle coordinating council created in chapter 182, Laws of 2022. The amounts provided in this subsection include staff support for the council. The funding provided in this subsection may be used to support the publicly available mapping and forecasting tool under RCW 47.01.520, but only to the extent not funded in the omnibus appropriations act.

Sec. 111. 2022 c 186 s 216 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE—PROGRAM M

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($505,015,000))

$509,127,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$7,000,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Local Appropriation
. . . .
$17,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,657,000

Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,560,000

Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$8,611,000

Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 Express

Toll Lanes Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,594,000

Waste Tire Removal Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$5,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($534,454,000))

$538,566,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $7,529,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for utility fees assessed by local governments as authorized under RCW 90.03.525 for the mitigation of stormwater runoff from state highways. Plan and reporting requirements as required in chapter 435, Laws of 2019 (Local Stormwater Charges) shall be consistent with the January 2012 findings of the Joint Transportation Committee Report for Effective Cost Recovery Structure for WSDOT, Jurisdictions, and Efficiencies in Stormwater Management.

(2) $5,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for a contingency pool for snow and ice removal. The department must notify the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature when they have spent the base budget for snow and ice removal and will begin using the contingency pool funding.

(3) $1,025,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to implement safety improvements and debris clean up on department-owned rights-of-way in the city of Seattle at levels above that being implemented as of January 1, 2019, to be administered in conjunction with subsection (9) of this section. The department must maintain a crew dedicated solely to collecting and disposing of garbage, clearing debris or hazardous material, and implementing safety improvements where hazards exist to the traveling public, department employees, or people encamped upon department-owned rights-of-way. The department may request assistance from the Washington state patrol as necessary in order for both agencies to provide enhanced safety-related activities regarding the emergency hazards along state highway rights-of-way in the Seattle area.

(4) $1,015,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for a partnership program between the department and the city of Tacoma, to be administered in conjunction with subsection (9) of this section. The program shall address the safety and public health problems created by homeless encampments on the department's property along state highways within the city limits. $570,000 is for dedicated department maintenance staff and associated clean-up costs. The department and the city of Tacoma shall enter into a reimbursable agreement to cover up to $445,000 of the city's expenses for clean-up crews and landfill costs.

(5) The department must continue a pilot program for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium at the four highest demand safety rest areas to create and maintain an online calendar for volunteer groups to check availability of weekends for the free coffee program. The calendar must be updated at least weekly and show dates and times that are, or are not, available to participate in the free coffee program. The department must submit a report to the legislature on the ongoing pilot by December 1, 2022, outlining the costs and benefits of the online calendar pilot, and including surveys from the volunteer groups and agency staff to determine its effectiveness.

(6) $686,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for reimbursing the Oregon department of transportation (ODOT) for the department's share of increased maintenance costs of six highway bridges over the Columbia River that are maintained by ODOT.

(7) $8,290,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for increased costs of highway maintenance materials.

(8) $5,816,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for a contingency pool for repairing damages to highways caused by known and unknown third parties. The department must notify the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature when they have spent the base budget for third-party damage repair and will begin using the contingency pool funding.

(9)(a) $3,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation and $5,000,000 of the waste tire removal account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department to address the risks to safety and public health associated with homeless encampments on department owned rights-of-way. The department must coordinate and work with local government officials and social service organizations who provide services and direct people to housing alternatives that are not in highway rights-of-way to help prevent future encampments from forming on highway rights-of-way, and may reimburse the organizations doing this outreach assistance who transition people into treatment or housing or for debris clean up on highway rights-of-way. A minimum of $2,000,000 of this appropriation must be used to provide more frequent removal of litter on the highway rights-of-way that is generated by unsheltered people and may be used to hire crews specializing in collecting and disposing of garbage, clearing debris or hazardous material, and implementing safety improvements where hazards exist to the traveling public and department employees. The department may use these funds to either reimburse local law enforcement costs or the Washington state patrol if they are providing enhanced safety to department staff during debris cleanup or during efforts to prevent future encampments from forming on highway rights-of-way.

(b) Beginning November 1, 2022, and semiannually thereafter, the Washington state patrol and the department of transportation must jointly submit a report to the governor and the house and senate transportation committees of the legislature on the status of these efforts, including:

(i) A detailed breakout of the size, location, risk level categorization, and number of encampments on or near department-owned rights-of-way, compared to the levels during the quarter being reported;

(ii) A summary of the activities in that quarter related to addressing these encampments, including information on arrangements with local governments or other entities related to these activities;

(iii) A description of the planned activities in the ensuing quarter to further address the emergency hazards and risks along state highway rights-of-way; and

(iv) Recommendations for executive branch or legislative action to achieve the desired outcome of reduced emergency hazards and risks along state highway rights-of-way.

(10)(a) $2,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with the city of Fife to address the risks to safety and public health associated with homeless encampments on department-owned rights-of-way along the SR 167/SR 509 Puget Sound Gateway project corridor in and adjacent to the city limits.

(b) The city must coordinate and work with the department and local governments and social service organizations who provide services and direct people to housing alternatives that are not in highway rights-of-way to help prevent future encampments from forming on highway rights-of-way. State funds may be used to reimburse the organizations doing this outreach assistance who transition people into treatment or housing that is not on the rights-of-way or for debris clean up on highway rights-of-way.

(c) The department may hire crews specializing in collecting and disposing of garbage, clearing debris or hazardous material, and implementing safety improvements where hazards exist to the traveling public and department employees.

(d) Funds may also be used to reimburse local law enforcement costs or the Washington state patrol if they are participating as part of a state or local government agreement to provide enhanced safety related activities along state highway rights-of-way.

(e) It is the intent of the legislature that the city and collaborating partners should place particular emphasis on utilizing available funds for addressing large scale and multiple homeless encampments that impact public safety and health. Funding for initiatives associated with such encampments may include targeted assistance to local governments and social service organizations, directing moneys toward not only initial efforts to clear encampments, clean up debris and restore sightlines, but to ongoing work, monitoring, and maintenance of efforts to place individuals in housing, treatment and services, and to better ensure individuals experiencing homelessness receive needed assistance while sites remain safe and secure for the traveling public.

(11) $12,096,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for contingency funding to address emergent issues related to mitigating negative impacts of the high level of staff vacancies. Potential uses of the funding include, but are not limited to, the following: Increased overtime, travel and other related costs; increased contracting to maintain adequate service levels; and unanticipated facility and equipment needs. By January 1, 2023, the department must submit a report to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature detailing the specific expenditures made from the contingency funding provided in this subsection.

(12) $5,400,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for replacement of traffic signs and to increase the visibility of road pavement markings. Investments must replace traffic signs that do not meet the department's standards or that are faded, lacking in reflectivity, cracked, illegible, or damaged. Investments must also increase the visibility of road pavement markings during periods of low light conditions and during precipitation with pavement marking products that contain all-weather optical reflectivity capability. The request for proposals and subsequent competitive procurement for the signs shall be performed following state specifications and standards.

(13) $17,000 of the motor vehicle account—local appropriation is provided solely to update existing signs along Interstate 5 in the vicinity of Seattle center. The department must install new Seattle center logos with a redesigned logo that recognizes climate pledge arena, but is not responsible for design or fabrication of the logo or new sign.

(14) $100,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to install fencing to delineate between the privately leased property owned by the department and the public right-of-way property maintained by the city of Seattle. The parameters of the adjacent properties located under the Interstate 5 corridor, south of milepost 165, are south Jackson street and south King street going north and south, and 8th avenue south and 9th avenue south going west to east in the international district.

(15)(a) $2,500,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for:

(i) Additional resources for operations, maintenance, facility replacements, security, and upgrades to safety rest areas to ensure that safety rest areas owned and operated by the department are open for use except for seasonal closures or cleaning, maintenance, and repair; and

(ii) Reconfiguration of maintenance operations pursuant to chapter 262, Laws of 2022 (safety rest areas).

(b) The department may use the funds for additional labor, services, materials, or equipment needed to allow commercial vehicle parking stalls to remain open when rest areas might otherwise be closed.

(c) It is the intent of the legislature that these funds are additional resources for the department and not meant to supplant underlying resources for the maintenance and operations of safety rest areas.

(d) The department must make a report to the transportation committees of the legislature regarding the additional operations and maintenance activities made at safety rest areas to ensure that rest areas stayed open by January 15, 2023. The report must include the status per safety rest area of openings and closures that were impacted by the additional activities; the additional activities, including security efforts, that were performed at the rest areas; and an update on the status and a review of the safety rest area strategic plan.

(16)(a) $50,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to install and inspect monthly human trafficking informational posters in every rest room in every safety rest area owned and operated by the department.

(b) In developing the informational posters, the department shall consult with human trafficking victim advocates to determine content.

(c) The posters must:

(i) Be printed in a variety of languages;

(ii) Include contact information for seeking help, which may include toll-free telephone numbers a person may call for assistance, including the number for the national human trafficking resource center and the number for the Washington state office of crime victims advocacy; and

(iii) Be made of durable material and permanently affixed.

(d) The department shall install the informational posters in every restroom at every safety rest area owned and operated by the department by December 31, 2022.

(e) Beginning January 1, 2023, or one month after installation of informational posters, whichever is sooner, the department shall inspect the informational posters as part of its monthly maintenance activities to ensure that the posters are in fair condition and remain legible.

(f) The department must make a report to the transportation committees of the legislature regarding the installation of informational posters at safety rest areas by January 15, 2023. The report must include the number of informational posters installed, the location of the poster installations, and the completion date of the poster installations.

Sec. 112. 2022 c 186 s 217 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—TRAFFIC OPERATIONS—PROGRAM Q—OPERATING

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($73,760,000))

$74,070,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,050,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$295,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$225,000

Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$40,000

Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,112,000

Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 Express

Toll Lanes Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$20,000

Agency Financial Transaction Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$100,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($77,602,000))

$77,912,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $6,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for low-cost enhancements. The department shall give priority to low-cost enhancement projects that improve safety or provide congestion relief. By December 15th of each odd-numbered year, the department shall provide a report to the legislature listing all low-cost enhancement projects completed in the prior fiscal biennium.

(2)(a) During the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the department shall continue a pilot program that expands private transportation providers' access to high occupancy vehicle lanes. Under the pilot program, when the department reserves a portion of a highway based on the number of passengers in a vehicle, the following vehicles must be authorized to use the reserved portion of the highway if the vehicle has the capacity to carry eight or more passengers, regardless of the number of passengers in the vehicle: (i) Auto transportation company vehicles regulated under chapter 81.68 RCW; (ii) passenger charter carrier vehicles regulated under chapter 81.70 RCW, except marked or unmarked stretch limousines and stretch sport utility vehicles as defined under department of licensing rules; (iii) private nonprofit transportation provider vehicles regulated under chapter 81.66 RCW; and (iv) private employer transportation service vehicles. For purposes of this subsection, "private employer transportation service" means regularly scheduled, fixed-route transportation service that is offered by an employer for the benefit of its employees. Nothing in this subsection is intended to authorize the conversion of public infrastructure to private, for-profit purposes or to otherwise create an entitlement or other claim by private users to public infrastructure.

(b) The department shall expand the high occupancy vehicle lane access pilot program to vehicles that deliver or collect blood, tissue, or blood components for a blood-collecting or distributing establishment regulated under chapter 70.335 RCW. Under the pilot program, when the department reserves a portion of a highway based on the number of passengers in a vehicle, blood-collecting or distributing establishment vehicles that are clearly and identifiably marked as such on all sides of the vehicle are considered emergency vehicles and must be authorized to use the reserved portion of the highway.

(c) The department shall expand the high occupancy vehicle lane access pilot program to organ transport vehicles transporting a time urgent organ for an organ procurement organization as defined in RCW 68.64.010. Under the pilot program, when the department reserves a portion of a highway based on the number of passengers in a vehicle, organ transport vehicles that are clearly and identifiably marked as such on all sides of the vehicle are considered emergency vehicles and must be authorized to use the reserved portion of the highway.

(d) The department shall expand the high occupancy vehicle lane access pilot program to private, for hire vehicles regulated under chapter 81.72 RCW that have been specially manufactured, designed, or modified for the transportation of a person who has a mobility disability and uses a wheelchair or other assistive device. Under the pilot program, when the department reserves a portion of a highway based on the number of passengers in a vehicle, wheelchair-accessible taxicabs that are clearly and identifiably marked as such on all sides of the vehicle are considered public transportation vehicles and must be authorized to use the reserved portion of the highway.

(e) The department shall expand the high occupancy vehicle lane access pilot program to for hire nonemergency medical transportation vehicles, when in use for medical purposes, as described in section 208, chapter 333, Laws of 2021. Under the pilot program, when the department reserves a portion of a highway based on the number of passengers in a vehicle, nonemergency medical transportation vehicles that meet the requirements identified in section 208, chapter 333, Laws of 2021 must be authorized to use the reserved portion of the highway.

(f) Nothing in this subsection (2) is intended to exempt these vehicles from paying tolls when they do not meet the occupancy requirements established by the department for express toll lanes.

(3) $2,574,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for contingency funding to address emergent issues related to mitigating negative impacts of the high level of staff vacancies. Potential uses of the funding include, but are not limited to, the following: Increased overtime, travel, and other related costs; increased contracting to maintain adequate service levels; and unanticipated facility and equipment needs. By January 1, 2023, the department must submit a report to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature detailing the specific expenditures made from the contingency funding provided in this subsection.

(4) The appropriations in this section assume implementation of additional cost recovery mechanisms to recoup at least $100,000 in credit card and other financial transaction costs related to the collection of fees imposed under RCW 46.44.0941 for driver and vehicle fee transactions beginning January 1, 2023. The department may recover transaction fees incurred through credit card transactions. At the direction of the office of financial management, the department shall develop a method of tracking the additional amount of credit card and other financial cost-recovery revenues. In consultation with the office of financial management, the department shall notify the office of the state treasurer of these amounts and the state treasurer must deposit these revenues in the agency financial transaction account created in RCW 46.01.385 on a quarterly basis. The department shall also submit, as part of its 2023-2025 budget submittal, an overview of the credit card cost recovery approach, including fee rates and the amount of revenue expected to be generated in the 2021-2023 and 2023-2025 biennia.

(5) The department shall promote safety messages encouraging drivers to slow down and move over and pay attention when emergency lights are flashing on the side of the road and other suitable safety messages on electronic message boards the department operates across the state. The messages must be promoted multiple times each month through June 30, 2023. The department may coordinate such messaging with any statewide public awareness campaigns being developed by the department of licensing or the Washington state traffic safety commission or both.

Sec. 113. 2022 c 186 s 218 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT—PROGRAM S

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($37,365,000))

$37,369,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$780,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$500,000

Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$266,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$5,129,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$186,000

Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$150,000

Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$121,000

Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 Express

Toll Lanes Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$77,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($44,574,000))

$44,578,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $4,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for efforts to increase diversity in the transportation construction workforce through: (a) The preapprenticeship support services (PASS) program, which aims to increase diversity in the highway construction workforce and prepare individuals interested in entering the highway construction workforce. In addition to the services allowed by RCW 47.01.435, the PASS program may provide housing assistance for youth aging out of the foster care and juvenile rehabilitation systems in order to support the participation of these youth in a transportation-related preapprenticeship program; (b) assisting minority and women-owned businesses to perform work in the highway construction industry. This assistance shall include technical assistance, business training, counseling, guidance, prime to subcontractor relationship building, and a capacity building mentorship program. At a minimum, $1,000,000 of the total appropriation in this subsection shall be directed toward the efforts outlined in (b) of this subsection. The provider(s) chosen to complete the work in this subsection shall be selected through a competitive bidding process. The program shall be administered by the Washington state department of transportation's office of equal opportunity.

(2) $1,446,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for contingency funding to address emergent issues related to mitigating negative impacts of the high level of staff vacancies. Potential uses of the funding include, but are not limited to, the following: Increased overtime, travel, and other related costs; increased contracting to maintain adequate service levels; and unanticipated facility and equipment needs. By January 1, 2023, the department must submit a report to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature detailing the specific expenditures made from the contingency funding provided in this subsection.

(3) $774,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation and $266,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department to hire a workforce development consultant to develop, track, and monitor the progress of community workforce agreements, and to hire staff to assist with the development and implementation of internal diversity, equity, and inclusion efforts and serve as subject matter experts on federal and state civil rights provisions. The department shall engage with relevant stakeholders, and provide a progress report on the implementation of efforts under this subsection to the transportation committees of the legislature and the governor by December 1, 2022.

(4) For Washington state department of transportation small works roster projects under RCW 39.04.155, the department may only allow firms certified as small business enterprises, under 49 C.F.R. 26.39, to bid on the contract, unless the department determines there would be insufficient bidders for a particular project. The department shall report on the effectiveness of this policy to the transportation committees of the legislature by January 31, 2023.

Sec. 114. 2022 c 186 s 219 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA, AND RESEARCH—PROGRAM T

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($26,483,000))

$26,503,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$34,865,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$400,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,902,000))

$1,322,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,809,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Private/Local

Appropriation
. . . .
$100,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$451,000

Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 Express

Toll Lanes Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,879,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($69,889,000))

$69,329,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $4,080,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation is provided solely for the Forward Drive road usage charge research project overseen by the transportation commission using a portion of the amount of the federal grant award. The purpose of the Forward Drive road usage charge research project is to advance research in key policy areas related to road usage charge including assessing impacts of future mobility shifts on road usage charge revenues, conducting an equity analysis, updating and assessing emerging mileage reporting methods, determining opportunities to reduce cost of collection, conducting small-scale pilot tests, and identifying a long-term, detailed phase-in plan.

(2) $2,879,000 of the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account—state appropriation is provided solely for completion of updating the state route number 167 master plan.

(3) $500,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to partner with the department of commerce in developing vehicle miles traveled targets for the counties in Washington state with (a) a population density of at least 100 people per square mile and a population of at least 200,000; or (b) a population density of at least 75 people per square mile and an annual growth rate of at least 1.75 percent as determined by the office of financial management. Given land use patterns are key factors in travel demand and should be taken into consideration when developing the targets, the department and the department of commerce shall partner with local jurisdictions, regional transportation planning organizations and other stakeholders to inventory existing laws and rules that promote transportation and land use, identify gaps and make recommendations for changes in laws, rules and agency guidance, and establish a framework for considering underserved and rural communities in the evaluation. The department and the department of commerce shall provide an initial technical report by December 31, 2021, an interim report by June 22, 2022, and a final report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2023, that includes a process for establishing vehicle miles traveled reduction targets, a recommended suite of options for local jurisdictions to achieve the targets, and funding requirements for state and local jurisdictions.

(4) $451,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with the University of Washington department of mechanical engineering, to study measures to reduce noise impacts from the state route number 520 bridge expansion joints. The field testing shall be scheduled during existing construction, maintenance, or other scheduled closures to minimize impacts. The testing must also ensure safety of the traveling public. The study shall examine testing methodologies and project timelines and costs. A draft report must be submitted to the transportation committees of the legislature and the governor by March 1, 2022. A final report must be submitted to the transportation committees of the legislature and the governor by December 31, 2022.

(5) $5,900,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation and $400,000 of the motor vehicle account—private/local appropriation are provided solely for delivery of the department's state planning and research work program and pooled fund research projects.

(6) $800,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for WSDOT to do a corridor study of SR 302 (Victor Area) to recommend safety and infrastructure improvements to address current damage and prevent future roadway collapse and landslides that have caused road closures.

(7) $1,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for a study on the need for additional connectivity in the area between SR 161, SR 7, SR 507, and I-5 in South Pierce County.

(8) $1,654,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation and $108,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation are provided solely for contingency funding to address emergent issues related to mitigating negative impacts of the high level of staff vacancies. Potential uses of the funding include, but are not limited to, the following: Increased overtime, travel, and other related costs; increased contracting to maintain adequate service levels; and unanticipated facility and equipment needs. By January 1, 2023, the department must submit a report to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature detailing the specific expenditures made from the contingency funding provided in this subsection.

(9) $450,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to complete a performance-based project evaluation model based on the initial work done for section 218(7), chapter 219, Laws of 2020, in a way that operationalizes the six transportation policy goals in RCW 47.04.280. This work should first include clarification of the transportation policy goals through development of objectives and criteria that reflect system priorities based on outcomes of community engagement. After a framework is established by which goals can be more directly related to outcomes, the project evaluation model should leverage the department's existing experts and best practices used for prioritizing programmatic funds to develop procedures by which evaluators could consistently score and rank all types of projects. The department must issue a report by June 30, 2023, summarizing the new project evaluation model, and provide recommendations for how this process could be implemented in coordination with the legislative work cycle.

(10)(a) (($250,000))$70,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for Thurston regional planning council (TRPC) to conduct a study examining options for multimodal high capacity transportation (HCT) to serve travelers on the I-5 corridor between central Thurston county (Olympia area) and Pierce county.

(b) The study will include an assessment of travelsheds and ridership potential and identify and provide an evaluation of options to enhance connectivity and accessibility for the greater south Puget Sound region with an emphasis on linking to planned or existing commuter or regional light rail. The study must account for previous and ongoing efforts by transit agencies and the department. The study will emphasize collaboration with a diverse community of interests, including but not limited to transit, business, public agencies, tribes, and providers and users of transportation who because of age, income, or ability may face barriers and challenges. TRPC will provide to the transportation committees of the legislature a study outline and recommendations of deliverables by December 1, 2022.

(11) (($600,000))$200,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the city of Seattle's office of planning and community development to support an equitable development initiative to reconnect the South Park neighborhood, currently divided by State Route 99.

(a) The support work must include:

(i) A public engagement and visioning process led by a neighborhood-based, community organization; and

(ii) A feasibility study of decommissioning SR 99 in the South Park neighborhood to include, but not be limited to, traffic studies, environmental impact analysis, and development of alternatives, including the transfer of the land to a neighborhood-led community land trust.

(b) The support work must be conducted in coordination and partnership with neighborhood residents, neighborhood industrial and commercial representatives, the state department of transportation, and other entities and neighborhoods potentially impacted by changes to the operation of SR 99.

(c) The city must provide a report on the plan that includes recommendations to the Seattle city council, state department of transportation, and the transportation committees of the legislature by January 1, 2025.

Sec. 115. 2022 c 186 s 221 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION—PROGRAM V

State Vehicle Parking Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$784,000

Regional Mobility Grant Program Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($115,488,000))

$83,488,000

Rural Mobility Grant Program Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$33,283,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($134,754,000))

$129,245,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,574,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Local

Appropriation
. . . .
$100,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($287,983,000))

$250,474,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $67,821,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for a grant program for special needs transportation provided by transit agencies and nonprofit providers of transportation. Of this amount:

(a) $15,568,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants to nonprofit providers of special needs transportation. Grants for nonprofit providers must be based on need, including the availability of other providers of service in the area, efforts to coordinate trips among providers and riders, and the cost effectiveness of trips provided. Fuel type may not be a factor in the grant selection process.

(b) $52,253,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants to transit agencies to transport persons with special transportation needs. To receive a grant, the transit agency must, to the greatest extent practicable, have a maintenance of effort for special needs transportation that is no less than the previous year's maintenance of effort for special needs transportation. Grants for transit agencies must be prorated based on the amount expended for demand response service and route deviated service in calendar year 2019 as reported in the "Summary of Public Transportation - 2019" published by the department of transportation. No transit agency may receive more than thirty percent of these distributions. Fuel type may not be a factor in the grant selection process.

(2) $33,283,000 of the rural mobility grant program account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants to aid small cities in rural areas as prescribed in RCW 47.66.100. Fuel type may not be a factor in the grant selection process.

(3) $2,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for a public transit rideshare grant program for: (a) Public transit agencies to add or replace rideshare vehicles; and (b) incentives and outreach to increase rideshare use. The grant program for public transit agencies may cover capital costs only; operating costs for public transit agencies are not eligible for funding under this grant program. Additional employees may not be hired from the funds provided in this section for the vanpool grant program, and supplanting of transit funds currently funding vanpools is not allowed. The department shall encourage grant applicants and recipients to leverage funds other than state funds. Fuel type may not be a factor in the grant selection process.

(4) $37,809,000 of the regional mobility grant program account—state appropriation is reappropriated and provided solely for the regional mobility grant projects identified in ((LEAP Transportation Document 2022-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed March 9, 2022, Program -))2022 OFM Transportation Document 2023-1: Proposed Transportation Project List as developed December 14, 2022, Public Transportation Program (V).

(5)(a) (($77,679,000))$83,488,000 of the regional mobility grant program account—state appropriation is provided solely for the regional mobility grant projects identified in ((LEAP Transportation Document 2022-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed March 9, 2022, Program -))2022 OFM Transportation Document 2023-1: Proposed Transportation Project List as developed December 14, 2022, Public Transportation Program (V). The department shall review all projects receiving grant awards under this program at least semiannually to determine whether the projects are making satisfactory progress. Any project that has been awarded funds, but does not report activity on the project within one year of the grant award, must be reviewed by the department to determine whether the grant should be terminated. The department shall promptly close out grants when projects have been completed, and any remaining funds must be used only to fund projects identified in the ((LEAP))OFM transportation document referenced in this subsection. The department shall provide annual status reports on December 15, 2021, and December 15, 2022, to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature regarding the projects receiving the grants. It is the intent of the legislature to appropriate funds through the regional mobility grant program only for projects that will be completed on schedule. A grantee may not receive more than twenty-five percent of the amount appropriated in this subsection. Additionally, when allocating funding for the 2023-2025 biennium, no more than thirty percent of the total grant program may directly benefit or support one grantee unless all other funding is awarded. The department shall not approve any increases or changes to the scope of a project for the purpose of a grantee expending remaining funds on an awarded grant. Fuel type may not be a factor in the grant selection process.

(b) In order to be eligible to receive a grant under (a) of this subsection during the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, a transit agency must establish a process for private transportation providers to apply for the use of park and ride facilities. For purposes of this subsection, (i) "private transportation provider" means: An auto transportation company regulated under chapter 81.68 RCW; a passenger charter carrier regulated under chapter 81.70 RCW, except marked or unmarked stretch limousines and stretch sport utility vehicles as defined under department of licensing rules; a private nonprofit transportation provider regulated under chapter 81.66 RCW; or a private employer transportation service provider; and (ii) "private employer transportation service" means regularly scheduled, fixed-route transportation service that is offered by an employer for the benefit of its employees.

(6) Funds provided for the commute trip reduction (CTR) program may also be used for the growth and transportation efficiency center program.

(7) $6,500,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation and $784,000 of the state vehicle parking account—state appropriation are provided solely for CTR grants and activities. Fuel type may not be a factor in the grant selection process. Of this amount:

(a) $30,000 of the state vehicle parking account—state appropriation is provided solely for the STAR pass program for state employees residing in Mason and Grays Harbor Counties. Use of the pass is for public transportation between Mason County and Thurston County, and Grays Harbor and Thurston County. The pass may also be used within Grays Harbor County. The STAR pass commute trip reduction program is open to any state employee who expresses intent to commute to his or her assigned state worksite using a public transit system currently participating in the STAR pass program.

(b) $800,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for continuation of the first mile/last mile connections grant program. Eligible grant recipients include cities, businesses, nonprofits, and transportation network companies with first mile/last mile solution proposals. Transit agencies are not eligible. The commute trip reduction board shall develop grant parameters, evaluation criteria, and evaluate grant proposals. The commute trip reduction board shall provide the transportation committees of the legislature a report on the effectiveness of this grant program and best practices for continuing the program.

(8)(a) Except as provided otherwise in this subsection, $29,030,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for connecting Washington transit projects identified in ((LEAP Transportation Document 2022-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed March 9,))OFM Transportation Document 2023-1: Proposed Transportation Project List as developed December 14, 2022. It is the intent of the legislature that entities identified to receive funding in the ((LEAP))OFM document referenced in this subsection receive the amounts specified in the time frame specified in that ((LEAP))OFM document. If an entity has already completed a project in the ((LEAP))OFM document referenced in this subsection before the time frame identified, the entity may substitute another transit project or projects that cost a similar or lesser amount.

(b) Within the amount provided in this subsection, $900,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely to complete work on Martin Luther King Way, Rainier Ave improvements (G2000040).

(9) The department shall not require more than a ten percent match from nonprofit transportation providers for state grants.

(10) (($23,349,000))$20,849,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the green transportation capital grant program established in chapter 287, Laws of 2019 (advancing green transportation adoption).

(11) $555,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for an interagency transfer to the Washington State University extension energy program to establish and administer a technical assistance and education program for public agencies on the use of alternative fuel vehicles. The Washington State University extension energy program shall prepare a report regarding the utilization of the program and provide this report to the transportation committees of the legislature by November 15, 2021.

(12) The department must provide telework assistance to employers as part of its CTR activities. The objectives of telework assistance include improving transportation system performance, supporting economic vitality, and increasing equity and access to opportunity.

(13) $150,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for Intercity Transit for the Dash shuttle program.

(14)(a) $500,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for King county metro to develop a pilot program to place teams including human services personnel along routes that are enduring significant public safety issues and various disruptive behavior in south King county. The team would be available to deescalate disruptions, provide immediate access to transit resources, and refer customers to community resources to break cycles of inappropriate behavior. The teams must be individuals trained in deescalation and outreach. The function and duties should be cocreated with community stakeholders.

(b) King county metro must provide a report to the transportation committees of the legislature by June 30, 2023, regarding the effectiveness of the program, any suggestions for improving its efficacy, and any modifications that might be necessary for other transit providers to institute similar programs.

(c) If King county metro does not provide at least $500,000 to develop the pilot program funded by this subsection, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(15)(a) $250,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department, in consultation with the joint transportation committee, to conduct a study of statewide transit service benchmarks. Elements of the study include:

(i) Development of definitions of frequent fixed route transit and accessible frequent fixed route transit; and

(ii) Identification of, to the extent possible using existing data, current gaps in frequent fixed route transit and accessible walking routes to frequent fixed route transit stops.

(b) An initial report is due by December 15, 2022, that proposes a definition of frequent transit and documents how many people in Washington live within one half mile walk of frequent transit. A final report is due by June 30, 2023, that identifies gaps in accessible frequent transit, analyzed for disparities in race, age, and disability, and develops funding scenarios to address the identified gaps.

(16) Within existing resources, the department shall prepare a report regarding the funding, implementation, and operation of the grant management system or systems utilized by the public transportation division. In preparing this report, the department must survey and report on all grant recipients experience with the operation of this system or systems. The department shall provide this report to the transportation committees of the legislature by November 15, 2022.

Sec. 116. 2022 c 186 s 222 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—MARINE—PROGRAM X

Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($430,388,000))

$445,616,000

Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
(($156,789,000))

$155,756,000

Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—Private/Local

Appropriation
. . . .
$121,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$9,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($587,298,000))

$601,502,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The office of financial management budget instructions require agencies to recast enacted budgets into activities. The Washington state ferries shall include a greater level of detail in its 2021-2023 supplemental and 2023-2025 omnibus transportation appropriations act requests, as determined jointly by the office of financial management, the Washington state ferries, and the transportation committees of the legislature. This level of detail must include the administrative functions in the operating as well as capital programs. The data in the tables in the report must be supplied in a digital file format.

(2) For the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the department may enter into a distributor controlled fuel hedging program and other methods of hedging approved by the fuel hedging committee, which must include a representative of the department of enterprise services.

(3) $32,905,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—federal appropriation and (($53,794,000))$67,688,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation are provided solely for auto ferry vessel operating fuel in the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, which reflect cost savings from a reduced biodiesel fuel requirement and, therefore, is contingent upon the enactment of section 703 of this act. The amount provided in this subsection represents the fuel budget for the purposes of calculating any ferry fare fuel surcharge. The department shall review future use of alternative fuels and dual fuel configurations, including hydrogen.

(4) $500,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for operating costs related to moving vessels for emergency capital repairs. Funds may only be spent after approval by the office of financial management.

(5) $2,400,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation and $2,000,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—federal appropriation are provided solely for staffing and overtime expenses incurred by engine and deck crewmembers. The department must provide updated staffing cost estimates for fiscal years 2022 and 2023 with its annual budget submittal and updated estimates by January 1, 2022.

(6) $688,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation and $697,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—federal appropriation are provided solely for new employee training. The department must work to increase its outreach and recruitment of populations underrepresented in maritime careers and continue working to expand apprenticeship and internship programs, with an emphasis on programs that are shown to improve recruitment for positions with the state ferry system.

(7) The department must request reimbursement from the federal transit administration for the maximum amount of ferry operating expenses eligible for reimbursement under federal law.

(8) $484,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—federal is provided solely for the department to contract for additional traffic control assistance at the Kingston ferry terminal during peak ferry travel times, with a particular focus on Sundays and holiday weekends. Traffic control methods should include, but not be limited to, holding traffic on the shoulder at Lindvog Road until space opens for cars at the tollbooths and dock, and management of traffic on Highway 104 in order to ensure Kingston residents and business owners have access to businesses, roads, and driveways.

(9) $336,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for evacuation slide training.

(10) $336,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for fall restraint labor and industries inspections.

(11) $735,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation and $410,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—federal appropriation are provided solely for familiarization for new assignments of engine crew and terminal staff.

(12) $160,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for electronic navigation training.

(13) $250,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for Washington State Ferries to conduct a study of passenger demographics. The study must include:

(a) Information on age, race, gender, income level of passengers by route in summer and winter seasons;

(b) Composition of passengers by travel purpose, such as commute, tourism, or commerce; and

(c) Frequency of passenger trips by mode and fare products utilized.

The study may be included as part of a larger origin and destination study. The department shall report study results to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2023.

(14)(a) $8,419,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—federal appropriation is provided solely for Washington state ferries to:

(i) Continuously recruit and hire deck, engine, and terminal staff;

(ii) Contract with an external recruitment firm to increase recruitment efforts both locally and nationally with an emphasis on attracting maritime workers from communities underrepresented in the ferry system;

(iii) Enhance employee retention by standardizing on-call worker schedules;

(iv) Increase training and development opportunities for employees; and

(v) Make improvements to hiring processes by establishing additional positions to support timely hiring of employees.

(b) It is the intent of the legislature to continue funding for the activities outlined in this section as part of the move ahead WA package.

(15) $248,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—federal appropriation is provided solely for labor at the Vashon terminal.

(16) $194,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—federal appropriation is provided solely for operating costs at the Mukilteo terminal.

(17) $294,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—federal appropriation is provided solely for deck and engine internships.

(18) By December 1, 2022, the department must report on the status of efforts to increase training and development opportunities for employees. The report must include a description of the new training and career advancement programs for able-bodied sailors, mates, and engineers; the numbers of employees participating in each program; the number of employees completing each program; the number of open positions that the program is designed to fill; and the anticipated number of employee promotions as a result of program completion. The department must provide the report to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature.

(19) For the Mukilteo multimodal terminal, the department must submit a report showing for a 12-month period, on a monthly basis, how much electricity is generated by solar power generated on-site, electricity usage, and actual electricity cost savings. The report is due to the transportation committees of the legislature by June 30, 2023.

(20) $93,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for Washington state ferries to partner with local community colleges and universities to secure housing for workforce training sessions and to pay in advance for the costs of transportation worker identification credentials for incoming ferry system employees and trainees.

(21)(a) $300,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department, in consultation with the joint transportation committee, to oversee a consultant study to identify and recommend cost-effective strategies to maximize walk-on passenger ridership of the Anacortes – San Juan ferry routes. The study must also identify available public funding sources to support these strategies. Reducing the need for passengers to bring their cars on the ferries will increase the capacity of each ferry run to transport more people.

(b) The evaluated options may include, but not be limited to:

(i) Increased public funding or other support for transit or shuttle service between ferry landings on Orcas, Lopez, San Juan, and Anacortes and nearby major town centers or connecting transit hubs;

(ii) Options to increase availability of taxi and rideshare services at each of the landings;

(iii) Short-term electric vehicle rentals at ferry landings, including electric bicycles and scooters;

(iv) Public funding or other support to increase the available locations for additional parking and reduce the cost for short-term parking near each landing;

(v) Marketing of the availability of options through the Washington state ferries reservation system website, on ferries and at ferry landings and ticketing facilities.

(c) Outreach for the study, including on the feasibility and effectiveness of each strategy evaluated, must include outreach to representatives of:

(i) Washington state ferries;

(ii) San Juan county council;

(iii) Anacortes and San Juan Islands ferry advisory committee members;

(iv) San Juan economic development council;

(v) City of Anacortes;

(vi) City of Friday Harbor;

(vii) Skagit transit;

(viii) Skagit RTPO;

(ix) Eastsound;

(x) Lopez Village;

(xi) Transit dependent populations; and

(xii) Others as deemed appropriate by the committee.

(d) A report with recommendations on the most feasible and cost-effective strategies to maximize walk-on passenger ridership of the Anacortes – San Juan and Anacortes - Sidney ferry routes is due to the transportation committees of the legislature by January 6, 2023.

(22)(a) During negotiations of the 2023-2025 collective bargaining agreements, the department must conduct a review and analysis of the collective bargaining agreements governing state ferry employees, to identify provisions that create barriers for, or contribute to creating a disparate impact on, newly hired ferry employees, including those who are women, people of color, veterans, and other employees belonging to communities that have historically been underrepresented in the workforce. The review and analysis must include, but not be limited to, provisions regarding seniority, work assignments, and work shifts. The review and analysis must also include consultation with the governor's office of labor relations, the governor's office of equity, and the attorney general's office.

(b) For future negotiations or modifications of the collective bargaining agreements, it is the intent of the legislature that the collective bargaining representatives for the state and ferry employee organizations may consider the findings of the review and analysis required in (a) of this subsection and negotiate in a manner to remove identified barriers and address identified impacts so as not to perpetuate negative impacts.

(23) To the extent that an activity funded by federal funds in this section is not eligible for federal reimbursement, the department may transfer expenditure authority between state and federal appropriations provided in this section.

Sec. 117. 2022 c 186 s 223 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—RAIL—PROGRAM Y—OPERATING

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($68,430,000))

$68,432,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Private/Local

Appropriation
. . . .
$46,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$500,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($68,976,000))

$68,978,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department is directed to continue to pursue efforts to reduce costs, increase ridership, and review Amtrak Cascades fares and fare schedules. Within thirty days of each annual cost/revenue reconciliation under the Amtrak service contract, the department shall report annual credits to the office of financial management and the legislative transportation committees. Annual credits from Amtrak to the department including, but not limited to, credits due to higher ridership, reduced level of service, and fare or fare schedule adjustments, must be used to offset corresponding amounts of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation, which must be placed in reserve.

(2) Consistent with the ongoing planning and service improvement for the intercity passenger rail program, $500,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state is provided solely for the Cascades service development plan. This funding is to be used to analyze current and future market conditions and to develop a structured assessment of service options and goals based on anticipated demand and the results of the state and federally required 2019 state rail plan, including identifying implementation alternatives to meet the future service goals for the Amtrak Cascades route. The work must be consistent with federal railroad administration guidance and direction on developing service development plans. It must also leverage the $500,000 in federal funding appropriated for development of a service development plan and comply with the planning and grant award obligations of the consolidated rail infrastructure and safety improvements (CRISI) program. A status report must be provided to the transportation committees of the legislature by June 30, 2022.

(3) $4,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the continued coordination, engagement, and planning for a new ultra high-speed ground transportation corridor with participation from Washington, Oregon, and British Columbia. This funding is contingent on meaningful financial contributions for this effort by Oregon or British Columbia. "Ultra high-speed" means a maximum testing speed of at least 250 miles per hour. These efforts are to support and advance activities and must abide by the memorandum of understanding signed by the governors of Washington and Oregon, and the premier of the province of British Columbia in November 2021. The department shall establish a policy committee with participation from Washington, Oregon, and British Columbia, including representation from the two largest caucuses of each chamber of the Washington state legislature, and coordinate the activities of the policy committee to include:

(a) Developing an organizational framework that facilitates input in decision-making from all parties;

(b) Developing a public engagement approach with a focus on equity, inclusion, and meaningful engagement with communities, businesses, federal, state, provincial, and local governments including indigenous communities;

(c) Developing and leading a collaborative approach to prepare and apply for potential future federal, state, and provincial funding opportunities, including development of strategies for incorporating private sector participation and private sector contributions to funding, including through the possible use of public-private partnerships;

(d) Beginning work on scenario analysis addressing advanced transportation technologies, land use and growth assumptions, and an agreed to and defined corridor vision statement; and

(e) Developing a recommendation on the structure and membership of a formal coordinating entity that will be responsible for advancing the project through the project initiation stage to project development and recommended next steps for establishment of the coordinating entity. Project development processes must include consideration of negative and positive impacts on communities of color, low-income households, indigenous peoples, and other disadvantaged communities.

By June 30, 2023, the department shall provide to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature a report detailing the work conducted by the policy committee and recommendations for establishing a coordinating entity. The report must also include an assessment of current activities and results relating to stakeholder engagement, planning, and any federal funding application. As applicable, the assessment should also be sent to the executive and legislative branches of government in Oregon and appropriate government bodies in the province of British Columbia.

(4) The department shall consider applying for federal grant opportunities that support the development of the Amtrak Cascades service. Grant submittals must align with the department's federally required service development plan and state rail plans and partnership agreements with Amtrak as the service provider and BNSF Railway as the host railroad.

Sec. 118. 2022 c 186 s 224 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—LOCAL PROGRAMS—PROGRAM Z—OPERATING

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($12,451,000))

$12,456,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,567,000

Multiuse Roadway Safety Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$900,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$250,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($16,168,000))

$16,173,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The entire multiuse roadway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants under RCW 46.09.540, subject to the following limitations:

(a) Twenty-five percent of the amounts provided are reserved for counties that each have a population of fifteen thousand persons or less; and

(b)(i) Seventy-five percent of the amounts provided are reserved for counties that each have a population exceeding fifteen thousand persons; and

(ii) No county that receives a grant or grants under (a) of this subsection may receive more than sixty thousand dollars in total grants.

(2) $1,023,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department, from amounts set aside out of statewide fuel taxes distributed to counties according to RCW 46.68.120(3), to contract with the Washington state association of counties to:

(a) In coordination with stakeholders, identify county-owned fish passage barriers, and assess which barriers share the same stream system as state-owned fish passage barriers;

(b) Streamline and update the county road administration board's data dashboard, county reporting systems, and program management software to provide a more detailed, more transparent, and user-friendly platform for data management, reporting, and research by the public and other interested parties; and

(c) Conduct a study of the use of county road right-of-way as a potential source of revenue for county road operating and maintenance needs with recommendations on their feasibility statewide.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 119. 2022 c 187 s 203 (uncodified) is repealed.

(End of part)

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES—CAPITAL

Sec. 201. 2022 c 186 s 301 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE FREIGHT MOBILITY STRATEGIC INVESTMENT BOARD

Freight Mobility Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$17,769,000

Freight Mobility Multimodal Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$14,004,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$31,773,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the entire appropriations in this section are provided solely for the projects by amount, as listed in ((the LEAP Transportation Document 2022-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed March 9,))2022 OFM Transportation Document 2023-2: Proposed FMSIB Project List as developed December 14, 2022, Freight Mobility Strategic Investment Board (FMSIB).

(2) Until directed by the legislature, the board may not initiate a new call for projects.

(3) It is the intent of the legislature to continue to make strategic investments in a statewide freight mobility transportation system with the help of the freight mobility strategic investment board, including projects that mitigate the impact of freight movement on local communities. To that end, and in coordination with WSDOT as it updates its federally-compliant freight plan, the board is directed to identify the highest priority freight investments for the state, across freight modes, state and local jurisdictions, and regions of the state. By December 1, 2021, the board must submit a preliminary report providing a status update on the process and methodology for identifying and prioritizing investments. By December 1, 2022, the board must submit a prioritized list of freight investments that are geographically balanced across the state and can proceed to construction in a timely manner. The prioritized freight project list for the state portion of national highway freight program funds must first address shortfalls in funding for connecting Washington act projects.

(4)(a) For the 2021-2023 project appropriations, unless otherwise provided in this act, the director of the office of financial management may authorize a transfer of appropriation authority between projects managed by the freight mobility strategic investment board in order for the board to manage project spending and support the efficient and timely delivery of all projects in the program. The office of financial management may authorize a transfer of appropriation authority between projects under the following conditions and limitations:

(i) Transfers from a project may not be made as a result of the reduction of the scope of a project or be made to support increases in the scope of a project;

(ii) Each transfer between projects may only occur if the director of the office of financial management finds that any resulting change will not hinder the completion of the projects ((on LEAP Transportation Document 2022-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed March 9,))in 2022 OFM Transportation Document 2023-2: Proposed FMSIB Project List as developed December 14, 2022;

(iii) Transfers between projects may be made by the board without the formal written approval provided under this subsection (3)(a), provided that the transfer amount does not exceed $250,000 or 10 percent of the total project, whichever is less. These transfers must be reported to the director of the office of financial management and the chairs of the house of representatives and senate transportation committees; and

(iv) Except for transfers made under (a)(iii) of this subsection, transfers may only be made in fiscal year 2023.

(b) At the time the board submits a request to transfer funds under this section, a copy of the request must be submitted to the chairs and ranking members of the transportation committees of the legislature.

(c) Before approval, the office of financial management shall work with legislative staff of the house of representatives and senate transportation committees to review the requested transfers in a timely manner and consider any concerns raised by the chairs and ranking members of the transportation committees.

(d) No fewer than 10 days after the receipt of a project transfer request, the director of the office of financial management must provide written notification to the board of any decision regarding project transfers, with copies submitted to the transportation committees of the legislature.

Sec. 202. 2022 c 186 s 303 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD

Rural Arterial Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$55,028,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,456,000

County Arterial Preservation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($44,653,000))

$45,666,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($101,137,000))

$102,150,000

Sec. 203. 2022 c 186 s 304 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—FACILITIES—PROGRAM D—(DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS)—CAPITAL

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($16,076,000))

$15,743,000

Connecting Washington Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$3,667,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($19,743,000))

$19,410,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($3,289,000))$3,667,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation is provided solely for a new Olympic region maintenance and administration facility to be located on the department-owned site at the intersection of Marvin Road and 32nd Avenue in Lacey, Washington.

(2)(a) (($4,325,000))$4,025,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for payments of a financing contract issued pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for the department facility located at 15700 Dayton Ave N in Shoreline.

(b) Payments from the department of ecology pursuant to the agreement with the department to pay a share of the financing contract in (a) of this subsection must be deposited into the motor vehicle account.

Sec. 204. 2022 c 186 s 305 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—IMPROVEMENTS—PROGRAM I

Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($482,000))

$486,000

Transportation Partnership Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($232,566,000))

$169,880,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($246,948,000))

$233,798,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($251,835,000))

$259,638,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
(($400,000,000))

$100,000,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($56,192,000))

$87,854,000

Connecting Washington Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,063,783,000))

$1,116,840,000

Special Category C Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($86,198,000))

$78,734,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($10,792,000))

$4,934,000

Puget Sound Gateway Facility Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$8,400,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$70,886,000

Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 Express

Toll Lanes Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($217,282,000))

$44,028,000

Move Ahead WA Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($10,771,000))

$26,293,000

Move Ahead WA Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($7,200,000))

$52,312,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($3,663,335,000))

$2,254,083,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire connecting Washington account—state appropriation and the entire transportation partnership account—state appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed by fund, project, and amount in ((LEAP Transportation Document 2022-1 as developed March 9,))2022 OFM Transportation Document 2023-1: Proposed Transportation Project List as developed December 14, 2022, ((Program -)) Highway Improvements Program (I). However, limited transfers of specific line-item project appropriations may occur between projects for those amounts listed subject to the conditions and limitations in section 601, chapter 333, Laws of 2021.

(2) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire motor vehicle account—state appropriation and motor vehicle account—federal appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities listed in ((LEAP Transportation Document 2022-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed March 9,))2022 OFM Transportation Document 2023-1: Proposed Transportation Project List as developed December 14, 2022, ((Program -)) Highway Improvements Program (I). Any federal funds gained through efficiencies, adjustments to the federal funds forecast, or the federal funds redistribution process must then be applied to highway and bridge preservation activities or fish passage barrier corrections (0BI4001), as long as the application of the funds is not inconsistent with subsection (26) of this section.

(3) Within the motor vehicle account—state appropriation and motor vehicle account—federal appropriation, the department may transfer funds between programs I and P, except for funds that are otherwise restricted in this act. Ten days prior to any transfer, the department must submit its request to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature and consider any concerns raised. The department shall submit a report on fiscal year funds transferred in the prior fiscal year using this subsection as part of the department's annual budget submittal.

(4) The connecting Washington account—state appropriation includes up to $326,594,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.889.

(5) The special category C account—state appropriation includes up to $51,460,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.812.

(6) The transportation partnership account—state appropriation includes up to $124,629,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.873.

(7) (($161,792,000))$106,947,000 of the transportation partnership account—state appropriation, $3,882,000 of the motor vehicle account—private/local appropriation, (($9,000,000))$4,880,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation, (($1,000 of the transportation 2003 account (nickel account)—state appropriation,)) and (($985,000))$987,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation are provided solely for the SR 99/Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement project (809936Z). It is the intent of the legislature that any legal damages paid to the state as a result of a lawsuit related to contractual provisions for construction and delivery of the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project be used to repay project cost increases paid from the transportation partnership account—state funds and motor vehicle account—state funds.

(8) (($186,820,000))$11,512,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation ((and $488,000 of the motor vehicle account—local appropriation are))is provided solely for the US 395 North Spokane Corridor project (M00800R). If the department expects the original scope of this project to be completed under budget when a final design is approved for the interchange with I-90 and nearby on ramp access, then the scope of work for this project must also include constructing a land bridge in the vicinity of Liberty Park in Spokane, if appropriations are sufficient. It is the intent of the legislature, consistent with the move ahead WA proposal, to advance future funding for this project in order to accelerate delivery by up to two years.

(9)(a) (($177,982,000))$30,962,000 of the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account—state appropriation is provided solely for the I-405/SR 522 to I-5 Capacity Improvements project (L2000234) for activities related to adding capacity on Interstate 405 between state route number 522 and Interstate 5, with the goals of increasing vehicle throughput and aligning project completion with the implementation of bus rapid transit in the vicinity of the project.

(b) The department may advance the I-405/SR 522 to I-5 Capacity Improvements project (L2000234) and construct the project earlier than is scheduled in the ((LEAP))OFM transportation document referenced in subsection (2) of this section if additional funding is identified and submitted through the existing unanticipated receipts process by September 1, 2021. The department and the state treasurer shall pursue alternatives to toll revenue funding including but not limited to federal loan and grant programs. The department shall explore phasing and modifying the project to attempt to align project completion with the anticipated deployment of bus rapid transit on the corridor in the 2023-2025 biennium. The department shall report back to the transportation committees of the legislature on this work by September 15, 2021.

(10)(a) (($329,681,000))$309,774,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation, $70,886,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation, and (($1,021,000))$1,411,000 of the motor vehicle account—private/local appropriation are provided solely for the SR 520 Seattle Corridor Improvements - West End project (M00400R).

(b) Upon completion of the Montlake Phase of the West End project (current anticipated contract completion of 2023), the department shall sell that portion of the property not used for permanent transportation improvements and initiate a process to convey that surplus property to a subsequent owner.

(c) Of the amounts provided in this subsection (10), $100,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation is provided solely for noise mitigation activities. It is the intent of the legislature to provide an additional $1,000,000 for noise mitigation activities over the course of the 16-year move ahead WA funding package.

(11) (($361,296,000))$318,062,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation, (($4,800,000))$2,300,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation, (($13,725,000))$4,729,000 of the motor vehicle account—private/local appropriation, $7,200,000 of the move ahead WA account—federal appropriation, $8,400,000 of the Puget Sound Gateway facility account—state appropriation, and (($85,015,000))$86,015,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation are provided solely for the SR 167/SR 509 Puget Sound Gateway project (M00600R).

(a) Any savings on the project must stay on the Puget Sound Gateway corridor until the project is complete.

(b) In making budget allocations to the Puget Sound Gateway project, the department shall implement the project's construction as a single corridor investment. The department shall continue to collaborate with the affected stakeholders as it implements the corridor construction and implementation plan for state route number 167 and state route number 509. Specific funding allocations must be based on where and when specific project segments are ready for construction to move forward and investments can be best optimized for timely project completion. Emphasis must be placed on avoiding gaps in fund expenditures for either project.

(c) It is the legislature's intent that the department shall consult with the joint executive committee and joint steering committee to determine the most appropriate interchange at the junction of state route number 161 (Meridian avenue) and state route number 167.

(d) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $2,300,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the design phase of the Puyallup to Tacoma multiuse trail along the SR 167 right-of-way acquired for the project to connect a network of new and existing trails from Mount Rainier to Point Defiance Park.

(e) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $2,500,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for segment 2 of the state route number 167 completion project shared-use path to provide connections to the interchange of state route number 167 at 54th to the intersection of state route number 509 and Taylor Way in Tacoma.

(12)(a) (($25,378,000))$25,379,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation and (($413,000))$36,414,000 of the motor vehicle account—private/local appropriation are provided solely to support a project office and the continued work toward the I-5 Interstate Bridge Replacement project (((L2000370)))(L4000054).

(b) The project office must also study the possible different governance structures for a bridge authority that would provide for the joint administration of the bridges over the Columbia river between Oregon and Washington. As part of this study, the project office must examine the feasibility and necessity of an interstate compact in conjunction with the national center for interstate compacts.

(c) During the 2021-2023 biennium, the department shall have as a goal to:

(i) Conduct all work necessary to prepare and publish a draft SEIS;

(ii) Coordinate with regulatory agencies to begin the process of obtaining environmental approvals and permits;

(iii) Identify a locally preferred alternative; and

(iv) Begin preparing a final SEIS.

The department shall aim to provide progress reports on these activities to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2021, June 1, 2022, and December 1, 2022.

(13)(a) (($400,000,000))$100,000,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation, (($25,327,000))$167,194,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation, $35,263,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation, $5,618,000 of the motor vehicle account—local appropriation, $9,016,000 of the transportation partnership account—state appropriation, and $149,776,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation are provided solely for the Fish Passage Barrier Removal project (0BI4001) with the intent of fully complying with the federal U.S. v. Washington court injunction by 2030.

(b) The department shall coordinate with the Brian Abbott fish passage barrier removal board to use a watershed approach by replacing both state and local culverts guided by the principle of providing the greatest fish habitat gain at the earliest time. The department shall deliver high habitat value fish passage barrier corrections that it has identified, guided by the following factors: Opportunity to bundle projects, tribal priorities, ability to leverage investments by others, presence of other barriers, project readiness, culvert conditions, other transportation projects in the area, and transportation impacts. The department and Brian Abbott fish barrier removal board must provide updates on the implementation of the statewide culvert remediation plan to the legislature by November 1, 2021, and June 1, 2022.

(c) The department must keep track of, for each barrier removed: (i) The location; (ii) the amount of fish habitat gain; and (iii) the amount spent to comply with the injunction.

(d) Of the amount provided in this subsection, $142,923,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation reflects the department's portion of the unrestricted funds from the coronavirus response and relief supplemental appropriations act of 2021. If the final amount from this act changes while the legislature is not in session, the department shall follow the existing unanticipated receipt process and adjust the list referenced in subsection (1) of this section accordingly, supplanting state funds with federal funds if possible as directed in section 601, chapter 333, Laws of 2021.

(14) (($14,367,000))$13,542,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation((, $311,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation,)) and (($3,149,000))$4,285,000 of the motor vehicle account—private/local appropriation are provided solely for the I-90/Barker to Harvard – Improve Interchanges & Local Roads project (L2000122). The connecting Washington account appropriation for the improvements that fall within the city of Liberty Lake may only be expended if the city of Liberty Lake agrees to cover any project costs within the city of Liberty Lake above the $20,900,000 of state appropriation provided for the total project on the list referenced in subsection (1) of this section.

(15) (($16,984,000))$18,155,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation, (($269,000))$177,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation, $5,000 of the motor vehicle account—private/local appropriation, and (($17,900,000))$13,666,000 of the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account—state appropriation are provided solely for the SR 167/SR 410 to SR 18 - Congestion Management project (316706C).

(16) (($18,915,000))$12,019,000 of the Special Category C account—state appropriation is provided solely for the SR 18 Widening - Issaquah/Hobart Rd to Raging River project (L1000199) for improving and widening state route number 18 to four lanes from Issaquah-Hobart Road to Raging River.

(17) (($2,500,000))$500,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation is provided solely for the North Lewis County transportation study. The study shall examine new, alternate routes for vehicular and truck traffic at the Harrison interchange (Exit 82) in North Centralia and shall allow for a site and configuration to be selected and feasibility to be conducted for final design, permitting, and construction of the I-5/North Lewis county Interchange project (L2000204). It is the intent of the legislature to advance future funding for this project to accelerate delivery by up to two years.

(18) (($1,237,000))$148,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the US 101/East Sequim Corridor Improvements project (L2000343).

(19) (($2,197,000))$873,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation ((and $749,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation are))is provided solely for the SR 522/Paradise Lk Rd Interchange & Widening on SR 522 (Design/Engineering) project (NPARADI).

(20) (($1,455,000))$1,382,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation ((is))and $73,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation are provided solely for the US 101/Morse Creek Safety Barrier project (L1000247).

(21) (($1,000,000))$780,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the SR 162/410 Interchange Design and Right of Way project (L1000276).

(22) (($7,185,000))$1,892,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation ((is)), $2,000 of the motor vehicle account—private/local appropriation, and $7,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation are provided solely for the US Hwy 2 Safety project (N00200R).

(23) The department shall itemize all future requests for the construction of buildings on a project list and submit them through the transportation executive information system as part of the department's annual budget submittal. It is the intent of the legislature that new facility construction must be transparent and not appropriated within larger highway construction projects.

(24) Any advisory group that the department convenes during the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium must consider the interests of the entire state of Washington.

(25) The legislature continues to prioritize the replacement of the state's aging infrastructure and recognizes the importance of reusing and recycling construction aggregate and recycled concrete materials in our transportation system. To accomplish Washington state's sustainability goals in transportation and in accordance with RCW 70.95.805, the legislature reaffirms its determination that recycled concrete aggregate and other transportation building materials are natural resource construction materials that are too valuable to be wasted and landfilled, and are a commodity as defined in WAC 173-350-100.

Further, the legislature determines construction aggregate and recycled concrete materials substantially meet widely recognized international, national, and local standards and specifications referenced in American society for testing and materials, American concrete institute, Washington state department of transportation, Seattle department of transportation, American public works association, federal aviation administration, and federal highway administration specifications, and are described as necessary and desirable products for recycling and reuse by state and federal agencies.

As these recyclable materials have well established markets, are substantially a primary or secondary product of necessary construction processes and production, and are managed as an item of commercial value, construction aggregate and recycled concrete materials are exempt from chapter 173-350 WAC.

(26) $2,738,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the US 97 Wildlife Crossing Improvements project (L2021117). It is the intent of the legislature that, to the extent possible, the department use this funding as match for competitive federal funding to make additional wildlife crossing improvements on the corridor. The department must report to the transportation committees of the legislature with additional corridors that could benefit from wildlife crossing improvements and that are likely to successfully compete for federal funding.

(27) (($12,635,000))$1,961,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation is provided solely for the SR 3 Freight Corridor (T30400R) project. The legislature intends to provide a total of $78,910,000 for this project, including an increase of $12,000,000 in future biennia to safeguard against inflation and supply/labor interruptions and ensure that:

(a) The northern terminus remains at Lake Flora Road and the southern terminus at the intersection of SR 3/SR 302;

(b) Multimodal safety improvements at the southern terminus remain in the project to provide connections to North Mason school district and provide safe routes to schools; and

(c) Intersections on the freight corridor are constructed at Romance Hill and Log Yard road.

(28) (($450,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the SR 900 Safety Improvements project (L2021118). The department must: (a) Work in collaboration with King county and Skyway coalition to align community assets, transportation infrastructure needs, and initial design for safety improvements along SR 900; and (b) work with the Skyway coalition to lead community planning engagement and active transportation activities.

(29) $5,694,000))$3,686,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation is provided solely for the I-5/Chamber Way Interchange Vicinity Improvements project (L2000223).

(((30) $500,000))(29) $166,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for SR 162/SR 161 Additional Connectivity in South Pierce County project (L1000312) to conduct a study on the need for additional connectivity in the area between SR 162, south of Military Road East and north of Orting, and SR 161 in South Pierce county.

Sec. 205. 2022 c 186 s 306 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—PRESERVATION—PROGRAM P

Recreational Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,520,000

Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$53,911,000

Transportation Partnership Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($21,441,000))

$23,038,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($111,174,000))

$138,099,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($545,560,000))

$583,466,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($13,735,000))

$13,734,000

Connecting Washington Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($224,342,000))

$112,001,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,143,000))

$812,000

Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($5,676,000))

$3,578,000

Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
(($391,000))

$251,000

Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 Express

Toll Lanes Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($12,830,000))

$9,216,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($992,723,000))

$939,626,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire connecting Washington account—state appropriation and the entire transportation partnership account—state appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed by fund, project, and amount in ((LEAP Transportation Document 2022-1 as developed March 9,))2022 OFM Transportation Document 2023-1: Proposed Transportation Project List as developed December 14, 2022, ((Program -)) Highway Preservation Program (P). However, limited transfers of specific line-item project appropriations may occur between projects for those amounts listed subject to the conditions and limitations in section 601, chapter 333, Laws of 2021.

(2) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire motor vehicle account—state appropriation and motor vehicle account—federal appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities listed in ((LEAP Transportation Document 2022-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed March 9,))2022 OFM Transportation Document 2023-1: Proposed Transportation Project List as developed December 14, 2022, ((Program -)) Highway Preservation Program (P). Any federal funds gained through efficiencies, adjustments to the federal funds forecast, or the federal funds redistribution process must then be applied to highway and bridge preservation activities or fish passage barrier corrections (0BI4001)((, as long as the application of the funds is not inconsistent with subsection (10) of this section)).

(3) Within the motor vehicle account—state appropriation and motor vehicle account—federal appropriation, the department may transfer funds between programs I and P, except for funds that are otherwise restricted in this act. Ten days prior to any transfer, the department must submit its request to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature and consider any concerns raised. The department shall submit a report on fiscal year funds transferred in the prior fiscal year using this subsection as part of the department's annual budget submittal.

(4) $8,531,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation is provided solely for the land mobile radio upgrade (G2000055) and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701, chapter 333, Laws of 2021. The land mobile radio project is subject to technical oversight by the office of the chief information officer. The department, in collaboration with the office of the chief information officer, shall identify where existing or proposed mobile radio technology investments should be consolidated, identify when existing or proposed mobile radio technology investments can be reused or leveraged to meet multiagency needs, increase mobile radio interoperability between agencies, and identify how redundant investments can be reduced over time. The department shall also provide quarterly reports to the technology services board on project progress.

(5) (($5,000,000))$22,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for extraordinary costs incurred from litigation awards, settlements, or dispute mitigation activities not eligible for funding from the self-insurance fund (L2000290). The amount provided in this subsection must be held in unallotted status until the department submits a request to the office of financial management that includes documentation detailing litigation-related expenses. The office of financial management may release the funds only when it determines that all other funds designated for litigation awards, settlements, and dispute mitigation activities have been exhausted. No funds provided in this subsection may be expended on any legal fees related to the SR 99/Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project (809936Z).

(6) (($11,679,000))$23,731,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation ((is))and $85,227,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation are provided solely for preservation projects within project L1100071 that ensure the reliable movement of freight on the national highway freight system. The department shall give priority to those projects that can be advertised by September 30, 2021.

(7) The appropriation in this section includes funding for starting planning, engineering, and construction of the Elwha River bridge replacement. To the greatest extent practicable, the department shall maintain public access on the existing route.

(8) Within the connecting Washington account—state appropriation, the department may transfer funds from Highway System Preservation (L1100071) to other preservation projects listed in the ((LEAP))OFM transportation document identified in subsection (1) of this section, if it is determined necessary for completion of these high priority preservation projects. The department's next budget submittal after using this subsection must appropriately reflect the transfer.

(((9) $1,700,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the SR 109/88 Corner Roadway project (G2000106).))

Sec. 206. 2022 c 186 s 307 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—TRAFFIC OPERATIONS—PROGRAM Q—CAPITAL

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($9,618,000))

$10,084,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$11,215,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$500,000

Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 Express

Toll Lanes Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$900,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($22,233,000))

$22,699,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($579,000))$580,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the SR 99 Aurora Bridge ITS project (L2000338).

(2) (($1,001,000))$1,612,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation and (($2,060,000))$2,018,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation are provided solely for the Challenge Seattle project (000009Q). The department shall provide a progress report on this project to the transportation committees of the legislature by January 15, 2022.

Sec. 207. 2022 c 186 s 308 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTION—PROGRAM W

Puget Sound Capital Construction Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($167,533,000))

$145,849,000

Puget Sound Capital Construction Account—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
(($180,571,000))

$154,759,000

Puget Sound Capital Construction Account—

Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,181,000))

$1,844,000

Transportation Partnership Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($9,432,000))

$3,759,000

Connecting Washington Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($99,141,000))

$97,904,000

Capital Vessel Replacement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($45,668,000))

$5,769,000

((Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,000))

Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$987,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($505,514,000))

$410,871,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire appropriations in this section are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed in ((LEAP Transportation Document 2022-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed March 9,))2022 OFM Transportation Document 2023-1: Proposed Transportation Project List as developed December 14, 2022, ((Program -)) Washington State Ferries Capital Program (W).

(2) For the 2021-2023 biennium, the marine division shall provide to the office of financial management and the legislative transportation committees the following reports on ferry capital projects:

(a) On a semiannual basis the report must include a status update on projects with funding provided in subsections (4), (5), (6), and (8) of this section including, but not limited to, the following:

(i) Anticipated cost increases and cost savings;

(ii) Anticipated cash flow and schedule changes; and

(iii) Explanations for the changes.

(b) On an annual basis the report must include a status update on vessel and terminal preservation and improvement plans including, but not limited to, the following:

(i) What work has been done;

(ii) How have schedules shifted; and

(iii) Associated changes in funding among projects, accompanied by explanations for the changes.

(c) On an annual basis the report must include an update on the implementation of the maintenance management system with recommendations for using the system to improve the efficiency of project reporting under this subsection.

(3) (($12,232,000))$19,940,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for emergency capital repair costs (999910K). Funds may only be spent after approval by the office of financial management.

(4) (($2,385,000))$2,384,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the ORCA card next generation project (L2000300). The ferry system shall work with Washington technology solutions and the tolling division on the development of a new, interoperable ticketing system.

(5) (($28,134,000))$18,226,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the conversion of up to two Jumbo Mark II vessels to electric hybrid propulsion (G2000084). The department shall seek additional funds for the purposes of this subsection. The department may spend from the Puget Sound capital construction account—state appropriation in this section only as much as the department receives in Volkswagen settlement funds for the purposes of this subsection.

(6) (($45,668,000))$5,769,000 of the capital vessel replacement account—state appropriation is provided solely for the acquisition of a 144-car hybrid-electric vessel (L2000329). In 2019 the legislature amended RCW 47.60.810 to direct the department to modify an existing vessel construction contract to provide for an additional five ferries. As such, it is the intent of the legislature that the department award the contract for the hybrid electric Olympic class vessel #5(L2000329) in a timely manner. In addition, the legislature intends to minimize costs and maximize construction efficiency by providing sufficient funding for construction of all five vessels, including funding for long lead time materials procured at the lowest possible prices. The commencement of construction of new vessels for the ferry system is important not only for safety reasons, but also to keep skilled marine construction jobs in the Puget Sound region and to sustain the capacity of the region to meet the ongoing construction and preservation needs of the ferry system fleet of vessels. The legislature has determined that the current vessel procurement process must move forward with all due speed, balancing the interests of both the taxpayers and shipyards. To accomplish construction of vessels in accordance with RCW 47.60.810, the prevailing shipbuilder, for vessels initially funded after July 1, 2020, is encouraged to follow the historical practice of subcontracting the construction of ferry superstructures to a separate nonaffiliated contractor located within the Puget Sound region, that is qualified in accordance with RCW 47.60.690. If the department elects not to execute a new modification to an existing option contract for one or more additional 144-auto ferries under RCW 47.60.810(4), the department shall proceed with development of a new design-build request for proposals in accordance with RCW 47.60.810, 47.60.812, 47.60.814, 47.60.815, 47.60.816, 47.60.818, 47.60.820, 47.60.822, 47.60.824, and 47.60.8241. Of the amounts provided in this section, $200,000 is provided solely for hiring an independent owner's representative to perform quality oversight, manage the change order process, and ensure contract compliance.

(7) The capital vessel replacement account—state appropriation includes up to $45,468,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.873.

(8) (($4,200,000))$2,838,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation is provided solely for ferry vessel and terminal preservation (L2000110). The funds provided in this subsection must be used for unplanned preservation needs before shifting funding from other preservation projects.

Sec. 208. 2022 c 186 s 309 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—RAIL—PROGRAM Y—CAPITAL

Essential Rail Assistance Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,108,000

Transportation Infrastructure Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($6,218,000))

$6,219,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($118,320,000))

$66,712,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
(($6,567,000))

$11,568,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Private/Local

Appropriation
. . . .
$13,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,810,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($134,036,000))

$87,430,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire appropriations in this section are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed by project and amount in ((LEAP Transportation Document 2022-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed March 9,))2022 OFM Transportation Document 2023-1: Proposed Transportation Project List as developed December 14, 2022, ((Program -)) Rail Program (Y).

(2) (($5,089,000))$5,090,000 of the transportation infrastructure account—state appropriation is provided solely for new low-interest loans approved by the department through the freight rail investment bank (FRIB) program. The department shall issue FRIB program loans with a repayment period of no more than ten years, and charge only so much interest as is necessary to recoup the department's costs to administer the loans. The department shall report annually to the transportation committees of the legislature and the office of financial management on all FRIB loans issued. FRIB program loans may be recommended by the department for 2022 supplemental transportation appropriations up to the amount provided in this appropriation that has not been provided for the projects listed in ((2021-2 ALL PROJECTS))2023-1: Proposed Transportation Project List, as referenced in subsection (1) of this section. The department shall submit a prioritized list for any loans recommended to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature by November 15, 2021.

(3) (($7,041,000))$7,814,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for new statewide emergent freight rail assistance projects (FRAP) identified in the ((LEAP))OFM transportation document referenced in subsection (1) of this section.

(4) $367,000 of the transportation infrastructure account—state appropriation and $1,100,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation are provided solely to reimburse Highline Grain, LLC for approved work completed on Palouse River and Coulee City (PCC) railroad track in Spokane county between the BNSF Railway Interchange at Cheney and Geiger Junction and must be administered in a manner consistent with freight rail assistance program projects. The value of the public benefit of this project is expected to meet or exceed the cost of this project in: Shipper savings on transportation costs; jobs saved in rail-dependent industries; and/or reduced future costs to repair wear and tear on state and local highways due to fewer annual truck trips (reduced vehicle miles traveled). The amounts provided in this subsection are not a commitment for future legislatures, but it is the legislature's intent that future legislatures will work to approve biennial appropriations until the full $7,337,000 cost of this project is reimbursed.

(5)(a) $1,008,000 of the essential rail assistance account—state appropriation is provided solely for the purpose of the rehabilitation and maintenance of the Palouse river and Coulee City railroad line (F01111B).

(b) Expenditures from the essential rail assistance account—state in this subsection may not exceed the combined total of:

(i) Revenues and transfers deposited into the essential rail assistance account from leases and sale of property relating to the Palouse river and Coulee City railroad;

(ii) Revenues from trackage rights agreement fees paid by shippers; and

(iii) Revenues and transfers transferred from the miscellaneous program account to the essential rail assistance account, pursuant to RCW 47.76.360, for the purpose of sustaining the grain train program by maintaining the Palouse river and Coulee City railroad.

(6) The department shall issue a call for projects for the freight rail assistance program, and shall evaluate the applications in a manner consistent with past practices as specified in section 309, chapter 367, Laws of 2011. By November 15, 2022, the department shall submit a prioritized list of recommended projects to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature.

(7) (($32,996,000))$5,148,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for Passenger Rail Equipment Replacement (project 700010C). The appropriation in this subsection include insurance proceeds received by the state. The department must use these funds only to purchase replacement equipment that has been competitively procured and for service recovery needs and corrective actions related to the December 2017 derailment.

(8) It is the intent of the legislature to encourage the department to pursue federal grant opportunities leveraging up to $6,696,000 in connecting Washington programmed funds to be used as a state match to improve the state-owned Palouse river and Coulee City system. The amount listed in this subsection is not a commitment for future legislatures, but is the legislature's intent that future legislatures will work to approve biennial appropriations up to a state match share not to exceed $6,696,000 of a grant award.

(9) $500,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Chelatchie Prairie railroad for track improvement activities on the northern part of the railroad (L1000311).

Sec. 209. 2022 c 186 s 310 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—LOCAL PROGRAMS—PROGRAM Z—CAPITAL

Highway Infrastructure Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,744,000

Highway Infrastructure Account—Federal Appropriation

. . . .
$2,935,000

Transportation Partnership Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,000,000))

$500,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($25,101,000))

$21,631,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($79,306,000))

$44,945,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$6,600,000

Connecting Washington Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($178,464,000))

$141,403,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($96,975,000))

$62,362,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($392,125,000))

$282,120,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire appropriations in this section are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed by project and amount in ((LEAP Transportation Document 2022-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed March 9,))2022 OFM Transportation Document 2023-1: Proposed Transportation Project List as developed December 14, 2022, ((Program -)) Local Programs Program (Z).

(2) The amounts identified in the ((LEAP))OFM transportation document referenced under subsection (1) of this section for pedestrian safety/safe routes to school are as follows:

(a)(i) (($46,163,000))$29,870,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for pedestrian and bicycle safety program projects (L2000188).

(ii) The state route 99/Aurora Avenue North Planning Study funded in this subsection (2)(a) must prioritize designs that ensure slow vehicle speeds and systematic improvement to the quality of multimodal access, and must be fully completed by September 30, 2023, in order to ensure construction of improvements begin no later than March 1, 2024.

(b) (($26,086,000))$18,349,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation and (($21,656,000))$16,562,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation are provided solely for safe routes to school projects (L2000189). The department may consider the special situations facing high-need areas, as defined by schools or project areas in which the percentage of the children eligible to receive free and reduced-price meals under the national school lunch program is equal to, or greater than, the state average as determined by the department, when evaluating project proposals against established funding criteria while ensuring continued compliance with federal eligibility requirements.

(3) The department shall submit a report to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2021, and December 1, 2022, on the status of projects funded as part of the pedestrian safety/safe routes to school grant program. The report must include, but is not limited to, a list of projects selected and a brief description of each project's status. In its December 1, 2021, report the department must also include recommended changes to the pedestrian safety/safe routes to school grant program application and selection processes to increase utilization by a greater diversity of jurisdictions.

(4) $11,987,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for bicycle and pedestrian projects listed in the ((LEAP))OFM transportation document referenced in subsection (1) of this section.

(5) It is the expectation of the legislature that the department will be administering a local railroad crossing safety grant program for $7,000,000 in federal funds during the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.

(6) (($17,438,000))$16,438,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation is provided solely for national highway freight network projects identified on the project list submitted in accordance with section 218(4)(b), chapter 14, Laws of 2016 on October 31, 2016 (L1000169).

(7) When the department updates its federally-compliant freight plan, it shall consult the freight mobility strategic investment board on the freight plan update and on the investment plan component that describes how the estimated funding allocation for the national highway freight program for federal fiscal years 2022-2025 will be invested and matched. The investment plan component for the state portion of national highway freight program funds must first address shortfalls in funding for connecting Washington act projects. The department shall complete the freight plan update in compliance with federal requirements and deadlines and shall provide an update on the development of the freight plan, including the investment plan component, when submitting its 2022 supplemental appropriations request.

(8) (($35,411,000))$10,137,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation is provided solely for acceleration of local preservation projects that ensure the reliable movement of freight on the national highway freight system (G2000100). The department will identify projects through its current national highway system asset management call for projects with applications due in February 2021. The department shall give priority to those projects that can be obligated by September 30, 2021.

(9) (($400,000))$300,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for a grant to the Northwest Seaport Alliance (NWSA) to lead the creation and coordination of a multistakeholder zero emissions truck collaborative that will: (a) Facilitate the development and implementation of one or more zero-emissions drayage truck demonstration projects in Washington state; and (b) develop a roadmap for transitioning the entire fleet of approximately 4,500 drayage trucks that serve the NWSA cargo gateway to zero-emissions vehicles by 2050 or sooner (L2021119).

(10) (($8,524,000))$2,900,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation is provided solely for the I-5/Mellen Street Connector project (L2000205).

(11) (($500,000))$100,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the 166th/SR 410 Interchange (L20211244).

(12) (($1,063,000))$263,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for repairs and rehabilitation of the Pierce county ferry landings at Anderson Island and Steilacoom (L1000314).

(13) (($300,000))$150,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the city of Spokane for preliminary engineering of the US 195/Inland Empire Way project. Funds may be used for predesign environmental assessment work, community engagement, design, and project cost estimation (L1000316).

(14) $800,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the SR 109/88 Corner Roadway project (G2000106).

Sec. 210. 2022 c 187 s 308 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—LOCAL PROGRAMS—PROGRAM Z

Move Ahead WA Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($131,900,000))

$5,000,000

Move Ahead WA Flexible Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($5,000,000))

$3,000,000

Climate Active Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($20,182,000))

$12,182,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($157,082,000))

$20,182,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The entire move ahead WA account—state appropriation is provided solely for the local road projects and activities as listed in ((LEAP Transportation Document 2022 NL-1 as developed March 9, 2022))OFM Transportation Document 2023-1: Proposed Transportation Project List as developed December 14, 2022.

(2) The department shall submit the projects ((on LEAP Transportation Document 2022 NL-2 as developed March 9, 2022))in OFM Transportation Document 2023-1: Proposed Transportation Project List as developed December 14, 2022, in three tiers to the transportation committees of the legislature and the office of financial management by December 1, 2022, prioritizing projects based on community impacts to overburdened communities as defined in RCW 70A.02.010.

(3) (($10,686,000))$6,686,000 of the climate active transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for newly selected safe routes to school grants (L1000306).

(4) (($9,496,000))$5,496,000 of the climate active transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for newly selected pedestrian and bicycle grants (L1000307).

(5) It is the intent of the legislature that up to $14,000,000 will be provided for the Guemes Ferry Boat Replacement Project (L4000124).

(6) (($5,000,000))$3,000,000 of the move ahead WA flexible account—state appropriation is provided solely for railroad crossing grant awards which match federal funds for city and county projects which eliminate at-grade highway-rail crossings.

(7) It is the intent of the legislature that $25,000,000 will be provided as part of the move ahead WA investment package in a future biennium, as indicated on the list identified in subsection (1) of this section, for the Ballard and Magnolia bridge project (L4000123). As part of the project, the Seattle department of transportation (SDOT) must consult with an independent engineering firm to verify that the costs for the type, size, and location preliminary design report (TS&L), environmental impact statement (EIS), and 60 percent design work are within industry cost range standards in advance of moving forward with construction. SDOT must ensure that funds are maximized by limiting the percentage for TS&L, EIS, and 60 percent design work to 10 percent of the total cost of the project. Of the $25,000,000, $12,500,000 must remain in unallotted status, and may be distributed to SDOT only upon determination by the office of financial management that SDOT's cost estimates have been verified by an independent engineering firm as within industry cost range standards, and SDOT has secured the additional matching funding needed to complete the TS&L, EIS, and 60 percent design work.

(8)(a) It is the intent of the legislature, over the first five years of the move ahead WA program, that $50,000,000 will be provided to SDOT to implement Aurora Avenue North Safety Improvements (L4000154). Under this program, SDOT will be required to implement strategic transportation investments for the Aurora Ave N Corridor from N 90th St to N 105th St that ensure slow vehicle speeds, walkability, multimodal mobility, safe routes to local schools, and safety for residents, which will demonstrate the benefits of similar transportation investments for other locations along Aurora Avenue and elsewhere. SDOT must convene a neighborhood oversight board consisting of residents of communities of the Aurora Ave N Corridor to prioritize investments and monitor project implementation. The oversight board should be composed of an equitable representation of local communities along the Aurora Ave N Corridor, including residents with disabilities. SDOT will ensure that the oversight board is consulted on a bimonthly basis during the prioritization process.

(b) The legislature intends, upon completion of the State Route 99/Aurora Avenue North Planning Study, that projects recommended in the study will be funded by this program. A specific focus must be on access management to consolidate driveways and improve safety for vulnerable users. This work must also include installation of full curb and sidewalks to improve safety, mobility, transit ridership, equity, and work towards the goals set forth in vision zero, target zero, and the Washington state active transportation plan. SDOT must ensure the design and implementation of an accessible sidewalk network to support users with mobility limitations, convenient and accessible transit stops, all-ages-and-abilities bicycle facilities, and safe pedestrian-activated crosswalks that puts safety over speed, balances the needs of different modes, reduces the level of traffic stress experienced by pedestrians and cyclists, connects to existing bicycle and transit networks, creates safe walking and bicycling routes to local schools including crosswalks, improves human and environmental health, and supports the surrounding neighborhoods. SDOT must coordinate with the Washington state department of transportation and King county metro in implementing the investments. SDOT must ensure that funds are maximized by limiting the percentage for planning, predesign, design, permitting, and environmental review to 10 percent of the total cost of each project.

(c) The legislature intends that all Aurora Avenue North Safety Improvement projects funded in this program be completed by December 31, 2029, and that no funds may be expended for this purpose after this date.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 211. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) 2022 c 187 s 304 (uncodified);

(2) 2022 c 187 s 305 (uncodified); and

(3) 2022 c 187 s 307 (uncodified).

(End of part)

TRANSFERS AND DISTRIBUTIONS

Sec. 301. 2022 c 186 s 401 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALES DISCOUNTS AND DEBT TO BE PAID BY MOTOR VEHICLE ACCOUNT AND TRANSPORTATION FUND REVENUE

Transportation Partnership Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($794,000))

$481,000

Connecting Washington Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,633,000

Special Category C Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($257,000))

$259,000

Highway Bond Retirement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,408,622,000))

$1,406,716,000

Ferry Bond Retirement Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$17,150,000

Transportation Improvement Board Bond Retirement

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($18,152,000))

$14,153,000

Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
(($26,278,000))

$29,230,000

Toll Facility Bond Retirement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$76,376,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,542,811,000))

$1,544,365,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $6,451,550 of the transportation improvement board bond retirement account—state appropriation is provided solely for the prepayment of certain outstanding bonds and debt service.

Sec. 302. 2022 c 186 s 402 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES AND FISCAL AGENT CHARGES

Transportation Partnership Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($150,000))

$88,000

((Connecting Washington Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$327,000))

Special Category C Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($51,000))

$52,000

Transportation Improvement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$20,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($548,000))

$160,000

Sec. 303. 2022 c 186 s 403 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation: For motor

vehicle fuel tax statutory distributions to

cities and counties
. . . .
(($474,003,000))

$473,248,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation: For distribution to cities and

counties
. . . .
$26,786,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation: For

distribution to cities and counties
. . . .
$23,438,000

Sec. 304. 2022 c 186 s 404 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—TRANSFERS

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation: For motor

vehicle fuel tax refunds and statutory

transfers
. . . .
(($2,000,419,000))

$2,014,975,000

Sec. 305. 2022 c 186 s 405 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING—TRANSFERS

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation: For motor

vehicle fuel tax refunds and transfers
. . . .
(($240,330,000))

$265,457,000

Sec. 306. 2022 c 186 s 406 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—ADMINISTRATIVE TRANSFERS

(1) Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the State Patrol Highway

Account—State
. . . .
(($47,000,000))

$52,500,000

(2)(((a) Transportation Partnership Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Capital Vessel

Replacement Account—State
. . . .
$45,468,000

(b) The amount transferred in this subsection represents proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.873.

(3)))(a) Transportation Partnership Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State
. . . .
$30,293,000

(b) It is the intent of the legislature that this transfer is temporary, for the purpose of minimizing the impact of toll increases. An equivalent reimbursing transfer is to occur after the debt service and deferred sales tax on the Tacoma Narrows bridge construction costs are fully repaid in accordance with chapter 195, Laws of 2018.

(((4)))(3)(a) Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project

Account—State
. . . .
$6,000,000

(b) The funds provided in (a) of this subsection are a loan to the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account—state, and the legislature assumes that these funds will be reimbursed to the motor vehicle account—state at a later date when traffic on the toll facility has recovered from the COVID-19 pandemic.

(((5)))(4) Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the County Arterial Preservation

Account—State
. . . .
$7,666,000

(((6)))(5) Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the Freight Mobility Investment

Account—State
. . . .
$5,511,000

(((7)))(6) Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the Rural Arterial Trust Account—State
. . . .
$9,331,000

(((8)))(7) Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the Transportation Improvement

Account—State
. . . .
$9,688,000

(((9)))(8) Rural Mobility Grant Program Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Multimodal

Transportation Account—State
. . . .
$3,000,000

(((10)))(9)(a) State Route Number 520 Civil Penalties

Account—State Appropriation: For transfer to the

Motor Vehicle Account—State

. . . .
$2,000,000

(b) The transfer in this subsection is to repay moneys loaned to the state route number 520 civil penalties account in the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium.

(((11)))(10) State Route Number 520 Civil Penalties

Account—State Appropriation: For transfer to the

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State
. . . .
$1,532,000

(((12)))(11) Capital Vessel Replacement Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Connecting

Washington Account—State
. . . .
$35,000,000

(((13)))(12)(a) Capital Vessel Replacement Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Transportation

Partnership Account—State
. . . .
(($1,542,000))

$35,547,000

(b) The amount transferred in this subsection represents ((repayment of debt service incurred for the construction of the Hybrid Electric Olympic Class (144-auto) Vessel #5 project (L2000329).))proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in the 2019-2021 biennium in RCW 47.10.873.

(((14)))(13) Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Complete Streets

Grant Program Account—State
. . . .
$14,670,000

(((15)))(14) Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Connecting

Washington Account—State
. . . .
$200,000,000

(((16)))(15) Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Freight Mobility

Multimodal Account—State
. . . .
$4,011,000

(((17)))(16) Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Ignition Interlock

Device Revolving Account—State
. . . .
$600,000

(((18)))(17) Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Pilotage

Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

(((19)))(18) Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Puget Sound

Capital Construction Account—State
. . . .
$816,700,000

(((20)))(19) Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Regional Mobility

Grant Program Account—State
. . . .
$27,679,000

(((21)))(20) Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Rural Mobility

Grant Program Account—State
. . . .
$15,223,000

(((22)))(21)(a) Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project

Account—State Appropriation: For transfer to the

Transportation Partnership Account—State
. . . .
$22,884,000

(b) The amount transferred in this subsection represents repayment of debt service incurred for the construction of the SR 99/Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement project (809936Z).

(((23)))(22) Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Motor Vehicle

Account—State
. . . .
$950,000

(((24)))(23) Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Puget Sound

Capital Construction Account—State
. . . .
$60,000,000

(((25)))(24)(a) General Fund Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the State Patrol

Highway Account—State
. . . .
$625,000

(b) The state treasurer shall transfer the funds only after receiving notification from the Washington state patrol under section 207(2), chapter 333, Laws of 2021.

(((26)))(25) Motor Vehicle Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Puget Sound

Capital Construction Account—State
. . . .
$30,000,000

(((27)))(26) Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the I-405 and SR 167

Express Toll Lanes Account—State
. . . .
$268,433,000

(((28)))(27) Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Move Ahead WA

Account—State
. . . .
$874,081,000

(((29)))(28) Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the State Route

Number 520 Corridor Account—State
. . . .
$70,786,000

(((30)))(29) Motor Vehicle Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Connecting Washington

Account—State
. . . .
$80,000,000

(((31)))(30) Move Ahead WA Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Connecting Washington

Account—State
. . . .
$600,000,000

(((32)))(31) Transportation Improvement Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Transportation

Improvement Board Bond Retirement Account
. . . .
$6,451,550

(End of part)

IMPLEMENTING PROVISIONS

Sec. 401. 2022 c 186 s 601 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

MANAGEMENT OF TRANSPORTATION FUNDS WHEN THE LEGISLATURE IS NOT IN SESSION

(1) The 2005 transportation partnership projects or improvements and 2015 connecting Washington projects or improvements are listed in ((the LEAP Transportation Document 2022-1 as developed March 9, 2022))OFM Transportation Document 2023-1: Proposed Transportation Project List as developed December 14, 2022, which consists of a list of specific projects by fund source and amount over a sixteen-year period. Current fiscal biennium funding for each project is a line-item appropriation, while the outer year funding allocations represent a sixteen-year plan. The department of transportation is expected to use the flexibility provided in this section to assist in the delivery and completion of all transportation partnership account and connecting Washington account projects on the ((LEAP))OFM transportation document referenced in this subsection. For the 2021-2023 project appropriations, unless otherwise provided in this act, the director of the office of financial management may provide written authorization for a transfer of appropriation authority between projects funded with transportation partnership account appropriations or connecting Washington account appropriations to manage project spending and efficiently deliver all projects in the respective program under the following conditions and limitations:

(a) Transfers may only be made within each specific fund source referenced on the respective project list;

(b) Transfers from a project may not be made as a result of the reduction of the scope of a project or be made to support increases in the scope of a project;

(c) Transfers from a project may be made if the funds appropriated to the project are in excess of the amount needed in the current fiscal biennium;

(d) Transfers may not occur for projects not identified on the applicable project list;

(e) Transfers to a project may not occur if that project is a programmatic funding item described in broad general terms on the applicable project list without referencing a specific state route number;

(f) Transfers may not be made while the legislature is in session;

(g) Transfers to a project may not be made with funds designated as attributable to practical design savings as described in RCW 47.01.480;

(h) Except for transfers made under (l) of this subsection, transfers may only be made in fiscal year 2023;

(i) The total amount of transfers under this section may not exceed $50,000,000;

(j) Except as otherwise provided in (l) of this subsection, transfers made to a single project may not cumulatively total more than $20,000,000 per biennium;

(k) Each transfer between projects may only occur if the director of the office of financial management finds that any resulting change will not hinder the completion of the projects as approved by the legislature; and

(l) Transfers between projects may be made by the department of transportation without the formal written approval provided under this subsection (1), provided that the transfer amount to a single project does not exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars or ten percent of the total project per biennium, whichever is less. These transfers must be reported quarterly to the director of the office of financial management and the chairs of the house of representatives and senate transportation committees.

(2) The department of transportation must submit quarterly all transfers authorized under this section in the transportation executive information system. The office of financial management must maintain a legislative baseline project list identified in the ((LEAP))OFM transportation documents referenced in this act, and update that project list with all authorized transfers under this section, including any effects to the total project budgets and schedules beyond the current biennium.

(3) At the time the department submits a request to transfer funds under this section, a copy of the request must be submitted to the chairs and ranking members of the transportation committees of the legislature.

(4) Before approval, the office of financial management shall work with legislative staff of the house of representatives and senate transportation committees to review the requested transfers in a timely manner and address any concerns raised by the chairs and ranking members of the transportation committees.

(5) No fewer than ten days after the receipt of a project transfer request, the director of the office of financial management must provide written notification to the department of any decision regarding project transfers, with copies submitted to the transportation committees of the legislature.

(6) The department must submit annually as part of its budget submittal a report detailing all transfers made pursuant to this section, including any effects to the total project budgets and schedules beyond the current biennium.

(7)(a) If the department of transportation receives federal funding not appropriated in this act, the department shall apply such funds to any of the following activities in lieu of state funds, if compliant with federal funding restrictions, and in the order that most reduces administrative burden and minimizes the use of bond proceeds:

(i) ((Projects on LEAP Transportation Document 2022-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed March 9,))2022 OFM Transportation Document 2023-1: Proposed Transportation Project List as developed December 14, 2022; or

(ii) Other department of transportation operating or capital expenditures funded by appropriations from state accounts in this act.

(b) However, if the funds received may not be used for any of the purposes enumerated in this section and must be obligated before the next regular legislative session, then the department may program the funds for other transportation-related activities, provided that these actions do not initiate any new programs, policies, or expenditure levels requiring additional one-time or ongoing state funds that have not been expressly authorized by the legislature. The department shall follow the existing unanticipated receipt process to notify the legislative standing committees on transportation and the office of financial management of the amount of federal funds received in addition to those appropriated in this act and the projects or activities receiving funding through this process.

Sec. 402. 2022 c 186 s 602 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

TRANSIT, BICYCLE, AND PEDESTRIAN ELEMENTS REPORTING

(1) By November 15th of each year, the department of transportation must report on amounts expended to benefit transit, bicycle, or pedestrian elements within all connecting Washington projects in programs I, P, and Z identified in ((LEAP Transportation Document 2022-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed March 9,))2022 OFM Transportation Document 2023-1: Proposed Transportation Project List as developed December 14, 2022. The report must address each modal category separately and identify if eighteenth amendment protected funds have been used and, if not, the source of funding.

(2) To facilitate the report in subsection (1) of this section, the department of transportation must require that all bids on connecting Washington projects include an estimate on the cost to implement any transit, bicycle, or pedestrian project elements.

(End of part)

MISCELLANEOUS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 501. A new section is added to 2022 c 186 (uncodified) to read as follows:

The appropriations to the department of transportation in chapter 333, Laws of 2021, chapters 186 and 187, Laws of 2022, and this act must be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in chapter 333, Laws of 2021, chapters 186 and 187, Laws of 2022, and this act. However, after May 1, 2023, unless specifically prohibited, the department may transfer state appropriations for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium among operating programs after approval by the director of the office of financial management. However, the department shall not transfer state moneys that are provided solely for a specific purpose. The department shall not transfer funds, and the director of the office of financial management shall not approve the transfer, unless the transfer is consistent with the objective of conserving, to the maximum extent possible, the expenditure of state funds and not federal funds. The director of the office of financial management shall notify the appropriate transportation committees of the legislature prior to approving any allotment modifications or transfers under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

(End of part)

--- END ---