BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature recognizes that the health care authority, consistent with the public employees' benefits board resolution 2022-16, will consult with active employees and retirees, by conducting listening sessions and facilitating public forums, to gather feedback about retiree needs. The legislature intends that the results of stakeholder engagements will be used to inform future health care plan selections.

(2) By December 1, 2023, the authority must report to the legislature with its findings of the stakeholder engagements in subsection (1) of this section and an analysis of government self-insured plans with benefits that are equal to or richer, and with more affordable premiums, than uniform medical plan classic medicare.

--- END ---