BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 49.60 RCW to read as follows:

(1) After January 1, 2024, any contractor or prospective contractor, including subcontractors, with the state for public works or for goods or services is subject to the nondiscrimination requirements of this section and any rules and regulations to implement it.

(2) Every state contract and subcontract for public works or for goods or services must contain a nondiscrimination clause prohibiting discrimination on the bases enumerated in subsection (3) of this section. The nondiscrimination clause must contain a provision requiring contractors and subcontractors to give written notice of their obligations under that clause to labor organizations with which they have a collective bargaining or other agreement.

(3) The antidiscrimination clauses required by this section must prohibit any covered contractor or subcontractor from:

(a) Refusing to hire any person because of age, sex, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, race, creed, color, national origin, citizenship or immigration status, honorably discharged veteran or military status, the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability, or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person with a disability, unless based upon a bona fide occupational qualification: PROVIDED, That the prohibition against discrimination because of such disability shall not apply if the particular disability prevents the proper performance of the particular worker involved: PROVIDED, That this section shall not be construed to require an employer to establish employment goals or quotas based on sexual orientation;

(b) Discharging or barring any person from employment because of age, sex, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, race, creed, color, national origin, citizenship or immigration status, honorably discharged veteran or military status, the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability, or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person with a disability;

(c) Discriminating against any person in compensation or in other terms or conditions of employment because of age, sex, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, race, creed, color, national origin, citizenship or immigration status, honorably discharged veteran or military status, the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability, the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person with a disability: PROVIDED, That it shall not be an unfair practice for an employer to segregate washrooms or locker facilities on the basis of sex, or to base other terms and conditions of employment on the sex of employees where the commission by regulation or ruling in a particular instance has found the employment practice to be appropriate for the practical realization of equality of opportunity between the sexes; or

(d) Printing or circulating, or causing to be printed or circulated, any statement, advertisement, or publication, or to use any form of application for employment, or to make any inquiry in connection with prospective employment, which expresses any limitation, specification, or discrimination as to age, sex, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, race, creed, color, national origin, citizenship or immigration status, honorably discharged veteran or military status, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability, the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person with a disability, or any intent to make any such limitation, specification, or discrimination, unless based upon a bona fide occupational qualification: PROVIDED, That nothing contained herein shall prohibit advertising in a foreign language.

(4) The department of enterprise services, in collaboration with the office of minority and women's business enterprises, the office of equity, and the commission, must develop a standard template for public works and goods and services contracts to meet the provisions of this section.

Sec. 2. RCW 39.26.245 and 2010 c 5 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All contracts entered into and purchases made, including leasing or renting, under this chapter on or after September 1, 1983, are subject to the requirements established under chapter 39.19 RCW.

(2) All procurement contracts entered into under this chapter on or after June 10, 2010, are subject to the requirements established under RCW 43.60A.200.

(3) All contracts with the state for goods or services entered into under this chapter on or after January 1, 2024, are subject to the requirements established under section 1 of this act.

Sec. 3. RCW 39.04.160 and 1983 c 120 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All contracts entered into under this chapter by the state on or after September 1, 1983, are subject to the requirements established under chapter 39.19 RCW.

(2) All contracts entered into under this chapter by the state on or after January 1, 2024, are subject to the requirements established under section 1 of this act.

--- END ---