BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) A budget is hereby adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth in the following sections, the several amounts specified in parts I through IX of this act, or so much thereof as shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby appropriated and authorized to be incurred for salaries, wages, and other expenses of the agencies and offices of the state and for other specified purposes for the fiscal biennium beginning July 1, 2023, and ending June 30, 2025, except as otherwise provided, out of the several funds of the state hereinafter named.

(2) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this act.

(a) "ARPA" means the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2.

(b) "CRRSA" means the coronavirus response and relief supplemental appropriations act, P.L. 116-260, division M.

(c) "CRRSA/ESSER" means the elementary and secondary school emergency relief fund, as modified by the coronavirus response and relief supplemental appropriations act, P.L. 116-260, division M.

(d) "Fiscal year 2024" or "FY 2024" means the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024.

(e) "Fiscal year 2025" or "FY 2025" means the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025.

(f) "FTE" means full time equivalent.

(g) "Lapse" or "revert" means the amount shall return to an unappropriated status.

(h) "Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only for the specified purpose. Unless otherwise specifically authorized in this act, any portion of an amount provided solely for a specified purpose which is not expended subject to the specified conditions and limitations to fulfill the specified purpose shall lapse.

(3) Whenever the terms in subsection (2)(a) through (c) of this section are used in the context of a general fund—federal appropriation, the term is used to attribute the funding to that federal act.

PART I

GENERAL GOVERNMENT

NEW SECTION. Sec. 101. FOR THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$59,650,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$61,968,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$121,618,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102. FOR THE SENATE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$44,185,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$47,635,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$91,820,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $260,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $270,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the payment of membership dues to the council of state governments, the national conference of state legislatures, the pacific northwest economic region, the pacific fisheries legislative task force, and the western legislative forestry task force.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103. FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEE

Performance Audits of Government Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$13,783,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$13,783,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $499,000 of the performance audits of government account—state appropriation is for the performance audit required in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5716 (in-home services surveys). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(2) $23,000 of the performance audits of government account—state appropriation is for the tax preference review required in Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5536 (controlled substances). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(3) $16,000 of the performance audits of government account—state appropriation is for the tax preference review required in Substitute Senate Bill No. 5096 (employee ownership). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4) $626,000 of the performance audits of government account—state appropriation is for the audit required in Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5080 (cannabis social equity). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(5) $23,000 of the performance audits of government account—state appropriation is for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5030 (hog fuel/tax exemption). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(6) $42,000 of the performance audits of government account—state appropriation is for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5045 (ADU rental/property tax). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(7) $27,000 of the performance audits of government account—state appropriation is for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5052 (leasehold excise/arenas). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(8) $13,000 of the performance audits of government account—state appropriation is for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5166 (cooperative finance orgs). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(9) $44,000 of the performance audits of government account—state appropriation is for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5447 (alternative jet fuel). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(10) Within the amount appropriated in this section, the joint legislative audit and review committee shall conduct a review of the state's recreational boating programs. The committee shall complete the review by December 1, 2024. This review shall include examination of the following:

(a) Revenue sources for state recreational boating programs;

(b) Expenditures for state boating programs;

(c) Methods of administrating state recreational boating programs, including the roles of both state and local government entities; and

(d) Approaches other states have taken to funding and administering their recreational boating programs.

(11) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the joint legislative audit and review committee may adjust the due dates for projects included on the committee's 2023-2025 work plan as necessary to efficiently manage workload.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104. FOR THE LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE

Performance Audits of Government Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$5,287,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$5,287,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105. FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE SYSTEMS COMMITTEE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$21,678,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$19,595,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$41,273,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: Within the amounts provided in this section, the joint legislative systems committee shall provide information technology support, including but not limited to internet service, for the district offices of members of the house of representatives and the senate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106. FOR THE OFFICE OF STATE LEGISLATIVE LABOR RELATIONS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$961,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$964,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,925,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107. FOR THE OFFICE OF THE STATE ACTUARY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$409,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$423,000

State Health Care Authority Administrative Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$291,000

Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$7,074,000

School Employees' Insurance Administrative Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$258,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$8,455,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108. FOR THE STATUTE LAW COMMITTEE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$6,175,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$6,791,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$12,966,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 109. FOR THE OFFICE OF LEGISLATIVE SUPPORT SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$5,827,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$6,448,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$12,275,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 110. LEGISLATIVE AGENCIES

In order to achieve operating efficiencies within the financial resources available to the legislative branch, the executive rules committee of the house of representatives and the facilities and operations committee of the senate by joint action may transfer funds among the house of representatives, senate, joint legislative audit and review committee, legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, joint transportation committee, office of the state actuary, joint legislative systems committee, statute law committee, redistricting commission, office of state legislative labor relations, and office of legislative support services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 111. FOR THE SUPREME COURT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$14,709,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$15,032,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$29,741,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 112. FOR THE COMMISSION ON JUDICIAL CONDUCT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$2,190,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$2,174,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$4,364,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 113. FOR THE COURT OF APPEALS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$25,774,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$26,404,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$52,178,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $764,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $764,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5046 (postconviction counsel). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 114. FOR THE ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$117,791,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$113,516,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,209,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$681,000

Judicial Stabilization Trust Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$112,345,000

Judicial Information Systems Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$83,100,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$429,642,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The distributions made under this section and distributions from the county criminal justice assistance account made pursuant to section 801 of this act constitute appropriate reimbursement for costs for any new programs or increased level of service for purposes of RCW 43.135.060.

(2)(a) $7,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $7,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for distribution to county juvenile court administrators for the costs associated with processing and case management of truancy, children in need of services, and at-risk youth referrals. The administrator for the courts, in conjunction with the juvenile court administrators, shall develop an equitable funding distribution formula. The formula must neither reward counties with higher than average per-petition/referral processing costs nor shall it penalize counties with lower than average per-petition/referral processing costs.

(b) Each fiscal year during the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, each county shall report the number of petitions processed and the total actual costs of processing truancy, children in need of services, and at-risk youth petitions. Counties shall submit the reports to the administrator for the courts no later than 45 days after the end of the fiscal year. The administrator for the courts shall electronically transmit this information to the chairs and ranking minority members of the house of representatives and senate fiscal committees no later than 60 days after a fiscal year ends. These reports are informational in nature and are not for the purpose of distributing funds.

(3) $1,094,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,094,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the statewide fiscal impact on Thurston county courts. It is the intent of the legislature that this policy will be continued in subsequent fiscal biennia.

(4) $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for distribution to local courts for costs associated with the court-appointed attorney and visitor requirements set forth in the uniform guardianship act, chapter 11.130 RCW. If the amount provided in this subsection is insufficient to fully fund the local court costs, distributions must be reduced on a proportional basis to ensure that expenditures remain within the available funds provided in this subsection. No later than December 31, 2023, the administrative office of the courts will provide a report on distributions to local courts including, but not limited to, the amount provided to each court, the number of guardianship cases funded at each court, costs segregated by attorney appointments and court visitor appointments, the amount of any pro rata reductions, and a recommendation on how to forecast distributions for potential future funding by the legislature.

(5) $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the administrative office of the courts to use as matching funds to distribute to small municipal and county courts, located in a rural county as defined in RCW 43.160.020, for the purpose of increasing security for court facilities. Grants must be used solely for security equipment and services for municipal, district, and superior courts and may not be used for staffing or administrative costs.

(6) $7,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $7,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for distribution to courts of limited jurisdiction for therapeutic court programs.

(7) $2,599,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,618,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to continue implementation of the case management system for courts of limited jurisdiction and probation offices.

(8) $1,600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to provide electronic filing for those superior courts using the superior court case management system.

(9) $1,090,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,090,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to address data quality issues across Washington state court management systems.

(10) $51,428,000 of the judicial stabilization trust account—state appropriation is provided solely to establish a direct refund process to individuals to refund legal financial obligations, collection costs, and document-verified costs paid to third parties previously paid by defendants whose convictions have been vacated by court order due to the State v. Blake ruling. Superior court clerks, district court administrators, and municipal court administrators must certify and send to the office the amount of any refund ordered by the court. The court order must either contain the amount of the refund or provide language for the clerk or court administrator to certify to the office the amount to be refunded to the individual.

(11) $1,627,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,627,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for activities of the office relating to the resentencing of individuals and refund of legal financial obligations and costs associated with the State v. Blake ruling. In addition to contracting with cities and counties for the disbursement of funds appropriated for resentencing costs, the office must:

(a) Collaborate with superior court clerks, district court administrators, and municipal court administrators to prepare comprehensive reports, based on available court records, of all cause numbers impacted by State v. Blake going back to 1971; and

(b) Establish a process that can be used by individuals seeking a refund, provide individuals information regarding the application process necessary to claim a refund, and issue payments from the refund bureau to individuals certified in subsection (10) of this section.

(12) $38,000,000 of the judicial stabilization trust account—state appropriation is provided solely to assist counties with costs of complying with the State v. Blake decision that arise from the county's role in operating the state's criminal justice system, including resentencing, vacating prior convictions for simple drug possession, and certifying refunds of legal financial obligations and collections costs. The office shall contract with counties for judicial, clerk, defense, and prosecution expenses for these purposes.

(13) $11,500,000 of the judicial stabilization trust account—state appropriation is provided solely to assist cities with costs of complying with the State v. Blake decision that arise from the city's role in operating the city's criminal justice system, including vacating prior convictions for simple drug possession, to include marijuana and possession of paraphernalia, and certifying refunds of legal financial obligations and collections costs. The office shall contract with cities for judicial, clerk, defense, and prosecution expenses for these purposes.

(14) $439,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $304,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5128 (jury diversity). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(15) $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely the office to administer a jury pay pilot program in Pierce county. Funding must be used to increase jury pay up to $75 for each day served in Pierce county superior court. The funds provided in this subsection must supplement, and not supplant, existing local funding for juror pay. The office must compare juror demographics after the pay increase as compared to date collected from the 2022 jury demographic survey to measure the impact increasing juror pay has on jury diversity and juror response rates.

(16) $1,800,000 of the judicial stabilization trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for distribution to counties to help cover the cost of electronic monitoring with victim notification technology when an individual seeking a protection order requests electronic monitoring with victim notification technology from the court and the respondent is unable to pay. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, up to five percent of the funding each fiscal year may be used by the office for education and outreach to the courts regarding this technology.

(17) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5536 (controlled substances). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 115. FOR THE OFFICE OF PUBLIC DEFENSE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$65,232,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$69,525,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$385,000

Judicial Stabilization Trust Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$9,867,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$145,009,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $900,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $900,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the purpose of improving the quality of trial court public defense services as authorized by chapter 10.101 RCW. The office of public defense must allocate these amounts so that $450,000 per fiscal year is distributed to counties, and $450,000 per fiscal year is distributed to cities, for grants under chapter 10.101 RCW.

(2) $5,973,000 of the judicial stabilization trust account—state appropriation is provided solely to assist counties with public defense services related to vacating the convictions of defendants and/or resentencing for defendants whose convictions or sentences are affected by the State v. Blake decision.

(3) $1,323,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,097,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to provide prefiling legal representation to pregnant parents and parents of newborns at risk of removal by the department of children, youth, and families.

(4) $623,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,165,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5046 (postconviction counsel). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(5) $6,863,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $6,602,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5415 (public defense/insanity). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(6) $1,200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the parents for parents program. The amount provided in this subsection must be used to maintain and improve service models for the current programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 116. FOR THE OFFICE OF CIVIL LEGAL AID

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$52,388,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$58,906,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,468,000

Judicial Stabilization Trust Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,851,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$116,613,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $3,917,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $7,708,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the appointed counsel program for children and youth in dependency cases under RCW 13.34.212(3) in accordance with revised practice, caseload, and training standards adopted by the supreme court commission on children in foster care and includes a vendor rate increase for contracted attorneys. By October 1, 2023, the office must develop a revised implementation schedule based on a caseload assumption of adding no more than 1,250 new dependency cases to the program each fiscal year for consideration by the governor and the legislature.

(2) $2,408,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,579,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the provision of civil legal information, advice, and representation for tenants at risk of eviction but not yet eligible for appointed counsel services under RCW 59.18.640.

(3) $14,646,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $15,222,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the appointed counsel program for tenants in unlawful detainer cases established in RCW 59.18.640 and includes a vendor rate increase for contracted attorneys.

(4) $2,387,000 of the judicial stabilization trust account—state appropriation is provided solely to continue legal information, advice, assistance, and representation for individuals eligible for civil relief under the supreme court's ruling in State v. Blake.

(5) An amount not to exceed $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and an amount not to exceed $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 may be used to provide telephonic legal advice and assistance to otherwise eligible persons who are 60 years of age or older on matters authorized by RCW 2.53.030(2) (a) through (k) regardless of household income or asset level.

(6) $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to the office of civil legal aid to establish a legal advice phone line to provide guidance and legal advice for kinship caregivers. The phone line must be staffed by two FTE contracted attorneys that have experience with kinship care, guardianship statutes, the child welfare system, and issues relating to legal custody.

(7) $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of civil legal aid to expand civil legal aid services for survivors of domestic violence, including legal services for protection order proceedings, family law cases, immigration assistance, and other civil legal issues arising from or related to the domestic violence they experienced.

(8) $1,009,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,022,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of civil legal aid to continue the statewide reentry legal aid project as established in section 115(12), chapter 357, Laws of 2020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 117. FOR THE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$22,676,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$22,554,000

Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,282,000

Governor's Office Central Services Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$12,576,000

Performance Audits of Government Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$720,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$60,808,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,146,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,146,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of the education ombuds.

(2) $12,576,000 of the governor's office central services account—state appropriation is provided solely for the office of equity.

(3) $480,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the governor to invite federally recognized tribes, local governments, agricultural producers, commercial and recreational fisher organizations, business organizations, salmon recovery organizations, forestry and agricultural organizations, and environmental organizations to participate in a process facilitated by an independent entity to develop recommendations on proposed changes in policy and spending priorities to improve riparian habitat to ensure salmon and steelhead recovery.

(a) The independent entity must develop recommendations on furthering riparian funding and policy, including but not limited to, strategies that can attract private investment in improving riparian habitat, and developing a regulatory or compensation strategy if voluntary programs do not achieve concrete targets.

(b) Preliminary recommendations shall be submitted to the legislature and governor by May 1, 2024, with a final report by June 30, 2024.

(c) The office of the governor may contract for an independent facilitator. The contract is exempt from the competitive procurement requirements in chapter 39.26 RCW.

(4) $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5311 (special education funding). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 118. FOR THE LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$1,590,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$1,613,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$90,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$3,293,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the legislative committee on economic development and international relations to conduct an analysis of the statewide economic impact of the military and defense sector. The analysis shall be completed and submitted to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by September 1, 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 119. FOR THE PUBLIC DISCLOSURE COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$5,937,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$5,738,000

Public Disclosure Transparency Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,371,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$14,046,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $280,000 of the public disclosure transparency account—state appropriation is provided solely for staff for business analysis and project management of information technology projects.

(2) No moneys may be expended from the appropriations in this section to establish an electronic directory, archive, or other compilation of political advertising unless explicitly authorized by the legislature.

(3) $1,891,000 of the public disclosure transparency account—state appropriation is provided solely for the public disclosure commission for the purpose of improving the ability of the public to access information about political campaigns, lobbying, and elected officials, and facilitating accurate and timely reporting by the regulated community. The commission must report to the office of financial management and fiscal committees of the legislature by October 31st of each year detailing information on the public disclosure transparency account. The report shall include, but is not limited to:

(a) An investment plan of how funds would be used to improve the ability of the public to access information about political campaigns, lobbying, and elected officials, and facilitate accurate and timely reporting by the regulated community;

(b) A list of active projects as of July 1st of the fiscal year. This must include a breakdown of expenditures by project and expense type for all current and ongoing projects;

(c) A list of projects that are planned in the current and following fiscal year and projects the commission would recommend for future funding. The commission must identify priorities, and develop accountability measures to ensure the projects meet intended purposes; and

(d) Any other metric or measure the commission deems appropriate to track the outcome of the use of the funds.

(4) $100,000 of the public disclosure transparency account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5207 (controlled entities). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(5) $100,000 of the public disclosure transparency account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5284 (campaign finance disclosure). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 120. FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$41,332,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$54,968,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$8,535,000

Public Records Efficiency, Preservation, and Access

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$11,531,000

Charitable Organization Education Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,161,000

Washington State Library Operations Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$14,424,000

Local Government Archives Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$11,893,000

Election Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$4,487,000

Personnel Service Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,256,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$150,587,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $2,147,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $11,668,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to reimburse counties for the state's share of primary and general election costs and the costs of conducting mandatory recounts on state measures. Counties shall be reimbursed only for those costs that the secretary of state validates as eligible for reimbursement.

(2)(a) $3,551,500 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,551,500 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for contracting with a nonprofit organization to produce gavel-to-gavel television coverage of state government deliberations and other events statewide. The funding level for each year of the contract shall be based on the amount provided in this subsection. The nonprofit organization shall be required to raise contributions or commitments to make contributions, in cash or in kind, in an amount equal to forty percent of the state contribution. The office of the secretary of state may make full or partial payment once all criteria in this subsection have been satisfactorily documented.

(b) The legislature finds that the commitment of on-going funding is necessary to ensure continuous, autonomous, and independent coverage of public affairs. For that purpose, the secretary of state shall enter into a contract with the nonprofit organization to provide public affairs coverage.

(c) The nonprofit organization shall prepare an annual independent audit, an annual financial statement, and an annual report, including benchmarks that measure the success of the nonprofit organization in meeting the intent of the program.

(d) No portion of any amounts disbursed pursuant to this subsection may be used, directly or indirectly, for any of the following purposes:

(i) Attempting to influence the passage or defeat of any legislation by the legislature of the state of Washington, by any county, city, town, or other political subdivision of the state of Washington, or by the congress, or the adoption or rejection of any rule, standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of any state agency;

(ii) Making contributions reportable under chapter 42.17 RCW; or

(iii) Providing any: (A) Gift; (B) honoraria; or (C) travel, lodging, meals, or entertainment to a public officer or employee.

(3) Any reductions to funding for the Washington talking book and Braille library may not exceed in proportion any reductions taken to the funding for the library as a whole.

(4) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for humanities Washington speaker's bureau community conversations.

(5) $114,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $114,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for election reconciliation reporting. Funding provides for one staff to compile county reconciliation reports, analyze the data, and to complete an annual statewide election reconciliation report for every state primary and general election. The report must be submitted annually on July 31, to legislative policy and fiscal committees. The annual report must include statewide analysis and by county analysis on the reasons for ballot rejection and an analysis of the ways ballots are received, counted, rejected and cure data that can be used by policymakers to better understand election administration.

(6) $1,245,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,195,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for staff dedicated to the maintenance and operations of the voter registration and election management system. These staff will manage database upgrades, database maintenance, system training and support to counties, and triage and customer service to system users.

(7) $8,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $8,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for:

(a) Funding the security operations center, including identified needs for expanded operations, systems, technology tools, training resources;

(b) Additional staff dedicated to the cyber and physical security of election operations at the office and county election offices;

(c) Expanding security assessments, threat monitoring, enhanced security training; and

(d) Providing grants to county partners to address identified threats and expand existing grants and contracts with other public and private organizations such as the Washington military department, national guard, private companies providing cyber security, and county election offices.

(8) $148,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5128 (jury diversity). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(9) $148,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5112 (voter registration). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(10) $148,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5182 (candidate filing). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(11) $148,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5208 (online voter registration). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(12) $616,000 of the personnel service account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5015 (productivity board). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(13) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a contract with humanities Washington to expand the prime time family reading program.

(14) $1,714,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,677,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to replace the combined fund drive donor management system.

(15) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for legal services costs for Vet Voice Foundation et al. v. Hobbs.

(16) $4,024,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,374,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the agency to design and implement strategies and products to counter false narratives surrounding election security and integrity, including community engagement with underserved populations such as young voters, voters with disabilities, tribal communities, and non-English-speaking voters. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $500,000 per fiscal year are provided solely for grants to county auditors for the same purposes.

(17) The office of the secretary of state must work with the office of the chief information officer to evaluate the office of the secretary of state's information technology infrastructure and applications to determine the appropriate candidates for the location of data and the systems that could be exempt from consolidated technology services oversight. The office shall report its findings to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2023.

(18) $83,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $67,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely the office of the secretary of state to assist businesses and nonprofits providing therapeutic rehabilitation within Washington state's juvenile secure residential facilities. It is well established that providing outreach and therapeutic education among incarcerated youth remains critical to successful community reentry. The amounts provided under this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations: To be eligible for a grant under this subsection, a business must (a) apply for or have applied for the grant; (b) be registered as a Washington state business or non-profit; (c) reported annual gross receipts are no more than $1,000,000 in the most recent calendar year; (d) must have ability to conduct in-person business operations at one of Washington's juvenile correctional facilities; (e) of the total grant amount awarded, no more than 10 percent may be awarded for travel expenses; (f) agree to operate in-person, in accordance with the requirements of applicable federal, state, and local directives and guidance; and (g) at least one principal of entity must demonstrate the following educational credential, minimum masters degree in related field, and professional experience of conducting therapeutic gaming. The office of the secretary of state may use up to 10 percent of the amount provided in this subsection for administrative costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 121. FOR THE GOVERNOR'S OFFICE OF INDIAN AFFAIRS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$665,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$660,000

Climate Commitment Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$508,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,833,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The office shall assist the department of enterprise services on providing the government-to-government training sessions for federal, state, local, and tribal government employees. The training sessions shall cover tribal historical perspectives, legal issues, tribal sovereignty, and tribal governments. Costs of the training sessions shall be recouped through a fee charged to the participants of each session. The department of enterprise services shall be responsible for all of the administrative aspects of the training, including the billing and collection of the fees for the training.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 122. FOR THE COMMISSION ON ASIAN PACIFIC AMERICAN AFFAIRS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$585,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$595,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,180,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 123. FOR THE STATE TREASURER

State Treasurer's Service Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$22,797,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$22,797,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $500,000 of the state treasurer's service account—state appropriation is provided solely for the review of local government tax increment financing proposals as provided in RCW 39.114.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 124. FOR THE STATE AUDITOR

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$1,070,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$1,079,000

Auditing Services Revolving Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$18,397,000

Performance Audits of Government Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,858,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$22,404,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,585,000 of the performance audit of government account—state appropriation is provided solely for staff and related costs to verify the accuracy of reported school district data submitted for state funding purposes; conduct school district program audits of state-funded public school programs; establish the specific amount of state funding adjustments whenever audit exceptions occur and the amount is not firmly established in the course of regular public school audits; and to assist the state special education safety net committee when requested.

(2) Within existing resources of the performance audits of government account, the state auditor's office shall conduct a performance audit or accountability audit of Washington charter public schools to satisfy the requirement to contract for an independent performance audit pursuant to RCW 28A.710.030(2).

(3) $825,000 of the auditing services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for accountability and risk based audits.

(4) $1,030,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,030,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for law enforcement audits pursuant to RCW 43.101.460 and 43.101.465.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 125. FOR THE CITIZENS' COMMISSION ON SALARIES FOR ELECTED OFFICIALS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$290,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$289,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$579,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 126. FOR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$38,276,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$34,678,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$23,595,000

Public Service Revolving Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,681,000

New Motor Vehicle Arbitration Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,874,000

Medicaid Fraud Penalty Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$6,584,000

Child Rescue Fund—State Appropriation
. . . .
$80,000

Legal Services Revolving Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$397,780,000

Local Government Archives Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,109,000

Tobacco Prevention and Control Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$273,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$508,930,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The attorney general shall report each fiscal year on actual legal services expenditures and actual attorney staffing levels for each agency receiving legal services. The report shall be submitted to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives no later than ninety days after the end of each fiscal year. As part of its by agency report to the legislative fiscal committees and the office of financial management, the office of the attorney general shall include information detailing the agency's expenditures for its agency-wide overhead and a breakdown by division of division administration expenses.

(2) Prior to entering into any negotiated settlement of a claim against the state that exceeds five million dollars, the attorney general shall notify the director of the office of financial management and the chairs and ranking members of the senate committee on ways and means and the house of representatives committee on appropriations.

(3) The attorney general shall annually report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all new cy pres awards and settlements and all new accounts, disclosing their intended uses, balances, the nature of the claim or account, proposals, and intended timeframes for the expenditure of each amount. The report shall be distributed electronically and posted on the attorney general's web site. The report shall not be printed on paper or distributed physically.

(4) $1,217,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,217,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for multi-year arbitrations of the state's diligent enforcement of its obligations to receive amounts withheld from tobacco master settlement agreement payments.

(5) $6,189,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $4,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 326, Laws of 2021 (law enforcement data).

(6) $1,958,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $958,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of a program for receiving and responding to tips from the public regarding risks or potential risks to the safety or well-being of youth, called the YES tip line program. Risks to safety or well-being may include, but are not limited to, harm or threats of harm to self or others, sexual abuse, assault, rape, bullying or cyberbullying, substance use, and criminal acts. Any person contacting the YES tip line, whether for themselves or for another person, must receive timely assistance and not be turned away. The program must operate within the guidelines of this subsection.

(a) During the development and implementation of the YES tip line program the attorney general shall convene an advisory committee consisting of representatives from the Washington state patrol, the department of health, the health care authority, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the Washington student achievement council, the Washington association of educational service districts, and other participants the attorney general appoints.

(b) The attorney general shall develop and implement policies and processes for:

(i) Assessing tips based on the level of severity, urgency, and assistance needed using best triage practices including the YES tip line;

(ii) Risk assessment for referral of persons contacting the YES tip line to service providers;

(iii) Threat assessment that identifies circumstances requiring the YES tip line to alert law enforcement, mental health services, or other first responders immediately when immediate emergency response to a tip is warranted;

(iv) Referral and follow-up on tips to schools or postsecondary institution teams, local crisis services, law enforcement, and other entities;

(v) YES tip line information data retention and reporting requirements;

(vi) Ensuring the confidentiality of persons submitting a tip and to allow for disclosure when necessary to respond to a specific emergency threat to life; and

(vii) Systematic review, analysis, and reporting by the YES tip line program of YES tip line data including, but not limited to, reporting program utilization and evaluating whether the YES tip line is being implemented equitably across the state.

(c) The YES tip line shall be operated by a vendor selected by the attorney general through a competitive contracting process. The attorney general shall ensure that the YES tip line program vendor and its personnel are properly trained and resourced. The contract must require the vendor to be bound by confidentiality policies developed by the office. The contract must also provide that the state of Washington owns the data and information produced from the YES tip line and that vendor must comply with the state's data retention, use, and security requirements.

(d) The YES tip line program must develop and maintain a reference and best practices tool kit for law enforcement and mental health officials that identifies statewide and community mental health resources, services, and contacts, and provides best practices and strategies for investigators to use in investigating cases and assisting youths and their parents and guardians.

(e) The YES tip line program must promote and market the program and YES tip line to youth, families, community members, schools, and others statewide to build awareness of the program's resources and the YES tip line. Youth perspectives must be included and consulted in tip line development and implementation including creating marketing campaigns and materials required for the YES tip line program. The insights of youth representing marginalized and minority communities must be prioritized for their invaluable insight. Youths are eligible for stipends and reasonable allowances for reimbursement, lodging, and travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.220.

(7) $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of the attorney general to support the Washington state missing and murdered indigenous women and people task force in Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5477 (murdered indigenous women) or section 913 of this act.

(8) $9,188,000 of the legal services revolving fund—state appropriation is provided solely for additional legal services to address additional legal services necessary for dependency actions where the state and federal Indian child welfare act apply. The office must report to the fiscal committees of the legislature within 90 days of the close of the fiscal year the following information for new cases initiated in the previous fiscal year to measure quantity and use of this funding:

(a) The number and proportion of cases where the state and federal Indian child welfare act (ICWA) applies as compared to non-ICWA new cases;

(b) The amount of time spent advising on, preparing for court, and litigating issues and elements related to ICWA's requirements as compared to the amount of time advising on, preparing for court, and litigating issues and elements that are not related to ICWA's requirements;

(c) The length of state and federal Indian child welfare act cases as compared to non-ICWA cases measured by time or number of court hearings; and

(d) Any other information or metric the office determines is appropriate to measure the quantity and use of the funding in this subsection.

(9) $161,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $161,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the civil rights unit to provide additional services in defense and protection of civil and constitutional rights for people in Washington.

(10) $1,381,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for legal services and other costs related to redistricting commission litigation.

(11) $566,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $436,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for legal services related to litigation challenging chapter 104, Laws of 2022 (ESSB 5078).

(12) $749,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $689,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for legal services related to the defense of the state and its agencies in a federal environmental cleanup action involving the Quendall terminals superfund site.

(13) $731,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,462,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for additional resources for the prosecution of sexually violent predator cases pursuant to chapter 71.09 RCW.

(14) $699,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $699,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for additional resources for the criminal litigation unit to address increased wrongfully convicted person claims under chapter 4.100 RCW and increased workload and complexity of cases referred to the unit.

(15) $755,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,510,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office to create a centralized statewide organized retail crime task force to coordinate, investigate, and prosecute multijurisdictional retail crime.

(16) $1,245,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,245,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5078 (firearms industry duties). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(17) $442,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $359,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5171 (consumer products/gender). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(18) $39,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $39,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $16,000 of the legal services revolving fund—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5263 (psilocybin). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(19) $2,071,000 of the legal services revolving fund—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5080 (cannabis social equity). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(20) $1,136,000 of the legal services revolving fund—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5236 (hospital staffing standards). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(21) $80,000 of the legal services revolving fund—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5267 (railroad workers). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(22) $2,316,000 of the legal services revolving fund—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5272 (speed safety cameras). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(23) $138,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for staff support to the joint legislative task force on jail standards authorized by RCW 70.48.801. The task force shall report finding and recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than December 1, 2023.

(24) $463,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $454,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, $398,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation, $91,000 of the public service revolving account—state appropriation, $133,000 of the medicaid fraud penalty account—state appropriation, and $6,740,000 of the legal services revolving fund—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of the legal matter management system and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(25) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the office must collaborate with the office of the insurance commissioner to study regulatory approaches used by other states to address affordability of health insurance beyond rate review and to address any anticompetitive impacts of horizontal consolidation and vertical integration in the health care marketplace to supplement federal antitrust law, as provided in section 144(14) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 127. FOR THE CASELOAD FORECAST COUNCIL

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$2,286,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$2,288,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$356,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$4,930,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $356,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to forecast the caseload for the Washington college grant program.

(2) Within existing resources, and beginning with the November 2021 forecast, the caseload forecast council shall produce an unofficial forecast of the long-term caseload for juvenile rehabilitation as a courtesy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 128. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

(1)(a) The appropriations to the department of commerce in this act must be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, 2024, unless prohibited by this act, the department may transfer general fund—state appropriations for fiscal year 2024 among programs and subprograms after approval by the director of the office of financial management. However, the department may not transfer state appropriations that are provided solely for a specified purpose.

(b) Within 30 days after the close of fiscal year 2024, the department must provide the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature with an accounting of any transfers made under this subsection. The accounting shall include a narrative explanation and justification of the changes, along with expenditures and allotments by budget unit and appropriation, both before and after any allotment modifications or transfers. The department must also provide recommendations for revisions to appropriations to better align funding with the new budget structure for the department in this act and to eliminate the need for the transfer authority in future budgets.

(2) Repayments of outstanding mortgage and rental assistance program loans administered by the department under RCW 43.63A.640 shall be remitted to the department, including any current revolving account balances. The department shall collect payments on outstanding loans, and deposit them into the state general fund. Repayments of funds owed under the program shall be remitted to the department according to the terms included in the original loan agreements.

(3) The department is authorized to suspend issuing any nonstatutorily required grants or contracts of an amount less than $1,000,000 per year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 129. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE—COMMUNITY SERVICES AND HOUSING

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$281,284,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$341,090,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$208,405,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$5,252,000

Affordable Housing for All Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$109,227,000

Apple Health and Homes Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$28,452,000

Climate Commitment Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$75,000,000

Community and Economic Development Fee Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,159,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$60,950,000

Financial Fraud and Identity Theft Crimes

Investigation and Prosecution Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,631,000

Home Security Fund Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$290,410,000

Lead Paint Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$831,000

Prostitution Prevention and Intervention Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$26,000

Washington Housing Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$5,679,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,412,396,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $7,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $7,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to resolution Washington to build statewide capacity for alternative dispute resolution centers and dispute resolution programs that guarantee that citizens have access to low-cost resolution as an alternative to litigation.

(2) $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to the retired senior volunteer program.

(3) Within existing resources, the department shall provide administrative and other indirect support to the developmental disabilities council.

(4) $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Washington new Americans program. The department may require a cash match or in-kind contributions to be eligible for state funding.

(5) $643,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $643,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to contract with a private, nonprofit organization to provide developmental disability ombuds services.

(6) $1,000,000 of the home security fund—state appropriation, $2,000,000 of the Washington housing trust account—state appropriation, and $1,000,000 of the affordable housing for all account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department of commerce for services to homeless families and youth through the Washington youth and families fund.

(7) $2,000,000 of the home security fund—state appropriation is provided solely for the administration of the grant program required in chapter 43.185C RCW, linking homeless students and their families with stable housing.

(8)(a) $1,980,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,980,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for community beds for individuals with a history of mental illness. Currently, there is little to no housing specific to populations with these co-occurring disorders; therefore, the department must consider how best to develop new bed capacity in combination with individualized support services, such as intensive case management and care coordination, clinical supervision, mental health, substance abuse treatment, and vocational and employment services. Case-management and care coordination services must be provided. Increased case-managed housing will help to reduce the use of jails and emergency services and will help to reduce admissions to the state psychiatric hospitals. The department must coordinate with the health care authority and the department of social and health services in establishing conditions for the awarding of these funds. The department must contract with local entities to provide a mix of (i) shared permanent supportive housing; (ii) independent permanent supportive housing; and (iii) low and no-barrier housing beds for people with a criminal history, substance abuse disorder, and/or mental illness.

(b) Priority for permanent supportive housing must be given to individuals on the discharge list at the state psychiatric hospitals or in community psychiatric inpatient beds whose conditions present significant barriers to timely discharge.

(9) $557,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $557,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to design and administer the achieving a better life experience program.

(10) $8,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $8,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to contract with organizations and attorneys to provide either legal representation or referral services for legal representation, or both, to indigent persons who are in need of legal services for matters related to their immigration status. Persons eligible for assistance under any contract entered into pursuant to this subsection must be determined to be indigent under standards developed under chapter 10.101 RCW.

(11)(a) $28,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $28,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $37,000,000 of the affordable housing for all account—state appropriation are provided solely for grants to support the building operation, maintenance, and service costs of permanent supportive housing projects or units within housing projects that have or will receive funding from the housing trust fund—state account or other public capital funding that:

(i) Is dedicated as permanent supportive housing units;

(ii) Is occupied by low-income households with incomes at or below thirty percent of the area median income; and

(iii) Requires a supplement to rent income to cover ongoing property operating, maintenance, and service expenses.

(b) Permanent supportive housing projects receiving federal operating subsidies that do not fully cover the operation, maintenance, and service costs of the projects are eligible to receive grants as described in this subsection.

(c) The department may use a reasonable amount of funding provided in this subsection to administer the grants.

(12) $7,000,000 of the home security fund—state appropriation is provided solely for the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs to:

(a) Expand outreach, services, and housing for homeless youth and young adults including but not limited to secure crisis residential centers, crisis residential centers, and HOPE beds, so that resources are equitably distributed across the state;

(b) Contract with other public agency partners to test innovative program models that prevent youth from exiting public systems into homelessness; and

(c) Support the development of an integrated services model, increase performance outcomes, and enable providers to have the necessary skills and expertise to effectively operate youth programs.

(13) $4,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $4,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of homeless youth to build infrastructure and services to support a continuum of interventions, including but not limited to prevention, crisis response, and long-term housing, to reduce youth homelessness in communities identified as part of the anchor community initiative.

(14) $2,125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of homeless youth to contract with one or more nonprofit organizations to provide youth services and young adult housing on a multi-acre youth campus located in the city of Tacoma. Youth services include, but are not limited to, HOPE beds and crisis residential centers to provide temporary shelter and permanency planning for youth under the age of 18. Young adult housing includes, but is not limited to, rental assistance and case management for young adults ages 18 to 24. The department shall submit an annual report to the legislature on the use of the funds. The report is due annually on June 30th. The report shall include but is not limited to:

(a) A breakdown of expenditures by program and expense type, including the cost per bed;

(b) The number of youth and young adults helped by each program;

(c) The number of youth and young adults on the waiting list for programs, if any; and

(d) Any other metric or measure the department deems appropriate to evaluate the effectiveness of the use of the funds.

(15) $52,070,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $52,070,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the essential needs and housing support program and related services. The department may use a portion of the funds provided in this subsection to continue the pilot program established in section 127(106) of chapter 357, Laws of 2020.

(16) $198,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $198,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to retain a behavioral health facilities siting administrator within the department to coordinate development of effective behavioral health housing options and provide technical assistance in siting of behavioral health treatment facilities statewide to aide in the governor's plan to discharge individuals from the state psychiatric hospitals into community settings. This position must work closely with the local government legislative authorities, planning departments, behavioral health providers, health care authority, department of social and health services, and other entities to facilitate linkages among disparate behavioral health community bed capacity-building efforts. This position must work to integrate building behavioral health treatment and infrastructure capacity in addition to ongoing supportive housing benefits.

(17) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to contract with an entity located in the Beacon hill/Chinatown international district area of Seattle to provide low income housing, low income housing support services, or both. To the extent practicable, the chosen location must be colocated with other programs supporting the needs of children, the elderly, or persons with disabilities.

(18) $4,740,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $4,740,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $4,500,000 of the home security fund—state appropriation are provided solely for the consolidated homeless grant program.

(a) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $4,500,000 of the home security fund—state appropriation is provided solely for permanent supportive housing targeted at those families who are chronically homeless and where at least one member of the family has a disability. The department will also connect these families to medicaid supportive services.

(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for diversion services for those families and individuals who are at substantial risk of losing stable housing or who have recently become homeless and are determined to have a high probability of returning to stable housing.

(c) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $3,240,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,240,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for up to nine months of rental assistance for individuals enrolled in the foundational community supports initiative who are transitioning off of benefits under RCW 74.04.805 due to increased income or other changes in eligibility. The health care authority, department of social and health services, and department of commerce shall collaborate on this effort.

(19) $958,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,332,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the operations of the long-term care ombudsman program.

(20) $1,007,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,007,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to administer a transitional housing program for nondependent homeless youth.

(21) $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to establish an identification assistance and support program to assist homeless persons in collecting documentation and procuring an identicard issued by the department of licensing. This program may be operated through a contract for services. The program shall operate in one county west of the crest of the Cascade mountain range with a population of one million or more and one county east of the crest of the Cascade mountain range with a population of 500,000 or more.

(22) $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs to create a centralized diversion fund to serve homeless or at-risk youth and young adults, including those who are unsheltered, exiting inpatient programs, or in school. Funding provided in this subsection may be used for short-term rental assistance, offsetting costs for first and last month's rent and security deposits, transportation costs to go to work, and assistance in obtaining photo identification or birth certificates.

(23) $607,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $607,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to assist homeowners at risk of foreclosure pursuant to chapter 61.24 RCW. Funding provided in this section may be used for activities to prevent mortgage or tax lien foreclosure, housing counselors, a foreclosure prevention hotline, legal services for low-income individuals, mediation, and other activities that promote homeownership. The department may contract with other foreclosure fairness program state partners to carry out this work.

(24) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to contract with a nonprofit entity located in Seattle that focuses on poverty reduction and racial equity to convene and staff a poverty reduction workgroup steering committee comprised of individuals that have lived experience with poverty. Funding provided in this section may be used to reimburse steering committee members for travel, child care, and other costs associated with participation in the steering committee.

(25) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for capacity-building grants through the Latino community fund for emergency response services, educational programs, and human services support for children and families in rural and underserved communities.

(26) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of homeless youth to administer a competitive grant process to award funding to licensed youth shelters, HOPE centers, and crisis residential centers to provide behavioral health support services for youth in crisis, and to increase funding for current grantees.

(27) $9,864,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $9,864,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for long-term rental subsidies for individuals with mental health or substance use disorders. This funding may be used for individuals enrolled in the foundational community support program while waiting for a longer term resource for rental support or for individuals transitioning from behavioral health treatment facilities or local jails. Individuals who would otherwise be eligible for the foundational community support program but are not eligible because of their citizenship status may also be served.

(28) $9,575,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $9,575,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to continue the Washington state office of firearm safety and violence prevention, including the creation of a state and federal grant funding plan to direct resources to cities that are most impacted by community violence. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for community-based violence prevention and intervention services to individuals identified through the King county shots fired social network analysis. The department must complete an evaluation of the program and provide a report to the governor and the appropriate legislative committees by June 30, 2025.

(b) $5,318,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $5,318,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to support existing programs and capacity building for new programs providing evidence-based violence prevention and intervention services to youth who are at high risk to perpetrate or be victims of firearm violence and who reside in areas with high rates of firearm violence as provided in RCW 43.330A.050.

(i) Priority shall be given to programs that partner with the University of Washington, school of medicine, department of psychiatry and behavioral sciences for training and support to deliver culturally relevant family integrated transition services through use of credible messenger advocates.

(ii) The office may enter into agreement with the University of Washington or another independent entity with expertise in evaluating community-based grant-funded programs to evaluate the grant program's effectiveness.

(iii) The office shall enter into agreement to provide funding to the University of Washington, school of medicine, department of psychiatry and behavioral sciences to directly deliver trainings and support to programs providing culturally relevant family integrated transition services through use of credible messenger and to train a third-party organization to similarly support those programs.

(c) $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided to further support firearm violence prevention and intervention programs and initiatives consistent with the duties of the office as set forth in RCW 43.330A.020.

(d) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided to support safe storage programs and suicide prevention outreach and education efforts across the state.

(29) $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to administer grants to diaper banks for the purchase of diapers, wipes, and other essential baby products, for distribution to families in need. The department must give priority to providers serving or located in marginalized, low-income communities or communities of color; and providers that help support racial equity.

(30) $120,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $120,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit resource center in King county that provides sexual assault advocacy services, therapy services, and prevention and outreach to begin a three-year, multigrade sexual violence prevention program in the Renton school district.

(31) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs to colead a prevention work group with the department of children, youth, and families. The work group must focus on preventing youth and young adult homelessness and other related negative outcomes. The work group shall consist of members representing the department of social and health services, the employment security department, the health care authority, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the Washington student achievement council, the interagency work group on homelessness, community-based organizations, and young people and families with lived experience of housing instability, child welfare involvement, justice system involvement, or inpatient behavioral health involvement.

(a) The work group shall help guide implementation of:

(i) The state's strategic plan on prevention of youth homelessness;

(ii) Chapter 157, Laws of 2018 (SSB 6560);

(iii) Chapter 312, Laws of 2019 (E2SSB 5290);

(iv) Efforts to reform family reconciliation services; and

(v) Other state initiatives addressing the prevention of youth homelessness.

(b) The office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs must use the amounts provided in this subsection to contract with a community-based organization to support the involvement with the work group of young people and families with lived experience of housing instability, child welfare involvement, justice system involvement, or inpatient behavioral health involvement. The community-based organization must serve and be substantially governed by marginalized populations. The amounts provided in this subsection must supplement private funding to support the work group.

(32) $3,183,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,183,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to increase existing grantee contracts providing rental or housing subsidy and services for eligible tenants in housing and homeless programs. The department will work with stakeholders and grantees to increase current contracts and distribute funds to account for increases in housing and services costs across the state.

(33) $75,000,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to administer grant funding through the existing network of federal low-income home energy assistance program grantees to provide low-income households with an energy assessment that includes determining the household's need for clean cooling and heating system upgrades that improve safety and efficiency while meeting Washington's climate goals. If beneficial, households may be offered grant funding to cover the replacement of inefficient, outdated, or unsafe home heating and cooling systems with more energy efficient electric heating and cooling technologies, such as heat pumps. The department may utilize a portion of the funding provided within this subsection to create an electronic application system. Within the amounts provided, no more than 60 percent of the funding may be utilized by the department to target services to multifamily residential buildings across the state that experience high energy use, where a majority of the residents within the building are below 80 percent of the area median income and the community experiences high environmental health disparities. All households and multifamily residential buildings receiving grant funding to replace home heating and cooling systems must comply with contracting requirements outlined in RCW 70A.35.060. The department will incorporate this data in future energy assistance reports and may publish information on its website on the number of furnace or heating and cooling system replacements, including replacements within multifamily housing units.

(34) $55,000,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery account—federal appropriation and $55,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to continue grant funding for emergency housing and shelter capacity and associated supports such as street outreach, diversion services, short-term rental assistance, hotel and motel vouchers, housing search and placement, and housing stability case management. Entities eligible for grant funding include local governments and nonprofit entities. The department may use existing programs, such as the consolidated homelessness grant program, to award funding under this subsection. Grants provided under this subsection must be used to maintain or increase current emergency housing capacity, funded by the shelter program grant and other programs, as practicable due to increased costs of goods, services, and wages. Emergency housing includes transitional housing, congregate or noncongregate shelter, sanctioned encampments, or short-term hotel or motel stays.

(35)(a) $60,050,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $60,050,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a targeted grant program to transition persons residing in encampments to safer housing opportunities, with an emphasis on permanent housing solutions. No less than $105,000,000 of the amount provided must be used for housing services to persons residing on state-owned rights-of-way. Eligible grant recipients include local governments and nonprofit organizations operating to provide housing or services. The department may provide funding to state agencies to ensure individuals accessing housing services are also able to access other wrap-around services that enable them to obtain housing such as food, personal identification, and other related services. Local government and nonprofit grant recipients may use grant funding to provide outreach, housing, transportation, site monitoring, and other services needed to assist individuals residing on encampments and public rights-of-way with moving into housing.

(b) Grant criteria must include, but are not limited to:

(i) Whether a site where the grantee will conduct outreach and engagement has been identified as a location where individuals residing in encampments or on the public right-of-way are in specific circumstances or physical locations that expose them to especially or imminently unsafe conditions;

(ii) Local government readiness and capacity to enter into and fulfill the grant requirements as applicable; and

(iii) Other criteria as identified by the department.

(c) When awarding grants under (a) of this subsection, the department must prioritize applicants that focus on permanent housing solutions.

(d) Grant recipients under (a) of this subsection must enter into a memorandum of understanding with the department, and other state agencies if applicable, as a condition of receiving funds. Memoranda of understanding must specify the responsibilities of the grant recipients and the state agencies, and must include specific measurable outcomes for each entity signing the memorandum. The department must publish all signed memoranda on the department's website and must publish updates on outcomes for each memorandum at least every 90 days. At a minimum, outcomes must include:

(i) The number of people living in the encampment with whom the parties engage;

(ii) The demographics of those engaged;

(iii) The type and duration of engagement with individuals living within encampments;

(iv) The types of housing options that were offered;

(v) The number of individuals who accepted offered housing;

(vi) The types of assistance provided to move individuals into offered housing;

(vii) Any services and benefits in which an individual was successfully enrolled; and

(viii) The housing outcomes of individuals who were placed into housing six months and one year after placement.

(e) Grant recipients under (a) of this subsection may not transition individuals from encampments unless they in good faith offer individuals a housing option that is safer than their current living situation. The department must establish criteria regarding the safety, accessibility, and habitability of housing options to be offered by grant recipients to ensure that such options are a meaningful improvement over an individual's current living situation and that grant recipients provide options that are well-matched to an individual's assessed needs.

(f) Funding granted to eligible recipients under (a) of this subsection may not be used to supplant or replace existing funding provided for housing services.

(36) $252,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $229,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5198 (mobile home community sales). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(37) $1,694,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,694,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5561 (law enforcement community grants). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(38) $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5599 (protected health care/youth). Of this amount, $2,350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of homeless youth for prevention and protection programs to provide supportive care grants to organizations to address the needs of youth seeking protected health care services. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(39) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to the city of Monroe to continue existing pilot projects that enable the city to dispatch human services and social services staff in conjunction with law enforcement staff to support unhoused residents and residents in crisis.

(40) $2,850,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,850,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5114 (sex trafficking). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(41) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a contract with the international families justice coalition to expand private capacity to provide legal services for indigent foreign nationals in contested domestic relations and family law cases. Amounts provided in this section may not be expended for direct private legal representation of clients in domestic relations and family law cases.

(42)(a) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department to convene a work group to examine allowable expenses in human service provider contracts in Washington state's local and state contracting processes. The work group must:

(i) Assess if existing contracting structures at the state and local levels for human service providers are adequate for sustaining the human services sector;

(ii) Assess the viability of a lowest responsible bidder contracting structure for human service providers contracts at the state and local levels;

(iii) Facilitate discussion amongst interested parties; and

(iv) Develop recommendations for necessary changes in the law or rule.

(b) The department must, in consultation with the department of enterprise services, appoint a minimum of 12 members to the work group representing different stakeholder groups including, but not limited to:

(i) Organizations whose mission includes serving Black, indigenous, and communities of color;

(ii) State government agencies that manage human service contracts;

(iii) Associations representing human service provider organizations; and

(iv) Associations of city or county governments.

(c) The department must convene the first meeting of the work group by October 1, 2023. Members are not entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses if they are elected officials or are participating on behalf of an employer, governmental entity, or other organization. Any reimbursement for travel expenses for other nonlegislative members is subject to chapter 43.03 RCW, and may include stipends to individuals as provided in RCW 43.03.220.

(d) The department must submit a final report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024. The final report must include:

(i) An evaluation if existing funding structures at the state and local levels for human service provider contracts are creating hardship for human service providers; and

(ii) Recommendations for necessary changes in law or rule to address structural hardships in human services contracting.

(e) For purposes of this subsection "eligible individual" means an individual that is low income or has lived experience to support their participation in the work group when the agency determines such participation is desirable in order to implement the principles of equity described in RCW 43.06D.020, provided that the individuals are not otherwise compensated for their attendance at meetings.

(43) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to the city of Bellevue for one-time expenses required for the operation of an expanded community service center to help low-income individuals and immigrant and refugee community members. The center will join with community partners to provide utility rate and rent relief; health care access; energy assistance; food access; medical, legal and financial services; housing; childcare resources; employment assistance; and resources for starting a business.

(44) $215,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $345,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to produce a report to the legislature detailing the scope of work, cost estimates, and implementation timeline to create or procure an online registry of rental units in Washington state subject to state information system planning and oversight requirements. The online rental unit registry must have the capacity to collect and report out timely information on each rental unit in the state. Information to collect includes, but is not limited to, the rental unit's physical address, identity of the property owner, monthly rent charged, and vacancy status. The scope of work must assume integration with existing rental registries operated by local governments. Cost and timeline estimates must provide two alternatives with one assuming statewide implementation and the other assuming implementation in the six largest counties of the state. The department shall consult with landlord representatives, tenant representatives, local governments operating existing rental registries, and other interested stakeholders as part of the process of developing the scope of work and timeline for the online rental unit registry. The department must submit the report to the legislature by December 1, 2024.

(45) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for a Seattle based nonprofit to create a temporary space to allow youth and low-income populations to participate in ice rink related events during the 2024 national hockey league winter classic.

(46) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization based in Kitsap county that partners with the Bremerton and central Kitsap school districts, first responders, and other organizations to expand implementation of the handle with care program.

(47) $371,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $371,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for Pacific county to operate or participate in a drug task force to enhance coordination and intelligence while facilitating multijurisdictional criminal investigations.

(48) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for distribution to statewide and community asset building coalitions across Washington to support capacity in organizations that coordinate financial health services and outreach efforts around poverty reduction resources such as the earned income tax credit and the working families tax credit.

(49) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for a community based organization in Whatcom county to expand services to unhoused and low-income residents of Ferndale and north Whatcom county and to provide a safe parking program.

(50) $155,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to an organization in Pierce county experienced in providing peer-to-peer training, to develop and implement a program aimed at reducing workplace sexual harassment in the agricultural sector. Funding will be used to continue peer-to-peer trainings for farmworkers in Yakima county and expand services into Grant and Benton counties. Funding may also be used to support an established network of farmworker peer trainers whose primary purpose is to prevent workplace sexual harassment and assault through leadership and education. The organization is expected to share best practices from their peer-to-peer model at a statewide conference.

(51) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to a Seattle-based nonprofit that provides holistic services to help refugee and immigrant women. Funds must be used to expand an existing program that increases equity in ice skating and hockey by providing skate lessons to preschoolers from diverse and low-income families.

(52)(a) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to administer grants to strengthen family resource center services and increase capacity statewide. Grant funding may be used: For an organization to provide new services in order to meet the statutory requirements of a family resource center, as defined in RCW 43.216.010; to increase capacity or enhance service provision at current family resource centers, including but not limited to direct staffing and administrative costs; and to conduct data collection, evaluation, and quality improvement activities. The department may award an amount from $30,000 up to $200,000 per grant recipient.

(b) Eligible applicants for a grant under (a) of this subsection include current family resource centers, as defined in RCW 43.330.010, or organizations in the process of becoming qualified as family resource centers. Applicants must affirm their ability and willingness to serve all families requesting services in order to receive a grant. Applicants must currently be or agree to become a member of a statewide family resource center network during the grant award period in order to receive a grant. Applicants must provide proof of certification in the standards of quality for family strengthening and support developed by the national family support network for one member of the applicant's organizational leadership in order to receive a grant.

(c) In distributing grant funding, the department must, to the extent it is practicable, award 75 percent of funding to organizations located west of the crest of the Cascade mountains, and 25 percent of funding to organizations located east of the crest of the Cascade mountains.

(d) By July 1, 2025, grant recipients must submit a report to the department on the use of grant funding, including, but not limited to, progress in attaining status as a family resource center, if applicable; the number and type of services offered to families; demographic and income data for families served; and family post-service outcomes. By September 1, 2025, the department must submit a report to the Legislature on topics including, but not limited to, the grant application process; needs identified by family resource centers; and use of funds by grant recipients.

(e) Of the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection, $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to provide a grant to the statewide nonprofit organization that serves as the registered Washington state network member of the national family support network. The grant recipient may use the grant funding for costs including, but not limited to, outreach and engagement, data and evaluation, and providing training and development opportunities in support of family resource centers statewide.

(53) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for a grant to volunteers of America western Washington to stabilize newly arriving refugees from the 2021 Afghanistan conflict and the 2022 Ukraine conflict.

(54) $16,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $16,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department for grants to local governments for maintaining programs and investments which are primarily funded through document recording fees pursuant to RCW 36.22.178, 36.22.179, and 36.22.1791. In allocating grant funding to local jurisdictions, awards must be based on a formula, determined by the department, to ensure that grants are distributed equitably among cities and counties.

(55) $7,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $7,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a 15 percent increase to the value of the benefit provided to individuals receiving benefits through the essential needs and housing support program and related services in subsection (15) of this section.

(56) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the work group created in section 920 of this act to examine the impacts of government regulation on the cost of housing.

(57) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to expand a competitive grant program to evaluate and award grants to school districts to pilot increased identification of homeless students and the capacity to provide support, as established in chapter 157, Laws of 2016 (3SHB 1682).

(58) $12,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $12,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for sexual assault service programs administered by the office of crime victims advocacy.

(59) $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to programs operated by and for historically marginalized populations to support "by and for" culturally specific services for victims of domestic violence, sexual assault, and other crimes in historically marginalized populations. Marginalized populations can include, but are not limited to, organizations or groups composed along racial, ethnic, religious, sexual orientation, and gender lines.

(60) $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to programs developed to support the enhancement and development of additional services for tribal members, including programs to address needs of crime victims, including strategies which integrate services for multiple crime types.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 130. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE—LOCAL GOVERNMENT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$38,580,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$32,582,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$39,374,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$1,050,000

Climate Investment Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$40,000,000

Community Preservation and Development Authority

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$500,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$200,000

Growth Management Planning and Environmental Review

Fund—State Appropriation
. . . .
$5,681,000

Liquor Excise Tax Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$986,000

Liquor Revolving Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$6,827,000

Model Toxics Control Stormwater Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$100,000

Public Facilities Construction Loan Revolving

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,026,000

Public Works Assistance Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$7,267,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$174,173,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department shall administer its growth management act technical assistance and pass-through grants so that smaller cities and counties receive proportionately more assistance than larger cities or counties.

(2) $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely as pass-through funding to Walla Walla Community College for its water and environmental center.

(3) $6,827,000 of the liquor revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with the municipal research and services center of Washington.

(4) The department must develop a model ordinance for cities and counties to utilize for siting community based behavioral health facilities.

(5) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to produce the biennial report identifying a list of projects to address incompatible developments near military installations as provided in RCW 43.330.520.

(6) $100,000 of the model toxics control stormwater account—state appropriation is provided solely for planning work related to stormwater runoff at the aurora bridge and I-5 ship canal bridge. Planning work may include, but is not limited to, coordination with project partners, community engagement, conducting engineering studies, and staff support.

(7) $500,000 of the community preservation and development authority account—state/operating appropriation is provided solely for the operations of the Pioneer Square-International District community preservation and development authority established in RCW 43.167.060.

(8) $1,160,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,159,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the statewide broadband office established in RCW 43.330.532.

(9) $10,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $10,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department for grants for updating and implementing comprehensive plans and development regulations in order to implement the requirements of the growth management act.

(a) In allocating grant funding to local jurisdictions, awards must be based on a formula, determined by the department, to ensure that grants are distributed equitably among cities and counties. Grants will be used primarily to fund the review and update requirements for counties and cities required by RCW 36.70A.130. Funding provided on this formula basis shall cover additional county and city costs, if applicable, to implement chapter 254, Laws of 2021 (Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1220) and to implement Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5412 (land use permitting/local).

(b) Within the amounts not utilized under (a) of this subsection, the department shall establish a competitive grant program to implement requirements of the growth management act.

(10) $1,100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to contract with the municipal research and services center, in coordination with the Washington procurement technical assistance center, to provide training and technical assistance to local governments and contractors on public works contracting. Training topics may include utilization of supplemental bidding criteria, utilization of alternate public works, contracting, cost estimating, obtaining performance and payment bonds, and increasing participation of women-owned and minority-owned businesses.

(11) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for an affordable housing auditing program to monitor ongoing affordability of income-restricted units constructed with affordable housing incentives, including the multifamily tax exemption.

(12) $733,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $734,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5268 (public works procurement). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(13) $37,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5536 (controlled substances). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(14) $21,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $22,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5235 (accessory dwelling units). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(15) $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for a grant to the city of Battle Ground to contract for a study to explore feasible options to redesign their downtown corridor to emphasize pedestrian accessibility, improve safety, and highlight community amenities.

(16) $200,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for a grant to a Tacoma based automotive museum as businesses assistance to address COVID-19 pandemic impacts to revenues from decreased attendance and loss of other revenue generating opportunities.

(17) $120,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $115,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the transportation demand management program at the canyon park subarea in the city of Bothell.

(18) $134,000 of general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $135,000 of general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to the city of Tacoma for the operating costs of the hilltop community hub. The hilltop community fund shall support a distribution center to provide housing goods.

(19) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to the city of Ferndale for the purpose of implementing and improving a wayfinding system throughout the greater Ferndale market area.

(20)(a) $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a law enforcement technology grant program for the purpose of providing law enforcement with modern vehicle pursuit management technology including, but not limited to, global positioning system tracking equipment, automated license plate reading technology, aircraft, and nonarmed and nonarmored drone technology.

(b) Grants must be awarded to local law enforcement agencies based on locally developed proposals. The department shall establish policies for applications under this subsection in addition to criteria for evaluating and selecting grant recipients. A proposal must include a request for specific technology and a specific plan for the implementation, use, and effectiveness reporting of that technology.

(c) Before grants are awarded, each local law enforcement agency seeking to acquire vehicle pursuit technology must:

(i) Establish data-sharing and management policies including policies related to sharing data between law enforcement agencies and other third parties; and

(ii) Establish policies ensuring all personnel who operate the vehicle pursuit technology, or access the vehicle pursuit technology data, are trained to use that technology and are able to comply with the data-sharing and management policies prior to the operational use of the vehicle pursuit technology.

(21) $20,000,000 of the climate investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants to municipalities for implementing methane and other greenhouse gas capture techniques.

(22) $20,000,000 of the climate investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants to cities with climate action plans adopted under the growth management act. Priority must be given to projects that reduce total carbon footprint and to nontransportation projects.

(a) Of the amounts provided in this subsection (22), $500,000 of the climate investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide guidance by June 30, 2025, on best practices and actions that counties and cities may take to incorporate environmental justice into their comprehensive plans and development regulations that:

(i) Addresses how each mandatory element under the growth management act individually, and how the entirety of a comprehensive plan collectively, can incorporate environmental justice to reduce any cumulative or disparate environmental impacts faced by vulnerable populations or overburdened communities, and advance the equitable distribution of environmental benefits;

(ii) Describes how cities and counties should identify vulnerable populations and overburdened communities impacted by cumulative sources of pollution within the planning jurisdiction. The definitions of vulnerable populations and overburdened communities must be consistent with Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1181 (climate change/planning); and

(iii) Describes how cities and counties can equitably engage with vulnerable populations and overburdened communities in their jurisdiction and federally recognized Indian tribes, to increase public participation in the comprehensive planning process.

(b) The department's guidance may address additional best practices and actions related to regulations, including vulnerable populations and overburdened communities in decisions on siting and permitting, resource allocations, enforcement, and the monitoring and reporting of exposures to environmental health hazards that cities and counties may use to incorporate environmental justice into comprehensive plan, planning implementation, and development regulations.

(c) Of the amounts provided in this subsection (22), $5,000,000 of the climate investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide grants to jurisdictions that fully plan under the growth management act that choose to develop a stand-alone environmental justice element and grants to community-based organizations to support their ability to participate in the planning process in those jurisdictions.

(23) $5,464,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5290 (local permit review). Of the amount provided in this subsection, at least $5,000,000 is provided solely for grants to local governments. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(24) $315,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $221,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5466 (transit-oriented development). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(25) $490,000 of the public works assistance account—state appropriation is provided solely for the public works board to develop a data dashboard to map investments made by the public works board, the department of commerce, the department of health, the department of ecology, the department of transportation, the transportation improvement board, and by board partners to the system improvement team created in RCW 43.155.150.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 131. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE—OFFICE OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$21,114,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$18,742,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$8,069,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$1,230,000

Dedicated Cannabis Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2024)
. . . .
$3,444,000

Dedicated Cannabis Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2025)
. . . .
$3,549,000

Andy Hill Cancer Research Endowment Fund Match

Transfer Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$20,684,000

Community and Economic Development Fee Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$765,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$40,200,000

Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,786,000

Statewide Tourism Marketing Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$7,953,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$128,536,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $4,404,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $4,404,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for associate development organizations. During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the department shall consider an associate development organization's total resources when making contracting and fund allocation decisions, in addition to the schedule provided in RCW 43.330.086. The department must distribute the funding as follows:

(a) For associate development organizations serving urban counties, which are counties other than rural counties as defined in RCW 82.14.370, a locally matched allocation of up to $1.00 per capita, totaling no more than $300,000 per organization; and

(b) For associate development organizations in rural counties, as defined in RCW 82.14.370, a $1.00 per capita allocation with a base allocation of $75,000.

(2) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the northwest agriculture business center.

(3) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the regulatory roadmap program for the construction industry and to identify and coordinate with businesses in key industry sectors to develop additional regulatory roadmap tools.

(4) $1,070,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,070,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the small business export assistance program. The department must ensure that at least one employee is located outside the city of Seattle for purposes of assisting rural businesses with export strategies.

(5) $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to submit the necessary Washington state membership dues for the Pacific Northwest economic region.

(6) $1,808,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,808,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to identify and invest in strategic growth areas, support key sectors, and align existing economic development programs and priorities. The department must consider Washington's position as the most trade-dependent state when identifying priority investments. The department must engage states and provinces in the northwest as well as associate development organizations, small business development centers, chambers of commerce, ports, and other partners to leverage the funds provided. Sector leads established by the department must include the industries of: (a) Aerospace; (b) clean technology and renewable and nonrenewable energy; (c) wood products and other natural resource industries; (d) information and communication technology; (e) life sciences and global health; (f) maritime; (g) military and defense; and (h) creative industries. The department may establish these sector leads by hiring new staff, expanding the duties of current staff, or working with partner organizations and or other agencies to serve in the role of sector lead.

(7) $20,684,000 of the Andy Hill cancer research endowment fund match transfer account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Andy Hill cancer research endowment program. Amounts provided in this subsection may be used for grants and administration costs.

(8) $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to establish representation in key international markets that will provide the greatest opportunities for increased trade and investment for small businesses in the state of Washington. Prior to entering into any contract for representation, the department must consult with associate development organizations, ports, and other organizations and associations that represent small business, rural industries, and disadvantaged business enterprises, including the office of minority and women's business enterprises.

(9) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to assist people with limited incomes in urban areas of the state start and sustain small businesses. The grant recipient must be a nonprofit organization involving a network of microenterprise organizations and professionals to support micro entrepreneurship and access to economic development resources.

(10) $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a nonprofit organization whose sole purpose is to provide grants, capacity building, and technical assistance support to a network of microenterprise development organizations. The microenterprise development organizations will support rural and urban Black, indigenous and people of color owned businesses, veteran owned businesses, and limited resourced and other hard to serve businesses with five or fewer employees throughout the state with business training, technical assistance, and microloans.

(11) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to a business center that provides confidential, no-cost, one-on-one, client-centered assistance to small businesses to expand outreach in underserved communities, especially Black, indigenous, and people of color-owned businesses, providing targeted assistance where needed. Funding may also be used to collaborate the department, the Washington economic development association, and others to develop a more effective and efficient service delivery system for Washington's women and minority-owned small businesses.

(12) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to strengthen capacity of the keep Washington working act work group established in RCW 43.330.510.

(13) $877,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $878,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5096 (employee ownership). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(14) $409,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $411,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5269 (manufacturing). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(15) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department, in consultation with other agencies as necessary, to support activities related to cooperation with governmental and public agencies of the Republic of Finland, the Kingdom of Sweden, and the Kingdom of Norway. Eligible activities include, but are not limited to, cooperation in clean energy, clean technology, clean transportation, telecommunications, agriculture and wood science technology, general economic development, and other areas of mutual interest with Nordic nations and institutions.

(16) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a Bellingham based nonprofit that assists entrepreneurs to create, build, and grow businesses in northwest Washington to help establish a network of innovation centers for entrepreneurs and innovative small businesses between Seattle and the Canadian border.

(17)(a) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department to develop strategies for cooperation with governmental agencies of Vietnam, including higher education institutions, and organizations around the following:

(i) Trade and investment, including, but not limited to, the agriculture, information technology, food processing, manufacturing, and textile industries;

(ii) Combating climate change, including, but not limited to, cooperation on clean energy, clean transportation, and climate-smart agriculture; and

(iii) Academic and cultural exchange.

(b) By June 30, 2024, the department must provide a report on the use of funds in this subsection, any key metrics and deliverables, and any recommendations for further opportunities for collaboration.

(18) $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to provide an economic development grant to a nongovernmental organization established in Federal Way, in operation for at least 30 years, whose primary focus is the economic development of the greater Federal Way region, in order to provide assessment for the development of innovation campuses in identified economic corridors.

(19) $8,000,000 of the statewide tourism marketing account—state appropriation is provided solely for the statewide tourism marketing program and operation of the statewide tourism marketing authority pursuant to chapter 43.384 RCW.

(20) $13,200,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely to expand the small business resiliency network program. Program expansion activities may include:

(a) Providing funding for new or existing network partners to provide wraparound services and support to assist small business owners, including support in accessing financing; and

(b) Establishing a credit repair pilot program by contracting with community foundations and nonprofit credit unions with existing character-based lending programs to provide credit counseling and other services to build or improve credit for small businesses and entrepreneurs who are unable to access conventional lending.

(21) $7,000,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for a small business innovation and competitiveness fund program to spur small business recovery, startup, and growth, with a focus on initiatives that will serve BIPOC entrepreneurs and small businesses located in underserved, low-income, and rural areas.

(a) The department must competitively award grants to nonprofit organizations that work with or provide assistance to small businesses.

(b) Grant funding may be used for activities such as:

(i) Small business incubator programs;

(ii) Small business accelerator programs;

(iii) Local procurement initiatives;

(iv) Small business competitiveness programs focused on hiring and retention;

(v) Improvements and repairs to physical workplaces, including in response to public health guidelines or acts of vandalism; and

(vi) Other initiatives as determined by the department.

(c) The department may require applicants to provide a description of how proposed initiatives will benefit small businesses and entrepreneurs that are not members of the recipient organization, if applicable.

(d) The department may encourage, but may not require, a local one-to-one match of state funding awarded under the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 132. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE—ENERGY AND INNOVATION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$141,022,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$141,415,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$39,461,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$34,000

Building Code Council Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$13,000

Climate Commitment Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$175,650,000

Community and Economic Development Fee Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$160,000

Electric Vehicle Incentive Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$95,000,000

Low-Income Weatherization and Structural

Rehabilitation Assistance Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,399,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$594,154,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department is authorized to require an applicant to pay an application fee to cover the cost of reviewing the project and preparing an advisory opinion on whether a proposed electric generation project or conservation resource qualifies to meet mandatory conservation targets.

(2)(a) $95,000,000 of the electric vehicle incentive account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to implement programs and incentives that promote the purchase of or conversion to alternative fuel vehicles. The department must work with the interagency electric vehicle coordinating council to develop and implement alternative fuel vehicle programs and incentives.

(b) In developing and implementing programs and incentives under this subsection, the department must prioritize programs and incentives that:

(i) Will serve individuals living in an overburdened community, as defined in RCW 70A.02.010;

(ii) Will serve individuals who are in greatest need of this assistance in order to reduce the carbon emissions and other environmental impacts of their current mode of transportation in the overburdened community in which they live; and

(iii) Will serve low-income communities, communities with the greatest health disparities, and communities of color that are most likely to receive the greatest health benefits from the programs through a reduction in greenhouse gas emissions and other pollutants that will result in improved groundwater and stormwater quality, improved air quality, and reductions in noise pollution.

(3) $69,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $69,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the development of community electric vehicle charging infrastructure.

(a) Funding provided in this section must be used for projects that provide a benefit to the public through development, demonstration, and deployment of clean energy technologies that save energy and reduce energy costs, reduce harmful air emissions, or increase energy independence for the state.

(b) Projects that receive funding under this section must be implemented by, or include partners from, one or more of the following: Local governments, federally recognized tribal governments, or public and private electrical utilities that serve retail customers in the state.

(c) Grant funding must be used for level 2 or higher charging infrastructure and related costs including but not limited to construction and site improvements. Projects may include a robust public and private outreach plan that includes engaging with affected parties in conjunction with the new electric vehicle infrastructure.

(d) The department must prioritize funding for projects in the following order:

(i) Multifamily housing;

(ii) Publicly available charging at any location;

(iii) Schools and school districts;

(iv) State and local government buildings and office buildings;

(v) All other eligible projects.

(e) The department must coordinate with other electrification programs, including projects developed by the department of transportation, to determine the most effective distribution of the systems. The department must also collaborate with the interagency electric vehicle coordinating council established in RCW 43.392.030 to implement this subsection and must work to meet benchmarks established in chapter 182, Laws of 2022.

(4) $37,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $37,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to increase solar deployment and installation of battery storage in community buildings to enhance grid resiliency and provide backup power for critical needs, such as plug load and refrigeration for medication, during outages or to provide incentives to support electric utility demand response programs that include customer-sited solar and battery storage systems. Eligible uses of the amounts provided in this subsection include, but are not limited to, planning and predevelopment work with vulnerable, highly impacted, and rural communities. For the purposes of this subsection "community buildings" means K-12 schools, community colleges, community centers, recreation centers, libraries, tribal buildings, state and local government buildings, and other publicly owned infrastructure.

(5) $20,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $20,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant program to provide solar and battery storage community solar projects for public assistance organizations serving low-income communities. Eligible uses of the amounts provided in this subsection include, but are not limited to, planning and predevelopment work with vulnerable, highly impacted, and rural communities.

(a) Grants are not to exceed 100 percent of the cost of the project, taking into account any federal tax credits or other federal or nonfederal grants or incentives that the project is benefiting from.

(b) Priority must be given to projects sited on "preferred sites" such as rooftops, structures, existing impervious surfaces, landfills, brownfields, previously developed sites, irrigation canals and ponds, storm water collection ponds, industrial areas, dual-use solar projects that ensure ongoing agricultural operations, and other sites that do not displace critical habitat or productive farmland.

(c) For the purposes of this subsection "low-income" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 19.405.020 and "community solar project" means a solar energy system that: Has a direct current nameplate capacity that is greater than 12 kilowatts but no greater than 1,000 kilowatts; and has, at minimum, either two subscribers or one low-income service provider subscriber.

(d) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $550,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided to the department:

(i) Study the value of distributed generation and cost shifts among ratepayers associated with retail rate net metering in Washington state, and provide a report to the governor's office and appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024; and

(ii) Convene a work group focused on the future of net metering in Washington state, develop recommendations for successor net energy metering tariffs and rate schedules, and provide a report to the governor's office and appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2025.

(6) $10,000,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants to support port districts, counties, cities, towns, special purpose districts, and any other municipal corporations or quasi-municipal corporations to support siting and permitting of clean energy projects in the state. Eligible uses of grant funding provided in this section include supporting predevelopment work for sites intended for clean energy projects, land use studies, conducting or engaging in planning efforts such as planned actions and programmatic environmental impact statements, and staff to improve permit timeliness and certainty.

(7)(a) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to contract with the national academy of sciences or other similar independent research organization to conduct an analysis of new electricity generation, transmission, ancillary services, efficiency and storage sufficient to offset those presently provided by the lower Snake river dams, as well as identifying any impacts to grid reliability, consumer pricing, and carbon pollution resulting from proposed dam removal. The analysis should identify a detailed plan for a replacement portfolio that maintains the reliability and adequacy of the electric power system, is consistent with the state's statutory and regulatory requirements for clean electricity generation, and is supplementary to the resources that will be required to replace fossil fuels in the transportation, industry, and buildings sectors. The assessment will include quantitative analysis based on available data as well as qualitative input gathered from tribal and other governments, the Northwest power and conservation council, utilities, and other key stakeholders. The analysis must include the following:

(i) Expected trends for demand, generation, and cost through 2050, as well as the most recent analysis of future resource adequacy;

(ii) A resource portfolio approach in which a combination of generating resources, energy efficiency and demand response programs, transmission resources, and other programs and resources would be developed to replace the services otherwise provided by the lower Snake river dams;

(iii) Identification of generation and transmission siting options consistent with the overall replacement resource portfolio, in coordination with other state processes and requirements supporting the planning of clean energy and transmission siting;

(iv) An evaluation of alternatives for the ownership and operation of the replacement resource portfolio;

(v) Incorporation of any impacts and opportunities that might result from the renewal of the Columbia river treaty, revisions of the Bonneville power administration preference contracts, implementation of the western resource adequacy program (WRAP), and other changes in operation and governance of the regional electric power system;

(vi) Identification of revenue and payment structures sufficient to maintain reliable and affordable electricity supplies for ratepayers; and

(vii) Cost estimates for development and implementation of identified generation and transmission needs and options including planning, permitting, design, and construction, including relevant federal authorities.

(b) The department shall, to the extent determined practicable, support related analyses undertaken by the federal government as part of the Columbia river system operation stay of litigation agreed to in National Wildlife Federation et al. v. National Marine Fisheries Service et al. in October 2021.

(c) The department shall provide a status update to the energy and environment committees of the legislature and governor's office by December 31, 2024.

(8) $600,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5447 (alternative jet fuel). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(9)(a) $56,300,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department of commerce, in consultation with the department of health and the department of ecology, to develop a medium and heavy duty decarbonization incentive grant program. Funds shall be used to provide incentives to transition to zero-emissions medium and heavy duty vehicles, as well as funding for charging or fueling infrastructure to reduce emissions in overburdened communities, including communities surrounding ports, which are disproportionately impacted by air pollution. Eligible recipients include independent medium and heavy duty vehicle operators, ports, cities, counties, state agencies, or public transportation providers operating medium and heavy duty vehicles in overburdened communities.

(b) The department shall engage stakeholders and consult with the environmental justice council when developing the program. The program must include a requirement for greenhouse gas emissions reduction outcome measurements and must be consistent with the interagency electric vehicle coordinating council transportation electrification strategy recommendations on medium and heavy duty vehicles to the extent such recommendations are available. The department may use up to 10 percent of the amount provided to develop, implement, administer, and conduct public outreach and program evaluation.

(c) When funding for specific technologies, the department must enter into appropriate agreements to support the state's interest in advancing innovation solution to decarbonize while ensuring compliance with Article VIII, section 5 and Article XII, section 9 of the state Constitution.

(d) Within amounts provided in this subsection, $6,300,000 is provided solely to the northwest seaport alliance for a demonstration project to replace drayage trucks serving the ports of Tacoma and Seattle with zero emission class-8 trucks, including charging or fueling infrastructure. These grants must be provided to benefit vulnerable populations in overburdened communities as defined in RCW 70A.65.010, the climate commitment act.

(10) $10,000,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for a grant to the Puyallup tribe for port electrification.

(11) $39,000,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for large scale solar projects. $19,000,000 of the amount provided in this subsection is solely for the Yakama solar canal project.

(12) $1,000,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for a grant to the Yakama Nation for an advanced rail energy storage project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 133. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE—PROGRAM SUPPORT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$25,101,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$16,458,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$7,544,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$1,955,000

Dedicated Cannabis Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2024)
. . . .
$5,000

Dedicated Cannabis Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2025)
. . . .
$7,000

Affordable Housing for All Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$176,000

Building Code Council Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,000

Community and Economic Development Fee Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$222,000

Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$47,000

Energy Efficiency Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$20,000

Financial Fraud and Identity Theft Crimes

Investigation and Prosecution Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$47,000

Growth Management Planning and Environmental Review

Fund—State Appropriation
. . . .
$147,000

Home Security Fund Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,339,000

Lead Paint Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$27,000

Liquor Excise Tax Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$398,000

Liquor Revolving Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$17,000

Low-Income Weatherization and Structural

Rehabilitation Assistance Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$6,000

Public Facilities Construction Loan Revolving

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$305,000

Public Works Assistance Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,952,000

Statewide Tourism Marketing Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$81,000

Washington Housing Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$5,244,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$61,102,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants and associated technical assistance and administrative costs to foster collaborative partnerships that expand child care capacity in communities. Eligible applicants include nonprofit organizations, school districts, educational service districts, and local governments. These funds may be expended only after the approval of the director of the department of commerce and must be used to support planning and activities that help communities address the shortage of child care, prioritizing partnerships serving in whole or in part areas identified as child care access deserts. The department must submit a report to the legislature on the use of funds by June 30, 2025. The report shall include, but is not limited to:

(a) The number and location of organizations, school districts, educational service districts, and local governments receiving grants;

(b) The number of grants issued and their size; and

(c) Any information from grantee organizations on outcomes.

(2) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the work group created in section 918 of this act to examine fire service delivery.

(3)(a) $30,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department to produce a study of the retirement preparedness of Washington residents and the feasibility of establishing a portable individual retirement account savings program with automatic enrollment (auto-IRA) for private sector workers who do not have workplace retirement benefits. To conduct the study, the department shall enter into an agreement with a nonprofit, nonpartisan think tank and research center based in Washington, D.C. that is unaffiliated with any institution of higher education and with a mission to generate a foundation of facts that enriches the public dialog and supports sound decision making. This research center will be responsible for the production of the study to the department. The center shall not be reimbursed for costs nor shall it receive or retain any of the funds. With the advice and consent of the department, the center may select a research institution, entity, or individual located in Washington state with expertise and proficiency in demographic analysis, retirement systems, or retirement planning to collaborate with on this study. The appropriation may be used by the department to enter into a contract with this partner entity for the partner entity's contributions to the study. Any funds not provided to the partner entity or otherwise unused shall be returned.

(b) The study must analyze current state and federal programs and recent state and federal statutory and rule changes that encourage citizens to save for retirement by participating in retirement savings plans, including plans pursuant to sections 401(k), 403(b), 408, 408(a), 408(k), 408(p), and 457(b) of the internal revenue code. The scope of the analysis must include:

(i) An examination of potential retirement savings options for self-employed individuals, part-time employees, and full-time employees whose employers do not offer a retirement savings plan;

(ii) Estimates of the impact on the state budget from shortfalls in retirement savings or income, including on public budgets from taxpayer-financed elderly assistance programs and a loss of economic activity by seniors;

(iii) The level of interest by private sector Washington employers in participating in an auto-IRA program;

(iv) A determination of how prepared financial institutions will be to offer these plans in compliance with federal requirements on all new retirement plans going into effect in 2025;

(v) Findings that clarify the gaps in retirement savings services currently offered by financial institutions;

(vi) An examination of the impact of retirement savings on income and wealth inequality;

(vii) An estimate of the costs to start up an auto-IRA program, an estimate of the time for the program to reach self-sufficiency, and potential funding options;

(viii) The experience of other states that have implemented or are implementing a similar auto-IRA program for employers and employees, as well as program impacts on the market for retirement plan products and services;

(ix) An evaluation of the feasibility and benefits of interstate partnerships and cooperative agreements with similar auto-IRA programs established in other jurisdictions, including contracting with another state to use that state's auto-IRA program, partnering with one or more states to create a joint auto-IRA program, or forming a consortium with one or more other states in which certain aspects of each state's auto-IRA program are combined for administrative convenience and efficiency;

(x) An assessment of potential changes in enrollment in a joint auto-IRA program if potential participants are concurrently enrolled in the federal "saver's credit" program;

(xi) An assessment of how a range of individuals or communities view wealth, as well as ways to accumulate assets;

(xii) The appropriate state agency and potential structure for implementing an auto-IRA program; and

(xiii) Recommendations for statutory changes or appropriations for establishing an auto-IRA program.

(c) By December 15, 2023, the department must submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature in compliance with RCW 43.01.036 on the study findings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 134. FOR THE ECONOMIC AND REVENUE FORECAST COUNCIL

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$966,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$1,033,000

Lottery Administrative Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$50,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$2,049,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 135. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$19,885,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$21,250,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$35,324,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$1,499,000

Climate Investment Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$137,000

Climate Commitment Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$50,000,000

Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$68,000

Personnel Service Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$25,973,000

Higher Education Personnel Services Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,497,000

Statewide Information Technology System Development

Revolving Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$105,745,000

Office of Financial Management Central Service

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$29,333,000

Performance Audits of Government Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$108,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$100,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$290,919,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) The student achievement council and all institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.92.030 and eligible for state financial aid programs under chapters 28B.92 and 28B.118 RCW shall ensure that data needed to analyze and evaluate the effectiveness of state financial aid programs are promptly transmitted to the education data center so that it is available and easily accessible. The data to be reported must include but not be limited to:

(i) The number of Washington college grant and college bound recipients;

(ii) Persistence and completion rates of Washington college grant recipients and college bound recipients, disaggregated by institution of higher education;

(iii) Washington college grant recipients grade point averages; and

(iv) Washington college grant and college bound scholarship program costs.

(b) The student achievement council shall submit student unit record data for state financial aid program applicants and recipients to the education data center.

(2) $100,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to the office of financial management to implement career connected learning.

(3)(a) $105,607,000 of the information technology system development revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the one Washington enterprise resource planning statewide program phase 1A (agency financial reporting system replacement) and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(b) Of the amount provided in this subsection:

(i) $41,000,000 of the information technology system development revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for a technology pool in fiscal year 2024 to pay for phase 1A (agency financial reporting system replacement—core financials) state agency costs due to legacy system remediation work associated with impacted financial systems and interfaces. The office of financial management must manage the pool, authorize funds, track costs by agency by fiscal month, and report after each fiscal month close on the agency spending to the consolidated technology services agency so that the spending is included in the statewide dashboard actual spending;

(ii) $5,650,000 of the information technology system development revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for organizational change management;

(iii) $690,000 of the information technology system development revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for an interagency agreement in fiscal year 2024 with consolidated technology services for one dedicated information technology consultant and two dedicated system architect staff to be contracted from the office of the chief information officer. These staff will work with state agencies to ensure preparation and timely decommission of information technology systems that will no longer be necessary post implementation of phase 1A (agency financial reporting system replacement—core financials); and

(iv) $1,854,000 of the information technology system development revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for dedicated back office administrative support in fiscal year 2024. This includes resources for human resource staff, contract staff, information technology staff, and fiscal staff.

(c) The one Washington team must include at least the chair and ranking member of the technology committees and fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives in system demonstrations of at least these key deliverables:

(i) Demonstration of integration build, which must be completed by July 31, 2023; and

(ii) Demonstration of workday tenant, which must be completed by November 30, 2023.

(d) The one Washington solution and team must use an agile development model holding live demonstrations of functioning software, developed using incremental user research, held at the end of two-week sprints.

(e) The one Washington solution must be capable of being continually updated, as necessary.

(f) Beginning July 1, 2023, the office of financial management shall provide written quarterly reports, within 30 calendar days of the end of each fiscal quarter, to legislative fiscal committees and the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee to include how funding was spent compared to the budget spending plan for the prior quarter by fiscal month and what the ensuing quarter budget will be by fiscal month. All reporting must be separated by phase of one Washington subprojects. The written report must also include:

(i) A list of quantifiable deliverables accomplished and amount spent associated with each deliverable, by fiscal month;

(ii) A report on the contract full-time equivalent charged compared to the budget spending plan by month for each contracted vendor, to include interagency agreements with other state agencies, and what the ensuing contract equivalent budget spending plan assumes by fiscal month;

(iii) A report identifying each state agency that applied for and received technology pool resources, the staffing equivalent used, and the cost by fiscal month by agency compared to the budget spending plan by fiscal month;

(iv) A report on budget spending plan by fiscal month by phase compared to actual spending by fiscal month, and the projected spending plan by fiscal month for the ensuing quarter; and

(v) A report on current financial office performance metrics that at least 10 state agencies use, to include the monthly performance data, that began July 1, 2021.

(g) Prior to the expenditure of the amounts provided in this subsection, the director of the office of financial management must review and approve the spending in writing.

(4) $250,000 of the office of financial management central services account—state appropriation is provided solely for a dedicated information technology budget staff for the work associated with statewide information technology projects that at least are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act and are under the oversight of the office of the chief information officer. The staff will be responsible for providing a monthly financial report after each fiscal month close to fiscal staff of the senate ways and means and house appropriations committees to reflect at least:

(a) Fund balance of the information technology pool account after each fiscal month close;

(b) Amount by information technology project, differentiated if in the technology pool or the agency budget, of what funding has been approved to date and for the last fiscal month;

(c) Amount by agency of what funding has been approved to date and for the last fiscal month;

(d) Total amount approved to date, differentiated if in the technology pool or the agency budget, and for the last fiscal month;

(e) A projection for the information technology pool account by fiscal month through the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium close, and a calculation spent to date as a percentage of the total appropriation;

(f) A projection of each information technology project spending compared to budget spending plan by fiscal month through the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, and a calculation of amount spent to date as a percentage of total project cost; and

(g) A list of agencies and projects that have not yet applied for nor been approved for funding by the office of financial management.

(5) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 245, Laws of 2022 (state boards, etc./stipends).

(6) $137,000 of the climate investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the office of financial management to complete an analysis of laws regulating greenhouse gas emissions as required by RCW 70A.65.200(10).

(7)(a) $50,000,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for a competitive program for state agencies to apply for funding of projects that will conserve energy and lower carbon emissions from state run facilities. Priority will be made for those projects that provide the greatest change in greenhouse gas emissions.

(b) To be eligible for funds, a request letter signed by the affected agency director must be submitted to the office of financial management and the appropriate legislative fiscal committees. The request must include:

(i) A statement describing the energy and lower carbon emissions retrofit project work, outcomes, and the state owned building it impacts;

(ii) The estimated energy conservation the retrofit will result in by fiscal year, and when the energy savings are anticipated to first be realized; and

(iii) The estimated lower carbon emission level the retrofit will result in by fiscal year, and when the emissions are anticipated to first be reduced.

(c) The office of financial management must notify the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee and the fiscal committees of the legislature as funds are approved, including the approved funding level by agency by building and a copy of all the materials submitted in (b) of this subsection.

(d) The office of financial management must report quarterly, beginning October 1, 2023, on the funding approved by agency, by state owned building, and by type of retrofits that will be done and when, to the fiscal committees of the legislature.

(8) $366,000 of the office of financial management central services account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5512 (higher ed. financial reports). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(9) $54,000 of the office of financial management central services account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5082 (advisory votes). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(10) $298,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the office of financial management to convene a task force created in section 915 of this act to identify, plan, and make recommendations on the conversion of the Naselle youth camp property and facilities to an alternate use. Staff support for the task force must be provided by the office of financial management.

(11) The office of financial management shall convene a work group with the goal to improve the state salary survey and provide employees with a voice in the process. The work group will consist of five employees from the office and five representatives from employee labor organizations who will act as a coalition on behalf of all labor organizations representing state employees, and one chairperson appointed by the director of the office of financial management, to share information and identify concerns with the state salary survey and benchmark job descriptions. The work group will provide a report of identified concerns to the fiscal and state government committees of the legislature and the director of the office of financial management by December 31, 2023.

(12)(a) $410,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $615,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office to establish a difficult to discharge task force to oversee a pilot program and make recommendations about how to address challenges faced with discharging patients from acute care settings and postacute care capacity by July 1, 2023.

(b) The task force shall consist of six members, one from each of the following:

(i) The governor's office;

(ii) The health care authority;

(iii) The department of social and health services;

(iv) The Washington state hospital association;

(v) Harborview medical center; and

(vi) Postacute care provider organizations.

(c) In consultation with stakeholder groups, the governor's office will identify task force members.

(d) The task force shall provide recommendations to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature on topics including, but not limited to:

(i) Pilot program implementation and evaluation, and recommendations for statewide implementation;

(ii) Available funding mechanisms;

(iii) Postacute care and administrative day rates;

(iv) Managed care contracting; and

(v) Legal, regulatory, and administrative barriers to discharge.

(e) The task force shall consult with stakeholders with relevant expertise to inform recommendations, including the health care authority, the department of social and health services, hospitals, postacute care providers, and medicaid managed care organizations.

(f) The task force may assemble ad hoc subgroups of stakeholders as necessary to complete its work.

(g) The task force and its operations, including any associated ad hoc subgroups, shall be organized and facilitated by the University of Washington through October 31, 2023. Beginning November 1, 2023, the office shall identify a contractor to undertake the following responsibilities, with oversight from the task force:

(i) Organization and facilitation of the task force, including any associated subgroups;

(ii) Management of task force process to ensure deliverables, including report writing;

(iii) Oversight of the launch of a five-site, two-year pilot project based on a model created by Harborview medical center by November 1, 2023; and

(iv) Coordination of pilot implementation, associated reports, and deliverables.

(h) The task force shall provide recommendations to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature outlining its initial recommendations by November 1, 2023. A report outlining interim recommendations and findings shall be provided by July 1, 2024, and a final report shall be provided by July 1, 2025.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 136. FOR THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS

Administrative Hearings Revolving Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$71,073,000

Administrative Hearings Revolving Account—Local

Appropriation
. . . .
$12,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$71,085,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $597,000 of the administrative hearings revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5080 (cannabis social equity). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(2) $80,000 of the administrative hearings revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5225 (working conn. child care). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(3) $31,000 of the administrative hearings revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5236 (hospital staffing standards). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4) $36,000 of the administrative hearings revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5267 (railroad workers). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(5) $2,487,000 of the administrative hearings revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5272 (speed safety cameras). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(6) $61,000 of the administrative hearings revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5726 (prevailing wage/public works). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 137. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE LOTTERY

Lottery Administrative Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$32,518,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$32,518,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) No portion of this appropriation may be used for acquisition of gaming system capabilities that violate state law.

(2) Pursuant to RCW 67.70.040, the commission shall take such action necessary to reduce retail commissions to an average of 5.1 percent of sales.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 138. FOR THE COMMISSION ON HISPANIC AFFAIRS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$730,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$582,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,312,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 139. FOR THE COMMISSION ON AFRICAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$524,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$529,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,053,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 140. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS—OPERATIONS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$387,000

Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$112,709,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$113,096,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $34,491,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account—state appropriation is provided solely for pension system modernization, and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(2) $143,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5296 (military service credits). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(3) $1,172,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5538 (postretirement nursing). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 141. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$422,358,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$428,746,000

Climate Commitment Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,119,000

Timber Tax Distribution Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$8,024,000

Business License Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$19,594,000

Waste Reduction, Recycling, and Litter Control

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$183,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$127,000

Financial Services Regulation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$5,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$885,151,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,455,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,233,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 196, Laws of 2021 (capital gains tax).

(2) $250,091,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $260,632,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 195, Laws of 2021 (working families tax exempt.). Of the total amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) $15,091,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $12,632,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for administration of the working families tax exemption program; and

(b) $235,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $248,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for remittances under the working families tax exemption program.

(3) $1,200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $900,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to facilitate a tax structure work group as provided in section 914 of this act.

(4) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department to develop an implementation plan for an online searchable database of all taxes and tax rates in the state for each taxing district. A report summarizing options, estimated costs, and timelines to implement each option must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2024. The implementation plan must include an array of options, including low cost options that may change the scope of the database. However, each low cost option must still provide ease of public access to state and local tax information that is currently difficult for the public to collect and efficiently navigate.

(5) $19,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1303 (property tax administration). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(6) $54,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $11,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1764 (asphalt & agg. valuation). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(7) $169,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $72,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5001 (public facility districts). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(8) $2,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $12,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5030 (hog fuel/tax exemption). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(9) $4,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5045 (ADU rental/property tax). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(10) $463,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $21,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5096 (employee ownership). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(11) $63,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5144 (batteries/environment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(12) $31,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5166 (cooperative finance org. B&O). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(13) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5218 (complex rehab. products/tax). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(14) $244,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $132,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5258 (condos and townhouses). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(15) $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $22,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5277 (dairy, etc. tax preferences). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(16) $88,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $29,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5309 (petroleum transportation/tax). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(17) $231,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $51,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5334 (affordable housing funding). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(18) $1,119,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5447 (alternative jet fuel). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(19) $594,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $140,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5536 (controlled substances). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(20) $31,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5565 (tax and revenue laws). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(21) $35,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5614 (adult entertainment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(22) $51,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $31,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5634 (problem gambling). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(23) $63,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $9,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5663 (abandoned vehicle auctions). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(24) $243,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $21,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5689 (internet projects/tribes). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(25) $4,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5732 (property tax exemptions). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(26) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5748 (senior living meals/tax). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(27)(a) $336,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $317,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to research and analyze wealth taxes imposed in other countries and wealth tax legislation recently proposed by other states and the United States. At a minimum, the department must examine how existing and proposed wealth taxes are structured, compliance and administrative challenges of wealth taxes, best practices in the design and administration of wealth taxes, and potential data sources to aid the department in estimating the revenue impacts of future wealth tax proposals for this state or assisting the department in the administration of a wealth tax. As part of its examination and analysis, the department must seek to consult with relevant subject matter experts from within and outside of the United States.

(b) The department may contract with one or more institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 for assistance in carrying out its obligations under this subsection.

(c) The department must submit a status report to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature by January 1, 2024, and a final report to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature by November 1, 2024. The final report must include the department's findings.

(28) $4,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5302 (adult family homes/prop. tax). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 142. FOR THE BOARD OF TAX APPEALS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$2,757,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$2,754,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$5,511,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 143. FOR THE OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$2,896,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$2,899,000

Minority and Women's Business Enterprises Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$5,852,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$11,647,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The office of minority and women's business enterprises shall consult with the Washington state office of equity on the Washington state toolkit for equity in public spending.

(2) $540,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $529,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5268 (public works procurement). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(3) $151,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $151,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a policy analyst position.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 144. FOR THE INSURANCE COMMISSIONER

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$4,723,000

Insurance Commissioner's Regulatory Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$77,506,000

Insurance Commissioner's Fraud Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,042,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$86,271,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $52,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5242 (abortion cost sharing). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(2) $63,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5210 (annuity transactions). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(3) $72,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5036 (audio-only telemedicine). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4) $55,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5300 (behavioral health continuity). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(5) $19,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5189 (behavioral health support). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(6) $52,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5396 (breast exam cost sharing). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(7) $260,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5338 (essential health benefits). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(8) $1,206,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5066 (health care benefit managers). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(9) $9,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5729 (insulin cost-sharing cap). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(10) $272,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5581 (maternal support services). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(11) $237,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5319 (pet insurance). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(12) $25,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5720 (risk mitigation). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(13) $450,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for a comparative analysis of the state's commercial health plan and medicaid reimbursement rates for reproductive health care services, including all forms of birth control and methods of abortion. The commissioner may contract for all or a portion of the analysis required in this subsection.

(a) The commissioner shall obtain the following information for the period of 2019 through 2022 for both commercial health plans offered in Washington state and services provided by medicaid managed care organizations:

(i) Covered reproductive health care services, including contraception and associated services and methods of abortion;

(ii) The reimbursement methodologies used to pay for those services; and

(iii) Reimbursement rates for those services.

(b) The commissioner must submit an initial report of the information gathered in (a) of this subsection and include an analysis that compares the reimbursement methodologies and rates used by carriers for commercial health plans offered in Washington state to those used by medicaid managed care organizations. The initial report must be submitted to appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2023.

(c) The commissioner must annually update the information in (a) of this subsection, including a comparative analysis to identify trends or other changes from year to year. Subsequent reports are due each December 1st and it is the intent of the legislature that these reports will be provided through December 1, 2027, to conclude with the 2026 calendar year.

(14)(a) $250,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for the commissioner, in collaboration with the office of the attorney general to study:

(i) Regulatory approaches used by other states to address affordability of health insurance beyond traditional health plan rate review, other than those targeting prescription drug spending, including for each state reported on:

(A) The statutory and regulatory authority for the state's relevant affordability activities;

(B) A description of the activities and processes developed by the state; and

(C) Any available research or other findings related to the impact or outcomes of the state's affordability activities;

(ii) Regulatory approaches used by other states to address any anticompetitive impacts of horizontal consolidation and vertical integration in the health care marketplace to supplement federal antitrust law, including for each state reported on:

(A) The statutory and regulatory authority for the state's relevant antitrust and consumer protection activities;

(B) A description of the activities and processes developed by the state; and

(C) Any available research, case law, or other findings related to the impact or outcomes of the state's activities to encourage competition; and

(iii) Recent health care consolidation and vertical consolidation activity in Washington state, to the extent information is available and identifying any areas lacking relevant data.

(b) The commissioner may contract with a third party and consult with other state entities to conduct all or any portion of the study.

(c) The commissioner and the office of the attorney general shall submit a report to the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 2023, including:

(i) Findings from (a) of this subsection;

(ii) Recommended actions based on other states' approaches and their potential applicability to Washington state;

(iii) Recommended actions based on available Washington data, and any additional recommendations related to availability of relevant data for Washington; and

(iv) Additional related areas of study needed, if any.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 145. FOR THE STATE INVESTMENT BOARD

State Investment Board Expense Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$83,062,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$83,062,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $41,000 of the state investment board expense account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5084 (self-insured pensions/fund). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 146. FOR THE LIQUOR AND CANNABIS BOARD

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$2,365,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$835,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$3,187,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$75,000

Dedicated Cannabis Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2024)
. . . .
$16,581,000

Dedicated Cannabis Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2025)
. . . .
$16,188,000

Liquor Revolving Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$123,467,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$162,698,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The liquor and cannabis board may require electronic payment of the cannabis excise tax levied by RCW 69.50.535. The liquor and cannabis board may allow a waiver to the electronic payment requirement for good cause as provided by rule.

(2) Of the liquor revolving account—state appropriation, $35,278,000 is provided solely for the modernization of regulatory systems and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(3) $144,000 of the liquor revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5614 (adult entertainment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4) $1,526,000 of the liquor revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5448 (delivery of alcohol). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(5) $42,000 of the dedicated cannabis account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $42,000 of the dedicated cannabis account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5263 (psilocybin). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(6) $250,000 of the dedicated cannabis account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $159,000 of the dedicated cannabis account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5367 (products containing THC). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(7) $1,527,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,255,000 of the dedicated cannabis account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, and $1,463,000 of the dedicated cannabis account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5080 (cannabis social equity). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(8) $35,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the liquor and cannabis board to conduct an agency analysis of commercial tobacco and vaping enforcement actions from fiscal year 2018 through fiscal year 2022 involving youth under the age of 18. This analysis shall be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2023, and must include:

(a) The total number of such interactions by fiscal year;

(b) Information on the nature of those interactions;

(c) How many interactions convert to administrative violation notices (AVNs);

(d) How many of those interactions and AVNs convert to retailer education and violations; and

(e) Descriptions of training for liquor and cannabis board officers, and the number of officers trained on interacting with youth, particularly LGBTQ youth and youth of color.

(9) $4,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5365 (vapor and tobacco/minors). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 147. FOR THE UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$1,175,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$1,018,000

Public Service Revolving Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$64,752,000

Public Service Revolving Account—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$100,000

Pipeline Safety Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$3,704,000

Pipeline Safety Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$3,404,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$74,153,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Up to $800,000 of the public service revolving account—state appropriation in this section is for the utilities and transportation commission to supplement funds committed by a telecommunications company to expand rural broadband service on behalf of an eligible governmental entity. The amount in this subsection represents payments collected by the utilities and transportation commission pursuant to the Qwest performance assurance plan.

(2) $43,000 of the public service revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5165 (electric transm. planning). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(3) $157,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the commission to convene a stakeholder group to discuss the sufficiency of energy resources available to address the risk of rolling blackouts and potential inadequacy events, discuss how electrification laws and regulations may require new state policy for resource adequacy, and identify incentives to enhance and ensure resource adequacy. A report of the commission's findings and recommendations must be made to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2023.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 148. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$14,268,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$14,606,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$146,048,000

911 Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$54,306,000

Disaster Response Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$59,466,000

Disaster Response Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,184,618,000

Military Department Rent and Lease Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,009,000

Military Department Active State Service Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$400,000

Oil Spill Prevention Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,040,000

Worker and Community Right to Know Fund—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,042,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,477,803,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The military department shall submit a report to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees by February 1st and October 31st of each year detailing information on the disaster response account, including: (a) The amount and type of deposits into the account; (b) the current available fund balance as of the reporting date; and (c) the projected fund balance at the end of the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium based on current revenue and expenditure patterns.

(2) $40,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for homeland security, subject to the following conditions: Any communications equipment purchased by local jurisdictions or state agencies shall be consistent with standards set by the Washington state interoperability executive committee.

(3) $11,000,000 of the enhanced 911 account—state appropriation is provided solely for financial assistance to counties.

(4) $784,000 of the disaster response account—state appropriation is provided solely for fire suppression training, equipment, and supporting costs to national guard soldiers and airmen.

(5) $386,000 of the military department rental and lease account—state appropriation is provided solely for maintenance staff.

(6) $876,000 of the disaster response account—state appropriation is provided solely for a dedicated access and functional needs program manager, access and functional need services, and a dedicated tribal liaison to assist with disaster preparedness and response.

(7) $136,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $132,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5518 (cybersecurity). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 149. FOR THE PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$2,567,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$2,594,000

Personnel Service Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,778,000

Higher Education Personnel Services Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,623,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$11,562,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $71,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $28,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5238 (academic employee bargaining). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 150. FOR THE BOARD OF ACCOUNTANCY

Certified Public Accountants' Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,677,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$4,677,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 151. FOR THE BOARD FOR VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTERS

Volunteer Firefighters' and Reserve Officers'

Administrative Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$3,514,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$3,514,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $1,128,000 of the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative account—state appropriation is provided solely for a benefits management system, and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 152. FOR THE FORENSIC INVESTIGATION COUNCIL

Death Investigations Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$819,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$819,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) $250,000 of the death investigations account—state appropriation is provided solely for providing financial assistance to local jurisdictions in multiple death investigations. The forensic investigation council shall develop criteria for awarding these funds for multiple death investigations involving an unanticipated, extraordinary, and catastrophic event or those involving multiple jurisdictions.

(b) Of the amount provided in this subsection, $30,000 of the death investigations account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Adams county crime lab to investigate a double homicide that occurred in fiscal year 2021.

(2) $210,000 of the death investigations account—state appropriation is provided solely for providing financial assistance to local jurisdictions in identifying human remains.

(3) Within the amount appropriated in this section, the forensic investigation council may enter into an interagency agreement with the department of enterprise services for the department to provide services related to public records requests, to include responding to, or assisting the council in responding to, public disclosure requests received by the council.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 153. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$14,800,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$13,384,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$102,000

Building Code Council Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,165,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$30,451,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $7,254,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $7,250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the payment of facilities and services charges to include campus rent, parking, security, contracts, public and historic facilities, financial cost recovery, and capital projects surcharges allocable to the senate, house of representatives, statute law committee, legislative support services, and joint legislative systems committee. The department shall allocate charges attributable to these agencies among the affected revolving funds. The department shall maintain an interagency agreement with these agencies to establish performance standards, prioritization of preservation and capital improvement projects, and quality assurance provisions for the delivery of services under this subsection. The legislative agencies named in this subsection shall continue to have all of the same rights of occupancy and space use on the capitol campus as historically established.

(2) Before any agency may purchase a passenger motor vehicle as defined in RCW 43.19.560, the agency must have approval from the director of the department of enterprise services. Agencies that are exempted from the requirement are the Washington state patrol, Washington state department of transportation, and the department of natural resources.

(3) From the fee charged to master contract vendors, the department shall transfer to the office of minority and women's business enterprises in equal monthly installments $1,500,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $1,300,000 in fiscal year 2025.

(4) Within existing resources, the department, in collaboration with consolidated technology services, must provide a report to the governor and fiscal committees of the legislative by October 31 of each calendar year that reflects information technology contract information based on a contract snapshot from June 30 of that same calendar year, and must also include any contract that was active since July 1 of the previous calendar year. The department will coordinate to receive contract information for all contracts to include those where the department has delegated authority so that the report includes statewide contract information. The report must contain a list of all information technology contracts to include the agency name, contract number, vendor name, contract term start and end dates, contract dollar amount in total, and contract dollar amounts by state fiscal year. The report must also include, by contract, the contract spending projections by state fiscal year for each ensuing state fiscal year through the contract term, and note the type of service delivered. The list of contracts must be provided electronically in Excel and be sortable by all field requirements. The report must also include trend analytics on information technology contracts, and recommendations for reducing costs where possible.

(5) $654,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $654,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department, in collaboration with the state efficiency and environmental performance program, to implement the zero emission vehicle strategy.

(6) $2,671,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,671,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for zero emission electric vehicle supply equipment infrastructure at facilities to accommodate charging station installation. The electric vehicle charging equipment must allow for the collection of usage data and must be coordinated with the state efficiency and environmental performance program. The department must prioritize locations based on state efficiency and environmental performance location priorities, and at least where zero emission fleet vehicles are or are scheduled to be purchased. The department must report when and where the equipment was installed, usage data at each charging station, and the state agencies and facilities that benefit from the installation of the charging station to the fiscal committees of the legislature by June 30. The department shall collaborate with the interagency electric vehicle coordinating council to implement this subsection and must work to meet benchmarks established in chapter 182, Laws of 2022 (transportation resources).

(7) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5491 (residential building exits). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(8)(a) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the state building code council to implement a technical advisory group related to smoke control and smoke/fire dampers. The state building code council shall ensure the group includes but is not limited to representatives of the following:

(i) Appropriate local governments;

(ii) Building owners;

(iii) Fire marshals;

(iv) Companies who install, repair, or test smoke control systems and dampers;

(v) Labor unions; and

(vi) Engineers involved in smoke control system design.

(b) The technical advisory group will review the status of laws, codes, and rules related to smoke control and fire/smoke dampers including the implementation and enforcement of such laws, codes, and rules, and make recommendations, if any, for changes to the Revised Code Of Washington or Washington Administrative Code. A final report to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the governor is due June 30, 2024.

(c) Members are not entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses if they are elected officials or are participating on behalf of an employer, governmental entity, or other organization. Any reimbursement for members is subject to chapter 43.03 RCW.

(9) $640,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $640,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to fully fund the security operations center on capitol campus.

(10) $950,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for security enhancements to the governor's office lobby space and for security enhancement design for the remaining lobby and public spaces in the legislative building on the capitol campus. Enhancement designs must be provided to the senate committee on state government and elections and the house of representatives committee on state government and tribal relations no later than December 31, 2023.

(11) $162,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $162,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to waive rent fees and charges through June 30, 2025, for vendors who are blind business enterprise program licensees by the department of services for the blind and who lease space and operate food service businesses, inclusive of delis, cafeterias, and espresso stands, in state government buildings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 154. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$3,925,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$3,894,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,899,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$14,000

Climate Commitment Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$762,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$11,494,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $103,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $103,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for archaeological determinations and excavations of inadvertently discovered skeletal human remains, and removal and reinterment of such remains when necessary.

(2) $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Washington main street program.

(3) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the implementation of the black historic sites survey project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 155. FOR THE CONSOLIDATED TECHNOLOGY SERVICES AGENCY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$20,197,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$200,000

Consolidated Technology Services Revolving Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$136,746,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$157,143,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $12,642,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the office of the chief information officer. Of this amount:

(a) $2,000,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for experienced information technology project managers to provide critical support to agency IT projects that are under oversight from the office of the chief information officer. The staff or vendors will:

(i) Provide master level project management guidance to agency IT stakeholders;

(ii) Consider statewide best practices from the public and private sectors, independent review and analysis, vendor management, budget and timing quality assurance and other support of current or past IT projects in at least Washington state and share these with agency IT stakeholders and legislative fiscal staff at least twice annually and post these to the statewide IT dashboard; and

(iii) Provide independent recommendations to legislative fiscal committees by December of each calendar year on oversight of IT projects to include opportunities for accountability and performance metrics.

(b) $2,960,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the office of privacy and data protection.

(2) $16,925,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the office of cyber security.

(3) The consolidated technology services agency shall work with customer agencies using the Washington state electronic records vault (WASERV) to identify opportunities to:

(a) Reduce storage volumes and costs associated with vault records stored beyond the agencies' record retention schedules; and

(b) Assess a customized service charge as defined in chapter 304, Laws of 2017 for costs of using WASERV to prepare data compilations in response to public records requests.

(4)(a) In conjunction with the office of the chief information officer's prioritization of proposed information technology expenditures, agency budget requests for proposed information technology expenditures must include the following:

(i) The agency's priority ranking of each information technology request;

(ii) The estimated cost by fiscal year and by fund for the current biennium;

(iii) The estimated cost by fiscal year and by fund for the ensuing biennium;

(iv) The estimated total cost for the current and ensuing biennium;

(v) The total cost by fiscal year, by fund, and in total, of the information technology project since it began;

(vi) The estimated cost by fiscal year and by fund over all biennia through implementation and close out and into maintenance and operations;

(vii) The estimated cost by fiscal year and by fund for service level agreements once the project is implemented;

(viii) The estimated cost by fiscal year and by fund for agency staffing for maintenance and operations once the project is implemented; and

(ix) The expected fiscal year when the agency expects to complete the request.

(b) The office of the chief information officer and the office of financial management may request agencies to include additional information on proposed information technology expenditure requests.

(5) The consolidated technology services agency must not increase fees charged for existing services without prior approval by the office of financial management. The agency may develop fees to recover the actual cost of new infrastructure to support increased use of cloud technologies.

(6) Within existing resources, the agency must provide oversight of state procurement and contracting for information technology goods and services by the department of enterprise services.

(7) Within existing resources, the agency must host, administer, and support the state employee directory in an online format to provide public employee contact information.

(8) The health care authority, the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, the department of health, the department of corrections, and the department of children, youth, and families shall work together within existing resources to establish the health and human services enterprise coalition (the coalition). The coalition, led by the health care authority, must be a multi-organization collaborative that provides strategic direction and federal funding guidance for projects that have cross-organizational or enterprise impact, including information technology projects that affect organizations within the coalition. The office of the chief information officer shall maintain a statewide perspective when collaborating with the coalition to ensure that the development of projects identified in this report are planned for in a manner that ensures the efficient use of state resources and maximizes federal financial participation. The work of the coalition and any project identified as a coalition project is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(9) $4,526,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the creation and ongoing delivery of information technology services tailored to the needs of small agencies. The scope of services must include, at a minimum, full-service desktop support, service assistance, security, and consultation.

(10) $75,935,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the procurement and distribution of Microsoft 365 licenses which must include advanced security features and cloud-based private branch exchange capabilities for state agencies. The office must report annually to fiscal committees of the legislature each December 31, on the count and type of licenses distributed by consolidated technology services to each state agency. The report must also separately report on the count and type of Microsoft 365 licenses that state agencies have in addition to those that are distributed by consolidated technology services so that the total count, type of license, and cost is known for statewide Microsoft 365 licenses.

(11) The office of the chief information officer shall maintain an information technology project dashboard that, at minimum, provides updated information each fiscal month on the projects subject to section 701 of this act.

(a) The statewide information technology dashboard must include, at a minimum, the:

(i) Start date of the project;

(ii) End date of the project, when the project will close out and implementation will commence;

(iii) Term of the project in state fiscal years across all biennia to reflect the start of the project through the end of the project;

(iv) Total project cost from start date through the end date of the project in total dollars, and a subtotal of near general fund outlook;

(v) Near general fund outlook budget and actual spending in total dollars and by fiscal month for central service agencies that bill out project costs;

(vi) Start date of maintenance and operations;

(vii) Estimated annual state fiscal year cost of maintenance and operations after implementation and close out;

(viii) Actual spending by state fiscal year and in total for state fiscal years that have closed;

(ix) Date a feasibility study was completed or note if none has been completed to date;

(x) Monthly project status assessments on scope, schedule, budget, and overall by the:

(A) Office of the chief information officer;

(B) Quality assurance vendor, if applicable; and

(C) Agency project team;

(xi) Monthly quality assurance reports, if applicable;

(xii) Monthly office of the chief information officer status reports on budget, scope, schedule, and overall project status; and

(xiii) Historical project budget and expenditures through fiscal year 2023.

(b) The statewide dashboard must retain a roll up of the entire project cost, including all subprojects, that can display subproject detail. This includes coalition projects that are active. For projects that include multiple agencies or subprojects and roll up, the dashboard must display:

(i) A separate technology budget and investment plan for each impacted agency; and

(ii) A statewide project technology budget roll up that includes each affected agency at the subproject level.

(c) The office of the chief information officer may recommend additional elements to include but must have agreement with legislative fiscal committees and the office of financial management prior to including additional elements.

(d) The agency must ensure timely posting of project data on the statewide information technology dashboard for at least each project funded in the budget and those projects subject to the conditions of section 701 of this act to include, at a minimum, posting on the dashboard:

(i) The budget funded level by project for each project under oversight within 30 calendar days of the budget being signed into law;

(ii) The project historical expenditures through completed fiscal years by December 31; and

(iii) Whether each project has completed a feasibility study.

(e) The office of the chief information officer must post to the statewide dashboard a list of funding received by fiscal year by enacted session law, and how much was received citing chapter law as a list of funding provided by fiscal year.

(12) Within existing resources, consolidated technology services must collaborate with the department of enterprise services on the annual contract report that provides information technology contract information. Consolidated technology services will:

(a) Provide data to the department of enterprise services annually by September 1 of each year; and

(b) Provide analysis on contract information for all agencies comparing spending across state fiscal years by, at least, the contract spending towers.

(13) $8,666,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of the enterprise cloud computing program as outlined in the December 2020 Washington state cloud readiness report. Funding provided includes, but is not limited to, cloud service broker resources, cloud center of excellence, cloud management tools, a network assessment, cybersecurity governance, and a cloud security roadmap.

(14) $3,498,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of the recommendations of the cloud transition task force report to include:

(a) A cloud readiness program to help agencies plan and prepare for transitioning to cloud computing;

(b) A cloud retraining program to provide a coordinated approach to skills development and retraining; and

(c) Staffing to define career pathways and core competencies for the state's information technology workforce.

(15) $20,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department of corrections statewide electronic health records project, which must comply with the approved statewide electronic health records plan. The purpose of the plan is to implement a common technology solution to leverage shared business processes and data across the state in support of client services.

(a) The statewide electronic health records plan must include, but is not limited to, the following elements:

(i) A proposed governance model for the electronic health records solution;

(ii) An implementation plan for the technology solution from kickoff through five years maintenance and operations post implementation;

(iii) A technology budget to include estimated budget and resources needed to implement the electronic health records solution by agency and across the state, including fund sources and all technology budget element requirements as outlined in section 701(4) of this act;

(iv) A licensing plan in consultation with the department of enterprise services that seeks to utilize the state data center;

(v) A procurement approach, in consultation with the department of enterprise services;

(vi) A system that must be capable of being continually updated, as necessary;

(vii) A system that will use an agile development model holding live demonstrations of functioning software, developed using incremental user research, held at the end of every two-week sprint;

(viii) A system that will deploy usable functionality into production for users within 180 days from the date there is an executed procurement contract after a competitive request for proposal is closed;

(ix) A system that uses quantifiable deliverables that must include live, accessible demonstrations of software in development to program staff and end users at each sprint or at least monthly;

(x) A requirement that the agency implementing its electronic health record solution must invite the office and the agency comptrollers or their designee to sprint reviews;

(xi) A requirement that there is an annual independent audit of the system to evaluate compliance of the software solution vendor's performance standards and contractual requirements and technical code quality, and that it meets user needs;

(xii) A recommended program structure for implementing a statewide electronic health records solution;

(xiii) A list of individual state agency projects that will need to implement a statewide electronic health records solution and the readiness of each agency to successfully implement;

(xiv) The process for agencies to request funding from the consolidated technology services for their electronic health records projects. The submitted application must:

(A) Include at least a technology budget in compliance with the requirements of section 701(4) of this act that each agency budget office will assist with; and

(B) Be posted to the statewide information technology dashboard and meet all dashboard posting requirements as outlined in this subsection; and

(xv) The approval criteria for agencies to receive funds for their electronic health records project. The approval may not be given without an approved current technology budget, and the office must notify the fiscal committees of the legislature. The office may not approve funding for the project any earlier than 10 business days from the date of notification to the fiscal committees of the legislature.

(b) The plan described in (a) of this subsection:

(i) Must be submitted to the office of financial management, the chair and ranking member of the senate environment, energy, and information technology policy committee, the chairs and ranking members of the fiscal committees of the legislature, and the technology services board by July 1, 2023; and

(ii) Must be approved by the office of financial management and the technology services board established in RCW 43.105.285.

(c) $20,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the electronic health record project at the department of corrections in accordance with the approved statewide electronic health record plan requirements in (a) of this subsection. For the amount provided in this subsection (15):

(i) Funding may not be released until the office of financial management and the technology services board have approved the statewide electronic health record plan.

(ii) Funding may not cover any costs incurred by the department of corrections for services or project costs prior to the date of statewide electronic health record plan approval.

(iii) The department of corrections must submit their proposed electronic health records project and technology budget to the office of the chief information officer for approval.

(iv) When a funding request is approved, consolidated technology services will transfer the funds to the agency to execute their electronic health records project.

(16) $12,202,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the secure access Washington replacement project, which is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(17) $2,759,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the wa.gov website to resident portal project, which is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(18) $134,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5518 (cybersecurity). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(19) The office of the chief information officer must collaborate with the office of the secretary of state in the evaluation of the office of the secretary of state's information technology infrastructure and applications in determining the appropriate candidates for the location of data and the systems that could be exempt from consolidated technology services oversight.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 156. FOR THE BOARD OF REGISTRATION OF PROFESSIONAL ENGINEERS AND LAND SURVEYORS

Professional Engineers' Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,562,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$4,562,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 157. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE LEADERSHIP BOARD

Washington State Leadership Board Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,385,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,385,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $900,000 of the Washington state leadership board account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementing programming in RCW 43.15.030, and specifically the Washington world fellows program, sports mentoring program/boundless Washington, compassion scholars, and the Washington state leadership awards.

(End of part)

PART II

HUMAN SERVICES

NEW SECTION. Sec. 201. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

(1) The appropriations to the department of social and health services in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. Appropriations made in this act to the department of social and health services shall initially be allotted as required by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not include transfers of moneys between sections of this act except as expressly provided in this act, nor shall allotment modifications permit moneys that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for other than that purpose.

(2) The department of social and health services shall not initiate any services that require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation providing appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.

(3) The legislature finds that medicaid payment rates, as calculated by the department pursuant to the appropriations in this act, bear a reasonable relationship to the costs incurred by efficiently and economically operated facilities for providing quality services and will be sufficient to enlist enough providers so that care and services are available to the extent that such care and services are available to the general population in the geographic area. The legislature finds that cost reports, payment data from the federal government, historical utilization, economic data, and clinical input constitute reliable data upon which to determine the payment rates.

(4) The department shall to the maximum extent practicable use the same system for delivery of spoken-language interpreter services for social services appointments as the one established for medical appointments in the health care authority. When contracting directly with an individual to deliver spoken language interpreter services, the department shall only contract with language access providers who are working at a location in the state and who are state-certified or state-authorized, except that when such a provider is not available, the department may use a language access provider who meets other certifications or standards deemed to meet state standards, including interpreters in other states.

(5) Information technology projects or investments and proposed projects or investments impacting time capture, payroll and payment processes and systems, eligibility, case management, and authorization systems within the department of social and health services are subject to technical oversight by the office of the chief information officer.

(6)(a) The department shall facilitate enrollment under the medicaid expansion for clients applying for or receiving state funded services from the department and its contractors. Prior to open enrollment, the department shall coordinate with the health care authority to provide referrals to the Washington health benefit exchange for clients that will be ineligible for medicaid.

(b) To facilitate a single point of entry across public and medical assistance programs, and to maximize the use of federal funding, the health care authority, the department of social and health services, and the health benefit exchange will coordinate efforts to expand HealthPlanfinder access to public assistance and medical eligibility staff. The department shall complete medicaid applications in the HealthPlanfinder for households receiving or applying for public assistance benefits.

(7) The health care authority, the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, the department of health, the department of corrections, and the department of children, youth, and families shall work together within existing resources to establish the health and human services enterprise coalition (the coalition). The coalition, led by the health care authority, must be a multi-organization collaborative that provides strategic direction and federal funding guidance for projects that have cross-organizational or enterprise impact, including information technology projects that affect organizations within the coalition. The office of the chief information officer shall maintain a statewide perspective when collaborating with the coalition to ensure that projects are planned for in a manner that ensures the efficient use of state resources, support the adoption of a cohesive technology and data architecture, and maximize federal financial participation. The work of the coalition is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—MENTAL HEALTH PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$611,314,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$668,546,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$148,301,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$10,732,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,438,893,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The state psychiatric hospitals and residential treatment facilities may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods, services, and supplies through hospital group purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.

(2) $311,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $311,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the salaries, benefits, supplies, and equipment for one full-time investigator, one full-time police officer, and one full-time community services officer for policing efforts at western state hospital. The department must collect data from the city of Lakewood on the use of the funds and the number of calls responded to by the community policing program and submit a report with this information to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature each December of the fiscal biennium.

(3) $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for payment to the city of Lakewood for police services provided by the city at western state hospital and adjacent areas.

(4) $311,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $311,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the salaries, benefits, supplies, and equipment for one full-time investigator, one full-time police officer, and one full-time community services officer for policing efforts at eastern state hospital. The department must collect data from the city of Medical Lake on the use of the funds and the number of calls responded to by the community policing program and submit a report with this information to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature each December of the fiscal biennium.

(5) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for payment to the city of Medical Lake for police services provided by the city at eastern state hospital and adjacent areas.

(6) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department, in collaboration with the health care authority, to develop and implement a predictive modeling tool which identifies clients who are at high risk of future involvement with the criminal justice system and for developing a model to estimate demand for civil and forensic state hospital bed needs pursuant to the following requirements.

(a) By the first day of each December during the fiscal biennium, the department, in coordination with the health care authority, must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature that summarizes how the predictive modeling tool has been implemented and includes the following: (i) The number of individuals identified by the tool as having a high risk of future criminal justice involvement; (ii) the method and frequency for which the department is providing lists of high-risk clients to contracted managed care organizations and behavioral health administrative services organizations; (iii) a summary of how the managed care organizations and behavioral health administrative services organizations are utilizing the data to improve the coordination of care for the identified individuals; and (iv) a summary of the administrative data to identify whether implementation of the tool is resulting in increased access and service levels and lower recidivism rates for high-risk clients at the state and regional level.

(b) The department must provide staff support for the forensic and long-term civil commitment bed forecast which must be conducted under the direction of the office of financial management. The forecast methodology, updates, and methodology changes must be conducted in coordination with staff from the department, the health care authority, the office of financial management, and the appropriate fiscal committees of the state legislature. The model shall incorporate factors for capacity in state hospitals as well as contracted facilities, which provide similar levels of care, referral patterns, wait lists, lengths of stay, and other factors identified as appropriate for estimating the number of beds needed to meet the demand for civil and forensic state hospital services. Factors should include identification of need for the services and analysis of the effect of community investments in behavioral health services and other types of beds that may reduce the need for long-term civil commitment needs. The forecast must be updated each February, June, and November during the fiscal biennium and the department must submit a report to the legislature and the appropriate committees of the legislature summarizing the updated forecast based on the caseload forecast council's schedule for entitlement program forecasts.

(7) $9,119,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $9,145,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the phase-in of the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States District Court for the Western District of Washington, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP. The department, in collaboration with the health care authority and the criminal justice training commission, must implement the provisions of the settlement agreement pursuant to the timeline and implementation plan provided for under the settlement agreement. This includes implementing provisions related to competency evaluations, competency restoration, forensic navigators, crisis diversion and supports, education and training, and workforce development.

(8) $7,147,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $7,147,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to maintain implementation of efforts to improve the timeliness of competency evaluation services for individuals who are in local jails pursuant to chapter 5, Laws of 2015 (timeliness of competency treatment and evaluation services). This funding must be used solely to maintain increases in the number of competency evaluators that began in fiscal year 2016 pursuant to the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States District Court for the Western District of Washington, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP.

(9) $71,690,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $77,825,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of efforts to improve the timeliness of competency restoration services pursuant to chapter 5, Laws of 2015 (timeliness of competency treatment and evaluation services) and the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States District Court for the Western District of Washington, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP. These amounts must be used to maintain increases that were implemented between fiscal year 2016 and fiscal year 2021, and further increase the number of forensic beds at western state hospital during the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium. Pursuant to chapter 7, Laws of 2015 1st sp. sess. (timeliness of competency treatment and evaluation services), the department may contract some of these amounts for services at alternative locations if the secretary determines that there is a need.

(10) $85,843,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $73,994,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $891,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to continue to implement an acuity based staffing tool at western state hospital and eastern state hospital in collaboration with the hospital staffing committees. The staffing tool must be used to identify, on a daily basis, the clinical acuity on each patient ward and determine the minimum level of direct care staff by profession to be deployed to meet the needs of the patients on each ward. The department must evaluate interrater reliability of the tool within each hospital and between the two hospitals. The department must also continue to update, in collaboration with the office of financial management's labor relations office, the staffing committees, and state labor unions, an overall state hospital staffing plan that looks at all positions and functions of the facilities.

(a) Within the amounts provided in this section, the department must establish, monitor, track, and report monthly staffing and expenditures at the state hospitals, including overtime and use of locums, to the functional categories identified in the recommended staffing plan. The allotments and tracking of staffing and expenditures must include all areas of the state hospitals, must be done at the ward level, and must include contracted facilities providing forensic restoration services as well as the office of forensic mental health services.

(b) By December 1, 2023, and December 1, 2024, the department must submit reports to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature that provide a comparison of monthly spending, staffing levels, overtime, and use of locums for the prior year compared to allotments and to the recommended state hospital staffing model. The format for these reports must be developed in consultation with staff from the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature. The reports must include a summary of the results of the evaluation of the interrater reliability in use of the staffing acuity tool and an update from the hospital staffing committees.

(c) Monthly staffing levels and related expenditures at the state hospitals must not exceed official allotments without prior written approval from the director of the office of financial management. In the event the director of the office of financial management approves an increase in monthly staffing levels and expenditures beyond what is budgeted, notice must be provided to the appropriate committees of the legislature within 30 days of such approval. The notice must identify the reason for the authorization to exceed budgeted staffing levels and the time frame for the authorization. Extensions of authorizations under this subsection must also be submitted to the director of the office of financial management for written approval in advance of the expiration of an authorization. The office of financial management must notify the appropriate committees of the legislature of any extensions of authorizations granted under this subsection within 30 days of granting such authorizations and identify the reason and time frame for the extension.

(11) $9,007,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $8,611,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $924,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to establish a violence reduction team at western state hospital to improve patient and staff safety at eastern and western state hospitals. A report must be submitted by December 1, 2023, and December 1, 2024, which includes a description of the violence reduction or safety strategy, a profile of the types of patients being served, the staffing model being used, and outcomes associated with each strategy. The outcomes section should include tracking data on facility-wide metrics related to patient and staff safety as well as individual outcomes related to the patients served.

(12) $2,593,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,593,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to increase services to patients found not guilty by reason of insanity under the Ross v. Lashway settlement agreement.

(13) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the department must develop and submit an annual state hospital performance report for eastern and western state hospitals. Each measure included in the performance report must include baseline performance data, agency performance targets, and performance for the most recent fiscal year. The performance report must include a one page dashboard as well as charts for each fiscal year and quality of care measure broken out by hospital and including but not limited to: (a) Monthly FTE expenditures compared to allotments; (b) monthly dollar expenditures compared to allotments; (c) monthly FTE expenditures per thousand patient bed days; (d) monthly dollar expenditures per thousand patient bed days; (e) percentage of FTE expenditures for overtime; (f) average length of stay by category of patient; (g) average monthly civil wait list; (h) average monthly forensic wait list; (i) rate of staff assaults per thousand patient bed days; (j) rate of patient assaults per thousand patient bed days; (k) average number of days to release after a patient has been determined to be clinically ready for discharge; and (l) average monthly vacancy rates for key clinical positions. The department must submit the state hospital performance report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by the first day of each December of the biennium.

(14) $546,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $566,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for design and planning activities for the new forensic hospital being constructed on the grounds of western state hospital.

(15) $796,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $678,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to establish a forensic competency evaluation pilot at the King county correctional facility to provide on-site competency evaluations to class members of the Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al. settlement agreement.

(16) $10,364,000 of the general fund state—appropriation for fiscal year 2024 are provided solely for the department to contract with the south correctional entity for the provision of behavioral health services to class members of the Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al. settlement agreement who are waiting in jail for admission for in-patient services.

(17) $2,619,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $5,027,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to hire additional forensic evaluators to provide in-jail competency evaluations and community-based evaluations.

(18) $494,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $482,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to provide additional neuropsychologic assessments for patients at western state hospital and eastern state hospital.

(19) $10,547,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $37,221,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to operate the 48 bed Clark county facility to provide long-term inpatient care beds as defined in RCW 71.24.025. The department must use this facility to provide treatment services for individuals who have been committed to a state hospital pursuant to the dismissal of criminal charges and civil evaluation ordered under RCW 10.77.086 or 10.77.088. The department must continue to develop a protocol to assess the risk of patients being considered for placement in this facility and determine whether the level of security and treatment services is appropriate to meet the patient's needs and implement it upon completion. The department must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2023, providing detail on the final version of the protocol.

(20) $8,048,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $7,677,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to operate a 30 bed ward for civil patients at western state hospital.

(21) $21,750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $12,142,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to operate 76 beds at the maple lane campus to provide long-term inpatient care beds as defined in RCW 71.24.025. The facility must have the capacity to provide treatment services to individuals committed under chapter 71.05 RCW, including individuals who have been committed to a state hospital pursuant to the dismissal of criminal charges and a civil evaluation ordered under RCW 10.77.086 or 10.77.088 and to individuals who have been acquitted of a crime by reason of insanity and subsequently ordered to receive treatment services under RCW 10.77.120.

(22) $10,581,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $39,580,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to operate 64 beds at the maple lane campus to provide long-term inpatient care beds as defined in RCW 71.24.025. The facility must have the capacity to provide treatment services to individuals committed under chapter 71.05 RCW. The department must develop and implement a protocol to assess the risk of patients being considered for placement in this facility and determine whether the level of security and treatment services is appropriate to meet the patient's needs. The department must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024, providing a description of the protocol and a status update on progress toward opening the new facility.

(23) $272,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $267,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $40,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5438 (supportive relationships). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(24) $2,100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,362,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5440 (competency evaluations). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(25) $2,233,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $4,118,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $297,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to address delays in patient discharge as provided in this subsection.

(a) The department shall hire staff dedicated to discharge reviews, including psychologists to complete reviews and staff for additional discharge review work, including, but not limited to, scheduling, planning, and providing transportation; and establish and implement a sex offense and problematic behavior program as part of the sex offense review and referral team program.

(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $504,000 per year shall be used for bed fees for patients who are not guilty by reason of insanity.

(c) The department shall track data as it relates to this subsection and, where available, compare it to historical data. The department will provide a report to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature. A preliminary report is due by December 1, 2023, and the final report is due by September 15, 2024, and at a minimum must include the:

(i) Volume of patients discharged;

(ii) Volume of patients in a sex offense or problematic behavior program;

(iii) Number of beds held for not guilty by reason of insanity patients;

(iv) Average and median duration to complete discharges;

(v) Staffing as it relates to this subsection; and

(vi) Average discharge evaluation caseload.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES PROGRAM

(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$1,124,090,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$1,168,006,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,380,412,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$4,058,000

Developmental Disabilities Community Services

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$32,120,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$4,708,686,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) Individuals receiving services as supplemental security income (SSI) state supplemental payments may not become eligible for medical assistance under RCW 74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state supplemental payments.

(b) In accordance with RCW 18.51.050, 18.20.050, 70.128.060, and 43.135.055, the department is authorized to increase nursing facility, assisted living facility, and adult family home fees as necessary to fully support the actual costs of conducting the licensure, inspection, and regulatory programs. The license fees may not exceed the department's annual licensing and oversight activity costs and shall include the department's cost of paying providers for the amount of the license fee attributed to medicaid clients.

(i) The current annual renewal license fee for adult family homes is $225 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2024 and $225 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2025. A processing fee of $2,750 must be charged to each adult family home when the home is initially licensed. This fee is nonrefundable. A processing fee of $700 must be charged when adult family home providers file a change of ownership application.

(ii) The current annual renewal license fee for assisted living facilities is $116 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2024 and $116 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2025.

(iii) The current annual renewal license fee for nursing facilities is $359 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2024 and $359 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2025.

(c) $30,970,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $50,745,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $102,677,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the rate increase for the new consumer-directed employer contracted individual providers as set by the consumer-directed employer rate setting board in accordance with RCW 74.39A.530.

(d) $5,095,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $7,299,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $16,042,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the homecare agency parity consistent with the rate set by the consumer-directed employer rate setting board in accordance with RCW 74.39A.530.

(e) $1,099,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,171,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $5,515,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for administrative costs of the consumer-directed employer as set by the consumer-directed employer rate setting board in accordance with RCW 74.39A.530.

(f) $328,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $444,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $998,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase the administrative rate for home care agencies by 56 cents per hour effective July 1, 2023.

(g) $9,371,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $10,798,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $25,267,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of an agreement reached between the governor and the adult family home council under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, as provided in section 907 of this act.

(h) The department may authorize a one-time waiver of all or any portion of the licensing and processing fees required under RCW 70.128.060 in any case in which the department determines that an adult family home is being relicensed because of exceptional circumstances, such as death or incapacity of a provider, and that to require the full payment of the licensing and processing fees would present a hardship to the applicant. In these situations the department is also granted the authority to waive the required residential administrator training for a period of 120 days if necessary to ensure continuity of care during the relicensing process.

(i) Community residential cost reports that are submitted by or on behalf of contracted agency providers are required to include information about agency staffing including health insurance, wages, number of positions, and turnover.

(j) Sufficient appropriations are provided to continue community alternative placement beds that prioritize the transition of clients who are ready for discharge from the state psychiatric hospitals, but who have additional long-term care or developmental disability needs.

(i) Community alternative placement beds include enhanced service facility beds, adult family home beds, skilled nursing facility beds, shared supportive housing beds, state operated living alternative beds, and assisted living facility beds.

(ii) Each client must receive an individualized assessment prior to leaving one of the state psychiatric hospitals. The individualized assessment must identify and authorize personal care, nursing care, behavioral health stabilization, physical therapy, or other necessary services to meet the unique needs of each client. It is the expectation that, in most cases, staffing ratios in all community alternative placement options described in (h)(i) of this subsection will need to increase to meet the needs of clients leaving the state psychiatric hospitals. If specialized training is necessary to meet the needs of a client before he or she enters a community placement, then the person centered service plan must also identify and authorize this training.

(iii) When reviewing placement options, the department must consider the safety of other residents, as well as the safety of staff, in a facility. An initial evaluation of each placement, including any documented safety concerns, must occur within thirty days of a client leaving one of the state psychiatric hospitals and entering one of the community placement options described in (h)(i) of this subsection. At a minimum, the department must perform two additional evaluations of each placement during the first year that a client has lived in the facility.

(iv) In developing bed capacity, the department shall consider the complex needs of individuals waiting for discharge from the state psychiatric hospitals.

(k) Sufficient appropriations are provided for discharge case managers stationed at the state psychiatric hospitals. Discharge case managers will transition clients ready for hospital discharge into less restrictive alternative community placements. The transition of clients ready for discharge will free up bed capacity at the state psychiatric hospitals.

(l) $238,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $238,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $481,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase the residential personal needs allowance.

(m) The annual certification renewal fee for community residential service businesses is $859 per client in fiscal year 2024 and $859 per client in fiscal year 2025. The annual certification renewal fee may not exceed the department's annual licensing and oversight activity costs.

(n) $2,648,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,631,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $2,293,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for enhanced respite beds across the state for children. These services are intended to provide families and caregivers with a break in caregiving, the opportunity for behavioral stabilization of the child, and the ability to partner with the state in the development of an individualized service plan that allows the child to remain in his or her home. The department must provide the legislature with a respite utilization report in January of each year that provides information about the number of children who have used enhanced respite in the preceding year, as well as the location and number of days per month that each respite bed was occupied.

(o) $2,173,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,154,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for 13 community respite beds across the state for adults. These services are intended to provide families and caregivers with a break in caregiving and the opportunity for stabilization of the individual in a community-based setting as an alternative to using a residential habilitation center to provide planned or emergent respite. The department must provide the legislature with a respite utilization report by January of each year that provides information about the number of individuals who have used community respite in the preceding year, as well as the location and number of days per month that each respite bed was occupied.

(p) $144,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $181,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for funding the unfair labor practice settlement in the case of Adult Family Home Council v Office of Financial Management, PERC case no. 135737-U-22. If the settlement agreement is not reached by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(q) $373,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $411,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $998,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a rate adjustment for assisted living providers.

(r) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding to implement chapter 220, Laws of 2020 (adult family homes/8 beds). A nonrefundable fee of $485 shall be charged for each application to increase bed capacity at an adult family home to seven or eight beds.

(s) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding to provide access to the individual and family services waiver and the basic plus waiver to those individuals on the service request list as forecasted by the caseload forecast council. For subsequent policy level budgets, the department shall submit a request for funding associated with individuals requesting to receive the individual and family services waiver and the basic plus waiver in accordance with the courtesy forecasts provided by the caseload forecast council.

(t) $1,729,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,669,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $4,206,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to operate intensive habilitation services and enhanced out-of-home services facilities.

(u) $1,339,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,363,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $2,116,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for additional staff to reduce the timeline for completion of financial eligibility determinations. No later than December 31, 2024, the department of social and health services shall submit a final report to the appropriate committees of the legislature that details how the funds were utilized and the associated outcomes, including, but not limited to, a description of how the timeline for completion of these determinations has changed.

(v) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding to contract for an evaluation of the comprehensive assessment reporting evaluation tool to determine how the tool can be simplified, modified, or replaced to meet federal match obligations and to ensure that the desired outcomes of care are achieved.

(w) $1,223,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,763,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $3,248,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for supported employment and community inclusion services for those individuals with intellectual or developmental disabilities who are transitioning from high school in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium and are anticipated to utilize these services.

(x) $11,074,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $13,222,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $19,206,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase rates paid to supported employment and community inclusion providers.

(y)(i) $79,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $76,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $121,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to develop a plan for implementing an enhanced behavior support specialty contract for community residential supported living, state-operated living alternative, or a group training home to provide intensive behavioral services and support to adults with intellectual and developmental disabilities who require enhanced services and support due to challenging behaviors that cannot be safely and holistically managed in an exclusively community setting, and who are at risk of institutionalization or out-of-state placement, or are transitioning to the community from an intermediate care facility, hospital, or other state-operated residential facility. The enhanced behavior support specialty contract shall be designed to ensure that enhanced behavior support specialty settings serve a maximum capacity of four clients and that they have the adequate levels of staffing to provide 24-hour nonmedical care and supervision of residents.

(ii) No later than June 30, 2025, the department must submit to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature a report that includes:

(A) A detailed description of the design of the enhanced behavior support specialty contract and setting, including a description of and the rationale for the number of staff required within each behavior support specialty setting and the necessary qualifications of these staff;

(B) A detailed description of and the rationale for the number of department staff required to manage the enhanced behavior support specialty program;

(C) A plan for implementing the enhanced behavior support specialty contracts that includes:

(I) An analysis of areas of the state where enhanced behavior support specialty settings are needed, including recommendations for how to phase in the enhanced behavior support specialty settings in these areas; and

(II) An analysis of the sufficiency of the provider network to support a phase in of the enhanced behavior support specialty settings, including recommendations for how to further develop this network; and

(D) An estimate of the costs to implement the enhanced behavior support specialty settings and program and any necessary recommendations for legislative actions to facilitate the ability of the department to:

(I) Enter into contracts and payment arrangements with providers choosing to provide the enhanced behavior support specialty setting and to supplement care in all community-based residential settings with experts trained in enhanced behavior support so that state-operated living alternatives, supported living facilities, and other community-based settings can specialize in the needs of individuals with developmental disabilities who are living with high, complex behavioral support needs;

(II) Enter into funding agreements with the health care authority for the provision of applied behavioral analysis and other applicable health care services within the community-based residential setting; and

(III) Provide the enhanced behavior support specialty through a medicaid waiver or other federal authority administered by the department, to the extent consistent with federal law and federal funding requirements to receive federal matching funds.

(z) $2,494,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,345,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to provide personal care services for up to 33 clients who are not United States citizens and who are ineligible for medicaid upon their discharge from an acute care hospital. The department must prioritize the funding provided in this subsection for such clients in acute care hospitals who are also on the department's wait list for services.

(aa) $2,605,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,402,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $3,840,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to establish transition coordination teams to coordinate transitions of care for clients who move from one care setting to another. The department of social and health services shall submit annual reports no later than December 1, 2023, and December 1, 2024, to the appropriate committees of the legislature that detail how the funds were utilized and the associated outcomes including, but not limited to:

(i) A detailed reporting of the number of clients served, the settings in which clients received care, and the progress made toward increasing stability of client placements;

(ii) A comparison of these outcomes against the outcomes achieved in prior fiscal years;

(iii) A description of lessons learned since the transition coordination teams were first implemented, including an identification of what processes were improved to reduce the timelines for completion; and

(iv) Recommendations for changes necessary to the transition coordination teams to improve increasing stability of client placements.

(bb) $1,448,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,807,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $3,626,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to pilot a specialty rate for adult family homes to serve up to 100 individuals with intellectual or developmental disabilities who also have co-occurring health or behavioral health diagnoses. No later than December 1, 2024, the department of social and health services shall submit a report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature that details how the funds were utilized and the associated outcomes including, but not limited to:

(i) A detailed reporting of the number of clients served and the setting from which each client entered the adult family home receiving this specialty rate;

(ii) A comparison of the rate of admissions to the adult family homes receiving this specialty rate against the rate of admissions to other state-operated settings including, but not limited to, state-operated living alternatives, enhanced services facilities, and the transitional care center of Seattle; and

(iii) A comparison of the length of stay in the setting from which the client entered the adult family home receiving this specialty rate against the average length of stay in settings prior to entering other state-operated settings including, but not limited to, state-operated living alternatives, enhanced services facilities, and the transitional care center of Seattle.

(cc) $2,856,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $3,104,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $5,948,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to pilot a program that provides a specialty rate for community residential providers who receive additional training to support individuals with complex physical and behavioral health needs.

(i) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $2,453,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,705,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $5,259,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the specialty rate for community residential providers to serve up to 30 individuals.

(ii) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $403,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $399,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $689,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to hire staff to support this specialty program, including expanding existing training programs available for community residential providers and to support providers in locating affordable housing.

(iii) No later than December 1, 2024, the department of social and health services shall submit a report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature that details how the funds were utilized and the associated outcomes including, but not limited to:

(A) A detailed reporting of the number of clients served and the setting from which each client entered the community residential setting receiving this specialty rate;

(B) A comparison of the rate of admissions to the community residential setting receiving this specialty rate against the rate of admissions to other community residential settings not receiving this specialty rate as well as against the rate of admissions to other state-operated settings including, but not limited to, state-operated living alternatives, enhanced services facilities, and the transitional care center of Seattle; and

(C) A comparison of the length of stay in the setting from which the client entered the community residential setting receiving this specialty rate against the average length of stay in settings prior to entering other community residential settings not receiving this specialty rate as well as prior to entering other state-operated settings including, but not limited to, state-operated living alternatives, enhanced services facilities, and the transitional care center of Seattle.

(dd)(i) $104,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department to contract with the Ruckleshaus center for a progress report on the recommendations in the December 2019 report, "Rethinking Intellectual and Developmental Disability Policy to Empower Clients, Develop Providers and Improve Services."

(ii) By February 29, 2024, a final report shall be submitted to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature that includes:

(A) Detailed information about the successes and barriers related to meeting the recommendations in the December 2019 report;

(B) Identification of other potential issues or options for meeting the recommendations in the December 2019 report, including but not limited to, an exploration of the enhanced behavioral support homes concept;

(C) A review of other state's approaches and innovations regarding any of the recommendations in the December 2019 report;

(D) Identification of any emergent issues; and

(E) Identification or recommendation for the organization of focus groups of state agencies and respective stakeholders.

(iii) In compiling the final report, members of the previous workgroup, as well as other interested parties, should be consulted for their feedback and to identify areas where there is potential for agreement to move forward and to make process recommendations if applicable.

(ee) $127,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $28,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $55,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for adult day respite. Of the amounts appropriated in this subsection:

(i) $27,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $28,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $55,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase adult day respite rates from $3.40 to $5.45 per 15-minute unit to expand and ensure the sustainability of respite services for clients with intellectual or developmental disabilities and their family caregivers.

(ii) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department to hire a project position to conduct a study and submit a report by December 1, 2023 to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature that examines the feasibility and operational resources needed to add adult day services to a state plan 1915(i) option or to the existing basic plus and core 1915(c) waivers.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$139,343,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$141,950,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$257,981,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$19,489,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$558,763,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) Individuals receiving services as supplemental security income (SSI) state supplemental payments may not become eligible for medical assistance under RCW 74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state supplemental payments.

(b) $495,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $495,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are for the department to fulfill its contracts with the school districts under chapter 28A.190 RCW to provide transportation, building space, and other support services as are reasonably necessary to support the educational programs of students living in residential habilitation centers.

(c) The residential habilitation centers may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods, services, and supplies through hospital group purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.

(d) $122,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $117,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the residential personal needs allowance.

(3) PROGRAM SUPPORT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$4,054,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$4,127,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$4,882,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$13,063,000

(4) SPECIAL PROJECTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$66,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$66,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,094,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,226,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—AGING AND ADULT SERVICES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$2,203,058,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$2,372,202,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$5,613,159,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$53,719,000

Traumatic Brain Injury Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$5,586,000

Skilled Nursing Facility Safety Net Trust Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$133,360,000

Long-Term Services and Supports Trust Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$44,301,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$10,425,385,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) For purposes of implementing chapter 74.46 RCW, the weighted average nursing facility payment rate may not exceed $349.42 for fiscal year 2024 and may not exceed $364.67 for fiscal year 2025. The weighted average nursing facility payment rates in this subsection (1)(a) include the following:

(i) $17,361,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $17,361,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $34,722,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to maintain rate add-ons funded in the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium to address low-wage equity for low-wage direct care workers.

(ii) $2,227,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,227,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $4,456,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to maintain rate add-ons funded in the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium to address low-wage equity for low-wage indirect care workers.

(b) The department shall provide a medicaid rate add-on to reimburse the medicaid share of the skilled nursing facility safety net assessment as a medicaid allowable cost. The nursing facility safety net rate add-on may not be included in the calculation of the annual statewide weighted average nursing facility payment rate.

(2) In accordance with RCW 18.51.050, 18.20.050, 70.128.060, and 43.135.055, the department is authorized to increase nursing facility, assisted living facility, and adult family home fees as necessary to fully support the actual costs of conducting the licensure, inspection, and regulatory programs. The license fees may not exceed the department's annual licensing and oversight activity costs and shall include the department's cost of paying providers for the amount of the license fee attributed to medicaid clients.

(a) The current annual renewal license fee for adult family homes is $225 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2024 and $225 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2025. A processing fee of $2,750 must be charged to each adult family home when the home is initially licensed. This fee is nonrefundable. A processing fee of $700 shall be charged when adult family home providers file a change of ownership application.

(b) The current annual renewal license fee for assisted living facilities is $116 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2024 and $116 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2025.

(c) The current annual renewal license fee for nursing facilities is $359 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2024 and $359 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2025.

(3) The department is authorized to place long-term care clients residing in nursing homes and paid for with state-only funds into less restrictive community care settings while continuing to meet the client's care needs.

(4) $65,702,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $109,746,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $216,254,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the rate increase for the new consumer-directed employer contracted individual providers as set by the consumer-directed rate setting board in accordance with RCW 74.39A.530.

(5) $19,044,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $30,439,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $63,986,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the homecare agency parity consistent with the rate set by the consumer-directed employer rate setting board in accordance with RCW 74.39A.530.

(6) $2,385,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $4,892,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $12,502,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for administrative costs of the consumer-directed employer as set by the consumer-directed employer rate setting board in accordance with RCW 74.39A.530.

(7) $2,547,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $3,447,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $7,762,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase the administrative rate for home care agencies by 56 cents per hour effective July 1, 2023.

(8) $425,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $542,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for funding the unfair labor practice settlement in the case of Adult Family Home Council v Office of Financial Management, PERC case no. 135737-U-22. If the settlement agreement is not reached by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(9) The department may authorize a one-time waiver of all or any portion of the licensing and processing fees required under RCW 70.128.060 in any case in which the department determines that an adult family home is being relicensed because of exceptional circumstances, such as death or incapacity of a provider, and that to require the full payment of the licensing and processing fees would present a hardship to the applicant. In these situations the department is also granted the authority to waive the required residential administrator training for a period of 120 days if necessary to ensure continuity of care during the relicensing process.

(10) In accordance with RCW 18.390.030, the biennial registration fee for continuing care retirement communities shall be $900 for each facility.

(11) Within amounts appropriated in this subsection, the department shall assist the legislature to continue the work of the joint legislative executive committee on planning for aging and disability issues.

(a) A joint legislative executive committee on aging and disability is continued, with members as provided in this subsection.

(i) Four members of the senate, with the leaders of the two largest caucuses each appointing two members, and four members of the house of representatives, with the leaders of the two largest caucuses each appointing two members;

(ii) A member from the office of the governor, appointed by the governor;

(iii) The secretary of the department of social and health services or his or her designee;

(iv) The director of the health care authority or his or her designee;

(v) A member from disability rights Washington and a member from the office of long-term care ombuds;

(vi) The insurance commissioner or his or her designee, who shall serve as an ex officio member; and

(vii) Other agency directors or designees as necessary.

(b) The committee must make recommendations and continue to identify key strategic actions to prepare for the aging of the population in Washington and to serve people with disabilities, including state budget and policy options, and may conduct, but are not limited to, the following tasks:

(i) Identify strategies to better serve the health care needs of an aging population and people with disabilities to promote healthy living and palliative care planning;

(ii) Identify strategies and policy options to create financing mechanisms for long-term service and supports that allow individuals and families to meet their needs for service;

(iii) Identify policies to promote financial security in retirement, support people who wish to stay in the workplace longer, and expand the availability of workplace retirement savings plans;

(iv) Identify ways to promote advance planning and advance care directives and implementation strategies for the Bree collaborative palliative care and related guidelines;

(v) Identify ways to meet the needs of the aging demographic impacted by reduced federal support;

(vi) Identify ways to protect the rights of vulnerable adults through assisted decision-making and guardianship and other relevant vulnerable adult protections;

(vii) Identify options for promoting client safety through residential care services and consider methods of protecting older people and people with disabilities from physical abuse and financial exploitation; and

(viii) Identify other policy options and recommendations to help communities adapt to the aging demographic in planning for housing, land use, and transportation.

(c) Staff support for the committee shall be provided by the office of program research, senate committee services, the office of financial management, and the department of social and health services.

(d) Within existing appropriations, the cost of meetings must be paid jointly by the senate, house of representatives, and the office of financial management. Joint committee expenditures and meetings are subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their successor committees. Meetings of the task force must be scheduled and conducted in accordance with the rules of both the senate and the house of representatives. The joint committee members may be reimbursed for travel expenses as authorized under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, and chapter 44.04 RCW as appropriate. Advisory committee members may not receive compensation or reimbursement for travel and expenses.

(12) Appropriations in this section are sufficient to fund discharge case managers stationed at the state psychiatric hospitals. Discharge case managers will transition clients ready for hospital discharge into less restrictive alternative community placements. The transition of clients ready for discharge will free up bed capacity at the state psychiatric hospitals.

(13) Appropriations in this section are sufficient to fund financial service specialists stationed at the state psychiatric hospitals. Financial service specialists will help to transition clients ready for hospital discharge into alternative community placements. The transition of clients ready for discharge will free up bed capacity at the state hospitals.

(14) The department shall continue to administer tailored support for older adults and medicaid alternative care as described in initiative 2 of the 1115 demonstration waiver. This initiative will be funded by the health care authority through the medicaid quality improvement program. The secretary in collaboration with the director of the health care authority shall report to the office of financial management all expenditures of this subsection and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested. The department shall not increase general fund—state expenditures on this initiative.

(15) $61,209,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $70,352,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $161,960,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of an agreement reached between the governor and the adult family home council under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, as provided in section 907 of this act.

(16) $1,761,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,761,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $4,162,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for case managers at the area agencies on aging to coordinate care for medicaid clients with mental illness who are living in their own homes. Work shall be accomplished within existing standards for case management and no requirements will be added or modified unless by mutual agreement between the department of social and health services and area agencies on aging.

(17) Appropriations provided in this section are sufficient for the department to contract with an organization to provide educational materials, legal services, and attorney training to support persons with dementia. The funding provided in this subsection must be used for:

(a) An advance care and legal planning toolkit for persons and families living with dementia, designed and made available online and in print. The toolkit should include educational topics including, but not limited to:

(i) The importance of early advance care, legal, and financial planning;

(ii) The purpose and application of various advance care, legal, and financial documents;

(iii) Dementia and capacity;

(iv) Long-term care financing considerations;

(v) Elder and vulnerable adult abuse and exploitation;

(vi) Checklists such as "legal tips for caregivers," "meeting with an attorney," and "life and death planning;"

(vii) Standardized forms such as general durable power of attorney forms and advance health care directives; and

(viii) A selected list of additional resources.

(b) Webinars about the dementia legal and advance care planning toolkit and related issues and topics with subject area experts. The subject area expert presenters must provide their services in-kind, on a volunteer basis.

(c) Continuing legal education programs for attorneys to advise and assist persons with dementia. The continuing education programs must be offered at no cost to attorneys who make a commitment to participate in the pro bono program.

(d) Administrative support costs to develop intake forms and protocols, perform client intake, match participating attorneys with eligible clients statewide, maintain records and data, and produce reports as needed.

(18) Appropriations provided in this section are sufficient to continue community alternative placement beds that prioritize the transition of clients who are ready for discharge from the state psychiatric hospitals, but who have additional long-term care or developmental disability needs.

(a) Community alternative placement beds include enhanced service facility beds, adult family home beds, skilled nursing facility beds, shared supportive housing beds, state operated living alternative beds, assisted living facility beds, adult residential care beds, and specialized dementia beds.

(b) Each client must receive an individualized assessment prior to leaving one of the state psychiatric hospitals. The individualized assessment must identify and authorize personal care, nursing care, behavioral health stabilization, physical therapy, or other necessary services to meet the unique needs of each client. It is the expectation that, in most cases, staffing ratios in all community alternative placement options described in (a) of this subsection will need to increase to meet the needs of clients leaving the state psychiatric hospitals. If specialized training is necessary to meet the needs of a client before he or she enters a community placement, then the person centered service plan must also identify and authorize this training.

(c) When reviewing placement options, the department must consider the safety of other residents, as well as the safety of staff, in a facility. An initial evaluation of each placement, including any documented safety concerns, must occur within thirty days of a client leaving one of the state psychiatric hospitals and entering one of the community placement options described in (a) of this subsection. At a minimum, the department must perform two additional evaluations of each placement during the first year that a client has lived in the facility.

(d) In developing bed capacity, the department shall consider the complex needs of individuals waiting for discharge from the state psychiatric hospitals.

(19) The annual certification renewal fee for community residential service businesses is $859 per client in fiscal year 2024 and $859 per client in fiscal year 2025. The annual certification renewal fee may not exceed the department's annual licensing and oversight activity costs.

(20) $5,094,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $5,094,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for services and support to individuals who are deaf, hard of hearing, or deaf-blind.

(21) $75,957,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $40,714,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $123,356,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for rate adjustments for skilled nursing facilities.

(22) $26,470,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $29,591,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $63,540,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for rate adjustments for assisted living providers. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) $20,497,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $22,634,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $49,089,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase funding of the assisted living medicaid methodology established in RCW 74.39A.032 and to establish two geographic service areas.

(b) $5,351,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $6,323,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $13,099,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for rate increases for specialized dementia care.

(c) $622,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $634,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,352,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for rate increases for expanded community services.

(23) Within available funds, the aging and long term support administration must maintain a unit within adult protective services that specializes in the investigation of financial abuse allegations and self-neglect allegations.

(24) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding to implement chapter 220, Laws of 2020 (adult family homes/8 beds). A nonrefundable fee of $485 shall be charged for each application to increase bed capacity at an adult family home to seven or eight beds.

(25) $1,858,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,857,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for operation of the volunteer services program. Funding must be prioritized towards serving populations traditionally served by long-term care services to include senior citizens and persons with disabilities.

(26) $479,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $479,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the kinship navigator program in the Colville Indian reservation, Yakama Nation, and other tribal areas.

(27) $1,091,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,529,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $815,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for community housing transitions. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $800,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for payments to landlords to retain rental units for medicaid clients receiving long-term services and supports. No later than December 1, 2024, the department shall submit a report to the governor and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature that details how the funds were spent and the number of individuals served.

(b) $312,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,325,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to provide wrap around services to clients dealing with behavioral health issues.

(c) $379,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $404,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $815,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to hire staff to assist with community housing transitions.

(28) The traumatic brain injury council shall collaborate with other state agencies in their efforts to address traumatic brain injuries to ensure that efforts are complimentary and continue to support the state's broader efforts to address this issue.

(29) $863,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $863,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for community-based dementia education and support activities in two areas of the state, including dementia resource catalyst staff and direct services for people with dementia and their caregivers.

(30) $5,410,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $9,277,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $14,909,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the operating costs associated with the phase-in of enhanced services facilities and specialized dementia care beds that were established with behavioral health community capacity grants.

(31) $899,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $899,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,796,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5318 (estate recovery). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(32)(a) $71,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $68,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $141,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to develop a plan for implementing an enhanced behavior support specialty contract for community residential supported living, state-operated living alternative, or a group training home to provide intensive behavioral services and support to adults with intellectual and developmental disabilities who require enhanced services and support due to challenging behaviors that cannot be safely and holistically managed in an exclusively community setting, and who are at risk of institutionalization or out-of-state placement, or are transitioning to the community from an intermediate care facility, hospital, or other state-operated residential facility. The enhanced behavior support specialty contract shall be designed to ensure that enhanced behavior support specialty settings serve a maximum capacity of four clients and that they have the adequate levels of staffing to provide 24-hour nonmedical care and supervision of residents.

(b) No later than June 30, 2025, the department must submit to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature a report that includes:

(i) A detailed description of the design of the enhanced behavior support specialty contract and setting, including a description of and the rationale for the number of staff required within each behavior support specialty setting and the necessary qualifications of these staff;

(ii) A detailed description of and the rationale for the number of department staff required to manage the enhanced behavior support specialty program;

(iii) A plan for implementing the enhanced behavior support specialty contracts that includes:

(A) An analysis of areas of the state where enhanced behavior support specialty settings are needed, including recommendations for how to phase in the enhanced behavior support specialty settings in these areas; and

(B) An analysis of the sufficiency of the provider network to support a phase in of the enhanced behavior support specialty settings, including recommendations for how to further develop this network; and

(iv) An estimate of the costs to implement the enhanced behavior support specialty settings and program and any necessary recommendations for legislative actions to facilitate the ability of the department to:

(A) Enter into contracts and payment arrangements with providers choosing to provide the enhanced behavior support specialty setting and to supplement care in all community-based residential settings with experts trained in enhanced behavior support so that state-operated living alternatives, supported living facilities, and other community-based settings can specialize in the needs of individuals with developmental disabilities who are living with high, complex behavioral support needs;

(B) Enter into funding agreements with the health care authority for the provision of applied behavioral analysis and other applicable health care services within the community-based residential setting; and

(C) Provide the enhanced behavior support specialty through a medicaid waiver or other federal authority administered by the department, to the extent consistent with federal law and federal funding requirements to receive federal matching funds.

(33) $2,874,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,211,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $70,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the kinship care support program. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) $667,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely to continue the kinship navigator case management pilot program.

(b) $900,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $900,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to increase the rates paid to kinship navigators and to increase the number of kinship navigators so that each area agency on aging has one kinship navigator and King county has two kinship navigators.

(34) $2,574,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,567,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to provide personal care services for up to 40 clients who are not United States citizens and who are ineligible for medicaid upon their discharge from an acute care hospital. The department must prioritize the funding provided in this subsection for such clients in acute care hospitals who are also on the department's wait list for services.

(35) $691,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $658,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,347,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to provide staff support to the difficult to discharge task force described in section 135(12) of this act, including any associated ad hoc subgroups, and to develop home and community services assessment timeliness requirements for pilot participants in cooperation with the health care authority as described in section 211(66) of this act.

(36) $51,717,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $56,874,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the rebase of skilled nursing facilities as required in RCW 74.46.561.

(37) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a study of functional assessments conducted by the department prior to acute care hospital discharge and placement in a post-acute facility. No later than June 30, 2025, a report must be submitted to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature that evaluates:

(a) The timeliness of the completion of these assessments;

(b) How requiring these assessments impacts:

(i) The length of a patient's hospital stay;

(ii) The patient's medical, emotional, and mental well-being;

(iii) The hospital staff who care for these patients; and

(iv) Access to inpatient and emergency beds for other patients;

(c) Best practices from other states for placing hospitalized patients in post-acute care settings in a timely and effective manner that includes:

(i) Identification of the states that require these assessments prior to post-acute placement; and

(ii) An analysis of a patient's hospital length of stay and a patient's medical, emotional, and mental well-being in states that require these assessments compared to the states that do not; and

(d) The potential benefits of, and barriers to, outsourcing some or all of the functional assessment process to hospitals. Barriers evaluated must include department policies regarding staff workloads, outsourcing work, and computer system access.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—ECONOMIC SERVICES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$592,633,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$577,137,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,651,078,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$5,274,000

Domestic Violence Prevention Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,404,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$2,828,526,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) $153,861,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $138,865,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $857,273,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for all components of the WorkFirst program. Within the amounts provided for the WorkFirst program, the department may provide assistance using state-only funds for families eligible for temporary assistance for needy families. The department must create a WorkFirst budget structure that allows for transparent tracking of budget units and subunits of expenditures where these units and subunits are mutually exclusive from other department budget units. The budget structure must include budget units for the following: Cash assistance, child care, WorkFirst activities, and administration of the program. Within these budget units, the department must develop program index codes for specific activities and develop allotments and track expenditures using these codes. The department shall report to the office of financial management and the relevant fiscal and policy committees of the legislature prior to adopting a structure change.

(b) $418,459,000 of the amounts in (a) of this subsection is for assistance to clients, including grants, diversion cash assistance, and additional diversion emergency assistance including but not limited to assistance authorized under RCW 74.08A.210. The department may use state funds to provide support to working families that are eligible for temporary assistance for needy families but otherwise not receiving cash assistance. Of the amounts provided in this subsection (1)(b):

(i) $1,089,000 is provided solely for the department to provide cash assistance to all child-only households who have exceeded the 60 month time limit in the temporary assistance for needy families program, pursuant to RCW 74.08A.010(5), through June 30, 2025.

(ii) $17,315,000 is provided solely to increase the temporary assistance for needy families and state family assistance cash grants by $100 per month for households with a child under the age of three, effective November 1, 2023. The funding is intended to assist families with the cost of diapers as described in chapter 100, Laws of 2022.

(c) $163,806,000 of the amounts in (a) of this subsection is for WorkFirst job search, education and training activities, barrier removal services, limited English proficiency services, and tribal assistance under RCW 74.08A.040. The department must allocate this funding based on client outcomes and cost effectiveness measures. Within amounts provided in this subsection (1)(c), the department shall implement the working family support program. $2,474,000 of the amounts provided in this subsection (1)(c) is for enhanced transportation assistance. The department must prioritize the use of these funds for the recipients most in need of financial assistance to facilitate their return to work. The department must not utilize these funds to supplant repayment arrangements that are currently in place to facilitate the reinstatement of drivers' licenses.

(d) Of the amounts in (a) of this subsection, $353,402,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is for the working connections child care program under RCW 43.216.020 within the department of children, youth, and families. The department is the lead agency for and recipient of the federal temporary assistance for needy families grant. A portion of this grant must be used to fund child care subsidies expenditures at the department of children, youth, and families.

(i) The department of social and health services shall work in collaboration with the department of children, youth, and families to determine the appropriate amount of state expenditures for the working connections child care program to claim towards the state's maintenance of effort for the temporary assistance for needy families program. The departments will also collaborate to track the average monthly child care subsidy caseload and expenditures by fund type, including child care development fund, general fund—state appropriation, and temporary assistance for needy families for the purpose of estimating the annual temporary assistance for needy families reimbursement from the department of social and health services to the department of children, youth, and families.

(ii) Effective December 1, 2023, and annually thereafter, the department of children, youth, and families must report to the governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature the total state contribution for the working connections child care program claimed the previous fiscal year towards the state's maintenance of effort for the temporary assistance for needy families program and the total temporary assistance for needy families reimbursement from the department of social and health services for the previous fiscal year.

(e) Of the amounts in (a) of this subsection, $68,496,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is for child welfare services within the department of children, youth, and families.

(f) Of the amounts in (a) of this subsection, $145,840,000 is for WorkFirst administration and overhead. Of the amounts provided in this subsection (1)(f): $575,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation of the amounts in (a) of this subsection are provided solely for administrative and overhead costs associated with the expansion of the 60 month time limit to all child-only households through June 30, 2025.

(g)(i) The department shall submit quarterly expenditure reports to the governor, the fiscal committees of the legislature, and the legislative WorkFirst poverty reduction oversight task force under RCW 74.08A.341. In addition to these requirements, the department must detail any fund transfers across budget units identified in (a) through (e) of this subsection. The department shall not initiate any services that require expenditure of state general fund moneys that are not consistent with policies established by the legislature.

(ii) The department may transfer up to ten percent of funding between budget units identified in (b) through (f) of this subsection. The department shall provide notification prior to any transfer to the office of financial management and to the appropriate legislative committees and the legislative-executive WorkFirst poverty reduction oversight task force. The approval of the director of financial management is required prior to any transfer under this subsection.

(h) On January 2nd and July 1st of each year, the department shall provide a maintenance of effort and participation rate tracking report for temporary assistance for needy families to the office of financial management, the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature, and the legislative-executive WorkFirst poverty reduction oversight task force. The report must detail the following information for temporary assistance for needy families:

(i) An overview of federal rules related to maintenance of effort, excess maintenance of effort, participation rates for temporary assistance for needy families, and the child care development fund as it pertains to maintenance of effort and participation rates;

(ii) Countable maintenance of effort and excess maintenance of effort, by source, provided for the previous federal fiscal year;

(iii) Countable maintenance of effort and excess maintenance of effort, by source, for the current fiscal year, including changes in countable maintenance of effort from the previous year;

(iv) The status of reportable federal participation rate requirements, including any impact of excess maintenance of effort on participation targets;

(v) Potential new sources of maintenance of effort and progress to obtain additional maintenance of effort;

(vi) A two-year projection for meeting federal block grant and contingency fund maintenance of effort, participation targets, and future reportable federal participation rate requirements; and

(vii) Proposed and enacted federal law changes affecting maintenance of effort or the participation rate, what impact these changes have on Washington's temporary assistance for needy families program, and the department's plan to comply with these changes.

(i) In the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, it is the intent of the legislature to provide appropriations from the state general fund for the purposes of (a) of this subsection if the department does not receive additional federal temporary assistance for needy families contingency funds in each fiscal year as assumed in the budget outlook.

(2) $3,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for naturalization services.

(3) $2,366,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for employment services for refugees and immigrants, of which $1,774,000 is provided solely for the department to pass through to statewide refugee and immigrant assistance organizations for limited English proficiency pathway services; and $2,366,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for employment services for refugees and immigrants, of which $1,774,000 is provided solely for the department to pass through to statewide refugee and immigrant assistance organizations for limited English proficiency pathway services.

(4) On January 1, 2024, and January 1, 2025, the department must report to the governor and the legislature on all sources of funding available for both refugee and immigrant services and naturalization services during the current fiscal year and the amounts expended to date by service type and funding source. The report must also include the number of clients served and outcome data for the clients.

(5) To ensure expenditures remain within available funds appropriated in this section, the legislature establishes the benefit under the state food assistance program, pursuant to RCW 74.08A.120, to be one hundred percent of the federal supplemental nutrition assistance program benefit amount.

(6) The department shall review clients receiving services through the aged, blind, or disabled assistance program, to determine whether they would benefit from assistance in becoming naturalized citizens, and thus be eligible to receive federal supplemental security income benefits. Those cases shall be given high priority for naturalization funding through the department.

(7) The department shall continue the interagency agreement with the department of veterans' affairs to establish a process for referral of veterans who may be eligible for veterans' services. This agreement must include out-stationing department of veterans' affairs staff in selected community service office locations in King and Pierce counties to facilitate applications for veterans' services.

(8) $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for operational support of the Washington information network 211 organization.

(9) $377,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $377,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the consolidated emergency assistance program.

(10) $560,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $560,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a state-funded employment and training program for recipients of the state's food assistance program.

(11) $5,244,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $3,805,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $21,115,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the integrated eligibility and enrollment modernization project to create a comprehensive application and benefit status tracker for multiple programs and to establish a foundational platform. Funding is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(12) $3,307,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $257,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $8,318,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the integrated eligibility and enrollment modernization project for the discovery, innovation, and customer experience phase. Funding is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(13) $1,067,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,067,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $4,981,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the integrated eligibility and enrollment modernization project office.

(14) $224,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $953,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the expansion of the ongoing additional requirements program, effective April 1, 2024. Of the amount in this subsection, the maximum amount that can be expended on new items added to the ongoing additional requirements program is $53,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $710,000 in fiscal year 2025.

(15)(a) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for sponsorship stabilization funds for eligible unaccompanied children and their sponsors and a study to assess needs and develop recommendations for ongoing supports for this population.

(b) Of the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection (15), $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for sponsorship stabilization funds for eligible unaccompanied children and their sponsors in order to address financial hardship and support household well-being. Stabilization funds can be used to support the sponsorship household with costs of housing, childcare, transportation, internet and data services, household goods, and other unmet needs. The funds may be provided on behalf of an unaccompanied child when the following eligibility criteria are met:

(i) The unaccompanied child is between the ages of 0-17, has been placed in Washington under the care of a nonparental sponsor following release from the United States office of refugee resettlement custody, and has not been reunified with a parent; and

(ii) The sponsorship household demonstrates financial need and has an income below 250 percent of the federal poverty level. A sponsorship household receiving stabilization funds on behalf of a child who turns 18 may continue to receive funds for an additional 60 days after the child reaches 18 years of age.

(c) The department may work with community-based organizations to administer sponsorship stabilization supports. Up to 10 percent of the amounts provided in (b) of this subsection (15) may be used by the community-based organizations to cover administrative expenses associated with the distribution of these supports.

(d) Of the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection (15), $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to cover the administrative resources necessary for the department to administer the sponsorship stabilization program and to convene a work group with the department of children, youth, and families, department of commerce's office of homeless youth prevention and programs, stakeholders, and community-based organization who have pertinent information regarding sponsorship households. The work group shall identify and analyze the resource and service needs for unaccompanied children and their sponsors, including the types and levels of financial supports and related services that will promote stability of sponsorship placements for this population.

(i) The department must produce a report that includes an overview of the number of impacted children and sponsors, existing services and supports that are available, any gaps in services, and potential changes to federal programs and policies that could impact unaccompanied children. The report shall include recommendations for how state agencies and community organizations can partner with the federal government to support sponsorship households, proposed services and supports that the state could provide to promote the ongoing stability of sponsorship households, and a recommended service delivery model.

(ii) The department shall submit the report required by (d)(i) of this subsection (15) to the governor and appropriate legislative committees no later than June 30, 2025.

(16) $18,826,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $18,076,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, $6,734,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation, and $2,404,000 of the domestic violence prevention account—state appropriation are provided solely for domestic violence victim services. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 must be distributed to domestic violence services providers proportionately, based upon bed capacity.

(17) $117,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5398 (domestic violence funding). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$26,670,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$26,962,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$110,047,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$163,679,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—SPECIAL COMMITMENT PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$81,459,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$81,698,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$163,157,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The special commitment center may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods and supplies through hospital group purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$49,435,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$50,011,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$57,178,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$156,624,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the department shall provide to the department of health, where available, the following data for all nutrition assistance programs funded by the United States department of agriculture and administered by the department. The department must provide the report for the preceding federal fiscal year by February 1, 2024, and February 1, 2025. The report must provide:

(a) The number of people in Washington who are eligible for the program;

(b) The number of people in Washington who participated in the program;

(c) The average annual participation rate in the program;

(d) Participation rates by geographic distribution; and

(e) The annual federal funding of the program in Washington.

(2) $5,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $22,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $14,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of an agreement reached between the governor and the Washington federation of state employees for the language access providers under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium as provided in section 907 of this act.

(3) $650,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $150,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for maintenance and operations of the system for integrated leave, attendance, and scheduling (SILAS) system.

(4) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $96,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $149,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5497 (medicaid expenditures). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(5) $231,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $65,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5304 (language access/testing). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(6) $97,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $97,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $14,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5388 (diversity in clinical trials). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 209. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—PAYMENTS TO OTHER AGENCIES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$48,869,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$50,680,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$51,038,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$150,587,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department must extend master property insurance to all buildings owned by the department valued over $250,000 and to all locations leased by the department with contents valued over $250,000.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 210. FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY

(1)(a) During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the health care authority shall provide support and data as required by the office of the state actuary in providing the legislature with health care actuarial analysis, including providing any information in the possession of the health care authority or available to the health care authority through contracts with providers, plans, insurers, consultants, or any other entities contracting with the health care authority.

(b) Information technology projects or investments and proposed projects or investments impacting time capture, payroll and payment processes and systems, eligibility, case management, and authorization systems within the health care authority are subject to technical oversight by the office of the chief information officer.

(2) The health care authority shall not initiate any services that require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The health care authority may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the health care authority receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation providing appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.

(3)(a) The health care authority, the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, the department of health, the department of corrections, and the department of children, youth, and families shall work together within existing resources to establish the health and human services enterprise coalition (the coalition). The coalition, led by the health care authority, must be a multi-organization collaborative that provides strategic direction and federal funding guidance for projects that have cross-organizational or enterprise impact, including information technology projects that affect organizations within the coalition. The office of the chief information officer shall maintain a statewide perspective when collaborating with the coalition to ensure that projects are planned for in a manner that ensures the efficient use of state resources, supports the adoption of a cohesive technology and data architecture, and maximizes federal financial participation. The work of the coalition and any project identified as a coalition project is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(b) The health care authority must submit a report on November 1, 2023, and annually thereafter, to the fiscal committees of the legislature. The report must include, at a minimum:

(i) A list of active coalition projects as of July 1st of the fiscal year. This must include all current and ongoing coalition projects, which coalition agencies are involved in these projects, and the funding being expended on each project, including in-kind funding. For each project, the report must include which federal requirements each coalition project is working to satisfy, and when each project is anticipated to satisfy those requirements; and

(ii) A list of coalition projects that are planned in the current and following fiscal year. This must include which coalition agencies are involved in these projects, including the anticipated in-kind funding by agency, and if a budget request will be submitted for funding. This must reflect all funding required by fiscal year and by fund source and include the budget outlook period.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 211. FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY—MEDICAL ASSISTANCE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$2,709,869,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$2,610,610,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$14,030,471,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$962,029,000

Dedicated Cannabis Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2024)
. . . .
$27,483,000

Dedicated Cannabis Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2025)
. . . .
$29,408,000

Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems

Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$15,092,000

Hospital Safety Net Assessment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$819,297,000

Medical Aid Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$540,000

Telebehavioral Health Access Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$8,394,000

Ambulance Transport Fund—State Appropriation
. . . .
$13,872,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$21,227,065,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The authority shall submit an application to the centers for medicare and medicaid services to renew the 1115 demonstration waiver for an additional five years as described in subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section. The authority may not accept or expend any federal funds received under an 1115 demonstration waiver except as described in this section unless the legislature has appropriated the federal funding. To ensure compliance with legislative requirements and terms and conditions of the waiver, the authority shall implement the renewal of the 1115 demonstration waiver and reporting requirements with oversight from the office of financial management. The legislature finds that appropriate management of the renewal of the 1115 demonstration waiver as set forth in subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section requires sound, consistent, timely, and transparent oversight and analytic review in addition to lack of redundancy with other established measures. The patient must be considered first and foremost in the implementation and execution of the demonstration waiver. To accomplish these goals, the authority shall develop consistent performance measures that focus on population health and health outcomes. The authority shall limit the number of projects that accountable communities of health may participate in under initiative 1 to a maximum of six and shall seek to develop common performance measures when possible. The joint select committee on health care oversight will evaluate the measures chosen: (a) For effectiveness and appropriateness; and (b) to provide patients and health care providers with significant input into the implementation of the demonstration waiver to promote improved population health and patient health outcomes. In cooperation with the department of social and health services, the authority shall consult with and provide notification of work on applications for federal waivers, including details on waiver duration, financial implications, and potential future impacts on the state budget to the joint select committee on health care oversight prior to submitting these waivers for federal approval. Prior to final approval or acceptance of funds by the authority, the authority shall submit the special terms and conditions as submitted to the centers for medicare and medicaid services and the anticipated budget for the duration of the renewed waiver to the governor, the joint select committee on health care, and the fiscal committees of the legislature. By federal standard any programs created or funded by this waiver do not create an entitlement. The demonstration period for the waiver as described in subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section begins July 1, 2023.

(2)(a) $150,219,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation and $150,219,000 of the general fund—local appropriation are provided solely for accountable communities of health described in initiative 1 of the 1115 demonstration waiver and this is the maximum amount that may be expended for this purpose. In renewing this initiative, the authority shall consider local input regarding community needs and shall limit total local projects to no more than six. To provide transparency to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature, the authority shall provide fiscal staff of the legislature query ability into any database of the fiscal intermediary that authority staff would be authorized to access. The authority shall not supplement the amounts provided in this subsection with any general fund—state moneys appropriated in this section or any moneys that may be transferred pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. The director shall report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all expenditures under this subsection and provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested by the legislative fiscal committees.

(b) $438,515,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation and $179,111,000 of the general fund—private/local appropriation are provided solely for the medicaid quality improvement program and this is the maximum amount that may be expended for this purpose. Medicaid quality improvement program payments do not count against the 1115 demonstration waiver spending limits and are excluded from the waiver's budget neutrality calculation. The authority may provide medicaid quality improvement program payments to apple health managed care organizations and their partnering providers as they meet designated milestones. Partnering providers and apple health managed care organizations must work together to achieve medicaid quality improvement program goals according to the performance period timelines and reporting deadlines as set forth by the authority. The authority may only use the medicaid quality improvement program to support initiatives 1, 2, and 3 as described in the 1115 demonstration waiver and may not pursue its use for other purposes. Any programs created or funded by the medicaid quality improvement program do not constitute an entitlement for clients or providers. The authority shall not supplement the amounts provided in this subsection with any general fund—state, general fund—federal, or general fund—local moneys appropriated in this section or any moneys that may be transferred pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. The director shall report to the joint select committee on health care oversight not less than quarterly on financial and health outcomes. The director shall report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all expenditures under this subsection and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested by the legislative fiscal committees.

(c) In collaboration with the accountable communities of health, the authority will submit a report to the governor and the joint select committee on health care oversight describing how each of the accountable community of health's work aligns with the community needs assessment no later than December 1, 2023.

(d) Performance measures and payments for accountable communities of health shall reflect accountability measures that demonstrate progress toward transparent, measurable, and meaningful goals that have an impact on improved population health and improved health outcomes, including a path to financial sustainability. While these goals may have variation to account for unique community demographics, measures should be standardized when possible.

(3) $115,713,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation and $115,725,000 of the general fund—local appropriation are provided solely for long-term support services as described in initiative 2 of the 1115 demonstration waiver as well as administrative expenses for initiative 3 and this is the maximum amount that may be expended for this purpose. The authority shall contract with and provide funding to the department of social and health services to administer initiative 2. The director in cooperation with the secretary of the department of social and health services shall report to the office of financial management all of the expenditures of this section and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested. The authority shall not supplement the amounts provided in this subsection with any general fund—state moneys appropriated in this section or any moneys that may be transferred pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

(4)(a) $54,912,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation and $30,162,000 of the general fund—local appropriation are provided solely for supported housing and employment services described in initiative 3a and 3b of the 1115 demonstration waiver and this is the maximum amount that may be expended for this purpose. Under this initiative, the authority and the department of social and health services shall ensure that allowable and necessary services are provided to eligible clients as identified by the department or its third-party administrator. The authority and the department, in consultation with the medical assistance expenditure forecast work group, shall ensure that reasonable reimbursements are established for services deemed necessary within an identified limit per individual. The authority shall not supplement the amounts provided in this subsection with any general fund—state moneys appropriated in this section or any moneys that may be transferred pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. The director shall report to the joint select committee on health care oversight no less than quarterly on financial and health outcomes. The director shall also report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all of the expenditures of this subsection and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested by the legislative fiscal committees.

(b) The authority and the department shall seek additional flexibilities for housing supports through the centers for medicare and medicaid services and shall coordinate with the office of financial management and the department of commerce to ensure that services are not duplicated.

(c) The director shall report to the joint select committee on health care oversight no less than quarterly on utilization and caseload statistics for both supportive housing and employment services and its progress toward increasing uptake and availability for these services.

(5) $1,432,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,008,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for supported employment services and $1,478,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,162,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for supported housing services, similar to the services described in initiatives 3a and 3b of the 1115 demonstration waiver to individuals who are ineligible for medicaid. Under these initiatives, the authority and the department of social and health services shall ensure that allowable and necessary services are provided to eligible clients as identified by the authority or its third-party administrator. Before authorizing services, eligibility for initiative 3a or 3b of the 1115 demonstration waiver must first be determined.

(6) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this subsection to implement the medicaid expansion as defined in the social security act, section 1902(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII).

(7) The legislature finds that medicaid payment rates, as calculated by the health care authority pursuant to the appropriations in this act, bear a reasonable relationship to the costs incurred by efficiently and economically operated facilities for providing quality services and will be sufficient to enlist enough providers so that care and services are available to the extent that such care and services are available to the general population in the geographic area. The legislature finds that the cost reports, payment data from the federal government, historical utilization, economic data, and clinical input constitute reliable data upon which to determine the payment rates.

(8) Based on quarterly expenditure reports and caseload forecasts, if the health care authority estimates that expenditures for the medical assistance program will exceed the appropriations, the health care authority shall take steps including but not limited to reduction of rates or elimination of optional services to reduce expenditures so that total program costs do not exceed the annual appropriation authority.

(9) In determining financial eligibility for medicaid-funded services, the health care authority is authorized to disregard recoveries by Holocaust survivors of insurance proceeds or other assets, as defined in RCW 48.104.030.

(10) The legislature affirms that it is in the state's interest for Harborview medical center to remain an economically viable component of the state's health care system.

(11) When a person is ineligible for medicaid solely by reason of residence in an institution for mental diseases, the health care authority shall provide the person with the same benefits as he or she would receive if eligible for medicaid, using state-only funds to the extent necessary.

(12) $4,176,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $4,261,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $8,607,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for low-income disproportionate share hospital payments.

(13) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the health care authority shall provide disproportionate share hospital payments to hospitals that provide services to children in the children's health program who are not eligible for services under Title XIX or XXI of the federal social security act due to their citizenship status.

(14) $7,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for supplemental payments to nursing homes operated by public hospital districts. The public hospital district shall be responsible for providing the required nonfederal match for the supplemental payment, and the payments shall not exceed the maximum allowable under federal rules. It is the legislature's intent that the payments shall be supplemental to and shall not in any way offset or reduce the payments calculated and provided in accordance with part E of chapter 74.46 RCW. It is the legislature's further intent that costs otherwise allowable for rate-setting and settlement against payments under chapter 74.46 RCW shall not be disallowed solely because such costs have been paid by revenues retained by the nursing home from these supplemental payments. The supplemental payments are subject to retrospective interim and final cost settlements based on the nursing homes' as-filed and final medicare cost reports. The timing of the interim and final cost settlements shall be at the health care authority's discretion. During either the interim cost settlement or the final cost settlement, the health care authority shall recoup from the public hospital districts the supplemental payments that exceed the medicaid cost limit and/or the medicare upper payment limit. The health care authority shall apply federal rules for identifying the eligible incurred medicaid costs and the medicare upper payment limit.

(15) The health care authority shall continue the inpatient hospital certified public expenditures program for the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium. The program shall apply to all public hospitals, including those owned or operated by the state, except those classified as critical access hospitals or state psychiatric institutions. The health care authority shall submit reports to the governor and legislature by November 1, 2023, and by November 1, 2024, that evaluate whether savings continue to exceed costs for this program. If the certified public expenditures (CPE) program in its current form is no longer cost-effective to maintain, the health care authority shall submit a report to the governor and legislature detailing cost-effective alternative uses of local, state, and federal resources as a replacement for this program. During fiscal year 2024 and fiscal year 2025, hospitals in the program shall be paid and shall retain one hundred percent of the federal portion of the allowable hospital cost for each medicaid inpatient fee-for-service claim payable by medical assistance and one hundred percent of the federal portion of the maximum disproportionate share hospital payment allowable under federal regulations. For the purpose of determining the amount of any state grant under this subsection, payments will include the federal portion of medicaid program supplemental payments received by the hospitals. Inpatient medicaid payments shall be established using an allowable methodology that approximates the cost of claims submitted by the hospitals. Payments made to each hospital in the program in each fiscal year of the biennium shall be compared to a baseline amount. The baseline amount will be determined by the total of (a) the inpatient claim payment amounts that would have been paid during the fiscal year had the hospital not been in the CPE program based on the reimbursement rates developed, implemented, and consistent with policies approved in the 2023-2025 biennial operating appropriations act and in effect on July 1, 2015, (b) one-half of the indigent assistance disproportionate share hospital payment amounts paid to and retained by each hospital during fiscal year 2005, and (c) all of the other disproportionate share hospital payment amounts paid to and retained by each hospital during fiscal year 2005 to the extent the same disproportionate share hospital programs exist in the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium. If payments during the fiscal year exceed the hospital's baseline amount, no additional payments will be made to the hospital except the federal portion of allowable disproportionate share hospital payments for which the hospital can certify allowable match. If payments during the fiscal year are less than the baseline amount, the hospital will be paid a state grant equal to the difference between payments during the fiscal year and the applicable baseline amount. Payment of the state grant shall be made in the applicable fiscal year and distributed in monthly payments. The grants will be recalculated and redistributed as the baseline is updated during the fiscal year. The grant payments are subject to an interim settlement within eleven months after the end of the fiscal year. A final settlement shall be performed. To the extent that either settlement determines that a hospital has received funds in excess of what it would have received as described in this subsection, the hospital must repay the excess amounts to the state when requested. $237,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $218,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for state grants for the participating hospitals.

(16) The health care authority shall seek public-private partnerships and federal funds that are or may become available to provide ongoing support for outreach and education efforts under the federal children's health insurance program reauthorization act of 2009.

(17) The health care authority shall target funding for maternity support services towards pregnant women with factors that lead to higher rates of poor birth outcomes, including hypertension, a preterm or low birth weight birth in the most recent previous birth, a cognitive deficit or developmental disability, substance abuse, severe mental illness, unhealthy weight or failure to gain weight, tobacco use, or African American or Native American race. The health care authority shall prioritize evidence-based practices for delivery of maternity support services. To the extent practicable, the health care authority shall develop a mechanism to increase federal funding for maternity support services by leveraging local public funding for those services.

(18) The authority shall submit reports to the governor and the legislature by September 15, 2023, and no later than September 15, 2024, that delineate the number of individuals in medicaid managed care, by carrier, age, gender, and eligibility category, receiving preventative services and vaccinations. The reports should include baseline and benchmark information from the previous two fiscal years and should be inclusive of, but not limited to, services recommended under the United States preventative services task force, advisory committee on immunization practices, early and periodic screening, diagnostic, and treatment (EPSDT) guidelines, and other relevant preventative and vaccination medicaid guidelines and requirements.

(19) Managed care contracts must incorporate accountability measures that monitor patient health and improved health outcomes, and shall include an expectation that each patient receive a wellness examination that documents the baseline health status and allows for monitoring of health improvements and outcome measures.

(20) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the authority to provide an adult dental benefit.

(21) The health care authority shall coordinate with the department of social and health services to provide referrals to the Washington health benefit exchange for clients that will be ineligible for medicaid.

(22) To facilitate a single point of entry across public and medical assistance programs, and to maximize the use of federal funding, the health care authority, the department of social and health services, and the health benefit exchange will coordinate efforts to expand HealthPlanfinder access to public assistance and medical eligibility staff. The health care authority shall complete medicaid applications in the HealthPlanfinder for households receiving or applying for medical assistance benefits.

(23) $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $180,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to continue operation by a nonprofit organization of a toll-free hotline that assists families to learn about and enroll in the apple health for kids program.

(24) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall reimburse for primary care services provided by naturopathic physicians.

(25) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall continue to provide coverage for pregnant teens that qualify under existing pregnancy medical programs, but whose eligibility for pregnancy related services would otherwise end due to the application of the new modified adjusted gross income eligibility standard.

(26) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section to remove the mental health visit limit and to provide the shingles vaccine and screening, brief intervention, and referral to treatment benefits that are available in the medicaid alternative benefit plan in the classic medicaid benefit plan.

(27) The authority shall use revenue appropriated from the dedicated cannabis account for contracts with community health centers under RCW 69.50.540 in lieu of general fund—state payments to community health centers for services provided to medical assistance clients, and it is the intent of the legislature that this policy will be continued in subsequent fiscal biennia.

(28) Beginning no later than July 1, 2018, for any service eligible under the medicaid state plan for encounter payments, managed care organizations at the request of a rural health clinic shall pay the full published encounter rate directly to the clinic. At no time will a managed care organization be at risk for or have any right to the supplemental portion of the claim. Payments will be reconciled on at least an annual basis between the managed care organization and the authority, with final review and approval by the authority.

(29) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the authority to provide a medicaid equivalent adult dental benefit to clients enrolled in the medical care service program.

(30) During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, sufficient amounts are provided in this section for the authority to provide services identical to those services covered by the Washington state family planning waiver program as of August 2018 to individuals who:

(a) Are over nineteen years of age;

(b) Are at or below two hundred and sixty percent of the federal poverty level as established in WAC 182-505-0100;

(c) Are not covered by other public or private insurance; and

(d) Need family planning services and are not currently covered by or eligible for another medical assistance program for family planning.

(31) Sufficient amounts are appropriated within this section for the authority to incorporate the expected outcomes and criteria to measure the performance of managed care organizations that provide services to clients under chapter 74.09 RCW. The authority must:

(a) Contract with an external quality improvement organization to annually analyze the performance of managed care organizations providing services to clients under this chapter based on seven performance measures. The analysis required under this subsection must:

(i) Measure managed care performance in four common measures across each managed care organization, including:

(A) At least one common measure that must be weighted towards having the potential to impact managed care costs; and

(B) At least one common measure that must be weighted towards population health management, as defined by the measure; and

(ii) Measurement of managed care performance in an additional three quality focus performance measures specific to a managed care organization. Quality focus performance measures chosen by the authority must:

(A) Be chosen from the statewide common measure set;

(B) Reflect specific measures where a managed care organization has poor performance; and

(C) Be substantive and clinically meaningful in promoting health status.

(b) The authority shall set the four common measures to be analyzed across all managed care organizations.

(c) The authority shall set three quality focus performance measures specific to each managed care organization. The authority must determine performance measures for each managed care organization based on the criteria established in (a)(ii) of this subsection.

(d) By September 15, 2023, and annually thereafter, the authority shall notify each managed care organization of the performance measures for the organization for the subsequent plan year.

(e) Two percent of the total plan year funding appropriated to each managed care organization that provides services to clients under chapter 70.320 RCW shall be withheld. At least 75 percent of the withhold shall be held contingent on each managed care organization's performance on the seven performance measures identified in this subsection. Each managed care organization may earn back the annual withhold if the external quality improvement organization finds that the managed care organization:

(i) Made statistically significant improvement in the seven performance measures as compared to the preceding plan year; or

(ii) Scored in the top national medicaid quartile of the performance measures.

(f) The amount of withhold annually paid to each managed care organization shall be proportional to findings of statistically significant improvement or top national medicaid quartile scoring by a managed care organization.

(g) For no more than two of the four quality focus performance measures, the authority may use an alternate methodology to approximate top national medicaid quartile performance where top quartile performance data is unavailable.

(h) For the purposes of this subsection, "external quality improvement organization" means an organization that meets the competence and independence requirements under 42 C.F.R. Sec. 438.354, as it existed on the effective date of this section.

(i) By September 15, 2023, the authority, in collaboration with the medical assistance expenditure forecast work group, shall develop new performance measures for the 2025 plan year. Quality focus performance measures chosen by the authority must, at a minimum:

(A) Be chosen from the statewide common measure set;

(B) Reflect specific measures where a managed care organization has poor performance;

(C) Be substantive and clinically meaningful in promoting health status;

(D) Include ways to improve behavioral health reporting;

(E) Be selected with consideration to health equity;

(F) Ensure that measures that have an impact on funding have a direct relationship to the funding plans receive; and

(G) Include participation from the authority's actuary to ensure that the measures and methods chosen meet required tests for actuarial soundness.

(j) By October 15, 2023, the authority shall provide a report to the governor and fiscal committees of the legislature outlining the measures it has chosen for the 2025 plan year, including the information outlined in (i) of this subsection.

(32)(a) The authority shall ensure that appropriate resources are dedicated to implementing the recommendations of the centers for medicare and medicaid services center for program integrity as provided to the authority in the January 2019 Washington focused program integrity review final report. Additionally, the authority shall:

(i) Work to ensure the efficient operations of the managed care plans, including but not limited to, a deconflicting process for audits with and among the managed care plans and the medicaid fraud division at the attorney general's office, to ensure the authority staff perform central audits of cases that appear across multiple managed care plans, versus the audits performed by the individual managed care plans or the fraud division;

(ii) Remain accountable for operating in an effective and efficient manner, including performing program integrity activities that ensure high value in the medical assistance program in general and in medicaid managed care specifically;

(iii) Work with its contracted actuary and the medical assistance expenditure forecast work group to develop methods and metrics related to managed care program integrity activity that shall be incorporated into annual rate setting; and

(iv) Work with the medical assistance expenditure forecast work group to ensure the results of program integrity activity are incorporated into the rate setting process in a transparent, timely, measurable, quantifiable manner.

(b) The authority shall consider, as part of its program integrity activities, whether it is providing economical and efficient prescription drug services through its administrative services model and the quantifiable cost and benefit of this service delivery method. In making this determination, the authority shall provide at an aggregate level, the following minimum information to the governor and fiscal committees of the legislature no later than October 15, 2023:

(i) The cost of providing these prescription drug benefits through a carved-out fee-for-service benefit, both total cost and net of rebates;

(ii) The cost of providing these prescription drug benefits through a carved-in managed care benefit, both total cost and net of rebates;

(iii) The cost of providing these prescription drug benefits through the administrative services model, both total and net of rebates; and

(iv) The community benefit attributable to 340B providers as a result of the administrative services or carved-in model as compared to each other and as compared to the carved-out model.

(c) The authority shall submit a report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by October 1, 2023, that includes, but is not limited to:

(i) Specific, quantified actions that have been taken, to date, related to the recommendations of the centers for medicare and medicaid services center for program integrity as provided to the authority in the January 2019 Washington focused program integrity review final report;

(ii) Specific, quantified information regarding the work done with its contracted actuary and the medical assistance expenditure forecast expenditure work group to develop methods and metrics related to managed care program integrity activity that shall be incorporated into annual rate setting;

(iii) Specific, quantified information regarding the work done with the medical assistance expenditure forecast work group to ensure the results of program integrity activity are incorporated into the rate setting process in a transparent, timely, measurable, quantifiable manner;

(iv) Accounting by fiscal year, medicaid eligibility group, and service beginning with state fiscal year 2020 to include all program integrity recoveries attributable to the authority, including how these recoveries are categorized, to which year they are reported, how these recoveries are applied against legislative savings requirements, and what recoveries are attributable to the office of the attorney general's medicaid fraud control division and how these recoveries are considered when reporting program integrity activity and determining managed care rates; and

(v) Information detailing when the agency acquired a new fraud and abuse detection system and to what extent this system is being utilized.

(33)(a) The authority shall not enter into any future value-based arrangements with federally qualified health centers or rural health clinics prior to receiving approval from the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature.

(b) The authority shall not modify the reconciliation process or the APM4 program with federally qualified health centers or rural health clinics without notification to and the opportunity to comment from the office of financial management.

(c) The authority shall require all managed care organizations to provide information to the authority to account for all payments to federally qualified health centers to include how payments are made, including any additional payments and whether there is a sub-capitation arrangement or value-based purchasing arrangement.

(d) Beginning with fiscal year 2021 and for each subsequent year thereafter, the authority shall reconcile on an annual basis with federally qualified health centers.

(e) Beginning with fiscal year 2021 and for each subsequent year thereafter, the authority shall properly accrue for any anticipated reconciliations with federally qualified health centers during the fiscal year close process following generally accepted accounting practices.

(34) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority is to include allergen control bed and pillow covers as part of the durable medical equipment benefit for children with an asthma diagnosis enrolled in medical assistance programs.

(35) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall reimburse for maternity services provided by doulas.

(36) The authority shall collaborate with the Washington state LGBTQ commission, the department of health, advocates for people living with HIV in Washington, consumers, and medical professionals with expertise in serving the medicaid population living with HIV, to consider and develop recommendations regarding:

(a) Access to HIV antiretroviral drugs on the medicaid drug formulary, including short- and long-term fiscal implications of eliminating current prior authorization and fail-first requirements;

(b) Impact of drug access on public health and the statewide goal of reducing HIV transmissions; and

(c) Maximizing pharmaceutical drug rebates for HIV antiretroviral drugs.

(37) Sufficient funds are provided to continue reimbursing dental health aid therapists for services performed in tribal facilities for medicaid clients. The authority must leverage any federal funding that may become available as a result of appeal decisions from the centers for medicare and medicaid services or the United States court of appeals for the ninth circuit.

(38) Within the amount appropriated within this section, the authority shall implement the requirements of RCW 74.09.830 (postpartum health care coverage) and the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2, in extending health care coverage during the postpartum period. The authority shall make every effort to expedite and complete eligibility determinations for individuals who are likely eligible to receive health care coverage under Title XIX or Title XXI of the federal social security act to ensure the state is receiving maximum federal match. This includes, but is not limited to, working with managed care organizations to provide continuous outreach in various modalities until the individual's eligibility determination is completed. Beginning September 30, 2023, the authority must submit quarterly reports to the caseload forecast work group on the number of individuals who are likely eligible to receive health care coverage under Title XIX or Title XXI of the federal social security act but are waiting for the authority to complete eligibility determination, the number of individuals who were likely eligible but are now receiving health care coverage with the maximum federal match under Title XIX or Title XXI of the federal social security act, and outreach activities including the work with managed care organizations.

(39) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the perinatal support warm line to provide peer support, resources, and referrals to new and expectant parents and people in the emotional transition to parenthood experiencing, or at risk of, postpartum depression or other mental health issues.

(40) Sufficient funding is provided to remove the asset test from the medicare savings program review process.

(41) Sufficient funding is provided to eliminate the mid-certification review process for the aged, blind, or disabled and housing and essential needs referral programs.

(42) $404,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,616,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $5,931,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for an adult acupuncture benefit beginning January 1, 2024.

(43) $582,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,327,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $8,544,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for an adult chiropractic benefit beginning January 1, 2024.

(44)(a) $4,109,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,055,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to establish a two-year grant program for reimbursement for services to patients up to age 18 provided by community health workers in primary care clinics whose patients are significantly comprised of pediatric patients enrolled in medical assistance under chapter 74.09 RCW beginning January 1, 2023. Community health workers funded under this subsection may provide outreach, informal counseling, and social supports for health-related social needs. The authority shall seek a state plan amendment or federal demonstration waiver should they determine these services are eligible for federal matching funds. Within the amounts provided within this subsection, the authority will provide an initial report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by January 1, 2024, and a final report by January 1, 2025. The report shall include, but not be limited to, the quantitative impacts of the grant program, how many community health workers are participating in the grant program, how many clinics these community health workers represent, how many clients are being served, and evaluation of any measurable health outcomes identified in the planning period prior to January 2023.

(b) In collaboration with key stakeholders including pediatric primary care clinics and medicaid managed care organizations, the authority shall explore longer term, sustainable reimbursement options for the integration of community health workers in primary care to address the health-related social needs of families, including approaches to incorporate federal funding.

(45) $1,635,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,024,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,765,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a technology solution for an authoritative client identifier, or master person index, for state programs within the health and human services coalition to uniformly identify clients across multiple service delivery systems. The coalition will clearly identify all state programs impacted by and all fund sources used in development and implementation of this project. This subsection is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(46)(a) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the authority to maintain providing coverage for all federal food and drug administration-approved HIV antiviral drugs without prior authorization.

(b) Beginning July 1, 2023, upon initiating or renewal of a contract with the authority to administer a medicaid managed care plan, a managed care health care system shall provide coverage without prior authorization for all federal food and drug administration-approved HIV antiviral drugs.

(c) By December 1, 2023, and December 1, 2024, the authority must submit to the fiscal committees of the legislature the projected and actual expenditures and percentage of medicaid clients who switch to a new drug class without prior authorization as described in (a) of this subsection.

(47) The authority shall consider evidence-based recommendations from the Oregon health evidence review commission when making coverage decisions for the treatment of pediatric autoimmune neuropsychiatric disorders associated with streptococcal infections and pediatric acute-onset neuropsychiatric syndrome.

(48) $2,356,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,356,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $10,012,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase advanced life support code A0426 by 89 percent, basic life support base rates for nonemergency ambulance transports code A0428 by 71 percent, and mileage for both nonemergency and emergency ambulance transportation code A0425 by 39 percent, beginning July 1, 2023.

(49) $2,047,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $3,390,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $5,135,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase reimbursement rates by 20 percent for applied behavior analysis codes 0362T and 0373T for individuals with complex behavioral health care needs; and by 15 percent for all other applied behavior analysis codes with the exception of Q3014, beginning January 1, 2024.

(50) $280,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,992,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for modular replacement costs of the ProviderOne pharmacy point of sale system and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(51) $709,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,413,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $4,072,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to maintain and increase access for behavioral health services through increased provider rates. The rate increases are effective January 1, 2024, and must be applied to the following codes for children and adults enrolled in the medicaid program: 90785, 90791, 90832, 90833, 90834, 90836, 90837, 90838, 90845, 90846, 90847, 90849, 90853, 96156, 96158, 96159, 96164, 96165, 96167, 96168, 96170, 96171, H0004, H0023, H0036, and H2015. The authority may use a substitute code in the event that any of the codes identified in this subsection are discontinued and replaced with an updated code covering the same service. Within the amounts provided in this subsection the authority must:

(a) Implement this rate increase in accordance with the process established in RCW 71.24.885 (medicaid rate increases);

(b) Raise the state fee-for-service rates for these codes by up to 7 percent, except that the state medicaid rate may not exceed the published medicare rate or an equivalent relative value unit rate if a published medicare rate is not available;

(c) Require in contracts with managed care organizations that, beginning January 2024, managed care organizations pay no lower than the fee-for-service rate for these codes, and adjust managed care capitation rates accordingly; and

(d) Not duplicate rate increases provided in subsection (52) of this section.

(52) $1,055,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $2,046,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to maintain and increase access for primary care services for medicaid-enrolled patients through increased provider rates beginning January 1, 2025. Within the amounts provided in this subsection the authority must:

(a) Increase the medical assistance rates for adult primary care services that are reimbursed solely at the existing medical assistance rates on a fee-for-service basis, as well as through managed care plans, by at least 2 percent above medical assistance rates in effect on January 1, 2023;

(b) Increase the medical assistance rates for pediatric primary care services that are reimbursed solely at the existing medical assistance rates on a fee-for-service basis, as well as through managed care plans, by at least 2 percent above medical assistance rates in effect on January 1, 2023;

(c) Increase the medical assistance rates for pediatric critical care, neonatal critical care, and neonatal intensive care services that are reimbursed solely at the existing medical assistance rates on a fee-for-service basis, as well as through managed care plans, by at least 2 percent above medical assistance rates in effect on January 1, 2023;

(d) Apply reimbursement rates required under this subsection to payment codes in a manner consistent with the temporary increase in medicaid reimbursement rates under federal rules and guidance in effect on January 1, 2014, implementing the patient protection and affordable care act, except that the authority may not require provider attestations;

(e) Pursue state plan amendments to require medicaid managed care organizations to increase rates under this subsection through adoption of a uniform percentage increase for network providers pursuant to 42 C.F.R. Sec. 438.6(c)(1)(iii)(B), as existing on January 1, 2023; and

(f) Not duplicate rate increases provided in subsection (51) of this section.

(53) The authority shall seek a waiver from the federal department of health and human services necessary to implement the requirements of RCW 74.09.670 (medical assistance benefits—incarcerated or committed persons—suspension). Additionally, the authority shall explore expanding its waiver application for prerelease services from 30 to 90 days; and provide the governor and fiscal committees of the legislature estimates of costs for implementation or maintenance of effort requirements of this expansion prior to entering into agreement with the centers for medicare and medicaid services.

(54) Within the amounts appropriated in this section the authority in collaboration with UW Medicine shall explore funding options for clinical training programs including, but not limited to, family medical practice, psychiatric residencies, advanced registered nurse practitioners, and other primary care providers. Options should include, but not be limited to, shifting direct medicaid graduate medical education payments or indirect medicaid graduate medical education payments, or both, from rates to a standalone program. The authority in collaboration with UW Medicine shall submit a report outlining its findings to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature no later than December 1, 2023.

(55) $143,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5263 (psilocybin). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(56) $663,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,401,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $4,506,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5532 (small rural hospital payment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(57) $407,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $3,057,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $3,482,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5580 (maternal health outcomes). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(58) $56,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $111,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $166,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to increase pediatric palliative care rates to the equivalent medicare rates paid for hospice care in effect October 1, 2022, beginning January 1, 2024.

(59) $598,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $591,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for work required of the authority as specified in RCW 41.05.840 (universal health care commission). Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(i) $216,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $216,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are for staff dedicated to contract procurement, meeting coordination, legislative reporting, federal application requirements, and administrative support;

(ii) $132,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are for additional staff dedicated to the work of the finance technical advisory committee; and

(iii) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are for consultant services, dedicated actuarial support, and economic modeling.

(60) $3,193,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $3,193,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $13,570,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase air ambulance-fixed wing code A0430 by 252 percent, air ambulance-rotary wing code A0431 by 353 percent, fixed wing air mileage code A0435 by 76 percent, and rotary wing air mileage code A0436 by 91 percent, beginning July 1, 2023.

(61) $37,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $73,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $218,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to increase the allowable number of periodontal treatments to up to four per 12 month period for apple health eligible adults, ages 21 and over, with a current diagnosis of diabetes, beginning January 1, 2024.

(62) $4,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for one-time bridge grants to hospitals in financial distress. To qualify for these grants, a hospital must:

(a) Be located in Washington;

(b) Serve individuals enrolled in state and federal medical assistance programs;

(c) Continue to maintain a medicaid population at similar utilization levels as in calendar year 2022;

(d) Be necessary for an adequate provider network for the medicaid program;

(e) Demonstrate a plan for long-term financial sustainability; and

(f) Meet one of the following criteria:

(i) Lack adequate cash-on-hand to remain financially solvent;

(ii) Have experienced financial losses during hospital fiscal year 2022; or

(iii) Be at risk of bankruptcy.

(63)(a) Sufficient funds are provided in this section for an outpatient directed payment program.

(b) The authority shall:

(i) Maintain the program to support the state's access and other quality of care goals and to not increase general fund—state expenditures;

(ii) Seek approval from the centers for medicare and medicaid services to expand the medicaid outpatient directed payment program for hospital outpatient services provided to medicaid program managed care recipients by UW Medicine hospitals and, at their option, UW Medicine affiliated hospitals;

(iii) Direct managed care organizations to make payments to eligible providers at levels required to ensure enrollees have timely access to critical high-quality care as allowed under 42 C.F.R. 438.6(c); and

(iv) Increase medicaid payments for hospital outpatient services provided by UW Medicine hospitals and, at their option, UW Medicine affiliated hospitals to the average payment received from commercial payers.

(c) Any incremental costs incurred by the authority in the development, implementation, and maintenance of this program shall be the responsibility of the participating hospitals.

(d) Participating hospitals shall retain the full amount of payments provided under this program.

(64)(a) No more than $200,661,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation and no more than $91,430,000 of the general fund—local appropriation may be expended for an inpatient directed payment program.

(b) The authority shall:

(i) Design the program to support the state's access and other quality of care goals and to not increase general fund—state expenditures;

(ii) Seek approval from the centers for medicare and medicaid services to create a medicaid inpatient directed payment program for hospital inpatient services provided to medicaid program managed care recipients by UW Medicine hospitals and, at their option, UW Medicine affiliated hospitals;

(iii) Upon approval, direct managed care organizations to make payments to eligible providers at levels required to ensure enrollees have timely access to critical high-quality care as allowed under 42 C.F.R. 438.6(c); and

(iv) Increase medicaid payments for hospital inpatient services provided by UW Medicine and, at their option, UW Medicine affiliated hospitals to the average payment received from commercial payers.

(c) Any incremental costs incurred by the authority in the development, implementation, and maintenance of this program shall be the responsibility of the participating hospitals.

(d) Participating hospitals shall retain the full amount of payments provided under this program.

(e) Participating hospitals will provide the local funds to fund the required nonfederal contribution.

(f) This program shall be effective as soon as administratively possible.

(65) $1,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5103 (medicaid patients/discharge). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(66)(a) $9,563,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $12,727,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $259,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to implement a five-site pilot program for difficult to discharge individuals as described in section 135(12) of this act.

(b) The authority shall work in collaboration with the contractor and task force identified in section 135(12) of this act to carry out the goals and objectives of the pilot program, including but not limited to:

(i) Providing enhanced care management and wraparound services that shall be provided by or delegated by managed care pilot participants, based on services currently provided by the Harborview medical center program;

(ii) Providing incentive payments to participating postacute care providers;

(iii) Developing home and community services assessment timeliness requirements for pilot participants in cooperation with the department of social and health services; and

(iv) Providing reimbursement for administrative support through Harborview medical center for the duration of the pilot project, including training and education to support pilot participants.

(c) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $44,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $42,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $259,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to provide staff support to the difficult to discharge task force described in section 135(12) of this act, including any associated ad hoc subgroups.

(67)(a) Within the amounts appropriated in this section the authority, in consultation with the health and human services enterprise coalition, community-based organizations, health plans, accountable communities of health, and safety net providers, shall determine the cost and implementation impacts of a statewide community information exchange (CIE). A CIE platform must serve as a tool for addressing the social determinants of health, defined as nonclinical community and social factors such as housing, food security, transportation, financial strain, and interpersonal safety, that affect health, functioning, and quality-of-life outcomes.

(b) Prior to issuing a request for proposals or beginning this project, the authority must work with stakeholders in (a) of this subsection to determine which platforms already exist within the Washington public and private health care system to determine interoperability needs and fiscal impacts to both the state and impacted providers and organizations that will be using a single statewide community information exchange platform.

(c) Any community information exchange solution must ensure patient privacy and the ability for the patient to self-navigate.

(d) The authority shall provide the office of financial management and fiscal committees of the legislature a proposal to leverage medicaid enterprise financing or other federal funds prior to beginning this project and shall not expend funds under a 1115 waiver or any other waiver without legislative authorization.

(68) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall develop a plan to provide technical assistance to new medicaid providers, with a focus on doulas historically practicing outside the traditional health care system. The authority shall engage with practicing doulas serving historically marginalized communities, users of maternity doula services, and the department of health, in development of the plan.

(69) $76,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $76,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, $152,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation, and $606,000 of the telebehavioral health access account—state appropriation are provided solely for additional staff support for the mental health referral service for children and teens.

(70) $1,608,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,015,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $3,681,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a rate increase for the health homes program for fee-for-service enrollees, beginning July 1, 2023.

(71) $295,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $307,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $123,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the first approach skills training program through the partnership access line.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 212. FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY—PUBLIC EMPLOYEES' BENEFITS BOARD AND EMPLOYEE BENEFITS PROGRAM

State Health Care Authority Administrative Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$43,651,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$43,651,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Any savings from reduced claims costs must be reserved for funding employee benefits during future fiscal biennia and may not be used for administrative expenses. The health care authority shall deposit any moneys received on behalf of the uniform medical plan resulting from rebates on prescription drugs, audits of hospitals, subrogation payments, or any other moneys received as a result of prior uniform medical plan claims payments, in the public employees' and retirees' insurance account to be used for insurance benefits.

(2) Any changes to benefits must be approved by the public employees' benefits board. The board shall not make any changes to benefits without considering a comprehensive analysis of the cost of those changes, and shall not increase benefits unless offsetting cost reductions from other benefit revisions are sufficient to fund the changes. The board shall not make any change in retiree eligibility criteria that reestablishes eligibility for enrollment in retiree benefits.

(3) Except as may be provided in a health care bargaining agreement pursuant to RCW 41.80.020, to provide benefits within the level of funding provided in part IX of this bill, the public employees' benefits board shall require: Employee premium copayments, increases in point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of managed competition, or make other changes to benefits consistent with RCW 41.05.065.

(4) The board shall collect a surcharge payment of not less than $25 per month from members who use tobacco products, and a surcharge payment of not less than $50 per month from members who cover a spouse or domestic partner where the spouse or domestic partner has chosen not to enroll in another employer-based group health insurance that has benefits and premiums with an actuarial value of not less than 95 percent of the actuarial value of the public employees' benefits board plan with the largest enrollment. The surcharge payments shall be collected in addition to the member premium payment.

(5) $500,000 of the state health care authority administrative account—state appropriation is provided solely for consultation with retirees, including conducting listening sessions and facilitating public forums to gather feedback about retiree needs. By December 1, 2023, the authority must report to the legislature with its findings, including an analysis of government self-insured plans with benefits that are equal to or richer, and with more affordable premiums, than uniform medical plan classic medicare. The legislature intends that the results of stakeholder engagements will be used to inform future health care plan selections.

(6) $78,000 of the state health care authority administrative account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5696 (PEBB/political subdivisions). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(7) During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the health care authority, in consultation with the office of financial management, shall review consolidating the administrative sections of the operating budget for the public employees' and school employees' benefits boards. Any change in budget structure must not result in changes to board or benefit policies. A budget structure change developed under this subsection may be included in the 2024 supplemental or the 2025-2027 biennial governor's budget submittal without being subject to the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee approval under RCW 43.88.030(7).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 213. FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY—SCHOOL EMPLOYEES' BENEFITS BOARD

School Employees' Insurance Administrative Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$33,482,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$33,482,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $324,000 of the school employees' insurance administrative account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5275 (SEBB benefit access). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 214. FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY—HEALTH BENEFIT EXCHANGE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$7,813,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$6,870,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$61,781,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$350,000

Health Benefit Exchange Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$76,214,000

State Health Care Affordability Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$129,615,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$282,643,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The receipt and use of medicaid funds provided to the health benefit exchange from the health care authority are subject to compliance with state and federal regulations and policies governing the Washington apple health programs, including timely and proper application, eligibility, and enrollment procedures.

(2)(a) By July 15th and January 15th of each year, the authority shall make a payment of one-half the general fund—state appropriation, one-half the health benefit exchange account—state appropriation, and one-half the health care affordability account—state appropriation to the exchange.

(b) The exchange shall monitor actual to projected revenues and make necessary adjustments in expenditures or carrier assessments to ensure expenditures do not exceed actual revenues.

(c) Payments made from general fund—state appropriation and health benefit exchange account—state appropriation shall be available for expenditure for no longer than the period of the appropriation from which it was made. When the actual cost of materials and services have been fully determined, and in no event later than the lapsing of the appropriation, any unexpended balance of the payment shall be returned to the authority for credit to the fund or account from which it was made, and under no condition shall expenditures exceed actual revenue.

(3) $1,939,000 of the health benefit exchange account—state appropriation and $6,189,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the modernizing healthplanfinder project. These amounts are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(4) $100,000,000 of the state health care affordability account—state appropriation is provided solely for the exchange to administer a premium assistance program, beginning for plan year 2023, as established in RCW 43.71.110. The amounts provided in this subsection and subsection (5)(a) of this section are the maximum amounts the exchange may expend for this purpose. An individual is eligible for the premium assistance provided if the individual: (a) Has income up to 250 percent of the federal poverty level; and (b) meets other eligibility criteria as established in RCW 43.71.110.

(5)(a) $29,615,000 of the state health care affordability account—state appropriation is provided solely to provide premium assistance for individuals ineligible for federal premium tax credits who meet the eligibility criteria established in subsection (4) of this section, and is contingent upon approval of the waiver described in RCW 43.71.120.

(b) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the exchange to administer the premium assistance program described in (a) of this subsection. The exchange shall:

(i) Develop culturally relevant materials and conduct outreach for historically marginalized and underserved populations who are ineligible for federal premium tax credits to assist these populations in their knowledge of access to low cost or free health insurance plans;

(ii) Collaborate with community stakeholders to ensure that materials used for entry into healthplanfinder and questions asked to obtain insurance are understandable, flexible, culturally appropriate, and culturally responsive; and

(iii) Collect data subject to the requirements of the waiver described in RCW 43.71.110.

(6) $102,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $865,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation, and $123,000 of the health benefit exchange account—state appropriation are provided solely for a technology solution for an authoritative client identifier, or master person index, for state programs within the health and human services coalition to uniformly identify clients across multiple service delivery systems. The coalition will clearly identify all state programs impacted by and all fund sources used in development and implementation of this project. This subsection is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(7) $30,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $30,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5632 (labor disputes/health care). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 215. FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY—COMMUNITY BEHAVIORAL HEALTH PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$980,209,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$1,035,348,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,732,901,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$38,826,000

Dedicated Cannabis Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2024)
. . . .
$28,498,000

Dedicated Cannabis Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2025)
. . . .
$28,501,000

Criminal Justice Treatment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$22,001,000

Opioid Settlement Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$46,751,000

Problem Gambling Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,783,000

Statewide 988 Behavioral Health Crisis Response Line

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$9,989,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$4,924,807,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) For the purposes of this section, "behavioral health entities" means managed care organizations and behavioral health administrative services organizations that reimburse providers for behavioral health services.

(2) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is provided for implementation of the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States District Court for the Western District of Washington, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP. In addition to amounts provided solely for implementation of the settlement agreement, class members must have access to supports and services funded throughout this section for which they meet eligibility and medical necessity requirements. The authority must include language in contracts that requires regional behavioral health entities to develop and implement plans for improving access to timely and appropriate treatment for individuals with behavioral health needs and current or prior criminal justice involvement who are eligible for services under these contracts.

(3) $39,748,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $43,307,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $17,488,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to continue the phase-in of the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States District Court for the Western District of Washington, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP. The authority, in collaboration with the department of social and health services and the criminal justice training commission, must implement the provisions of the settlement agreement pursuant to the timeline and implementation plan provided for under the settlement agreement. This includes implementing provisions related to competency evaluations, competency restoration, crisis diversion and supports, education and training, and workforce development.

(4) $5,108,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $6,341,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5440 (competency evaluations). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(5) $12,359,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $12,359,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $23,444,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority and behavioral health entities to continue to contract for implementation of high-intensity programs for assertive community treatment (PACT) teams. In determining the proportion of medicaid and nonmedicaid funding provided to behavioral health entities with PACT teams, the authority shall consider the differences between behavioral health entities in the percentages of services and other costs associated with the teams that are not reimbursable under medicaid. The authority may allow behavioral health entities which have nonmedicaid reimbursable costs that are higher than the nonmedicaid allocation they receive under this section to supplement these funds with local dollars or funds received under subsection (7) of this section. The authority and behavioral health entities shall maintain consistency with all essential elements of the PACT evidence-based practice model in programs funded under this section.

(6) $3,520,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the authority to maintain a pilot project to incorporate peer bridging staff into behavioral health regional teams that provide transitional services to individuals returning to their communities.

(7) $129,998,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $138,663,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for persons and services not covered by the medicaid program. To the extent possible, levels of behavioral health entity spending must be maintained in the following priority order: Crisis and commitment services; community inpatient services; and residential care services, including personal care and emergency housing assistance. These amounts must be distributed to behavioral health entities as follows:

(a) $95,700,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $103,124,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to contract with behavioral health administrative service organizations for behavioral health treatment services not covered under the medicaid program.

(b) $34,299,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $35,539,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to contract with medicaid managed care organizations for wraparound services to medicaid enrolled individuals that are not covered under the medicaid program and for the state share of costs for exceptional medicaid behavioral health personal care services. Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the authority shall assure that managed care organizations reimburse the department of social and health services aging and long term support administration for the general fund—state cost of exceptional behavioral health personal care services for medicaid enrolled individuals who require these because of a psychiatric disability. Funding for the federal share of these services is separately appropriated to the department of social and health services.

(c) Pursuant to RCW 41.56.029, during fiscal year 2024, the authority may work with the office of financial management to negotiate a tiered rate structure for behavioral health personal care services for adult family home providers serving medicaid enrollees. An agreement reached with the adult family home council must be submitted to the director of financial management by October 1, 2023, and certified as financially feasible in order to be considered for funding during the 2024 legislative session. Upon completion of bargaining, the authority shall coordinate with the department of social and health services to develop and submit to the centers for medicare and medicaid services an application to provide a 1915(i) state plan home and community-based services benefit. The application shall be developed to allow for the delivery of wraparound supportive behavioral health services for individuals with mental illnesses who also have a personal care need. The waiver shall be developed to standardize coverage and administration, improve the current benefit design, and clarify roles in administration of the behavioral health personal care services benefit.

(8) The authority is authorized to continue to contract directly, rather than through contracts with behavioral health entities for children's long-term inpatient facility services.

(9) $1,204,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,204,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to reimburse Pierce and Spokane counties for the cost of conducting 180-day commitment hearings at the state psychiatric hospitals.

(10) Behavioral health entities may use local funds to earn additional federal medicaid match, provided the locally matched rate does not exceed the upper-bound of their federally allowable rate range, and provided that the enhanced funding is used only to provide medicaid state plan or waiver services to medicaid clients. Additionally, behavioral health entities may use a portion of the state funds allocated in accordance with subsection (7) of this section to earn additional medicaid match, but only to the extent that the application of such funds to medicaid services does not diminish the level of crisis and commitment, community inpatient, residential care, and outpatient services presently available to persons not eligible for medicaid.

(11) $2,291,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,291,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for mental health services for mentally ill offenders while confined in a county or city jail and for facilitating access to programs that offer mental health services upon release from confinement. The authority must collect information from the behavioral health entities on their plan for using these funds, the numbers of individuals served, and the types of services provided and submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1st of each year of the fiscal biennium.

(12) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is provided for the authority to develop and phase in intensive mental health services for high needs youth consistent with the settlement agreement in T.R. v. Dreyfus and Porter.

(13) The authority must work with actuaries responsible for setting medicaid managed care rates to establish minimum and maximum reserve levels allowed under behavioral health administrative services organization contracts informed by the amount of risk carried by behavioral health administrative service organizations for mandatory and nondiscretionary services funded by these organizations. The authority must include contract language that clearly states the requirements and limitations of such reserves. The authority must monitor and ensure that behavioral health administrative service organization reserves do not exceed maximum levels. The authority must monitor revenue and expenditure reports and must require a behavioral health administrative service organization to submit a corrective action plan on how it will spend its excess reserves within a reasonable period of time, when its reported reserves exceed maximum levels established under the contract. The authority must review and approve such plans and monitor to ensure compliance. If the authority determines that a behavioral health administrative service organization has failed to provide an adequate excess reserve corrective action plan or is not complying with an approved plan, the authority must reduce payments to the entity in accordance with remedial actions provisions included in the contract. These reductions in payments must continue until the authority determines that the entity has come into substantial compliance with an approved excess reserve corrective action plan.

(14) During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, any amounts provided in this section that are used for case management services for pregnant and parenting women must be contracted directly between the authority and pregnant and parenting women case management providers.

(15) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority may contract with the University of Washington and community-based providers for the provision of the parent-child assistance program or other specialized chemical dependency case management providers for pregnant, post-partum, and parenting women. For all contractors: (a) Service and other outcome data must be provided to the authority by request; and (b) indirect charges for administering the program must not exceed 10 percent of the total contract amount.

(16) $3,500,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the continued funding of existing county drug and alcohol use prevention programs.

(17) Within the amounts provided in this section, behavioral health entities must provide outpatient chemical dependency treatment for offenders enrolled in the medicaid program who are supervised by the department of corrections pursuant to a term of community supervision. Contracts with behavioral health entities must require that behavioral health entities include in their provider network specialized expertise in the provision of manualized, evidence-based chemical dependency treatment services for offenders. The department of corrections and the authority must develop a memorandum of understanding for department of corrections offenders on active supervision who are medicaid eligible and meet medical necessity for outpatient substance use disorder treatment. The agreement will ensure that treatment services provided are coordinated, do not result in duplication of services, and maintain access and quality of care for the individuals being served. The authority must provide all necessary data, access, and reports to the department of corrections for all department of corrections offenders that receive medicaid paid services.

(18) The criminal justice treatment account—state appropriation is provided solely for treatment and treatment support services for offenders with a substance use disorder pursuant to RCW 71.24.580. The authority must offer counties the option to administer their share of the distributions provided for under RCW 71.24.580(5)(a). If a county is not interested in administering the funds, the authority shall contract with behavioral health entities to administer these funds consistent with the plans approved by local panels pursuant to RCW 71.24.580(5)(b). Funding from the criminal justice treatment account may be used to provide treatment and support services through the conclusion of an individual's treatment plan to individuals participating in a drug court program as of February 24, 2021, if that individual wishes to continue treatment following dismissal of charges they were facing under RCW 69.50.4013(1). Such participation is voluntary and contingent upon substantial compliance with drug court program requirements. The authority must provide a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature which identifies the distribution of criminal justice treatment account funds by September 30, 2023.

(19)(a) $11,426,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $15,501,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $21,544,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for crisis triage facilities, crisis relief centers, or crisis stabilization units. Services in these facilities may include crisis stabilization and intervention, individual counseling, peer support, medication management, education, and referral assistance. The authority shall monitor each center's effectiveness at lowering the rate of state psychiatric hospital admissions.

(b) Sufficient funding is provided in this subsection to implement Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5120 (crisis relief centers).

(20) $9,795,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $10,015,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $15,025,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the operation of secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities. The authority may not use any of these amounts for services in facilities that are subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions for mental diseases, unless they have received a waiver that allows for full federal participation in these facilities. Within these amounts, funding is provided to increase the fee-for-service rate for these facilities up to $650 per day. The authority must require in contracts with behavioral health entities that, beginning in calendar year 2020, they pay no lower than the fee-for-service rate. The authority must coordinate with regional behavioral health entities to identify and implement purchasing strategies or regulatory changes that increase access to services for individuals with complex behavioral health needs at secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities.

(21) $23,090,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $23,090,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $92,444,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to maintain the enhancement of community-based behavioral health services that was initially funded in fiscal year 2019. Twenty percent of the general fund—state appropriation amounts for each regional service area must be contracted to the behavioral health administrative services organizations and used to increase their nonmedicaid funding allocations and the remainder must be provided to the medicaid managed care organizations providing apple health integrated managed care. The medicaid funding is intended to maintain increased rates for behavioral health services provided by licensed and certified community behavioral health agencies as defined by the department of health. For the behavioral health administrative services organizations, this funding must be allocated to each region based upon the population of the region. For managed care organizations, this funding must be provided through the behavioral health portion of the medicaid integrated managed care capitation rates. The authority must require the managed care organizations to provide a report that details the methodology the managed care organization used to distribute this funding to their contracted behavioral health providers. The report submitted by behavioral health administrative service organizations and managed care organizations must identify mechanisms employed to disperse the funding as well as estimated impacts to behavioral health providers in the community. The authority must submit a report to the legislature by December 1st of each year of the fiscal biennium, summarizing the information regarding the distribution of the funding provided under this subsection.

(22) $1,401,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,401,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $3,210,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of intensive behavioral health treatment facilities within the community behavioral health service system pursuant to chapter 324, Laws of 2019 (concerning community facilities needed to ensure a continuum of care for behavioral health patients).

(23)(a) $12,878,000 of the dedicated cannabis account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $12,878,000 of the dedicated cannabis account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided for:

(i) A memorandum of understanding with the department of children, youth, and families to provide substance abuse treatment programs;

(ii) A contract with the Washington state institute for public policy to conduct a cost-benefit evaluation of the implementations of chapter 3, Laws of 2013 (Initiative Measure No. 502);

(iii) Designing and administering the Washington state healthy youth survey and the Washington state young adult behavioral health survey;

(iv) Maintaining increased services to pregnant and parenting women provided through the parent child assistance program;

(v) Grants to the office of the superintendent of public instruction for life skills training to children and youth;

(vi) Maintaining increased prevention and treatment service provided by tribes and federally recognized American Indian organization to children and youth;

(vii) Maintaining increased residential treatment services for children and youth;

(viii) Training and technical assistance for the implementation of evidence-based, research based, and promising programs which prevent or reduce substance use disorder;

(ix) Expenditures into the home visiting services account; and

(x) Grants to community-based programs that provide prevention services or activities to youth.

(b) The authority must allocate the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection amongst the specific activities proportionate to the fiscal year 2021 allocation.

(24)(a) $1,125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for Spokane behavioral health entities to implement services to reduce utilization and the census at eastern state hospital. Such services must include:

(i) A high intensity treatment team for persons who are high utilizers of psychiatric inpatient services, including those with co-occurring disorders and other special needs;

(ii) Crisis outreach and diversion services to stabilize in the community individuals in crisis who are at risk of requiring inpatient care or jail services;

(iii) Mental health services provided in nursing facilities to individuals with dementia, and consultation to facility staff treating those individuals; and

(iv) Services at the 16-bed evaluation and treatment facility.

(b) At least annually, the Spokane county behavioral health entities shall assess the effectiveness of these services in reducing utilization at eastern state hospital, identify services that are not optimally effective, and modify those services to improve their effectiveness.

(25) $1,850,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,850,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $13,312,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for substance use disorder peer support services included in behavioral health capitation rates in accordance with section 213(5)(ss), chapter 299, Laws of 2018. The authority shall require managed care organizations to provide access to peer support services for individuals with substance use disorders transitioning from emergency departments, inpatient facilities, or receiving treatment as part of hub and spoke networks.

(26) $1,423,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,423,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $5,908,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to continue to implement discharge wraparound services for individuals with complex behavioral health conditions transitioning or being diverted from admission to psychiatric inpatient programs. The authority must coordinate with the department of social and health services in establishing the standards for these programs.

(27) $350,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely to contract with a nationally recognized recovery residence organization and to provide technical assistance to operators of recovery residences seeking certification in accordance with RCW 41.05.761.

(28) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to maintain a memorandum of understanding with the criminal justice training commission to provide funding for community grants pursuant to RCW 36.28A.450.

(29) $3,396,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $3,396,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $16,200,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for support of and to continue to increase clubhouse programs across the state. The authority shall work with the centers for medicare and medicaid services to review opportunities to include clubhouse services as an optional "in lieu of" service in managed care organization contracts in order to maximize federal participation.

(30) $708,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $708,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,598,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementing mental health peer respite centers and a pilot project to implement a mental health drop-in center in accordance with chapter 324, Laws of 2019 (concerning community facilities needed to ensure a continuum of care for behavioral health patients).

(31) $446,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $446,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $178,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the University of Washington's evidence-based practice institute which supports the identification, evaluation, and implementation of evidence-based or promising practices. The institute must work with the authority to develop a plan to seek private, federal, or other grant funding in order to reduce the need for state general funds. The authority must collect information from the institute on the use of these funds and submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1st of each year of the biennium.

(32) As an element of contractual network adequacy requirements and reporting, the authority shall direct managed care organizations to make all reasonable efforts to develop or maintain contracts with provider networks that leverage local, federal, or philanthropic funding to enhance effectiveness of medicaid-funded integrated care services. These networks must promote medicaid clients' access to a system of services that addresses additional social support services and social determinants of health as defined in RCW 43.20.025 in a manner that is integrated with the delivery of behavioral health and medical treatment services.

(33) $9,000,000 of the criminal justice treatment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the authority to maintain funding for new therapeutic courts created or expanded during fiscal year 2021, or to maintain the fiscal year 2021 expansion of services being provided to an already existing therapeutic court that engages in evidence-based practices, to include medication assisted treatment in jail settings pursuant to RCW 71.24.580. Funding provided under this subsection shall not supplant existing funds utilized for this purpose.

(34) In establishing, re-basing, enhancing, or otherwise updating medicaid rates for behavioral health services, the authority and contracted actuaries shall use a transparent process that provides an opportunity for medicaid managed care organizations, behavioral health administrative service organizations, and behavioral health provider agencies, and their representatives, to review and provide data and feedback on proposed rate changes within their region or regions of service operation. The authority and contracted actuaries shall transparently incorporate the information gained from this process and make adjustments allowable under federal law when appropriate.

(35) The authority shall seek input from representatives of the managed care organizations, licensed community behavioral health agencies, and behavioral health administrative service organizations to develop specific metrics related to behavioral health outcomes under integrated managed care. These metrics must include, but are not limited to: (a) Revenues and expenditures for community behavioral health programs, including medicaid and nonmedicaid funding; (b) access to services, service denials, and utilization by state plan modality; (c) claims denials and record of timely payment to providers; (d) client demographics; and (e) social and recovery measures and managed care organization performance measures. The authority must work with managed care organizations and behavioral health administrative service organizations to integrate these metrics into an annual reporting structure designed to evaluate the performance of the behavioral health system in the state over time. The authority shall submit a report for the preceding calendar year to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature on or before December 30th of each year detailing the implemented metrics and relevant performance outcomes for the prior calendar year.

(36) $4,061,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $3,773,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $6,419,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to continue three pilot programs for intensive outpatient services and partial hospitalization services for certain children and adolescents and to integrate intensive outpatient services and partial hospitalization services for children and adolescents into the state's medicaid plan beginning January 1, 2024.

(a) The authority must establish minimum standards, eligibility criteria, authorization and utilization review processes, and payment methodologies for the pilot programs in contract.

(b) Eligibility for the pilot sites is limited pursuant to the following:

(i) Children and adolescents discharged from an inpatient hospital treatment program who require the level of services offered by the pilot programs in lieu of continued inpatient treatment;

(ii) Children and adolescents who require the level of services offered by the pilot programs in order to avoid inpatient hospitalization; and

(iii) Services may not be offered if there are less costly alternative community based services that can effectively meet the needs of an individual referred to the program.

(c) The authority must collect data on the pilot sites and work with the actuaries responsible for establishing managed care rates for medicaid enrollees to develop and submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature. A report must be submitted annually by December 1 of each year. The reports must include the following information:

(i) A narrative description of the services provided at each pilot site and identification of any specific gaps the sites were able to fill in the current continuum of care;

(ii) Clinical outcomes and estimated reductions in psychiatric inpatient costs associated with each of the pilot sites;

(iii) Recommendations for whether the pilot models should be expanded statewide; whether modifications should be made to the models to better address gaps in the continuum identified through the pilot sites, whether the models could be expanded to community behavioral health providers, and whether statewide implementation should be achieved through a state plan amendment or some other mechanism for leveraging federal medicaid match; and

(iv) Actuarial projections on the statewide need for services related to the pilot sites and estimated costs of adding each of the services to the medicaid behavioral health benefit for children and adolescents and adults.

(37) $3,109,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,109,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for short-term rental subsidies for individuals with mental health or substance use disorders. This funding may be used for individuals enrolled in the foundational community support program while waiting for a longer term resource for rental support or for individuals transitioning from behavioral health treatment facilities or local jails. Individuals who would otherwise be eligible for the foundational community support program but are not eligible because of their citizenship status may also be served.

(38) $500,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely to establish an emotional support network program for individuals employed as peer specialists. The authority must contract for these services which shall include, but not be limited to, facilitating support groups for peer specialists, support for the recovery journeys of the peer specialists themselves, and targeted support for the secondary trauma inherent in peer work.

(39) $1,250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to contract with the King county behavioral health administrative services organization to maintain children's crisis outreach response system services that were previously funded through the department of children, youth, and families.

(40) $661,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,785,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $3,446,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to maintain rates for community children's long-term inpatient program providers at $1,030 per diem and to increase rates by an additional 9.2 percent, effective January 1, 2024.

(41) $15,474,000 of the generalfund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $15,474,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $18,835,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for local behavioral health mobile crisis response team capacity and ensuring each region has at least one adult and one children and youth mobile crisis team that is able to respond to calls coming into the 988 crisis hotline. Of these amounts, $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $2,024,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to continue increased capacity for mobile crisis services in King county. These amounts must supplement and not supplant funding to the county previously allocated by the authority under this subsection.

(42) $9,182,000 of the statewide 988 behavioral health crisis response line account—state appropriation and $4,523,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for additional crisis response capacity to enhance the state's 988 crisis response system, including mobile crisis and stabilization services.

(43) $64,980,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $72,852,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $120,240,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to contract with community hospitals or freestanding evaluation and treatment centers to provide long-term inpatient care beds as defined in RCW 71.24.025. Within these amounts, the authority must meet the requirements for reimbursing counties for the judicial services for patients being served in these settings in accordance with RCW 71.05.730. Of the amounts in this subsection, sufficient amounts are provided in fiscal year 2024 and fiscal year 2025 for the authority to reimburse community hospitals and nonhospital residential treatment centers serving clients in long-term inpatient care beds as defined in RCW 71.24.025 as follows:

(a) For a hospital licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW that requires a hospital specific medicaid inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate for long-term civil commitment patients because the hospital has completed a medicare cost report, the authority shall analyze the most recent medicare cost report of the hospital after a minimum of 200 medicaid inpatient psychiatric days. The authority shall establish the inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate for long-term civil commitment patients for the hospital at 100 percent of the allowable cost of care, based on the most recent medicare cost report of the hospital.

(b) For a hospital licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW that has not completed a medicare cost report with more than 200 medicaid inpatient psychiatric days, the authority shall establish the medicaid inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate for long-term civil commitment patients for the hospital at the higher of the hospital's current medicaid inpatient psychiatric rate; or the annually updated statewide average of the medicaid inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate of all acute care hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW providing long-term civil commitment services.

(c) For a hospital licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW and currently providing long-term civil commitment services, the authority shall establish the medicaid inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate at $940 plus adjustments that may be needed to capture costs associated with long-term psychiatric patients that are not allowable on the medicare cost report or reimbursed separately. The hospital may provide the authority with supplemental data to be considered and used to make appropriate adjustments to the medicaid inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate of the hospital. Adjustment of costs may include:

(i) Costs associated with professional services and fees not accounted for in the hospital's medicare cost report or reimbursed separately;

(ii) Costs associated with the hospital providing the long-term psychiatric patient access to involuntary treatment court services that are not reimbursed separately; and

(iii) Other costs associated with caring for long-term psychiatric patients that are not reimbursed separately.

(d) For a hospital licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW that requires an initial medicaid inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate for long-term civil commitment services because it has not yet completed a medicare cost report, the authority shall establish the medicaid inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate at the higher of:

(i) The hospital's current medicaid inpatient psychiatric rate; or

(ii) The annually updated statewide average of the medicaid long-term inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate of all freestanding psychiatric hospitals licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW providing long-term civil commitment services.

(e) For nonhospital residential treatment centers certified to provide long-term inpatient care beds as defined in RCW 71.24.025, the authority shall establish the medicaid inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate at $931.

(f) Provider payments for vacant bed days shall not exceed six percent of their annual contracted bed days.

(g) The authority, in coordination with the department of social and health services, the office of the governor, the office of financial management, and representatives from medicaid managed care organizations, behavioral health administrative service organizations, and community providers, must develop and implement a plan to continue the expansion of civil community long-term inpatient capacity. The plan shall identify gaps and barriers in the current array of community long-term inpatient beds in serving higher need individuals including those committed to a state hospital pursuant to the dismissal of criminal charges and a civil evaluation ordered under RCW 10.77.086 or 10.77.088. The plan shall identify strategies to overcome these barriers including, but not limited to, potential rate enhancements for high needs clients.

(h) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $5,150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $5,150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to pilot an enhanced rate model at two civil commitment sites for patients who are committed pursuant to the dismissal of criminal charges and a civil evaluation ordered under RCW 10.77.086 or 10.77.088. It is the intent of the legislature that this acuity-based rate enhancement be added to the state's medicaid plan in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium.

(44) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $125,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to contract for the development of a cost-based rate and reporting process for state-operated evaluation and treatment centers where the population served includes individuals committed to involuntary treatment pursuant to the dismissal of criminal charges and a civil evaluation ordered under RCW 10.77.086 or 10.77.088. A report summarizing this rate structure must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature by January 1, 2024.

(45) $2,184,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation and $2,184,000 of the general fund—local appropriation are provided solely for supported housing and employment services described in initiative 3a and 3b of the 1115 demonstration waiver and this is the maximum amount that may be expended for this purpose. Under this initiative, the authority and the department of social and health services shall ensure that allowable and necessary services are provided to eligible clients as identified by the authority or its providers or third party administrator. The department and the authority in consultation with the medical assistance expenditure forecast work group, shall ensure that reasonable reimbursements are established for services deemed necessary within an identified limit per individual. The authority shall not increase general fund—state expenditures above appropriated levels for this specific purpose. The secretary in collaboration with the director of the authority shall report to the joint select committee on health care oversight no less than quarterly on financial and health outcomes. The secretary in cooperation with the director shall also report to the fiscal committees of the legislature the expenditures of this subsection and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested by the legislative fiscal committees.

(46) Within the amounts provided in this section, sufficient funding is provided for the authority to maintain and increase the capabilities of a tool to track medication assisted treatment provider capacity.

(47) $18,188,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $18,188,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for claims for services rendered to medicaid eligible clients admitted to institutions of mental disease that were determined to be unallowable for federal reimbursement due to medicaid's institutions for mental disease exclusion rules. Of these amounts, $20,042,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for belated claims for services that were rendered prior to fiscal year 2024.

(48) $6,010,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $6,010,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,980,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority, in coordination with the department of health, to deploy an opioid awareness campaign and to contract with syringe service programs and other service settings assisting people with substance use disorders to: Prevent and respond to overdoses; provide other harm reduction services and supplies, including but not limited to distributing naloxone, fentanyl, and other drug testing supplies; and for expanding contingency management services. The authority is encouraged to use these funds to leverage federal funding for this purpose to expand buying power. The authority should prioritize funds for naloxone distribution for programs or settings that are least likely to be able to bill medicaid. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to deploy an opioid awareness campaign targeted at youth to increase the awareness of the dangers of fentanyl.

(49) $998,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $998,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $618,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to contract for three regional behavioral health mobile crisis response teams focused on supported housing to prevent individuals with behavioral health conditions at high risk of losing housing from becoming homeless, identify and prioritize serving the most vulnerable people experiencing homelessness, and increase alternative housing options to include short-term alternatives which may temporarily deescalate situations where there is high risk of a household from becoming homeless.

(50) The authority shall continue to incorporate community behavioral health service data elements into the monthly executive management information system reports on a phased-in basis, allowing for elements which are readily available to be incorporated in the initial phase, and elements which require further definition and data collection changes to be incorporated in a later phase. The authority must collaborate with the research and data analysis division to ensure data elements are clearly defined and must include requirements in medicaid managed care organization and behavioral health administrative services organization contracts to provide the data in a consistent and timely manner for inclusion into the system. The community behavioral health executive management system information data elements must include, but are not limited to: Psychiatric inpatient bed days; evaluation and treatment center bed days; long-term involuntary community psychiatric inpatient bed days; children's long-term inpatient bed days; substance use disorder inpatient, residential, withdrawal evaluation and management, and secure withdrawal evaluation and management bed days; crisis triage and stabilization services bed days; mental health residential bed days; mental health and substance use disorder outpatient treatment services; opioid substitution and medication assisted treatment services; program of assertive treatment team services; wraparound with intensive services; mobile outreach crisis services; recovery navigator team services; foundational community supports housing and employment services; projects for assistance in transition from homelessness services; housing and recovery through peer services; other housing services administered by the authority; mental health and substance use disorder peer services; designated crisis responder investigations and outcomes; involuntary commitment hearings and outcomes; pregnant and parenting women case management services; and single bed certifications and no available bed reports. Wherever possible and practical, the data must include historical monthly counts and shall be broken out to distinguish services to medicaid and nonmedicaid individuals and children and adults. The authority and the research and data analysis division must consult with the office of financial management and staff from the fiscal committees of the legislature on the development and implementation of the community behavioral health data elements.

(51) $2,587,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,587,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to support efforts by counties and cities to implement local response teams. Of these amounts:

(a) $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to provide a grant to the association of Washington cities to assist cities with the costs of implementing alternative response teams. This funding must be used to reimburse cities for documented costs associated with creating co-responder teams within different alternative diversion models including law enforcement assisted diversion programs, community assistance referral and education programs, and as part of mobile crisis teams. Cities are encouraged to partner with each other to create a regional response model. In awarding these funds, the association must prioritize applicants with demonstrated capacity for facility-based crisis triage and stabilization services. The association and authority must collect and report information regarding the number of facility-based crisis stabilization and triage beds available in the locations receiving funding through this subsection and submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature with this information by December 1 of each year.

(b) $587,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $587,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for operating expenses for an alternative response base station in Whatcom county, including personnel, maintenance, and utility expenses.

(52) $1,135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,136,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to operate a 16-bed substance use disorder inpatient facility in Grays Harbor county that specializes in treating pregnant and parenting women using a family preservation model. The authority must contract for these services through behavioral health entities in a manner that allows leveraging of federal medicaid funds to pay for a portion of the costs. The authority must consult with the department of children, youth, and families in the implementation of this funding. The facility must allow families to reside together while a parent is receiving treatment.

(53) $2,437,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $4,772,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,705,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to contract for youth inpatient navigator services in all 10 regions of the state. The services must be provided through clinical response teams that receive referrals for children and youth inpatient services and manage a process to coordinate placements and alternative community treatment plans.

(54) $69,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $136,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $463,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to increase fee-for-service rates for mental health and substance use disorder treatment by seven percent beginning January 1, 2024. This rate increase does not apply to per diem costs for long-term civil commitment inpatient services. Services affected by the psychiatric rebase in subsection (72) of this section are excluded from this rate increase.

(55) $35,509,000 of the opioid settlement account—state appropriation and $4,352,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for opioid and overdose response activities. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) $2,328,000 of the opioid settlement account—state appropriation and $762,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority and the department of health to administer treatment programs and initiatives funded in this subsection.

(b) $12,362,000 of the opioid settlement account—state appropriation is provided solely for the authority to pass through to tribes and urban Indian health programs for opioid and overdose response activities.

(c) $1,076,000 of the opioid settlement account—state appropriation is provided solely for the authority to establish a substance use disorder professional and peer scholarship program in communities with overdose rates higher than the state average, including BIPOC, rural, and other communities disproportionally impacted by the opioid epidemic. Peer scholarship funding under this subsection may include reimbursement for peer licensing costs under Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5555 (certified peer specialists).

(d) $2,692,000 of the opioid settlement account—state appropriation is provided solely for the expansion of housing first supports, including master leasing, peer support specialists, homeless outreach, and program support staff.

(e) $1,226,000 of the opioid settlement account—state appropriation and $1,788,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for an emergency department bridge program to support staffing, clinical consultation for substance use disorder, and linkage to recovery support services following acute substance use disorder events.

(f) $1,966,000 of the opioid settlement account—state appropriation and $1,802,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the development and implementation of a health promotion and education campaign to focus on synthetic drug supplies and harm reduction messaging for communities and law enforcement.

(g) $3,955,000 of the opioid settlement account—state appropriation is provided solely for services that address underage drinking, cannabis and tobacco prevention, and opioid, prescription, and other drug misuse among individuals between the ages of 12 and 25.

(h) $2,692,000 of the opioid settlement account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants to communities, schools, and tribes for prevention services for youth, young adults, and families in high-risk and high-need areas.

(i) $1,830,000 of the opioid settlement account—state appropriation is provided solely for programs to prevent inappropriate opioid prescribing.

(j) $1,076,000 of the opioid settlement account—state appropriation is provided solely for technical assistance and training for law enforcement organizations, courts, and correctional settings to address misinformation about the harms of fentanyl exposure among law enforcement and first responders.

(k) $538,000 of the opioid settlement account—state appropriation is provided solely for technical support to improve access to medications for opioid use disorder in jails.

(l) $3,768,000 of the opioid settlement account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants to providers to expand opioid treatment program facilities with priority given to rural, frontier, and tribal locations and to applicants who are able to provide mobile services that include wound care and other primary care services.

(56) $14,883,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $29,585,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $80,465,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement a seven percent increase to medicaid reimbursement for community behavioral health providers contracted through managed care organizations to be effective January 1, 2024. The authority must employ mechanisms such as directed payment or other options allowable under federal medicaid law to assure the funding is used by the managed care organizations for a seven percent provider rate increase as intended and verify this pursuant to the process established in chapter 285, Laws of 2020 (establishing rates for behavioral health services). The rate increase shall be implemented to behavioral health inpatient, residential and outpatient providers contracted through the medicaid managed care organizations. Provider services receiving rate increases under other subsections of this section must be excluded from the rate increase directed in this subsection. Inpatient services in free standing psychiatric hospitals or psychiatric units in acute care hospitals are excluded from this rate increase.

(57) $2,266,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $14,151,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $19,269,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the operations of community behavioral health facilities that received capital funding from the community behavioral health capacity grant program at the department of commerce.

(58) $1,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for a federal planning grant related to certified community behavioral health clinics.

(59) $265,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $281,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $546,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to provide trainings to support children with developmental disabilities and behavioral health needs through contracts with the project ECHO (extension for community health care outcomes) and the systemic, therapeutic, assessment, resources, and training (START) program.

(60) $2,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for grants to law enforcement and other first responders to include a mental health professional on the team of personnel responding to emergencies.

(61) $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to the city of Arlington in partnership with the north county regional fire authority for a mobile integrated health pilot project. The project shall provide mobile integrated health services for residents who cannot navigate resources through typical methods through brief therapeutic intervention, biopsychosocial assessment and referral, and community care coordination.

(62) $956,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $956,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for wraparound with intensive services for youth ineligible for medicaid as outlined in the settlement agreement under AGC v. Washington State Health Care Authority, Thurston county superior court no. 21-2-00479-34.

(63) $2,387,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,387,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a bridge period for individuals also enrolled in the foundational community supports initiative who are transitioning from benefits under RCW 74.04.805 due to increased income or other changes in eligibility. The authority, department of social and health services, and department of commerce shall collaborate on this effort.

(64) $2,249,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,249,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to contract with a program to provide medical respite care for individuals with behavioral health needs. The program must serve individuals with significant behavioral health needs and medical issues who do not require hospitalization but are unable to provide adequate self-care for their medical conditions. The program must prioritize services to individuals with complex medical and behavioral health issues who are homeless or who were recently discharged from a hospital setting. The services must meet quality standards and best practices developed by the national health care for the homeless council and may include, but are not limited to, medical oversight and health education; care transitions; and discharge planning to and from primary care, inpatient hospitals, emergency rooms, and supportive housing. In selecting the contractor, the authority must prioritize projects that demonstrate the active involvement of an established medical provider that is able to leverage federal medicaid funding in the provision of these services. The authority must work with the medicaid managed care organizations to encourage their participation and assist the plans and the contractor in identifying mechanisms for appropriate use of medicaid reimbursement in this setting.

(65) $5,623,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $5,623,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $3,748,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to continue and expand access to no barrier and low-barrier programs using a housing first model designed to assist and stabilize housing supports for adults with behavioral health conditions. Housing supports and services shall be made available with no requirement for treatment for their behavioral health condition and must be individualized to the needs of the individual. The authority and department of commerce shall collaborate on this effort, and must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2023.

(66) $190,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $354,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,106,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5228 (behavioral health OT). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(67) $66,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $502,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $171,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5189 (behavioral health support). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(68) $5,132,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,655,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,456,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5555 (certified peer specialists). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(69) $2,068,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,715,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, $3,810,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation, and $11,242,000 of the opioid settlement account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5536 (controlled substances). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) $5,241,000 of the opioid settlement account—state appropriation and $749,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a grant program for providers of employment, education, training, certification, and other supportive programs designed to provide persons recovering from a substance use disorder with employment opportunities. The grant program shall employ a low-barrier application and give priority to programs that engage with black, indigenous, persons of color, and other historically underserved communities.

(b) $6,000,000 of the opioid settlement account—state appropriation is provided solely for the authority to expand health engagement hub capacity within the state.

(c) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $100,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for initial planning and development for a directory of recovery services statewide.

(d) $561,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $561,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $989,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to contract with the administrative office of the courts to reimburse local courts for the cost of substance use disorder assessments.

(70) $158,000 of the problem gambling services account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5634 (problem gambling). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(71) $67,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $89,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $133,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5438 (supportive relationships). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(72) $4,944,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $9,888,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $37,247,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to rebase community hospital psychiatric inpatient rates effective January 1, 2024. Rebasing adjustment shall be based on adjusted calendar year 2020 medicare cost reports. Long-term civil commitment rates are excluded from this adjustment.

(73) $39,854,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $39,854,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $5,402,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to continue initiatives originally funded in chapter 311, Laws of 2021 (State v. Blake decision). Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) $22,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $22,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to contract with behavioral health administrative service organizations to continue the statewide recovery navigator program established in RCW 71.24.115 and for related technical assistance to support this implementation. This includes funding for recovery navigator teams to provide community-based outreach and case management services based on the law enforcement assisted diversion model and for technical assistance support from the law enforcement assisted diversion national support bureau.

(b) $3,114,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $3,114,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $5,402,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to implement clubhouse services in every region of the state.

(c) $7,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $7,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to continue the homeless outreach stabilization team program established in RCW 71.24.145.

(d) $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to expand efforts to provide opioid use disorder medication in city, county, regional, and tribal jails.

(e) $1,400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for behavioral health administrative service organizations to develop regional recovery navigator program plans and to establish positions focusing on regional planning to improve access to and quality of regional behavioral health services with a focus on integrated care.

(f) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to contract with an organization with expertise in supporting efforts to increase access to and improve quality in recovery housing and recovery residences. This funding shall be used to increase recovery housing availability through partnership with private landlords, increase accreditation of recovery residences statewide, operate a grievance process for resolving challenges with recovery residences, and conduct a recovery capital outcomes assessment for individuals living in recovery residences.

(g) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to provide short-term housing vouchers for individuals with substance use disorders.

(h) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to convene and provide staff and contracted services support to the substance use recovery services advisory committee established in RCW 71.24.546.

(i) $2,565,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,565,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for staff and contracted services support for the authority to develop and implement the recovery services plan established in RCW 71.24.546 and to carry out other duties related to implementing chapter 311, Laws of 2021 (State v. Blake decision). Within these amounts, funding is provided for the authority to:

(A) Continue an occupational nurse consultant position within the authority to provide contract oversight, accountability, performance improvement activities, and to ensure medicaid managed care organization plan compliance with provisions in law and contract related to care transition work with local jails; and

(B) Continue a position within the authority to create and oversee a program to initiate and support emergency department programs for inducing medications for patients with opioid use disorder paired with a referral to community-based outreach and case management programs.

(74) $811,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,622,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $526,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5130 (assisted outpatient treat.). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(75) $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a youth behavioral inpatient and outpatient program with facilities in Clark and Spokane counties that serves over 65 percent medicaid eligible clients for co-occurring substance use and mental health disorders and sexual exploitation behavioral health treatment. Funding is on a one-time basis and must be used to supplement medicaid reimbursement, address workforce shortages and health care inflation, and provide for the maintenance and expansion of programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 216. FOR THE HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$4,257,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$4,178,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,975,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$11,410,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $77,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5186 (contracting/discrimination). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 217. FOR THE BOARD OF INDUSTRIAL INSURANCE APPEALS

Worker and Community Right to Know Fund—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$10,000

Accident Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$27,300,000

Medical Aid Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$27,295,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$54,605,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $650,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $650,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for the board of appeals information system modernization project.

(2) $32,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $32,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5454 (RN PTSD/industrial insurance). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 218. FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$46,590,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$45,048,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$11,042,000

Death Investigations Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,708,000

Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$460,000

Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$7,167,000

Washington Internet Crimes Against Children Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,270,000

24/7 Sobriety Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$20,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$114,305,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided to the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs solely to verify the address and residency of registered sex offenders and kidnapping offenders under RCW 9A.44.130.

(2) Funding in this section is sufficient for 75 percent of the costs of providing 23 statewide basic law enforcement trainings in each fiscal year 2024 and fiscal year 2025. The criminal justice training commission must schedule its funded classes to minimize wait times throughout each fiscal year and meet statutory wait time requirements. The criminal justice training commission must track and report the average wait time for students at the beginning of each class and provide the findings in an annual report to the legislature due in December of each year. At least three classes must be held in Spokane each year.

(3) The criminal justice training commission may not run a basic law enforcement academy class of fewer than 30 students.

(4) $2,270,000 of the Washington internet crimes against children account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 84, Laws of 2015.

(5) $4,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $4,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the mental health field response team program administered by the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs. The association must distribute $7,000,000 in grants to the phase one and phase two regions as outlined in the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et. al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et. al., U.S. District Court-Western District, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP. The association must submit an annual report to the Governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by September 1st of each year of the biennium. The report shall include best practice recommendations on law enforcement and behavioral health field response and include outcome measures on all grants awarded.

(6) $899,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $899,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for crisis intervention training for the phase one regions as outlined in the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et. al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et. al., U.S. District Court-Western District, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP.

(7) $1,598,000 of the death investigations account—state appropriation is provided solely for the commission to provide 240 hours of medicolegal forensic investigation training to coroners and medical examiners to meet the recommendations of the national commission on forensic science for certification and accreditation.

(8) $296,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of chapter 321, Laws of 2021 (officer duty to intervene).

(9) $30,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $30,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for additional grants to local jurisdictions to investigate instances where a purchase or transfer of a firearm was attempted by an individual who is prohibited from owning or possessing a firearm.

(10) $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the criminal justice training commission to provide grant funding to local law enforcement agencies to support law enforcement wellness programs. Of the amount provided in this subsection:

(a) $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the commission to provide grants to local law enforcement agencies for the purpose of establishing officer wellness programs. Grants provided under this subsection may be used for, but are not limited to building resilience, injury prevention, peer support programs, physical fitness, proper nutrition, stress management, suicide prevention, and physical or behavioral health services. The commission must consult with a representative from the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs and a representative of the Washington state fraternal order of police and the Washington council of police and sheriffs in the development of the grant program.

(b) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs to establish and coordinate an online or mobile-based application for any Washington law enforcement officer; 911 operator or dispatcher; and any other current or retired employee of a Washington law enforcement agency, and their families, to anonymously access on-demand wellness techniques, suicide prevention, resilience, physical fitness, nutrition, and other behavioral health and wellness supports.

(11) $290,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $290,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for academy training for limited authority Washington peace officers employed by the Washington state gambling commission, Washington state liquor and cannabis board, Washington state parks and recreation commission, department of natural resources, and the office of the insurance commissioner.

(a) Up to 30 officers must be admitted to attend the basic law enforcement academy and up to 30 officers must be admitted to attend basic law enforcement equivalency academy.

(b) Allocation of the training slots amongst the agencies must be based on the earliest application date to the commission. Training does not need to commence within six months of employment.

(c) The state agencies must reimburse the commission for the actual cost of training.

(12) $3,789,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,112,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to establish and provide basic law enforcement academy classes at two new regional training academies, one in Pasco and one in another location with demonstrated demand. Funding in this subsection is sufficient for 75 percent of the costs of providing four classes per year beginning in fiscal year 2024.

(13) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the criminal justice training commission to develop plans for increasing training capacity. The planning process should include engagement with limited law enforcement agencies, tribal law enforcement representatives, and local law enforcement agencies and representatives. The criminal justice training commission will provide recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature in a preliminary report due November 15, 2023, and in a final report due September 30, 2024. The reports should include the following:

(a) Identifying the demand for additional basic law enforcement academy courses to support law enforcement agencies and develop a proposal to meet any identified training needs, including basic law enforcement academy and advanced training needs;

(b) A plan for how to provide basic law enforcement academy training to limited law enforcement officers and tribal law enforcement officers, including providing additional capacity for training classes. The plan should also consider alternatives for distribution of the costs of the training course; and

(c) A plan for providing at least two basic law enforcement training academy classes per year to candidates who are not yet employed with a law enforcement agency. The plan should, at a minimum, include the following:

(i) A recruitment strategy that emphasizes recruitment of diverse candidates from different geographic areas of the state; diverse race, ethnicity, gender, and sexual orientation; and candidates with diverse backgrounds and experiences including nontraditional educational programs or work experience;

(ii) Pathways from training to employment with a law enforcement agency; and

(iii) Plans to address capacity for and delivery of training.

(14) $165,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the commission to convene a technical advisory committee created in section 916 of this act to develop legislative policy recommendations related to vehicular pursuits by law enforcement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 219. FOR THE OFFICE OF INDEPENDENT INVESTIGATIONS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$17,035,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$17,209,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$34,244,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $9,383,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $9,383,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for dedicated staffing at regional offices to include at least regional investigator supervisors, investigators, forensic investigators, family liaisons, and evidence technicians.

(2) $1,124,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,124,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to contract with the Washington state patrol for laboratory-based testing and processing of crime scene evidence collected during investigations.

(3) $251,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $251,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for contracted specialized training for investigators relating to death investigations in cases involving deadly force.

(4) $2,257,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,057,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for training development, additional staff training costs, crime lab processing, and contract services to include polygraphs, background checks, personnel evaluations, contracted security, and software licensing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 220. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$18,610,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$22,593,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$11,470,000

Asbestos Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$629,000

Electrical License Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$64,378,000

Farm Labor Contractor Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$28,000

Opioid Settlement Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$250,000

Worker and Community Right to Know Fund—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,138,000

Construction Registration Inspection Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$30,174,000

Public Works Administration Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$19,473,000

Manufactured Home Installation Training Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$455,000

Accident Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$418,874,000

Accident Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$15,823,000

Medical Aid Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$408,526,000

Medical Aid Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$3,571,000

Plumbing Certificate Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$3,601,000

Pressure Systems Safety Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$5,031,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,500,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,029,124,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $4,714,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $4,711,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for the labor and industries workers' compensation information system replacement project. This subsection is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act. The department must:

(a) Submit quarterly data within 30 calendar days of the end of each quarter, effective July 1, 2023, on:

(i) The quantifiable deliverables accomplished and the amount spent by each deliverable in each of the following subprojects:

(A) Business readiness;

(B) Change readiness;

(C) Commercial off the shelf procurement;

(D) Customer access;

(E) Program foundations;

(F) Independent assessment; and

(G) In total by fiscal year;

(ii) All of the quantifiable deliverables accomplished by subprojects identified in (a)(i)(A) through (F) of this subsection and in total and the associated expenditures by each deliverable by fiscal month;

(iii) The contract full time equivalent charged by subprojects identified in (a)(i)(A) through (F) of this subsection, and in total, compared to the budget spending plan by month for each contracted vendor and what the ensuing contract equivalent budget spending plan by subprojects identified in (a)(i)(A) through (F) of this subsection, and in total, assumes by fiscal month;

(iv) The performance metrics by subprojects identified in (a)(i)(A) through (F) of this subsection, and in total, that are currently used, including monthly performance data; and

(v) The risks identified independently by at least the quality assurance vendor and the office of the chief information officer, and how the project:

(A) Has mitigated each risk; and

(B) Is working to mitigate each risk, and when it will be mitigated;

(b) Submit the report in (a) of this subsection to fiscal and policy committees of the legislature; and

(c) Receive an additional gated project sign off by the office of financial management, effective September 1, 2023. Prior to spending any project funding in this subsection each quarter, there is an additional gate of approval required for this project. The director of financial management must agree that the project shows accountability, effective and appropriate use of the funding, and that risks are being mitigated to the spending and sign off on the spending for the ensuing quarter.

(2) $250,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation and $250,000 of the accident account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department of labor and industries safety and health assessment and research for prevention program to conduct research to address the high injury rates of the janitorial workforce. The research must quantify the physical demands of common janitorial work tasks and assess the safety and health needs of janitorial workers. The research must also identify potential risk factors associated with increased risk of injury in the janitorial workforce and measure workload based on the strain janitorial work tasks place on janitors' bodies. The department must conduct interviews with janitors and their employers to collect information on risk factors, identify the tools, technologies, and methodologies used to complete work, and understand the safety culture and climate of the industry. The department must produce annual progress reports through the year 2025 or until the tools are fully developed and deployed. The annual progress report must be submitted to the governor and legislature by December 1st of each year such report is due.

(3) $258,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $258,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department of labor and industries safety and health assessment research for prevention program to conduct research to prevent the types of work-related injuries that require immediate hospitalization. The department will develop and maintain a tracking system to identify and respond to all immediate in-patient hospitalizations and will examine incidents in defined high-priority areas, as determined from historical data and public priorities. The research must identify and characterize hazardous situations and contributing factors using epidemiological, safety-engineering, and human factors/ergonomics methods. The research must also identify common factors in certain types of workplace injuries that lead to hospitalization. The department must submit a report to the governor and appropriate legislative committees by August 30, 2023, and annually thereafter, summarizing work-related immediate hospitalizations and prevention opportunities, actions that employers and workers can take to make workplaces safer, and ways to avoid severe injuries.

(4)(a) $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to promote workforce development in aerospace and aerospace related supply chain industries by: Expanding the number of registered apprenticeships, preapprenticeships, and aerospace-related programs; and providing support for registered apprenticeships or programs in aerospace and aerospace-related supply chain industries.

(b) Grants awarded under this section may be used for:

(i) Equipment upgrades or new equipment purchases for training purposes;

(ii) New training space and lab locations to support capacity needs and expansion of training to veterans and veteran spouses, and underserved populations;

(iii) Curriculum development and instructor training for industry experts;

(iv) Tuition assistance for degrees in engineering and high-demand degrees that support the aerospace industry; and

(v) Funding to increase capacity and availability of child care options for shift work schedules.

(c) An entity is eligible to receive a grant under this subsection if it is a nonprofit, nongovernmental, or institution of higher education that provides training opportunities, including apprenticeships, preapprenticeships, preemployment training, aerospace-related degree programs, or incumbent worker training to prepare workers for the aerospace and aerospace-related supply chain industries.

(d) The department may use up to 5 percent of these funds for administration of these grants.

(5) $1,065,000 of the construction registration inspection account—state appropriation, $57,000 of the accident account—state appropriation, and $12,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for the conveyance management system replacement project and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(6) $250,000 of the opioid settlement account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to analyze patients who are maintained on chronic opioids. The department must submit an annual report of its findings to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than October 1st of each year of the fiscal biennium. The report shall include analysis of patient data, describing the characteristics of patients who are maintained on chronic opioids and their clinical needs, and a preliminary evaluation of potential interventions to improve care and reduce harms in this population.

(7) $1,363,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation is provided solely to improve access to medical and vocational providers of the workers' compensation program by expanding the use of navigators to recruit and assist providers in underserved communities and by ensuring access to high quality and reliable interpreter services.

(8) $1,360,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $240,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department of labor and industries, in coordination with the Washington state apprenticeship training council, to establish behavioral health apprenticeship programs. The behavioral health apprenticeship programs shall be administered by the Washington state apprenticeship training council. The amounts provided in this subsection must be used to compensate behavioral health providers for the incurred operating costs associated with the apprenticeship program, including apprentice compensation, staff support and supervision of apprentices, development of on-the-job training catalogs for apprentices, and provider incentives for implementing a behavioral health apprenticeship program. In awarding this funding, special preference must be given to small or rural behavioral health providers and those that serve higher percentages of individuals from black, indigenous, and people of color communities.

(9) $2,908,000 of the public works administration account—state appropriation is provided solely for system improvements to the prevailing wage program information technology system. This project is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(10) $205,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $205,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to continue conducting a four-year retention study of state registered apprentices as provided in chapter 156, Laws of 2022 (apprenticeship programs). The study shall include the collection of data from all apprentices three months into their apprenticeship to understand challenges and barriers they face towards program participation. The aggregate data by trade must be displayed on a publicly available dashboard. Study data must be provided with apprenticeship coordinators to implement an early response to connect apprentices with needed supports. The department shall submit an annual report to the governor and appropriate legislative committees on June 30, 2024 and June 30, 2025.

(11) $4,500,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to administer a grant program intended to provide wraparound support services to mitigate barriers to beginning or participating in apprenticeship programs as described in chapter 156, Laws of 2022. Up to five percent of the total funding provided in this subsection may be used to cover administrative expenses.

(12) $1,963,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $797,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely to expand access to worker rights and safety information for workers with limited English proficiency (LEP) through outreach and translation of safety-related information, training, and other materials. $1,000,000 of the amount provided in this subsection is provided solely for grants to community-based organizations to provide workplace rights and safety outreach to underserved workers.

(13) $857,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $855,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for enhancements to the workers' compensation training modules to include strategies on reducing long-term disability among claimants.

(14) $3,774,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $890,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for the creation of an agriculture compliance unit within the division of occupational safety and health. The compliance unit will perform compliance inspections and provide bilingual outreach to agricultural workers and employers.

(15) $1,642,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation is provided solely to cover the overhead rent costs to increase the number of labor and industry vocational specialists embedded in WorkSource offices and to implement a comprehensive quality-assurance team to ensure the continuous improvement of vocational services for injured workers through the workers' compensation program.

(16) $1,798,000 of the public works administration account—state appropriation is provided solely to maintain expanded capacity to investigate and enforce prevailing-wage complaints.

(17) $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the crime victims' compensation program to pay for medical exams for suspected victims of domestic violence. Neither the hospital, medical facility, nor victim is to pay for the cost of the medical exam. This funding must not supplant existing funding for sexual assault medical exams. If the cost of medical exams exceeds the funding provided in this subsection, the program shall not reduce the reimbursement rates for medical providers seeking reimbursement for other claimants, and instead the program shall return to paying for domestic violence medical exams after insurance.

(18) $560,000 of the public works administration account—state appropriation is provided solely to update computer applications for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5088 (contractor registration). This project is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(19) $84,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $84,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5084 (self-insured pensions/fund). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(20) $226,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $240,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5070 (nonfatal strangulation). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(21) $74,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $13,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5111 (sick leave/construction). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(22) $216,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $37,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5156 (farm internship program). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(23) $1,470,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $260,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5217 (musculoskeletal injuries/L&I). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(24) $4,495,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $795,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5236 (hospital staffing standards). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(25) $321,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $57,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5267 (railroad workers). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(26) $354,000 of the public works administration account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5268 (public works procurement). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(27) $367,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $369,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5454 (RN PTSD/industrial insurance). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(28) $234,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $41,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5582 (nurse supply). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(29) $2,888,000 of the public works administration account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5726 (prevailing wage/public works). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(30) $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to distribute funds to nonprofit programs providing apprenticeship education and job training for general journey (01) electricians to increase funding for related supplemental instruction (RSI) costs. Funding shall be allocated to programs by formula based on delivered RSI hours for active apprentices under chapter 49.04 RCW and operating in compliance for administrative procedures. If a program is partnered with a Washington community or technical college to deliver the RSI, the program may apply for up to a 25 percent increase in allocated funding based on the level of contracted support provided by the college. Up to five percent of the total funding provided in this subsection may be used to cover administrative expenses.

(31) $1,249,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $507,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for the creation of the center for work equity research. The center shall study and systematically address employer and employment factors that place historically marginalized workers at increased risk for work-related injuries and illnesses and social and economic hardship.

(32) $234,000 of the electrical license account—state appropriation, $26,000 of the construction registration inspection account—state appropriation, $26,000 of the public works administration account—state appropriation, $882,000 of the accident account—state appropriation, $467,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation, and $26,000 of the plumbing certificate account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department of labor and industries for the relocation costs of field offices.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 221. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

(1) The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The department of veterans affairs shall not initiate any services that will require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys that are unrelated to the coronavirus response and not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys that are unrelated to the coronavirus response, those moneys must be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation that provides appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.

(b) Each year, there is fluctuation in the revenue collected to support the operation of the state veteran homes. When the department has foreknowledge that revenue will decrease, such as from a loss of census or from the elimination of a program, the legislature expects the department to make reasonable efforts to reduce expenditures in a commensurate manner and to demonstrate that it has made such efforts. In response to any request by the department for general fund—state appropriation to backfill a loss of revenue, the legislature shall consider the department's efforts in reducing its expenditures in light of known or anticipated decreases to revenues.

(2) HEADQUARTERS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$4,660,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$4,793,000

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$10,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$9,463,000

(3) FIELD SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$10,090,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$10,119,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$10,323,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$6,538,000

Veteran Estate Management Account—Private/Local

Appropriation
. . . .
$717,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$37,787,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $642,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $642,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5358 (veterans' services). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(2) $138,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5268 (public works procurement). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4) STATE VETERANS HOMES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$25,639,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$20,199,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$126,776,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$17,184,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$189,798,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) If the department receives additional unanticipated federal resources that are unrelated to the coronavirus response at any point during the remainder of the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, an equal amount of general fund—state must be placed in unallotted status so as not to exceed the total appropriation level specified in this subsection. The department may submit as part of the policy level budget submittal documentation required by RCW 43.88.030 a request to maintain the general fund—state resources that were unallotted as required by this subsection.

(b) Appropriations have been adjusted in this section to reflect anticipated changes in state, federal, and local resources as a result of census changes. The department shall incorporate these adjustments in the governor's projected maintenance level budget required in RCW 43.88.030.

(5) CEMETERY SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$157,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$159,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,055,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,371,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 222. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$155,665,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$139,979,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$587,783,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$191,962,000

Dedicated Cannabis Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2024)
. . . .
$12,916,000

Dedicated Cannabis Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2025)
. . . .
$12,981,000

Climate Commitment Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$63,252,000

Climate Investment Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$702,000

Foundational Public Health Services Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$23,066,000

Hospital Data Collection Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$592,000

Health Professions Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$189,437,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$642,000

Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems

Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$10,175,000

Medicaid Fraud Penalty Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$3,027,000

Opioid Settlement Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$14,536,000

Public Health Supplemental Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$293,000

Safe Drinking Water Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$8,914,000

Drinking Water Assistance Account—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$25,746,000

Waterworks Operator Certification Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,089,000

Drinking Water Assistance Administrative Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,480,000

Site Closure Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$197,000

Biotoxin Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,773,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$8,223,000

Medical Test Site Licensure Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$5,239,000

Secure Drug Take-Back Program Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,474,000

Youth Tobacco and Vapor Products Prevention Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$3,273,000

Public Health Supplemental Account—Private/Local

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,824,000

Accident Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$388,000

Medical Aid Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$58,000

Statewide 988 Behavioral Health Crisis Response Line

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$27,708,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$27,022,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,525,416,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department of health shall not initiate any services that will require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department of health and the state board of health shall not implement any new or amended rules pertaining to primary and secondary school facilities until the rules and a final cost estimate have been presented to the legislature, and the legislature has formally funded implementation of the rules through the omnibus appropriations act or by statute. The department may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation that provides appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.

(2) During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, each person subject to RCW 43.70.110(3)(c) is required to pay only one surcharge of up to $25 annually for the purposes of RCW 43.70.112, regardless of how many professional licenses the person holds.

(3) In accordance with RCW 43.70.110 and 71.24.037, the department is authorized to adopt license and certification fees in fiscal years 2024 and 2025 to support the costs of the regulatory program. The department's fee schedule shall have differential rates for providers with proof of accreditation from organizations that the department has determined to have substantially equivalent standards to those of the department, including but not limited to the joint commission on accreditation of health care organizations, the commission on accreditation of rehabilitation facilities, and the council on accreditation. To reflect the reduced costs associated with regulation of accredited programs, the department's fees for organizations with such proof of accreditation must reflect the lower costs of licensing for these programs than for other organizations which are not accredited.

(4) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, and in accordance with RCW 70.41.100, the department shall set fees to include the full costs of the performance of inspections pursuant to RCW 70.41.080.

(5) In accordance with RCW 43.70.110 and 71.24.037, the department is authorized to adopt fees for the review and approval of mental health and substance use disorder treatment programs in fiscal years 2024 and 2025 as necessary to support the costs of the regulatory program. The department's fee schedule must have differential rates for providers with proof of accreditation from organizations that the department has determined to have substantially equivalent standards to those of the department, including but not limited to the joint commission on accreditation of health care organizations, the commission on accreditation of rehabilitation facilities, and the council on accreditation. To reflect the reduced costs associated with regulation of accredited programs, the department's fees for organizations with such proof of accreditation must reflect the lower cost of licensing for these programs than for other organizations which are not accredited.

(6) The health care authority, the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, the department of health, the department of corrections, and the department of children, youth, and families shall work together within existing resources to establish the health and human services enterprise coalition (the coalition). The coalition, led by the health care authority, must be a multi-organization collaborative that provides strategic direction and federal funding guidance for projects that have cross-organizational or enterprise impact, including information technology projects that affect organizations within the coalition. The office of the chief information officer shall maintain a statewide perspective when collaborating with the coalition to ensure that projects are planned for in a manner that ensures the efficient use of state resources, supports the adoption of a cohesive technology and data architecture, and maximizes federal financial participation. The work of the coalition and any project identified as a coalition project is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(7) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, and in accordance with RCW 43.70.110 and 71.12.470, the department shall set fees to include the full costs of the performance of inspections pursuant to RCW 71.12.485.

(8) $492,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $492,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to coordinate with local health jurisdictions to establish and maintain comprehensive group B programs to ensure safe drinking water. These funds shall be used for implementation costs, including continued development and adoption of rules, policies, and procedures; technical assistance; and training.

(9) $96,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $92,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for community outreach to prepare culturally and linguistically appropriate hepatitis B information in a digital format to be distributed to ethnic and cultural leaders and organizations to share with foreign-born and limited or non-English speaking community networks.

(10) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the Washington nursing commission must hire sufficient staff to process applications for nursing licenses so that the time required for processing does not exceed seven days.

(11) $725,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $725,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the Washington poison center. This funding is provided in addition to funding pursuant to RCW 69.50.540.

(12) $612,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $612,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $3,000,000 of the medicaid fraud penalty account—state appropriation are provided solely for the ongoing operations and maintenance of the prescription monitoring program maintained by the department.

(13) $2,265,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,265,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for:

(a) Staffing by the department, the department of veterans affairs, and the department of corrections to expand statewide suicide prevention efforts, which efforts include suicide prevention efforts for military service members and veterans and incarcerated persons;

(b) A suicide prevention public awareness campaign to provide education regarding the signs of suicide, interventions, and resources for support;

(c) Staffing for call centers to support the increased volume of calls to suicide hotlines;

(d) Training for first responders to identify and respond to individuals experiencing suicidal ideation;

(e) Support for tribal suicide prevention efforts;

(f) Strengthening behavioral health and suicide prevention efforts in the agricultural sector;

(g) Support for the three priority areas of the governor's challenge regarding identifying suicide risk among service members and their families, increasing the awareness of resources available to service members and their families, and lethal means safety planning;

(h) Training for community health workers to include culturally informed training for suicide prevention;

(i) Coordination with the office of the superintendent of public instruction; and

(j) Support for the suicide prevention initiative housed in the University of Washington.

(14) $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the fruit and vegetable incentive program.

(15) $627,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $627,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to implement the recommendations from the community health workers task force to provide statewide leadership, training, and integration of community health workers with insurers, health care providers, and public health systems.

(16) $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Washington nursing commission to manage a grant process to incentivize nurses to supervise nursing students in health care settings. The goal of the grant program is to create more clinical placements for nursing students to complete required clinical hours to earn their nursing degree and related licensure.

(17) $1,490,000 of the health professional services account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Washington nursing commission to continue to implement virtual nursing assistant training and testing modalities, create an apprenticeship pathway into nursing for nursing assistants, implement rule changes to support a career path for nursing assistants, and collaborate with the workforce training and educational coordinating board on a pilot project to transform the culture and practice in long term care settings. The goal of these activities is to expand the nursing workforce for long term care settings.

(18) $186,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $186,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to test for lead in child care facilities to prevent child lead exposure and to research, identify, and connect facilities to financial resources available for remediation costs.

(19) $814,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $814,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to provide grants to support school-based health centers and behavioral health services.

(20) $1,300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to coordinate and lead a multi-agency approach to youth suicide prevention and intervention.

(21) $486,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for maintenance of the community health worker platform and continued implementation of the community health worker trainings in the pediatric setting for children with behavioral health needs.

(22)(a) $1,390,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,378,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the child profile health promotion notification system and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(b) Pursuant to the department's recommendation in its December 2022 report, which reviewed options for a new fee structure, the department must identify and implement a new fee structure for ongoing support of the child profile health promotion notification system. A report identifying the new fee structure and implementation plan is due to the legislature by April 1, 2024.

(23)(a) $10,000,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely to support and administer a workplace health and safety program for workers who are affected by climate impacts, including but not limited to, extreme heat and cold, wildfire smoke, drought and flooding. This program will focus on workplace health and safety for farmworkers, construction workers, and other workers who face the most risk from climate-related impacts. This amount shall be limited to supporting vulnerable populations in overburdened communities under the climate commitment act as defined in RCW 70A.65.010. Funding shall be provided for:

(i) Pass through grants to community-based organizations, tribal governments, and tribal organizations to support workplace health and safety for workers who are burdened by the intersection of their work and climate impacts; and

(ii) Procurement and distribution of equipment and resources for workers who are burdened by the intersection of their work and climate impacts directly by the department of health, or through pass-through grants to community-based organizations, tribal governments, and tribal organizations. Equipment and resources may include but are not limited to: Personal protective equipment, other protective or safety clothing for cold and heat, air purifiers for the workplace or worker housing, protection from ticks and mosquitoes, and heating and cooling devices.

(b) The department of health, in consultation with the environmental justice council, community groups, and the department of labor and industries, shall evaluate mechanisms to provide workers with financial assistance to cover lost wages or other financial hardships caused by extreme weather events and climate threats;

(c) No more than five percent of this funding may be used to administer this grant program.

(24) $17,752,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely to sustain information technology infrastructure, tools, and solutions developed to respond to the COVID-19 pandemic. The department shall submit a plan to the office of financial management by September 15, 2023, that identifies a new funding strategy to maintain these information technology investments within the department's existing state, local, and federal funding. Of this amount, sufficient funding is provided for the department to create an implementation plan for real-time bed capacity and tracking for hospitals and skilled nursing facilities, excluding behavioral health hospitals and facilities. The department will provide the implementation plan and estimated cost for an information technology system and implementation costs to the office of financial management by September 15, 2023, for the bed capacity and tracking tool.

(25) $20,000,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely to support COVID-19 public health and response activities. The department must continue to distribute COVID-19 testing supplies to agricultural workers and tribal governments. The department must submit a spending plan to the office of financial management for approval. These funds may only be allocated and expended after approval of the spending plan.

(26) $7,407,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $7,603,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to providers of abortion care that participate in the department's sexual and reproductive health program. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) $2,739,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for each fiscal year is provided solely for reimbursement of abortion services to providers of abortion care.

(b) $368,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $364,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are solely provided for outreach, patient navigation, and staffing at the department.

(c) $4,100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $4,300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for workforce recruitment, retention, and provider training.

(d) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for each fiscal year is solely provided for grants to providers of abortion care that participate in the department's sexual and reproductive health program for security investments.

(27) $3,768,000 of the opioid abatement settlement account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide naloxone, safe usage supplies, and other harm reduction supplies to existing harm reduction programs and stabilization and support programs.

(28) $2,692,000 of the opioid abatement settlement account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide supports to pregnant and parenting families, and families with children, including:

(a) Coordinating a pregnant, parenting, and families with children support work group;

(b) Coordinating activities through the work group, including a gap analysis to assess services and outcomes by community;

(c) Contracting with hospitals to address methods of providing substance use disorder care at birth; and

(d) Providing housing supports to parenting families with children.

(29) $6,730,000 of the opioid abatement settlement account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to establish health engagement hubs to provide services to people who use drugs, including physical and mental health care, social services, care coordination, and connections to community supports.

(30) $1,346,000 of the opioid abatement settlement account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to create an overdose data dashboard and develop a state opioid and overdose response plan (SOORP) and a data collection, evaluation, and usage plan to monitor and improve SOORP implementation.

(31) $9,156,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to implement the healthy environment for all act, including: Developing an environmental health disparities map, providing staffing support to the environmental justice council, and implementing a community engagement plan.

(32) $952,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $683,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5263 (psilocybin). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(33) $65,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5179 (death with dignity act). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(34) $20,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $68,000 of the general fund—private/local appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5716 (DOH validation surveys). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(35) $604,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $552,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5582 (nurse supply). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(36) $95,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5389 (optometry). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(37) $1,205,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5499 (multistate nurse licensure). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(38) $30,000 of the general fund state—appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $52,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5547 (nursing pool transparency). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(39) $32,000 of the general fund—private/local appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5569 (kidney disease centers). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(40) $446,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $441,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5453 (female genital mutilation). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(41) $242,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5094 (water system plans/climate). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(42) $466,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $487,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5278 (home care aide certification). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(43) $1,000,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5236 (hospital staffing standards). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(44) $131,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $91,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5523 (forensic pathologist). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(45) $36,000 of the general fund—private/local appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5515 (child abuse and neglect). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(46) $339,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $694,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5555 (certified peer specialists). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(47) $198,000 of the general fund—private/local appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5120 (crisis relief centers). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(48) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $207,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $133,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5189 (behavioral health support). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(49) $150,000 of general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department of health to provide grants to federally qualified health centers (FQHCs) for the purchase of long-acting reversible contraceptives (LARCs). For LARCs purchased with the funding provided in this subsection, FQHCs shall provide patients with LARCs the same day they are seeking that family planning option.

(a) The department shall develop criteria for how the grant dollars will be distributed, including that FQHCs are required to participate in contraceptive training related to patient-centered care, shared decision making, and reproductive bias and coercion.

(b) The department shall survey the FQHCs participating in the grant program regarding the use of LARCs by their patients, as compared to the two years prior to participation in the grant program, and report the results of the survey to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2025.

(50) $63,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department to utilize materials from the "count the kicks" program in designing, preparing, and making available online written materials to inform health care providers and staff of evidence-based research and practices that reduce the incident of stillbirth, by December 31, 2023.

(51) $351,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $624,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Snohomish county health department to convene a leadership planning group that will:

(a) Conduct a landscape analysis of current sexually transmitted infection, postexposure prophylaxis, preexposure prophylaxis, and hepatitis B virus services and identify treatment improvements for HIV preexposure prophylaxis;

(b) Establish sexually transmitted infection clinical services at the Snohomish county health department and identify opportunities to expand sexual health services provided outside of clinical settings;

(c) Conduct research on opportunities to expand jail-based sexual health services;

(d) Establish an epidemiology and technical team;

(e) Expand field-based treatment for syphilis; and

(f) Establish an in-house comprehensive, culturally responsive sexual health clinic at the Snohomish county health department.

(52) $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for tobacco, vapor product, and nicotine control, cessation, treatment, and prevention, and other substance use prevention and education, with an emphasis on community-based strategies. These strategies must include programs that consider the disparate impacts of nicotine addiction on specific populations, including youth and racial or other disparities.

(53) $47,000 of the general fund—private/local appropriation and $13,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5536 (controlled substances). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(54) $7,355,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $7,022,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery—federal appropriation are provided solely for operation of the statewide medical logistics center. Within these amounts, the department must coordinate with the department of social and health services to develop processes that will minimize the disposal and destruction of personal protective equipment and for interagency distribution of personal protective equipment.

(55) $5,496,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide grants to school districts making updates to existing heating, venting, and air conditioning systems using small district modernization grants.

(56) $634,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the master person index and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(57) $38,600,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to develop a grant program to fund projects that benefit overburdened communities as defined in RCW 70A.02.010(11). Of the amount provided in this subsection:

(a) $6,000,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for fiscal year 2024 for the department and the environmental justice council created in RCW 70A.02.110 to engage in a participatory budgeting process with five overburdened communities, as identified by the department, to develop a process to select and fund projects that mitigate the disproportional impacts of climate change on overburdened communities. The process must allow for full community engagement and develop criteria for eligible entities and projects and establish priorities to achieve the greatest gain for decarbonization and resiliency. A report of the outcomes of the participatory budgeting process detailing its recommendations for funding as well as future improvements to the participatory budgeting process must be provided to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2023.

(b) $32,600,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for fiscal year 2025 for the department to provide grants that benefit overburdened communities. The department must submit to the governor and the legislature a ranked list of projects consistent with the recommendations developed in (a) of this subsection. The department shall not sign contracts or otherwise financially obligate funds under this section until the legislature has approved a specific list of projects.

(58) $5,430,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $5,326,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to maintain the current level of credentialing staff through the study on fees by Results WA.

(59) $280,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $280,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to contract with the central nursing resource center established in RCW 18.79.202 to facilitate communication between nursing education programs and health care facilities that offer clinical placements for the purpose of increasing clinical education and practice experiences for nursing students. The department shall contract with the central nursing resource center to:

(a) Gather data to assess current clinical placement practices, opportunities, and needs;

(b) Identify all approved nursing education programs and health care facilities that offer clinical placement opportunities in the state;

(c) Convene and facilitate quarterly stakeholder meetings between representatives from approved nursing education programs and health care facilities that offer clinical placement opportunities, and other relevant stakeholders, in order to:

(i) Connect representatives by region;

(ii) Facilitate discussions between representatives, by region, to determine:

(A) Clinical placement barriers;

(B) The number and types of clinical placement opportunities needed; and

(C) The number and types of clinical placement opportunities available; and

(iii) Develop strategies to resolve clinical placement barriers;

(d) Provide a digital message board and communication platform representatives can use to maintain ongoing communication and clinical placement needs and opportunities;

(e) Identify other policy options and recommendations to help increase the number of clinical placement opportunities, if possible; and

(f) Submit a report of findings, progress, and recommendations to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2025.

(60) $23,066,000 of the foundational public health services account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to maintain the RAINIER (reporting array for incident, noninfectious and infectious event response) suite, RHINO (rapid health information network) program, WAIIS (Washington immunization information system) system, and data exchange services.

(61) $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department of health to contract with an organization located in Thurston county that dedicates itself to the promotion of education, holistic health, and trauma healing in the African American community to provide behavioral health education, mental wellness training, evidence based health programs, events, and conferences to individuals, youth/adults, parents/parent partners, and families, that have suffered from generational and systemic racism. In conducting this work, the organization will engage diverse individuals in racial healing and reparative justice in the field of mental wellness. The organization will also prioritize mental health equity and reparative justice in their work to eradicate health disparities that African American communities have faced due to generational racism.

(62) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the office of radiation protection to conduct a review of the state's readiness for licensing fusion energy projects. Fusion is a rapidly advancing clean energy technology, and in order for Washington to be poised to become a world leader in fusion energy research and deployment, the department, in consultation with relevant state-level regulatory agencies, must review, provide recommendations, and costs estimates for the necessary staffing and technical resources to fulfill the state's registration, inspection, and licensure obligations. The department must report its findings and any recommendations to the governor and appropriate legislative committees by December 1, 2023.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 223. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

The health care authority, the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, the department of health, the department of corrections, and the department of children, youth, and families shall work together within existing resources to establish the health and human services enterprise coalition (the coalition). The coalition, led by the health care authority, must be a multiorganization collaborative that provides strategic direction and federal funding guidance for projects that have cross-organizational or enterprise impact, including information technology projects that affect organizations within the coalition. The office of the chief information officer shall maintain a statewide perspective when collaborating with the coalition to ensure that the development of projects identified in this report are planned for in a manner that ensures the efficient use of state resources and maximizes federal financial participation. The work of the coalition and any project identified as a coalition project is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(1) ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$94,928,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$94,144,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$400,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$189,472,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $819,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $58,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to acquire and implement a sentencing calculation module for the offender management network information system and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act. This project must use one discrete organizational index across all department of corrections programs. Implementation of this sentencing calculation module must result in a reduction of tolling staff within six months of the project implementation date and the department must report this result. In addition, the report must include the budgeted and actual tolling staffing levels by fiscal month beginning with fiscal year 2023 and the count of tolling staff reduced by fiscal month from date of implementation through six months post implementation. The report must be submitted to the senate ways and means and house appropriations committees within 30 calendar days after six months post implementation.

(b) $932,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $434,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the amend collaboration and training statewide program administration team.

(c) $2,056,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,056,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for reentry investments to include reentry and discharge services. The staffing and resources must provide expanded reentry and discharge services to include, but not limited to, transition services, preemployment testing, enhanced discharge planning, housing voucher assistance, cognitive behavioral interventions, educational programming, and community partnership programs.

(d) $1,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5025 (DOC technology systems).

(e) $127,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for chapter 160, Laws of 2022 (body scanners).

(2) CORRECTIONAL OPERATIONS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$727,288,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$736,024,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$4,326,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$334,000

Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,837,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,472,809,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The department may contract for local jail beds statewide to the extent that it is at no net cost to the department. The department shall calculate and report the average cost per offender per day, inclusive of all services, on an annual basis for a facility that is representative of average medium or lower offender costs. The department shall not pay a rate greater than $85 per day per offender excluding the costs of department of corrections provided services, including evidence-based substance abuse programming, dedicated department of corrections classification staff on-site for individualized case management, transportation of offenders to and from department of corrections facilities, and gender responsive training for jail staff. The capacity provided at local correctional facilities must be for offenders whom the department of corrections defines as close medium or lower security offenders. Programming provided for offenders held in local jurisdictions is included in the rate, and details regarding the type and amount of programming, and any conditions regarding transferring offenders must be negotiated with the department as part of any contract. Local jurisdictions must provide health care to offenders that meets standards set by the department. The local jail must provide all medical care including unexpected emergent care. The department must utilize a screening process to ensure that offenders with existing extraordinary medical/mental health needs are not transferred to local jail facilities. If extraordinary medical conditions develop for an inmate while at a jail facility, the jail may transfer the offender back to the department, subject to terms of the negotiated agreement. Health care costs incurred prior to transfer are the responsibility of the jail.

(b) $671,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $671,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to maintain the facility, property, and assets at the institution formerly known as the maple lane school in Rochester.

(c) $1,713,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $146,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to acquire and implement a sentencing calculation module for the offender management network information system and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act. This project must use one discrete organizational index across all department of corrections programs. Implementation of this sentencing calculation module must result in a reduction of tolling staff within six months of the project implementation date and the department must report this result. In addition, the report must include the budgeted and actual tolling staffing levels by fiscal month beginning with fiscal year 2023 and the count of tolling staff reduced by fiscal month from date of implementation through six months post implementation. The report must be submitted to the senate ways and means and house appropriations committees within 30 calendar days after six months post implementation.

(d) Within the amounts appropriated in this subsection, the department must cover the costs to provide a minimally processed carbohydrate diet to include two protein meals a day for those incarcerated individuals diagnosed with diabetes.

(e) $579,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,058,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the amend collaboration and training program.

(f) $1,294,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,294,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for reentry investments to include reentry and discharge services. The staffing and resources must provide expanded reentry and discharge services to include, but not limited to, transition services, preemployment testing, enhanced discharge planning, housing voucher assistance, cognitive behavioral interventions, educational programming, and community partnership programs.

(g) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5131 (commissary funds). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(h) $1,839,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,839,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5134 (reentry services & supports) to increase gate money from $40 to $300 at release. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(i) $2,871,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for chapter 160, Laws of 2022 (body scanners).

(j) $586,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $576,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a planning and development manager and an executive secretary in the women's prison division.

(3) COMMUNITY SUPERVISION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$242,022,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$251,237,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$4,142,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$497,401,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The department of corrections shall contract with local and tribal governments for jail capacity to house offenders who violate the terms of their community supervision. A contract rate increase may not exceed five percent each year. The department may negotiate to include medical care of offenders in the contract rate if medical payments conform to the department's offender health plan and pharmacy formulary, and all off-site medical expenses are preapproved by department utilization management staff. If medical care of offender is included in the contract rate, the contract rate may exceed five percent to include the cost of that service.

(b) The department shall engage in ongoing mitigation strategies to reduce the costs associated with community supervision violators, including improvements in data collection and reporting and alternatives to short-term confinement for low-level violators.

(c) $1,233,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $88,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to acquire and implement a sentencing calculation module for the offender management network information system and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act. This project must use one discrete organizational index across all department of corrections programs. Implementation of this sentencing calculation module must result in a reduction of tolling staff within six months of the project implementation date and the department must report this result. In addition, the report must include the budgeted and actual tolling staffing levels by fiscal month beginning with fiscal year 2023 and the count of tolling staff reduced by fiscal month from date of implementation through six months post implementation. The report must be submitted to the senate ways and means and house appropriations committees within 30 calendar days after six months post implementation.

(d) $110,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the amend collaboration and training program.

(e) $1,409,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,386,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for staffing and operational costs to operate the Bellingham reentry center as a state-run facility.

(f) $1,320,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,320,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for staffing and operational costs to operate the Helen B. Ratcliff reentry center as a state-run facility.

(g) $18,813,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $19,027,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for reentry investments to include reentry and discharge services. The staffing and resources must provide expanded reentry and discharge services to include, but not limited to, transition services, preemployment testing, enhanced discharge planning, housing voucher assistance, cognitive behavioral interventions, educational programming, and community partnership programs.

(4) CORRECTIONAL INDUSTRIES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$9,136,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$9,334,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$18,470,000

(5) INTERAGENCY PAYMENTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$59,920,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$58,395,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$118,315,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $21,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $21,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5134 (reentry services & supports). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(b) $19,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $19,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5502 (sub. use disorder treatment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(c) $36,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for chapter 160, Laws of 2022 (body scanners).

(6) OFFENDER CHANGE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$84,502,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$85,460,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,436,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$171,398,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The department of corrections shall use funds appropriated in this subsection (6) for programming for incarcerated individuals. The department shall develop and implement a written comprehensive plan for programming for incarcerated individuals that prioritizes programs which follow the risk-needs-responsivity model, are evidence-based, and have measurable outcomes. The department is authorized to discontinue ineffective programs and to repurpose underspent funds according to the priorities in the written plan.

(b) The department of corrections shall collaborate with the state health care authority to explore ways to utilize federal medicaid funds as a match to fund residential substance use disorder treatment-based alternative beds under RCW 9.94A.664 under the drug offender sentencing alternative program and residential substance use disorder treatment beds that serve individuals on community custody.

(c) Within existing resources, the department of corrections may provide reentry support items such as disposable cell phones, prepaid phone cards, hygiene kits, housing vouchers, and release medications associated with individuals resentenced or ordered released from confinement as a result of policies or court decisions including, but not limited to, the State v. Blake decision.

(d) $11,454,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $11,454,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for expanded reentry investments to include, but not be limited to, transition services, preemployment testing, enhanced discharge planning, housing voucher assistance, cognitive behavioral interventions, educational programming, and community partnership programs.

(e) $1,186,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,129,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5134 (reentry services & supports) and provides funding for dedicated discharge planning staff. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(f) $1,177,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,154,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5502 (sub. use disorder treatment) for dedicated staffing for substance use disorder assessments and for coordinated treatment care in the community at release. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(g) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization to assist fathers transitioning from incarceration to community and family reunification. The grant recipient must have experience contracting with the department of corrections to support incarcerated individual betterment projects and contracting with the department of social and health services to provide access and visitation services.

(h) $424,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for chapter 160, Laws of 2022 (body scanners).

(7) HEALTH CARE SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$238,287,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$242,506,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$3,084,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$483,877,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The state prison medical facilities may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods, supplies, and services through hospital or other group purchasing organizations when it is cost effective to do so.

(b) $73,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $387,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the amend collaboration and training program.

(c) $1,236,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,236,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for reentry investments to include reentry and discharge services. The staffing and resources must provide expanded reentry and discharge services to include, but not limited to, transition services, enhanced health care discharge planning, case management, and evaluation of physical health and behavioral health.

(d) $13,605,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $13,605,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for medical staffing in prisons for patient centered care and behavioral health care. Funding must be used to increase access to care, addiction care, and expanded screening of individuals in prison facilities to include chronic illnesses, infectious disease, diabetes, heart disease, serious mental health, and behavioral health services.

(e) $1,612,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for chapter 160, Laws of 2022 (body scanners).

(f) $1,115,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,115,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for an electronic health records system solution and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act and must be in compliance with the statewide electronic health records plan that must be approved by the office of financial management and the technology services board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 224. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES FOR THE BLIND

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$6,877,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$7,209,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$25,672,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$61,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$39,819,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $201,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $201,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the continuation of statewide services for blind or low vision youth under the age of 14.

(2) $184,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $367,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the independent living program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 225. FOR THE EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$16,445,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$26,086,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$216,212,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$38,366,000

Unemployment Compensation Administration Account—

Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$260,197,000

Administrative Contingency Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$28,713,000

Employment Service Administrative Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$84,825,000

Family and Medical Leave Insurance Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$152,514,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$15,629,000

Long-Term Services and Supports Trust Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$40,401,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$879,388,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department is directed to maximize the use of federal funds. The department must update its budget annually to align expenditures with anticipated changes in projected revenues.

(2) $15,399,000 of the long-term services and supports trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of the long-term services and support trust program information technology project and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(3) Within existing resources, the department must reassess its ongoing staffing and funding needs for the paid family medical leave program and submit documentation of the updated need to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by September 1, 2023, and annually thereafter.

(4) Within existing resources, the department shall coordinate outreach and education to paid family and medical leave benefit recipients with a statewide family resource, referral, and linkage system that connects families with children prenatal through age five and residing in Washington state to appropriate services and community resources. This coordination shall include but is not limited to placing information about the statewide family resource, referral, and linkage system on the paid family and medical leave program web site and in printed materials, and conducting joint events.

(5) Within existing resources, the department shall report the following to the legislature and the governor by October 15, 2023, and each year thereafter:

(a) An inventory of the department's programs, services, and activities, identifying federal, state, and other funding sources for each;

(b) Federal grants received by the department, segregated by line of business or activity, for the most recent five fiscal years, and the applicable rules;

(c) State funding available to the department, segregated by line of business or activity, for the most recent five fiscal years;

(d) A history of staffing levels by line of business or activity, identifying sources of state or federal funding, for the most recent five fiscal years;

(e) A projected spending plan for the employment services administrative account and the administrative contingency account. The spending plan must include forecasted revenues and estimated expenditures under various economic scenarios.

(6) $3,264,000 of the employment services administrative account—state appropriation is provided solely for continuation of the office of agricultural and seasonal workforce services.

(7) $15,585,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for career connected learning grants as provided in RCW 28C.30.050, including sector intermediary grants and administrative expenses associated with grant administration.

(8) $2,000,000 of the unemployment compensation administration account—federal appropriation is provided solely for the department to continue implementing the federal United States department of labor equity grant. This grant includes improving the translation of notices sent to claimants as part of their unemployment insurance claims into any of the 10 languages most frequently spoken in the state and other language, demographic, and geographic equity initiatives approved by the grantor. The department must also ensure that letters, alerts, and notices produced manually or by the department's unemployment insurance technology system are written in plainly understood language and evaluated for ease of claimant comprehension before they are approved for use.

(9) $140,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $140,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for one full-time employee to provide casework on behalf of constituents who contact their legislators to escalate unresolved claims.

(10) $3,136,000 of the unemployment compensation administration account—federal appropriation is provided solely for a continuous improvement team to make customer, employer, and equity enhancements to the unemployment insurance program. If the department does not receive adequate funding from the United States department of labor to cover these costs, the department may use funding made available to the state through section 903 (d), (f), and (g) of the social security act (Reed act) in an amount not to exceed the amount provided in this subsection.

(11)(a) $9,323,000 of the employment service administrative account—state appropriation is provided solely for the replacement of the WorkSource integrated technology platform. The replacement system must support the workforce administration statewide to ensure adoption of the United States department of labor's integrated service delivery model and program performance requirements for the state's workforce innovation and opportunity act and other federal grants. This subsection is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(b) $2,290,000 of the employment services administrative account—state appropriation is provided solely for the maintenance and operation of the WorkSource integrated technology platform.

(12) $6,208,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $6,208,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the continuation of the economic security for all program. The department must collect quarterly data on the number of participants that participate in the program, the costs associated with career, training, and other support services provided by category, including but not limited to, child care, housing, transportation, and car repair, and progress made towards self-sufficiency. The department must provide a report to the governor and the legislature on December 1 and June 1 of each year that includes an analysis of the program, a detailed summary of the quarterly data collected, and associated recommendations for program delivery.

(13)(a) $5,292,000 of the employment service administrative account—state appropriation is provided to expand the economic security for all program to residents of Washington state that are over 200 percent of the federal poverty level but who demonstrate financial need for support services or assistance with training costs to either maintain or secure employment. Supports to each participant must not exceed $5,000 per year.

(b) The department must collect quarterly data on the number of participants that participate in the program, the costs associated with career, training, and other support services provided by category, including but not limited to, child care, housing, transportation, and car repair, and progress made towards self-sufficiency. The department must provide a report to the governor and the legislature on December 1 and June 1 of each year that includes an analysis of the program, a detailed summary of the quarterly data collected, and associated recommendations for program delivery.

(c) Of the amounts in (a) of this subsection, the department may use $146,000 each year to cover program administrative expenses.

(14) $1,655,000 of the administrative contingency account—state appropriation is provided to increase the department's information security team to proactively address critical security vulnerabilities, audit findings, and process gaps.

(15) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided for two project managers to assist with the coordination of state audits.

(16) $11,895,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of the quality jobs, equity strategy, and training (QUEST) grant to enhance the workforce system's ongoing efforts to support employment equity and employment recovery from the COVID-19 pandemic. The funds are for partnership development, community outreach, business engagement, and comprehensive career and training services.

(17) $3,389,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $4,540,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to increase the stipend for Washington service corps members to $26,758 per year and for one staff member to assist with program outreach. The stipend increase is for members that enter into a service year with income below 200 percent of the federal poverty level.

(18) $3,539,000 of the long-term services and supports trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for the paid family and medical leave and long-term services and supports programs to increase outreach to underserved communities, perform program evaluation and data management, perform necessary fiscal functions, and make customer experience enhancements.

(19) $794,000 of the unemployment compensation administration account—federal appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5176 (employee-owned coop UI). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(20) $30,000 of the family and medical leave insurance account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5286 (paid leave premiums). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(21) $2,896,000 of the family and medical leave insurance account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5586 (paid leave data). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(22) $35,000 of the employment service administrative account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide research and consultation on the feasibility of replicating the unemployment insurance program for and expanding other social net programs to individuals regardless of their citizenship status.

(23) $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department to design a form for employer use to voluntarily report no show, no call interview data. This data shall be used to inform potential trend analysis or policy development for job search compliance.

(24) $6,363,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $14,863,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to maintain the current level of unemployment insurance support staffing and customer service delivery, which would otherwise be negatively impacted due to an expected decrease in federal unemployment insurance administrative funding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 226. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES—GENERAL

(1) The appropriations to the department of children, youth, and families in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. Appropriations made in this act to the department of children, youth, and families shall initially be allotted as required by this act. The department shall seek approval from the office of financial management prior to transferring moneys between sections of this act except as expressly provided in this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not include transfers of moneys between sections of this act except as expressly provided in this act, nor shall allotment modifications permit moneys that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for other than that purpose.

(2) The health care authority, the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, the department of health, the department of corrections, and the department of children, youth, and families shall work together within existing resources to establish the health and human services enterprise coalition (the coalition). The coalition, led by the health care authority, must be a multi-organization collaborative that provides strategic direction and federal funding guidance for projects that have cross-organizational or enterprise impact, including information technology projects that affect organizations within the coalition. The office of the chief information officer shall maintain a statewide perspective when collaborating with the coalition to ensure that projects are planned for in a manner that ensures the efficient use of state resources, supports the adoption of a cohesive technology and data architecture, and maximizes federal financial participation.

(3) Information technology projects or investments and proposed projects or investments impacting time capture, payroll and payment processes and systems, eligibility, case management, and authorization systems within the department are subject to technical oversight by the office of the chief information officer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 227. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES—CHILDREN AND FAMILIES SERVICES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$490,442,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$510,507,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$504,072,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$2,824,000

Opioid Settlement Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,304,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,510,149,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $748,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $748,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to contract for the operation of one pediatric interim care center. The center shall provide residential care for up to 13 children through two years of age. Seventy-five percent of the children served by the center must be in need of special care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers. The center shall also provide on-site training to biological, adoptive, or foster parents. The center shall provide at least three months of consultation and support to the parents accepting placement of children from the center. The center may recruit new and current foster and adoptive parents for infants served by the center. The department shall not require case management as a condition of the contract.

(2) $453,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $453,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the costs of hub home foster and kinship families that provide a foster care delivery model that includes a hub home. Use of the hub home model is intended to support foster parent retention, provide support to biological families, improve child outcomes, and encourage the least restrictive community placements for children in out-of-home care.

(3) $579,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $579,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $110,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a receiving care center east of the Cascade mountains.

(4) $3,245,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,245,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for services provided through children's advocacy centers.

(5) In fiscal year 2024 and in fiscal year 2025, the department shall provide a tracking report for social service specialists and corresponding social services support staff to the office of financial management, and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature. The report shall detail continued implementation of the targeted 1:18 caseload ratio standard for child and family welfare services caseload-carrying staff and targeted 1:8 caseload ratio standard for child protection services caseload carrying staff. To the extent to which the information is available, the report shall include the following information identified separately for social service specialists doing case management work, supervisory work, and administrative support staff, and identified separately by job duty or program, including but not limited to intake, child protective services investigations, child protective services family assessment response, and child and family welfare services:

(a) Total full-time equivalent employee authority, allotments and expenditures by region, office, classification, and band, and job duty or program;

(b) Vacancy rates by region, office, and classification and band; and

(c) Average length of employment with the department, and when applicable, the date of exit for staff exiting employment with the department by region, office, classification and band, and job duty or program.

(6) $94,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $94,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a contract with a child advocacy center in Spokane to provide continuum of care services for children who have experienced abuse or neglect and their families.

(7)(a) $539,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $540,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, $656,000 of the general fund—private/local appropriation, and $252,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a contract with an educational advocacy provider with expertise in foster care educational outreach. The amounts in this subsection are provided solely for contracted education coordinators to assist foster children in succeeding in K-12 and higher education systems and to assure a focus on education during the department's transition to performance-based contracts. Funding must be prioritized to regions with high numbers of foster care youth, or regions where backlogs of youth that have formerly requested educational outreach services exist. The department is encouraged to use private matching funds to maintain educational advocacy services.

(b) The department shall contract with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, which in turn shall contract with a nongovernmental entity or entities to provide educational advocacy services pursuant to RCW 28A.300.590.

(8) For purposes of meeting the state's maintenance of effort for the state supplemental payment program, the department of children, youth, and families shall track and report to the department of social and health services the monthly state supplemental payment amounts attributable to foster care children who meet eligibility requirements specified in the state supplemental payment state plan. Such expenditures must equal at least $3,100,000 annually and may not be claimed toward any other federal maintenance of effort requirement. Annual state supplemental payment expenditure targets must continue to be established by the department of social and health services. Attributable amounts must be communicated by the department of children, youth, and families to the department of social and health services on a monthly basis.

(9) $197,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $197,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to conduct biennial inspections and certifications of facilities, both overnight and day shelters, that serve those who are under 18 years old and are homeless.

(10)(a) $6,195,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $6,195,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,188,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to operate emergent placement and enhanced emergent placement contracts.

(b) The department shall not include the costs to operate emergent placement contracts in the calculations for family foster home maintenance payments and shall submit as part of the budget submittal documentation required by RCW 43.88.030 any costs associated with increases in the number of emergent placement contract beds after the effective date of this section that cannot be sustained within existing appropriations.

(11) Beginning January 1, 2024, and continuing through the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the department must provide semiannual reports to the governor and appropriate legislative committees that includes the number of in-state behavioral rehabilitation services providers and licensed beds, the number of out-of-state behavioral rehabilitation services placements, and a comparison of these numbers to the same metrics expressed as an average over the prior six months. The report shall identify separately beds with the enhanced behavioral rehabilitation services rate. Effective January 1, 2024, and to the extent the information is available, the report shall include the same information for emergency placement services beds and enhanced emergency placement services beds.

(12) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementing the supportive visitation model that utilizes trained visit navigators to provide a structured and positive visitation experience for children and their parents.

(13) $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for enhanced adoption placement services for legally free children in state custody, through a partnership with a national nonprofit organization with private matching funds. These funds must supplement, but not supplant, the work of the department to secure permanent adoptive homes for children with high needs.

(14) The department of children, youth, and families shall make foster care maintenance payments to programs where children are placed with a parent in a residential program for substance abuse treatment. These maintenance payments are considered foster care maintenance payments for purposes of forecasting and budgeting at maintenance level as required by RCW 43.88.058.

(15) $511,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $511,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $306,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for continued implementation of chapter 210, Laws of 2021 (2SHB 1219) (youth counsel/dependency).

(16) If the department receives an allocation of federal funding through an unanticipated receipt, the department shall not expend more than what was approved or for another purpose than what was approved by the governor through the unanticipated receipt process pursuant to RCW 43.79.280.

(17) $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to contract with one or more nonprofit, nongovernmental organizations to purchase and deliver concrete goods to low-income families.

(18) $2,400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of performance-based contracts for family support and related services pursuant to RCW 74.13B.020.

(19) The amounts provided in this section include sufficient funding for continued implementation of chapter 80, Laws of 2018 (2SSB 6453) (kinship caregiver legal support).

(20) The amounts provided in this section include sufficient funding for continued implementation of chapter 51, Laws of 2020 (SHB 2873) (families in conflict).

(21) The department will only refer child welfare cases to the department of social and health services division of child support enforcement when the court has found a child to have been abandoned by their parent or guardian as defined in RCW 13.34.030.

(22) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and 100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the provision of SafeCare, an evidence-based parenting program, for families in Grays Harbor county.

(23) $7,685,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $8,354,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $2,682,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the phase-in of the settlement agreement under D.S. et al. v. Department of Children, Youth and Families et al., United States district court for the western district of Washington, cause no. 2:21-cv-00113-BJR. The department must implement the provisions of the settlement agreement pursuant to the timeline and implementation plan provided for under the settlement agreement. This includes implementing provisions related to the emerging adulthood housing program, professional therapeutic foster care, statewide hub home model, revised licensing standards, family group planning, referrals and transition, qualified residential treatment program, and monitoring and implementation. To comply with the settlement agreement, funding in this subsection is provided as follows:

(a) $276,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $264,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $104,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation and monitoring of the state's implementation plan, which includes receiving recurring updates, requesting data on compliance, reporting on progress, and resolving disputes that may arise.

(b) $2,022,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,432,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $42,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the statewide hub home model. The department shall develop and adapt the existing hub home model to serve youth as described in the settlement agreement.

(c) $452,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $864,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $334,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to establish a negotiated rule-making method to align and update foster care and group care licensing standards.

(d) $2,195,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,110,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $238,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for revised referral and transition procedures for youth entering foster care.

(e) $1,868,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,852,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,543,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to develop and implement a professional therapeutic foster care contract and licensing category. Therapeutic foster care professionals are not required to have another source of income and must receive specialized training and support.

(f) $872,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $832,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $421,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to update assessment and placement procedures prior to placing a youth in a qualified residential treatment program, as well as updating the assessment schedule to every 90 days.

(g) The department shall implement all provisions of the settlement agreement, including those described in (a) through (f) of this subsection; revisions to shared planning meeting and family team decision-making policies and practices; and any and all additional settlement agreement requirements and timelines established.

(24) $15,527,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $33,225,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $8,909,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of a seven-level foster care support system. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) $5,527,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $11,054,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $5,284,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to expand foster care maintenance payments from a four-level to a seven-level support system, beginning January 1, 2024.

(b) $9,180,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $21,421,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $3,487,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for expanded caregiver support services. Services include, but are not limited to, placement, case aide, and after-hours support, as well as training, coaching, child care, and respite coordination.

(c) $573,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $566,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for project management to oversee the shift in systems and practices.

(d) $247,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $184,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $138,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a contract with the department of social and health services research and data analysis division to track program outcomes through monitoring and analytics.

(25) $732,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $732,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $362,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase staff to support statewide implementation of the kinship caregiver engagement unit.

(26) $7,332,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $7,332,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to issue foster care maintenance payments for up to 90 days to those kinship caregivers who obtain an initial license.

(27) $6,696,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $6,696,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $2,940,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for contracted visitation services for children in temporary out-of-home care. Funding is provided to reimburse providers for certain uncompensated services, which may include work associated with missed or canceled visits.

(28) $4,104,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $5,589,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to expand combined in-home services to serve more families. By December 1, 2023, and annually thereafter, the department shall provide a report to the legislature detailing combined in-home services expenditures and utilization, including the number of families served and a listing of services received by those families.

(29) $892,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $892,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $796,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for increased licensing staff. Licensing staff are increased in anticipation that more kinship placements will become licensed due to recent legislation and court decisions, including In re Dependency of K.W. and chapter 211, Laws of 2021 (E2SHB 1227) (child abuse or neglect).

(30) $755,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,014,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5124 (nonrelative kin placement). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(31) $338,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $317,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $54,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5515 (child abuse and neglect). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(32) $851,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,412,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $108,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5683 (foster care/Indian children). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(33) $2,304,000 of the opioid settlement account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5536 (controlled substances). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 228. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES—JUVENILE REHABILITATION PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$138,529,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$142,270,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$694,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$205,000

Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$196,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$281,894,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $2,841,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,841,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to county juvenile courts for effective, community-based programs that are culturally relevant, research-informed, and focused on supporting positive youth development, not just reducing recidivism. Additional funding for this purpose is provided through an interagency agreement with the health care authority. County juvenile courts shall apply to the department of children, youth, and families for funding for program-specific participation and the department shall provide grants to the courts consistent with the per-participant treatment costs identified by the institute. The block grant oversight committee, in consultation with the Washington state institute for public policy, shall identify effective, community-based programs that are culturally relevant, research-informed, and focused on supporting positive youth development to receive funding.

(2) $1,537,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,537,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for expansion of the juvenile justice treatments and therapies in department of children, youth, and families programs identified by the Washington state institute for public policy in its report: "Inventory of Evidence-based, Research-based, and Promising Practices for Prevention and Intervention Services for Children and Juveniles in the Child Welfare, Juvenile Justice, and Mental Health Systems." The department may concentrate delivery of these treatments and therapies at a limited number of programs to deliver the treatments in a cost-effective manner.

(3)(a) $6,198,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $6,198,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to implement evidence- and research-based programs through community juvenile accountability grants, administration of the grants, and evaluations of programs funded by the grants. In addition to funding provided in this subsection, funding to implement alcohol and substance abuse treatment programs for locally committed offenders is provided through an interagency agreement with the health care authority.

(b) The department of children, youth, and families shall administer a block grant to county juvenile courts for the purpose of serving youth as defined in RCW 13.40.510(4)(a) in the county juvenile justice system. Funds dedicated to the block grant include: Consolidated juvenile service funds, community juvenile accountability act grants, chemical dependency/mental health disposition alternative, and suspended disposition alternative. The department of children, youth, and families shall follow the following formula and must prioritize evidence-based programs and disposition alternatives and take into account juvenile courts program-eligible youth in conjunction with the number of youth served in each approved evidence-based program or disposition alternative: (i) Thirty-seven and one-half percent for the at-risk population of youth ten to seventeen years old; (ii) fifteen percent for the assessment of low, moderate, and high-risk youth; (iii) twenty-five percent for evidence-based program participation; (iv) seventeen and one-half percent for minority populations; (v) three percent for the chemical dependency and mental health disposition alternative; and (vi) two percent for the suspended dispositional alternatives. Funding for the special sex offender disposition alternative shall not be included in the block grant, but allocated on the average daily population in juvenile courts. Funding for the evidence-based expansion grants shall be excluded from the block grant formula. Funds may be used for promising practices when approved by the department of children, youth, and families and juvenile courts, through the community juvenile accountability act committee, based on the criteria established in consultation with Washington state institute for public policy and the juvenile courts.

(c) The department of children, youth, and families and the juvenile courts shall establish a block grant funding formula oversight committee with equal representation from the department of children, youth, and families and the juvenile courts. The purpose of this committee is to assess the ongoing implementation of the block grant funding formula, utilizing data-driven decision making and the most current available information. The committee will be co-chaired by the department of children, youth, and families and the juvenile courts, who will also have the ability to change members of the committee as needed to achieve its purpose. The committee may make changes to the formula categories in (d)(ii) of this subsection if it determines the changes will increase statewide service delivery or effectiveness of evidence-based program or disposition alternative resulting in increased cost/benefit savings to the state, including long-term cost/benefit savings. The committee must also consider these outcomes in determining when evidence-based expansion or special sex offender disposition alternative funds should be included in the block grant or left separate.

(d) The juvenile courts and administrative office of the courts must collect and distribute information and provide access to the data systems to the department of children, youth, and families and the Washington state institute for public policy related to program and outcome data. The department of children, youth, and families and the juvenile courts must work collaboratively to develop program outcomes that reinforce the greatest cost/benefit to the state in the implementation of evidence-based practices and disposition alternatives.

(4) $645,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $645,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for funding of the teamchild project.

(5) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant program focused on criminal street gang prevention and intervention. The department of children, youth, and families may award grants under this subsection. The department of children, youth, and families shall give priority to applicants who have demonstrated the greatest problems with criminal street gangs. Applicants composed of, at a minimum, one or more local governmental entities and one or more nonprofit, nongovernmental organizations that have a documented history of creating and administering effective criminal street gang prevention and intervention programs may apply for funding under this subsection. Each entity receiving funds must report to the department of children, youth, and families on the number and types of youth served, the services provided, and the impact of those services on the youth and the community.

(6) The juvenile rehabilitation institutions may use funding appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods, supplies, and services through hospital group purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.

(7) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to county juvenile courts to establish alternative detention facilities similar to the proctor house model in Jefferson county, Washington, that will provide less restrictive confinement alternatives to youth in their local communities. County juvenile courts shall apply to the department of children, youth, and families for funding and each entity receiving funds must report to the department on the number and types of youth serviced, the services provided, and the impact of those services on the youth and the community.

(8) $432,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $432,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to provide housing services to clients releasing from incarceration into the community.

(9)(a) $878,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $879,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 206, Laws of 2021 (concerning juvenile rehabilitation community transition services).

(b) Of the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection, $105,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $105,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for housing vouchers.

(10) $123,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $123,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 265, Laws of 2021 (supporting successful reentry).

(11) $3,306,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $8,732,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for caseload costs and staffing. Of the amount provided in this subsection: $1,752,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,428,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for staffing necessary to operate the baker cottage north living unit at green hill school that is anticipated to be operational by February 1, 2024.

(12) $1,791,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,754,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to maintain the facility, property, and assets at the facility formerly known as the Naselle youth camp in Naselle until the legislature considers and acts upon recommendations of the task force created in section 915 of this act.

(13) $2,436,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,206,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a dedicated institutional educational oversight and accountability team and 12 staff to provide a transition team at both green hill and echo glen that will serve as an education engagement team at the facility and will also coordinate and engage with community enrichment programs and community organizations to afford more successful transitions.

(14) $505,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $505,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for contracted services for housing for youth exiting juvenile rehabilitation facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 229. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES—EARLY LEARNING PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$628,969,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$706,373,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$458,539,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$104,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$385,965,000

Home Visiting Services Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$35,545,000

Home Visiting Services Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$36,417,000

Washington Opportunity Pathways Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$80,000,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$22,764,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$2,354,676,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) $138,751,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $156,241,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, $91,810,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation, and $80,000,000 of the opportunity pathways account—state appropriation are provided solely for the early childhood education and assistance program. These amounts shall support at least 17,378 slots in fiscal year 2024 and 18,478 slots in fiscal year 2025. Of the total slots in each fiscal year, 100 slots must be reserved for foster children to receive school-year-round enrollment.

(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(i) $26,877,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $29,504,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a slot rate increase of 18 percent for working and school day slots, and 9 percent for part day slots, beginning July 1, 2023.

(ii) $14,863,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $14,863,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to increase school day slots by 1,000 and to increase working day slots by 100, beginning in fiscal year 2024.

(iii) $14,863,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely to increase school day slots by 1,000 and to increase working day slots by 100, beginning in fiscal year 2025.

(c) The department of children, youth, and families must develop a methodology to identify, at the school district level, the geographic locations of where early childhood education and assistance program slots are needed to meet the entitlement specified in RCW 43.216.556. This methodology must be linked to the caseload forecast produced by the caseload forecast council and must include estimates of the number of slots needed at each school district and the corresponding facility needs required to meet the entitlement in accordance with RCW 43.216.556. This methodology must be included as part of the budget submittal documentation required by RCW 43.88.030.

(2) The department is the lead agency for and recipient of the federal child care and development fund grant. Amounts within this grant shall be used to fund child care licensing, quality initiatives, agency administration, and other costs associated with child care subsidies.

(3) The department of children, youth, and families shall work in collaboration with the department of social and health services to determine the appropriate amount of state expenditures for the working connections child care program to claim towards the state's maintenance of effort for the temporary assistance for needy families program. The departments will also collaborate to track the average monthly child care subsidy caseload and expenditures by fund type, including child care development fund, general fund—state appropriation, and temporary assistance for needy families for the purpose of estimating the annual temporary assistance for needy families reimbursement from the department of social and health services to the department of children, youth, and families. Effective December 1, 2023, and annually thereafter, the department of children, youth, and families must report to the governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature the total state contribution for the working connections child care program claimed the previous fiscal year towards the state's maintenance of effort for the temporary assistance for needy families program and the total temporary assistance for needy families reimbursement from the department of social and health services for the previous fiscal year.

(4)(a) $203,817,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $215,866,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $41,030,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for enhancements to the working connections child care program.

(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(i) $98,839,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $105,688,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to increase subsidy base rates to the 85th percentile of market based on the 2021 market rate survey for child care centers.

(ii) $104,978,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $110,178,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $41,030,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement the 2023-2025 collective bargaining agreement covering family child care providers as provided in section 907 of this act. Of the amounts provided in this subsection (4)(b)(ii):

(A) $8,263,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $9,793,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are for an 85 cent per hour per child rate increase for family, friends, and neighbor providers (FFNs) beginning July 1, 2023, and a 15 cent per hour per child rate increase beginning July 1, 2024.

(B) $34,498,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $38,168,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $41,030,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided to increase subsidy base rates to the 85th percentile of market based on the 2021 market rate survey for licensed family homes.

(C) $370,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $370,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided for the department to pay the background check application and fingerprint processing fees.

(D) $61,847,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $61,847,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are for a cost of care rate enhancement for licensed family homes.

(c) Funding in this subsection must be expended with internal controls that provide child-level detail for all transactions.

(d) On July 1, 2023, and July 1, 2024, the department, in collaboration with the department of social and health services, must report to the governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature on the status of overpayments in the working connections child care program. The report must include the following information for the previous fiscal year:

(i) A summary of the number of overpayments that occurred;

(ii) The reason for each overpayment;

(iii) The total cost of overpayments;

(iv) A comparison to overpayments that occurred in the past two preceding fiscal years; and

(v) Any planned modifications to internal processes that will take place in the coming fiscal year to further reduce the occurrence of overpayments.

(e) Within available amounts, the department in consultation with the office of financial management shall report enrollments and active caseload for the working connections child care program to the governor and the legislative fiscal committees and the legislative-executive WorkFirst poverty reduction oversight task force on an agreed upon schedule. The report shall also identify the number of cases participating in both temporary assistance for needy families and working connections child care. The department must also report on the number of children served through contracted slots.

(5) $1,560,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,560,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $6,701,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the seasonal child care program.

(6) $871,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $871,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department of children, youth, and families to contract with a countywide nonprofit organization with early childhood expertise in Pierce county for a project to prevent child abuse and neglect using nationally recognized models.

(a) The nonprofit organization must continue to implement a countywide resource and referral linkage system for families of children who are prenatal through age five.

(b) The nonprofit organization must offer a voluntary brief newborn home visiting program. The program must meet the diverse needs of Pierce county residents and, therefore, it must be flexible, culturally appropriate, and culturally responsive. The department, in collaboration with the nonprofit organization, must examine the feasibility of leveraging federal and other fund sources, including federal Title IV-E and medicaid funds, for home visiting provided through the pilot. The department must report its findings to the governor and appropriate legislative committees by September 1, 2023.

(7) $3,577,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $3,587,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $9,588,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation are provided solely for the early childhood intervention prevention services (ECLIPSE) program. The department shall contract for ECLIPSE services to provide therapeutic child care and other specialized treatment services to abused, neglected, at-risk, and/or drug-affected children. The department shall pursue opportunities to leverage other funding to continue and expand ECLIPSE services. Priority for services shall be given to children referred from the department.

(8) The department shall place a ten percent administrative overhead cap on any contract entered into with the University of Washington. In a bi-annual report to the governor and the legislature, the department shall report the total amount of funds spent on the quality rating and improvements system and the total amount of funds spent on degree incentives, scholarships, and tuition reimbursements.

(9) $1,728,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,728,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for reducing barriers for low-income providers to participate in the early achievers program.

(10) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a contract with a nonprofit entity experienced in the provision of promoting early literacy for children through pediatric office visits.

(11) $4,000,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for early intervention assessment and services.

(12) The department shall work with state and local law enforcement, federally recognized tribal governments, and tribal law enforcement to develop a process for expediting fingerprinting and data collection necessary to conduct background checks for tribal early learning and child care providers.

(13) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for continued implementation of chapter 202, Laws of 2017 (children's mental health).

(14) Within existing resources, the department shall continue implementation of chapter 409, Laws of 2019 (early learning access).

(15) $265,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $265,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a statewide family resource and referral linkage system, with coordinated access point of resource navigators who will connect families with children prenatal through age five with services, programs, and community resources through a facilitated referral and linkage process.

(16)(a) $114,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $173,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, $6,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation, and $31,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) are provided solely for the department to complete its pilot project to determine the feasibility of a child care license category for multi-site programs operating under one owner or one entity and to complete one year of transition activities. The department shall adopt rules to implement the pilot project and may waive or adapt licensing requirements when necessary to allow for the operation of a new license category. Pilot participants must include, at least:

(i) One governmental agency;

(ii) One nonprofit organization; and

(iii) One for-profit private business.

(b) New or existing license child care providers may participate in the pilot. When selecting and approving pilot project locations, the department shall aim to select a mix of rural, urban, and suburban locations. By July 1, 2024, the department shall submit to the governor and relevant committees of the legislature a plan for permanent implementation of this license category, including any necessary changes to law.

(17) $2,760,000 of the home visiting account—state appropriation and $6,540,000 of the home visiting account—federal appropriation are provided for a funding increase, including to increase funding for contracts to support wage and cost increases and create more equity in contracting among the home visiting workforce.

(18) Within the amounts provided in this section, funding is provided for the department to make permanent the two language access coordinators with specialties in Spanish and Somali as funded in chapter 334, Laws of 2021.

(19)(a) The department must provide to the education research and data center, housed at the office of financial management, data on all state-funded early childhood programs. These programs include the early support for infants and toddlers, early childhood education and assistance program (ECEAP), and the working connections and seasonal subsidized childcare programs including license-exempt facilities or family, friend, and neighbor care. The data provided by the department to the education research data center must include information on children who participate in these programs, including their name and date of birth, and dates the child received services at a particular facility.

(b) ECEAP early learning professionals must enter any new qualifications into the department's professional development registry starting in the 2015-16 school year, and every school year thereafter. By October 2017, and every October thereafter, the department must provide updated ECEAP early learning professional data to the education research data center.

(c) The department must request federally funded head start programs to voluntarily provide data to the department and the education research data center that is equivalent to what is being provided for state-funded programs.

(d) The education research and data center must provide an updated report on early childhood program participation and K-12 outcomes to the house of representatives appropriations committee and the senate ways and means committee using available data every March for the previous school year.

(e) The department, in consultation with the department of social and health services, must withhold payment for services to early childhood programs that do not report on the name, date of birth, and the dates a child received services at a particular facility.

(20) $260,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $260,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to continue implementation of an infant and early childhood mental health consultation initiative to support tribal child care and early learning programs. Funding may be used to provide culturally congruent infant and early childhood mental health supports for tribal child care, the tribal early childhood education and assistance program, and tribal head start providers. The department must consult with federally recognized tribes which may include round tables through the Indian policy early learning committee.

(21) $640,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $640,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for continued expansion and support of family, friend, or neighbor caregivers with a focus on the provision of play and learn groups. The amounts provided in this subsection may be used for the department to:

(a) Fund consistent staffing across the state's six geographic regions to support the needs of family, friend, or neighbor caregivers;

(b) Contract with a statewide child care resource and referral program to sustain and expand the number of facilitated play groups to meet the needs of communities statewide;

(c) Support existing infrastructure for organizations that have developed the three existing play and learn program models so they have capacity to provide training, technical assistance, evaluation, data collection, and other support needed for implementation; and

(d) Provide direct implementation support to community-based organizations that offer play and learn groups.

(22) $5,143,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $5,136,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for tribal early learning grants to be distributed to providers with tribal children enrolled in early childhood education and assistance program, early ECEAP, childcare, head start, early head start and home visiting programs. Grants will be administered by the department of children, youth and families office of tribal relations and may be awarded for purposes including but not limited to culturally appropriate mental health supports for addressing historical trauma, incorporating indigenous foods, culturally-responsive books and materials, staff professional development, curriculum adaptations and supplements, tribal language education, elders and storytelling in classrooms, traditional music and arts instruction, and transportation to facilitate tribal child participation in early childhood education. Of the amounts in this subsection, the department may use $143,000 in fiscal year 2024 and up to $136,000 in fiscal year 2025 to cover associated administrative expenses.

(23) $7,698,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $7,698,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to increase complex needs grant funds for child care providers.

(24) $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for equity grants provided in chapter 199, Laws of 2021 (E2SSB 5237).

(25) $2,354,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,431,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to continue the birth-to-three early childhood education and assistance program. Funding is sufficient for a 20 percent rate increase beginning July 1, 2023, and a 1.8 percent rate increase beginning July 1, 2024.

(26) $3,352,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $9,916,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to implement Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5225 (working conn. child care). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(27) $1,309,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,309,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5316 (DCYF background check fees). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(28) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to help close the gap in childcare access in the King county region by providing pandemic recovery support funding to the Launch learning organization.

(29) $533,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department to submit an implementation plan to expand access to Washington's mixed delivery child care system. The plan must assume that any financial contribution by families is capped at no more than seven percent of household income and that the child care workforce are provided living wages and benefits. The plan must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025, and should:

(a) Follow the intent of chapter 199, Laws of 2021;

(b) Be aligned with the cost of quality care rate model;

(c) Include timelines, costs, and statutory changes necessary for timely and effective implementation; and

(d) Be developed through partnership with the statewide child care resource and referral organization and the largest union representing child care providers, with consultation from families.

(30) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for infant and early childhood mental health consultation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 230. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES—PROGRAM SUPPORT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$251,625,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$249,539,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$145,929,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$2,486,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$180,000

Home Visiting Services Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$482,000

Home Visiting Services Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$380,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$650,621,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a Washington state mentoring organization to continue its public-private partnerships providing technical assistance and training to mentoring programs that serve at-risk youth.

(2) $2,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $6,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $2,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of an agreement reached between the governor and the Washington federation of state employees for the language access providers under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, as provided in section 907 of this act.

(3) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a full-time employee to coordinate policies and programs to support pregnant and parenting individuals receiving chemical dependency or substance use disorder treatment.

(4) $2,719,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,632,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $174,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the phase-in of the settlement agreement under D.S. et al. v. Department of Children, Youth and Families et al., United States district court for the western district of Washington, cause no. 2:21-cv-00113-BJR. The department must implement the provisions of the settlement agreement pursuant to the timeline and implementation plan provided for under the settlement agreement. This includes implementing provisions related to the emerging adulthood housing program, professional therapeutic foster care, statewide hub home model, revised licensing standards, family group planning, referrals and transition, qualified residential treatment program, and monitoring and implementation. To comply with the settlement agreement, funding in this subsection is provided as follows:

(a) $2,406,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,382,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $174,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for supported housing programs for hard-to-place foster youth age 16 and above. The department shall provide housing and case management supports that ensure youth placement stability, promote mental health and well-being, and prepare youth for independent living.

(b) $313,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation and monitoring of the state's implementation plan, which includes receiving recurring updates, requesting data on compliance, reporting on progress, and resolving disputes that may arise.

(5) $704,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,022,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $222,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to implement a language access plan, which will include but is not limited to:

(a) Translation of department materials;

(b) Hiring staff to form a centralized language access team to provide language access supports and coordination across all department divisions;

(c) Outreach to community organizations serving multilingual children and families regarding department programs;

(d) Webinars and other technical assistance provided in multiple languages for department programs;

(e) Training for department staff on language access resources; and

(f) Other means of increasing language access and equity for providers and caregivers in health and safety, licensing and regulations, and public funding opportunities for programs offered by the department.

(6) $170,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $170,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $50,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for indirect costs associated with increased licensing staff in anticipation that more kinship placements will become licensed due to recent legislation and court decisions, including In re Dependency of K.W. and chapter 211, Laws of 2021 (E2SHB 1227).

(7) $1,885,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,885,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a feasibility study to develop an implementation plan and determine costs for a new child welfare information system.

(8) $1,187,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,187,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for housing support services for youth exiting foster care and juvenile rehabilitation.

(9) $19,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $19,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $6,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for indirect costs associated with the implementation of a seven-level foster care support system.

(10) $1,494,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for continued implementation of the family first prevention services act requirements, including technology enhancements to support the automated assessments, data quality, and reporting requirements. Funding provided in this subsection is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(11) $717,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $717,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $324,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for continued implementation of chapter 210, Laws of 2021 (2SHB 1219).

(12) $1,248,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,248,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the continuation of the emergency adolescent housing pilot program. The housing pilot will serve hard-to-place foster youth who are at least 16 years old with housing and intensive case management.

(13) $319,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $319,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $170,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to continue implementation of chapter 137, Laws of 2022 (2SHB 1905).

(14) $26,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $26,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to continue implementation of chapter 39, Laws of 2022 (SHB 2068).

(15) $23,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $31,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $7,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5225 (working conn. child care). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(16) $1,571,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,571,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5316 (DCYF background check fees). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(17) $53,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $53,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $16,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5515 (child abuse and neglect). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(18) $43,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $78,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $18,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5124 (nonrelative kin placement). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(19) $3,627,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,628,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5256 (child welfare housing). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(20) $33,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $58,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $14,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5683 (foster care/Indian children). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(21) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the partnership council for juvenile justice to consider and provide recommendations regarding juvenile justice policy projects and for one additional staff for ongoing policy and program analysis. The partnership council is authorized to consult with experts to study and gather research on best practices regarding juvenile justice, and to consult with relevant stakeholders regarding its potential recommendations. Relevant stakeholders may include but are not limited to the superior court judges association; Washington association of juvenile court administrators; Washington association of county clerks; the association of Washington counties; community-based organizations with expertise in legal financial obligation reform, community compensation funds, supporting victims and survivors of crime, or supporting youth who have been convicted or adjudicated of criminal offenses; law enforcement, prosecutors; public defenders; incarcerated and formerly incarcerated youth and young adults; the administrative office of the courts; the crime victims compensation program; and the office of crime victims advocacy.

(a) The council shall:

(i) By October 31, 2024, report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature recommendations for establishing a state-funded community compensation program to address out of pocket expenses for those who have been harmed by juvenile criminal offenses. Recommendations shall consider restorative principles and best practices and shall be developed in consultation with those who have been adjudicated and charged restitution and those who have been owed restitution. The council shall provide recommendations for program implementation including, but not limited to, structure and placement within state government; scope and scale of funding including eligibility criteria; retroactivity; documentation requirements; and coordination with the existing crime victims compensation fund. The council shall provide estimates of startup costs and ongoing operational costs, including administration and direct compensation to victims.

(ii) By October 31, 2024, report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature recommendations regarding retention, dissemination, confidentiality, sealing, consequences, and general treatment of juvenile court records. In making recommendations, the council shall take into consideration developments in brain science regarding decision-making amongst youth; the impact the juvenile court records can have on future individual well-being; principles of racial equity; and impacts that the recommendations could have on recidivism.

(iii) By June 30, 2025, report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature recommendations regarding implementation of juvenile court jurisdiction expansion to encompass persons 18, 19, and 20 years old. Recommendations shall include an implementation plan for the expansion, including necessary funding, essential personnel and programmatic resources, measures necessary to avoid a negative impact on the state's child protection response, and specific milestones related to operations and policy. The implementation plan shall also include a timeline for structural and systemic changes within the juvenile justice system for the juvenile rehabilitation division; the department of children, youth, and families; the department of corrections; and the juvenile court pursuant to chapter 13.04 RCW. The implementation plan shall also include an operations and business plan that defines benchmarks including possible changes to resource allocations; a review of the estimated costs avoided by local and state governments with the reduction of recidivism and an analysis of cost savings reinvestment options; and estimated new costs incurred to provide juvenile justice services to persons 18, 19, and 20 years old.

(22) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a statewide nonprofit organization to develop public facing regionalized data dashboards and reports to measure change in equitable access over time as a result of programs and grants administered by the department. The statewide nonprofit organization must have experience promoting and supporting STEM education from early learning through postsecondary education and demonstrated ability to partner with state agencies and community organizations. The dashboard data must be accessible in a consumer-friendly format and include updates on program supply and demand for subsidized childcare and preschool, disaggregated by program and facility type, geography, family demographics, and rate of copayment; and outcomes of grants and rate enhancements, disaggregated by staff role, program and facility type, and geography. The department should take into consideration data on the population, length of employment, professional development, demographics, and, when available, compensation of early learning professionals employed in the state.

(23) $1,508,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,943,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,769,000 of the general fund—private/local appropriation are provided solely for the department to contract with one or more community organizations with expertise in the LifeSet case management model to serve youth and adults currently being served in or exiting the foster care, juvenile justice, and mental health systems to successfully transition to adulthood.

(End of part)

PART III

NATURAL RESOURCES

NEW SECTION. Sec. 301. FOR THE COLUMBIA RIVER GORGE COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$1,725,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$1,266,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$32,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$2,564,000

Climate Commitment Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$138,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$5,725,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $105,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $108,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a land use planner to provide land use planning services dedicated to Klickitat county. Because the activities of the land use planner are solely for the benefit of Washington state, Oregon is not required to provide matching funds for this activity.

(2) $553,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $352,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $905,000 of the general fund—private/local appropriation are provided solely for the access database replacement project.

(3) $138,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation and $138,000 of the general fund—private/local appropriation are provided solely for staff to lead implementation of the agency's climate change action plan and to support implementation of the vital sign indicators monitoring program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$20,381,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$17,141,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$108,429,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$29,544,000

Dedicated Cannabis Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2024)
. . . .
$19,000

Dedicated Cannabis Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2025)
. . . .
$23,000

Climate Commitment Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$20,912,000

Reclamation Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,684,000

Flood Control Assistance Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$5,015,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$150,000

Refrigerant Emission Management Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,783,000

State Emergency Water Projects Revolving Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$40,000

Waste Reduction, Recycling, and Litter Control

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$33,320,000

State Drought Preparedness and Response Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$204,000

State and Local Improvements Revolving Account—Water

Supply Facilities—State Appropriation
. . . .
$186,000

Water Rights Tracking System Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$48,000

Site Closure Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$582,000

Wood Stove Education and Enforcement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$605,000

Worker and Community Right to Know Fund—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,188,000

Water Rights Processing Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$39,000

Water Quality Permit Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$64,870,000

Underground Storage Tank Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,858,000

Biosolids Permit Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$3,023,000

Hazardous Waste Assistance Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$9,271,000

Radioactive Mixed Waste Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$23,563,000

Air Pollution Control Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,648,000

Oil Spill Prevention Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$8,396,000

Air Operating Permit Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$5,430,000

Wastewater Treatment Plant Operator Certification

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$801,000

Oil Spill Response Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$7,076,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$373,342,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—Local

Appropriation
. . . .
$775,000

Model Toxics Control Stormwater Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$16,991,000

Voluntary Cleanup Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$344,000

Paint Product Stewardship Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$151,000

Water Pollution Control Revolving Administration

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$8,414,000

Clean Fuels Program Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,721,000

Climate Investment Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$46,795,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$829,762,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $455,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $455,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to grant to the northwest straits commission to provide funding, technical assistance, and/or coordination support equally to the seven Puget Sound marine resources committees.

(2) $170,000 of the oil spill prevention account—state appropriation is provided solely for a contract with the University of Washington's sea grant program to continue an educational program targeted to small spills from commercial fishing vessels, ferries, cruise ships, ports, and marinas.

(3) $102,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $102,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Executive Order No. 12-07, Washington's response to ocean acidification.

(4) $24,000,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide grants to local governments for the purpose of supporting local solid waste and financial assistance programs.

(5) $150,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of the state marine management plan and ongoing costs of the Washington coastal marine advisory council to serve as a forum and provide recommendations on coastal management issues.

(6) $2,000,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to convene a stakeholder group, including representatives from overburdened communities, to assist with developing a water quality implementation plan for polychlorinated biphenyls and to address other emerging contaminants in the Spokane river. The department must also consult with the Spokane tribe of Indians and other interested tribes when developing and implementing actions to address water quality in the Spokane river.

(7) $4,002,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely to address flood prevention in the Nooksack basin and Sumas prairie. Of this amount:

(a) $2,000,000 is provided solely to expand and sustain Whatcom county's floodplain integrated planning (FLIP) team planning process, including supporting communication, community participation, coordination, technical studies and analysis, and development of local solutions.

(b) $900,000 is provided solely for the department to support transboundary coordination, including facilitation and technical support to develop and evaluate alternatives for managing transboundary flooding in Whatcom county and British Columbia.

(c) $1,102,000 is provided solely to support dedicated local and department capacity for floodplain planning and technical support. Of this amount in subsection (c), $738,000 is solely for a grant to Whatcom county. The remaining amount is for the department to provide ongoing staff technical assistance and support to flood prevention efforts in this area.

(8) $16,472,000 of the climate investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for capacity grants to federally recognized tribes for: (a) Consultation on spending decisions on grants in accordance with RCW 70A.65.305; and (b) consultation on clean energy siting projects. In order to meet the requirements of RCW 70A.65.230(1)(b), tribal applicants are encouraged to include a tribal resolution supporting their request with their grant application.

(9) $1,363,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for preparation and filing of adjudications of state water rights in water resource inventory area 1 (Nooksack).

(10) $573,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $963,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for preparation and filing of adjudications of state water rights in lake Roosevelt and its immediate tributaries.

(11) $2,479,000 of the climate investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for addressing air quality in overburdened communities highly impacted by air pollution under RCW 70A.65.020.

(12) $177,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $177,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to validate a proposed standardized channel migration zone mapping methodology, develop a statewide channel migration zone mapping implementation plan, and provide technical assistance to local and tribal governments looking to use the new standard.

(13) $296,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for technical assistance, compliance assurance, and a study to identify equity challenges associated with the ban of certain hydrofluorocarbon-related products.

(14) $2,500,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to conduct a statewide compost emissions study, which will provide essential data needed to improve the quality of air permitting decisions, improve compost facility operations, and support state goals to reduce organic waste in landfills reducing climate change impacts.

(15) $1,128,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,128,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to provide technical assistance to landowners and local governments to promote voluntary compliance, implement best management practices, and support implementation of water quality clean-up plans in shellfish growing areas, agricultural areas, forestlands, and other types of land uses, including technical assistance focused on protection and restoration of critical riparian management areas important for salmon recovery.

(16) $2,000,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to develop a programmatic environmental impact statement focused on green hydrogen projects to identify potential impacts and mitigation. The work would include a public process and engagement with agencies, industry, tribes, local government, ports, and overburdened communities.

(17) $996,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to develop a programmatic environmental impact statement for potential impacts and mitigation focused on solar energy projects in the Columbia plateau to follow on from the Washington State University least-conflict solar siting project. The work would include a public process and engagement with agencies, industry, tribes, local government, and overburdened communities.

(18) $2,702,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to develop a 6PPD action plan and complete a safer alternatives assessment of the 6PPD compound used in tires, including obtaining any data necessary to complete the alternatives assessment. The action plan should identify, characterize, and evaluate uses and releases of 6PPD and related chemicals, and recommend actions to protect human health and the environment. The department must provide a progress report on the action plan and alternatives assessment to the governor's office, office of financial management, and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2024.

(19) $5,195,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely to establish a program to monitor 6PPD compounds in water and sediment, identify effective best management practices to treat 6PPD in stormwater runoff, produce guidance on how and when to use best management practices for toxicity reduction to protect salmon and other aquatic life, and incorporate the guidance into stormwater management manuals.

(20) $1,823,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $473,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5104 (marine shoreline habitat). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(21) $37,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5649 (floodproofing improvements). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(22) $1,185,000 of the clean fuels program account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5447 (alternative jet fuel). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(23) $1,220,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5144 (batteries/environment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(24) $198,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5369 (polychlorinated biphenyls). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(25) $165,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $165,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to provide a grant to Clark county for the purpose of developing and implementing a lake management plan to restore and maintain the health of Vancouver lake, a category 5 303(d) status impaired body of water. The department must work with the county to include involvement by property owners around the lake and within the watersheds that drain to the lake, the department of natural resources, other state agencies and local governments with proprietary or regulatory jurisdiction, tribes, and nonprofit organizations advocating for the health of the lake. The plan should incorporate work already completed by the county and other entities involved in development of the lake management strategy.

(26) $276,000 of the model toxics control operating account—local appropriation is provided solely for a grant to San Juan county for the enhancement of ongoing oil spill response preparedness staff hiring, spill response equipment acquisition, and spill response training and operational expenses.

(27) $702,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $758,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to provide grants to the following organizations in the amounts specified for the purpose of coordinating, monitoring, restoring, and conducting research for Puget Sound kelp conservation and recovery:

(a) $300,000 to the Squaxin Island Tribe;

(b) $200,000 to the Samish Indian Nation;

(c) $144,000 to the Lower Elwha Klallam Tribe;

(d) $200,000 to the Northwest straits commission;

(e) $366,000 to the Puget Sound restoration fund to subcontract with sound data systems and Vashon nature center; and

(f) $250,000 to the reef check foundation.

(28) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department, in consultation with other agencies as necessary, to conduct an analysis of how to continue water use for irrigation during draw-down related to potential lower Snake river dam removal and thereafter from a restored river.

(a) The analysis must include the following:

(i) A plan identifying potential mitigation needs and interim approaches for delivery of water for irrigation pursuant to existing water rights for those using pumps or wells, or both, from Ice Harbor reservoir during the transition from the current reservoir-based irrigation to irrigation from a restored river;

(ii) Identification of cost-effective options for continued irrigation at current amounts and with existing water rights from the lower Snake river at the area of the current Ice Harbor pool following river restoration; and

(iii) Cost estimates for any necessary irrigation system upgrades required to continue irrigation from the lower Snake river following river restoration.

(b) The department may, as necessary and appropriate, consult for this analysis with irrigators and tribal governments.

(c) The department must provide a status update to the environment and energy committees of the legislature and the governor by December 31, 2024.

(29)(a) $500,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to carry out the following activities to inform the design and implementation of a producer responsibility program for consumer packaging, including paper, plastic, metal, and glass, and paper products:

(i) Conduct a recycling, reuse, and source reduction targets study; and

(ii) Carry out a community input process on the state's recycling system.

(b) The department must contract with a third-party consultant with relevant technical expertise and capabilities in facilitation and gathering public input, including from overburdened communities, to carry out the activities specified in (a) of this subsection. The third party consultant must submit a report to the appropriate committees of the house of representatives and the senate by December 1, 2023.

(c) The recycling, reuse, and source reduction targets study must:

(i) Document recycling rates, reuse and plastic component elimination targets for consumer packaging and paper products that have been adopted in other jurisdictions, measure methods used, and the basis or justification for recommended target rates selected;

(ii) Recommend, under a producer responsibility program and associated enabling conditions under different scenarios, an overall recycling rate, a separate specific minimum reuse rate, a recycling rate for each material category, and a source reduction rate to be achieved solely by eliminating plastic components; and

(iii) Make recommendations that consider the commercial viability and technological feasibility of achieving rates based on current rates achieved in the state, rates achieved based on real world performance data, and other data, with performance rates designed to be achieved statewide by 2032.

(d) The community input process on the state's recycling system must include:

(i) In-person and virtual workshops and community meetings held at locations in urban and rural areas and in ways that are accessible to stakeholders across the state, including overburdened communities;

(ii) Public opinion surveys that are representative of Washington residents across the state, including overburdened communities and urban and rural areas; and

(iii) A focus on eliciting an improved understanding of public values and opinions related to the state's recycling system, the current public experience with respect to the state's recycling systems, and ways the public believes that their recycling experience and system outcomes could be improved.

(30) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department's engagement with the federal government, Indian tribes, water users, and local governments on a process that could result in a federal Indian water rights settlement through the Nooksack adjudication. The department shall produce a monthly report during the claims filing period to monitor the progress of claims filed by water users. The department shall provide a report to the appropriate standing committees of the legislature regarding the status of the adjudication and any potential settlement structure by June 30, 2024, and by June 30, 2025.

(31) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to Whatcom county to provide technical assistance that must be made available to all water users in WRIA 1 in filing adjudication claims under RCW 90.03.140. This assistance must be administered by Whatcom county and no portion of this funding may be used to contest the claims of any other claimant in the adjudication.

(32) $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to Whatcom county acting as fiscal agent for the WRIA 1 watershed management board, in support of collaborative water supply planning in WRIA 1. Funding may be used to collect or analyze technical information, to develop and assess the feasibility of water supply solutions in WRIA 1, and for facilitation and mediation among parties including, but not limited to, the department, Whatcom county, the public utility district, the city of Bellingham, Lummi Nation, and the Nooksack Tribe. Specific funding allocations, including purpose and amount, will be determined by the WRIA 1 watershed management board. Funding under this subsection will be available only after the filing of the Nooksack adjudication, and no funding provided for the Nooksack adjudication will be used to support the activities funded by this subsection. It is anticipated that these activities will run in parallel with the Nooksack adjudication.

(33) $10,000,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to install air quality monitors statewide, with priority made for gaining increased information that will inform decisions for mitigating climate impacts to overburdened communities.

(34) $27,000 of the reclamation account—state appropriation, $19,000 of the flood control assistant account—state appropriation, $131,000 of the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account—state appropriation, $15,000 of the worker and community right-to-know account—state appropriation, $427,000 of the water quality permit account—state appropriation, $38,000 of the underground storage tank account—state appropriation, $23,000 of the bio solids permit account—state appropriation, $70,000 of the hazardous waste assistance account—state appropriation, $189,000 of the radioactive mixed waste account—state appropriation, $27,000 of the air pollution control account—state appropriation, $54,000 of the oil spill prevention account—state appropriation, $38,000 of the air operating permit account—state appropriation, $2,106,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation, $19,000 of the refrigerant emission management account—state appropriation, $616,000 of the climate investment account—state appropriation, and $50,000 of the water pollution control revolving administration account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department to upgrade the ecology administration of grants and loans system and move it to a cloud environment. Funding is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(35) $1,050,000 of the hazardous waste assistance account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to upgrade turboplan, the system that allows businesses and organizations to submit pollution prevention plans, and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(36) $508,000 of the climate investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to develop a web-based portal that tracks Washington's climate commitment act investments and their outcomes, using the data collected from the requirements specified in RCW 70A.65.300, to increase transparency and accountability of spending and performance.

(a) Information shared on the portal should include, but not be limited to:

(i) Cumulative and annual investments;

(ii) The geographic location of funding invested or to be invested;

(iii) Benefits to vulnerable populations and overburdened communities;

(iv) Cobenefits, accomplishments, and measurable outcomes of investments including greenhouse gas emission reductions where appropriate; and

(v) Investments that are tribal priorities supported by a resolution of an Indian tribe per RCW 70A.65.230, on both tribal and nontribal land.

(b) In addition to traditional mapping, the department should also utilize a variety of data visualization tools to present information on the portal.

(37) $200,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with a consultant to develop a report that conducts a full emissions life cycle assessment for solid waste processed at the Spokane Waste to Energy Facility (WTEF) compared to solid waste processed at three other landfills within the region that waste may be sent to if the WTEF were to cease operations. The report must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31st, 2023.

(38) Within the amounts provided in subsections (18) and (19), the department may enter into agreements to provide funding to the University of Washington and Washington State University for 6PPD research when they are available to offer established methods, equipment, or expertise.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303. FOR THE WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$800,000

Pollution Liability Insurance Agency Underground

Storage Tank Revolving Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$957,000

Pollution Liability Insurance Program Trust Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,550,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$3,307,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$40,515,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$40,312,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$7,231,000

Winter Recreation Program Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,928,000

ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$396,000

Snowmobile Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$5,715,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$367,000

Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$146,851,000

Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account—Private/Local

Appropriation
. . . .
$420,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$246,735,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $5,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $5,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $142,000 of the parks renewal and stewardship account—state appropriation are provided solely for operating budget impacts from capital budget projects funded in the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.

(2) $127,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $128,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $750,000 of the parks renewal and stewardship account—state appropriation are provided solely to monitor known cultural resource sites, perform needed evaluations for historic properties, manage historic preservation capital projects, and support native American grave protection and repatriation act compliance.

(3) $299,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $299,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,797,000 of the parks renewal and stewardship account—state appropriation are provided solely for additional staff and technical support for scoping and scheduling to proactively address tribal and community concerns and increase the quality of capital project requests.

(4) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to complete a park master plan and an environmental impact statement for Miller peninsula park.

(5) $3,750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the maintenance of state parks, including maintaining grounds and facilities, trails, restrooms, water access areas, and similar activities.

(6) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely to create a statewide data management system with the department of natural resources and the department of fish and wildlife to make informed management decisions that meet conservation goals for public lands. The agencies will also collaborate with tribal governments to ensure cultural resources and cultural practices are considered and incorporated into management plans.

(7) $129,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $129,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant for the operation of the Northwest weather and avalanche center.

(8) $170,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $170,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a contract with a statewide trail maintenance and hiking nonprofit organization to implement the emerging leaders program to expand equity in the outdoors. The goal of the program is expanding both the number and diversity of trained, qualified individuals available for employment in the outdoor recreation and natural resource management sectors. The program must demonstrate a commitment to diversity, equity, and inclusion by providing a safe and supportive environment for individuals of diverse backgrounds, including those who have been historically underrepresented in the outdoor recreation and natural resource sectors, such as indigenous people and people of color. The program must provide both technical outdoor skills training and professional development opportunities that include, but are not limited to, outdoor leadership, representation in the outdoors, and team building.

(9) $21,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5371 (orca vessel protection). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$10,800,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$7,218,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$6,196,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$24,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$464,000

Climate Investment Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$200,000

Firearms Range Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$37,000

Recreation Resources Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,905,000

NOVA Program Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,564,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$31,408,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $37,000 of the firearms range account—state appropriation is provided solely to the recreation and conservation funding board for administration of the firearms range grant program as described in RCW 79A.25.210.

(2) $4,905,000 of the recreation resources account—state appropriation is provided solely to the recreation and conservation funding board for administrative and coordinating costs of the recreation and conservation office and the board as described in RCW 79A.25.080(1).

(3) $1,564,000 of the NOVA program account—state appropriation is provided solely to the recreation and conservation funding board for administration of the nonhighway and off-road vehicle activities program as described in chapter 46.09 RCW.

(4) $139,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $139,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the governor's salmon recovery office to implement the governor's salmon recovery strategy update by convening the natural resources subcabinet on a regular basis and developing biennial statewide work priorities with a recommended budget for salmon recovery pursuant to RCW 77.85.030(4)(e) that align with tribal priorities and regional salmon recovery plans. The office shall submit the biennial implementation plan to the governor's office and the office of financial management no later than October 31, 2024.

(5) $2,186,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,286,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for operational and administrative support of lead entities and salmon recovery regions.

(6) $200,000 of the climate investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the agency to complete the required community engagement plan as outlined in RCW 70A.65.030, the climate commitment act.

(7) $188,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $184,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to update recreation and conservation data collection methods to maintain up-to-date data sets and make the data publicly available.

(8) $1,464,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation and $50,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account—state appropriation are provided solely to support removal efforts for flowering rush in the Columbia river basin and Whatcom county.

(9) $3,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization with a mission for salmon and steelhead restoration to install near-term solutions to prevent steelhead mortality at the Hood canal bridge.

(10) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to increase threatened and endangered salmon escapement within the nontribal commercial fishery on the lower Columbia river. The grants may be provided to commercial fishers for the purpose of installing pound nets or fish traps under an approved experimental fishery within Washington waters. Grant recipients must be required to keep detailed records of all species caught as well as any nontarget species, including the release of threatened or endangered salmon. Within 90 days of the completion of a fishing season the grant recipient must provide a report to the office and the department of fish and wildlife summarizing the records of fish catch and fish released. The grant agreement must make provision for continued use of such gear by another licensee in the event the grant recipient elects not to fish and the installation remains eligible under an approved experimental fishery. A report of goods and services purchased with grant funds must be provided to the office by June 30, 2025.

(11) $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to local parks to address any maintenance backlog of existing facilities, trails, and capital improvements. The funds should be dispersed on a needs-based set of criteria and on a one-time basis. Grants are limited to $100,000 per organization. Allowable uses of grant funding include, but are not limited to, maintenance, repair, or replacement of trails, restroom facilities, picnic sites, playgrounds, signage, and kiosks, as well as necessary Americans with disabilities act upgrades delayed due to the pandemic. Local parks agencies may partner with nonprofit organizations in deploying this maintenance and Americans with disabilities act funding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306. FOR THE ENVIRONMENTAL AND LAND USE HEARINGS OFFICE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$3,470,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$3,740,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$7,210,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $409,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $552,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the agency to hire staff to respond to increased caseloads, including appeals as a result of the climate commitment act, chapter 316, Laws of 2021.

(2) $41,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5235 (accessory dwelling units). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(3) $41,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5466 (transit-oriented development). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 307. FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$23,514,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$23,463,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,482,000

Climate Investment Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$5,250,000

Natural Climate Solutions Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$90,000,000

Public Works Assistance Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$9,979,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,110,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$155,798,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $250,000 of the climate investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the agency to complete the required community engagement plan as outlined in RCW 70A.65.030, the climate commitment act.

(2) $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to increase technical assistance and operational capacity of conservation districts.

(3) $3,000,000 of the climate investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to support the outreach, identification, and implementation of salmon riparian habitat restoration projects.

(4) $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to the commission to work with conservation districts to address unhealthy forests and build greater community resiliency to wildfire.

(5) $550,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $700,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to connect scientists, practitioners, and researchers and coordinate efforts to monitor and quantify benefits of best management practices on agricultural lands, and better understand values and motivations of landowners to implement voluntary incentive programs.

(6) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to support the continued development of the disaster assistance program established in RCW 89.08.645, to provide short-term financial support for farmers and ranchers during disasters.

(7) $1,420,000 of the public works assistance account—state appropriation is provided solely to support monitoring and reporting efforts necessary to evaluate the implementation and effectiveness of voluntary stewardship program work plans.

(8) $2,000,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely to develop and implement an educational communication plan to the general public and landowners in urban, suburban, rural, agricultural, and forested areas regarding the importance of riparian buffers and the actions they can take to protect and enhance these critical areas.

(9) $8,484,000 of the public works assistance account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of the voluntary stewardship program. This amount may not be used to fund agency indirect and administrative expenses.

(10) $26,000 of the public works assistance account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5353 (voluntary stewardship prog.). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(11) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the commission to conduct an evaluation of the current contribution that organic and climate smart agriculture makes toward Washington's climate response goals, what potential there is for increasing this contribution, and how additional investments will help realize this potential, while supporting resiliency. The commission must include the departments of agriculture and ecology and other relevant state agencies, Washington state university, conservation districts, tribal governments, nongovernmental organizations, and other relevant stakeholders who will participate in the evaluation. The commission must submit a report of its findings and recommendation to the appropriate committees of the legislature by May 1, 2024.

(12) $40,000,000 of the natural climate solutions account—state appropriation is provided solely for the commission to provide grants for projects to restore riparian areas, prioritizing areas that will directly benefit salmon habitat and recovery.

(13) $40,000,000 of the natural climate solutions account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants through the sustainable farms and fields program for organic agricultural waste and greenhouse gas emissions reduction through climate-smart livestock management. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) The commission may grant up to 60 percent toward cost share agreements for anaerobic digester development to dairy farm owners. Grants awarded for anaerobic digester development must have at least a 50 percent nonstate match and be awarded through a competitive process that considers:

(i) The amount of greenhouse gas reduction that will be achieved by the proposal; and

(ii) The amount of untreated effluent that will be decreased.

(b) Recipients of grants under (a) of this subsection must provide a report to the commission within one year of receipt of the grant, detailing the success of the project in meeting the stated criteria for the competitive process.

(c) The commission may grant up to 25 percent for technical and financial assistance to increase implementation of climate-smart livestock management, alternative manure management, and other best management practices to reduce greenhouse gas emissions and increase carbon sequestration.

(d) The commission may grant up to 10 percent for research on, or demonstration of, projects with greenhouse gas reduction benefits.

(e) When funding for specific technologies, including anaerobic digesters, the commission must enter into appropriate agreements to support the state's interest in advancing innovation solution to decarbonize while ensuring compliance with Article VIII, section 5 and Article XII, section 9 of the state Constitution.

(f) The commission must submit a report summarizing the grants awarded and the likely annual greenhouse gas emission reductions achieved as a result to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024.

(14) $10,000,000 of the natural climate solutions account—state appropriation is provided solely for the commission to provide grants to local government and private landowners for fire wise projects to reduce forest fuel loading in areas deemed a high hazard for potential wildfire.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 308. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$154,285,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$152,872,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$144,165,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$69,389,000

Natural Climate Solutions Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$15,306,000

ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$696,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$14,098,000

Recreational Fisheries Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,713,000

Salmon Recovery Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$3,000,000

Warm Water Game Fish Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$3,066,000

Eastern Washington Pheasant Enhancement Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$673,000

Limited Fish and Wildlife Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$37,220,000

Special Wildlife Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,922,000

Special Wildlife Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$531,000

Special Wildlife Account—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$3,820,000

Wildlife Rehabilitation Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$661,000

Ballast Water and Biofouling Management Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$10,000

Regional Fisheries Enhancement Salmonid Recovery

Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$5,001,000

Oil Spill Prevention Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,284,000

Aquatic Invasive Species Management Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,134,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$7,094,000

Fish, Wildlife, and Conservation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$83,328,000

Forest Resiliency Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$6,000,000

Oyster Reserve Land Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$524,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$710,792,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,777,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,777,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to grant to the northwest Indian fisheries commission for hatchery operations that are prioritized to increase prey abundance for southern resident orcas, including $200,000 per fiscal year for tagging and marking costs, and the remainder to grant to tribes in the following amounts per fiscal year: $150,000 for the Quinault Indian Nation, $199,000 for the Tulalip Tribes, $268,000 for the Quileute Tribe, $186,000 for the Puyallup Tribe, $122,000 for the Port Gamble S'Klallam Tribe, $25,000 for the Muckleshoot Indian Tribe, $207,000 for the Squaxin Island Tribe, $142,000 for the Skokomish Indian Tribe, and $278,000 for the Lummi Nation.

(2) $330,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $330,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to provide to the Yakama Nation for hatchery operations that are prioritized to increase prey abundance for southern resident orcas.

(3) $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to grant to public utility districts for additional hatchery production that is prioritized to increase prey abundance for southern resident orcas.

(4) $467,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $467,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to pay for emergency fire suppression costs. These amounts may not be used to fund agency indirect and administrative expenses.

(5) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a state match to support the Puget Sound nearshore partnership between the department and the United States army corps of engineers.

(6) $6,082,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $6,082,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to implement eradication and control measures on European green crabs through coordination and grants with partner organizations. The department must provide quarterly progress reports on the success and challenges of the measures to the appropriate committees of the legislature.

(7) $852,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $852,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to provide additional capacity to the attorney general's office to prosecute environmental crimes. The department must provide an annual report by December 1st of each year, to the appropriate committees of the legislature, on the progress made in prosecuting environmental crimes.

(8) $753,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $753,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for expanded management of pinniped populations on the lower Columbia river and its tributaries with the goal of increasing chinook salmon abundance and prey availability for southern resident orcas.

(9) $470,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $470,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to expand efforts to survey the diets of seals and sea lions in the Salish sea and identify nonlethal management actions to deter them from preying on salmon and steelhead.

(10) $518,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $519,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to continue to provide policy and scientific support to the department of ecology regarding surface and groundwater management issues as part of implementing chapter 90.94 RCW streamflow restoration.

(11) $4,096,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely to analyze salmon contaminants of emerging concern (CEC), including substances such as 6PPD-quinone and polychlorinated biphenyls (PCB) in already collected tissue samples. This research will accelerate recovery and protection by identifying the location and sources of CEC exposure.

(12) $194,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $194,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to update and maintain rule making related to chapter 77.57 RCW, fishways, flow, and screening.

(13) $822,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $822,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to monitor recreational steelhead spawning and harvest in freshwater streams and rivers in Puget Sound.

(14) $2,714,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for additional law enforcement officers for marine and freshwater fisheries compliance and a patrol vessel dedicated to coastal operations.

(15) $1,449,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,245,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to monitor recreational shellfish harvests, monitor intertidal and crustacean fisheries, address emerging environmental issues, maintain a new data management infrastructure, and develop a disease and pest management program to protect shellfish fisheries in the Puget Sound.

(16) $360,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $224,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to complete and maintain a statewide prioritization of fish passage barriers in collaboration with regional salmon recovery organizations.

(17) $997,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $997,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to continue the assessment of riparian ecosystems. The assessment must include identifying common statewide definitions of terms for riparian usage, recommendations to improve data sharing, and identifying any gaps in vegetated cover relative to a science-based standard for a fully functioning riparian ecosystem and comparing the status and gaps to water temperature impairments, known fish passage barriers, and status of salmonid stocks.

(18) $900,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the Lummi Nation to make infrastructure updates at the Skookum hatchery.

(19) $285,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $285,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to manage electronic tracked crab fishery gear to avoid whale entanglements during their migration as the agency develops a conservation plan to submit for an endangered species act incidental take permit.

(20) $817,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $772,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to equip officers with body worn cameras to advance public safety.

(21) $3,000,000 of the salmon recovery account—state appropriation is provided solely for pass-through to tribes of the upper Columbia river to support reintroduction of Chinook salmon above Grand Coulee and Chief Joseph dams.

(22) $948,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $948,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to continue operations of the Toutle and Skamania hatcheries.

(23) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to create a statewide data management system with the department of natural resources and the state parks and recreation commission to make informed management decisions that meet conservation goals for public lands. The agencies will also collaborate with tribal governments to ensure cultural resources and cultural practices are considered and incorporated into management plans.

(24) $5,306,000 of the natural climate solutions account—state appropriation is provided solely to increase capacity in four aspects of the department's mission most vulnerable to climate change including species recovery planning, harvest and recreation management, providing technical assistance, permitting, and planning support, and managing agency lands and infrastructure.

(25) $6,000,000 of the forest resiliency account—state appropriation is provided solely to reduce severe wildfire risk and increase forest resiliency through fuels reduction, thinning, fuel break creation, and prescribed burning on agency lands.

(26) $158,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $163,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5371 (orca vessel protection). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(27) $325,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for a contract with a nonprofit organization that operates a zoological garden in King county for the purpose of an outreach campaign on pollinator health issues. The pollinator outreach campaign is intended to further the mission of the department's pollinator conservation efforts and the department of agriculture's pollinator health task force goals.

(28) $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a conflict resolution process mediated by the federal mediation and conciliation service. This funding must be used by the department to facilitate meetings between Skagit tribes, drainage and irrigation districts, and state and federal resource agencies and support the technical work necessary to resolve conflict. Invited parties must include the national marine fisheries service, Washington state department of agriculture, Washington state department of fish and wildlife, Swinomish Indian tribal community, Upper Skagit Indian Tribe, Sauk-Suiattle Indian Tribe, and Skagit drainage and irrigation districts consortium LLC. A report documenting meeting notes, points of resolution, and recommendations must be provided to the legislature no later than June 30, 2025.

(29) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to evaluate the abundance and distribution of white and green sturgeon on the Washington coast and Puget Sound tributaries and to evaluate genetic relatedness with Columbia and Fraser river sturgeon populations. The funding is also provided to increase monitoring of the abundance and distribution of eulachon to use the information as a baseline for sturgeon and eulachon management plans.

(30) $235,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $409,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to the department of fish and wildlife to proactively survey for wildlife disease risks and provide action plans and management for healthy wildlife in Washington.

(31) $403,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $377,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to develop conflict mitigation strategies for wolf recovery and staff resources in northeast Washington for response to wolf-livestock conflicts. The department shall not hire contract range riders in northeast Washington unless there is a gap in coverage from entities funded through the northeast Washington wolf-livestock management grant program as provided in RCW 16.76.020. No contract riders shall be deployed in areas already sufficiently covered by other riders. The department must focus on facilitating coordination with other entities providing conflict deterrence, including range riding, and technical assistance to livestock producers in order to minimize wolf-livestock issues in the Kettle Range and other areas of northeast Washington with existing or emerging chronic conflict. The department is discouraged from the use of firearms from helicopters for removing wolves.

(32) $100,000 of general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department to enter into individual damage prevention contract agreements for the use of hiring range riders for proactive wolf-livestock conflict deterrence outside of the service area of the northeast Washington wolf-livestock management grant program as provided in RCW 16.76.020.

(33) $800,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to initiate a demonstration project to contribute to rebuilding of salmon runs in the Lake Washington basin through suppression of predatory fish species. The project must remove nonnative species and northern pikeminnow using trap, nets, or other means and assess the benefits of reduced predator abundance on juvenile salmon survival. The department must also assess the recreational fishing rules that were implemented in 2020 in the Lake Washington basin. The department must submit an interim report on the demonstration project by December 1, 2024, and a final report by June 30, 2025, to the appropriate committees of the legislature.

(34) Within amounts provided in this section, the department must prioritize derelict and abandoned crab pot removal in north Hood Canal.

(35) $10,000,000 of the natural climate solutions account—state appropriation is provided solely for climate sensitive species conservation and recovery in places such as near shore ocean habitat and mountain ecotones.

(36) $1,175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to continue to restore shrubsteppe habitat and associated wildlife on public lands as well as private lands by landowners who are willing to participate. The restoration effort must be coordinated with other natural resource agencies and interested stakeholders.

(37) $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to continue to address the maintenance backlog associated with providing recreation on lands managed by the department. Allowable uses include, but are not limited to, maintenance, repair, or replacement of trails, toilet facilities, roads, parking lots, campgrounds, picnic sites, water access areas, signs, kiosks, and gates. The department is encouraged to partner with nonprofit organizations in the maintenance of public lands.

(38) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to increase the work of regional fisheries enhancement groups.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 309. FOR THE PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIP

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$8,284,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$8,284,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$31,994,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,497,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,343,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$52,402,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) By October 15, 2024, the Puget Sound partnership shall provide the governor and appropriate legislative fiscal committees a single, prioritized list of state agency 2025-2027 capital and operating budget requests related to Puget Sound recovery and restoration.

(2) $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the partnership to implement shipping noise reduction initiatives and monitoring programs in the Puget Sound, in coordination with Canadian and United States authorities. The partnership must contract with Washington maritime blue in order to establish and administer the quiet sound program to better understand and reduce the cumulative effects of acoustic and physical disturbance from large commercial vessels on southern resident orcas throughout their range in Washington state. Washington maritime blue will support a quiet sound leadership committee and work groups that include relevant federal and state agencies, ports, industry, research institutions, and nongovernmental organizations and consult early and often with relevant federally recognized tribes.

(3) $1,000,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for tire removal projects in Puget Sound, with specific priority to remove tire reefs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 310. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$151,745,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$153,935,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$49,946,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$3,500,000

Access Road Revolving Nonappropriated Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$108,000

Climate Commitment Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$15,229,000

Contract Harvesting Revolving Nonappropriated

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$78,000

Forest Development Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$58,158,000

Forest Fire Protection Assessment Nonappropriated

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$88,000

Forest Health Revolving Nonappropriated Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$106,000

Natural Climate Solutions Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$95,913,000

Natural Resources Federal Lands Revolving

Nonappropriated Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$6,000

ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$7,862,000

State Forest Nursery Revolving Nonappropriated

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$34,000

Surveys and Maps Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,356,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$19,873,000

Resource Management Cost Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$119,262,000

Surface Mining Reclamation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,546,000

Disaster Response Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$23,554,000

Forest and Fish Support Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$12,645,000

Aquatic Land Dredged Material Disposal Site Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$405,000

Natural Resources Conservation Areas Stewardship

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$211,000

Forest Practices Application Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,171,000

Air Pollution Control Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$918,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$936,000

Wildfire Response, Forest Restoration, and Community

Resilience Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$117,605,000

NOVA Program Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$26,000

Derelict Vessel Removal Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$10,637,000

Community Forest Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$52,000

Agricultural College Trust Management Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,386,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$856,291,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $2,691,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,296,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to carry out the forest practices adaptive management program pursuant to RCW 76.09.370 and the May 24, 2012, settlement agreement entered into by the department and the department of ecology. Scientific research must be carried out according to the master project schedule and work plan of cooperative monitoring, evaluation, and research priorities adopted by the forest practices board.

(2) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the small forest landowner office, in order to restore staffing capacity reduced during the great recession and to support small forest landowners, including assistance related to forest and fish act regulations.

(3) $1,583,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,515,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for deposit into the agricultural college trust management account and are provided solely to manage approximately 70,700 acres of Washington State University's agricultural college trust lands.

(4) $60,883,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $60,883,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $16,050,000 of the disaster response account—state appropriation are provided solely for emergency response, including fire suppression. The department shall provide a monthly report to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature with an update of fire suppression costs incurred and the number and type of wildfires suppressed.

(5) $5,647,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $8,470,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $330,000 of the disaster response account—state appropriation are provided solely for indirect and administrative expenses related to fire suppression.

(6) $5,500,000 of the forest and fish support account—state appropriation is provided solely for outcome-based performance contracts with tribes to participate in the implementation of the forest practices program. Contracts awarded may only contain indirect costs set at or below the rate in the contracting tribe's indirect cost agreement with the federal government. Of the amount provided in this subsection, $500,000 is contingent upon receipts under RCW 82.04.261 exceeding $8,000,000 per biennium. If receipts under RCW 82.04.261 are more than $8,000,000 but less than $8,500,000 for the biennium, an amount equivalent to the difference between actual receipts and $8,500,000 shall lapse.

(7) Consistent with the recommendations of the Wildfire Suppression Funding and Costs (18-02) report of the joint legislative audit and review committee, the department shall submit a report to the governor and legislature by December 1, 2024, and December 1, 2025, describing the previous fire season. At a minimum, the report shall provide information for each wildfire in the state, including its location, impact by type of land ownership, the extent it involved timber or range lands, cause, size, costs, and cost-share with federal agencies and nonstate partners. The report must also be posted on the agency's website.

(8) $4,206,000 of the aquatic land enhancement account—state appropriation is provided solely for the removal of creosote pilings and debris from the marine environment and to continue monitoring zooplankton and eelgrass beds on state-owned aquatic lands managed by the department. Actions will address recommendations to recover the southern resident orca population and to monitor ocean acidification as well as help implement the Puget Sound action agenda.

(9) $94,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $101,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for compensation to the trust beneficiaries and department for lost revenue from leases to amateur radio operators who use space on the department managed radio towers for their equipment. The department is authorized to lease sites at the rate of up to one hundred dollars per year, per site, per lessee. The legislature makes this appropriation to fulfill the remaining costs of the leases at market rate per RCW 79.13.510.

(10) $145,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department to replace the NaturE revenue and leasing administration system and integrate with the new One Washington financial system. Funding is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(11) $505,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $368,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to replace the statewide forest practices permit database system. Funding is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(12) $3,878,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,878,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to collect and refresh statewide lidar data.

(13) $4,371,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,409,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for increased law enforcement capacity on agency managed lands, to develop a statewide recreation plan, and to jointly create a statewide data management system with the Washington department of fish and wildlife and the state parks and recreation commission to make informed management decisions that meet conservation goals for public lands. The agencies will also collaborate with tribal governments to ensure cultural resources and cultural practices are considered and incorporated into management plans.

(14) $2,066,000 of the natural climate solutions account—state appropriation is provided solely for the agency to develop a comprehensive strategy to tackle barriers to reforestation, including through expanding seed collection, increasing the capacity of the state's public nursery, and addressing workforce needs.

(15) $2,864,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the agency to implement aspects of their watershed resilience action plan for the Snohomish watershed, including activities to support kelp and eelgrass stewardship, a large woody debris program, aquatic restoration grants, and culvert removal.

(16) $5,991,000 of the natural climate solutions account—state appropriation is provided solely for investment in urban forestry to support reduction of negative environmental conditions such as heat, flooding, and pollution and helping communities become greener, cleaner, healthier, and more resilient.

(17) $2,365,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to make investments in education and training to bolster a statewide natural resources workforce to support the health and resilience of Washington's forests. Of this amount, $800,000 is provided solely to provide wildland fire management training to tribal communities and members.

(18) $3,356,000 of the natural climate solutions account—state appropriation is provided solely to increase the agency's capacity to provide active management of department of natural resources natural areas and to create a statewide map of essential conservation areas and areas of high forest conversion risk to determine and mitigate the impacts of climate change and support long-term conservation goals.

(19) $2,286,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,693,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for full-time and seasonal crews from the Washington conservation corps and other corps programs to conduct work benefiting the management of state managed lands, including natural areas restoration and conservation, trail work, and forest resiliency activities as well as other recreation and habitat projects with agency partners.

(20) $591,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $552,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5433 (derelict aquatic structures). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(21) $321,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $427,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5390 (forestlands/safeharbor). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(22) $70,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $30,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to advance research and cooperation with governmental agencies of Finland and Finnish organizations to implement sustainable forestry practices. The department must report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2024, on the use of the funds and the research conducted and cooperation accomplished, and make recommendations for further opportunities for collaboration.

(23) $139,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $139,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to perform coordination and monitoring related to Puget Sound kelp conservation and recovery.

(24) $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to coordinate with the Olympic natural resources center to study emerging ecosystem threats such as Swiss needlecast disease, fully implement the T3 watershed experiments on state trust lands, continue field trials for long-term ecosystem productivity, and engage stakeholders through learning-based collaboration. The department may expend up to $30,000 in one fiscal year to conduct Swiss needlecast surveys.

(25) $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to continue the work specified in section 3291, chapter 413, Laws of 2019 to assess public school seismic safety for school buildings not yet assessed, focused on highest risk areas of the state as a priority.

(26) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to gain the approval of the board of natural resources for any new lease or existing lease subject to renewal, except for agricultural, grazing, or communication site leases or commercial leases with an annual value of less than $50,000.

(a) The department must make general summary lease information for state public lands available to the public on a per parcel basis. The information must be readily available and easy to access for the public.

(b) The department must not disclose sensitive or confidential information regarding departmental leases. Nothing in this subsection authorizes the disclosure of information that is otherwise confidential.

(27) $10,000,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to prepare commercial thinning timber sales for the purposes of restoring spotted owl and riparian habitat as specified in the 1997 state lands habitat conservation plan, facilitating access to more timber volume than is possible under normal operating funding and increasing carbon sequestration. Thinning operations in designated spotted owl management areas must be conducted in stands that do not yet meet spotted owl habitat conditions. Thinning in riparian areas must comply with department procedures for restoring riparian habitat under the 1997 state lands habitat conservation plan.

(28) $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to continue to address the maintenance backlog associated with providing recreation on lands managed by the department. Allowable uses include, but are not limited to, maintenance, repair, or replacement of trails, toilet facilities, roads, parking lots, campgrounds, picnic sites, water access areas, signs, kiosks, and gates. The department is encouraged to partner with nonprofit organizations in the maintenance of public lands.

(29) $83,000,000 of the natural climate solutions account—state appropriation is provided solely for the purchase of property to be managed for increased carbon sequestration and carbon storage through sustainable harvests and as replacement trust lands for existing encumbered forested state trust lands and for structurally complex, carbon dense, forested state trust lands that may be transferred from trust status. The amount provided in this subsection is also to be used to carry out additional silvicultural activities on state trust lands and to hold a series of forest policy discussions. Of the amount provided in this subsection:

(a) $70,000,000 is provided solely for a forest land purchase in a westside timber county. The forest land must be purchased within a willing county identified in coordination with the Washington association of counties. The land once purchased must be considered as part of the land bank created in RCW 79.19.020. The property must be purchased before the sale or exchange of any existing trust land is considered. Transfers must utilize the trust land transfer process.

(i) Up to 2,000 acres of the new land may be considered as replacement land for any existing structurally complex, carbon dense forest existing on state trust lands. Any state forest land considered for replacement must have agreement from the specific county beneficiary.

(ii) The remainder of the new purchased land may be used as exchange land for any encumbered state forest lands in Clallam, Jefferson, Pacific, Skamania, and Wahkiakum counties. Any exchanged land under this purpose must be designated as state forest transfer land.

(b) $10,000,000 is provided solely for the department to enhance forest stand growth on managed trust lands in western Washington, employing silviculture to increase growth and vigor of the trees, for healthy, resilient forests.

(c) $3,000,000 is provided solely for the department to contract with a facilitator for the purpose of convening a stakeholder group to collaborate on the protection of older timber stands on department of natural resources managed lands, the protection of a viable wood supply for the current timber market, and the definition of terms to be used when developing future forest policy pertaining to the storage of carbon and perpetual forests, while meeting the department's trust management responsibilities. The group should also provide recommendation for defining the management regime of the lands purchased with amounts provided by this subsection intended to increase forest sequestration above what it would otherwise be in the absence of the purchase by the department of natural resources, as well as for using consulting businesses for buying large forest parcels in a competitive marketplace, and may include contracting with researchers and universities for additional analysis. A report of the stakeholder group's recommendations must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024.

(30) $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to implement a pilot project to evaluate the costs and benefits of marketing and selling specialty forest products including cedar salvage, alder, and other hardwood products. The pilot project must include: Identifying suitable areas for hardwood or cedar sales within the administrative areas of the Olympic and Pacific Cascade regions, preparing and conducting sales, and evaluating the costs and benefits from conducting the sales.

(a) The pilot project must include an evaluation that:

(i) Determines if revenues from the sales are sufficient to cover the costs of preparing and conducting the sales;

(ii) Identifies and evaluates factors impacting the sales, including regulatory constraints, staffing levels, or other limitations;

(iii) Compares the specialty sales to other timber sales that combine the sale of cedar and hardwoods with other species;

(iv) Evaluates the bidder pool for the pilot sales and other factors that impact the costs and revenues received from the sales; and

(v) Evaluates the current and future prices and market trends for cedar salvage and hardwood species.

(b) The department must work with affected stakeholders and report to the appropriate committees of the legislature with the results of the pilot project and make recommendations for any changes to statute by June 30, 2025.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 311. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$45,131,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$62,819,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$38,219,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$193,000

Dedicated Cannabis Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2024)
. . . .
$29,000

Dedicated Cannabis Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2025)
. . . .
$32,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,809,000

Climate Commitment Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$3,619,000

Water Quality Permit Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$73,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$12,693,000

Northeast Washington Wolf-Livestock Management

Nonappropriated Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,600,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$25,275,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$192,492,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $12,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $12,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to continue the we feed Washington program, a state alternative to the United States department of agriculture farmers to families food box program, and provide resources for hunger relief organizations.

(2) $2,212,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,212,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for local food system infrastructure and market access grants.

(3) $3,655,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,655,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementing a Japanese beetle monitoring and eradication program in central Washington.

(4) $15,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $15,000,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementing the emergency food assistance program as defined in RCW 43.23.290.

(5) $246,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $246,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,550,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementing a Vespa mandarinia eradication program.

(6) $842,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $822,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 135, Laws of 2022, which requires the department to establish cannabis testing lab quality standards by rule.

(7) $3,038,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely to implement organic materials legislation passed in the 2022 legislative session.

(8) $581,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely to implement a science-based, voluntary software program called saving tomorrow's agricultural resources (STAR) which provide producers tools to track soil health improvements and the ability to generate market-based incentives.

(9) $1,492,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely to increase capacity and support work to reduce nitrate pollution in groundwater from irrigated agriculture in the lower Yakima valley.

(10) $88,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $88,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $702,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to match federal funding for eradication treatments and follow-up monitoring of invasive moths.

(11) $120,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $120,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to continue the early detection program and the associated invasive Ailanthus altissima, known colloquially as tree-of-heaven, survey and control programs.

(12) $179,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $179,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5341 (WA food & ag. products). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(13) $47,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $47,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5263 (psilocybin). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(14) $2,000,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for research, including, but not limited to, ongoing research and trial research; larger scale treatment trials; and permit development, including required monitoring and review, to assist with development of an integrated pest management plan to find a suitable replacement for imidacloprid to address burrowing shrimp in Willapa Bay and Grays Harbor and facilitate continued shellfish cultivation on tidelands. In selecting research recipients for this purpose, the department must incorporate the advice of the Willapa-Grays Harbor working group formed on October 15, 2019. Up to eight percent of the amount provided in this subsection may be used by the department to reimburse any participating group or individual for their expenses associated with meeting participation, preparation, or travel, in accordance with chapter 43.03 RCW.

(15) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for a grant to a community-based organization in Whatcom county for the food and farm finder program, which connects local food producers with retail and wholesale consumers through the state.

(16) $1,600,000 of the northeast Washington wolf-livestock management nonappropriated account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to conduct the following:

(a) Offer grants for the northeast Washington wolf-livestock management program as provided in RCW 16.76.020, in the amount of $1,400,000 for the biennium.

(i) Funds from the grant program must be used only for the deployment of nonlethal deterrence, specifically with the goal to reduce the likelihood of cattle being injured or killed by wolves by deploying proactive, preventative methods that have a high probability of producing effective results. Grant proposals will be assessed partially on this intent. Grantees who use funds for range riders or herd monitoring must deploy this tool in a manner so that targeted areas with cattle are visited daily or near daily. Grantees must collaborate with other grantees of the program and other entities providing prevention efforts resulting in coordinated wolf-livestock conflict deterrence efforts, both temporally and spatially, therefore providing well timed and placed preventative coverage on the landscape. Additionally, range riders must document their activities with GPS track logs and provide written description of their efforts to the department of fish and wildlife on a monthly basis. The department shall incorporate the requirements of this subsection into contract language with the grantees.

(ii) In order to provide continuity of services to meet the long-term intent of the program, no less than $1,100,000 of the funding allocated in this subsection (a) shall be awarded to entities who have proven ability to meet program intent as described in (a)(i) of this subsection and who have been awarded funds through this grant program or pass-through funds from the northeast Washington wolf-livestock management nonappropriated account in the past. The remaining $300,000 may be awarded to new applicants whose applications meet program intent and all of other requirements of the program. If no applications from new entities are deemed qualified, the unused funds shall be awarded in equal amounts to successful grantees. The department retains the final decision making authority over disbursement of funds. Annual reports from grantees will be assessed for how well grant objectives were met and used to decide whether future grant funds will be awarded to past grantees.

(b) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the department must provide $100,000 each fiscal year to the sheriffs offices of Ferry and Stevens counties for providing a local wildlife specialist to aid the department of fish and wildlife in the management of wolves in northeast Washington.

(17) $128,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $127,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to the Tri-Cities food bank for operations including food storage.

(18) $64,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $64,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5367 (products containing THC). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(19) $170,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $170,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to continue a shellfish coordinator position.

(20) $635,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $635,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for compliance-based laboratory analysis of pesticides in cannabis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 312. FOR THE ENERGY FACILITY SITE EVALUATION COUNCIL

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$900,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$894,000

Climate Commitment Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$3,622,000

Energy Facility Site Evaluation Council Account—

Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$26,583,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$31,999,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $2,665,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely to support agency operations and to hire additional environmental siting and compliance positions needed to support an anticipated workload increase from new clean energy projects.

(2) $757,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants to tribes to review green energy project applications.

(3) $200,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5165 (electric transm. planning). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(End of part)

PART IV

TRANSPORTATION

NEW SECTION. Sec. 401. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$3,698,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$3,616,000

Architects' License Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,741,000

Real Estate Commission Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$15,247,000

Uniform Commercial Code Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$3,422,000

Real Estate Education Program Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$308,000

Real Estate Appraiser Commission Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,047,000

Business and Professions Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$30,433,000

Real Estate Research Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$461,000

Firearms Range Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$74,000

Funeral and Cemetery Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$104,000

Landscape Architects' License Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$78,000

Appraisal Management Company Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$243,000

Concealed Pistol License Renewal Notification

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$142,000

Geologists' Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$38,000

Derelict Vessel Removal Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$37,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$61,689,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $142,000 of the concealed pistol license renewal notification account—state appropriation and $74,000 of the firearms range account—state appropriation are provided solely to implement chapter 74, Laws of 2017 (concealed pistol license).

(2) $6,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $9,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, $8,000 of the architects' license account—state appropriation, $74,000 of the real estate commission account—state appropriation, $14,000 of the uniform commercial code account—state appropriation, $10,000 of the real estate appraiser commission account—state appropriation, and $139,000 of the business and professions account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department to redesign and improve its online services and website, and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(3) $21,000 of the real estate appraiser commission account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5191 (real estate agency). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4) $19,000 of the funeral and cemetery account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5261 (cemetery authority deadlines). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$76,299,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$77,219,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$16,972,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$3,091,000

Dedicated Cannabis Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2024)
. . . .
$131,000

Dedicated Cannabis Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2025)
. . . .
$173,000

Death Investigations Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$9,145,000

County Criminal Justice Assistance Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,893,000

Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,800,000

Fire Service Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$131,000

Vehicle License Fraud Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$119,000

Disaster Response Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$8,000,000

Fire Service Training Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$12,952,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$596,000

Fingerprint Identification Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$15,128,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$226,649,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $8,000,000 of the disaster response account—state appropriation is provided solely for Washington state fire service resource mobilization costs incurred in response to an emergency or disaster authorized under RCW 43.43.960 through 43.43.964. The state patrol shall submit a report quarterly to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing information on current and planned expenditures from this account. This work shall be done in coordination with the military department.

(2) $2,423,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,423,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Washington state patrol to partner with multi-jurisdictional drug and gang task forces to detect, deter, and dismantle criminal organizations involved in criminal activity including diversion of cannabis from the legalized market and the illicit production and distribution of cannabis and cannabis-related products in Washington state.

(3) $320,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $68,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5367 (products containing THC). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4) $1,133,000 of the fingerprint identification account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5499 (multistate nurse licensure). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(5) $46,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $28,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5477 (murdered indigenous women) or section 913 of this act. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, $32,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $14,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 shall lapse.

(6) $33,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5536 (controlled substances). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(7) $700,000 of the fire service training account—state appropriation is provided solely for the firefighter apprenticeship training program.

(End of part)

PART V

EDUCATION

NEW SECTION. Sec. 501. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$41,614,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$40,774,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$108,342,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$8,079,000

Dedicated Cannabis Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2024)
. . . .
$600,000

Dedicated Cannabis Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2025)
. . . .
$618,000

Washington Opportunity Pathways Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$285,000

Performance Audits of Government Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$213,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$7,479,000

Elementary and Secondary School Emergency Relief III

Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$3,524,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$211,528,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) BASE OPERATIONS AND EXPENSES OF THE OFFICE

(a) $19,661,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $19,601,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(i) The superintendent shall recognize the extraordinary accomplishments of four students who have demonstrated a strong understanding of the civics essential learning requirements to receive the Daniel J. Evans civic education award.

(ii) By October 31st of each year, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall produce an annual status report on implementation of the budget provisos in section 501, chapter 415, Laws of 2019 and sections 515 and 522, chapter 334, Laws of 2021. The status report of each proviso shall include, but not be limited to, the following information: Purpose and objective, number of state staff funded by the proviso, number of contractors, status of proviso implementation, number of beneficiaries by year, list of beneficiaries, a comparison of budgeted funding and actual expenditures, other sources and amounts of funding, and proviso outcomes and achievements.

(iii) Districts shall annually report to the office of the superintendent of public instruction on: (A) The annual number of graduating high school seniors within the district earning the Washington state seal of biliteracy provided in RCW 28A.300.575; and (B) the number of high school students earning competency-based high school credits for world languages by demonstrating proficiency in a language other than English. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide a summary report to the office of the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1st of each year.

(iv) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall perform ongoing program reviews of alternative learning experience programs, dropout reengagement programs, and other high risk programs. Findings from the program reviews will be used to support and prioritize the office of the superintendent of public instruction outreach and education efforts that assist school districts in implementing the programs in accordance with statute and legislative intent, as well as to support financial and performance audit work conducted by the office of the state auditor.

(v) The superintendent of public instruction shall integrate climate change content into the Washington state learning standards across subject areas and grade levels. The office shall develop materials and resources that accompany the updated learning standards that encourage school districts to develop interdisciplinary units focused on climate change that include authentic learning experiences, that integrate a range of perspectives, and that are action oriented.

(vi) Funding provided in this subsection (1)(a) is sufficient for maintenance of the apportionment system, including technical staff and the data governance working group.

(b) $494,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $494,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 240, Laws of 2010, including staffing the office of equity and civil rights.

(c) $61,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $61,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the ongoing work of the education opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee.

(d) $96,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $96,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 380, Laws of 2009 (enacting the interstate compact on educational opportunity for military children).

(e) $273,000 of the Washington opportunity pathways account—state appropriation is provided solely for activities related to public schools other than common schools authorized under chapter 28A.710 RCW.

(f) $123,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $123,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 163, Laws of 2012 (foster care outcomes). The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall annually report each December on the implementation of the state's plan of cross-system collaboration to promote educational stability and improve education outcomes of foster youth.

(g) $385,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $385,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of native education to increase services to tribes, including but not limited to, providing assistance to tribes and school districts to implement Since Time Immemorial, applying to become tribal compact schools, convening the Washington state native American education advisory committee, and extending professional learning opportunities to provide instruction in tribal history, culture, and government. The professional development must be done in collaboration with school district administrators and school directors. Funding in this subsection is sufficient for the office, the Washington state school directors' association government-to-government task force, and the association of educational service districts to collaborate with the tribal leaders congress on education to develop a tribal consultation training and schedule.

(h) $481,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $481,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for additional full-time equivalent staff to support the work of the safety net committee and to provide training and support to districts applying for safety net awards.

(i) Districts shall report to the office the results of each collective bargaining agreement for certificated staff within their district using a uniform template as required by the superintendent, within thirty days of finalizing contracts. The data must include but is not limited to: Minimum and maximum base salaries, supplemental salary information, and average percent increase for all certificated instructional staff. Within existing resources by December 1st of each year, the office shall produce a report for the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee summarizing the district level collective bargaining agreement data.

(j) $3,524,000 of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account—federal appropriation from funds attributable to subsection 2001(f)(4), the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2 is provided solely for administrative costs related to the management of federal funds provided for COVID-19 response and other emergency needs.

(k) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to plan for the development and implementation of a common substitute teacher application platform.

(2) DATA SYSTEMS

(a) $1,802,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,802,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementing a comprehensive data system to include financial, student, and educator data, including development and maintenance of the comprehensive education data and research system (CEDARS).

(b) $281,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $281,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for K-20 telecommunications network technical support in the K-12 sector to prevent system failures and avoid interruptions in school utilization of the data processing and video-conferencing capabilities of the network. These funds may be used to purchase engineering and advanced technical support for the network.

(c) $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the superintendent of public instruction to develop and implement a statewide accountability system to address absenteeism and to improve student graduation rates. The system must use data to engage schools and districts in identifying successful strategies and systems that are based on federal and state accountability measures. Funding may also support the effort to provide assistance about successful strategies and systems to districts and schools that are underperforming in the targeted student subgroups.

(3) WORK GROUPS

(a) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to meet statutory obligations related to the provision of medically and scientifically accurate, age-appropriate, and inclusive sexual health education as authorized by chapter 206, Laws of 1988 (AIDS omnibus act) and chapter 265, Laws of 2007 (healthy youth act).

(b) $118,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $118,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 75, Laws of 2018 (dyslexia).

(c) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 386, Laws of 2019 (social emotional learning).

(d) $107,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $107,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office to support the children and youth behavioral health work group created in chapter 130, Laws of 2020 (child. mental health wk. grp).

(4) STATEWIDE PROGRAMS

(a) $2,590,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,590,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills. State funding shall support statewide administration and district implementation of the inventory under RCW 28A.655.080.

(b) $703,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $703,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 72, Laws of 2016 (educational opportunity gap).

(c) $950,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $950,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Washington reading corps. The superintendent shall allocate reading corps members to schools identified for comprehensive or targeted support and school districts that are implementing comprehensive, proven, research-based reading programs. Two or more schools may combine their Washington reading corps programs.

(d) $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for chapter 102, Laws of 2014 (biliteracy seal).

(e)(i) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for school bullying and harassment prevention activities.

(ii) $15,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $15,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 240, Laws of 2016 (school safety).

(iii) $570,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $570,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to provide statewide support and coordination for the regional network of behavioral health, school safety, and threat assessment established in chapter 333, Laws of 2019 (school safety and well-being).

(iv) $196,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $196,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the school safety center within the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(A) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (4)(e)(iv), $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a school safety program to provide school safety training for all school administrators and school safety personnel. The school safety center advisory committee shall develop and revise the training program, using the best practices in school safety.

(B) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (4)(e)(iv), $96,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $96,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for administration of the school safety center. The safety center shall act as an information dissemination and resource center when an incident occurs in a school district in Washington or in another state, coordinate activities relating to school safety, review and approve manuals and curricula used for school safety models and training, and maintain a school safety information web site.

(f)(i) $162,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $162,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for youth suicide prevention activities.

(ii) $76,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $76,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 64, Laws of 2018 (sexual abuse of students).

(g)(i) $280,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $280,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,070,000 of the dedicated cannabis account—state appropriation are provided solely for dropout prevention, intervention, and reengagement programs, including the jobs for America's graduates (JAG) program, dropout prevention programs that provide student mentoring, and the building bridges statewide program. Students in the foster care system or who are homeless shall be given priority by districts offering the jobs for America's graduates program. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall convene staff representatives from high schools to meet and share best practices for dropout prevention. Of these amounts, $542,000 of the dedicated cannabis account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, and $562,000 of the dedicated cannabis account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the building bridges statewide program.

(ii) $293,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $293,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to support district implementation of comprehensive guidance and planning programs in support of high-quality high school and beyond plans consistent with RCW 28A.230.090.

(iii) $178,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $178,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 291, Laws of 2017 (truancy reduction efforts).

(h) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to create a process and provide assistance to school districts in planning for future implementation of the summer knowledge improvement program grants.

(i) $358,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $358,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 221, Laws of 2019 (CTE course equivalencies).

(j) $196,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $196,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 252, Laws of 2019 (high school graduation reqs.).

(k) $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $680,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 295, Laws of 2019 (educator workforce supply). Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $680,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for title II SEA state-level activities to implement section 103, chapter 295, Laws of 2019 relating to the regional recruiters program.

(l) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a tribal liaison at the office of the superintendent of public instruction to facilitate access to and support enrollment in career connected learning opportunities for tribal students, including career awareness and exploration, career preparation, and career launch programs, as defined in RCW 28C.30.020, so that tribal students may receive high school or college credit to the maximum extent possible.

(m) $57,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $57,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 288, Laws of 2020 (school meals at no cost).

(n) $269,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $142,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 353, Laws of 2020 (innovative learning pilot).

(o) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to provide statewide coordination towards multicultural, culturally responsive, and anti-racist education to support academically, socially, and culturally literate learners. The office must engage community members and key interested parties to:

(i) Develop a clear definition and framework for African American studies to guide instruction in grades seven through twelve;

(ii) Develop a plan for aligning African American studies across all content areas; and

(iii) Identify professional development opportunities for educators and administrators to build capacity in creating high-quality learning environments centered in belonging and racial equity, anti-racist approaches, and asset-based methodologies that pull from all students' cultural funds of knowledge.

(p) $49,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $49,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 38, Laws of 2021 (K-12 safety & security serv.).

(q) $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 111, Laws of 2021 (learning assistance program).

(r) $1,226,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,226,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 164, Laws of 2021 (institutional ed./release).

(s) $553,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $553,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to develop and implement a mathematics pathways pilot to modernize algebra II. The office should use research and engage stakeholders to develop a revised and expanded course.

(t) $3,348,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,348,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 107, Laws of 2022 (language access in schools).

(u) $294,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $294,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 provided solely for implementation of chapter 9, Laws of 2022 (school consultation/tribes).

(v) $18,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5019 (school safety staff). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(w) $1,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5031 (special education safety net awards). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(x) $76,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $15,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5072 (highly capable students). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(y) $167,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $152,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5102 (school library information and technology). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(z) $134,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $91,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5180 (teacher mobility compact). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(aa) $553,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $198,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5243 (high school and beyond plan). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(bb) $17,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5257 (elementary school recess). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(cc) $169,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $76,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5315 (special education/nonpublic). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(dd) $39,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5403 (school depreciation subfunds). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(ee) $51,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $41,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5462 (inclusive learning standards). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(ff) $463,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $306,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5593 (student data transfer). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(gg) $51,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $36,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5617 (career and technical education courses). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(hh) $513,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $502,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5626 (K-12 media literacy). Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to support school districts in development of curriculum through district-created leadership teams or for school districts or educational service districts to support the integration of media literacy and digital citizenship into subject areas.

(ii) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to contract with a community-based youth development nonprofit organization for a pilot program to provide behavioral health support for youth and trauma-informed, culturally responsive staff training.

(5) CAREER CONNECTED LEARNING

(a) $852,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for expanding career connected learning as provided in RCW 28C.30.020.

(b) $960,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for increasing the funding per full-time equivalent for career launch programs as described in RCW 28A.700.130. In the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, for career launch enrollment exceeding the funding provided in this subsection, funding is provided in section 504 of this act.

(c) $3,600,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to administer grants to skill centers for nursing programs to purchase or upgrade simulation laboratory equipment.

(d) $2,000,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Marysville school district to collaborate with Arlington school district, Everett Community College, other local school districts, local labor unions, local Washington state apprenticeship and training council registered apprenticeship programs, and local industry groups to continue the regional apprenticeship pathways program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502. FOR THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$2,155,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$6,695,000

Elementary and Secondary School Emergency Relief III

Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,779,000

Washington Opportunity Pathways Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$353,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$10,982,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,748,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,770,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are for the operation and expenses of the state board of education.

(2) $1,779,000 of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account—federal appropriation, $280,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, and $4,808,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to the state board of education for implementation of mastery-based learning in school district demonstration sites. The state board of education shall require grant recipients to report on impacts and participate in a collaborative to share best practices. The funds must be used for grants to school districts, charter schools, or state tribal education compact schools established under chapter 28A.715 RCW; professional development of educators; development of a resource suite for school districts statewide; evaluation of the demonstration project; implementation and policy support provided by the state board of education and other partners; and a report outlining findings and recommendations to the governor and education committees of the legislature by December 31, 2025. Grants for mastery-based learning may be made in partnership with private matching funds.

(3) Within funding provided within subsection (1) of this section, $23,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $23,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the state board of education to be a member in the education commission of the states.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503. FOR THE PROFESSIONAL EDUCATOR STANDARDS BOARD

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$21,220,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$21,231,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$42,451,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,831,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,831,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are for the operation and expenses of the Washington professional educator standards board including implementation of chapter 172, Laws of 2017 (educator prep. data/PESB).

(2)(a) $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to improve preservice teacher training and funding of alternate routes to certification programs administered by the professional educator standards board.

(b) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (2), up to $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and up to $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to public or private colleges of education in Washington state to develop models and share best practices for increasing the classroom teaching experience of preservice training programs.

(3) $1,005,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,001,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the recruiting Washington teachers program with priority given to programs that support bilingual teachers, teachers from populations that are underrepresented, and English language learners. Of the amounts provided in this subsection (3), $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation and expansion of the bilingual educator initiative pilot project established under RCW 28A.180.120.

(4) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 295, Laws of 2019 (educator workforce supply).

(5) $17,535,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $17,535,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 237, Laws of 2017 (paraeducators). Of the amounts provided in this subsection: $16,873,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $16,873,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to districts to provide two days of training per school year in the paraeducator certificate program to all paraeducators. Funds in this subsection are provided solely for reimbursement to school districts that provide paraeducators with two days of training in the paraeducator certificate program in each of the 2022-23 and 2023-24 school years. Funding provided in this subsection is sufficient for new paraeducators to receive four days of training in the paraeducator certificate program during their first year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 504. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR GENERAL APPORTIONMENT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$9,783,761,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$10,145,967,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$41,848,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,453,730,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$21,425,306,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(b) For the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years, the superintendent shall allocate general apportionment funding to school districts as provided in the funding formulas and salary allocations in sections 504 and 505 of this act, excluding (c) of this subsection.

(c) From July 1, 2023, to August 31, 2023, the superintendent shall allocate general apportionment funding to school districts programs as provided in sections 504 and 505, chapter 297, Laws of 2022, as amended.

(d) The enrollment of any district shall be the annual average number of full-time equivalent students and part-time students as provided in RCW 28A.150.350, enrolled on the fourth day of school in September and on the first school day of each month October through June, including students who are in attendance pursuant to RCW 28A.335.160 and 28A.225.250 who do not reside within the servicing school district. Any school district concluding its basic education program in May must report the enrollment of the last school day held in May in lieu of a June enrollment.

(e)(i) Funding provided in part V of this act is sufficient to provide each full-time equivalent student with the minimum hours of instruction required under RCW 28A.150.220.

(ii) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall align the agency rules defining a full-time equivalent student with the increase in the minimum instructional hours under RCW 28A.150.220, as amended by the legislature in 2014.

(f) The superintendent shall adopt rules requiring school districts to report full-time equivalent student enrollment as provided in RCW 28A.655.210.

(g) For the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years, school districts must report to the office of the superintendent of public instruction the monthly actual average district-wide class size across each grade level of kindergarten, first grade, second grade, and third grade classes. The superintendent of public instruction shall report this information to the education and fiscal committees of the house of representatives and the senate by September 30th of each year.

(2) CERTIFICATED INSTRUCTIONAL STAFF ALLOCATIONS

Allocations for certificated instructional staff salaries for the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years are determined using formula-generated staff units calculated pursuant to this subsection.

(a) Certificated instructional staff units, as defined in RCW 28A.150.410, shall be allocated to reflect the minimum class size allocations, requirements, and school prototypes assumptions as provided in RCW 28A.150.260. The superintendent shall make allocations to school districts based on the district's annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment in each grade.

(b) Additional certificated instructional staff units provided in this subsection (2) that exceed the minimum requirements in RCW 28A.150.260 are enhancements outside the program of basic education, except as otherwise provided in this section.

(c)(i) The superintendent shall base allocations for each level of prototypical school, including those at which more than fifty percent of the students were eligible for free and reduced-price meals in the prior school year, on the following regular education average class size of full-time equivalent students per teacher, except as provided in (c)(ii) of this subsection:

General education class size:

Grade

RCW 28A.150.260

2023-24

School Year

2024-25

School Year

Grade K

17.00

17.00

Grade 1

17.00

17.00

Grade 2

17.00

17.00

Grade 3

17.00

17.00

Grade 4

27.00

27.00

Grades 5-6

27.00

27.00

Grades 7-8

28.53

28.53

Grades 9-12

28.74

28.74

The superintendent shall base allocations for: Laboratory science average class size as provided in RCW 28A.150.260; career and technical education (CTE) class size of 23.0; and skill center program class size of 19. Certificated instructional staff units provided for skills centers that exceed the minimum requirements of RCW 28A.150.260 achieve class size reductions under RCW 28A.400.007 and are part of the state's program of basic education.

(ii) Pursuant to RCW 28A.150.260(4)(a), the assumed teacher planning period, expressed as a percentage of a teacher work day, is 13.42 percent in grades K-6, and 16.67 percent in grades 7-12; and

(iii) Advanced placement and international baccalaureate courses are funded at the same class size assumptions as general education schools in the same grade; and

(d)(i) Funding for teacher librarians, school nurses, social workers, school psychologists, and guidance counselors is allocated based on the school prototypes as provided in RCW 28A.150.260, as amended by chapter 109, Laws of 2022, and is considered certificated instructional staff.

(ii) For qualifying high-poverty schools in the 2023-24 school year, at which more than 50 percent of the students were eligible for free and reduced-price meals in the prior school year, in addition to the allocation under (d)(i) of this subsection, the superintendent shall allocate additional funding for guidance counselors for each level of prototypical school as follows:

Elementary

Middle

High

Guidance counselors

0.166

0.166

0.157

(iii) Students in approved career and technical education and skill center programs generate certificated instructional staff units to provide for the services of teacher librarians, school nurses, social workers, school psychologists, and guidance counselors at the following combined rate per 1000 student full-time equivalent enrollment:

2023-24

School Year

2024-25

School Year

Career and Technical Education

3.65

3.91

Skill Center

3.98

4.25

(3) ADMINISTRATIVE STAFF ALLOCATIONS

(a) Allocations for school building-level certificated administrative staff salaries for the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years for general education students are determined using the formula generated staff units calculated pursuant to this subsection. The superintendent shall make allocations to school districts based on the district's annual average full-time equivalent enrollment in each grade. The following prototypical school values shall determine the allocation for principals, assistant principals, and other certificated building level administrators:

Prototypical School Building:

Elementary School

1.253

Middle School

1.353

High School

1.880

(b) Students in approved career and technical education and skill center programs generate certificated school building-level administrator staff units at per student rates that are a multiple of the general education rate in (a) of this subsection by the following factors:

Career and Technical Education students. . . .1.025

Skill Center students. . . .1.198

(4) CLASSIFIED STAFF ALLOCATIONS

Allocations for classified staff units providing school building-level and district-wide support services for the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years are determined using the formula-generated staff units provided in RCW 28A.150.260 and pursuant to this subsection, and adjusted based on each district's annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment in each grade.

(5) CENTRAL OFFICE ALLOCATIONS

In addition to classified and administrative staff units allocated in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, classified and administrative staff units are provided for the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years for the central office administrative costs of operating a school district, at the following rates:

(a) The total central office staff units provided in this subsection (5) are calculated by first multiplying the total number of eligible certificated instructional, certificated administrative, and classified staff units providing school-based or district-wide support services, as identified in RCW 28A.150.260(6)(b) and the increased allocations provided pursuant to subsections (2) and (4) of this section, by 5.3 percent.

(b) Of the central office staff units calculated in (a) of this subsection, 74.53 percent are allocated as classified staff units, as generated in subsection (4) of this section, and 25.48 percent shall be allocated as administrative staff units, as generated in subsection (3) of this section.

(c) Staff units generated as enhancements outside the program of basic education to the minimum requirements of RCW 28A.150.260, and staff units generated by skill center and career-technical students, are excluded from the total central office staff units calculation in (a) of this subsection.

(d) For students in approved career-technical and skill center programs, central office classified units are allocated at the same staff unit per student rate as those generated for general education students of the same grade in this subsection (5), and central office administrative staff units are allocated at staff unit per student rates that exceed the general education rate established for students in the same grade in this subsection (5) by 12.29 percent in the 2023-24 school year and 12.45 percent in the 2024-25 school year for career and technical education students, and 17.62 percent in the 2023-24 school year and 17.79 percent in the 2024-25 school year for skill center students.

(6) FRINGE BENEFIT ALLOCATIONS

Fringe benefit allocations shall be calculated at a rate of 23.21 percent in the 2023-24 school year and 17.96 percent in the 2024-25 school year for certificated salary allocations provided under subsections (2), (3), and (5) of this section, and a rate of 23.06 percent in the 2023-24 school year and 21.56 percent in the 2024-25 school year for classified salary allocations provided under subsections (4) and (5) of this section.

(7) INSURANCE BENEFIT ALLOCATIONS

Insurance benefit allocations shall be calculated at the rates specified in section 506 of this act, based on the number of benefit units determined as follows: Except for nonrepresented employees of educational service districts, the number of calculated benefit units determined below. Calculated benefit units are staff units multiplied by the benefit allocation factors established in the collective bargaining agreement referenced in section 909 of this act. These factors are intended to adjust allocations so that, for the purpose of distributing insurance benefits, full-time equivalent employees may be calculated on the basis of 630 hours of work per year, with no individual employee counted as more than one full-time equivalent. The number of benefit units is determined as follows:

(a) The number of certificated staff units determined in subsections (2), (3), and (5) of this section multiplied by 1.02; and

(b) The number of classified staff units determined in subsections (4) and (5) of this section multiplied by 1.43.

(8) MATERIALS, SUPPLIES, AND OPERATING COSTS (MSOC) ALLOCATIONS

Funding is allocated per annual average full-time equivalent student for the materials, supplies, and operating costs (MSOC) incurred by school districts, consistent with the requirements of RCW 28A.150.260.

(a)(i) MSOC funding for general education students are allocated at the following per student rates:

MSOC RATES/STUDENT FTE

MSOC Component

2023-24

School Year

2024-25

School Year

Technology

$178.98

$182.72

Utilities and Insurance

$416.26

$425.01

Curriculum and Textbooks

$164.48

$167.94

Other Supplies

$326.54

$333.40

Library Materials

$22.65

$23.13

Instructional Professional Development for Certificated

and Classified Staff

$25.44

$25.97

Facilities Maintenance

$206.22

$210.55

Security and Central Office

$142.87

$145.87

TOTAL MSOC/STUDENT FTE

$1,483.44

$1,514.59

(ii) For the 2023-24 school year and 2024-25 school year, as part of the budget development, hearing, and review process required by chapter 28A.505 RCW, each school district must disclose: (A) The amount of state funding to be received by the district under (a) and (d) of this subsection (8); (B) the amount the district proposes to spend for materials, supplies, and operating costs; (C) the difference between these two amounts; and (D) if (A) of this subsection (8)(a)(ii) exceeds (B) of this subsection (8)(a)(ii), any proposed use of this difference and how this use will improve student achievement.

(iii) Within the amount provided in (a)(i) of this subsection (8), allocations for MSOC technology in excess of RCW 28A.150.260 are not part of the state's basic education.

(b) Students in approved skill center programs generate per student FTE MSOC allocations of $1,724.62 for the 2023-24 school year and $1,760.84 for the 2024-25 school year.

(c) Students in approved exploratory and preparatory career and technical education programs generate per student FTE MSOC allocations of $1,724.62 for the 2023-24 school year and $1,760.84 for the 2024-25 school year.

(d) Students in grades 9-12 generate per student FTE MSOC allocations in addition to the allocations provided in (a) through (c) of this subsection at the following rate:

MSOC Component

2023-24

School Year

2024-25

School Year

Technology

$44.04

$44.97

Curriculum and Textbooks

$48.06

$49.06

Other Supplies

$94.03

$95.89

Library Materials

$6.09

$6.33

Instructional Professional Development for Certified

and Classified Staff

$8.01

$8.18

TOTAL GRADE 9-12 BASIC EDUCATION MSOC/STUDENT FTE

$200.23

$204.43

(9) SUBSTITUTE TEACHER ALLOCATIONS

For the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years, funding for substitute costs for classroom teachers is based on four (4) funded substitute days per classroom teacher unit generated under subsection (2) of this section, at a daily substitute rate of $151.86.

(10) ALTERNATIVE LEARNING EXPERIENCE PROGRAM FUNDING

(a) Amounts provided in this section from July 1, 2023, to August 31, 2023, are adjusted to reflect provisions of chapter 297, Laws of 2022, as amended (allocation of funding for students enrolled in alternative learning experiences).

(b) The superintendent of public instruction shall require all districts receiving general apportionment funding for alternative learning experience (ALE) programs as defined in WAC 392-121-182 to provide separate financial accounting of expenditures for the ALE programs offered in district or with a provider, including but not limited to private companies and multidistrict cooperatives, as well as accurate, monthly headcount and FTE enrollment claimed for basic education, including separate counts of resident and nonresident students.

(11) DROPOUT REENGAGEMENT PROGRAM

The superintendent shall adopt rules to require students claimed for general apportionment funding based on enrollment in dropout reengagement programs authorized under RCW 28A.175.100 through 28A.175.115 to meet requirements for at least weekly minimum instructional contact, academic counseling, career counseling, or case management contact. Districts must also provide separate financial accounting of expenditures for the programs offered by the district or under contract with a provider, as well as accurate monthly headcount and full-time equivalent enrollment claimed for basic education, including separate enrollment counts of resident and nonresident students.

(12) ALL DAY KINDERGARTEN PROGRAMS

Funding in this section is sufficient to fund all day kindergarten programs in all schools in the 2023-24 school year and 2024-25 school year, pursuant to RCW 28A.150.220 and 28A.150.315.

(13) ADDITIONAL FUNDING FOR SMALL SCHOOL DISTRICTS AND REMOTE AND NECESSARY PLANTS

For small school districts and remote and necessary school plants within any district which have been judged to be remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction, additional staff units are provided to ensure a minimum level of staffing support. Additional administrative and certificated instructional staff units provided to districts in this subsection shall be reduced by the general education staff units, excluding career and technical education and skills center enhancement units, otherwise provided in subsections (2) through (5) of this section on a per district basis.

(a) For districts enrolling not more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within any school district which have been judged to be remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction and enroll not more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8:

(i) For those enrolling no students in grades 7 and 8, 1.76 certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five students, plus one-twentieth of a certificated instructional staff unit for each additional student enrolled; and

(ii) For those enrolling students in grades 7 or 8, 1.68 certificated instructional staff units and 0.32 certificated administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five students, plus one-tenth of a certificated instructional staff unit for each additional student enrolled;

(b) For specified enrollments in districts enrolling more than twenty-five but not more than one hundred average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within any school district which enroll more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8 and have been judged to be remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction:

(i) For enrollment of up to sixty annual average full-time equivalent students in grades K-6, 2.76 certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units; and

(ii) For enrollment of up to twenty annual average full-time equivalent students in grades 7 and 8, 0.92 certificated instructional staff units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units;

(c) For districts operating no more than two high schools with enrollments of less than three hundred average annual full-time equivalent students, for enrollment in grades 9-12 in each such school, other than alternative schools, except as noted in this subsection:

(i) For remote and necessary schools enrolling students in any grades 9-12 but no more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-12, four and one-half certificated instructional staff units and one-quarter of a certificated administrative staff unit;

(ii) For all other small high schools under this subsection, nine certificated instructional staff units and one-half of a certificated administrative staff unit for the first sixty average annual full-time equivalent students, and additional staff units based on a ratio of 0.8732 certificated instructional staff units and 0.1268 certificated administrative staff units per each additional forty-three and one-half average annual full-time equivalent students;

(iii) Districts receiving staff units under this subsection shall add students enrolled in a district alternative high school and any grades nine through twelve alternative learning experience programs with the small high school enrollment for calculations under this subsection;

(d) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more than seventy annual average full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-8 program or a grades 1-8 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional staff unit;

(e) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-6 program or a grades 1-6 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional staff unit;

(f)(i) For enrollments generating certificated staff unit allocations under (a) through (e) of this subsection, one classified staff unit for each 2.94 certificated staff units allocated under such subsections;

(ii) For each nonhigh school district with an enrollment of more than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty students, an additional one-half of a classified staff unit; and

(g) School districts receiving additional staff units to support small student enrollments and remote and necessary plants under this subsection (13) shall generate additional MSOC allocations consistent with the nonemployee related costs (NERC) allocation formula in place for the 2010-11 school year as provided section 502, chapter 37, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess. (2010 supplemental budget), adjusted annually for inflation.

(14) Any school district board of directors may petition the superintendent of public instruction by submission of a resolution adopted in a public meeting to reduce or delay any portion of its basic education allocation for any school year. The superintendent of public instruction shall approve such reduction or delay if it does not impair the district's financial condition. Any delay shall not be for more than two school years. Any reduction or delay shall have no impact on levy authority pursuant to RCW 84.52.0531 and local effort assistance pursuant to chapter 28A.500 RCW.

(15) The superintendent may distribute funding for the following programs outside the basic education formula during fiscal years 2024 and 2025 as follows:

(a) $650,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $650,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for fire protection for school districts located in a fire protection district as now or hereafter established pursuant to chapter 52.04 RCW.

(b) $436,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $436,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for programs providing skills training for secondary students who are enrolled in extended day school-to-work programs, as approved by the superintendent of public instruction. The funds shall be allocated at a rate not to exceed $500 per full-time equivalent student enrolled in those programs.

(16) Funding in this section is sufficient to fund a maximum of 1.6 FTE enrollment for skills center students pursuant to chapter 463, Laws of 2007.

(17) Funding in this section is sufficient to fund a maximum of 1.2 FTE enrollment for career launch students pursuant to RCW 28A.700.130. Expenditures for this purpose must come first from the appropriations provided in section 501(5) of this act; funding for career launch enrollment exceeding those appropriations is provided in this section.

(18) Students participating in running start programs may be funded up to a combined maximum enrollment of 1.2 FTE including school district and institution of higher education enrollment consistent with the running start course requirements provided in chapter 202, Laws of 2015 (dual credit education opportunities). In calculating the combined 1.2 FTE, the office of the superintendent of public instruction may average the participating student's September through June enrollment to account for differences in the start and end dates for courses provided by the high school and higher education institution. Additionally, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the state board for community and technical colleges, the student achievement council, and the education data center, shall annually track and report to the fiscal committees of the legislature on the combined FTE experience of students participating in the running start program, including course load analyses at both the high school and community and technical college system. The office of the superintendent of public instruction must adopt rules to fund the participating student's enrollment in running start courses during the summer term.

(19) If two or more school districts consolidate and each district was receiving additional basic education formula staff units pursuant to subsection (13) of this section, the following apply:

(a) For three school years following consolidation, the number of basic education formula staff units shall not be less than the number of basic education formula staff units received by the districts in the school year prior to the consolidation; and

(b) For the fourth through eighth school years following consolidation, the difference between the basic education formula staff units received by the districts for the school year prior to consolidation and the basic education formula staff units after consolidation pursuant to subsection (13) of this section shall be reduced in increments of twenty percent per year.

(20)(a) Indirect cost charges by a school district to approved career and technical education middle and secondary programs shall not exceed the lesser of five percent or the cap established in federal law of the combined basic education and career and technical education program enhancement allocations of state funds. Middle and secondary career and technical education programs are considered separate programs for funding and financial reporting purposes under this section.

(b) Career and technical education program full-time equivalent enrollment shall be reported on the same monthly basis as the enrollment for students eligible for basic support, and payments shall be adjusted for reported career and technical education program enrollments on the same monthly basis as those adjustments for enrollment for students eligible for basic support.

(21) Funding in this section is sufficient to provide full general apportionment payments to school districts eligible for federal forest revenues as provided in RCW 28A.520.020. For the 2023-2025 biennium, general apportionment payments are not reduced for school districts receiving federal forest revenues.

(22) $41,848,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA/ESSER) is provided solely for transitional kindergarten programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 505. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—BASIC EDUCATION EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION

(1) The following calculations determine the salaries used in the state allocations for certificated instructional, certificated administrative, and classified staff units as provided in RCW 28A.150.260, and under section 504 of this act: For the 2023-24 school year and the 2024-25 school year salary allocations for certificated instructional staff, certificated administrative staff, and classified staff units are determined for each school district by multiplying the statewide minimum salary allocation for each staff type by the school district's regionalization factor shown in LEAP Document 3.

Statewide Minimum Salary Allocation

Staff Type

2023-24

School Year

2024-25

School Year

Certificated Instructional

$75,419

$78,360

Certificated Administrative

$111,950

$116,316

Classified

$54,103

$56,213

(2) For the purposes of this section, "LEAP Document 3" means the school district regionalization factors for certificated instructional, certificated administrative, and classified staff, as developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee on February 18, 2023, at 21:28 hours.

(3) Incremental fringe benefit factors are applied to salary adjustments at a rate of 22.57 percent for school year 2023-24 and 17.32 percent for school year 2024-25 for certificated instructional and certificated administrative staff and 19.56 percent for school year 2023-24 and 18.06 percent for the 2024-25 school year for classified staff.

(4) The salary allocations established in this section are for allocation purposes only except as provided in this subsection, and do not entitle an individual staff position to a particular paid salary except as provided in RCW 28A.400.200, as amended by chapter 13, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. (fully funding the program of basic education).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 506. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR SCHOOL EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$376,002,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$870,037,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,246,039,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The salary increases provided in this section are 3.7 percent for the 2023-24 school year, and 3.9 percent for the 2024-25 school year, the annual inflationary adjustments pursuant to RCW 28A.400.205.

(2)(a) In addition to salary allocations, the appropriations in this section include funding for professional learning as defined in RCW 28A.415.430, 28A.415.432, and 28A.415.434. Funding for this purpose is calculated as the equivalent of three days of salary and benefits for each of the funded full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff units. Nothing in this section entitles an individual certificated instructional staff to any particular number of professional learning days.

(b) Of the funding provided for professional learning in this section, the equivalent of one day of salary and benefits for each of the funded full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff units in the 2023-24 school year must be used to train school district staff on cultural competency, diversity, equity, or inclusion, as required in chapter 197, Laws of 2021.

(3)(a) The appropriations in this section include associated incremental fringe benefit allocations at 22.57 percent for the 2023-24 school year and 17.32 percent for the 2024-25 school year for certificated instructional and certificated administrative staff and 19.56 percent for the 2023-24 school year and 18.06 percent for the 2024-25 school year for classified staff.

(b) The appropriations in this section include the increased or decreased portion of salaries and incremental fringe benefits for all relevant state-funded school programs in part V of this act. Changes for general apportionment (basic education) are based on the salary allocations and methodology in sections 504 and 505 of this act. Changes for special education result from changes in each district's basic education allocation per student. Changes for educational service districts and institutional education programs are determined by the superintendent of public instruction using the methodology for general apportionment salaries and benefits in sections 504 and 505 of this act. Changes for pupil transportation are determined by the superintendent of public instruction pursuant to RCW 28A.160.192, and impact compensation factors in sections 504, 505, and 506 of this act.

(c) The appropriations in this section include no salary adjustments for substitute teachers.

(4) The appropriations in this section are sufficient to fund the collective bargaining agreement referenced in part 9 of this act and reflect the incremental change in cost of allocating rates as follows: For the 2023-24 school year, $1,100 per month and for the 2024-25 school year, $1,157 per month.

(5) The rates specified in this section are subject to revision each year by the legislature.

(6) $47,692,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $212,779,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5650 (K-12 inflationary increases). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(7) $5,154,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $12,075,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5311 (special education funding). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 507. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR PUPIL TRANSPORTATION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$801,107,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$799,571,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,600,678,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2)(a) For the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school district programs for the transportation of eligible students as provided in RCW 28A.160.192. Funding in this section constitutes full implementation of RCW 28A.160.192, which enhancement is within the program of basic education. Students are considered eligible only if meeting the definitions provided in RCW 28A.160.160.

(b) From July 1, 2023, to August 31, 2023, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts programs for the transportation of students as provided in section 506, chapter 297, Laws of 2022, as amended.

(3) Within amounts appropriated in this section, up to $10,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and up to $10,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are for a transportation alternate funding grant program based on the alternate funding process established in RCW 28A.160.191. The superintendent of public instruction must include a review of school district efficiency rating, key performance indicators and local school district characteristics such as unique geographic constraints in the grant award process.

(4) A maximum of $939,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and a maximum of $939,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 may be expended for regional transportation coordinators and related activities. The transportation coordinators shall ensure that data submitted by school districts for state transportation funding shall, to the greatest extent practical, reflect the actual transportation activity of each district.

(5) Subject to available funds under this section, school districts may provide student transportation for summer skills center programs.

(6) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide reimbursement funding to a school district for school bus purchases only after the superintendent of public instruction determines that the school bus was purchased from the list established pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195(2) or a comparable competitive bid process based on the lowest price quote based on similar bus categories to those used to establish the list pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195.

(7) The superintendent of public instruction shall base depreciation payments for school district buses on the presales tax five-year average of lowest bids in the appropriate category of bus. In the final year on the depreciation schedule, the depreciation payment shall be based on the lowest bid in the appropriate bus category for that school year.

(8) Funding levels in this section reflect waivers granted by the state board of education for four-day school weeks as allowed under RCW 28A.305.141.

(9) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall annually disburse payments for bus depreciation in August.

(10) $50,358,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $50,239,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the special passenger safety net program created in Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5174 (student transportation). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 508. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—SCHOOL FOOD SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$61,834,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$63,834,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$537,178,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$662,846,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $11,548,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $11,548,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for state matching money for federal child nutrition programs, and may support the meals for kids program through the following allowable uses:

(a) Elimination of breakfast copays for eligible public school students and lunch copays for eligible public school students in grades pre-kindergarten through twelfth grades who are eligible for reduced-price lunch as required in chapter 74, Laws of 2021 (reduced-price lunch copays);

(b) Assistance to school districts and authorized public and private nonprofit organizations for supporting summer food service programs, and initiating new summer food service programs in low-income areas;

(c) Reimbursements to school districts for school breakfasts served to students eligible for free and reduced-price lunch, pursuant to chapter 287, Laws of 2005; and

(d) Assistance to school districts in initiating and expanding school breakfast programs.

(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall report annually to the fiscal committees of the legislature on annual expenditures in subsection (1)(a) through (c) of this section.

(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall provide the department of health with the following data, where available, for all nutrition assistance programs that are funded by the United States department of agriculture and administered by the office of the superintendent of public instruction. The superintendent must provide the report for the preceding federal fiscal year by February 1, 2024, and February 1, 2025. The report must provide:

(a) The number of people in Washington who are eligible for the program;

(b) The number of people in Washington who participated in the program;

(c) The average annual participation rate in the program;

(d) Participation rates by geographic distribution; and

(e) The annual federal funding of the program in Washington.

(4)(a) $50,167,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $52,167,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for reimbursements to school districts for schools and groups of schools required to participate in the federal community eligibility program under section 1, chapter 7, Laws of 2022 (schools/comm. eligibility) for meals not reimbursed at the federal free meal rate.

(b) $119,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $119,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 271, Laws of 2018 (school meal payment) to increase the number of schools participating in the federal community eligibility program and to support breakfast after the bell programs authorized by the legislature that have adopted the community eligibility provision, and for staff at the office of the superintendent of public instruction to implement section 1, chapter 7, Laws of 2022 (schools/comm. eligibility).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 509. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR SPECIAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$1,721,232,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$1,791,304,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$529,429,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$54,694,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$4,096,659,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) Funding for special education programs is provided on an excess cost basis, pursuant to RCW 28A.150.390. School districts shall ensure that special education students as a class receive their full share of the general apportionment allocation accruing through sections 504 and 506 of this act. To the extent a school district cannot provide an appropriate education for special education students under chapter 28A.155 RCW through the general apportionment allocation, it shall provide services through the special education excess cost allocation funded in this section.

(b) Funding provided within this section is sufficient for districts to provide school principals and lead special education teachers annual professional development on the best-practices for special education instruction and strategies for implementation. Districts shall annually provide a summary of professional development activities to the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(2)(a) The superintendent of public instruction shall ensure that:

(i) Special education students are basic education students first;

(ii) As a class, special education students are entitled to the full basic education allocation; and

(iii) Special education students are basic education students for the entire school day.

(b) The superintendent of public instruction shall continue to implement the full cost method of excess cost accounting, as designed by the committee and recommended by the superintendent, pursuant to section 501(1)(k), chapter 372, Laws of 2006.

(3) Each fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(4)(a) For the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school district programs for special education students as provided in RCW 28A.150.390, except that the calculation of the base allocation also includes allocations provided under section 504 (2) and (4) of this act and RCW 28A.150.415, which enhancement is within the program of basic education.

(b) From July 1, 2023, to August 31, 2023, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school district programs for special education students as provided in section 507, chapter 297, Laws of 2022, as amended.

(5) The following applies throughout this section: The definitions for enrollment and enrollment percent are as specified in RCW 28A.150.390(3). Each district's general fund—state funded special education enrollment shall be the lesser of the district's actual enrollment percent or 15 percent.

(6) At the request of any interdistrict cooperative of at least 15 districts in which all excess cost services for special education students of the districts are provided by the cooperative, the maximum enrollment percent shall be calculated in accordance with RCW 28A.150.390(3) (c) and (d), and shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than individual district units. For purposes of this subsection, the average basic education allocation per full-time equivalent student shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than individual district units.

(7) $106,931,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $106,931,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for safety net awards for districts with demonstrated needs for special education funding beyond the amounts provided in subsection (4) of this section. If the federal safety net awards based on the federal eligibility threshold exceed the federal appropriation in this subsection (7) in any fiscal year, the superintendent shall expend all available federal discretionary funds necessary to meet this need. At the conclusion of each school year, the superintendent shall recover safety net funds that were distributed prospectively but for which districts were not subsequently eligible.

(a) For the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years, safety net funds shall be awarded by the state safety net oversight committee as provided in section 109(1) chapter 548, Laws of 2009 (education).

(b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall make award determinations for state safety net funding in August of each school year, except that the superintendent of public instruction shall make award determinations for state safety net funding in July of each school year for the Washington state school for the blind and for the center for childhood deafness and hearing loss. Determinations on school district eligibility for state safety net awards shall be based on analysis of actual expenditure data from the current school year.

(8) A maximum of $1,250,000 may be expended from the general fund—state appropriations to fund teachers and aides at Seattle children's hospital. This amount is in lieu of money provided through the home and hospital allocation and the special education program.

(9) The superintendent shall maintain the percentage of federal flow-through to school districts at 85 percent. In addition to other purposes, school districts may use increased federal funds for high-cost students, for purchasing regional special education services from educational service districts, and for staff development activities particularly relating to inclusion issues.

(10) A school district may carry over from one year to the next year up to 10 percent of the general fund—state funds allocated under this program; however, carryover funds shall be expended in the special education program.

(11) $87,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $87,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $214,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a special education family liaison position within the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(12)(a) $13,538,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) is provided solely for allocations from federal funding as authorized in section 2014, the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2.

(b) $1,777,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) is provided solely for providing preschool services to qualifying special education students under section 619 of the federal individuals with disabilities education act, pursuant to section 2002, the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2.

(13) $153,631,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $199,433,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5311 (special education funding). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 510. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR EDUCATIONAL SERVICE DISTRICTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$33,380,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$33,360,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$66,740,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The educational service districts shall continue to furnish financial services required by the superintendent of public instruction and RCW 28A.310.190 (3) and (4).

(2) Funding within this section is provided for regional professional development related to mathematics and science curriculum and instructional strategies aligned with common core state standards and next generation science standards. Funding shall be distributed among the educational service districts in the same proportion as distributions in the 2007-2009 biennium. Each educational service district shall use this funding solely for salary and benefits for a certificated instructional staff with expertise in the appropriate subject matter and in professional development delivery, and for travel, materials, and other expenditures related to providing regional professional development support.

(3) Funding in this section is provided for regional professional development related to English language arts curriculum and instructional strategies aligned with common core state standards. Each educational service district shall use this funding solely for salary and benefits for certificated instructional staff with expertise in the appropriate subject matter and in professional development delivery, and for travel, materials, and other expenditures related to providing regional professional development support.

(4) Funding in this section is provided for regional technical support for the K-20 telecommunications network to prevent system failures and avoid interruptions in school utilization of the data processing and video-conferencing capabilities of the network. These funds may be used to purchase engineering and advanced technical support for the network.

(5) Funding in this section is provided for a corps of nurses located at the educational service districts, to be dispatched in coordination with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, to provide direct care to students, health education, and training for school staff. In fiscal years 2024 and 2025, allocations for the corps of nurses is sufficient to provide one day per week of nursing services for all second-class school districts.

(6) Funding in this section is provided for staff and support at the nine educational service districts to provide a network of support for school districts to develop and implement comprehensive suicide prevention and behavioral health supports for students.

(7) Funding in this section is provided for staff and support at the nine educational service districts to provide assistance to school districts with comprehensive safe schools planning, conducting needs assessments, school safety and security trainings, coordinating appropriate crisis and emergency response and recovery, and developing threat assessment and crisis intervention teams. In fiscal years 2024 and 2025, allocations for staff and support for regional safety centers are increased to 3 full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff for each regional safety center.

(8) Funding in this section is provided for regional English language arts coordinators to provide professional development of teachers and principals around the new early screening for dyslexia requirements.

(9) The educational service districts, at the request of the state board of education pursuant to RCW 28A.310.010 and 28A.305.130, may receive and screen applications for school accreditation, conduct school accreditation site visits pursuant to state board of education rules, and submit to the state board of education post-site visit recommendations for school accreditation. The educational service districts may assess a cooperative service fee to recover actual plus reasonable indirect costs for the purposes of this subsection.

(10) $2,169,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,169,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for each educational service district to provide technology consultation, procurement, and training required under chapter 301, Laws of 2021 (schools/computers & devices).

(11) $1,009,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,009,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 87, Laws of 2022 (ed. service district funding).

(12) $2,700,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the cost of employing one full-time equivalent employee at each of the nine education service districts to support the expansion of career connected learning.

(13) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for educational service districts to provide students attending school in rural areas with access to a mental health professional using telemedicine. Funding must be prioritized to districts where mental health services are inadequate or nonexistent due to geographic constraints. Funding may be used for schools or school districts for technology upgrades to provide secure access for students, for contracted services, or to pay applicable copays or fees for telemedicine visits if not covered by a student's public or private insurance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 511. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR LOCAL EFFORT ASSISTANCE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$235,469,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$211,159,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$446,628,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 512. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR INSTITUTIONAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$15,000,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$14,737,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$29,737,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund—state fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2) State funding provided under this section is based on salaries and other expenditures for a 220-day school year. The superintendent of public instruction shall monitor school district expenditure plans for institutional education programs to ensure that districts plan for a full-time summer program.

(3) State funding for each institutional education program shall be based on the institution's annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment. Staffing ratios for each category of institution shall remain the same as those funded in the 1995-97 biennium.

(4) The funded staffing ratios for education programs for juveniles age 18 or less in department of corrections facilities shall be the same as those provided in the 1997-99 biennium.

(5) $811,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $811,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to maintain at least one certificated instructional staff and related support services at an institution whenever the K-12 enrollment is not sufficient to support one full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff to furnish the educational program. The following types of institutions are included: Residential programs under the department of social and health services for developmentally disabled juveniles, programs for juveniles under the department of corrections, programs for juveniles under the juvenile rehabilitation administration, and programs for juveniles operated by city and county jails.

(6) Within the amounts provided in this section, funding is provided to increase the capacity of institutional education programs to differentiate instruction to meet students' unique educational needs, including students with individualized educational plans. Those needs may include but are not limited to one-on-one instruction, enhanced access to counseling for social emotional needs of the student, and services to identify the proper level of instruction at the time of student entry into the facility. Allocations of amounts for this purpose in a school year must be based on 45 percent of full-time enrollment in institutional education receiving a differentiated instruction amount per pupil equal to the total statewide allocation generated by the distribution formula under RCW 28A.150.260 (4)(a), (5), (6), and (8) and the allocation under RCW 28A.150.415, per the statewide full-time equivalent enrollment in common schools.

(7) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2024 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to support two student records coordinators to manage the transmission of academic records for each of the long-term juvenile institutions. One coordinator is provided for each of the following: The Issaquah school district for the Echo Glen children's center and for the Chehalis school district for Green Hill academic school.

(8) Ten percent of the funds allocated for the institution may be carried over from one year to the next.

(9) $588,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $897,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for one educational advocate to each institution with enrollments above 40 full-time equivalent students in addition to any educational advocates supported by federal funding. Educational advocates will provide the following supports to students enrolled in or just released from institutional education programs:

(a) Advocacy for institutional education students to eliminate barriers to educational access and success;

(b) Consultation with juvenile rehabilitation staff to develop educational plans for and with participating youth;

(c) Monitoring educational progress of participating students;

(d) Providing participating students with school and local resources that may assist in educational access and success upon release from institutional education facilities; and

(e) Coaching students and caregivers to advocate for educational needs to be addressed at the school district upon return to the community.

(10) Within the amounts provided in this section, funding is provided to increase materials, supplies, and operating costs by $85 per pupil for technology supports for institutional education programs. This funding is in addition to general education materials, supplies, and operating costs provided to institutional education programs, which exclude formula costs supported by the institutional facilities.

(11) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to support instruction in cohorts of students grouped by similar age and academic levels.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 513. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$33,333,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$33,128,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$66,461,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2)(a) For the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school district programs for highly capable students as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(c) except that allocations must be based on 5.0 percent of each school district's full-time equivalent enrollment. In calculating the allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following: (i) Additional instruction of 2.1590 hours per week per funded highly capable program student; (ii) fifteen highly capable program students per teacher; (iii) 36 instructional weeks per year; (iv) 900 instructional hours per teacher; and (v) the compensation rates as provided in sections 505 and 506 of this act.

(b) From July 1, 2023, to August 31, 2023, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts programs for highly capable students as provided in section 513, chapter 297, Laws of 2022, as amended.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 514. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR MISCELLANEOUS—EVERY STUDENT SUCCEEDS ACT

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$9,802,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$9,802,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 515. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—EDUCATION REFORM PROGRAMS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$138,295,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$140,512,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$95,825,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$1,450,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,664,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$377,746,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) ACCOUNTABILITY

(a) $26,975,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $26,975,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, $1,350,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation, and $15,868,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for development and implementation of the Washington state assessment system.

(b) $14,352,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $14,352,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 159, Laws of 2013 (K-12 education - failing schools).

(2) EDUCATOR CONTINUUM

(a) $78,680,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $80,882,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the following bonuses for teachers who hold valid, unexpired certification from the national board for professional teaching standards and who are teaching in a Washington public school, subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(i) For national board certified teachers, a bonus of $6,206 per teacher in the 2023-24 school year and a bonus of $6,336 per teacher in the 2024-25 school year;

(ii) An additional $5,000 annual bonus shall be paid to national board certified teachers who teach in either: (A) High schools where at least 50 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free or reduced-price lunch, (B) middle schools where at least 60 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free or reduced-price lunch, or (C) elementary schools where at least 70 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free or reduced-price lunch;

(iii) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to ensure that national board certified teachers meet the qualifications for bonuses under (b) of this subsection for less than one full school year receive bonuses in a prorated manner. All bonuses in this subsection will be paid in July of each school year. Bonuses in this subsection shall be reduced by a factor of 40 percent for first year NBPTS certified teachers, to reflect the portion of the instructional school year they are certified; and

(iv) During the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years, and within available funds, certificated instructional staff who have met the eligibility requirements and have applied for certification from the national board for professional teaching standards may receive a conditional loan of two thousand dollars or the amount set by the office of the superintendent of public instruction to contribute toward the current assessment fee, not including the initial up-front candidacy payment. The fee shall be an advance on the first annual bonus under RCW 28A.405.415. The conditional loan is provided in addition to compensation received under a district's salary allocation and shall not be included in calculations of a district's average salary and associated salary limitation under RCW 28A.400.200. Recipients who fail to receive certification after fully exhausting all years of candidacy as set by the national board for professional teaching standards are required to repay the conditional loan. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to define the terms for initial grant of the assessment fee and repayment, including applicable fees. To the extent necessary, the superintendent may use revenues from the repayment of conditional loan scholarships to ensure payment of all national board bonus payments required by this section in each school year.

(b) $3,418,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,418,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of a new performance-based evaluation for certificated educators and other activities as provided in chapter 235, Laws of 2010 (education reform) and chapter 35, Laws of 2012 (certificated employee evaluations).

(c) $477,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $477,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the leadership internship program for superintendents, principals, and program administrators.

(d) $810,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $810,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the development of a leadership academy for school principals and administrators. The superintendent of public instruction shall contract with an independent organization to operate a state-of-the-art education leadership academy that will be accessible throughout the state. Semiannually the independent organization shall report on amounts committed by foundations and others to support the development and implementation of this program. Leadership academy partners shall include the state level organizations for school administrators and principals, the superintendent of public instruction, the professional educator standards board, and others as the independent organization shall identify.

(e) $10,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $10,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a beginning educator support program (BEST). The program shall prioritize first year educators in the mentoring program. School districts and/or regional consortia may apply for grant funding. The program provided by a district and/or regional consortia shall include: A paid orientation; assignment of a qualified mentor; development of a professional growth plan for each beginning educator aligned with professional certification; release time for mentors and new educators to work together; and educator observation time with accomplished peers. Funding may be used to provide statewide professional development opportunities for mentors and beginning educators.

(f) $4,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $4,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the provision of training for teachers, principals, and principal evaluators in the performance-based teacher principal evaluation program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 516. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR TRANSITIONAL BILINGUAL PROGRAMS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$236,980,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$236,156,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$102,242,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$575,378,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2)(a) For the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts for transitional bilingual programs under RCW 28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080, including programs for exited students, as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(b) and the provisions of this section. In calculating the allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following averages: (i) Additional instruction of 4.7780 hours per week per transitional bilingual program student in grades kindergarten through six and 6.7780 hours per week per transitional bilingual program student in grades seven through twelve in school years 2023-24 and 2024-25; (ii) additional instruction of 3.0000 hours per week in school years 2023-24 and 2024-25 for the head count number of students who have exited the transitional bilingual instruction program within the previous two years based on their performance on the English proficiency assessment; (iii) fifteen transitional bilingual program students per teacher; (iv) 36 instructional weeks per year; (v) 900 instructional hours per teacher; and (vi) the compensation rates as provided in sections 505 and 506 of this act. Pursuant to RCW 28A.180.040(1)(g), the instructional hours specified in (a)(ii) of this subsection (2) are within the program of basic education.

(b) From July 1, 2023, to August 31, 2023, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts for transitional bilingual instruction programs as provided in section 516, chapter 297, Laws of 2022, as amended.

(3) The superintendent may withhold allocations to school districts in subsection (2) of this section solely for the central provision of assessments as provided in RCW 28A.180.090 (1) and (2) up to the following amounts: 1.68 percent for school year 2023-24 and 1.68 percent for school year 2024-25.

(4) The general fund—federal appropriation in this section is for migrant education under Title I Part C and English language acquisition, and language enhancement grants under Title III of the elementary and secondary education act.

(5) $35,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $35,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to track current and former transitional bilingual program students.

(6) $1,185,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2024 and $1,185,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the central provision of assessments as provided in RCW 28A.180.090, and is in addition to the withholding amounts specified in subsection (3) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 517. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR THE LEARNING ASSISTANCE PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$467,311,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$465,477,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$591,638,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,524,426,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The general fund—state appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The appropriations include such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(b)(i) For the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts for learning assistance programs as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(a), except that the allocation for the additional instructional hours shall be enhanced as provided in this section, which enhancements are within the program of the basic education. In calculating the allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following averages: (A) Additional instruction of 2.3975 hours per week per funded learning assistance program student for the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years; (B) additional instruction of 1.1 hours per week per funded learning assistance program student for the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years in qualifying high-poverty school building; (C) fifteen learning assistance program students per teacher; (D) 36 instructional weeks per year; (E) 900 instructional hours per teacher; and (F) the compensation rates as provided in sections 505 and 506 of this act.

(ii) From July 1, 2023, to August 31, 2023, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts for learning assistance programs as provided in section 517, chapter 297, Laws of 2022, as amended.

(c) A school district's funded students for the learning assistance program shall be the sum of the district's full-time equivalent enrollment in grades K-12 for the prior school year multiplied by the district's percentage of October headcount enrollment in grades K-12 eligible for free or reduced-price lunch in the prior school year. The prior school year's October headcount enrollment for free and reduced-price lunch shall be as reported in the comprehensive education data and research system.

(2) Allocations made pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be adjusted to reflect ineligible applications identified through the annual income verification process required by the national school lunch program, as recommended in the report of the state auditor on the learning assistance program dated February, 2010.

(3) The general fund—federal appropriation in this section is provided for Title I Part A allocations of the every student succeeds act of 2016.

(4) A school district may carry over from one year to the next up to 10 percent of the general fund—state funds allocated under this program; however, carryover funds shall be expended for the learning assistance program.

(5) Within existing resources, during the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years, school districts are authorized to use funds allocated for the learning assistance program to also provide assistance to high school students who have not passed the state assessment in science.

(6) $58,151,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA/ESSER) is provided solely for school districts for learning assistance programs in addition to the allocations provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(a). Funds must be obligated by September 30, 2023.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 518. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—PER PUPIL ALLOCATIONS

Statewide Average Allocations

Per Annual Average Full-Time Equivalent Student

Basic Education Program

2023-24

School Year

2024-25

School Year

General Apportionment

$10,627

$11,135

Pupil Transportation

$769

$789

Special Education Programs

$12,290

$12,847

Institutional Education Programs

$27,799

$28,812

Programs for Highly Capable Students

$673

$700

Transitional Bilingual Programs

$1,615

$1,653

Learning Assistance Program

$1,047

$1,088

NEW SECTION. Sec. 519. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

(1) Amounts distributed to districts by the superintendent through part V of this act are for allocation purposes only, unless specified by part V of this act, and do not entitle a particular district, district employee, or student to a specific service, beyond what has been expressly provided in statute. Part V of this act restates the requirements of various sections of Title 28A RCW. If any conflict exists, the provisions of Title 28A RCW control unless this act explicitly states that it is providing an enhancement. Any amounts provided in part V of this act in excess of the amounts required by Title 28A RCW provided in statute, are not within the program of basic education unless clearly stated by this act.

(2) When adopting new or revised rules or policies relating to the administration of allocations in part V of this act that result in fiscal impact, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall seek legislative approval through the budget request process.

(3) Appropriations made in this act to the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall initially be allotted as required by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not include transfers of moneys between sections of this act, except as expressly provided in subsection (4) of this section.

(4) The appropriations to the office of the superintendent of public instruction in this act shall be expended for the programs and amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, 2024, unless specifically prohibited by this act and after approval by the director of financial management, the superintendent of public instruction may transfer state general fund appropriations for fiscal year 2024 among the following programs to meet the apportionment schedule for a specified formula in another of these programs: General apportionment; employee compensation adjustments; pupil transportation; special education programs; institutional education programs; transitional bilingual programs; highly capable programs; and learning assistance programs.

(5) The director of financial management shall notify the appropriate legislative fiscal committees in writing prior to approving any allotment modifications or transfers under this section.

(6) Appropriations in sections 504 and 506 of this act for insurance benefits under chapter 41.05 RCW are provided solely for the superintendent to allocate to districts for employee health benefits as provided in section 909 of this act. The superintendent may not allocate, and districts may not expend, these amounts for any other purpose beyond those authorized in section 909 of this act.

(7) As required by RCW 28A.710.110, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall transmit the charter school authorizer oversight fee for the charter school commission to the charter school oversight account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 520. FOR THE OFFICE OF THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR CHARTER SCHOOLS

Washington Opportunity Pathways Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$191,164,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$191,164,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The superintendent shall distribute funding appropriated in this section to charter schools under chapter 28A.710 RCW. Within amounts provided in this section the superintendent may distribute funding for safety net awards for charter schools with demonstrated needs for special education funding beyond the amounts provided under chapter 28A.710 RCW.

(2) $3,457,000 of the opportunity pathways account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5650 (K-12 inflationary increases). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(3) $1,434,000 of the opportunity pathways account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5311 (special education funding). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 521. FOR THE OFFICE OF THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CHARTER SCHOOL COMMISSION

Washington Opportunity Pathways Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$23,000

Charter Schools Oversight Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,014,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$4,037,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The entire Washington opportunity pathways account—state appropriation in this section is provided to the superintendent of public instruction solely for the operations of the Washington state charter school commission under chapter 28A.710 RCW.

(2) $28,000 of the charter schools oversight account—state appropriation is provided solely to the Washington state charter school commission to enable each charter school to participate in the governance training required under chapter 197, Laws of 2021 (schools/equity training).

(3) $238,000 of the charter schools oversight account—state appropriation is provided solely for office of the attorney general legal services related to litigation challenging the commission's authority to oversee and regulate charter schools.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 522. FOR THE OFFICE OF THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR GRANTS AND PASS THROUGH FUNDING

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$70,611,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$70,962,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$111,277,000

Elementary and Secondary School Emergency Relief III

Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$901,880,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,154,730,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The general fund—state appropriations in this section for fiscal year 2024 have been reduced by $24,000 to reflect global compensation savings. The office of financial management, in consultation with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, shall adjust allotments from the appropriations in this section, including allotments of amounts provided solely for a specific purpose, to reflect the reduction to the overall appropriation.

(2) GRADUATION SUCCESS AND PREPARATION FOR POSTSECONDARY PATHWAYS

(a) $4,894,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $4,894,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to administer programs and grants which increase equitable access to dual credit programs, including subsidizing or eliminating student costs for dual credit courses or exams. By November 2024, the office shall submit a report to relevant committees of the legislature describing options for entering into statewide agreements with dual credit exam companies that will reduce the overall costs for all students and eliminate costs for students who are low income.

(b) $3,152,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,152,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for secondary career and technical education grants pursuant to chapter 170, Laws of 2008, including parts of programs receiving grants that serve students in grades four through six. If equally matched by private donations, $1,475,000 of the 2024 appropriation and $1,475,000 of the 2025 appropriation shall be used to support FIRST robotics programs in grades four through twelve. Of the amounts provided in this subsection (2)(b), $800,000 of the fiscal year 2024 appropriation and $800,000 of the fiscal year 2025 appropriation are provided solely for the purpose of statewide supervision activities for career and technical education student leadership organizations.

(c) $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for science, technology, engineering and mathematics lighthouse projects, consistent with chapter 238, Laws of 2010.

(d) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for advanced project lead the way courses at ten high schools. To be eligible for funding in 2024, a high school must have offered a foundational project lead the way course during the 2022-23 school year. The 2024 funding must be used for one-time start-up course costs for an advanced project lead the way course, to be offered to students beginning in the 2023-24 school year. To be eligible for funding in 2025, a high school must have offered a foundational project lead the way course during the 2023-24 school year. The 2025 funding must be used for one-time start-up course costs for an advanced project lead the way course, to be offered to students beginning in the 2024-25 school year. The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the education research and data center at the office of financial management shall track student participation and long-term outcome data. The office may require the recipient of these funds to report the impacts of the recipient's efforts in alignment with the measures of the Washington school improvement framework.

(e) $2,527,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,527,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for annual startup, expansion, or maintenance of core plus programs in maritime, construction, and aerospace and advanced manufacturing programs. To be eligible for funding to start up, maintain, or expand programs under (i) through (iii) of this subsection (2)(e), the skills center, high school, or middle school must be selected through a grant process administered by the office of the superintendent of public instruction in consultation with the advisory committee established in (vi) of this subsection (2)(e). The office and the education research and data center shall report annually student participation and long-term outcome data. Within the amounts provided in this subsection (2)(e):

(i) $900,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $900,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants for the annual startup, expansion, or maintenance of core plus programs in aerospace and advanced manufacturing programs.

(ii) $550,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $550,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants for the annual startup, expansion, or maintenance of core plus programs in construction programs.

(iii) $550,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $550,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants for the annual startup, expansion, or maintenance of core plus programs in maritime programs.

(iv) For (i) through (iii) of this subsection (2)(e), when the grant demand does not align with the specified allocation, the superintendent may allocate funding toward sector areas that meet criteria based on agreement from industry sector representatives.

(v) $527,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $527,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office to administer, evaluate, and promote programs under (i) through (iii) of this subsection (2)(e) based on industry sector recommendations, including contracts with sector-specific entities to expand sector-specific employer engagement programs, increase work placement opportunities, validate credentials necessary for direct employment, and provide professional development to support schools, teachers, and students. The office may also contract with an entity with experience promoting core plus programming across industry sectors and education providers to expand awareness and adoption of core plus programs.

(vi) The office shall collaborate with industry sector leadership from the core plus program areas and a representative from a statewide business and manufacturing association to inform the administration and continual improvement of core plus programs, review data and outcomes, recommend program improvements, ensure core plus programs reflect current industry competencies, and identify appropriate program credentials.

(f) $4,940,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $4,940,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Washington state achievers scholarship and Washington higher education readiness program. The funds shall be used to: Support community involvement officers that recruit, train, and match community volunteer mentors with students selected as achievers scholars; and to identify and reduce barriers to college for low-income and underserved middle and high school students. The office may require the recipient of these funds to report the impacts of the recipient's efforts in alignment with the measures of the Washington school improvement framework.

(g) $1,454,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,454,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for contracting with a college scholarship organization with expertise in conducting outreach to students concerning eligibility for the Washington college bound scholarship consistent with chapter 405, Laws of 2007. The office may require the recipient of these funds to report the impacts of the recipient's efforts in alignment with the measures of the Washington school improvement framework.

(h) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for an education and workforce pathway pilot program at the northwest career and technical academy. The pilot program will oversee a pathway including high schools, skills centers, community and technical colleges, and employers that results in students earning a high school diploma and an associate in technical arts degree, while maintaining summer employment.

(i) $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office to distribute after-exit running start grants to school districts that identify running start students that have exceeded maximum enrollment under running start formulas and high school graduates who have 15 or fewer college credits to earn before meeting associate degree requirements for instruction not funded under section 504(18) of this act. High school graduates who meet these requirements are eligible to receive funds from these grants for fees to the community and technical college to earn up to 15 college credits during the summer academic term following their high school graduation.

(j) $2,094,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,076,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the competitive grant program created in Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5582 (nurse supply). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(k) $125,000 of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account—federal appropriation and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the West Sound STEM Network to increase STEM activities for students in school and after school and to develop industry education pathways in high demand sectors.

(l) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the office to contract with a nongovernmental entity for a controls programmer apprenticeship program.

(3) CURRICULUM DEVELOPMENT, DISSEMINATION, AND SUPPORTS

(a) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for project citizen and we the people: The citizen and the constitution programs sponsored by the national conference of state legislatures and the center for civic education to promote participation in government by middle and high school students. Of the amounts provided, $15,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $15,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for awarding a travel grant to the winner of the we the people: The citizen and the constitution state competition.

(b) $373,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $373,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 127, Laws of 2018 (civics education). Of the amounts provided in this subsection (3)(b), $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grant programs to school districts to help cover travel costs associated with civics education competitions.

(c) $55,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $55,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction for statewide implementation of career and technical education course equivalency frameworks authorized under RCW 28A.700.070 for math and science. This may include development of additional equivalency course frameworks, course performance assessments, and professional development for districts implementing the new frameworks.

(d) Within the amounts appropriated in this section the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall ensure career and technical education courses are aligned with high-demand, high-wage jobs. The superintendent shall verify that the current list of career and technical education courses meets the criteria established in RCW 28A.700.020(2). The superintendent shall remove from the list any career and technical education course that no longer meets such criteria.

(e) $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to provide grants to school districts and educational service districts for science teacher training in the next generation science standards including training in the climate science standards. At a minimum, school districts shall ensure that teachers in one grade level in each elementary, middle, and high school participate in this science training. Of the amount appropriated $1,000,000 is provided solely for community-based nonprofits including tribal education organizations to partner with public schools for next generation science standards.

(f) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Kip Tokuda memorial Washington civil liberties public education program. The superintendent of public instruction shall award grants consistent with RCW 28A.300.410.

(g) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Washington state leadership and assistance for science education reform (LASER) regional partnership activities, including instructional material purchases, teacher and principal professional development, and school and community engagement events. The office may require the recipient of these funds to report the impacts of the recipient's efforts in alignment with the measures of the Washington school improvement framework.

(h) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants of $2,500 to provide twenty middle and high school teachers each year with professional development training for implementing integrated math, science, technology, and engineering programs in their schools.

(i) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the computer science and education grant program to support the following three purposes: Train and credential teachers in computer sciences; provide and upgrade technology needed to learn computer science; and, for computer science frontiers grants to introduce students to and engage them in computer science. The office of the superintendent of public instruction must use the computer science learning standards adopted pursuant to chapter 3, Laws of 2015 (computer science) in implementing the grant, to the extent possible. Additionally, grants provided for the purpose of introducing students to computer science are intended to support innovative ways to introduce and engage students from historically underrepresented groups, including girls, low-income students, and minority students, to computer science and to inspire them to enter computer science careers. The office of the superintendent of public instruction may award up to $500,000 each year, without a matching requirement, to districts with greater than fifty percent of students eligible for free and reduced-price meals. All other awards must be equally matched by private sources for the program, including gifts, grants, or endowments.

(j) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to contract with a qualified 501(c)(3) nonprofit community-based organization physically located in Washington state that has at least 18 years of experience collaborating with the office and school districts statewide to integrate the state learning standards in English language arts, mathematics, and science with FieldSTEM outdoor field studies and project-based and work-based learning opportunities aligned with the environmental, natural resource, and agricultural sectors. The office may require the recipient of these funds to report the impacts of the recipient's efforts in alignment with the measures of the Washington school improvement framework.

(k) $62,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $62,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for competitive grants to school districts to increase the capacity of high schools to offer AP computer science courses. In making grant allocations, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must give priority to schools and districts in rural areas, with substantial enrollment of low-income students, and that do not offer AP computer science. School districts may apply to receive either or both of the following grants:

(i) A grant to establish partnerships to support computer science professionals from private industry serving on a voluntary basis as coinstructors along with a certificated teacher, including via synchronous video, for AP computer science courses; or

(ii) A grant to purchase or upgrade technology and curriculum needed for AP computer science, as well as provide opportunities for professional development for classroom teachers to have the requisite knowledge and skills to teach AP computer science.

(l) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Mobius science center to expand mobile outreach of science, technology, engineering, and mathematics (STEM) education to students in rural, tribal, and low-income communities.

(m) $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the centrum program at Fort Worden state park.

(n) $20,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $20,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office to administer an outdoor learning grant program to develop and support outdoor educational experiences for students in Washington public schools. A portion of the amount provided must be used to provide outdoor educational opportunities for people with disabilities. The office may consult with the Washington recreation and conservation office on outdoor learning program grants. Of the amounts provided in this subsection (3)(n):

(i) $195,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $195,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office to implement chapter 112, Laws of 2022 (outdoor learning grant prg.).

(ii) $3,903,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,903,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the outdoor learning grant program, which consists of two types of grants:

(A) Allocation-based grants for school districts to develop or support outdoor educational experiences; and

(B) Competitive grants for outdoor education providers that are designed to support existing capacity and to increase future capacity for outdoor learning experiences.

(iii) $15,902,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $15,902,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the outdoor education experiences program. The office must prioritize providing the program to fifth and sixth grade students in high poverty schools, expanding to other fifth and sixth grade students subject to available funds.

(o) $3,205,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,205,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 238, Laws of 2022 (student financial literacy) which provides grants to school districts for integrating financial literacy education into professional development for certificated staff.

(p)(i) $1,425,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,425,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for dual language grants to grow capacity for high quality dual language learning. Grant funding may be used for new and existing dual language programs, heritage language programs for immigrant and refugee students, and indigenous language programs for native students.

(ii) Each grant recipient must convene an advisory board to guide the development and continuous improvement of its dual language program, including but not limited to: Determining which schools and languages will be prioritized; conducting outreach to the community; and addressing enrollment considerations and the hiring of staff. At least half the members of the board must be parents of English learner students or current or former English learner students. The other members of the board must represent teachers, students, school leaders, governing board members, youth, and community-based organizations that support English learners.

(q) $3,000,000 of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account—federal appropriation is provided solely for a statewide information technology academy program. This public-private partnership will provide educational software, as well as information technology certification and software training opportunities for students and staff in public schools for the 2023-24 school year only. The office must evaluate other options that may be available in the state for a future public-private partnership to deliver similar services to students and staff of public schools at no cost to the state.

(r) $1,000,000 of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account—federal appropriation and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office to contract with a nongovernmental entity whose goals are to reduce disparities in student performance and improve algebraic achievement to create a statewide interactive math tutoring tool for middle and high school students that is accessible on a 24 hour basis to students, teachers, and parents across the state. The nongovernmental entity must have previously contracted with five other states and have demonstrated experience creating statewide interactive math tools with proven outcomes in math proficiency.

(s) $1,536,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account—federal appropriation are provided solely for a gravitational wave observatory located in southeastern Washington that is supported through the national science foundation to purchase hands-on, interactive exhibits to expand the number of developmentally appropriate learning activities available for K-12 students attending the observatory.

(4) ELIMINATING INEQUITABLE STUDENT OUTCOMES

(a) $5,895,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,500,000 of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account—federal appropriation, and $7,395,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a contract with a nongovernmental entity or entities for demonstration sites to improve the educational outcomes of students who are dependent pursuant to chapter 13.34 RCW pursuant to chapter 71, Laws of 2016 (foster youth edu. outcomes). The office may require the recipient of these funds to report the impacts of the recipient's efforts in alignment with the measures of the Washington school improvement framework.

(i) Of the amount provided in this subsection (4)(a), $446,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $446,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the demonstration site established pursuant to the 2013-2015 omnibus appropriations act, section 202(10), chapter 4, Laws of 2013, 2nd sp. sess.

(ii) Of the amount provided in this subsection (4)(a), $1,015,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,015,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the demonstration site established pursuant to the 2015-2017 omnibus appropriations act, section 501(43)(b), chapter 4, Laws of 2015, 3rd sp. sess., as amended.

(iii) Of the amounts provided in this subsection (4)(a), $684,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $684,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the demonstration site established with funding provided in the 2017-2019 omnibus appropriations act, chapter 1, Laws of 2017, 3rd sp. sess., as amended.

(iv) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the demonstration site established with funding provided in this act.

(v) $55,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $55,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for maintaining and implementing the data sharing agreement between the office, the department of children, youth, and families, and the contractors to support targeted service delivery, program evaluation, and statewide education outcomes measurement for students served under this section.

(vi) Of the amounts provided in this subsection (4)(a), $1,500,000 of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account—federal appropriation and $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the expansion of individualized education services such as monitoring and supporting completion of educational milestones, remediation needs, and special education needs of middle school students who are dependent pursuant to chapter 13.34 RCW.

(b) $1,200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 157, Laws of 2016 (homeless students).

(c) $36,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $36,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for chapter 212, Laws of 2014 (homeless student educational outcomes).

(d) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for contracts with Washington state based nonprofit organizations that provide a career-integrated one-to-one mentoring program for disadvantaged students facing academic and personal challenges with the goal of keeping them on track for graduation and post-high school success. An applicant requesting funding under this subsection must successfully demonstrate to the office that it currently provides a career-integrated one-to-one volunteer mentoring program and has been mentoring school youth for at least 20 years in the state prior to application.

(e) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office to contract with an organization to create an after-school and summer learning program in the city of Federal Way. The program shall provide comprehensive, culturally competent academic support and cultural enrichment for primarily latinx, spanish-speaking, low-income sixth, seventh, and eighth grade students. The department must contract with an organization with over forty years of experience that serves the latino community in Seattle and King county and has previously established an after-school and summer learning program.

(f) $850,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $850,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to create and administer a grant program for districts to reduce associated student body fees or participation fees for students who are eligible to participate in the federal free and reduced-price meals program. The office must distribute grants for the 2023-24 school year to school districts by August 10, 2023, and grants for the 2024-25 school year by August 1, 2024.

(i) Grant awards must be prioritized in the following order:

(A) High schools implementing the United States department of agriculture community eligibility provision;

(B) High schools with the highest percentage of students in grades nine through twelve eligible to participate in the federal free and reduced-price meals program; and

(C) High schools located in school districts enrolling 5,000 or fewer students.

(ii) High schools that do not comply with the data collection and reporting requirements in RCW 28A.320.540 are not eligible for grant funding.

(iii) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall award grants that are the lesser of the cost of the high school's associated student body card multiplied by the number of students eligible for the free or reduced-price meals program that purchased a student body card in either 2022-23 or 2023-24 school year, whichever is higher, or $10,000.

(iv) The office may award additional funding if:

(A) The appropriations provided are greater than the total amount of funding requested at the end of the application cycle; and

(B) The applicant shows a demonstrated need for additional support.

(g) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to contract with a Washington-based nonprofit organization to promote equitable access in science, technology, engineering, and math education for historically underserved students and communities. The nonprofit shall provide a system of science educational programming specifically for migrant and bilingual students, including teacher professional development, culturally responsive classroom resources that are aligned with Washington state science and environmental and sustainability learning standards, and implementation support. At least 50 percent of the funding provided in this subsection must serve schools and school districts in eastern Washington. The nonprofit organization must have experience developing and implementing science and environmental science programming and resources for migrant and bilingual students.

(h) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to contract with a nonprofit organization serving opportunity youth in Pierce, King and Snohomish counties. The organization must assist traditionally underrepresented students on nontraditional educational pathways by providing mentorship and technical assistance in navigating higher education and financial aid. The office may require the recipient of these funds to report the impacts of the efforts in alignment with the measures of the Washington school improvement framework.

(i) $1,399,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,399,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for school districts to support youth who are truant under chapter 28A.225 RCW or at risk of becoming truant, and for costs associated with filing or serving petitions under RCW 28A.225.030.

(j) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to school districts and educational service districts operating institutional education programs for youth in state long-term juvenile institutions to provide access to computer science elective courses created in chapter 234, Laws of 2022 (computer science instruction).

(k) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to school districts, charter schools, and state-tribal education compact schools to establish K-12 intensive tutoring programs. Grants shall be used to recruit, train, and hire tutors to provide one-on-one tutoring services to K-12 students experiencing learning loss as a result of the COVID-19 pandemic. The tutors must receive training in proven tutoring models to ensure their effectiveness in addressing learning loss.

(l) $362,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $362,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 180, Laws of 2017 (Washington Aim program).

(m) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to the pacific science center to increase hands-on learning opportunities for Title I K-5 students statewide by increasing access to science on wheels and virtual field trips.

(5) EDUCATOR GROWTH AND DEVELOPMENT

(a) $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a nonviolence and ethical leadership training and professional development program provided by the institute for community leadership.

(b) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the office to contract with the association of Washington school principals to provide support, mentoring, mediation, and professional learning services to school principals and assistant principals in the greater Seattle area.

(c) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to contract with a nonprofit organization that supports Washington teachers in implementing lessons on the Holocaust for the expansion of comprehensive Holocaust and genocide education.

(6) FEDERAL GRANTS FOR COVID-19 RECOVERY

(a) $7,791,000 of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account—federal appropriation from funds attributable to subsection 2001(f)(4), the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2 is provided solely to administer a grant program for community-based organizations to collaborate with school districts to support learning recovery and acceleration.

(b) $102,002,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA/ESSER) from funds attributable to subsection 313(c), the coronavirus response and relief supplemental appropriations act, P.L. 116-260, division M is provided solely for subgrants to local education agencies. Total subgrants awarded under this subsection (6)(b) and section 12, chapter 3, Laws of 2021 may not exceed the federal amounts provided under subsection 313(c), the coronavirus response and relief supplemental appropriations act, P.L. 116-260, division M.

(c) $9,253,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA/GEER) is provided solely to provide emergency assistance to nonpublic schools, as authorized in section 312(d), the coronavirus response and relief supplemental appropriations act, P.L. 116-260, division M. Total funds provided under this subsection (6)(c) and section 13, chapter 3, Laws of 2021 may not exceed the federal amounts provided in section 312(d), the coronavirus response and relief supplemental appropriations act, P.L. 116-260, division M.

(d) $671,375,000 of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account—federal appropriation is provided solely for allocations from funds attributable to subsection 2001(e)(2) the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2 for subgrants to local education agencies.

(e) $123,373,000 of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account—federal appropriation is provided solely for allocations from funds attributable to subsection 2001(e)(1), the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2 for subgrants to local education agencies to address learning loss.

(f) $10,335,000 of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account—federal appropriation from funds attributable to subsection 2001(f)(3), the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2 is provided solely to support evidence-based comprehensive afterschool programs.

(g) $6,184,000 of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account—federal appropriation from funds attributable to subsection 2001(f)(4), the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2 is provided solely for grants to districts to expand the number of dual language classrooms in early grades and professional development to accelerate literacy gains in early grades, especially for English learners.

(h) $8,428,000 of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account—federal appropriation from funds attributable to subsection 2001(b), the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2, is provided solely for the purposes of identifying children and youth experiencing homelessness and providing children and youth experiencing homelessness with:

(i) Wrap-around services due to the challenges of the COVID-19 public health emergency; and

(ii) Assistance needed to enable children and youth experiencing homelessness to attend school and participate fully in school activities.

(i)(i) $57,575,000 of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account—federal appropriation is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to administer grants to schools or school districts to advance students' academic progress for the purposes of learning recovery and acceleration. Schools and school districts must submit proposals for review and approval by the superintendent by August 30, 2023. Proposals must include the following information:

(A) How the funding will be used to address learning loss;

(B) How the funding will be used to advance students' academic progress; and

(C) An identified metric to measure academic achievement at the end of the grant cycle.

(ii) Grants shall be awarded competitively based on the quality of the proposals submitted and the likelihood to achieve the academic outcomes described in the grant proposal. Selected grantees must reflect geographic diversity across the state. Grant award amounts may not exceed $500 per pupil and may be used for the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years. Grants must be awarded by October 1, 2023.

(j) $995,000 of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account—federal appropriation from funds attributable to subsection 2001(b), the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2, is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to contract with the Washington school principals' education foundation to support pandemic related learning loss through outdoor learning and overnight camp experiences.

(k) $173,000 of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account—federal appropriation from funds attributable to subsection 2001(f)(2), the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2 is provided solely for grants to entities or organizations to provide outdoor education summer enrichment programs to youth. Recipients must prioritize activities or programs that:

(i) Promote students connecting socially with their classmates;

(ii) Encourage students to engage in physical activity; and

(iii) Support families who have struggled with child care needs.

(l) $143,000 of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account—federal appropriation from funds attributable to subsection 2001(f)(4), the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2 is provided solely for grants for supplies, equipment, staffing, and services to increase access to summer meals and safe school meals in the 2023-24 school year and summer prior to the start of the school year.

(End of part)

PART VI

HIGHER EDUCATION

NEW SECTION. Sec. 601. The appropriations in sections 604 through 610 of this act are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) "Institutions" means the institutions of higher education receiving appropriations under sections 604 through 610 of this act.

(2) The legislature, the office of financial management, and other state agencies need consistent and accurate personnel data from institutions of higher education for policy planning purposes. Institutions of higher education shall report personnel data to the office of financial management for inclusion in the agency's data warehouse. Uniform reporting procedures shall be established by the office of financial management's office of the state human resources director for use by the reporting institutions, including provisions for common job classifications and common definitions of full-time equivalent staff. Annual contract amounts, number of contract months, and funding sources shall be consistently reported for employees under contract.

(3) In addition to waivers granted under the authority of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards and the state board may waive all or a portion of operating fees for any student. State general fund appropriations shall not be provided to replace tuition and fee revenue foregone as a result of waivers granted under this subsection.

(4)(a) For employees under the jurisdiction of chapter 41.56 or 41.80 RCW, salary increases will be in accordance with the applicable collective bargaining agreement. However, an increase shall not be provided to any classified employee whose salary is above the approved salary range maximum for the class to which the employee's position is allocated.

(b) For each institution of higher education receiving appropriations under sections 604 through 610 of this act:

(i) The only allowable salary increases are those associated with normally occurring promotions and increases related to faculty and staff retention and as provided in Part IX of this act.

(ii) Institutions may provide salary increases from sources other than general fund appropriations and tuition revenues to instructional and research faculty, exempt professional staff, teaching and research assistants, as classified by the office of financial management, and all other nonclassified staff, but not including employees under chapter 41.80 RCW. It is the intent of the legislature that salary increases provided under this subsection (4)(b)(ii) not increase state general fund support or impact tuition expenditures by an institution unless the legislature so determines.

(iii) Funding for salary increases provided under (b)(ii) of this subsection and RCW 41.76.035 and 28B.52.035 on or after July 1, 2019, must be excluded from the general fund and tuition salary base when calculating state funding for future general wage or other salary increases on or after July 1, 2019. In order to facilitate this funding policy, each institution shall report to the office of financial management on the details of locally authorized salary increases granted under (b)(ii) of this subsection and RCW 41.76.035 and 28B.52.035 with its 2023-2025 biennium budget submittal. At a minimum, the report must include the total cost of locally authorized increases by fiscal year, a description of the locally authorized provision, and the long-term source of funds that is anticipated to cover the cost.

(5) Within funds appropriated to institutions in sections 604 through 610 of this act, teacher preparation programs shall meet the requirements of RCW 28B.10.710 to incorporate information on the culture, history, and government of American Indian people in this state by integrating the curriculum developed and made available free of charge by the office of the superintendent of public instruction into existing programs or courses and may modify that curriculum in order to incorporate elements that have a regionally specific focus.

(6) Each institution of higher education must include the phone number of a campus, local, state, or national suicide, crisis, or counseling hotline on the back of newly issued student and faculty identification cards.

(7)(a) The student achievement council and all institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.92.030 and eligible for state financial aid programs under chapters 28B.92 and 28B.118 RCW shall ensure that data needed to analyze and evaluate the effectiveness of state financial aid programs are promptly transmitted to the education data center so that it is available and easily accessible. The data to be reported must include but not be limited to:

(i) The number of Washington college grant and college bound recipients;

(ii) Persistence and completion rates of Washington college grant recipients and college bound recipients, disaggregated by institution of higher education;

(iii) Washington college grant recipient grade point averages; and

(iv) Washington college grant and college bound scholarship program costs.

(b) The student achievement council shall submit student unit record data for state financial aid program applicants and recipients to the education data center.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602. (1) Within the amounts appropriated in this act, each institution of higher education shall seek to:

(a) Maintain and to the extent possible increase enrollment opportunities at campuses;

(b) Maintain and to the extent possible increase enrollment opportunities at university centers and other partnership programs that enable students to earn baccalaureate degrees on community college campuses; and

(c) Eliminate and consolidate programs of study for which there is limited student or employer demand, or that are not areas of core academic strength for the institution, particularly when such programs duplicate offerings by other in-state institutions.

(2) For purposes of monitoring and reporting statewide enrollment, the University of Washington and Washington State University shall notify the office of financial management of the number of full-time student equivalent enrollments for each of their campuses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603. PUBLIC BACCALAUREATE INSTITUTIONS

(1) The state universities, the regional universities, and The Evergreen State College must accept the transfer of college-level courses taken by students under RCW 28A.600.290 or 28A.600.300 if a student seeking a transfer of the college-level courses has been admitted to the state university, the regional university, or The Evergreen State College, and if the college-level courses are recognized as transferrable by the admitting institution of higher education.

(2) For institutions of higher education receiving funding for cybersecurity and nursing academic programs for students in sections 605 through 610 of this act, each institution must coordinate with the student achievement council as provided in section 611(7) of this act and submit a progress report on new or expanded cybersecurity and nursing academic programs, including the number of students enrolled.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604. FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$923,216,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$977,118,000

Community/Technical College Capital Projects

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$21,368,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$164,059,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$288,008,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$2,373,769,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $33,261,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $33,261,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely as special funds for training and related support services, including financial aid, as specified in RCW 28C.04.390. Funding is provided to support at least 7,170 full-time equivalent students in fiscal year 2024 and at least 7,170 full-time equivalent students in fiscal year 2025.

(2) $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $5,450,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation are provided solely for administration and customized training contracts through the job skills program. The state board shall make an annual report by January 1st of each year to the governor and to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature under RCW 43.01.036 regarding implementation of this section, listing the scope of grant awards, the distribution of funds by educational sector and region of the state, and the results of the partnerships supported by these funds.

(3) $425,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $425,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for Seattle Central College's expansion of allied health programs.

(4) $5,250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $5,250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the student achievement initiative.

(5) $2,062,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,062,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the mathematics, engineering, and science achievement program.

(6) $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for operating a fabrication composite wing incumbent worker training program to be housed at the Washington aerospace training and research center.

(7) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the aerospace center of excellence currently hosted by Everett community college to:

(a) Increase statewide communications and outreach between industry sectors, industry organizations, businesses, K-12 schools, colleges, and universities;

(b) Enhance information technology to increase business and student accessibility and use of the center's web site; and

(c) Act as the information entry point for prospective students and job seekers regarding education, training, and employment in the industry.

(8) $23,748,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $24,270,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.

(9) Community and technical colleges are not required to send mass mailings of course catalogs to residents of their districts. Community and technical colleges shall consider lower cost alternatives, such as mailing postcards or brochures that direct individuals to online information and other ways of acquiring print catalogs.

(10) The state board for community and technical colleges shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

(11) $157,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $157,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Wenatchee Valley college wildfire prevention program.

(12) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Puget Sound welcome back center at Highline College to create a grant program for internationally trained individuals seeking employment in the behavioral health field in Washington state.

(13) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for increased enrollments in the integrated basic education and skills training program. Funding will support approximately 120 additional full-time equivalent enrollments annually.

(14) $216,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $216,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the opportunity center for employment and education at North Seattle College.

(15) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for Highline College to implement the Federal Way higher education initiative in partnership with the city of Federal Way and the University of Washington Tacoma campus.

(16) $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for Peninsula College to maintain the annual cohorts of the specified programs as follows:

(a) Medical assisting, 40 students;

(b) Nursing assistant, 60 students; and

(c) Registered nursing, 32 students.

(17) $338,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $338,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Washington state labor education and research center at South Seattle College.

(18) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the aerospace and advanced manufacturing center of excellence hosted by Everett Community College to develop a semiconductor and electronics manufacturing branch in Vancouver.

(19) $15,220,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for employee compensation, academic program enhancements, student support services, and other institutional priorities that maintain a quality academic experience for Washington students.

(20) $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $75,847,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation are provided solely for statewide implementation of guided pathways at each of the state's community and technical colleges or similar programs designed to improve student success, including, but not limited to, academic program redesign, student advising, and other student supports.

(21) $40,800,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to continue to fund nurse educator salaries.

(22) $40,000,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided to continue to fund high-demand program faculty salaries, including but not limited to nurse educators, other health-related professions, information technology, computer science, and trades.

(23) $8,000,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the state board for community and technical colleges to maintain high-demand and career launch enrollments, as provided under RCW 28C.30.020. Within the amounts provided in this subsection (23):

(a) $6,000,000 of the amounts in this subsection (23) are provided to maintain career launch enrollments, as provided under RCW 28C.30.020.

(b) $2,000,000 of the amounts in this subsection (23) are provided to maintain enrollments in high demand programs. These programs include, but are not limited to, allied health, computer and information science, manufacturing, and other fields identified by the state board for community and technical colleges.

(24) $8,000,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the emergency assistance grant program in RCW 28B.50.295.

(25) $3,534,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,925,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of diversity, equity, inclusion, and antiracism provisions in chapter 28B.10 RCW.

(26) $4,725,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $4,525,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $15,848,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of equity and access provisions in chapter 28B.50 RCW.

(27)(a) $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to promote workforce development in trucking and trucking-related supply chain industries and the school bus driving industry by expanding the number of registered apprenticeships, preapprenticeships, and trucking related training programs; and providing support for registered apprenticeships or programs in trucking and trucking-related supply chain industries and the school bus driving industry.

(b) Grants awarded under this subsection may be used for:

(i) Equipment upgrades or new equipment purchases for training purposes;

(ii) New training spaces and locations to support capacity needs and expansion of training to veterans and veteran spouses, and underserved populations to include foster care and homeless transition populations and previously incarcerated persons;

(iii) Faculty curriculum development and instructor training for driving, repair, and service of technological advancements facing the industries;

(iv) Tuition assistance for commercial vehicle driver and related supply chain industry training, fees associated with driver testing, and other reasonable and necessary student support services, including child care costs; and

(v) Fees and other reasonable costs associated with commercial truck driving examiner training and certification.

(c) An entity is eligible to receive a grant if it is a nonprofit, nongovernmental, or institution of primary or higher education that provides training opportunities, including apprenticeships, preapprenticeships, preemployment training, commercial vehicle driver training and testing, or vocational training related to mechanical and support functions that support the trucking industry or the school bus driving industry; or incumbent worker training to prepare workers for the trucking and trucking-related supply chain industries or the school bus driving industry. Preference will be given to entities in compliance with government approved or accredited programs. Reporting requirements, as determined by the board, shall be required.

(d) The board may use up to five percent of funds for administration of grants.

(28)(a) $9,336,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to expand cybersecurity academic enrollments by 500 FTE students.

(b) The state board for community and technical colleges must coordinate with the student achievement council as provided in section 611(7) of this act to submit a progress report on the new or expanded cybersecurity academic programs, including the number of students enrolled.

(29) $2,068,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,068,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for legal services related to litigation by employees within the community and technical college system challenging the denial of retirement and sick leave benefits. The cases include Wolf v. State and SBCTC, Rush v. State and SBCTC (retirement), and Rush v. State and SBCTC (sick leave).

(30) $4,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $4,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the opportunity grant program to provide health care workforce grants for students.

(31) $2,720,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,720,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for each community and technical college to contract with a community-based organization to assist with financial aid access and support in communities.

(32) $3,456,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the expansion of existing programming to accommodate refugees and immigrants who have arrived in Washington state on or after July 1, 2021, and are eligible for federal refugee resettlement services, including those from Afghanistan and Ukraine.

(33)(a) $2,160,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,160,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $3,600,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation are provided solely for nursing education, to increase the number of nursing slots by at least 400 new slots in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium.

(b) The state board for community and technical colleges must coordinate with the student achievement council as provided in section 611(7) of this act to submit a progress report on the new or expanded nursing academic programs, including the number of students enrolled per program.

(34)(a) $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for a pilot program to help students, including those enrolled in state registered apprenticeship programs, connect with health care coverage. The state board for community and technical colleges must provide resources for up to two community or technical colleges, one on the east side and one on the west side of the Cascade mountains, to hire or train an employee to:

(i) Provide information to students and college staff about available health insurance options;

(ii) Develop culturally relevant materials and conduct outreach for historically marginalized and underserved student populations to assist these populations in their knowledge of access to low cost or free health insurance plans;

(iii) Provide ongoing technical assistance to students about health insurance options or the health insurance application process; and

(iv) Provide technical assistance to students as a health benefit exchange certified assister, to help students understand, shop, apply, and enroll in health insurance through Washington health planfinder.

(b) Participation in the exchange assister program is contingent on fulfilling applicable contracting, security, and other program requirements.

(c) The state board, in collaboration with the student achievement council and the health benefit exchange, must submit a report by June 30, 2024, to the appropriate committees of the legislature, pursuant to RCW 43.01.036, on information about barriers students, including those enrolled in state registered apprenticeship programs, encountered accessing health insurance coverage; and to provide recommendations on how to improve student access to health coverage based on data gathered from the pilot program.

(35) $37,239,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for institution compensation costs in recognition that these costs exceed estimated increases in undergraduate operating fee revenue.

(36) $200,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the state board for community and technical colleges to work with interested parties, such as local law enforcement agencies, the department of corrections, representatives of county or city jail facilities, the Washington state patrol, Washington community and technical colleges, and other organizations and entities as appropriate to assess the recruitment and retention challenges for their agencies and develop recommendations to meet the workforce needs. These recommendations should focus on education and training programs that meet the needs of law enforcement and corrections agencies and must include an outreach strategy designed to inform and attract students in non-traditional program pathways. The assessment and recommendations shall be provided in a report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by October 1, 2024.

(37) $11,400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $11,400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for preventative maintenance support.

(38) $954,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,068,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of state registered apprenticeship provisions in chapter 28B.124 RCW.

(39) $3,735,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,735,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5048 (college in high school fees). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(40) $293,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $589,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5582 (nurse supply). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(41) $1,250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $5,046,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5702 (student homelessness pilot). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse. Of the amount provided in this subsection, $1,250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for establishing a subsidized housing or housing voucher program.

(42) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for Bellingham technical college to contract with a nonprofit organization located in Whatcom county that focuses on working waterfronts to build on start-up efforts, provide a solid foundation, and grow the northwest maritime apprenticeship program.

(43) $631,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $631,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the centers of excellence.

(44) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the state board for community and technical colleges shall develop a plan that includes the cost to provide compensation to part-time and adjunct faculty that equals or exceeds 85 percent of the compensation provided to comparably qualified full-time and tenured faculty by the 2026-27 academic year. The plan must be submitted to the governor and the higher education committees of the legislature, in accordance with RCW 43.01.036, by July 1, 2024.

(45)(a) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to nonprofit organizations for the purpose of expanding meatcutter registered apprenticeship and pre-apprenticeship programs to new locations; and developing a new fishmonger registered apprenticeship program.

(b) Grants awarded under this section may be used for:

(i) Equipment upgrades or new equipment purchases for training purposes;

(ii) New training space and lab locations to support the expansion and establishment of apprenticeship and pre-apprenticeship training in new locations;

(iii) Curriculum development, including the creation of e-learning content, and instructor training for apprenticeship and pre-apprenticeship instructors;

(iv) Tuition assistance for apprentices in registered apprenticeship programs accredited by a community or technical college;

(v) Stipends for pre-apprentices; and

(vi) Apprenticeship and pre-apprenticeship coordination and administration services.

(c) An entity is eligible to receive a grant under this subsection if it is a nonprofit organization that administers or directly provides apprenticeship and pre-apprenticeship training opportunities, overseen by a committee with at least one labor union and one employer representative or with an active program with participation of both labor union and employer partners, for retail meatcutters, fishmongers, or both.

(d) The board may use up to 5 percent of funds for administration of grants.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 605. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$495,524,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$459,323,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,646,000

Climate Commitment Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$300,000

Natural Climate Solutions Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$537,000

University of Washington Building Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,546,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$39,643,000

Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,127,000

Biotoxin Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$632,000

Dedicated Cannabis Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2024)
. . . .
$357,000

Dedicated Cannabis Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2025)
. . . .
$369,000

Accident Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$8,586,000

Medical Aid Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$8,025,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$88,875,000

Geoduck Aquaculture Research Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$414,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal

Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$50,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,158,904,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $49,289,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $50,374,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.

(2) $10,000,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for the family medicine residency network at the university to maintain and expand the number of residency slots available in Washington.

(3) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in computer science and engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in computer science and engineering programs above the prior academic year.

(4) $14,000,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for the expansion of degrees in the department of computer science and engineering at the Seattle campus.

(5) $3,062,000 of the economic development strategic reserve account—state appropriation is provided solely to support the joint center for aerospace innovation technology.

(6) The University of Washington shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

(7) $7,345,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $7,345,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the continued operations and expansion of the Washington, Wyoming, Alaska, Montana, Idaho medical school program.

(8) $2,625,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,625,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the institute for stem cell and regenerative medicine. Funds appropriated in this subsection must be dedicated to research utilizing pluripotent stem cells and related research methods.

(9) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided to the University of Washington to support youth and young adults experiencing homelessness in the university district of Seattle. Funding is provided for the university to work with community service providers and university colleges and departments to plan for and implement a comprehensive one-stop center with navigation services for homeless youth; the university may contract with the department of commerce to expand services that serve homeless youth in the university district.

(10) $1,800,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,800,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the adult psychiatry residency program at the University of Washington to offer additional residency positions that are approved by the accreditation council for graduate medical education.

(11) $172,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $172,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a University of Washington study in the south Cascades to determine current wolf use and density, and to gather baseline data to understand the effects of wolf recolonization on predator-prey dynamics of species that currently have established populations in the area.

(a) The study objectives shall include:

(i) Determination of whether wolves have started to recolonize a 5,000 square kilometer study area in the south Cascades of Washington, and if so, an assessment of their distribution over the landscape as well as their health and pregnancy rates;

(ii) Baseline data collection, if wolves have not yet established pack territories in this portion of the state, that will allow for the assessment of how the functional densities and diets of wolves across the landscape will affect the densities and diets in the following predators and prey: Coyote, cougar, black bear, bobcat, red fox, wolverine, elk, white tailed deer, mule deer, moose, caribou, and snowshoe hare;

(iii) Examination of whether the microbiome of each species changes as wolves start to occupy suitable habitat; and

(iv) An assessment of the use of alternative wildlife monitoring tools to cost-effectively monitor size of the wolf population over the long-term.

(b) A report on the findings of the study shall be shared with the Washington department of fish and wildlife.

(12) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the University of Washington's psychiatry integrated care training program.

(13) $640,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $640,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for child and adolescent psychiatry residency positions that are approved by the accreditation council for graduate medical education, as provided in RCW 28B.20.445.

(14) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the University of Washington School of Dentistry to support its role as a major oral health provider to individuals covered by medicaid and the uninsured.

(15) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the pre-law pipeline and social justice program at the University of Washington-Tacoma.

(16) $226,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $226,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the university's neurology department to create a telemedicine program to disseminate dementia care best practices to primary care practitioners using the project ECHO model. The program shall provide a virtual connection for providers and content experts and include didactics, case conferences, and an emphasis on practice transformation and systems-level issues that affect care delivery. The initial users of this program shall include referral sources in health care systems and clinics, such as the university's neighborhood clinics and Virginia Mason Memorial in Yakima with a goal of adding 15 to 20 providers from smaller clinics and practices per year.

(17) $277,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $277,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the university's center for international trade in forest products.

(18) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Latino center for health.

(19) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a firearm policy research program. The program will:

(a) Support investigations of firearm death and injury risk factors;

(b) Evaluate the effectiveness of state firearm laws and policies;

(c) Assess the consequences of firearm violence; and

(d) Develop strategies to reduce the toll of firearm violence to citizens of the state.

(20) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the climate impacts group in the college of the environment.

(21) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the college of education to collaborate with teacher preparation programs and the office of the superintendent of public instruction to develop open access climate science educational curriculum for use in teacher preparation programs.

(22) $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Harry Bridges center for labor studies. The center shall work in collaboration with the state board for community and technical colleges.

(23) $8,000,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for employee compensation, academic program enhancements, student support services, and other institutional priorities that maintain a quality academic experience for Washington students.

(24) $8,000,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to maintain degree production in the college of engineering at the Seattle campus.

(25)(a) $1,000,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to maintain the Washington state academic redshirt program.

(b) By December 1, 2023, the university must report to the appropriate committees of the legislature, pursuant to RCW 43.01.036, on the redshirt program including, but not limited to, the following:

(i) The number of students who have enrolled in the program and the number of students by cohort;

(ii) The number of students who have completed the program and the number of students by cohort;

(iii) The placements of students by academic major;

(iv) The number of students placed in first-choice majors;

(v) The number of underrepresented minority students in the program;

(vi) The number of first-generation college students in the program;

(vii) The number of Washington college grant eligible or Pell grant eligible students in the program;

(viii) The number of Washington state opportunity scholarship recipients in the program;

(ix) The number of students who completed the program and graduated with a science, technology, engineering, or math related degree and the number of graduates by cohort; and

(x) Other program outcomes.

(26) $2,700,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to maintain degree capacity and undergraduate enrollments in engineering, mathematics, and science programs to support the biomedical innovation partnership zone at the Bothell campus.

(27) $3,268,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to maintain bachelor of science programs in mechanical and civil engineering to support increased student and local employer demand for graduates in these fields at the Tacoma campus.

(28) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a community care coordinator for transitional-age youth for the doorway project in partnership with the Seattle campus.

(29) $14,000,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the expansion of the Paul G. Allen school of computer science and engineering in order to award an additional 200 degrees per year focusing on traditionally underrepresented students. A report on degrees awarded must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2024, and June 30, 2025.

(30) To ensure transparency and accountability, in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium the University of Washington shall comply with any and all financial and accountability audits by the Washington state auditor including any and all audits of university services offered to the general public, including those offered through any public-private partnership, business venture, affiliation, or joint venture with a public or private entity, except the government of the United States. The university shall comply with all state auditor requests for the university's financial and business information including the university's governance and financial participation in these public-private partnerships, business ventures, affiliations, or joint ventures with a public or private entity. In any instance in which the university declines to produce the information to the state auditor, the university will provide the state auditor a brief summary of the documents withheld and a citation of the legal or contractual provision that prevents disclosure. The summaries must be compiled into a report by the state auditor and provided on a quarterly basis to the legislature.

(31) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Burke museum of natural history and culture to make education programs offered by the museum accessible to more students across Washington, especially students in underserved schools and locations. The funding shall be used for:

(a) Increasing the number of students who participate in Burke education programs at reduced or no cost, including virtual programs;

(b) Providing bus reimbursement for students visiting the museum on field trips and to support travel to bring museum programs across the state; and

(c) Staff who will form partnerships with school districts to serve statewide communities more efficiently and equitably, including through the Burkemobile program.

(32) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Burke museum to support tribal consultation work. The funding shall be used to engage in tribal relations work including, but not limited to, tribal consultation, expanding Native programming, and digitization of Native collections.

(33) $410,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $410,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the university's center for human rights. The appropriation must be used to supplement, not supplant, other funding sources for the center for human rights.

(34) $143,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $143,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to the University of Washington for the operation of the state forensic anthropologist. The university shall work in conjunction with and provide the full funding directly to the King county medical examiner's office to support the statewide work of the state forensic anthropologist.

(35) $64,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $64,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for one full-time mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW who has experience and training specifically related to working with active members of the military or military veterans.

(36) $443,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $443,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the operation of the center for environmental forensic science.

(37) $557,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $557,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of diversity, equity, inclusion, and antiracism provisions in chapter 28B.10 RCW.

(38) $1,250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation are provided solely for the community-engagement test to facilitate clean energy transitions by partnering with communities, utilities, and project developers.

(39) $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for staffing and operational expenditures related to the battery fabrication testbed.

(40) $505,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $505,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for pharmacy behavioral health. The University of Washington school of pharmacy/medicine pharmacy services will hire two residency training positions and one behavioral health faculty to create a residency program focused on behavioral health.

(41) $1,613,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and 1,613,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for an increase in the number of nursing slots and graduates in the already established accelerated bachelor of science in nursing program. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $273,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $273,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Tacoma school of nursing and healthcare leadership.

(42) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the memory and brain wellness center to support the statewide expansion of the dementia friends program.

(43)(a) $77,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $77,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to maintain a data repository to assist the state and all political subdivisions with evaluating whether and to what extent existing laws and practices with respect to voting and elections are consistent with public policy, implementing best practices in voting and elections, and to investigate potential infringements upon the right to vote.

(b) The operation of the repository shall be the responsibility of the director of the repository who shall be employed by the University of Washington with doctoral level expertise in demography, statistical analysis, and electoral systems. The director shall be appointed by the governor. The director shall appoint necessary staff to maintain the repository.

(c) The repository shall maintain in electronic format at least the following data and records, where available, for at least the previous 12-year period:

(i) Estimates of the total population, voting age population, and citizen voting age population by race, ethnicity, and language-minority groups, broken down to the election district and precinct level on a year-by-year basis for every political subdivision in the state, based on data from the United States census bureau, American community survey, or data of comparable quality collected by a public office;

(ii) Election results at the precinct level for every statewide election and every election in every political subdivision;

(iii) Regularly updated voter registration lists, voter history files, voting center locations, ballot drop box locations, and student engagement hub locations for every election in every political subdivision;

(iv) Contemporaneous maps, descriptions of boundaries, and shapefiles for election districts and precincts;

(v) Ballot rejection lists, curing lists, and reasoning for ballot rejection for every election in every political subdivision;

(vi) Apportionment plans for every election in every political subdivision; and

(vii) Any other data that the director deems advisable.

(d) The director shall update the data in the repository no later than 30 business days after certification of each election as required by RCW 29A.60.190 or 29A.60.250.

(e) Except for any data, information, or estimates that identifies individual voters, the data, information, and estimates maintained by the repository shall be posted online and made available to the public at no cost.

(f) The repository shall prepare any estimates made pursuant to this subsection by applying the most advanced, peer-reviewed, and validated methodologies.

(g) Upon the certification of election results and the completion of the voter history file after each election, the secretary of state shall transmit copies of:

(i) Election results at the election district level;

(ii) Contemporaneous voter registration lists;

(iii) Voter history files;

(iv) Maps, descriptions, and shapefiles for election districts; and

(v) Lists of voting centers and student engagement hubs.

(h) Staff at the repository may provide nonpartisan technical assistance to political subdivisions, scholars, and the general public seeking to use the resources of the repository.

(44) $122,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $122,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for sexual assault nurse examiner training.

(45) $120,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $120,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of RCW 43.60A.260.

(46) $22,793,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for institution compensation costs in recognition that these costs exceed estimated increases in undergraduate operating fee revenue.

(47) $1,869,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,738,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for operations and maintenance support of the behavioral health teaching faculty.

(48) $2,375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $4,183,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the behavioral health teaching faculty physician and facility support.

(49) $12,913,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $12,913,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for preventative maintenance support.

(50) $2,854,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the expansion of computing and engineering programs at the Tacoma campus in order to award an additional 55 degrees per year.

(51)(a) $1,724,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for a program modeled after the redshirt program at the Seattle campus, to provide additional student support for traditionally underrepresented students who intend to major in computer science related programs at the Bothell campus.

(b) By December 1, 2024, the university must submit a progress report on the program to the appropriate committees of the legislature, pursuant to RCW 43.01.036, including, but not limited to, the following:

(i) The number of students enrolled in the program;

(ii) The number of traditionally underrepresented students in the program;

(iii) The number of first-generation college students in the program;

(iv) The number of Washington college grant eligible or Pell eligible students in the program;

(v) The number of Washington state opportunity scholarship recipients in the program; and

(vi) Program outcomes.

(52) $300,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Washington ocean acidification center to maintain current levels of ship-based monitoring, process existing seawater samples, and expand conferences and science-synthesis activities to address barriers for tribes and affected communities on Washington's coast.

(53) $520,000 of the natural climate solutions account—state appropriation is provided solely to support the Washington ocean acidification center to advance high-priority biological experiments.

(54) $1,644,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,644,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5048 (college in high school fees). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(55) $96,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $61,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5189 (behavioral health support). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(56) $174,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5094 (water system plans/climate). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(57) $686,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $669,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5388 (diversity in clinical trials). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(58) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Washington mathematics, engineering, science achievement (MESA) programs to provide enrichment opportunities in mathematics, engineering, science, and technology to students who are traditionally underrepresented in these programs.

(59) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Washington MESA program and Washington State University Everett to plan and implement expansion of MESA activities at the Everett campus to facilitate increased attendance and degree completion by students who are underrepresented in science, technology, engineering, and mathematics degrees.

(60) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for one head archivist for the labor archives of Washington and reserved solely for labor archives activities, staffing, supplies, and equipment. The head will determine budget priorities and oversee expenditures on the budget. Budget funds will be reserved solely for the labor archives and shall not be used to supplant or supplement other activities of the University of Washington libraries unrelated to the collections and activities of the labor archives. The university and the head shall work in collaboration with the friends of the labor archives community advisory board.

(61) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to the University of Washington for the operation of a pilot plant to produce nanocellulose based materials for evaluation by potential users, such as packaging manufacturers and companies that produce polylactic acid composites.

(62) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the continuation of the collaborative for the advancement of telemedicine, hosted by the institution's telehealth services, through June 30, 2025.

(63) $523,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $715,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to establish washpop, a statewide integrated data repository for population and policy research on topics, including criminal justice and safety, economic prosperity and equity, and health and social well-being.

(64) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the center for indigenous health to increase the number of American Indian and Alaska Native physicians practicing in the state of Washington.

(65) $242,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $242,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to the university for Friday harbor labs in the amount of $125,000 each fiscal year and the school of aquatic and fishery sciences in the amount of $117,000 each fiscal year to perform coordinating, monitoring, and research related to Puget Sound kelp conservation and recovery.

(66) $205,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the University of Washington to organize and facilitate the difficult to discharge task force described in section 135(12) of this act and its operations, including any associated ad hoc subgroups, through October 31, 2023.

(67) $50,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $50,000,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation for fiscal year 2024 are provided solely to support the operations and teaching mission of the University of Washington medical center and harborview medical center.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 606. FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$279,295,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$287,130,000

Climate Commitment Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$7,721,000

Washington State University Building Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$792,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$33,995,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,771,000

Dedicated Cannabis Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2024)
. . . .
$188,000

Dedicated Cannabis Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2025)
. . . .
$194,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$48,135,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$660,221,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a rural economic development and outreach coordinator.

(2) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in computer science and engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in computer science and engineering programs above the prior academic year.

(3) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for state match requirements related to the federal aviation administration grant.

(4) Washington State University shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletic programs.

(5) $7,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $7,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $22,800,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation are provided solely for the continued development and operations of a medical school program in Spokane.

(6) $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a honey bee biology research position.

(7) $35,037,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $35,808,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.

(8) $580,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $580,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the development of an organic agriculture systems degree program located at the university center in Everett.

(9) $630,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $630,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the creation of an electrical engineering program located in Bremerton. At full implementation, the university is expected to increase degree production by 25 new bachelor's degrees per year. The university must identify these students separately when providing data to the education research data center as required in subsection (2) of this section.

(10) $1,370,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,370,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the creation of software engineering and data analytic programs at the university center in Everett. At full implementation, the university is expected to enroll 50 students per academic year. The university must identify these students separately when providing data to the education research data center as required in subsection (2) of this section.

(11) General fund—state appropriations in this section are reduced to reflect a reduction in state-supported tuition waivers for graduate students. When reducing tuition waivers, the university will not change its practices and procedures for providing eligible veterans with tuition waivers.

(12) $1,154,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,154,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for RCW 82.16.120 and 82.16.165.

(13) $376,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $376,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for RCW 28B.30.357.

(14) $585,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $585,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for RCW 77.12.272.

(15) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the joint center for deployment and research in earth abundant materials.

(16) $2,076,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for the university's soil health initiative and its network of long-term agroecological research and extension (LTARE) sites. The network must include a Mount Vernon REC site.

(17) $42,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $42,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for one full-time mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW who has experience and training specifically related to working with active members of the military or military veterans.

(18) $327,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $327,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for pharmacy behavioral health. Washington State University college of pharmacy and pharmaceutical sciences will hire two residency training positions and one behavioral health faculty to create a residency program focused on behavioral health.

(19) $5,202,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for institution compensation costs in recognition that these costs exceed estimated increases in undergraduate operating fee revenue.

(20) $608,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $608,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Washington state academy of sciences to provide support for core operations and to accomplish its mission of providing science in the service of Washington, pursuant to its memorandum of understanding with the university.

(21) $188,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $188,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for stormwater research to study the long-term efficacy of green stormwater infrastructure that incorporates compost to remove pollutants.

(22) $4,112,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to maintain a bachelor's degree in cybersecurity operations.

(23) $7,721,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the creation of the institute for northwest energy futures.

(24) $3,910,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to increase nurse educator salaries.

(25) $476,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for nursing program equipment.

(26) $1,130,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for a bachelor of science in public health degree at the Pullman campus.

(27) $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for operations support of the William D. Ruckleshaus Center.

(28) $5,058,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $5,057,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for preventative maintenance support.

(29) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5287 (wind turbine blades). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(30) $44,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $49,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5388 (diversity in clinical trials). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(31) $2,425,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the development and operations of a journalism fellowship program focused on civic affairs.

(32) $200,000 of general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for Washington State University extension service to hire a qualified contractor to assess program performance of the northeast Washington wolf-livestock management grant program as provided in RCW 16.76.020 and recipients of pass-through grants from the northeast Washington wolf-livestock management nonappropriated account. The program must be assessed for the period of 2021-2023 as to whether grant recipients met the intent of the appropriation.

(a) For recipients of grant funds from the program authorized in RCW 16.76.020, performance must be evaluated on the deployment of nonlethal deterrence, specifically with the goal to reduce the likelihood of cattle being injured or killed by wolves by deploying proactive, preventative methods that have a good probability of producing effective results. Grantees who use funds for range riders or herd monitoring must deploy this tool in a manner so that targeted areas with cattle are visited daily or near daily. Grantees must collaborate with other entities providing prevention efforts resulting in coordinated wolf-livestock conflict deterrence efforts, both temporally and spatially, therefore providing well timed and placed preventative coverage on the landscape.

(b) For recipient of the pass-through funds from the northeast Washington wolf-livestock management nonappropriated account, performance must be based on the intent of conducting proactive deterrence activities with the goal to reduce the likelihood of cattle being injured or killed by wolves.

(c) The contractor must have at least five years of experience in the combination of field work as a range rider and running range riding programs in areas with wolf-livestock conflict in the western United States. In conducting the assessment, the contractor may access written range rider logs and georeferenced data produced by the grant recipients, in addition to reading annual reports of the recipients and interviewing relevant participants. The contractor may also provide general recommendations for improvement of programs intended to provide effective wolf-livestock deterrence, taking into account the terrain and other challenges faced in northeast Washington. The contractor must complete their assessment for Washington State University extension service to be delivered to the legislature by June 30, 2024.

(33) $695,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for turf grass resilience research in high traffic areas.

(34)(a) $95,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the William D. Ruckelshaus center to conduct a jail modernization task force convening assessment and design a facilitated collaborative process and work plan for the jail modernization task force created in section 917 of this act. The assessment shall include, but not be limited to:

(i) Gathering and reviewing additional background information relevant to the project;

(ii) Meeting and consulting with the Washington state association of counties to gather background on issues, confirm the list of members to interview, and provide updates throughout the duration of the work; and meeting and consulting with the Washington state institute for public policy to coordinate, inform, and share information and findings gathered; and

(iii) Setting up individual conversations with task force members, and others as needed, to assess their goals, expectations, interests, and desired outcomes for the task force. The purpose of these conversations will also be to gather insights and perspectives from members about, but not limited to, the following:

(A) What key components and issues should be included in a statewide jail modernization plan, what existing facilities are in need of upgrades or remodel, and any need for building new facilities;

(B) Identifying any additional key stakeholders;

(C) Employee retention issues and potential solutions;

(D) The impact of overtime, jail atmosphere, emergency response time, inexperienced corrections officers, and how to overcome these challenges;

(E) The type of and design of facilities needed to house those with behavioral health needs and associated costs of these facilities;

(F) Available diversion programs and their costs;

(G) Types of existing behavioral health facilities for those involved in the criminal justice system, the costs of building and running these facilities, how these facilities vary by location, the viability of offering facilities in every county, and potential system improvements to the types of services and supports offered and delivered to those with behavioral health needs;

(H) The types of services and supports provided to those exiting the jail system; and

(I) Reforms necessary to create and enhance a seamless transition back to the community following jail confinement.

(b) Center staff will provide a convening assessment report that will include the overall process design and work plan for the task force by June 30, 2025.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 607. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$68,562,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$70,392,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$16,838,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$19,784,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$175,576,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) At least $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and at least $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 must be expended on the Northwest autism center.

(2) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in computer science and engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in computer science and engineering programs above the prior academic year.

(3) Eastern Washington University shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

(4) $12,586,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $12,862,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.

(5) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the university is encouraged to increase the number of tenure-track positions created and hired.

(6) $2,636,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to maintain a computer engineering degree program in the college of science, technology, engineering, and math.

(7) $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for one full-time mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW who has experience and training specifically related to working with active members of the military or military veterans.

(8) $300,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to operate a center for inclusive excellence for faculty and staff.

(9) $110,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $110,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a summer bridge program.

(10) $536,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for a professional masters of science cyber operations degree option.

(11) $2,144,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the operation of a bachelor of science in cybersecurity degree option through the computer science program.

(12) $2,108,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the operation of a coordinated care network that will help to maximize the collaboration of various student support services to create wraparound care for students to address obstacles to degree completion. The amount provided in this subsection must be used to supplement, not supplant, other funding sources for the program.

(13) $1,348,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for institution compensation costs in recognition that these costs exceed estimated increases in undergraduate operating fee revenue.

(14) $8,438,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to fully launch the bachelor of science in nursing program.

(15) $1,109,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,109,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for preventative maintenance support.

(16) $2,750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5048 (college in high school fees). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(17) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to Eastern Washington University for the purpose of providing professional practice planning classes to assist cities and counties with planning projects while creating hands-on learning opportunities for planning students.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 608. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$73,619,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$76,190,000

Central Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$76,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$19,076,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$7,847,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$176,808,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in engineering programs above the prior academic year.

(2) Central Washington University shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

(3) $14,186,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $14,498,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.

(4) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the university is encouraged to increase the number of tenure-track positions created and hired.

(5) $736,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to maintain mental health counseling positions.

(6) $240,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $240,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for two counselor positions to increase access to mental health counseling for traditionally underrepresented students.

(7) $52,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $52,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for one full-time mental health outreach and service coordination position who has knowledge of issues relevant to veterans.

(8) $1,050,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to increase the number of certified K-12 teachers.

(9) $240,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for expanding cybersecurity capacity by adding additional faculty resources in the department of computer science.

(10) $586,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for a peer mentoring program. The amount provided in this subsection must be used to supplement, not supplant, other funding sources for the program.

(11) $286,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the operation of an extended orientation program to help promote retention of underserved students. The amount provided in this subsection must be used to supplement, not supplant, other funding sources for the program.

(12) $1,246,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for institution compensation costs in recognition that these costs exceed estimated increases in undergraduate operating fee revenue.

(13) $967,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for grow your own teacher residency programs in high need areas of elementary, bilingual, special education, and English language learners.

(14) $1,211,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,211,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for preventative maintenance support.

(15) $500,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for student academic success support.

(16) $4,433,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $4,433,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5048 (college in high school fees). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(17) $18,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $18,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5238 (academic employee bargaining). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(18) $12,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $12,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the cost of the criminal justice training center's use of office and classroom space at the Lynnwood campus.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 609. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$38,993,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$38,464,000

The Evergreen State College Capital Projects

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$80,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$5,450,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,460,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$87,447,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $4,315,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $4,410,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.

(2) Funding provided in this section is sufficient for The Evergreen State College to continue operations of the Longhouse Center and the Northwest Indian applied research institute.

(3) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the college is encouraged to increase the number of tenure-track positions created and hired.

(4) $3,682,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,614,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Washington state institute for public policy to initiate, sponsor, conduct, and publish research that is directly useful to policymakers and manage reviews and evaluations of technical and scientific topics as they relate to major long-term issues facing the state. Within the amounts provided in this subsection (4):

(a) $1,665,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2024 and $1,685,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2025 are provided for administration and core operations.

(b) $1,229,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2024 and $529,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for ongoing and continuing studies on the Washington state institute for public policy's work plan.

(c)(i) $240,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2024 and $240,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Washington state institute for public policy, in consultation with the Washington traumatic brain injury strategic partnership advisory council, to study the potential need for developing specialized long-term services and supports for adults with traumatic brain injuries.

(ii) At a minimum, the study must include an examination of:

(A) The demographics of adults with traumatic brain injuries in the state who are anticipated to be in need of long-term services and supports, including an examination of those who are likely to be eligible for medicaid long-term services and supports;

(B) The industry standards of providing long-term care services and supports to individuals with traumatic brain injuries; and

(C) The methods other states are utilizing to provide long-term services and supports to individuals with traumatic brain injuries, including identifying the rates paid for these services and a description of any specialized facilities established to deliver these services.

(iii) A report of the findings of this study and any recommendations for increasing access to appropriate long-term services and supports for individuals with traumatic brain injuries shall be submitted to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than June 30, 2025.

(d) $163,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2024 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5236 (hospital staffing standards). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(e)(i) $183,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2024 and $80,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Washington state institute for public policy to conduct a study of the county jail system. The goal of the study is to: Establish a baseline understanding of the costs associated with operating, maintaining, and providing services in county jails; identify how county jail populations have changed over time; and assess how outside entities and policies impact county jails.

(ii) The institute's report shall include, to the extent possible, consideration of the following:

(A) A longitudinal study of how the county jail population has changed over the last 12 years including, but not limited to, an analysis of demographics, physical and behavioral health issues, number of inmates, and types of convictions;

(B) An analysis of county jail survey data provided by the Washington state association of counties as described in (e)(v) of this subsection; and

(C) Examination of the availability of criminal justice training commission classes for corrections officers.

(iii) The health care authority, department of social and health services, administrative office of the courts, criminal justice training commission, state auditor's office, office of financial management, and Washington state patrol must provide the institute with access to data or other resources if necessary to complete this work.

(iv) The institute shall submit the report to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the governor by December 1, 2024.

(v) As part of the study, the institute shall contract with the Washington state association of counties to conduct a survey of jail facilities in Washington state. The survey shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(A) Age of the facilities;

(B) Age of systems within the facilities;

(C) Cost of remodeling facilities;

(D) Cost of building new facilities;

(E) General maintenance costs of the facilities;

(F) Operational costs of the facilities;

(G) Jail workforce, to include, but not be limited to, employee vacancies as a percentage of total employees;

(H) Services, supports, and programming, to include, but not be limited to:

(I) Costs of housing those with behavioral health needs;

(II) Number of incarcerated individuals with behavioral health needs;

(III) Cost of competency restoration in jails;

(IV) Physical health services and related costs;

(V) Number of inmates booked and housed on behalf of state agencies; and

(VI) Percent of jail inmates waiting for a state hospital; and

(I) Funding sources, to include, but not be limited to:

(I) County tax structure and revenue raising ability; and

(II) Jail funding sources.

(vi) The Washington state association of counties shall consult with the Washington state institute for public policy during the design and distribution of the survey. Responses to the survey shall be compiled and provided to the Washington state institute for public policy by December 31, 2023.

(f) $202,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2024 and $80,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Washington state institute for public policy to update its adult corrections inventory of evidence-based, research-based, and promising programs and expand the inventory to include new programs that were not included in the last published Washington state institute for public policy inventory in 2018. This update must focus on programs for incarcerated individuals in prison facilities to include family and relationships programs, learning and working programs, and therapeutic and support programs. The institute should prioritize the addition of programs currently offered by the Washington state department of corrections. Of this amount:

(i) No later than December 31, 2023, the institute shall publish a preliminary report identifying the list of programs currently offered in Washington state department of corrections prison facilities and the list of new programs to be analyzed for inclusion on the updated adult corrections inventory. The preliminary report must include an indication of whether the Washington state department of corrections programs have ever been evaluated for their effect on recidivism; and

(ii) No later than December 31, 2024, the institute shall publish a final report with the updated adult corrections inventory classifying programs as evidence-based, research-based, or promising programs. The report shall include a list of programs currently offered in Washington state department of corrections prison facilities and a determination of their likely effectiveness in reducing recidivism based on the results of the adult corrections inventory.

(g) Notwithstanding other provisions in this subsection, the board of directors for the Washington state institute for public policy may adjust due dates for projects included on the institute's 2023-25 work plan as necessary to efficiently manage workload.

(5) $670,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to maintain enrollment capacity in psychology programs.

(6) $600,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to increase student success by maintaining support for a student precollege immersion program and the Evergreen first-year experience.

(7) $213,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $213,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for additional faculty to support Native American and indigenous programs.

(8) $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to the native pathways program for an assistant director.

(9) $110,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $110,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a tribal liaison position.

(10) $39,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $39,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for one full-time mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW who has experience and training specifically related to working with active members of the military or military veterans.

(11) $137,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $137,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for student mental health and wellness. The amount provided in this subsection must be used to supplement, not supplant, other funding sources for the program.

(12) $196,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for additional laboratory, art, and media lab sections.

(13) $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to develop and expand current corrections education programs offered in department of corrections facilities. The college shall appoint a project implementation team, collaborate with stakeholders to plan student success programs and curriculum which lead to transferable credit, associate and bachelor's degrees, and other workforce credentials, and train faculty and staff on working with incarcerated populations.

(14) $440,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $440,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for preventative maintenance support.

(15) $348,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to expand incarcerated adult educational programs offered at department of corrections facilities and the gateways for incarcerated youth program.

(16) $206,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for reentry student support staff to provide a direct link between the college's educational programs and transitioning of formerly incarcerated students.

(17) $26,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $26,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5238 (academic employee bargaining). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 610. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$98,851,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$102,541,000

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,424,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$13,831,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$21,190,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$237,837,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in computer science and engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in computer science and engineering programs above the prior academic year.

(2) Western Washington University shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

(3) $19,580,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $20,010,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.

(4) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to recruit and retain high quality and diverse graduate students.

(5) $548,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $548,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for critical support services to ensure traditionally underrepresented students receive the same opportunities for academic success as their peers.

(6) $700,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $700,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the creation and implementation of an early childhood education degree program at the western on the peninsulas campus. The university must collaborate with Olympic college. At full implementation, the university is expected to grant approximately 75 bachelor's degrees in early childhood education per year at the western on the peninsulas campus.

(7) $1,306,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,306,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the university to develop a new program in marine, coastal, and watershed sciences.

(8) $886,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $886,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the university to reduce tuition rates for four-year degree programs offered in partnership with Olympic college—Bremerton, Olympic college—Poulsbo, and Peninsula college—Port Angeles that are currently above state-funded resident undergraduate tuition rates.

(9) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the university is encouraged to increase the number of tenure-track positions created and hired.

(10) $3,426,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to maintain access to science, technology, engineering, and mathematics degrees.

(11) $48,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $48,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for one full-time mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW who has experience and training specifically related to working with active members of the military or military veterans.

(12) $530,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $530,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the operation of two bilingual educator programs in the south King county region, including a bilingual elementary education degree program and a secondary education degree program. At full implementation, each cohort shall support up to 25 students per year.

(13) $908,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to maintain an academic curriculum in ethnic studies.

(14) $400,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for upgrading cyber range equipment and software.

(15) $2,520,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for student support services that include resources for outreach and financial aid support, retention initiatives including targeted support for underserved student populations, mental health support, and initiatives aimed at addressing learning disruption due to the global pandemic. The amount provided in this subsection must be used to supplement, not supplant, other funding sources for student support services.

(16) $361,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $361,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a master of science program in nursing.

(17) $433,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $433,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the registered nurse to bachelors in nursing program.

(18) $3,607,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for institution compensation costs in recognition that these costs exceed estimated increases in undergraduate operating fee revenue.

(19) $3,186,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to establish two plus two undergraduate degree programs in engineering, data science, and sociology at western on the peninsulas.

(20) $694,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to establish a master of social work program at western on the peninsulas.

(21) $580,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to convert the human services program at western on the peninsulas from self-sustaining to state-supported to reduce tuition rates for students in the program.

(22) $2,036,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for additional student support and outreach at western on the peninsulas.

(23) $1,807,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,807,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for preventative maintenance support.

(24) $507,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to expand first-year seminars and early start programs.

(25) $366,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to expand remedial and introductory math services.

(26) $352,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to expand remedial English 101 services.

(27) $352,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for two disability accommodation counselors at the disability access center.

(28) $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the replacement of information technology infrastructure.

(29) $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5238 (academic employee bargaining). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 611. FOR THE STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT COUNCIL—POLICY COORDINATION AND ADMINISTRATION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$10,069,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$10,420,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$21,002,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$12,132,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$53,623,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $126,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $126,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the consumer protection unit.

(2) The student achievement council must ensure that all institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.92.030 and eligible for state financial aid programs under chapters 28B.92 and 28B.118 RCW provide the data needed to analyze and evaluate the effectiveness of state financial aid programs. This data must be promptly transmitted to the education data center so that it is available and easily accessible.

(3) $575,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $575,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided to increase the number of high school seniors and college bound scholars that complete the free application for federal student aid and the Washington application for state financial aid through digital engagement tools, expanded training, and increased events for high school students.

(4) $2,000,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the career launch grant pool for the public four-year institutions.

(5) $850,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $850,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for administrative support services to carry out duties and responsibilities necessary for recipients of the Washington college grant who are enrolled in a state registered apprenticeship program.

(6)(a) $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for a pilot program to help students, including those enrolled in state registered apprenticeship programs, connect with health care coverage. The student achievement council, in cooperation with the council of presidents, must provide resources for up to two four-year colleges or universities, one on the east side and one on the west side of the Cascade mountains, to hire or train an employee to:

(i) Provide information to students and college and university staff about available health insurance options;

(ii) Develop culturally relevant materials and conduct outreach for historically marginalized and underserved student populations to assist these populations in their knowledge of access to low cost or free health insurance plans;

(iii) Provide ongoing technical assistance to students about health insurance options or the health insurance application process; and

(iv) Provide technical assistance to students as a health benefit exchange certified assister, to help students understand, shop, apply, and enroll in health insurance through Washington health planfinder.

(b) Participation in the exchange assister program is contingent on fulfilling applicable contracting, security, and other program requirements.

(c) The council, in collaboration with the council of presidents and the health benefit exchange, must submit a report by June 30, 2024, to the appropriate committees of the legislature, pursuant to RCW 43.01.036, on information about barriers students, including those enrolled in state registered apprenticeship programs, encountered accessing health insurance coverage; and to provide recommendations on how to improve student and staff access to health coverage based on data gathered from the pilot program.

(7) $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the council to submit a progress report on the new or expanded cybersecurity and nursing academic programs that receive funding in sections 604 through 610 of this act, including the number of students enrolled. The council must coordinate with the institutions of higher education and the state board for community and technical colleges as provided in sections 603(2), 604(28), and 604(33) of this act. The progress report must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature, pursuant to RCW 43.01.036, by December 1, 2024.

(8) Community-based organizations that receive state funding under subsection (11) of this section and section 604(31) of this act are not eligible for Washington career and college pathways innovation challenge program grant funding for the same purpose.

(9) $1,208,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,208,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Washington award for vocational excellence. Of the amount provided in this subsection, $70,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $70,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 may be used for administration and that is the maximum amount that may be expended for this purpose.

(10) $55,254,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for an annual bridge grant of $500 to eligible students. A student is eligible for a grant if the student receives a maximum college grant award and does not receive a college bound scholarship under chapter 28B.118 RCW. Bridge grant funding provides supplementary financial support to low-income students to cover higher education expenses.

(11) $5,778,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Washington student achievement council to contract with a statewide nonprofit organization located in King county to expand college services to support underserved students and improve college retention and completion rates.

(12) $46,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $46,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the state of Washington's annual dues to the education commission of the state.

(13) $356,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Washington student achievement council to staff the workforce education investment accountability and oversight board as provided in Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5534 (workforce investment board). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(14) $179,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $179,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the complete Washington program.

(15) $16,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the good jobs challenge grant.

(16) $108,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $756,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for distribution to four-year institutions of higher education and the tribal college participating in the students experiencing homelessness program without reduction by the Washington student achievement council, pursuant to Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5702 (student homelessness pilot). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(17) $72,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the administration of the students experiencing homelessness program pursuant to Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5702 (student homelessness pilot). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(18) $287,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $233,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5687 (wrestling grant program). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(19)(a) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely to contract with a nonprofit organization located in Tacoma that focuses on coordinated systems of support for postsecondary success to conduct a comprehensive study on the feasibility and potential impacts on postsecondary enrollment of a policy of universal free application for federal financial aid (FAFSA) completion. For purposes of this subsection, universal FAFSA completion means making completion of the financial aid form a requirement for high school graduation and requiring schools to support students through the process. The study will include, but is not limited to, the following:

(i) A landscape scan of existing state and local level universal FAFSA completion policies, both in Washington and nationally;

(ii) Input from key stakeholder groups, including students, parents, state agency staff, K-12 district staff and leadership, and student serving organizations; and

(iii) Recommendations for possible policy change at the state level.

(b) A report of findings and recommendations must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature pursuant to RCW 43.01.036 by November 30, 2023.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 612. FOR THE STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT COUNCIL—OFFICE OF STUDENT FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$220,266,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$215,016,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$12,232,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$300,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$85,488,000

Washington Opportunity Pathways Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$103,914,000

Aerospace Training Student Loan Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$220,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$363,292,000

Health Professionals Loan Repayment and Scholarship

Program Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,720,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,002,448,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $7,834,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $7,835,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for student financial aid payments under the state work study program, including up to four percent administrative allowance for the state work study program.

(2) $195,416,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $190,416,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, $296,772,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation, $69,639,000 of the education legacy trust fund—state appropriation, and $92,654,000 of the Washington opportunity pathways account—state appropriation are provided solely for the Washington college grant program as provided in RCW 28B.92.200.

(3) Changes made to the state work study program in the 2009-2011 and 2011-2013 fiscal biennia are continued in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium including maintaining the increased required employer share of wages; adjusted employer match rates; discontinuation of nonresident student eligibility for the program; and revising distribution methods to institutions by taking into consideration other factors such as off-campus job development, historical utilization trends, and student need.

(4) $1,165,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,165,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, $15,849,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation, and $11,260,000 of the Washington opportunity pathways account—state appropriation are provided solely for the college bound scholarship program and may support scholarships for summer session. The office of student financial assistance and the institutions of higher education shall not consider awards made by the opportunity scholarship program to be state-funded for the purpose of determining the value of an award amount under RCW 28B.118.010.

(5) $6,999,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $6,999,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the passport to college program. The maximum scholarship award is up to $5,000. The council shall contract with a nonprofit organization to provide support services to increase student completion in their postsecondary program and shall, under this contract, provide a minimum of $500,000 in fiscal years 2024 and 2025 for this purpose.

(6) $12,800,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5711 (college grant eligibility). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 613. FOR THE WORKFORCE TRAINING AND EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$5,896,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$5,469,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$55,851,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$212,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$10,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$67,438,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $240,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $240,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the health workforce council of the state workforce training and education coordinating board. In partnership with the office of the governor, the health workforce council shall continue to assess workforce shortages across behavioral health disciplines and incorporate the recommended action plan completed in 2020.

(2) $564,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $573,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to conduct health workforce surveys, in collaboration with the nursing care quality assurance commission, to collect and analyze data on the long-term care workforce, and to manage a stakeholder process to address retention and career pathways in long-term care facilities.

(3) $1,200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for apprenticeship grants, in collaboration with the nursing care quality assurance commission and the department of labor and industries, to address the long-term care workforce.

(4) $109,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $109,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for administrative expenditures for the Washington award for vocational excellence.

(5) $216,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $216,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a full-time information technology position to collaborate with other state workforce agencies to establish and support a governance structure that provides strategic direction on cross-organizational information technology projects. The board must submit a report to the governor's office and the appropriate committees of the legislature, pursuant to RCW 43.01.036, with a progress update and recommendations on a coalition model that will result in better service coordination and public stewardship that enables the efficient delivery of workforce development services by September 1, 2023, and September 1, 2024.

(6) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $181,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5582 (nurse supply). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(7) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the board to award grants to labor-management partnerships established under section 302 of the labor-management relations act, 29 U.S.C. Sec. 186, for the purposes of providing apprenticeship, industry certifications and wraparound student supports to workers pursuing job advancement and enhancement through college readiness, apprenticeship, degree, certification, or professional development opportunities. Grant recipients must demonstrate adequate funding match and competency in the provision of student supports. Preference must be given to applications that demonstrate an ability to support students from racially diverse backgrounds as well as applications focused on in-demand fields with career ladders to living wage jobs. Grant recipients must use the funds to provide services including, but not limited to, development and implementation of apprenticeship and industry certifications, benefits administration, tuition assistance, counseling and navigation, tutoring and test preparation, instructor/mentor training, materials and technology for students, childcare, and travel costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 614. FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$10,975,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$11,100,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$34,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$22,109,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: Funding provided in this section is sufficient for the school to offer to students enrolled in grades six through twelve for full-time instructional services at the Vancouver campus or online with the opportunity to participate in a minimum of one thousand eighty hours of instruction and the opportunity to earn twenty-four high school credits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 615. FOR THE WASHINGTON CENTER FOR DEAF AND HARD OF HEARING YOUTH

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$17,815,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$17,893,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$3,050,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$38,758,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Funding provided in this section is sufficient for the center to offer students ages three through 21 enrolled at the center the opportunity to participate in a minimum of 1,080 hours of instruction and the opportunity to earn 24 high school credits.

(2) $225,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $225,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a mentoring program for persons employed as educational interpreters in public schools.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 616. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE ARTS COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$5,654,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$5,687,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,230,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$184,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$13,755,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $79,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $79,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the creative districts program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 617. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$5,072,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$5,081,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$10,153,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the purpose of supporting the Washington museums connect initiative, creating an inventory of rural, volunteer, and multidiscipline museums and place-based heritage groups to connect at-risk museums to a statewide funding and operational network. The department shall contract with an organization that works with and connects museums in Washington state.

(a) The contracted organization must:

(i) Submit to the department a report regarding funding needs for the museums and place-based heritage groups identified in the statewide inventory created in the first phase of the initiative;

(ii) Submit to the department a strategic plan assessing opportunities for the entities identified in the statewide inventory to access local, state, and national funding; and

(iii) Distribute to the entities identified in the inventory information regarding opportunities to apply for local, state, and national funding for the duration of the contract.

(b) The report and the strategic plan are due by June 30, 2025.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 618. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$4,207,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$4,232,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$8,439,000

(End of part)

PART VII

SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 701. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY INVESTMENT POOL

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$29,774,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$14,392,000

Other Appropriated Funds
. . . .
$6,438,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$50,604,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the information technology investment revolving account created in RCW 43.41.433. Amounts in the account are provided solely for the information technology projects shown in LEAP omnibus document IT-2023, dated March 23, 2023, which is hereby incorporated by reference. To facilitate the transfer of moneys from other funds and accounts that are associated with projects contained in LEAP omnibus document IT-2023, dated March 23, 2023, the state treasurer is directed to transfer moneys from other funds and accounts to the information technology investment revolving account in accordance with schedules provided by the office of financial management. Restricted federal funds may be transferred only to the extent permitted by law, and will otherwise remain outside the information technology investment account. The projects affected remain subject to the other provisions of this section.

(2) Agencies must apply to the office of the chief information officer for certification and release of funding for each gate of the project. When the office of the chief information officer certifies the key deliverables of the gate have been met, a current technology budget is approved, and that the project is putting functioning software into production that addresses user needs, if applicable at the stage of the project, is in compliance with the quality assurance plan, and meets a defined set of industry best practices for code quality that the office of the chief information officer will post to their website by July 1, 2023, it must notify the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature. The office of financial management may not approve funding for the certified project gate any earlier than ten business days from the date of notification to the fiscal committees of the legislature.

(3)(a) Allocations and allotments of information technology investment revolving account must be made for discrete stages of projects as determined by the technology budget approved by the office of the chief information officer and office of financial management.

(b) Fifteen percent of total funding allocated by the office of financial management, or another amount as defined jointly by the office of financial management and the office of the chief information officer, will be retained in the account, but remain allocated to that project. The retained funding will be released to the agency only after successful completion of that stage of the project and only after the office of the chief information officer certifies the stage as required in subsection (2) of this section. For the one Washington project, the amount retained is increased to at least twenty percent of total funding allocated for any stage of that project.

(4)(a) Each project must have a technology budget. The technology budget must have the detail by fiscal month for the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium. The technology budget must use a method similar to the state capital budget, identifying project costs, each fund source, and anticipated deliverables through each stage of the entire project investment and across fiscal periods and biennia from project onset through implementation and close out, as well as at least five years of maintenance and operations costs.

(b) As part of the development of a technology budget and at each request for funding, the agency shall submit an updated technology budget, if changes occurred, to include detailed financial information to the office of financial management and the office of the chief information officer. The technology budget must describe the total cost of the project, as well as maintenance and operations costs, to include and identify at least:

(i) Fund sources:

(A) If the project is funded from the information technology revolving account, the technology budget must include a worksheet that provides the fund sources that were transferred into the account by fiscal year;

(B) If the project is by a central service agency, and funds are driven out by the central service model, the technology budget must provide a statewide impact by agency by fund as a worksheet in the technology budget file;

(ii) Full time equivalent staffing level to include job classification assumptions. This is to assure that the project has adequate state staffing and agency support to ensure success, ensure user acceptance, and adequately test the functionality being delivered in each sprint before it is accepted by the agency's contracting officer or their representative. Key project functions that are deemed "critical" must be retained by state personnel and not outsourced, to ensure that knowledge is retained within state government and that the state can self-sufficiently support the system and make improvements without long-term dependence on a vendor;

(iii) Discrete financial budget codes to include at least the appropriation index and program index;

(iv) Object and subobject codes of expenditures;

(v) Anticipated deliverables to include software demonstration dates;

(vi) Historical budget and expenditure detail by fiscal year; and

(vii) Maintenance and operations costs by fiscal year for at least five years as a separate worksheet.

(c) If a project technology budget changes and a revised technology budget is completed, a comparison of the revised technology budget to the last approved technology budget must be posted to the dashboard, to include a narrative rationale on what changed, why, and how that impacts the project in scope, budget, and schedule.

(5)(a) Each project must have a project charter. The charter must include:

(i) An organizational chart of the project management team that identifies team members and their roles and responsibilities, and shows that the project is adequately staffed by state personnel in key functions to ensure success;

(ii) The office of the chief information officer staff assigned to the project;

(iii) A project roadmap that includes the problems the team is solving and the sequence in which the team intends to take on those problems, updated periodically to reflect what has been learned;

(iv) Metrics to support the project strategy and vision, to determine that the project is incrementally meeting user needs;

(v) An implementation schedule covering activities, critical milestones, and deliverables at each stage of the project for the life of the project at each agency affected by the project;

(vi) Performance measures used to determine that the project is on time, within budget, and meeting expectations for quality of work product;

(vii) Ongoing maintenance and operations cost of the project post implementation and close out delineated by agency staffing, contracted staffing, and service level agreements; and

(viii) Financial budget coding to include at least discrete financial coding for the project.

(b) If required by the office of the chief information officer, a project may also need to have an investment plan. The office of the chief information officer must:

(i) Base the requirement of an agency to have an investment plan on the complexity and risk of the project;

(ii) Establish requirements by project risk level in statewide technology policy, and publish the requirements by September 30, 2023; and

(iii) In collaboration with the department of enterprise services, define the circumstances under which the vendor will be terminated or replaced and establish the process by which the agency will transition to a new vendor with a minimal reduction in project productivity.

(6)(a) Projects with estimated costs greater than $100,000,000 from initiation to completion and implementation may be divided into discrete subprojects as determined by the office of the chief information officer, except for the one Washington project which must be divided into the following discrete subprojects: Core financials, expanding financials and procurement, budget, and human resources. Each subproject must have a technology budget as provided in this section.

(b) If the project affects more than one agency:

(i) A separate technology budget and investment plan must be prepared by each agency; and

(ii) There must be a budget roll up that includes each affected agency at the subproject level.

(7) The office of the chief information officer shall maintain a statewide information technology project dashboard that provides updated information each fiscal month on projects subject to this section. The statewide dashboard must meet the requirements in section 155 of this act.

(8) For any project that exceeds $2,000,000 in total funds to complete, requires more than one biennium to complete, or is financed through financial contracts, bonds, or other indebtedness:

(a) Independent quality assurance services for the project must report independently to the office of the chief information officer;

(b) The office of the chief information officer, based on project risk assessments, may require additional quality assurance services and independent verification and validation services;

(c) The office of the chief information officer must review, and, if necessary, revise the proposed project to ensure it is flexible and adaptable to advances in technology;

(d) The technology budget must specifically identify the uses of any financing proceeds. No more than thirty percent of the financing proceeds may be used for payroll-related costs for state employees assigned to project management, installation, testing, or training;

(e) The agency must consult with the office of the state treasurer during the competitive procurement process to evaluate early in the process whether products and services to be solicited and the responsive bids from a solicitation may be financed;

(f) The agency must consult with the contracting division of the department of enterprise services for a review of all contracts and agreements related to the project's information technology procurements;

(g) The agency and project must use an agile development model holding live demonstrations of functioning software, developed using incremental user research, held at the end of every two-week sprint;

(h) The project solution must be capable of being continually updated, as necessary; and

(i) The agency and project must deploy usable functionality into production for users within 180 days from the date of an executed procurement contract in response to a competitive request for proposal.

(9) The office of the chief information officer must evaluate the project at each stage and certify whether the project is putting functioning software into production that addresses user needs, is projected to be completed within budget, is in compliance with the quality assurance plan, and meets a defined set of industry best practices for code quality, and whether the project is planned, managed, and meeting deliverable targets as defined in the project's approved technology budget and investment plan.

(10) The office of the chief information officer may suspend or terminate a project at any time if it determines that the project is not meeting or not expected to meet anticipated performance and technology outcomes. Once suspension or termination occurs, the agency shall unallot any unused funding and shall not make any expenditure for the project without the approval of the office of financial management. The office of the chief information officer must report on December 1 each calendar year any suspension or termination of a project in the previous 12-month period to the legislative fiscal committees.

(11) The office of the chief information officer, in consultation with the office of financial management, may identify additional projects to be subject to this section, including projects that are not separately identified within an agency budget. The office of the chief information officer must report on December 1 each calendar year any additional projects to be subjected to this section that were identified in the previous 12-month period to the legislative fiscal committees.

(12) Any cost to administer or implement this section for projects listed in subsection (1) of this section, must be paid from the information technology investment revolving account. For any other information technology project made subject to the conditions, limitations, and review of this section, the cost to implement this section must be paid from the funds for that project.

(13) The following information technology projects are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review of this section:

(a) The state network firewall replacement of the consolidated technology services agency; and

(b) The legal matters management project of the office of the attorney general.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 702. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR DEBT SUBJECT TO THE DEBT LIMIT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$1,419,445,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$1,549,610,000

State Building Construction Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$14,092,000

Watershed Restoration and Enhancement Bond Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$204,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$876,000

Debt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$119,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$2,984,346,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriations are for expenditure into the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 703. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR GENERAL OBLIGATION DEBT TO BE REIMBURSED AS PRESCRIBED BY STATUTE

Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$51,730,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$51,730,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriation is for expenditure into the nondebt limit general fund bond retirement account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 704. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$1,400,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$1,400,000

State Building Construction Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,821,000

Watershed Restoration and Enhancement Bond Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$44,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$176,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$5,841,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 705. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—GOVERNOR'S EMERGENCY FUNDING

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$3,500,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$3,500,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$7,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided for the critically necessary work of any state agency in the event of an emergent or unforeseen circumstance. Prior to the allocation of funding from this subsection (1), the requesting agency and the office of financial management must comply with the provisions of RCW 43.88.250.

(2) $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided for individual assistance consistent with RCW 38.52.030(9) during an emergency proclaimed by the governor, as defined in RCW 38.52.010. The office of financial management must notify the fiscal committees of the legislature of the receipt by the governor or adjutant general of each application or request for individual assistance from the amounts provided in this subsection (2). The office of financial management may not approve or release funding for 10 business days from the date of notification to the fiscal committees of the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 706. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—EDUCATION TECHNOLOGY REVOLVING ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$9,000,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$9,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$18,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the education technology revolving account for the purpose of covering ongoing operational and equipment replacement costs incurred by the K-20 educational network program in providing telecommunication services to network participants.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 707. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—O'BRIEN BUILDING IMPROVEMENT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$2,585,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$2,584,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$5,169,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the enterprise services account for payment of principal, interest, and financing expenses associated with the certificate of participation for the O'Brien building improvement, project number 20081007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 708. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—CHERBERG BUILDING REHABILITATION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$550,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$552,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,102,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the enterprise services account for payment of principal, interest, and financing expenses associated with the certificate of participation for the Cherberg building improvements, project number 2002-1-005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 709. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—COUNTY PUBLIC HEALTH ASSISTANCE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$36,386,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$36,386,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$72,772,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The state treasurer shall distribute the appropriations to the following counties and health districts in the amounts designated to support public health services, including public health nursing:

Health District

FY 2024

FY 2025

2023-2025 Biennium

Adams County Integrated Health Care Services

$121,213

$121,213

$242,426

Asotin County Health District

$159,890

$159,890

$319,780

Benton-Franklin Health District

$1,614,337

$1,614,337

$3,228,674

Chelan-Douglas Health District

$399,634

$399,634

$799,268

Clallam County Health and Human Services Department

$291,401

$291,401

$582,802

Clark County Public Health

$1,767,341

$1,767,341

$3,534,682

Skamania County Community Health

$111,327

$111,327

$222,654

Columbia County Health District

$119,991

$119,991

$239,982

Cowlitz County Health and Human Services

$477,981

$477,981

$955,962

Garfield County Health District

$93,154

$93,154

$186,308

Grant County Health District

$297,761

$297,761

$595,522

Grays Harbor Public Health and Social Services

$335,666

$335,666

$671,332

Island County Health Department

$255,224

$255,224

$510,448

Jefferson County Public Health

$184,080

$184,080

$368,160

Public Health - Seattle & King County

$12,685,521

$12,685,521

$25,371,042

Kitsap Public Health District

$997,476

$997,476

$1,994,952

Kittitas County Public Health

$198,979

$198,979

$397,958

Klickitat County Public Health

$153,784

$153,784

$307,568

Lewis County Public Health and Social Services

$263,134

$263,134

$526,268

Lincoln County Health Department

$113,917

$113,917

$227,834

Mason County Public Health and Human Services

$227,448

$227,448

$454,896

Okanogan County Public Health

$169,882

$169,882

$339,764

Pacific County Health and Human Services

$169,075

$169,075

$338,150

Tacoma-Pierce County Health Department

$4,143,169

$4,143,169

$8,286,338

San Juan County Health and Community Services

$126,569

$126,569

$253,138

Skagit County Health Department

$449,745

$449,745

$899,490

Snohomish Health District

$3,433,291

$3,433,291

$6,866,582

Spokane Regional Health District

$2,877,318

$2,877,318

$5,754,636

Northeast Tri-County Health District

$249,303

$249,303

$498,606

Thurston County Public Health and Social Services

$1,046,897

$1,046,897

$2,093,794

Wahkiakum County Health and Human Services

$93,181

$93,181

$186,362

Walla Walla County Department of Community Health

$302,173

$302,173

$604,346

Whatcom County Health Department

$1,214,301

$1,214,301

$2,428,602

Whitman County Health Department

$189,355

$189,355

$378,710

Yakima Health District

$1,052,482

$1,052,482

$2,104,964

TOTAL APPROPRIATIONS

$36,386,000

$36,386,000

$72,772,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 710. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—COUNTY CLERK LEGAL FINANCIAL OBLIGATION GRANTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$541,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$441,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$982,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: By October 1st of each fiscal year, the state treasurer shall distribute the appropriations to the following county clerk offices in the amounts designated as grants for the collection of legal financial obligations pursuant to RCW 2.56.190:

County Clerk

FY 2024

FY 2025

Adams County Clerk

$2,103

$1,714

Asotin County Clerk

$2,935

$2,392

Benton County Clerk

$18,231

$14,858

Chelan County Clerk

$7,399

$6,030

Clallam County Clerk

$5,832

$4,753

Clark County Clerk

$32,635

$26,597

Columbia County Clerk

$384

$313

Cowlitz County Clerk

$16,923

$13,792

Douglas County Clerk

$3,032

$2,471

Ferry County Clerk

$422

$344

Franklin County Clerk

$5,486

$4,471

Garfield County Clerk

$243

$198

Grant County Clerk

$10,107

$8,237

Grays Harbor County Clerk

$8,659

$7,057

Island County Clerk

$3,059

$2,493

Jefferson County Clerk

$1,859

$1,515

King County Court Clerk

$119,290

$97,266

Kitsap County Clerk

$22,242

$18,127

Kittitas County Clerk

$3,551

$2,894

Klickitat County Clerk

$2,151

$1,753

Lewis County Clerk

$10,340

$8,427

Lincoln County Clerk

$724

$590

Mason County Clerk

$5,146

$4,194

Okanogan County Clerk

$3,978

$3,242

Pacific County Clerk

$2,411

$1,965

Pend Oreille County Clerk

$611

$498

Pierce County Clerk

$77,102

$62,837

San Juan County Clerk

$605

$493

Skagit County Clerk

$11,059

$9,013

Skamania County Clerk

$1,151

$938

Snohomish County Clerk

$38,143

$31,086

Spokane County Clerk

$44,825

$36,578

Stevens County Clerk

$2,984

$2,432

Thurston County Clerk

$22,204

$18,096

Wahkiakum County Clerk

$400

$326

Walla Walla County Clerk

$4,935

$4,022

Whatcom County Clerk

$20,728

$16,893

Whitman County Clerk

$2,048

$1,669

Yakima County Clerk

$25,063

$20,426

TOTAL APPROPRIATIONS

$541,000

$441,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 711. BELATED CLAIMS

The agencies and institutions of the state may expend moneys appropriated in this act, upon approval of the office of financial management, for the payment of supplies and services furnished to the agency or institution in prior fiscal biennia.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 712. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—FOUNDATIONAL PUBLIC HEALTH SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$122,023,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$151,091,000

Foundational Public Health Services Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$28,050,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$301,164,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for distribution as provided in RCW 43.70.515.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 713. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—COMMON SCHOOL CONSTRUCTION ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$600,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$600,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,200,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the common school construction account—state on July 1, 2023, and July 1, 2024, for an interest payment pursuant to RCW 90.38.130.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 714. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—NATURAL RESOURCES REAL PROPERTY REPLACEMENT ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$300,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$300,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$600,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the natural resources real property replacement account—state on July 1, 2023, and July 1, 2024, for an interest payment pursuant to RCW 90.38.130.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 715. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—ANDY HILL CANCER RESEARCH ENDOWMENT FUND MATCH TRANSFER ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$684,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$684,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for expenditure into the Andy Hill cancer research endowment fund match transfer account per RCW 43.348.080 to fund the Andy Hill cancer research endowment program. Matching funds using the amounts appropriated in this section may not be used to fund new grants that exceed two years in duration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 716. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—NORTHEAST WASHINGTON WOLF-LIVESTOCK MANAGEMENT ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$800,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$800,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,600,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the northeast Washington wolf-livestock management account for the deployment of nonlethal wolf deterrence resources as provided in chapter 16.76 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 717. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—STATE HEALTH CARE AFFORDABILITY ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$57,532,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$47,083,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$104,615,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the state health care affordability account created in RCW 43.71.130.

(2) It is the intent of the legislature to continue the policy of expending $5,000,000 into the account each fiscal year in future biennia for the purpose of funding premium assistance for customers ineligible for federal premium tax credits who meet the eligibility criteria established in section 214(4)(a) of this act. Future expenditures into the account are contingent upon approval of the waiver described in RCW 43.71.120.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 718. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—COUNTY CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT: JUVENILE CODE REVISIONS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$331,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$331,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$662,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the county criminal justice assistance account for costs to the criminal justice system associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). The amounts provided in this subsection are intended to provide funding for county adult court costs associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and shall be distributed in accordance with RCW 82.14.310.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 719. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—COUNTY CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT: REPEAT OFFENDERS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$226,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$226,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$452,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations, or so much thereof as may be necessary, are provided solely for expenditure into the county criminal justice assistance account. The treasurer shall make quarterly distributions from the county criminal justice assistance account of the amounts provided in this section in accordance with RCW 82.14.310 for the purposes of reimbursing local jurisdictions for increased costs incurred as a result of the mandatory arrest of repeat offenders pursuant to chapter 35, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. The appropriations and distributions made under this section constitute appropriate reimbursement for costs for any new programs or increased level of services for the purposes of RCW 43.135.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 720. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—MUNICIPAL CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT: REPEAT OFFENDERS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$133,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$133,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$266,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations, or so much thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated for expenditure into the municipal criminal justice assistance account. The treasurer shall make quarterly distributions from the municipal criminal justice assistance account of the amounts provided in this section in accordance with RCW 82.14.320 and 82.14.330, for the purposes of reimbursing local jurisdictions for increased costs incurred as a result of the mandatory arrest of repeat offenders pursuant to chapter 35, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. The appropriations and distributions made under this section constitute appropriate reimbursement for costs for any new programs or increased level of services for the purposes of RCW 43.135.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 721. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—INDIAN HEALTH IMPROVEMENT REINVESTMENT ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$708,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$708,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,416,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the Indian health improvement reinvestment account created in RCW 43.71B.040.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 722. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—OUTDOOR EDUCATION ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$2,250,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$2,250,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$4,500,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the outdoor education and recreation program account for the purposes identified in RCW 79A.05.351.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 723. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—UNIVERSAL COMMUNICATIONS SERVICES ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$5,000,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$5,253,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$10,253,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the universal communications services account created in RCW 80.36.690. The general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for expenditure pursuant to Substitute Senate Bill No. 5600 (universal communications). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided for fiscal year 2025 in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 724. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—WASHINGTON CAREER AND COLLEGE PATHWAYS INNOVATION CHALLENGE PROGRAM ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$10,000,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$10,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$20,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the Washington career and college pathways innovation challenge program account created in RCW 28B.120.040 to implement RCW 28B.120.060. The student achievement council must report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature on the uses of the general fund moneys deposited in the account by December 1 of each fiscal year of the biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 725. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—WASHINGTON INTERNET CRIMES AGAINST CHILDREN ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$1,135,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$1,135,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$2,270,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the Washington internet crimes against children account created in RCW 43.101.435.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 726. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—LANDLORD MITIGATION PROGRAM ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$8,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$8,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for expenditure into the landlord mitigation program account created in RCW 43.31.615.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 727. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS—CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS

(1) The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations for the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system shall be made on a monthly basis consistent with chapter 41.45 RCW, and the appropriations for the judges and judicial retirement systems shall be made on a quarterly basis consistent with chapters 2.10 and 2.12 RCW.

(2) There is appropriated for state contributions to the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system:

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$88,700,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$92,600,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$181,300,000

(3) There is appropriated for contributions to the judicial retirement system:

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$6,300,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$6,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$12,300,000

(4) There is appropriated for contributions to the judges' retirement system:

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$300,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$300,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 728. FOR THE BOARD FOR VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTERS AND RESERVE OFFICERS—CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS

There is appropriated for state contributions to the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund:

Volunteer Firefighters' and Reserve Officers'

Administrative Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$18,704,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$18,704,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 729. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—LEASE COST POOL

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,649,000

State Agency Office Relocation Pool Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,942,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$5,591,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the state agency office relocation pool account created in RCW 43.41.455.

(2) Impacted agencies are shown in LEAP omnibus document LEAS-2023, dated March 23, 2023, which is hereby incorporated by reference.

(3) To facilitate the transfer of moneys from other funds and accounts that are associated with office relocations contained in LEAP omnibus document LEAS-2023, dated March 23, 2023, the state treasurer is directed to transfer moneys from other funds and accounts to the state agency office relocation pool account in accordance with schedules provided by the office of financial management.

(4) Agencies may apply to the office of financial management to receive funds from the state agency office relocation pool amount not to exceed the amount identified in the LEAP omnibus document LEAS-2023, dated March 23, 2023. Prior to applying, the agencies must submit to the office of financial management statewide oversight office a relocation plan that identifies estimated project costs, including how the lease aligns to the agency's six-year leased facility plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 730. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—MICROSOFT 365 FEE-FOR-SERVICE REMOVAL

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
($10,819,000)

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
($10,830,000)

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
($6,620,000)

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
($712,000)

Other Appropriated Funds
. . . .
($9,656,000)

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
($38,637,000)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section reflect adjustments in agency appropriations related to corresponding adjustments in the consolidated technology services' billing authority. The office of financial management shall adjust allotments in the amounts specified, and to the state agencies specified, in LEAP omnibus document 90J-2023, dated March 23, 2023, and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 731. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—REAL ESTATE SERVICES FEE-FOR-SERVICE REMOVAL

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
($557,000)

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
($562,000)

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
($221,000)

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
($24,000)

Other Appropriated Funds
. . . .
($656,000)

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
($2,020,000)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section reflect adjustments in agency appropriations related to corresponding adjustments in the department of enterprise services' billing authority for real estate services. The office of financial management shall adjust allotments in the amounts specified, and to the state agencies specified, in LEAP omnibus document 90K-2023, dated March 23, 2023, and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 732. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—SECRETARY OF STATE ARCHIVES AND RECORDS MANAGEMENT CENTRAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$330,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$325,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$209,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$28,000

Other Appropriated Funds
. . . .
$330,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,222,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section reflect adjustments in agency appropriations related to corresponding adjustments in the secretary of state's billing authority for archives and records management. The office of financial management shall adjust allotments in the amounts specified, and to the state agencies specified, in LEAP omnibus document 92C-2023, dated March 23, 2023, and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 733. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—STATE AUDITOR AUDIT SERVICES CENTRAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$261,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$306,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$184,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$11,000

Other Appropriated Funds
. . . .
$253,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,015,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section reflect adjustments in agency appropriations related to corresponding adjustments in the state auditor's billing authority for state agency auditing services. The office of financial management shall adjust allotments in the amounts specified, and to the state agencies specified, in LEAP omnibus document 92D-2023, dated March 23, 2023, and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 734. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL LEGAL SERVICES CENTRAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$11,846,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$13,533,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$5,186,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$180,000

Other Appropriated Funds
. . . .
$14,010,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$44,755,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section reflect adjustments in agency appropriations related to corresponding adjustments in the attorney general's billing authority for legal services. The office of financial management shall adjust allotments in the amounts specified, and to the state agencies specified, in LEAP omnibus document 92E-2023, dated March 23, 2023, and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 735. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS CENTRAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$3,036,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$1,926,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$3,387,000

Other Appropriated Funds
. . . .
$6,704,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$15,053,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section reflect adjustments in agency appropriations related to corresponding adjustments in the office of administrative hearings' billing authority. The office of financial management shall adjust allotments in the amounts specified, and to the state agencies specified, in LEAP omnibus document 92G-2023, dated March 23, 2023, and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 736. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—CONSOLIDATED TECHNOLOGY SERVICES CENTRAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$17,713,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$18,608,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$11,005,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$1,119,000

Other Appropriated Funds
. . . .
$17,245,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$65,690,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section reflect adjustments in agency appropriations related to corresponding adjustments in the consolidated technology services' billing authority. The office of financial management shall adjust allotments in the amounts specified, and to the state agencies specified, in LEAP omnibus document 92J-2023, dated March 23, 2023, and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 737. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES CENTRAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$4,371,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$4,590,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,346,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$86,000

Other Appropriated Funds
. . . .
$4,365,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$14,758,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section reflect adjustments in agency appropriations related to corresponding adjustments in the department of enterprise services' billing authority. The office of financial management shall adjust allotments in the amounts specified, and to the state agencies specified, in LEAP omnibus document 92K-2023, dated March 23, 2023, and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 738. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT CENTRAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$20,994,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$7,186,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,486,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$752,000

Other Appropriated Funds
. . . .
$9,466,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$39,884,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section reflect adjustments in agency appropriations related to corresponding adjustments in the office of financial management billing authority. The office of financial management shall adjust allotments in the amounts specified, and to the state agencies specified, in LEAP omnibus document 92R-2023, dated March 23, 2023, and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 739. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—SELF-INSURANCE LIABILITY PREMIUM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$8,137,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$8,150,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$3,812,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$15,000

Other Appropriated Funds
. . . .
$514,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$20,628,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section reflect adjustments in agency appropriations related to corresponding adjustments in the self-insurance premium liability billing authority. The office of financial management shall adjust allotments in the amounts specified, and to the state agencies specified, in LEAP omnibus document 92X-2023, dated March 23, 2023, and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 740. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR CENTRAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$3,047,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$3,019,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,576,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$142,000

Other Appropriated Funds
. . . .
$2,363,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$10,147,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section reflect adjustments in agency appropriations related to corresponding adjustments in the office of the governor billing authority. The office of financial management shall adjust allotments in the amounts specified, and to the state agencies specified, in LEAP omnibus document 92W-2023, dated March 23, 2023, and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 741. FOR THE WASHINGTON STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT COUNCIL—BEHAVIORAL HEALTH LOAN REPAYMENT PROGRAM ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$1,000,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$1,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$2,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the behavioral health loan repayment program account created in RCW 28B.115.135.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 742. FOR THE WASHINGTON STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT COUNCIL—HEALTH PROFESSIONALS LOAN REPAYMENT AND SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$3,800,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$3,800,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$7,600,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the health professionals loan repayment and scholarship program account created in RCW 28B.115.130.

(2) These amounts must be used to increase the number of licensed primary care health professionals to serve in licensed primary care health professional critical shortage areas. Contracts between the office of student financial assistance and program recipients must guarantee at least three years of conditional loan repayments. The office of student financial assistance and the department of health shall prioritize a portion of any nonfederal balances in the health professional loan repayment and scholarship fund for conditional loan repayment contracts with psychiatrists and with advanced registered nurse practitioners for work at one of the state-operated psychiatric hospitals. The office and department shall designate the state hospitals as health professional shortage areas if necessary for this purpose. The office shall coordinate with the department of social and health services to effectively incorporate three conditional loan repayments into the department's advanced psychiatric professional recruitment and retention strategies. The office may use these targeted amounts for other program participants should there be any remaining amounts after eligible psychiatrists and advanced registered nurse practitioners have been served. The office shall also work to prioritize loan repayments to professionals working at health care delivery sites that demonstrate a commitment to serving uninsured clients. It is the intent of the legislature to provide funding to maintain the current number and amount of awards for the program in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium on the basis of these contractual obligations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 743. FOR THE WASHINGTON STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT COUNCIL—MEDICAL STUDENT LOAN ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$252,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$252,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$504,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the medical student loan account created in RCW 28B.99.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 744. FOR THE WASHINGTON STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT COUNCIL—NURSE EDUCATOR LOAN REPAYMENT PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$3,000,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$3,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$6,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the health professionals loan repayment and scholarship program account created in RCW 28B.115.130 for the nurse educator loan repayment program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 745. FOR THE WASHINGTON STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT COUNCIL—RURAL JOBS PROGRAM MATCH TRANSFER ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$200,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$200,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$400,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the rural jobs program match transfer account created in RCW 28B.145.120.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 746. FOR THE WASHINGTON STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT COUNCIL—OPPORTUNITY SCHOLARSHIP MATCH TRANSFER ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$5,800,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$5,800,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$11,600,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the opportunity scholarship match transfer account created in RCW 28B.145.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 747. FOR THE WASHINGTON STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT COUNCIL—EDUCATOR CONDITIONAL SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$2,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for expenditure into the educator conditional scholarship account created in RCW 28B.102.080 for the teacher shortage conditional grant program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 748. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES COMMUNITY SERVICES ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$1,000,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$1,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$2,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the developmental disabilities community services account (Dan Thompson memorial community services account) for the purposes identified in RCW 71A.20.170.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 749. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—HOME VISITING SERVICES ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$14,010,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$12,949,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$26,959,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the home visiting services account created in RCW 43.216.130 for the home visiting program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 750. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—AFFORDABLE HOUSING FOR ALL ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$18,500,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$18,500,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$37,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the affordable housing for all account created in RCW 43.185C.190 for operations, maintenance, and services for permanent supportive housing as defined in RCW 36.70A.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 751. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—WASHINGTON STATE LEADERSHIP BOARD ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$699,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$708,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,407,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the Washington state leadership board account created in RCW 43.388.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 752. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—MEDICATION FOR PEOPLE LIVING WITH HIV REBATE REVENUE ACCOUNT

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$43,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$43,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for expenditure into the medication for people living with HIV rebate revenue account. On or before July 1, 2023, the department of health must determine, and report to the office of financial management, the amount of expended revenues from receipt of pharmaceutical rebates generated by the purchase of medications with federal grant funds and revenue generated from federal grant funds for any person enrolled in the early intervention program residing in the general fund. After the office of financial management verifies the accuracy of the information, the office must direct the state treasurer to transfer such amount, not to exceed $43,000,000, on July 1, 2023, from the general fund to the medication for people living with HIV rebate revenue account created in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5142 (HIV medication rebate rev.). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this section shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 753. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—JUDICIAL INFORMATIONS SYSTEM ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$11,785,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$11,785,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$23,570,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the judicial information systems account created in RCW 2.68.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 754. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—OFFICE SPACE USE REDUCTIONS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
($3,019,000)

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
($2,035,000)

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
($5,054,000)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) In response to the COVID-19 pandemic, Washington state agencies rapidly implemented telework for employees whose job duties did not require on-site presence. This shift in state government operations has led to agencies' reevaluation of the amount of physical office space they will require as they implement hybrid work environments and adopt expanded telework opportunities. The appropriations in this section reflect adjustments in agency appropriations related to office space reductions to be achieved from hybrid work, telework, and the strategy provided in this section. The office of financial management shall adjust allotments in the amounts specified, and to the state agencies specified, in LEAP omnibus document LSSV-2023, dated March 23, 2023, and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly.

(2) To meet the goal of efficient use of state funds and office space, state agencies, institutions of higher education, and separately elected officials must adhere to the office of financial management's statewide space use policy, data integrity and system access policy, inventory policy, and the human resource management system data validation guide to ensure space use data is complete, accurate, and consistent for reporting and analysis.

(3) State agencies, institutions of higher education, and separately elected officials with leases expiring in fiscal years 2024 and 2025 must work toward reducing leased office space a minimum of 20 percent upon lease renewal or when requesting office relocation. Reductions in lease costs will be reflected in subsequent budgets.

(4) It is the intent of the legislature that state agencies, institutions of higher education, and separately elected officials with leases expiring in fiscal years 2026 and 2027 work to reduce their office space portfolio a minimum of 30 percent upon lease renewal or when requesting office relocation. The reductions in costs will be reflected in subsequent budgets.

(5) State agencies must:

(a) Work with the office of financial management's facilities oversight and planning program and the department of enterprise services to backfill office space and reduce full leases;

(b) Update monthly the office of financial management's facilities portfolio management tool to maximize collocation opportunities and better inform decision making;

(c) Update telework and employee location data monthly in the human resource management system to reflect office space use and needs; and

(d) Maintain a telework policy in accordance with executive order 16-07, building a modern work environment.

(6) The anticipated general fund savings from reduced office space need is $13,759,000 during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium.

(7) The office of financial management, working collaboratively with the department of enterprise services, must report to the fiscal and appropriate policy committees of the legislature with comparative analysis on the total estimated office space use savings by fiscal year for all impacted state agencies, institutions of higher education, and separately elected offices compared to the actual realized savings achieved by fiscal year. The report must be submitted each January 1st, beginning January 1, 2024, for the prior fiscal year. In addition to this high-level reporting requirement, the office must also report on each lease that was set to expire in the prior fiscal year, starting with fiscal year 2023, to provide actual detail for each lease by impacted state agency, institution of higher education, and separately elected office. The detail must include:

(a) Detail on the lease expiring to include the unique facility identification, the lease number, the address, the total square feet leased, the terms of the lease to include price per square foot, whether the lease is full service or not and what services are included in the rate, and how many workstations and offices will be available;

(b) Detail on the new lease, if applicable, to include the unique facility identification, the lease number, the address, the total square feet leased, the terms of the lease to include price per square foot, whether the lease is full service or not and what is included in the rate, and how many workstations and offices will be available;

(c) The estimated relocation costs for moving furniture and people to the new location;

(d) The estimated cost for new furniture and why existing furniture was not utilized;

(e) If tenant improvement costs are being paid for as one-time costs in the new location, what improvements are being made and at what cost;

(f) If tenant improvement costs are not being paid for as one-time costs in the new location, whether the costs for the tenant improvements are built into the new lease price per square foot and if so the estimated cost added to the base price per square feet;

(g) The triple net lease detail, if applicable, for the new space; and

(h) The net fiscal impact to the agency of the new lease and any additional one-time or ongoing new costs, compared to the lease that is expiring.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 755. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—FORENSIC PATHOLOGIST LOAN REPAYMENT ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$785,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$618,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,403,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the forensic pathologist loan repayment account established in Substitute Senate Bill No. 5523 (forensic pathologist). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this section shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 756. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—STATEWIDE TOURISM MARKETING ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$2,500,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$2,500,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$5,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the statewide tourism marketing account created in RCW 43.384.040.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 757. FOR THE OFFICE OF THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION AND OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—UNSPENT ELEMENTARY AND SECONDARY SCHOOL EMERGENCY RELIEF FUND II

General Fund—Federal Appropriation (CRRSA/ESSER)
. . . .
$58,151,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$58,151,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for allocation to school districts for learning assistance programs in addition to the allocations provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(a) and section 517 of this act. Funding from this appropriation must be obligated by the office of the superintendent of public instruction by August 1, 2023, for allocation to school districts no later than June 30, 2024. The office of the superintendent of public instruction must report no later than August 1, 2023, to the office of financial management that it has obligated the moneys to meet the requirements of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief fund, as modified by the coronavirus response and relief supplemental appropriations act, P.L. 116-260, division M, and provide a plan for allocation to school districts. On August 5, 2023, if the office of financial management determines, in its sole discretion, that the office of the superintendent of public instruction's action or inaction puts the appropriation provided in this section at risk of reallocation by the United States department of education, the spending authority provided to the office of the superintendent of public instruction provided in this section is terminated and provided to the office of financial management to obligate and allocate the funding to school districts as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(a) to prevent the loss of these federal funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 758. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—WASHINGTON HORSE RACING COMMISSION OPERATING ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$1,150,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,150,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for expenditure into the Washington horse racing commission operating account created in RCW 67.16.280.

(End of part)

PART VIII

OTHER TRANSFERS AND APPROPRIATIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 801. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION

General Fund Appropriation for fire insurance

premium distributions
. . . .
$13,766,000

General Fund Appropriation for prosecuting attorney

distributions
. . . .
$8,284,000

General Fund Appropriation for boating safety and

education distributions
. . . .
$4,272,000

General Fund Appropriation for public utility

district excise tax distributions
. . . .
$71,825,000

Death Investigations Account Appropriation for

distribution to counties for publicly funded

autopsies
. . . .
$4,947,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account Appropriation for

harbor improvement revenue distributions
. . . .
$140,000

Timber Tax Distribution Account Appropriation for

distribution to "timber" counties
. . . .
$82,143,000

County Criminal Justice Assistance Appropriation
. . . .
$129,509,000

Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Appropriation
. . . .
$51,247,000

City-County Assistance Appropriation
. . . .
$45,960,000

Liquor Excise Tax Account Appropriation for liquor

excise tax distribution
. . . .
$89,385,000

Columbia River Water Delivery Account Appropriation

for the Confederated Tribes of the Colville

Reservation
. . . .
$9,587,000

Columbia River Water Delivery Account Appropriation

for the Spokane Tribe of Indians
. . . .
$6,893,000

Liquor Revolving Account Appropriation for liquor

profits distribution
. . . .
$98,876,000

General Fund Appropriation for other tax

distributions
. . . .
$104,000

Dedicated Cannabis Account Appropriation for

Cannabis Excise Tax distributions pursuant to

Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No.

5796 (cannabis revenue)
. . . .
$53,100,000

General Fund Appropriation for Habitat Conservation

Program distributions
. . . .
$5,754,000

General Fund Appropriation for payment in lieu of

taxes to counties under Department of Fish and

Wildlife Program
. . . .
$4,496,000

Puget Sound Taxpayer Accountability Account

Appropriation for distribution to counties in

amounts not to exceed actual deposits into the

account and attributable to those counties'

share pursuant to RCW 43.79.520.
. . . .
$27,990,000

Manufacturing and Warehousing Job Centers Account

Appropriation for distribution to local taxing

jurisdictions to mitigate the unintended

revenue redistributions effect of sourcing law

changes pursuant to chapter 83, Laws of 2021

(warehousing & manufacturing jobs).
. . . .
$7,780,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$716,058,000

The total expenditures from the state treasury under the appropriations in this section shall not exceed the funds available under statutory distributions for the stated purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 802. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—FOR THE COUNTY CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT

Impaired Driving Safety Appropriation
. . . .
$2,065,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$2,065,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The amount appropriated in this section shall be distributed quarterly during the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium in accordance with RCW 82.14.310. This funding is provided to counties for the costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including, but not limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving penalties); chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 208, Laws of 1998 (deferred prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998 (DUI/license suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock violations); chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication levels lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); and chapter 215, Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 803. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—MUNICIPAL CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT

Impaired Driving Safety Appropriation
. . . .
$1,377,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,377,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The amount appropriated in this section shall be distributed quarterly during the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium to all cities ratably based on population as last determined by the office of financial management. The distributions to any city that substantially decriminalizes or repeals its criminal code after July 1, 1990, and that does not reimburse the county for costs associated with criminal cases under RCW 3.50.800 or 3.50.805(2), shall be made to the county in which the city is located. This funding is provided to cities for the costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including, but not limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving penalties); chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 208, Laws of 1998 (deferred prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998 (DUI/license suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock violations); chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication levels lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); and chapter 215, Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 804. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—FEDERAL REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION

General Fund Appropriation for federal flood control

funds distribution
. . . .
$68,000

General Fund Appropriation for federal grazing fees

distribution
. . . .
$56,000

General Fund Appropriation for federal military fees

distribution
. . . .
$1,172,000

Forest Reserve Fund Appropriation for federal forest

reserve fund distribution
. . . .
$29,502,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$30,798,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 805. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—TRANSFERS

Dedicated Cannabis Account: For transfer to the

basic health plan trust account, the lesser of

the amount determined pursuant to RCW 69.50.540

or this amount for fiscal year 2024,

$269,000,000 and this amount for fiscal year

2025, $278,000,000
. . . .
$547,000,000

Dedicated Cannabis Account: For transfer to the

state general fund, the lesser of the amount

determined pursuant to RCW 69.50.540 or this

amount for fiscal year 2024, $162,000,000 and

this amount for fiscal year 2025, $172,000,000
. . . .
$334,000,000

Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the

state general fund, in an amount not to exceed

the actual amount of the annual base payment to

the tobacco settlement account for fiscal year

2024
. . . .
$92,000,000

Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the

state general fund, in an amount not to exceed

the actual amount of the annual base payment to

the tobacco settlement account for fiscal year

2025
. . . .
$92,000,000

Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the

state general fund, in an amount not to exceed

the actual amount of the tobacco arbitration

payment to the tobacco settlement account, for

fiscal year 2024
. . . .
$24,500,000

State Treasurer's Service Account: For transfer to

the state general fund, $15,000,000 for fiscal

year 2024 and $15,000,000 for fiscal year 2025
. . . .
$30,000,000

General Fund: For transfer to the fair fund under

RCW 15.76.115, $3,500,000 for fiscal year 2024

and $3,500,000 for fiscal year 2025
. . . .
$7,000,000

Financial Services Regulation Account: For transfer

to the state general fund, $3,500,000 for

fiscal year 2024 and $3,500,000 for fiscal year

2025
. . . .
$7,000,000

General Fund: For transfer to the wildfire response,

forest restoration, and community resilience

account, solely for the implementation of

chapter 298, Laws of 2021 (2SHB 1168)

(long-term forest health), $44,903,000 for

fiscal year 2024 and $44,903,000 for fiscal

year 2025
. . . .
$89,806,000

Washington Rescue Plan Transition Account: For

transfer to the state general fund,

$800,000,000 for fiscal year 2025
. . . .
$800,000,000

Business License Account: For transfer to the state

general fund, $8,540,000 for fiscal year 2024
. . . .
$8,540,000

General Fund: For transfer to the manufacturing and

warehousing job centers account pursuant to RCW

82.14.545 for distribution in section 801 of

this act, $4,320,000 for fiscal year 2024 and

$3,460,000 for fiscal year 2025
. . . .
$7,780,000

Long-Term Services and Supports Trust Account: For

transfer to the state general fund as full

repayment of the long-term services program

start-up costs and interest for fiscal year

2024
. . . .
$48,000,000

General Fund: For transfer to the forest resiliency

account trust fund, $6,000,000 for fiscal year

2024
. . . .
$6,000,000

Water Pollution Control Revolving Administration

Account: For transfer to the water pollution

control revolving account, $6,000,000 for

fiscal year 2024
. . . .
$6,000,000

General Fund: For transfer to the salmon recovery

account, $3,000,000 for fiscal year 2024
. . . .
$3,000,000

Washington Student Loan Account: For transfer to the

workforce education investment account,

$150,000,000 for fiscal year 2024
. . . .
$150,000,000

(End of part)

PART IX

MISCELLANEOUS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 901. EXPENDITURE AUTHORIZATIONS

The appropriations contained in this act are maximum expenditure authorizations. Pursuant to RCW 43.88.037, moneys disbursed from the treasury on the basis of a formal loan agreement shall be recorded as loans receivable and not as expenditures for accounting purposes. To the extent that moneys are disbursed on a loan basis, the corresponding appropriation shall be reduced by the amount of loan moneys disbursed from the treasury during the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 902. EMERGENCY FUND ALLOCATIONS

Whenever allocations are made from the governor's emergency fund appropriation to an agency that is financed in whole or in part by other than general fund moneys, the director of financial management may direct the repayment of such allocated amount to the general fund from any balance in the fund or funds which finance the agency. An appropriation is not necessary to effect such repayment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 903. STATUTORY APPROPRIATIONS

In addition to the amounts appropriated in this act for revenues for distribution, state contributions to the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2 and bond retirement and interest, including ongoing bond registration and transfer charges, transfers, interest on registered warrants, and certificates of indebtedness, there is also appropriated such further amounts as may be required or available for these purposes under any statutory formula or under chapters 39.94, 39.96, and 39.98 RCW or any proper bond covenant made under law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 904. BOND EXPENSES

In addition to such other appropriations as are made by this act, there is hereby appropriated to the state finance committee from legally available bond proceeds in the applicable construction or building funds and accounts such amounts as are necessary to pay the expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of the subject bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 905. VOLUNTARY RETIREMENT AND SEPARATION

(1) As a management tool to reduce costs and make more effective use of resources, while improving employee productivity and morale, agencies may implement either a voluntary retirement or separation program, or both, that is cost neutral or results in cost savings, including costs to the state pension systems, over a two-year period following the commencement of the program, provided that such a program is approved by the director of financial management. Agencies participating in this authorization may offer voluntary retirement and/or separation incentives and options according to procedures and guidelines established by the office of financial management in consultation with the department of retirement systems. The options may include, but are not limited to, financial incentives for voluntary separation or retirement. An employee does not have a contractual right to a financial incentive offered under this section. The office of financial management and the department of retirement systems may review and monitor incentive offers. Agencies are required to submit a report by the date established by the office of financial management in the guidelines required in this section to the legislature and the office of financial management on the outcome of their approved incentive program. The report should include information on the details of the program, including the incentive payment amount for each participant, the total cost to the state, and the projected or actual net dollar savings over the two-year period.

(2) The department of retirement systems may collect from employers the actuarial cost of any incentive provided under this program, or any other incentive to retire provided by employers to members of the state's pension systems, for deposit in the appropriate pension account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 906. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS NOT IMPAIRED

Nothing in this act prohibits the expenditure of any funds by an agency or institution of the state for benefits guaranteed by any collective bargaining agreement in effect on the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 907. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS

(1) In accordance with chapters 41.80 and 41.56 RCW, agreements have been reached between the governor and organizations representing state employee bargaining units and nonstate employee bargaining units for the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium and funding is provided in this act for agreements and awards with the following organizations:

(a) Washington federation of state employees, general government;

(b) Teamsters local 117, department of corrections;

(c) Washington public employees association, general government;

(d) Teamsters 117, department of enterprise services;

(e) Service employees international union, healthcare 1199NW;

(f) Professional and technical engineers, local 17;

(g) Washington association of fish and wildlife professionals;

(h) The coalition of unions;

(i) Association of Washington assistant attorneys general;

(j) Washington federation of state employees, administrative law judges;

(k) Washington state patrol troopers association;

(l) Washington state patrol lieutenants and captains association;

(m) Fish and wildlife officers guild;

(n) Teamsters 760, fish and wildlife sergeants;

(o) Washington federation of state employees, higher education community college coalition;

(p) Washington public employees association, higher education community college coalition;

(q) Service employees international union local 925, family child care providers;

(r) Adult family home council, adult family home providers; and

(s) Washington federation of state employees, language access providers.

(2) In accordance with chapters 41.80 and 41.56 RCW, agreements have been reached between institutions of higher education and employee organizations representing state employee bargaining units for the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium and funding is provided in Part VI of this act for agreements and awards with the following organizations:

(a) University of Washington:

(i) Washington federation of state employees;

(ii) Service employees international union local 925;

(iii) Service employees international union local 1199, research/hall health;

(iv) Service employees international union local 1199, Harborview medical center/airlift northwest;

(v) Service employees international union local 1199, UW Medical Center—northwest;

(vi) Washington state nurses association, UW Medical Center—northwest;

(vii) Washington state nurses association, UW Medical Center—Montlake;

(viii) Teamsters local 117, police; and

(ix) Washington federation of state employees, police management;

(b) Washington State University:

(i) Washington federation of state employees; and

(ii) Police guild;

(c) Central Washington University:

(i) Washington federation of state employees; and

(ii) Public school employees;

(d) The Evergreen State College:

(i) Washington federation of state employees; and

(ii) Washington federation of state employees, uniformed personnel;

(e) Western Washington University:

(i) Washington federation of state employees; and

(ii) Fraternal order of police, lodge no. 24;

(f) Eastern Washington University:

(i) Washington federation of state employees;

(ii) Washington federation of state employees, uniformed personnel; and

(iii) Public school employees;

(g) Yakima Valley College: Washington public employees association; and

(h) Highline College: Washington public employees association.

(3) Expenditures for agreements in subsections (1) and (2) of this section may also be funded from nonappropriated accounts. If positions are funded with lidded grants or dedicated fund sources with insufficient revenue, additional funding from other sources is not provided.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 908. COMPENSATION—REPRESENTED EMPLOYEES—HEALTH CARE COALITION—INSURANCE BENEFITS

An agreement was reached for the 2023-2025 biennium between the governor and the health care coalition under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW. Appropriations in this act for state agencies, including institutions of higher education, are sufficient to implement the provisions of the 2023-2025 collective bargaining agreement, which maintains the provisions of the prior agreement, and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit premiums, public employees' benefits board administration, and the uniform medical plan, shall not exceed $1,145 per eligible employee for fiscal year 2024. For fiscal year 2025, the monthly employer funding rate shall not exceed $1,191 per eligible employee. These rates are sufficient to separate vision benefits out of medical plans into stand-alone vision insurance, beginning January 1, 2025.

(2) The board shall collect a $25 per month surcharge payment from members who use tobacco products and a surcharge payment of not less than $50 per month from members who cover a spouse or domestic partner where the spouse or domestic partner has chosen not to enroll in another employer-based group health insurance that has benefits and premiums with an actuarial value of not less than 95 percent of the actuarial value of the public employees' benefits board plan with the largest enrollment. The surcharge payments shall be collected in addition to the member premium payment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 909. COMPENSATION—SCHOOL EMPLOYEES—INSURANCE BENEFITS

An agreement was reached for the 2023-2025 biennium between the governor and the school employee coalition under the provisions of chapters 41.56 and 41.59 RCW. Appropriations in this act for allocations to school districts are sufficient to implement the provisions of the 2023-2025 collective bargaining agreement, which maintains the provisions of the prior agreement, and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit premiums, school employees' benefits board administration, retiree remittance, and the uniform medical plan, shall not exceed the rates identified in section 506(4) of this act.

(a) These rates are sufficient to cover, effective January 1, 2024:

(i) The following in the uniform medical plan: Offering a diabetes management program; and

(ii) The following in the uniform dental plan:

(A) Increasing the temporomandibular joint benefit to $1,000 annually and $5,000 per lifetime;

(B) Eliminating the deductible for children up to age 15;

(C) Covering composite fillings on posterior teeth; and

(D) Increasing plan coverage of crowns to 70 percent.

(b) These rates include funding to cover, effective January 1, 2025, increasing the stand-alone vision insurance benefit to $200 every 2 years.

(2) Rates established in subsection (1) of this section are sufficient to reduce member costs as provided in article 1.3 of the school employees health care funding agreement.

(3) Except as provided by the parties' health care agreement, in order to achieve the level of funding provided for health benefits, the school employees' benefits board shall require any or all of the following: Employee premium copayments, increases in point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of managed competition, or other changes to benefits consistent with RCW 41.05.740. The board shall collect a $25 per month surcharge payment from members who use tobacco products and a surcharge payment of not less than $50 per month from members who cover a spouse or domestic partner where the spouse or domestic partner has chosen not to enroll in another employer-based group health insurance that has benefits and premiums with an actuarial value of not less than 95 percent of the actuarial value of the public employees' benefits board plan with the largest enrollment. The surcharge payments shall be collected in addition to the member premium payment.

(4) The health care authority shall deposit any moneys received on behalf of the school employees' medical plan as a result of rebates on prescription drugs, audits of hospitals, subrogation payments, or any other moneys recovered as a result of prior uniform medical plan claims payments, into the school employees' and retirees' insurance account to be used for insurance benefits. Such receipts may not be used for administrative expenditures.

(5) When bargaining for funding for school employees health benefits for subsequent fiscal biennia, any proposal agreed upon must assume the imposition of a $25 per month surcharge payment from members who use tobacco products and a surcharge payment of not less than $50 per month from members who cover a spouse or domestic partner where the spouse or domestic partner has chosen not to enroll in another employer-based group health insurance that has benefits and premiums with an actuarial value of not less than 95 percent of the actuarial value of the public employees' benefits board plan with the largest enrollment. The surcharge payments shall be collected in addition to the member premium payment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 910. COMPENSATION—NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEES—INSURANCE BENEFITS

Appropriations for state agencies in this act are sufficient for represented employees outside the health care coalition and nonrepresented state employee health benefits for state agencies, including institutions of higher education, and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The employer monthly funding rate for insurance benefit premiums, public employees' benefits board administration, and the uniform medical plan, shall not exceed $1,145 per eligible employee for fiscal year 2024. For fiscal year 2025, the monthly employer funding rate shall not exceed $1,191 per eligible employee.

(2) The health care authority, subject to the approval of the public employees' benefits board, shall provide subsidies for health benefit premiums to eligible retired or disabled public employees and school district employees who are eligible for medicare, pursuant to RCW 41.05.085. For calendar years 2024 and 2025, the subsidy shall be up to $183 per month. Funds from reserves accumulated for future adverse claims experience, from past favorable claims experience, or otherwise, may not be used to increase this retiree subsidy beyond what is authorized in this subsection.

(3) School districts and educational service districts shall remit to the health care authority for deposit into the public employees' and retirees' insurance account established in RCW 41.05.120 the following amounts:

(a) For each full-time employee, $68.41 per month beginning September 1, 2023, and $78.58 beginning September 1, 2024;

(b) For each part-time employee, who at the time of the remittance is employed in an eligible position as defined in RCW 41.32.010 or 41.40.010 and is eligible for employer fringe benefit contributions for basic benefits, $68.41 each month beginning September 1, 2023, and $78.58 beginning September 1, 2024, prorated by the proportion of employer fringe benefit contributions for a full-time employee that the part-time employee receives. The remittance requirements specified in this subsection do not apply to employees of a school district or educational service district who purchase insurance benefits through contracts with the health care authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 911. GENERAL WAGE INCREASES AND LUMP SUM PAYMENTS

(1)(a) Appropriations for state agency employee compensation in this act are sufficient to provide general wage increases to state agency employees and employees of institutions of higher education, who are not represented or who bargain under statutory authority other than chapter 41.80 or 47.64 RCW or RCW 41.56.473 or 41.56.475.

(b) Appropriations for state agency employee compensation in this act are sufficient to provide a retention lump sum payment and a lump sum COVID-19 booster incentive to state agency employees who are not represented or who bargain under statutory authority other than chapter 41.80 or 47.64 RCW or RCW 41.56.473 or 41.56.475.

(2) Funding is provided for a four percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2023, for all classified employees as specified in subsection (1)(a) of this section, employees in the Washington management service, and exempt employees under the jurisdiction of the office of financial management. The appropriations are also sufficient to fund a four percent salary increase effective July 1, 2023, for executive, legislative, and judicial branch employees exempt from merit system rules whose maximum salaries are not set by the commission on salaries for elected officials.

(3) Funding is provided for a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2024, for all classified employees as specified in subsection (1)(a) of this section, employees in the Washington management service, and exempt employees under the jurisdiction of the office of financial management. The appropriations are also sufficient to fund a three percent salary increase effective July 1, 2024, for executive, legislative, and judicial branch employees exempt from merit system rules whose maximum salaries are not set by the commission on salaries for elected officials.

(4) Funding is provided for a retention lump sum payment of $1,000 for all employees as specified in subsection (1)(b) of this section who were employed on or before July 1, 2022, and continuously employed through July 1, 2023.

(5) Funding is provided for a COVID-19 booster incentive payment of $1,000 for all employees as specified in subsection (1)(b) of this section who provide verification, beginning January 1, 2023, through December 31, 2023, that they are up-to-date with the COVID-19 vaccine booster.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 912. COMPENSATION—PENSION CONTRIBUTIONS

The appropriations in this act for school districts and state agencies, including institutions of higher education, are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Appropriations are adjusted to reflect changes to agency appropriations to reflect pension contribution rates adopted by the pension funding council and the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2 board, and as adjusted under Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5294 (plan 1 UAAL rates).

(2) An increase of 0.12 percent is funded for state employer contributions to the public employees' retirement system, the public safety employees' retirement systems, and the school employees' retirement system. An increase of 0.23 percent for employer contributions to the teachers' retirement system is funded. These increases are provided for the purpose of a one-time, ongoing pension increase for retirees in the public employees' retirement system plan 1 and teachers' retirement system plan 1, as provided in Senate Bill No. 5350 (providing a benefit increase to certain retirees of the public employees' retirement system plan 1 and the teachers' retirement system plan 1). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, this subsection is null and void and appropriations for school districts and state agencies, including institutions of higher education, shall be held in unallotted status.

(3) An increase of 0.13 percent is funded for state employer contributions to the Washington state patrol retirement system and an increase of 0.01 percent is funded for state contributions to the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2 for the provisions of Senate Bill No. 5296 (military service credit). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, this subsection is null and void and appropriations for state agencies shall be held in unallotted status.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 913. The Washington state missing and murdered indigenous women and people task force is established.

(1) The task force is composed of members as provided in this subsection.

(a) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate.

(b) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives.

(c) The governor's office of Indian affairs shall appoint five representatives from federally recognized Indian tribes in Washington state.

(d) The president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives jointly shall appoint the following:

(i) One member representing the Seattle Indian health board;

(ii) One member representing the NATIVE project;

(iii) One member representing Northwest Portland area Indian health board;

(iv) One member representing the American Indian health commission;

(v) Two indigenous women or family members of indigenous women that have experienced violence;

(vi) One member representing the governor's office of Indian affairs;

(vii) The chief of the Washington state patrol or his or her representative;

(viii) One member representing the Washington state office of the attorney general;

(ix) One member representing the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs;

(x) One member representing the Washington state association of counties;

(xi) One member representing the association of Washington cities;

(xii) One member representing the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys; and

(xiii) One representative of the Washington association of criminal defense lawyers.

(e) Where feasible, the task force may invite and consult with any entity, agency, or individual deemed necessary.

(2) The legislative members shall convene the initial meeting of the task force no later than the end of 2023 and thereafter convene:

(a) A minimum of two subsequent meetings annually. The membership shall select the task force's cochairs, which must include one legislator and one nonlegislative member; and

(b) One summit annually.

(3) The task force shall review the laws and policies relating to missing and murdered American Indian and Alaska Native people. The task force shall review current policies and develop recommendations for the purpose of:

(a) Assessing systemic causes behind violence including patterns and underlying historical, social and economic, institutional, and cultural factors which may contribute to disproportionately high levels of violence that occur against American Indian and Alaska Native people and recommending changes to address these systemic causes;

(b) Identifying ways to improve cross-border coordination between law enforcement and federally recognized tribes that share a border with Washington state;

(c) Assessing and recommending improvements to data tracking and reporting practices relating to violence against American Indian and Alaska Native people in Washington state;

(d) Making recommendations and best practices for improving:

(i) The collection and reporting of data by tribal, local, and state law enforcement agencies to more effectively understand and address issues of violence facing American Indian and Alaska Native people;

(ii) Jurisdictional and data-sharing issues on tribal reservation land and urban areas that impact gender-based violence against American Indian and Alaska Native people;

(iii) The collaboration and coordination between law enforcement agencies and federal, state, county, local, and tribal social and health services; and

(iv) Strategies and practices to improve communication and transparency with family members in missing and murdered indigenous women and people cases;

(e) Reviewing prosecutorial trends and practices relating to crimes of violence against American Indian and Alaska Native people in Washington state, identifying disparities, and recommending changes to address such disparities;

(f) Identifying barriers to providing more state resources in tracking and addressing violence against American Indian and Alaska Native people and reducing the incidences of violence;

(g) Assessing and identifying state resources to support programs and services for survivors, impacted family members, and tribal and urban Indian service providers working with American Indian and Alaska Native people who have experienced violence and identifying needs of survivors, impacted family members, and tribal and urban Indian service providers that are not currently being met;

(h) Identifying and making recommendations for increasing state resources for trainings on culturally attuned best practices for working with American Indian and Alaska Native communities for tribal, local, and state law enforcement personnel in Washington state; and

(i) Supporting efforts led by American Indian and Alaska Native people to address this crisis, with the recognition that those personally impacted are already doing critical work to address the impacts of the missing and murdered indigenous women and people crisis in communities and that community-led work must be centered in order to identify and fully address the scope of the issue.

(4) The task force, with the assistance of the Washington state office of the attorney general, must consult with federally recognized tribes in Washington state and in states bordering Washington state, and engage with urban Indian organizations to submit reports to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2023, and June 1, 2025.

(5)(a) The office of the attorney general administers and provides staff support to the task force, organizes the summit required under subsection (2)(b) of this section, and oversees the development of the task force reports required under subsection (4) of this section. The task force and the office of the attorney general shall conduct eight site visits in different locations across the state in collaboration with tribes and native-led organizations. The office of the attorney general may contract for the summit.

(b) The office of the attorney general may, when deemed necessary by the task force, retain consultants to provide data analysis, research, recommendations, training, and other services to the task force for the purposes provided in subsection (3) of this section.

(c) The office of the attorney general may share and exchange information received or created on behalf of the task force with other states, federally recognized Indian tribes, urban Indian organizations, and other national groups working on missing and murdered indigenous women and people issues.

(d) The office of the attorney general must coordinate with the task force to create and update a missing and murdered indigenous women and people resource. The resource must include:

(i) Instructions on how to report a missing indigenous woman or person;

(ii) General information about the investigative processes in missing and murdered indigenous women and people cases;

(iii) Best practices for family members in missing and murdered indigenous women and people cases when working with law enforcement; and

(iv) Other useful information and resources.

(6) Legislative members of the task force are reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members are not entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses if they are elected officials or are participating on behalf of an employer, governmental entity, or other organization. Any reimbursement for other nonlegislative members is subject to chapter 43.03 RCW.

(7) To ensure that the task force has diverse and inclusive representation of those affected by its work, task force members whose participation in the task force may be hampered by financial hardship may be compensated as provided in RCW 43.03.220.

(8) This section expires June 30, 2025.

(9) If Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5477 (murdered indigenous women) is enacted by June 30, 2023, this section is null and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 914. (1) The department of revenue shall facilitate a tax structure work group, initially created within chapter 1, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. (SSB 5883) and hereby reauthorized.

(2)(a) Members serving on the tax structure work group as of the effective date of this section may continue serving on the work group. Any member not wishing to continue serving on the tax structure work group must provide written notice to the work group and the vacancy must be filled as provided in (d) of this subsection.

(b) The work group must include the following voting members:

(i) The president of the senate must appoint two members from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate;

(ii) The speaker of the house of representatives must appoint two members from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives; and

(iii) The governor must appoint one member who represents the office of the governor.

(c) The work group must include the following nonvoting members:

(i) One representative of the department of revenue;

(ii) One representative of the association of Washington cities; and

(iii) One representative of the Washington state association of counties.

(d) Elected officials not reelected to their respective offices, or other members who resign their position with their respective agency, may be relieved of their responsibilities on the tax structure work group. Vacancies on the tax structure work group must be filled within 60 days of notice of the vacancy. The cochairs of the tax structure work group as of the effective date of this section may continue serving as the cochairs of the work group. Should a cochair resign their cochair position, the work group may choose a new chair or cochair from among its legislative membership. The chair is, or cochairs are, responsible for convening the meetings of the work group no less than quarterly each year. Recommendations of the work group may be approved by a simple majority vote. All work group members may have a representative attend meetings of the tax structure work group in lieu of the member, but voting by proxy is not permitted. Staff support for the work group must be provided by the department. The department may engage one or more outside consultants to assist in providing support for the work group. Members of the work group must serve without compensation but may be reimbursed for travel expenses under RCW 44.04.120, 43.03.050, and 43.03.060.

(3) The duties of the work group are to:

(a) Finalize policy recommendations and develop legislation to implement modifications to the tax structure, informed by the findings of the tax structure work group from previous biennia, and the feedback received from taxpayers and other relevant stakeholders on proposals from the tax structure work group considered during the 2023 session that were not enacted into law. Legislative proposals recommended by the work group may not collectively result in a loss of revenue to the state as compared to the November 2023 biennial revenue forecast published by the economic and revenue forecast council. In making the recommendations, the work group must be guided by the following principles for a well-designed tax system: Equity (fairness), adequacy, stability, and transparency;

(b) Host no less than four meetings, in person, unless not practicable, with businesses, local government, and other relevant stakeholders to collect feedback on the legislation proposed in the 2023 session that was not enacted into law; and

(c) Collect feedback on other proposals under consideration by the work group, subject to the availability of funds in the 2023-2025 biennial budget.

(4) Stakeholder meetings of the tax structure work group are to be organized by geographic region with special consideration for regional geographies throughout the state, rural areas, and border communities. Additionally, the work group is directed to host no less than two meetings online with the general public as well as businesses, local government, and other relevant stakeholders. The work group is directed to modify proposals to address the feedback collected during these meetings. Additionally, the work group should:

(a) Encourage legislators to inform their constituents about the public meetings that occur within and near their legislative districts, whether in person or online; and

(b) Inform local elected officials about the public meetings that occur within and near their communities, whether in person or online.

(5) During the 2024 legislative session, it is the intent of the legislature to consider the modified and new proposals, as described in subsection (4) of this section.

(6) The work group is directed to submit a final report by December 31, 2024, that is a compilation of all other reports previously submitted since July 1, 2019, and may include additional content to summarize final activities of the tax structure work group and related legislation, in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, to the appropriate committees of the legislature.

(7) The duties of the department, with the assistance of one or more technical advisory groups or consultants, are to:

(a) Facilitate the tax structure work group and meetings of the work group cochairs;

(b) Conduct engagement with tribal governments regarding the potential impacts of work group proposals on tribal compacts, involving the work group cochairs, as practicable;

(c) Facilitate meetings with the public and relevant stakeholders, as directed in subsection (4) of this section, including language interpretation as needed;

(d) Prepare materials for meetings and other communication with the public and relevant stakeholders, with translation as necessary;

(e) Maintain a website for the tax structure work group during its duration, and transition content to the department website, as appropriate, at the work group's conclusion;

(f) Conduct, to the degree it is practicable, tax incidence analysis of the proposals under consideration to account for the impacts of tax shifting, such as business taxes passed along to consumers; and

(g) Conduct other analysis as directed by the work group.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 915. (1) The office of financial management must convene a task force to identify, plan, and make recommendations on the conversion of the Naselle youth camp property and facilities to an alternate use.

(2) The task force must include representatives appointed by the following entities and organizations:

(a) The Pacific county commissioners;

(b) The tribe located nearest to the facility;

(c) The Naselle-Grays river school district;

(d) Educational service district 112;

(e) The Pacific county sheriff's office;

(f) The Naselle chamber of commerce;

(g) A citizen residing near the Naselle youth camp, chosen by the Pacific county commissioners;

(h) The department of natural resources;

(i) The department of social and health services;

(j) The department of ecology; and

(k) The office of financial management.

(3) The task force must include the state senator and a state representative whose district represents the Naselle community.

(4) The task force must meet at least every other month, and the first meeting must be held by July 31, 2023.

(5) The task force shall report its findings and a prioritized list of recommendations to the governor and the fiscal committees of the legislature June 30, 2024.

(6) Task force members that are not elected officials or a representative of a governmental entity may be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with chapter 43.03 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 916. (1) The criminal justice training commission must convene a technical advisory committee to develop legislative policy recommendations related to vehicular pursuits by law enforcement. The commission is encouraged to invite experts to present to the technical advisory committee including experts in police tactics and academics and researchers in the area of criminal justice.

(2) The commission must ensure that the technical advisory committee is comprised of community and law enforcement stakeholders, including the following:

(a) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs;

(b) The Washington state patrol;

(c) The Washington state fraternal order of police;

(d) The Washington council of police and sheriffs;

(e) The Washington state patrol troopers association;

(f) The international brotherhood of teamsters;

(g) The Washington traffic safety commission;

(h) The Washington federation of state employees;

(i) Families who have lost loved ones as a result of interactions with law enforcement;

(j) An organization advocating for civil rights;

(k) A statewide organization advocating for Black Americans;

(l) A statewide organization advocating for Latinos;

(m) A statewide organization advocating for Asian Americans, Pacific Islanders, and Native Hawaiians;

(n) A federally recognized tribe located in Washington state;

(o) A community organization working on traffic safety issues;

(p) A community organization serving persons who are unhoused;

(q) The faith-based community with advocacy on police accountability;

(r) A statewide organization working on police accountability;

(s) A national organization advocating for policing equity;

(t) The Washington association of prosecuting attorneys;

(u) The Washington association of counties;

(v) The association of Washington cities; and

(w) A scholar from the Seattle University department of criminal justice, criminology, and forensics.

(3) The technical advisory committee shall consider:

(a) The factors to be considered in initiating and terminating a pursuit, and the standards for evaluating the need to initiate or terminate a pursuit including, but not limited to:

(i) The potential for harm or potential danger to others if the fleeing individual evades or escapes immediate custody;

(ii) The seriousness of the offense committed or believed to have been committed by the individual or individuals that are fleeing;

(iii) Consideration of whether the identity of the individual fleeing is known and whether the individual could be apprehended at a later time;

(iv) Safety factors that pose a risk to officers, other motorists, pedestrians, or other third parties;

(v) Vehicular or pedestrian traffic safety and volume;

(vi) Weather and vehicle conditions; and

(vii) Speeds of the pursuit;

(b) The procedures, tactics, and technologies used during pursuits;

(c) The circumstances where officers should consider the use of tactics other than engaging in a pursuit;

(d) The various responsibilities of the pursuing officers, the officers supervising the pursuit, the dispatcher, and air support;

(e) The procedures governing interjurisdictional pursuits;

(f) The procedures governing care of any persons injured in the course of the pursuit;

(g) The contents of law enforcement reports filed related to pursuits;

(h) The procedures used to evaluate each pursuit;

(i) A nationwide review of statewide pursuit policies, training practices, and model policies;

(j) A review of all state and federal government pursuit data collection programs; and

(k) A survey of data currently collected by Washington state law enforcement agencies on pursuits.

(4) A law enforcement agency may submit a preferred policy to the technical advisory committee for its review and consideration.

(5) Committee members are not entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses if they are elected officials or are participating on behalf of an employer, governmental entity, or other organization. Any reimbursement for members is subject to chapter 43.03 RCW.

(6) The commission shall submit a report containing its legislative policy recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature and publish the model policy on its website no later than October 31, 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 917. (1) The jail modernization task force is established, to be composed of the following members:

(a) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate, appointed by the president of the senate;

(b) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;

(c) A representative from the caseload forecast council, as an advisory member;

(d) One member appointed by and representing each of the following:

(i) The governor;

(ii) The department of corrections;

(iii) The sentencing guidelines commission;

(iv) The department of social and health services, representing the behavioral health administration's state hospitals;

(v) The health care authority;

(vi) The criminal justice training commission;

(vii) The superior court judges association;

(viii) The district and municipal court judges association;

(ix) The Washington association of criminal defense attorneys or the Washington defender association;

(x) The Washington association of prosecuting attorneys;

(xi) The Washington state minority and justice commission;

(xii) Disability rights Washington;

(xiii) A behavioral health administrative service organization; and

(xiv) An individual with lived experience; and

(e) Two members appointed by and representing each of the following:

(i) The Washington state association of counties, with one representative from east of the crest of the Cascades and one representative from west of the crest of the Cascades; and

(ii) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, with one representative from east of the crest of the Cascades and one representative from west of the crest of the Cascades.

(2) Any additions or modifications to the membership provided in (1) of this subsection will be informed by the analysis performed by the Washington state institute for public policy and the convening assessment performed by the William D. Ruckelshaus center.

(3) The initial meeting of the task force must be no later than December 1, 2024.

(4) The task force shall review the Washington state institute for public policy's report on jail characteristics, any resulting legislation from the criminal sentencing task force, and any resulting legislation from the Washington state joint legislative task force on jail standards. At a minimum, the task force shall also discuss the following:

(a) Employee retention issues and potential solutions;

(b) The impact of overtime, jail atmosphere, emergency response time, and inexperienced corrections officers, and how to overcome these challenges;

(c) The type of facility needed to house those with behavioral health needs and associated costs of these facilities;

(d) Available diversion programs and their costs;

(e) Types of existing behavioral health facilities for those involved in the criminal justice system, the costs of building and running these facilities, how these facilities vary by location, the viability of offering facilities in every county, and potential system improvements to the types of services and supports offered and delivered to those with behavioral health needs;

(f) The types of services and supports provided to those exiting the jail system; and

(g) What reforms are necessary to create and enhance a seamless transition back to the community following jail confinement.

(5) The task force shall develop a set of statewide jail modernization recommendations to include, at a minimum, identifying existing facilities in need of upgrades or remodel and any need for building new facilities, and potential funding sources or mechanisms to make the recommendations feasible.

(6) Legislative members of the task force are reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members are not entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses if they are elected officials or are participating on behalf of an employer, governmental entity, or other organization. Any reimbursement for other nonlegislative members is subject to chapter 43.03 RCW.

(7) The task force shall submit an initial report, including findings and recommendations, to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by July 1, 2025. The task force shall submit a final report by December 31, 2025.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 918. (1) The fire service delivery work group is established.

(2) The executive director of the Washington fire chiefs or their designee must chair the work group. The work group is composed of the following additional members who serve without compensation or reimbursement for expenses:

(a) The president of the Washington state council of firefighters or the president's designee;

(b) The executive director of the Washington fire commissioners association or the director's designee; and

(c) The president of the Washington state fire fighters' association or the president's designee.

(3) Staff support for the work group must be provided by the department of commerce.

(4) The work group must evaluate existing funding and service delivery models of fire service functions including, but not limited to:

(a) Fire service training and certifications;

(b) Apprenticeships;

(c) Risk mobilization;

(d) Fire prevention;

(e) Inspections and plan review;

(f) Data collection;

(g) Building codes and fire sprinkler and monitoring systems; and

(h) Fireworks and fire safe cigarettes.

(5) The work group must report its findings and recommendations for the future delivery of these functions to the legislature and the governor by December 1, 2023. The work group may also convene a fire service summit to accomplish the goals of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 919. (1) The senate facilities and operations committee and the house of representatives executive rules committee shall convene a legislative task force to examine standards for legislative oversight of declarations of a state of emergency and orders prohibiting certain activities or suspending laws during a state of emergency.

(2) The meetings of the task force must be scheduled and conducted in accordance with the requirements of both the senate and the house of representatives. The expenses of the task force shall be paid jointly by the senate and the house of representatives. Task force meetings and expenditures are subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their successor committees.

(3) The task force shall consist of:

(a) Four members of the senate majority caucus, appointed by the senate majority leader;

(b) Four members of the senate minority caucus, appointed by the senate minority leader;

(c) Four members of the house of representatives majority caucus, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; and

(d) Four members of the house of representatives minority caucus, appointed by the house of representatives minority leader.

(4) The members of the task force shall appoint two members to serve as cochairs. One cochair shall be from the house of representatives and one shall be from the senate. The cochairs shall be from opposite political caucuses.

(5) Members of the task force may be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120.

(6) Staff support for the task force shall be provided by the senate committee services and the house of representatives office of program research.

(7) The task force shall report its findings and recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2023.

(8) This section expires December 31, 2023.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 920. (1)(a) The housing regulation work group is established, with the following members:

(i) The chair and ranking minority member of the house of representatives housing committee and the chair and ranking minority member of the senate housing committee, or their elected official designees;

(ii) The chair and ranking minority member of the house of representatives local government committee and the chair and ranking minority member of the senate local government, land use, and tribal affairs committee, or their elected official designees;

(iii) The chair and ranking minority member of the house of representatives capital budget committee and the vice-chair for capital budget and ranking minority member for capital budget of the senate ways and means committee, or their elected official designees;

(iv) A representative from the department of commerce, the Washington housing finance commission, and the University of Washington's school of public policy;

(v) The president, board chairperson, or nonstaff person appointed by each of the following organizations: Washington state association of counties, association of Washington cities, association of Washington business, habitat for humanity Seattle-King & Kittitas counties, Washington environmental council, building industry association of Washington, master builders association of King or Pierce county, Futurewise, and climate solutions.

(b) Advisory committees may be established as appropriate to provide the task force with perspectives from public, private, and academic organizations.

(c) In addition, the task force shall retain the services of an independent facilitator to assemble, analyze, and present information as directed by the task force.

(d) The task force shall convene its first meeting no later than June 1, 2023, and shall choose two cochairs from among its legislative membership. The task force shall submit an interim report to the governor and legislature not later than November 1, 2023, which shall contain, at minimum, the findings to date of the independent fact finder. The task force shall submit its final report and recommendations for legislative changes, if any, to the governor and the legislature not later than December 1, 2024.

(2) The task force will assess the impact government regulations have on the cost of housing and provide near and long-term recommendations to reduce cost and increase housing supply. The task force shall initially focus its work and analysis on the following topics:

(a) Local zoning regulations and permitting processes;

(b) The growth management act;

(c) Impact fees, sales taxes on construction, and other direct costs for construction;

(d) Building codes; and

(e) Such other subjects or tasks as time and resources allow.

(3) The task force, when appropriate, may consult with individuals from the public and private sectors or ask those individuals to establish one or more advisory committees. Members of these advisory committees are not entitled to expense reimbursement.

(4) The task force may contract with additional persons who have specific technical expertise if that expertise is necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

(5) Staff support for the task force shall be provided by the department of commerce.

(6) Legislative members of the task force shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members, except those representing an employer or organization, are entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(7) The expenses of the task force shall be paid jointly by the senate and the house of representatives. Task force expenditures are subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee and the house executive rules committee, or their successor committees.

Sec. 921. RCW 19.02.210 and 2016 sp.s. c 36 s 916 are each amended to read as follows:

The business license account is created in the state treasury. Unless otherwise indicated in RCW 19.02.075, all receipts from handling and business license delinquency fees must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation beginning in fiscal year 1993. Expenditures from the account may be used only to administer the business licensing service program. During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, moneys from the business license account may be used for operations of the department of revenue. During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the business license account to the state general fund.

Sec. 922. RCW 28B.92.205 and 2022 c 297 s 949 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to other eligibility requirements outlined in this chapter, students who demonstrate financial need are eligible to receive the Washington college grant. Financial need is as follows:

(1) Until academic year 2020-21, students with family incomes between zero and fifty percent of the state median family income, adjusted for family size, shall receive the maximum Washington college grant as defined in RCW 28B.92.030. Grants for students with incomes between fifty-one and seventy percent of the state median family income, adjusted for family size, shall be prorated at the following percentages of the maximum Washington college grant amount:

(a) Seventy percent for students with family incomes between fifty-one and fifty-five percent of the state median family income;

(b) Sixty-five percent for students with family incomes between fifty-six and sixty percent of the state median family income;

(c) Sixty percent for students with family incomes between sixty-one and sixty-five percent of the state median family income; and

(d) Fifty percent for students with family incomes between sixty-six and seventy percent of the state median family income.

(2) Beginning with academic year 2020-21, except during the 2022-23, 2023-24, and 2024-25 academic years, students with family incomes between zero and fifty-five percent of the state median family income, adjusted for family size, shall receive the maximum Washington college grant as defined in RCW 28B.92.030. During the 2022-23, 2023-24, and 2024-25 academic years, students with family incomes between zero and ((60))sixty percent of the state median family income, adjusted for family size, shall receive the maximum Washington college grant. Grants for students with incomes between fifty-six and one hundred percent of the state median family income, adjusted for family size, shall be prorated at the following percentages of the maximum Washington college grant amount:

(a) Seventy percent for students with family incomes between fifty-six and sixty percent of the state median family income, except during the 2022-23, 2023-24, and 2024-25 academic years;

(b) Sixty percent for students with family incomes between sixty-one and sixty-five percent of the state median family income;

(c) Fifty percent for students with family incomes between sixty-six and seventy percent of the state median family income;

(d) Twenty-four and one-half percent for students with family incomes between seventy-one and seventy-five percent of the state median family income; and

(e) Ten percent for students with family incomes between seventy-six and one hundred percent of the state median family income.

Sec. 923. RCW 28B.93.060 and 2022 c 206 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The Washington student loan account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from the Washington student loan program must be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for administration and the issuance of new student loans. Only the executive director of the Washington student achievement council or the executive director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the Washington student loan account to the workforce education investment account.

Sec. 924. RCW 41.05.120 and 2018 c 260 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The public employees' and retirees' insurance account is hereby established in the custody of the state treasurer, to be used by the director for the deposit of contributions, the remittance paid by school districts and educational service districts under RCW 28A.400.410, reserves, dividends, and refunds, for payment of premiums and claims for employee and retiree insurance benefit contracts and subsidy amounts provided under RCW 41.05.085, and transfers from the flexible spending administrative account as authorized in RCW 41.05.123. Moneys from the account shall be disbursed by the state treasurer by warrants on vouchers duly authorized by the director. Moneys from the account may be transferred to the flexible spending administrative account to provide reserves and start-up costs for the operation of the flexible spending administrative account program.

(2) The state treasurer and the state investment board may invest moneys in the public employees' and retirees' insurance account. All such investments shall be in accordance with RCW 43.84.080 or 43.84.150, whichever is applicable. The director shall determine whether the state treasurer or the state investment board or both shall invest moneys in the public employees' and retirees' insurance account.

(3) The school employees' insurance account is hereby established in the custody of the state treasurer, to be used by the director for the deposit of contributions, reserves, dividends, and refunds, for payment of premiums and claims for school employee insurance benefit contracts, and for transfers from the school employees' benefits board flexible spending and dependent care administrative account as authorized in this subsection. Moneys from the account shall be disbursed by the state treasurer by warrants on vouchers duly authorized by the director. Moneys from the account may be transferred to the school employees' benefits board flexible spending and dependent care administrative account to provide reserves and start-up costs for the operation of the school employees' benefits board flexible spending arrangement and dependent care assistance program.

(4) The state treasurer and the state investment board may invest moneys in the school employees' insurance account. These investments must be in accordance with RCW 43.84.080 or 43.84.150, whichever is applicable. The director shall determine whether the state treasurer or the state investment board or both shall invest moneys in the school employees' insurance account.

(5) During fiscal year 2023 and the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, moneys may be transferred between the public employees' and retirees' insurance account and the school employees' insurance account for short-term cash management and cash balance purposes. If Substitute Senate Bill No. 5293 (accounts) is enacted by June 30, 2023, this subsection is null and void.

Sec. 925. RCW 41.26.450 and 2021 c 334 s 965 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Port districts established under Title 53 RCW and institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 shall contribute both the employer and state shares of the cost of the retirement system for any of their employees who are law enforcement officers.

(2) Institutions of higher education shall contribute both the employer and the state shares of the cost of the retirement system for any of their employees who are firefighters.

(3) During fiscal years 2018 and 2019 and during the 2019-2021 ((and)), 2021-2023, and 2023-2025 fiscal biennia:

When an employer charges a fee or recovers costs for work performed by a plan member where:

(a) The member receives compensation that is includable as basic salary under RCW 41.26.030(4)(b); and

(b) The service is provided, whether directly or indirectly, to an entity that is not an "employer" under RCW 41.26.030(14)(b);

the employer shall contribute both the employer and state shares of the cost of the retirement system contributions for that compensation. Nothing in this subsection prevents an employer from recovering the cost of the contribution from the entity receiving services from the member.

Sec. 926. RCW 43.79.555 and 2022 c 157 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The Washington rescue plan transition account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Revenues to the account consist of moneys directed by the legislature to the account. Allowable uses of moneys in the account include responding to the impacts of the COVID-19 pandemic including those related to education, human services, health care, and the economy. In addition, the legislature may appropriate from the account to continue activities begun with, or augmented with, COVID-19 related federal funding. During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the Washington rescue plan transition account to the general fund.

Sec. 927. RCW 43.79.567 and 2022 c 297 s 947 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The community reinvestment account is created in the state treasury. Revenues to the account shall consist of appropriations and transfers by the legislature and all other moneys directed for deposit into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.

(2) Expenditures from the account may be used by the department of commerce for:

(a) Economic development, which includes addressing wealth disparities to promote asset building such as home ownership and expanding access to financial resources including, but not limited to, grants and loans for small businesses and entrepreneurs, financial literacy training, and other small business training and support activities;

(b) Civil and criminal legal assistance to provide postconviction relief and case assistance, including the expungement of criminal records and vacation of criminal convictions;

(c) Community-based violence intervention and prevention services, which may include after-school programs focused on providing education and mentorship to youths; and

(d) Reentry services to facilitate successful transitions for persons formerly incarcerated in an adult correctional facility or juvenile residential facility in Washington.

(3) The distribution of the grants under this section must be done in collaboration with the governor's office of Indian affairs and "by and for community organizations" as defined by the department of commerce and the office of equity. For the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the distribution of grants must be done only in collaboration with "by and for community organizations" as defined by the department of commerce and the office of equity.

Sec. 928. RCW 43.101.200 and 2021 c 334 s 977 and 2021 c 323 s 31 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) All law enforcement personnel, except volunteers, and reserve officers whether paid or unpaid, initially employed on or after January 1, 1978, shall engage in basic law enforcement training which complies with standards adopted by the commission pursuant to RCW 43.101.080. For personnel initially employed before January 1, 1990, such training shall be successfully completed during the first fifteen months of employment of such personnel unless otherwise extended or waived by the commission and shall be requisite to the continuation of such employment. Personnel initially employed on or after January 1, 1990, shall commence basic training during the first six months of employment unless the basic training requirement is otherwise waived or extended by the commission. Successful completion of basic training is requisite to the continuation of employment of such personnel initially employed on or after January 1, 1990.

(2) Except as provided in RCW 43.101.170, the commission shall provide the aforementioned training and shall have the sole authority to do so. The commission shall provide necessary facilities, supplies, materials, and the board and room of noncommuting attendees for seven days per week, except during the 2017-2019, 2019-2021, ((and)) 2021-2023, and 2023-2025 fiscal biennia when the employing, county, city, or state law enforcement agency shall reimburse the commission for twenty-five percent of the cost of training its personnel. Additionally, to the extent funds are provided for this purpose, the commission shall reimburse to participating law enforcement agencies with ten or less full-time commissioned patrol officers the cost of temporary replacement of each officer who is enrolled in basic law enforcement training: PROVIDED, That such reimbursement shall include only the actual cost of temporary replacement not to exceed the total amount of salary and benefits received by the replaced officer during his or her training period.

Sec. 929. RCW 43.320.110 and 2021 c 334 s 982 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is created in the custody of the state treasurer a local fund known as the "financial services regulation fund" which shall consist of all moneys received by the divisions of the department of financial institutions, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

(2) The division of securities shall deposit thirteen percent of all moneys received, except as provided in RCW 43.320.115 and subsection (3) of this section, and which shall be used for the purchase of supplies and necessary equipment; the payment of salaries, wages, and utilities; the establishment of reserves; and other incidental costs required for the proper regulation of individuals and entities subject to regulation by the department.

(3) The division of securities shall deposit one hundred percent of all moneys received that are attributable to increases in fees implemented by rule pursuant to RCW 21.20.340(15).

(4) Disbursements from the fund shall be on authorization of the director of financial institutions or the director's designee. In order to maintain an effective expenditure and revenue control, the fund shall be subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required to permit expenditures and payment of obligations from the fund.

(5) During the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the financial services regulation fund to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund. During the 2017-2019 and 2021-2023 fiscal biennia, moneys from the financial services regulation fund may be appropriated for the family prosperity account program at the department of commerce and for the operations of the department of revenue.

(6)(a) Beginning in the 2020-2021 fiscal year, the state treasurer shall annually transfer from the fund to the student loan advocate account created in RCW 28B.77.008, the greater of one hundred seventy-five thousand dollars or twenty percent of the annual assessment derived from student education loan servicing.

(b) The department must provide information to the state treasurer regarding the amount of the annual assessment derived from student education loan servicing.

(7) The director's obligations or duties under chapter 62, Laws of 2018 are subject to section 21, chapter 62, Laws of 2018.

(8) During the 2019-2021 and 2023-2025 fiscal ((biennium))biennia, moneys in the financial services regulation fund may be appropriated for the operations of the department of revenue. ((It is the intent of the legislature to continue this policy in subsequent biennia.))

(9) During the ((2019-2021 and)) 2021-2023 and 2023-2025 fiscal biennia, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the financial services regulation fund to the general fund. It is the intent of the legislature to continue this policy in subsequent biennia.

Sec. 930. RCW 50.24.014 and 2021 c 2 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) A separate and identifiable account to provide for the financing of special programs to assist the unemployed is established in the administrative contingency fund. All money in this account shall be expended solely for the purposes of this title and for no other purposes whatsoever, except as provided in subsection (4) of this section. Contributions to this account shall accrue and become payable by each employer, except employers as described in RCW 50.44.010 and 50.44.030 who have properly elected to make payments in lieu of contributions, taxable local government employers as described in RCW 50.44.035, and those employers who are required to make payments in lieu of contributions, at a basic rate of two one-hundredths of one percent. The amount of wages subject to tax shall be determined under RCW 50.24.010.

(b) A separate and identifiable account is established in the administrative contingency fund for financing the employment security department's administrative costs under RCW 50.22.150 and 50.22.155 and the costs under RCW 50.22.150(11) and 50.22.155 (1)(m) and (2)(m). All money in this account shall be expended solely for the purposes of this title and for no other purposes whatsoever. Contributions to this account shall accrue and become payable by each employer, except employers as described in RCW 50.44.010 and 50.44.030 who have properly elected to make payments in lieu of contributions, taxable local government employers as described in RCW 50.44.035, those employers who are required to make payments in lieu of contributions, those employers described under RCW 50.29.025(1)(d), and those qualified employers assigned rate class 20 or rate class 40, as applicable, under RCW 50.29.025, at a basic rate of one one-hundredth of one percent. The amount of wages subject to tax shall be determined under RCW 50.24.010. Any amount of contributions payable under this subsection (1)(b) that exceeds the amount that would have been collected at a rate of four one-thousandths of one percent must be deposited in the account created in (a) of this subsection.

(2)(a) Contributions under this section shall become due and be paid by each employer under rules as the commissioner may prescribe, and shall not be deducted, in whole or in part, from the remuneration of individuals in the employ of the employer. Any deduction in violation of this section is unlawful.

(b) In the payment of any contributions under this section, a fractional part of a cent shall be disregarded unless it amounts to one-half cent or more, in which case it shall be increased to one cent.

(3) If the commissioner determines that federal funding has been increased to provide financing for the services specified in chapter 50.62 RCW, the commissioner shall direct that collection of contributions under this section be terminated on the following January 1st.

(4) During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, moneys in the account in subsection (1)(a) of this section may be appropriated for poverty reduction programs that coordinate employment, training, education, and other existing systems designed to assist low-income individuals attain self-sufficiency.

Sec. 931. RCW 70.48.801 and 2021 c 334 s 957 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A joint legislative task force on jail standards is established, with members as provided in this subsection.

(a) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate.

(b) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives.

(c) The president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives jointly shall appoint 13 members representing the interests of: Prosecutors, defense attorneys, law enforcement, counties, cities, jail administrators, superior courts, district and municipal courts, a state designated protection and advocacy agency, medical and mental health service providers, a statewide civil legal aid organization, persons with lived experience, and other entities involved with or interested in the operation of local jails.

(2) The legislative membership shall convene the initial meeting of the task force. The task force shall choose its chair from among its legislative membership.

(3) Staff support for the task force must be provided by the office of the attorney general.

(4)(a) Legislative members of the task force may be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, nonlegislative members are not entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses if they are elected officials or are participating on behalf of an employer, governmental entity, or other organization. Any reimbursement for other nonlegislative members is subject to chapter 43.03 RCW.

(b) Nonlegislative members of the task force who demonstrate financial hardship must be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, as well as other expenses as needed for each day a nonlegislative task force member attends a task force meeting to provide consultative assistance.

(5) The expenses of the task force must be paid jointly by the senate and the house of representatives. Task force expenditures are subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee and the house executive rules committee, or their successor committees.

(6) The task force shall review the following issues:

(a) The adequacy of standards adopted and used by jails including, but not limited to, standards for conditions and operations, inspections, enforcement, and oversight;

(b) Current data on jails in the state including, but not limited to, square footage of living space per individual, jail capacity, average daily population over the previous five years, medical and dental services, mental health services, treatment programming options, accreditation status, use of force incidents over the previous five years, and in-custody deaths and the causes of those deaths;

(c) How the jails in the state compare to jail standards and practices in other states regarding safety and physical conditions; health and welfare; access to medical, mental health, dental care, and substance use disorder treatment; food quality and quantity; use of force; use of solitary confinement; and recreational activities and programming;

(d) The revenue sources and funding mechanisms used by other states to pay for local jails and the kinds of services that are provided to inmates in jails in other states, including identifying the entity that is responsible for financing those services;

(e) Inmate's access to jail telecommunication, electronic media, and commissary services, including the rates and fees charged by the jail for these services that are often borne by families of incarcerated individuals; and

(f) Other issues the task force deems relevant to the conditions of jails.

(7) The task force shall make recommendations regarding:

(a) Statewide minimum jail standards, oversight, or other policy changes to ensure jail conditions meet state and federal constitutional and statutory standards and include adequate safety and welfare safeguards for incarcerated persons and staff; and

(b) Restoration of a statewide authority to set mandatory minimum jail standards and conduct inspections of jails for compliance and enforcement of those standards.

(8) The task force shall consult with organizations and entities with interest or experience in jail standards and operations including, but not limited to, treatment providers, victims' advocates, inmate advocates, organizations representing jail employees and officers, and other community organizations.

(9) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs and representatives from county, city, and regional jails must provide any data or information that is requested by the task force to perform its duties under this section.

(10) The task force shall report findings and recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by ((June 30))December 1, 2023.

Sec. 932. RCW 70A.65.030 and 2022 c 182 s 104 and 2022 c 181 s 13 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Each year or biennium, as appropriate, when allocating funds from the carbon emissions reduction account created in RCW 70A.65.240, the climate commitment account created in RCW 70A.65.260, the natural climate solutions account created in RCW 70A.65.270, the climate investment account created in RCW 70A.65.250, the air quality and health disparities improvement account created in RCW 70A.65.280, the climate transit programs account created in RCW 46.68.500, or the climate active transportation account created in RCW 46.68.490, or administering grants or programs funded by the accounts, agencies shall conduct an environmental justice assessment consistent with the requirements of RCW 70A.02.060 and establish a minimum of not less than 35 percent and a goal of 40 percent of total investments that provide direct and meaningful benefits to vulnerable populations within the boundaries of overburdened communities through: (a) The direct reduction of environmental burdens in overburdened communities; (b) the reduction of disproportionate, cumulative risk from environmental burdens, including those associated with climate change; (c) the support of community led project development, planning, and participation costs; or (d) meeting a community need identified by the community that is consistent with the intent of this chapter or RCW 70A.02.010.

(2) The allocation of funding under subsection (1) of this section must adhere to the following principles, additional to the requirements of RCW 70A.02.080: (a) Benefits and programs should be directed to areas and targeted to vulnerable populations and overburdened communities to reduce statewide disparities; (b) investments and benefits should be made roughly proportional to the health disparities that a specific community experiences, with a goal of eliminating the disparities; (c) investments and programs should focus on creating environmental benefits, including eliminating health burdens, creating community and population resilience, and raising the quality of life of those in the community; and (d) efforts should be made to balance investments and benefits across the state and within counties, local jurisdictions, and unincorporated areas as appropriate to reduce disparities by location and to ensure efforts contribute to a reduction in disparities that exist based on race or ethnicity, socioeconomic status, or other factors.

(3) State agencies allocating funds or administering grants or programs from the carbon emissions reduction account created in RCW 70A.65.240, the climate commitment account created in RCW 70A.65.260, the natural climate solutions account created in RCW 70A.65.270, the climate investment account created in RCW 70A.65.250, the air quality and health disparities improvement account created in RCW 70A.65.280, the climate transit programs account created in RCW 46.68.500, or the climate active transportation account created in RCW 46.68.490, must:

(a) Report annually to the environmental justice council created in RCW 70A.02.110 regarding progress toward meeting environmental justice and environmental health goals;

(b) Consider recommendations by the environmental justice council; and

(c)(i) If the agency is not a covered agency subject to the requirements of chapter 70A.02 RCW, create and adopt a community engagement plan to describe how it will engage with overburdened communities and vulnerable populations in allocating funds or administering grants or programs from the climate investment account. For the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the following agencies and institutions of higher education are exempted from the requirement to create and adopt a community engagement plan: The governor's office of Indian affairs, the office of financial management, the utilities and transportation commission, the military department, the department of archaeology and historical preservation, the department of labor and industries, the employment security department, the workforce training and education coordinating board, the energy facility site evaluation council, the state parks and recreation commission, the environmental and land use hearings office, the department of fish and wildlife, University of Washington, Washington State University, Western Washington University, and the state board for community and technical colleges.

(ii) The plan must include methods for outreach and communication with those who face barriers, language or otherwise, to participation.

Sec. 933. RCW 70A.65.100 and 2022 c 181 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in RCW 70A.65.110, 70A.65.120, and 70A.65.130, the department shall distribute allowances through auctions as provided in this section and in rules adopted by the department to implement these sections. An allowance is not a property right.

(2)(a) The department shall hold a maximum of four auctions annually, plus any necessary reserve auctions. An auction may include allowances from the annual allowance budget of the current year and allowances from the annual allowance budgets from prior years that remain to be distributed. The department must transmit to the environmental justice council an auction notice at least 60 days prior to each auction, as well as a summary results report and a postauction public proceeds report within 60 days after each auction. The department must communicate the results of the previous calendar year's auctions to the environmental justice council on an annual basis beginning in 2024.

(b) The department must make future vintage allowances available through parallel auctions at least twice annually in addition to the auctions through which current vintage allowances are exclusively offered under (a) of this subsection.

(3) The department shall engage a qualified, independent contractor to run the auctions. The department shall also engage a qualified financial services administrator to hold the bid guarantees, evaluate bid guarantees, and inform the department of the value of bid guarantees once the bids are accepted.

(4) Auctions are open to covered entities, opt-in entities, and general market participants that are registered entities in good standing. The department shall adopt by rule the requirements for a registered entity to register and participate in a given auction.

(a) Registered entities intending to participate in an auction must submit an application to participate at least 30 days prior to the auction. The application must include the documentation required for review and approval by the department. A registered entity is eligible to participate only after receiving a notice of approval by the department.

(b) Each registered entity that elects to participate in the auction must have a different representative. Only a representative with an approved auction account is authorized to access the auction platform to submit an application or confirm the intent to bid for the registered entity, submit bids on behalf of the registered entity during the bidding window, or to download reports specific to the auction.

(5) The department may require a bid guarantee, payable to the financial services administrator, in an amount greater than or equal to the sum of the maximum value of the bids to be submitted by the registered entity.

(6) To protect the integrity of the auctions, a registered entity or group of registered entities with a direct corporate association are subject to auction purchase and holding limits. The department may impose additional limits if it deems necessary to protect the integrity and functioning of the auctions:

(a) A covered entity or an opt-in entity may not buy more than 10 percent of the allowances offered during a single auction;

(b) A general market participant may not buy more than four percent of the allowances offered during a single auction and may not in aggregate own more than 10 percent of total allowances to be issued in a calendar year;

(c) No registered entity may buy more than the entity's bid guarantee; and

(d) No registered entity may buy allowances that would exceed the entity's holding limit at the time of the auction.

(7)(a) For fiscal year 2023, upon completion and verification of the auction results, the financial services administrator shall notify winning bidders and transfer the auction proceeds to the state treasurer for deposit as follows: (i) $127,341,000 must first be deposited into the carbon emissions reduction account created in RCW 70A.65.240; and (ii) the remaining auction proceeds to the climate investment account created in RCW 70A.65.250 and the air quality and health disparities improvement account created in RCW 70A.65.280.

(b) For fiscal year 2024, upon completion and verification of the auction results, the financial services administrator shall notify winning bidders and transfer the auction proceeds to the state treasurer for deposit as follows: (i) $356,697,000 must first be deposited into the carbon emissions reduction account created in RCW 70A.65.240, except during fiscal year 2024, the deposit as provided in this subsection (7)(b)(i) may be prorated equally across each of the auctions occurring in fiscal year 2024; and (ii) the remaining auction proceeds to the climate investment account created in RCW 70A.65.250 and the air quality and health disparities improvement account created in RCW 70A.65.280, which may be prorated equally across each of the auctions occurring in fiscal year 2024.

(c) For fiscal year 2025, upon completion and verification of the auction results, the financial services administrator shall notify winning bidders and transfer the auction proceeds to the state treasurer for deposit as follows: (i) $366,558,000 must first be deposited into the carbon emissions reduction account created in RCW 70A.65.240, except that during fiscal year 2025, the deposit as provided in this subsection (7)(c)(i) may be prorated equally across each of the auctions occurring in fiscal year 2025; and (ii) the remaining auction proceeds to the climate investment account created in RCW 70A.65.250 and the air quality and health disparities improvement account created in RCW 70A.65.280, which may be prorated equally across each of the auctions occurring in fiscal year 2025.

(d) For fiscal years 2026 through 2037, upon completion and verification of the auction results, the financial services administrator shall notify winning bidders and transfer the auction proceeds to the state treasurer for deposit as follows: (i) $359,117,000 per year must first be deposited into the carbon emissions reduction account created in RCW 70A.65.240; and (ii) the remaining auction proceeds to the climate investment account created in RCW 70A.65.250 and the air quality and health disparities improvement account created in RCW 70A.65.280.

(e) The deposits into the carbon emissions reduction account pursuant to (a) through (d) of this subsection must not exceed $5,200,000,000 over the first 16 fiscal years and any remaining auction proceeds must be deposited into the climate investment account created in RCW 70A.65.250 and the air quality and health disparities improvement account created in RCW 70A.65.280.

(f) For fiscal year 2038 and each year thereafter, upon completion and verification of the auction results, the financial services administrator shall notify winning bidders and transfer the auction proceeds to the state treasurer for deposit as follows: (i) 50 percent of the auction proceeds to the carbon emissions reduction account created in RCW 70A.65.240; and (ii) the remaining auction proceeds to the climate investment account created in RCW 70A.65.250 and the air quality and health disparities improvement account created in RCW 70A.65.280.

(8) The department shall adopt by rule provisions to guard against bidder collusion and minimize the potential for market manipulation. A registered entity may not release or disclose any bidding information including: Intent to participate or refrain from participation; auction approval status; intent to bid; bidding strategy; bid price or bid quantity; or information on the bid guarantee provided to the financial services administrator. The department may cancel or restrict a previously approved auction participation application or reject a new application if the department determines that a registered entity has:

(a) Provided false or misleading facts;

(b) Withheld material information that could influence a decision by the department;

(c) Violated any part of the auction rules;

(d) Violated registration requirements; or

(e) Violated any of the rules regarding the conduct of the auction.

(9) Records containing the following information are confidential and are exempt from public disclosure in their entirety:

(a) Bidding information as identified in subsection (8) of this section;

(b) Information contained in the secure, online electronic tracking system established by the department pursuant to RCW 70A.65.090(6);

(c) Financial, proprietary, and other market sensitive information as determined by the department that is submitted to the department pursuant to this chapter;

(d) Financial, proprietary, and other market sensitive information as determined by the department that is submitted to the independent contractor or the financial services administrator engaged by the department pursuant to subsection (3) of this section; and

(e) Financial, proprietary, and other market sensitive information as determined by the department that is submitted to a jurisdiction with which the department has entered into a linkage agreement pursuant to RCW 70A.65.210, and which is shared with the department, the independent contractor, or the financial services administrator pursuant to a linkage agreement.

(10) Any cancellation or restriction approved by the department under subsection (8) of this section may be permanent or for a specified number of auctions and the cancellation or restriction imposed is not exclusive and is in addition to the remedies that may be available pursuant to chapter 19.86 RCW or other state or federal laws, if applicable.

(11) The department shall design allowance auctions so as to allow, to the maximum extent practicable, linking with external greenhouse gas emissions trading programs in other jurisdictions and to facilitate the transfer of allowances when the state's program has entered into a linkage agreement with other external greenhouse gas emissions trading programs. The department may conduct auctions jointly with linked jurisdictions.

(12) In setting the number of allowances offered at each auction, the department shall consider the allowances in the marketplace due to the marketing of allowances issued as required under RCW 70A.65.110, 70A.65.120, and 70A.65.130 in the department's determination of the number of allowances to be offered at auction. The department shall offer only such number of allowances at each auction as will enhance the likelihood of achieving the goals of RCW 70A.45.020.

Sec. 934. RCW 70A.65.250 and 2022 c 253 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The climate investment account is created in the state treasury. Except as otherwise provided in chapter 316, Laws of 2021, all receipts from the auction of allowances authorized in this chapter must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.

(b) Projects or activities funded from the account must meet high labor standards, including family sustaining wages, providing benefits including health care and employer-contributed retirement plans, career development opportunities, and maximize access to economic benefits from such projects for local workers and diverse businesses. Each contracting entity's proposal must be reviewed for equity and opportunity improvement efforts, including: (i) Employer paid sick leave programs; (ii) pay practices in relation to living wage indicators such as the federal poverty level; (iii) efforts to evaluate pay equity based on gender identity, race, and other protected status under Washington law; (iv) facilitating career development opportunities, such as apprenticeship programs, internships, job-shadowing, and on-the-job training; and (v) employment assistance and employment barriers for justice affected individuals.

(2) Moneys in the account may be used only for projects and programs that achieve the purposes of the greenhouse gas emissions cap and invest program established under this chapter and for tribal capacity grants under RCW 70A.65.305. Moneys in the account as described in this subsection must first be appropriated for the administration of the requirements of this chapter, in an amount not to exceed five percent of the total receipt of funds from allowance auction proceeds under this chapter. Beginning July 1, ((2024))2023, and annually thereafter, the state treasurer shall distribute funds in the account that exceed the amounts appropriated for the purposes of this subsection (2) as follows:

(a) Seventy-five percent of the moneys to the climate commitment account created in RCW 70A.65.260; and

(b) Twenty-five percent of the moneys to the natural climate solutions account created in RCW 70A.65.270.

(3) The allocations specified in subsection (2)(a) and (b) of this section must be reviewed by the legislature on a biennial basis based on the changing needs of the state in meeting its clean economy and greenhouse gas reduction goals in a timely, economically advantageous, and equitable manner.

Sec. 935. RCW 70A.305.180 and 2021 c 334 s 988 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The model toxics control operating account is hereby created in the state treasury.

(2) Moneys in the model toxics control operating account must be used only to carry out the purposes of this chapter, including but not limited to the following:

(a) The state's responsibility for hazardous waste planning, management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public education required under chapter 70A.300 RCW;

(b) The state's responsibility for solid waste planning, management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public education required under chapter 70A.205 RCW;

(c) The hazardous waste clean-up program required under this chapter;

(d) State matching funds required under federal cleanup law;

(e) Financial assistance for local programs and plans, including local solid waste financial assistance, in accordance with chapters 70A.405, 70A.205, 70A.214, 70A.224, and 70A.300 RCW;

(f) State government programs for the safe reduction, recycling, or disposal of paint and hazardous wastes from households, small businesses, and agriculture;

(g) Oil and hazardous materials spill prevention, preparedness, training, and response activities;

(h) Water and environmental health protection and monitoring programs;

(i) Programs authorized under chapter 70A.135 RCW;

(j) A public participation program;

(k) Development and demonstration of alternative management technologies designed to carry out the hazardous waste management priorities of RCW 70A.300.260;

(l) State agriculture and health programs for the safe use, reduction, recycling, or disposal of pesticides;

(m) Funding requirements to maintain receipt of federal funds under the federal solid waste disposal act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 6901 et seq.);

(n) Air quality programs and actions for reducing public exposure to toxic air pollution;

(o) Petroleum-based plastic or expanded polystyrene foam debris clean-up activities in fresh or marine waters; ((and))

(p) For the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, and solely to continue the policy of previous biennia, forest practices at the department of natural resources; and

(q) For the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, for department of ecology programs and operations.

(3) Except for unanticipated receipts under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, moneys in model toxics control operating account may be spent only after appropriation by statute.

(4) One percent of the moneys collected under RCW 82.21.030 must be allocated only for public participation grants to persons who may be adversely affected by a release or threatened release of a hazardous substance and to not-for-profit public interest organizations. The primary purpose of these grants is to facilitate the participation by persons and organizations in the investigation and remedying of releases or threatened releases of hazardous substances and to implement the state's solid and hazardous waste management priorities. No grant may exceed sixty thousand dollars. Grants may be renewed annually. Moneys appropriated for public participation that are not expended at the close of any biennium revert to the model toxics control operating account.

(5) The department must adopt rules for grant or loan issuance and performance.

Sec. 936. RCW 71.24.580 and 2022 c 297 s 964 and 2022 c 157 s 18 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) The criminal justice treatment account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be expended solely for: (a) Substance use disorder treatment and treatment support services for offenders with a substance use disorder that, if not treated, would result in addiction, against whom charges are filed by a prosecuting attorney in Washington state; (b) the provision of substance use disorder treatment services and treatment support services for nonviolent offenders within a drug court program and, during the 2021-2023 and 2023-2025 fiscal ((biennium))biennia, for 180 days following graduation from the drug court program; and (c) the administrative and overhead costs associated with the operation of a drug court. Amounts provided in this subsection must be used for treatment and recovery support services for criminally involved offenders and authorization of these services shall not be subject to determinations of medical necessity. During the 2019-2021 and 2021-2023 fiscal biennia, funding from the criminal justice treatment account may be used to provide treatment and support services through the conclusion of an individual's treatment plan to individuals participating in a drug court program as of February 24, 2021, if that individual wishes to continue treatment following dismissal of charges they were facing under RCW 69.50.4013(1). Such participation is voluntary and contingent upon substantial compliance with drug court program requirements. The legislature may appropriate from the account for municipal drug courts and increased treatment options. During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the criminal justice treatment account to the home security fund account created in RCW 43.185C.060. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.

(2) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Treatment" means services that are critical to a participant's successful completion of his or her substance use disorder treatment program, including but not limited to the recovery support and other programmatic elements outlined in RCW 2.30.030 authorizing therapeutic courts; and

(b) "Treatment support" includes transportation to or from inpatient or outpatient treatment services when no viable alternative exists, and child care services that are necessary to ensure a participant's ability to attend outpatient treatment sessions.

(3) Revenues to the criminal justice treatment account consist of: (a) Funds transferred to the account pursuant to this section; and (b) any other revenues appropriated to or deposited in the account.

(4)(a) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2005, and each subsequent fiscal year, the state treasurer shall transfer eight million two hundred fifty thousand dollars from the general fund to the criminal justice treatment account, divided into four equal quarterly payments. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2006, and each subsequent fiscal year, the amount transferred shall be increased on an annual basis by the implicit price deflator as published by the federal bureau of labor statistics.

(b) In each odd-numbered year, the legislature shall appropriate the amount transferred to the criminal justice treatment account in (a) of this subsection to the department for the purposes of subsection (5) of this section.

(5) Moneys appropriated to the authority from the criminal justice treatment account shall be distributed as specified in this subsection. The authority may retain up to three percent of the amount appropriated under subsection (4)(b) of this section for its administrative costs.

(a) Seventy percent of amounts appropriated to the authority from the account shall be distributed to counties pursuant to the distribution formula adopted under this section. The authority, in consultation with the department of corrections, the Washington state association of counties, the Washington state association of drug court professionals, the superior court judges' association, the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, representatives of the criminal defense bar, representatives of substance use disorder treatment providers, and any other person deemed by the authority to be necessary, shall establish a fair and reasonable methodology for distribution to counties of moneys in the criminal justice treatment account. County or regional plans submitted for the expenditure of formula funds must be approved by the panel established in (b) of this subsection.

(b) Thirty percent of the amounts appropriated to the authority from the account shall be distributed as grants for purposes of treating offenders against whom charges are filed by a county prosecuting attorney. The authority shall appoint a panel of representatives from the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, the superior court judges' association, the Washington state association of counties, the Washington defender's association or the Washington association of criminal defense lawyers, the department of corrections, the Washington state association of drug court professionals, and substance use disorder treatment providers. The panel shall review county or regional plans for funding under (a) of this subsection and grants approved under this subsection. The panel shall attempt to ensure that treatment as funded by the grants is available to offenders statewide.

(6) The county alcohol and drug coordinator, county prosecutor, county sheriff, county superior court, a substance abuse treatment provider appointed by the county legislative authority, a member of the criminal defense bar appointed by the county legislative authority, and, in counties with a drug court, a representative of the drug court shall jointly submit a plan, approved by the county legislative authority or authorities, to the panel established in subsection (5)(b) of this section, for disposition of all the funds provided from the criminal justice treatment account within that county. The submitted plan should incorporate current evidence-based practices in substance use disorder treatment. The funds shall be used solely to provide approved alcohol and substance use disorder treatment pursuant to RCW 71.24.560 and treatment support services. No more than ten percent of the total moneys received under subsections (4) and (5) of this section by a county or group of counties participating in a regional agreement shall be spent for treatment support services.

(7) Counties are encouraged to consider regional agreements and submit regional plans for the efficient delivery of treatment under this section.

(8) Moneys allocated under this section shall be used to supplement, not supplant, other federal, state, and local funds used for substance abuse treatment.

(9) If a region or county uses criminal justice treatment account funds to support a therapeutic court, the therapeutic court must allow the use of all medications approved by the federal food and drug administration for the treatment of opioid use disorder as deemed medically appropriate for a participant by a medical professional. If appropriate medication-assisted treatment resources are not available or accessible within the jurisdiction, the health care authority's designee for assistance must assist the court with acquiring the resource.

(10) Counties must meet the criteria established in RCW 2.30.030(3).

(11) The authority shall annually review and monitor the expenditures made by any county or group of counties that receives appropriated funds distributed under this section. Counties shall repay any funds that are not spent in accordance with the requirements of its contract with the authority.

Sec. 937. RCW 74.46.561 and 2023 c ... s 1903 (section 1903 of this act) are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature adopts a new system for establishing nursing home payment rates beginning July 1, 2016. Any payments to nursing homes for services provided after June 30, 2016, must be based on the new system. The new system must be designed in such a manner as to decrease administrative complexity associated with the payment methodology, reward nursing homes providing care for high acuity residents, incentivize quality care for residents of nursing homes, and establish minimum staffing standards for direct care.

(2) The new system must be based primarily on industry-wide costs, and have three main components: Direct care, indirect care, and capital.

(3)(a) The direct care component must include the direct care and therapy care components of the previous system, along with food, laundry, and dietary services. Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, direct care must be paid at a fixed rate, based on one hundred percent or greater of statewide case mix neutral median costs, but shall be capped so that a nursing home provider's direct care rate does not exceed 118 percent of its base year's direct care allowable costs except if the provider is below the minimum staffing standard established in RCW 74.42.360(2). ((The legislature intends to remove the cap on direct care rates by June 30, 2027.)) Direct care must be performance-adjusted for acuity every six months, using case mix principles. Direct care must be regionally adjusted using countywide wage index information available through the United States department of labor's bureau of labor statistics. There is no minimum occupancy for direct care. The direct care component rate allocations calculated in accordance with this section must be adjusted to the extent necessary to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

(b) Unless a nursing home provider is below the minimum staffing standard established in RCW 74.42.360(2), a provider's direct care rate relative to its base year's direct care allowable costs must be capped as follows:

(i) For fiscal year 2023, the cap must not exceed 165 percent;

(ii) For fiscal year 2024, the cap must not exceed 153 percent; and

(iii) For fiscal year 2025, the cap must not exceed 142 percent.

(4)(a) The indirect care component must include the elements of administrative expenses, maintenance costs, and housekeeping services from the previous system. Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, a minimum occupancy assumption of ninety percent must be applied to indirect care. Indirect care must be paid at a fixed rate, based on ninety percent or greater of statewide median costs. The indirect care component rate allocations calculated in accordance with this section must be adjusted to the extent necessary to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

(b) A minimum occupancy assumption must be applied to indirect care as follows:

(i) For fiscal year 2023, the assumption must be 75 percent;

(ii) For fiscal year 2024, the assumption must be 75 percent; and

(iii) For fiscal year 2025, the assumption must be 80 percent.

(5) The capital component must use a fair market rental system to set a price per bed. The capital component must be adjusted for the age of the facility, and must use a minimum occupancy assumption of ninety percent.

(a) Beginning July 1, 2016, the fair rental rate allocation for each facility must be determined by multiplying the allowable nursing home square footage in (c) of this subsection by the RSMeans rental rate in (d) of this subsection and by the number of licensed beds yielding the gross unadjusted building value. An equipment allowance of ten percent must be added to the unadjusted building value. The sum of the unadjusted building value and equipment allowance must then be reduced by the average age of the facility as determined by (e) of this subsection using a depreciation rate of one and one-half percent. The depreciated building and equipment plus land valued at ten percent of the gross unadjusted building value before depreciation must then be multiplied by the rental rate at seven and one-half percent to yield an allowable fair rental value for the land, building, and equipment.

(b) The fair rental value determined in (a) of this subsection must be divided by the greater of the actual total facility census from the prior full calendar year or imputed census based on the number of licensed beds at ninety percent occupancy.

(c) For the rate year beginning July 1, 2016, all facilities must be reimbursed using four hundred square feet. For the rate year beginning July 1, 2017, allowable nursing facility square footage must be determined using the total nursing facility square footage as reported on the medicaid cost reports submitted to the department in compliance with this chapter. The maximum allowable square feet per bed may not exceed four hundred fifty.

(d) Each facility must be paid at eighty-three percent or greater of the median nursing facility RSMeans construction index value per square foot. The department may use updated RSMeans construction index information when more recent square footage data becomes available. The statewide value per square foot must be indexed based on facility zip code by multiplying the statewide value per square foot times the appropriate zip code based index. For the purpose of implementing this section, the value per square foot effective July 1, 2016, must be set so that the weighted average fair rental value rate is not less than ten dollars and eighty cents per patient day. The capital component rate allocations calculated in accordance with this section must be adjusted to the extent necessary to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

(e) The average age is the actual facility age reduced for significant renovations. Significant renovations are defined as those renovations that exceed two thousand dollars per bed in a calendar year as reported on the annual cost report submitted in accordance with this chapter. For the rate beginning July 1, 2016, the department shall use renovation data back to 1994 as submitted on facility cost reports. Beginning July 1, 2016, facility ages must be reduced in future years if the value of the renovation completed in any year exceeds two thousand dollars times the number of licensed beds. The cost of the renovation must be divided by the accumulated depreciation per bed in the year of the renovation to determine the equivalent number of new replacement beds. The new age for the facility is a weighted average with the replacement bed equivalents reflecting an age of zero and the existing licensed beds, minus the new bed equivalents, reflecting their age in the year of the renovation. At no time may the depreciated age be less than zero or greater than forty-four years.

(f) A nursing facility's capital component rate allocation must be rebased annually, effective July 1, 2016, in accordance with this section and this chapter.

(g) For the purposes of this subsection (5), "RSMeans" means building construction costs data as published by Gordian.

(6) A quality incentive must be offered as a rate enhancement beginning July 1, 2016.

(a) An enhancement no larger than five percent and no less than one percent of the statewide average daily rate must be paid to facilities that meet or exceed the standard established for the quality incentive. All providers must have the opportunity to earn the full quality incentive payment.

(b) The quality incentive component must be determined by calculating an overall facility quality score composed of four to six quality measures. For fiscal year 2017 there shall be four quality measures, and for fiscal year 2018 there shall be six quality measures. Initially, the quality incentive component must be based on minimum data set quality measures for the percentage of long-stay residents who self-report moderate to severe pain, the percentage of high-risk long-stay residents with pressure ulcers, the percentage of long-stay residents experiencing one or more falls with major injury, and the percentage of long-stay residents with a urinary tract infection. Quality measures must be reviewed on an annual basis by a stakeholder work group established by the department. Upon review, quality measures may be added or changed. The department may risk adjust individual quality measures as it deems appropriate.

(c) The facility quality score must be point based, using at a minimum the facility's most recent available three-quarter average centers for medicare and medicaid services quality data. Point thresholds for each quality measure must be established using the corresponding statistical values for the quality measure point determinants of eighty quality measure points, sixty quality measure points, forty quality measure points, and twenty quality measure points, identified in the most recent available five-star quality rating system technical user's guide published by the centers for medicare and medicaid services.

(d) Facilities meeting or exceeding the highest performance threshold (top level) for a quality measure receive twenty-five points. Facilities meeting the second highest performance threshold receive twenty points. Facilities meeting the third level of performance threshold receive fifteen points. Facilities in the bottom performance threshold level receive no points. Points from all quality measures must then be summed into a single aggregate quality score for each facility.

(e) Facilities receiving an aggregate quality score of eighty percent of the overall available total score or higher must be placed in the highest tier (tier V), facilities receiving an aggregate score of between seventy and seventy-nine percent of the overall available total score must be placed in the second highest tier (tier IV), facilities receiving an aggregate score of between sixty and sixty-nine percent of the overall available total score must be placed in the third highest tier (tier III), facilities receiving an aggregate score of between fifty and fifty-nine percent of the overall available total score must be placed in the fourth highest tier (tier II), and facilities receiving less than fifty percent of the overall available total score must be placed in the lowest tier (tier I).

(f) The tier system must be used to determine the amount of each facility's per patient day quality incentive component. The per patient day quality incentive component for tier IV is seventy-five percent of the per patient day quality incentive component for tier V, the per patient day quality incentive component for tier III is fifty percent of the per patient day quality incentive component for tier V, and the per patient day quality incentive component for tier II is twenty-five percent of the per patient day quality incentive component for tier V. Facilities in tier I receive no quality incentive component.

(g) Tier system payments must be set in a manner that ensures that the entire biennial appropriation for the quality incentive program is allocated.

(h) Facilities with insufficient three-quarter average centers for medicare and medicaid services quality data must be assigned to the tier corresponding to their five-star quality rating. Facilities with a five-star quality rating must be assigned to the highest tier (tier V) and facilities with a one-star quality rating must be assigned to the lowest tier (tier I). The use of a facility's five-star quality rating shall only occur in the case of insufficient centers for medicare and medicaid services minimum data set information.

(i) The quality incentive rates must be adjusted semiannually on July 1 and January 1 of each year using, at a minimum, the most recent available three-quarter average centers for medicare and medicaid services quality data.

(j) Beginning July 1, 2017, the percentage of short-stay residents who newly received an antipsychotic medication must be added as a quality measure. The department must determine the quality incentive thresholds for this quality measure in a manner consistent with those outlined in (b) through (h) of this subsection using the centers for medicare and medicaid services quality data.

(k) Beginning July 1, 2017, the percentage of direct care staff turnover must be added as a quality measure using the centers for medicare and medicaid services' payroll-based journal and nursing home facility payroll data. Turnover is defined as an employee departure. The department must determine the quality incentive thresholds for this quality measure using data from the centers for medicare and medicaid services' payroll-based journal, unless such data is not available, in which case the department shall use direct care staffing turnover data from the most recent medicaid cost report.

(7) Reimbursement of the safety net assessment imposed by chapter 74.48 RCW and paid in relation to medicaid residents must be continued.

(8)(a) The direct care and indirect care components must be rebased in even-numbered years, beginning with rates paid on July 1, 2016. Rates paid on July 1, 2016, must be based on the 2014 calendar year cost report. On a percentage basis, after rebasing, the department must confirm that the statewide average daily rate has increased at least as much as the average rate of inflation, as determined by the skilled nursing facility market basket index published by the centers for medicare and medicaid services, or a comparable index. If after rebasing, the percentage increase to the statewide average daily rate is less than the average rate of inflation for the same time period, the department is authorized to increase rates by the difference between the percentage increase after rebasing and the average rate of inflation.

(b) It is the intention of the legislature that direct and indirect care rates paid in fiscal year 2022 will be rebased using the calendar year 2019 cost reports. For fiscal year 2021, in addition to the rates generated by (a) of this subsection, an additional adjustment is provided as established in this subsection (8)(b). Beginning May 1, 2020, and through June 30, 2021, the calendar year costs must be adjusted for inflation by a twenty-four month consumer price index, based on the most recently available monthly index for all urban consumers, as published by the bureau of labor statistics. It is also the intent of the legislature that, starting in fiscal year 2022, a facility-specific rate add-on equal to the inflation adjustment that facilities received solely in fiscal year 2021, must be added to the rate. For fiscal year 2024, the direct care and indirect care components shall be rebased to the 2021 calendar year cost report plus a six percent adjustment for inflation. For fiscal year 2025, the direct and indirect care components shall be rebased to the 2022 calendar year cost report plus a five percent adjustment for inflation.

(c) To determine the necessity of regular inflationary adjustments to the nursing facility rates, by December 1, 2020, the department shall provide the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature with a report that provides a review of rates paid in 2017, 2018, and 2019 in comparison to costs incurred by nursing facilities.

(9) The direct care component provided in subsection (3) of this section is subject to the reconciliation and settlement process provided in RCW 74.46.022(6). Beginning July 1, 2016, pursuant to rules established by the department, funds that are received through the reconciliation and settlement process provided in RCW 74.46.022(6) must be used for technical assistance, specialized training, or an increase to the quality enhancement established in subsection (6) of this section. The legislature intends to review the utility of maintaining the reconciliation and settlement process under a price-based payment methodology, and may discontinue the reconciliation and settlement process after the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium.

(10) Compared to the rate in effect June 30, 2016, including all cost components and rate add-ons, no facility may receive a rate reduction of more than one percent on July 1, 2016, more than two percent on July 1, 2017, or more than five percent on July 1, 2018. To ensure that the appropriation for nursing homes remains cost neutral, the department is authorized to cap the rate increase for facilities in fiscal years 2017, 2018, and 2019.

(11) It is the intent of the legislature that a rate add-on be applied to the weighted average nursing facility payment rate referenced in the omnibus operating appropriations act in an amount necessary to ensure that the weighted average nursing facility payment rate for fiscal year 2026 is equal to the weighted average nursing facility payment rate for fiscal year 2025.

Sec. 938. RCW 79.64.040 and 2021 c 334 s 994 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board shall determine the amount deemed necessary in order to achieve the purposes of this chapter and shall provide by rule for the deduction of this amount from the moneys received from all leases, sales, contracts, licenses, permits, easements, and rights-of-way issued by the department and affecting state lands and aquatic lands, except as provided in RCW 79.64.130, provided that no deduction shall be made from the proceeds from agricultural college lands.

(2) Moneys received as deposits from successful bidders, advance payments, and security under RCW 79.15.100, 79.15.080, and 79.11.150 prior to December 1, 1981, which have not been subjected to deduction under this section are not subject to deduction under this section.

(3) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5) of this section, the deductions authorized under this section shall not exceed twenty-five percent of the moneys received by the department in connection with any one transaction pertaining to state lands and aquatic lands other than second-class tide and shore lands and the beds of navigable waters, and fifty percent of the moneys received by the department pertaining to second-class tide and shore lands and the beds of navigable waters.

(4) In the event that the department sells logs using the contract harvesting process described in RCW 79.15.500 through 79.15.530, the moneys received subject to this section are the net proceeds from the contract harvesting sale.

(5) During the 2015-2017, 2017-2019, 2019-2021, ((and)) 2021-2023, and 2023-2025 fiscal biennia, the board may increase the twenty-five percent limitation up to thirty-two percent.

Sec. 939. RCW 79.64.110 and 2021 c 334 s 995 and 2021 c 145 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Any moneys derived from the lease of state forestlands or from the sale of valuable materials, oils, gases, coal, minerals, or fossils from those lands, except as provided in RCW 79.64.130, or the appraised value of these resources when transferred to a public agency under RCW 79.22.060, except as provided in RCW 79.22.060(4), must be distributed as follows:

(a) For state forestlands acquired through RCW 79.22.040 or by exchange for lands acquired through RCW 79.22.040:

(i) The expense incurred by the state for administration, reforestation, and protection, not to exceed twenty-five percent, which rate of percentage shall be determined by the board, must be returned to the forest development account created in RCW 79.64.100. During the 2017-2019, 2019-2021, ((and)) 2021-2023, and 2023-2025 fiscal biennia, the board may increase the twenty-five percent limitation up to twenty-seven percent.

(ii) Any balance remaining must be paid to the county in which the land is located or, for counties participating in a land pool created under RCW 79.22.140, to each participating county proportionate to its contribution of asset value to the land pool as determined by the board. Payments made under this subsection are to be paid, distributed, and prorated, except as otherwise provided in this section, to the various funds in the same manner as general taxes are paid and distributed during the year of payment. However, in order to test county flexibility in distributing state forestland revenue, a county may in its discretion pay, distribute, and prorate payments made under this subsection of moneys derived from state forestlands acquired by exchange between July 28, 2019, and June 30, 2020, for lands acquired through RCW 79.22.040, within the same county, in the same manner as general taxes are paid and distributed during the year of payment for the former state forestlands that were subject to the exchange.

(iii) Any balance remaining, paid to a county with a population of less than sixteen thousand, must first be applied to the reduction of any indebtedness existing in the current expense fund of the county during the year of payment.

(iv) With regard to moneys remaining under this subsection (1)(a), within seven working days of receipt of these moneys, the department shall certify to the state treasurer the amounts to be distributed to the counties. The state treasurer shall distribute funds to the counties four times per month, with no more than ten days between each payment date.

(b) For state forestlands acquired through RCW 79.22.010 or by exchange for lands acquired through RCW 79.22.010, except as provided in RCW 79.64.120:

(i) Fifty percent shall be placed in the forest development account.

(ii) Fifty percent shall be prorated and distributed to the state general fund, to be dedicated for the benefit of the public schools, to the county in which the land is located or, for counties participating in a land pool created under RCW 79.22.140, to each participating county proportionate to its contribution of asset value to the land pool as determined by the board, and according to the relative proportions of tax levies of all taxing districts in the county. The portion to be distributed to the state general fund shall be based on the regular school levy rate under RCW 84.52.065 (1) and (2) and the levy rate for any school district enrichment levies. With regard to the portion to be distributed to the counties, the department shall certify to the state treasurer the amounts to be distributed within seven working days of receipt of the money. The state treasurer shall distribute funds to the counties four times per month, with no more than ten days between each payment date. The money distributed to the county must be paid, distributed, and prorated to the various other funds in the same manner as general taxes are paid and distributed during the year of payment.

(2) A school district may transfer amounts deposited in its debt service fund pursuant to this section into its capital projects fund as authorized in RCW 28A.320.330.

Sec. 940. RCW 79A.25.210 and 2021 c 334 s 997 are each amended to read as follows:

The firearms range account is hereby created in the state general fund. Moneys in the account shall be subject to legislative appropriation and shall be used for purchase and development of land, construction or improvement of range facilities, including fixed structure construction or remodeling, equipment purchase, safety or environmental improvements, noise abatement, and liability protection for public and nonprofit firearm range training and practice facilities.

Grant funds shall not be used for expendable shooting supplies, or normal operating expenses. In making grants, the board shall give priority to projects for noise abatement or safety improvement. Grant funds shall not supplant funds for other organization programs.

The funds will be available to nonprofit shooting organizations, school districts, and state, county, or local governments on a match basis. All entities receiving matching funds must be open on a regular basis and usable by law enforcement personnel or the general public who possess Washington concealed pistol licenses or Washington hunting licenses or who are enrolled in a firearm safety class.

Applicants for a grant from the firearms range account shall provide matching funds in either cash or in-kind contributions. The match must represent one dollar in value for each one dollar of the grant except that in the case of a grant for noise abatement or safety improvements the match must represent one dollar in value for each two dollars of the grant. In-kind contributions include but are not limited to labor, materials, and new property. Existing assets and existing development may not apply to the match.

Applicants other than school districts or local or state government must be registered as a nonprofit or not-for-profit organization with the Washington secretary of state. The organization's articles of incorporation must contain provisions for the organization's structure, officers, legal address, and registered agent.

Organizations requesting grants must provide the hours of range availability for public and law enforcement use. The fee structure will be submitted with the grant application.

Any nonprofit organization or agency accepting a grant under this program will be required to pay back the entire grant amount to the firearms range account if the use of the range facility is discontinued less than ten years after the grant is accepted.

Entities receiving grants must make the facilities for which grant funding is received open for hunter safety education classes and firearm safety classes on a regular basis for no fee.

Government units or school districts applying for grants must open their range facility on a regular basis for hunter safety education classes and firearm safety classes.

The board shall adopt rules to implement chapter 195, Laws of 1990, pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW. During the 2017-2019 and 2019-2021 fiscal biennia, expenditures from the firearms range account may be used to implement chapter 74, Laws of 2017 (SHB 1100) (concealed pistol licenses) and chapter 282, Laws of 2017 (SB 5268) (concealed pistol license notices). During the 2021-2023 and 2023-2025 fiscal ((biennium))biennia, expenditures from the firearms range account may be used to implement chapter 74, Laws of 2017 (SHB 1100) (concealed pistol licenses).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 941. (1) The legislature finds that survivors of gender based violence should be empowered in our state to choose how they want to respond to their situation from choosing to engage in the criminal system, the civil system, or to engage in community lead services. As a state, we are responsible for ensuring that regardless of the choice made by the survivor, we have the resources, services, and support needed to assist them in their journey to safety and self empowerment which involves multiple legal systems. Providers and advocates engaged in providing direct services, along with survivors should be the priority for leading this effort. As a result, the crime victim services work group is established.

(2) The co-chairs of the gender and justice commission or their designee must chair the work group. The work group is composed of the following additional members who serve without compensation or reimbursement for expenses:

(i) The director of the King county sexual assault resource center or the director's designee;

(ii) The executive director of the northwest justice project or the director's designee;

(iii) The executive director of the sexual violence law center or the director's designee;

(iv) Representatives from 4 community based domestic violence service providers from across the state;

(v) The executive director of the family violence appellate project or the director's designee;

(vi) The executive director of the protection order advocacy program or the director's designee;

(vii) The director of the department of commerce or the director's designee;

(viii) The director of the department of social and health services or the director's designee;

(ix) The director of the department of children, youth, and families or the director's designee;

(x) The state treasurer or the treasurer's designee;

(xi) Tribal representation;

(xii) Representatives from no less than 4 organization working with survivors of trafficking; and

(xiii) Representatives from no less than 4 of the state's children's advocacy centers.

(3) The work group must:

(a) Survey the need in the legal (protection orders, family law, abusive litigation) and community based systems including the need for evidence based training for all participants;

(b) Develop a plan to standardize and expand access to legal and community based assistance while utilizing and leveraging both public and private funding sources;

(b) Assess the different financial accounts which can be utilized for victim services including but not limited to those that exist in:

(i) The United States department of treasury;

(ii) The department of commerce;

(iii) The department of children, youth, and families;

(iv) The department of labor and industries;

(v) The department of social and health services; and

(c) Develop a sustainable funding formula and criteria for future state funding.

(4) Staff support for the work group must be provided by the administrative office of the courts.

(5) The work group must report its findings and recommendations to the legislature by October 1, 2024.

(End of part)

PART XI

GENERAL GOVERNMENT

SUPPLEMENTAL

Sec. 1101. 2022 c 297 s 101 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$46,838,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($53,280,000))

$53,080,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($100,118,000))

$99,918,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for a work group to continue the house of representatives' examination of employment practices and policies and to develop options and recommendations for the house of representatives.

(a) The work group is composed of the following members:

(i) Two legislative assistants from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives;

(ii) One nonsupervisory staff and one supervisory staff from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives;

(iii) One committee assistant, one coordinator, one analyst or counsel, and one administrative staff from the house of representatives office of program research;

(iv) One nonsupervisory staff and one supervisory staff from the house of representatives administration;

(v) The chief clerk of the house of representatives or their designee; and

(vi) The house of representatives human resource director.

(b) Staff who wish to be appointed to the work group must submit an application to the office of human resources. The house of representatives human resource officer shall make recommendations to the house of representatives executive rules committee who shall then confirm appointments to the work group.

(c) The chief clerk of the house of representatives shall contract for an external facilitator to staff and assist the work group. The facilitator must have a background or experience in organizational development. The chief clerk may also contract for legal services and other expert services, as necessary, to assist the work group.

(d) The work group shall consider issues related to employment practices and policies including, but not limited to:

(i) The supervisory structure of employees;

(ii) Workplace terms and conditions; and

(iii) Professional development.

(e) The expenses of the work group must be paid from the amount appropriated in this section subject to approval by the house of representatives executive rules committee.

(f) The work group must report its findings and recommendations to the house of representatives executive rules committee by December 1, 2022.

(g) If Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2124 is enacted by June 30, 2022, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1102. 2022 c 297 s 102 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SENATE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$33,755,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($41,625,000))

$41,425,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($75,380,000))

$75,180,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $260,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $270,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the payment of membership dues to the council of state governments, the national conference of state legislatures, the pacific northwest economic region, the pacific fisheries legislative task force, and the western legislative forestry task force.

(2) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for a work group to continue the senate's examination of employment practices and policies and to develop options and recommendations for the senate.

(a) The work group is composed of the following 17 members:

(i) Two legislative assistants from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate;

(ii) One nonsupervisory staff and one supervisory staff from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate;

(iii) One committee assistant, one coordinator, one analyst or counsel, and one administrative staff from senate committee services;

(iv) One nonsupervisory staff and one supervisory staff from senate administration;

(v) The secretary of the senate or their designee; and

(vi) The senate human resource director and senate diversity, equity, and inclusion coordinator.

(b) Staff who wish to be appointed to the work group must submit an application to the office of human resources. The senate human resource officer shall make recommendations to the senate facilities and operations committee who shall then confirm appointments to the work group.

(c) The secretary of the senate shall contract for an external facilitator to staff and assist the work group. The facilitator must have a background or experience in organizational development. The secretary may also contract for legal services and other expert services, as necessary, to assist the work group.

(d) The work group shall consider issues related to employment practices and policies including, but not limited to:

(i) The supervisory structure of employees;

(ii) Workplace terms and conditions; and

(iii) Professional development.

(e) The expenses of the work group must be paid from the amount appropriated in this section subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee.

(f) The work group must report its findings and recommendations to the senate facilities and operations committee by December 1, 2022.

(g) If Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2124 is enacted by June 30, 2022, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1103. 2022 c 297 s 103 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$342,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($296,000))

$288,000

Performance Audits of Government Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($10,036,000))

$10,031,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($10,674,000))

$10,661,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $273,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $244,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5405 (racial equity analyses).

(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the joint legislative audit and review committee may adjust the due dates for projects included on the committee's 2021-2023 work plan as necessary to efficiently manage workload.

(3) $20,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $2,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided to implement House Bill No. 1296 (behavioral health service organizations).

(4) $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $2,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 1033 (employment training program).

(5) $50,000 of the performance audits of government account—state appropriation is for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5268 (developmental disability services). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(6) Sufficient funding is appropriated in this section to conduct performance audits related to state agency programs and services to address the needs of farmworkers. The audits will assess how the agency is administering the programs and enforcing the relevant laws and provide recommendations to improve service delivery and effectiveness for the protection and needs farmworkers. The committee must incorporate the performance audits in this subsection into its work plan and must provide annual progress reports on their status. The committee may prioritize its work based on available resources and staff capacity, and may contract for services as necessary, to complete the following performance audits:

(a) The department of labor and industries' programs and responsibilities to investigate and enforce:

(i) Wage and hour laws applicable to farmworkers;

(ii) Workplace health and safety standards applicable to farmworkers; and

(iii) Laws prohibiting harassment, discrimination, and retaliation against farmworkers for, among other things, asserting their rights regarding health and safety standards and wage and hour laws;

(b) The employment security department's administration of the H-2A program; and

(c) The department of health's administration of laws and rules related to pesticide safety that are intended to protect farmworkers from hazardous exposures.

(7) $42,000 of the performance audits of government account—state appropriation is for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5649 (family and medical leave). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(8) $13,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $4,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1643 (affordable housing/REET). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(9) $36,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1015 (equitable access to credit). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((12)))(10)(a) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall conduct a performance audit of the department of health's oversight of hospital data reporting, inspections, and complaints. The study must explore:

(i) The types of data that hospitals are required to collect and report to state and federal regulatory entities, hospitals' compliance with these reporting requirements, and the department's enforcement and use of such reporting. This data includes: Hospital financial data, patient discharge data, charity care data, adverse health events and incidents notification and reporting, and community health needs, assessments, and benefits implementation strategies;

(ii) The type and frequency of hospital inspections conducted by state and federal regulatory entities, and hospitals' correction of any deficiencies; and

(iii) The hospital facility complaint process, including how consumers may file complaints, how the department investigates complaints, and how hospitals resolve any violations.

(b) The committee must incorporate the performance audit in this subsection into its work plan and prioritize its work based on available resources and staff capacity.

(((13)))(11) $17,000 of the performance audits of government account—state appropriation is for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5713 (limited equity cooperative housing). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((15)))(12) $17,000 of the performance audits of government account—state appropriation is for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5714 (solar canopies tax deferral). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1104. 2021 c 334 s 109 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE REDISTRICTING COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$1,633,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($22,000))

$132,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,655,000))

$1,765,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The entire general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the payment of expenses associated with the cessation of the commission's operations. The secretary of the senate and chief clerk of the house of representatives may jointly authorize the expenditure of these funds.

Sec. 1105. 2021 c 334 s 110 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

LEGISLATIVE AGENCIES

In order to achieve operating efficiencies within the financial resources available to the legislative branch, the executive rules committee of the house of representatives and the facilities and operations committee of the senate by joint action may transfer funds among the house of representatives, senate, joint legislative audit and review committee, legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, joint transportation committee, office of the state actuary, joint legislative systems committee, statute law committee, redistricting commission, office of state legislative labor relations, and office of legislative support services.

Sec. 1106. 2022 c 297 s 113 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COURT OF APPEALS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$21,709,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($22,673,000))

$22,833,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($44,382,000))

$44,542,000

Sec. 1107. 2022 c 297 s 114 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$86,711,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($118,611,000))

$118,666,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$3,994,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$681,000

Judicial Stabilization Trust Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$119,442,000

Judicial Information Systems Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($61,471,000))

$68,171,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($390,910,000))

$397,665,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The distributions made under this section and distributions from the county criminal justice assistance account made pursuant to section 801 of this act constitute appropriate reimbursement for costs for any new programs or increased level of service for purposes of RCW 43.135.060.

(2)(a) $7,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $7,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for distribution to county juvenile court administrators for the costs associated with processing and case management of truancy, children in need of services, and at-risk youth referrals. The administrator for the courts, in conjunction with the juvenile court administrators, shall develop an equitable funding distribution formula. The formula must neither reward counties with higher than average per-petition/referral processing costs nor shall it penalize counties with lower than average per-petition/referral processing costs.

(b) Each fiscal year during the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, each county shall report the number of petitions processed and the total actual costs of processing truancy, children in need of services, and at-risk youth petitions. Counties shall submit the reports to the administrator for the courts no later than 45 days after the end of the fiscal year. The administrator for the courts shall electronically transmit this information to the chairs and ranking minority members of the house of representatives and senate fiscal committees no later than 60 days after a fiscal year ends. These reports are informational in nature and are not for the purpose of distributing funds.

(3) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for providing all courts with an electronic demographic survey for jurors who begin a jury term. The survey must collect data on each juror's race, ethnicity, age, sex, employment status, educational attainment, and income, as well as any other data approved by order of the chief justice of the Washington state supreme court. This electronic data gathering must be conducted and reported in a manner that preserves juror anonymity. The administrative office of the courts shall provide this demographic data in a report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature, and publish a copy of the report on a publicly available internet address by June 30, 2023.

(4)(a) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the center for court research at the administrative office of the courts to review the number and types of young individuals placed on electronic home monitoring over a 10 year time period. The center for court research shall work in collaboration with the Washington state partnership council on juvenile justice and the juvenile block grant proviso committee (which includes a representative from the juvenile rehabilitation administration, the office of the administrator of the courts, the office of financial management, and the juvenile courts) to identify the number of individuals under the age of 26 that have been placed on electronic home monitoring by the department of children, youth, and families and the number of individuals placed on electronic home monitoring by or through juvenile courts from the year 2010 through 2020. At a minimum, the study must identify:

(i) How electronic home monitoring is defined and used by each entity;

(ii) The various types of electronic home monitoring services and the equipment used by each entity;

(iii) Whether the type of electronic home monitoring equipment used is different depending upon the age or type of the offender;

(iv) Whether the state or local entity provides the supervision and monitoring of individuals placed on electronic home monitoring or whether the supervision and monitoring are contracted services;

(v) By age, demographics, ethnicity, and race, the number of individuals that participated on electronic home monitoring each year;

(vi) By age, the offense committed that resulted in the individual being placed on electronic home monitoring, and the average duration of time individuals spent on electronic home monitoring; and

(vii) Whether electronic home monitoring was used as an alternative to or in lieu of incarceration or whether electronic home monitoring was used in addition to incarceration.

(b) The center for court research must complete a preliminary report by June 30, 2022, and submit a final report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2023.

(5) $44,500,000 of the judicial stabilization trust account—state appropriation is provided solely to assist counties with costs of complying with the State v. Blake decision that arise from the county's role in operating the state's criminal justice system, including resentencing, vacating prior convictions for simple drug possession, and certifying refunds of legal financial obligations and collections costs. The office shall contract with counties for judicial, clerk, and prosecution expenses for these purposes.

(6) $46,750,000 of the judicial stabilization trust account—state appropriation is provided solely to establish a legal financial obligation aid pool for counties to refund legal financial obligations and collection costs previously paid by defendants whose convictions have been vacated by court order due to the State v. Blake ruling. Once a direct refund process is established, superior court clerks or district court administrators must certify, and send to the office, the amount of any refund ordered by the court.

(7) $1,665,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $749,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1320 (civil protection orders).

(8) $68,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1219 (youth counsel-dependency).

(9) $110,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $165,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of House Bill No. 1167 (Thurston county superior court judge).

(10) $1,094,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,094,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the statewide fiscal impact on Thurston county courts. It is the intent of the legislature that this policy will be continued in subsequent fiscal biennia.

(11) $4,505,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $7,505,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5160 (landlord-tenant relations), including the management of an eviction resolution pilot program. By June 30, 2022, the administrative office of the courts shall provide to the legislature a detailed report of eviction resolution program expenditures and outcomes including but not limited to the number of individuals served by dispute resolution centers in the program, the average cost of resolution proceedings, and the number of qualified individuals who applied but were unable to be served by dispute resolution centers due to lack of funding or other reasons. Funding under this subsection for the eviction resolution pilot program is not subject to or conditioned upon adoption of a standing judicial order of an individual superior court.

(12) $325,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $304,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5331 (early childhood court program).

(13) $44,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5226 (license suspensions/traffic).

(14) $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for distribution to local courts for costs associated with the court-appointed attorney and visitor requirements set forth in the uniform guardianship act in chapter 11.130 RCW. If the amount provided in this subsection is insufficient to fully fund the local court costs, distributions must be reduced on a proportional basis to ensure that expenditures remain within the available funds provided in this subsection. No later than December 31, 2022, the administrative office of the courts will provide a report on distributions to local courts including, but not limited to, the amount provided to each court, the number of guardianship cases funded at each court, costs segregated by attorney appointments and court visitor appointments, the amount of any pro rata reductions, and a recommendation on how to forecast distributions for potential future funding by the legislature.

(15) $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $3,185,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for lease expenses and costs to relocate staff from the temple of justice to another workspace if the omnibus capital appropriation act provides funding for improvements to the heating, ventilation, lighting, and plumbing improvements to the temple of justice. Staff from the administrative office of the courts shall work with the department of enterprise services and the office of financial management to acquire temporary space in a state owned facility that meets the needs of the supreme court. If a state facility cannot be found, the court may acquire temporary workspace as it chooses.

(16) $63,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $251,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to facilitate and coordinate the scheduling of resentencing hearings for individuals impacted by the State v. Blake decision.

(17) $830,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to address data quality issues across Washington state court management systems.

(18) $2,050,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for assistance to trial courts across the state to address the trial court backlog created by the pandemic through the use of pro tem judges and backlog coordinators.

(19) $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for audio visual upgrades in courtrooms across the state.

(20) $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for distribution to the trial courts to address impacts of the COVID-19 pandemic.

(21) $4,900,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the administrative office of the courts to provide grant funding for the creation of new therapeutic courts or the expansion of services being provided to an existing therapeutic court. For purposes of this subsection, "therapeutic court" has the meaning defined in RCW 2.30.020. Funding provided under this subsection may not supplant existing funds utilized for this purpose.

(22) $2,469,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the administrative office of the courts to support community justice counselors and community coordinators that work with municipal and district court drug and therapeutic court programs. The community justice counselors and community coordinators are responsible for working with court participants to ensure connection to community services and existing resources to support completion of court requirements. Funding must be used for a minimum of four municipal court programs, with at least two programs located east of the Cascade mountains and two programs located west of the Cascade mountains, including Spokane county and Snohomish county. Funding may also be used for additional supports for participants, including bus passes and other transportation assistance, basic cell phones and phone cards, and translation services. Counties and cities that receive funding must provide a report back to the administrative office of the courts that shows how funds were expended.

(23) $520,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to establish pilot self-help centers in two courthouses, one on each side of the state.

(24) $82,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5490 (interbranch advisory committee). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(25) $341,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5575 (superior court judges in Snohomish county). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(26) $116,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5788 (minor guardianship). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(27) $26,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1773 (assisted outpatient treatment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(28) $502,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1901 (civil protection orders). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(29) $2,025,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for activities of the office relating to the resentencing of individuals and refund of legal financial obligations and costs associated with the State v. Blake ruling. In addition to contracting with cities and counties for the disbursement of funds appropriated for resentencing costs, the office must:

(a) Collaborate with superior court clerks, district court administrators, and municipal court administrators to prepare comprehensive reports, based on available court records, of all cause numbers impacted by State v. Blake going back to 1971; and

(b) Establish a process to locate and notify individuals of available refunds and notify those individuals of the application process necessary to claim the refund and issue payment from the legal financial obligation aid pool upon submission and approval of applications. The office shall continue to reimburse counties for any legal and financial obligation refunds made pursuant to a court order pending the implementation of a direct refund process.

(30) $131,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for a court policy analyst position to support the district and municipal court judges' association. The court policy analyst position must assist with the development, implementation, monitoring, and evaluation of district and municipal court programs, court operations, and court costs that relate to the State v. Blake decision.

(31) $11,500,000 of the judicial stabilization trust account—state appropriation is provided solely to assist cities with costs of complying with the State v. Blake ruling that arise from the city's role in operating the municipal criminal justice system, including resentencing, vacating prior convictions for simple drug possession, and certifying refunds of legal financial obligations and collections costs. The office shall contract with cities for judicial, clerk, prosecution, and defense expenses for these purposes.

(32) $10,000,000 of the judicial stabilization trust account—state appropriation is provided solely to establish a legal financial obligation aid pool for cities to refund legal financial obligations and collection costs previously paid by defendants whose convictions have been vacated by court order due to the State v. Blake ruling. Once a direct refund process is established, municipal administrators must certify, and send to the office, the amount of any refund ordered by the court.

(33) $1,892,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for distribution to counties to help cover the cost of electronic monitoring with victim notification technology when an individual seeking a protection order requests electronic monitoring with victim notification technology from the court and the respondent is unable to pay.

(34) $266,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for pass-through funding to the Washington association of child advocate programs to hire and coordinate AmeriCorps members to assist in community-based recruitment activities to promote child advocates and the need for volunteers, develop and distribute recruitment materials, and assist volunteers in preparing for required training. No later than June 30, 2023, the Washington association of child advocate programs must submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature on the efficacy of the program in recruiting volunteers.

(35) $1,785,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRF) is provided solely for COVID-19 response expenditures in fiscal year 2022. This funding expires December 31, 2021.

Sec. 1108. 2022 c 297 s 116 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF CIVIL LEGAL AID

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$41,710,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($51,001,000))

$52,393,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$379,000

Judicial Stabilization Trust Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,464,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($94,554,000))

$95,946,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) An amount not to exceed $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and an amount not to exceed $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 may be used to provide telephonic legal advice and assistance to otherwise eligible persons who are sixty years of age or older on matters authorized by RCW 2.53.030(2) (a) through (k) regardless of household income or asset level.

(2) The office of civil legal aid shall enter into an interagency agreement with the department of children, youth, and families to facilitate the use of federal title IV-E reimbursement for child representation services.

(3) $568,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is appropriated solely to continue and expand civil legal representation for tenants in eviction cases.

(4) Up to $165,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 may be used to wind down the children's representation study authorized in section 28, chapter 20, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess.

(5) $5,440,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to continue civil legal assistance to individuals and families directly and indirectly affected by the COVID-19 pandemic and its related health, social, economic, legal, and related consequences.

(6) $159,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,511,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1219 (youth counsel/dependency).

(7) $11,122,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $12,957,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5160 (landlord-tenant relations), including representation of indigent tenants in unlawful detainer cases. By June 30, 2022, the department shall provide to the legislature a detailed report of program expenditures and outcomes including but not limited to the number of individuals served, the average cost of a representation case, and the number of qualified individuals who qualified for but were unable to receive representation for funding or other reasons.

(8) $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $2,250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to continue and expand online automated plain language forms, outreach, education, technical assistance, and legal assistance to help resolve civil matters relating to legal financial obligations and vacating the sentences of defendants whose convictions or sentences are affected by the State v. Blake decision.

(9) $78,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $313,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the office of civil legal aid to cover the cost of contract adjustments necessary to conform attorney contracting practices with applicable caseload standards established by the supreme court commission on children in foster care.

(10) $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to support civil legal information, advice, and representation to tenants at risk of eviction and against whom an unlawful detainer action has not yet been commenced.

(11) $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to the office of civil legal aid to establish a legal advice phone line to provide guidance and legal advice for kinship caregivers. The phone line must be staffed by two FTE contracted attorneys that have experience with kinship care, guardianship statutes, the child welfare system, and issues relating to legal custody.

(12) $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the office of legal aid to expand civil legal aid services for survivors of domestic violence, including legal services for protection order proceedings, family law cases, immigration assistance, and other civil legal issues arising from or related to the domestic violence they experienced.

(13) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the office of civil legal aid to expand the statewide reentry legal aid project as established in section 115(12), chapter 357, Laws of 2020.

(14) $743,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to meet adjusted contractual obligations to ensure continued operation of the appointed counsel program for indigent tenants in unlawful detainer cases established in RCW 59.18.640.

(15) $649,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to meet adjusted contractual obligations necessary for effective operation of the appointed counsel program for dependent children established in RCW 13.34.212(3) in accordance with revised practice, caseload, and training standards adopted by the supreme court commission on children in foster care.

Sec. 1109. 2022 c 297 s 117 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$11,766,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($16,207,000))

$18,081,000

Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$5,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($32,973,000))

$34,847,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $917,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,146,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the office of the education ombuds.

(2) $1,289,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and (($3,545,000))$4,005,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to implement the provisions of chapter 332, Laws of 2020 (state equity office).

(3) $123,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $118,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5119 (individuals in custody).

(4) $180,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $209,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5126 (climate commitment act).

(5) $33,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the office of the education ombuds to support the language access work group that is reconvened and expanded in section 501(3)(g) of this act.

(6)(a) $20,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the Washington state LGBTQ commission, in collaboration with the health care authority, department of health, advocates for people living with HIV in Washington, consumers, and medical professionals with expertise in serving the medicaid population living with HIV, to consider and develop recommendations regarding:

(i) Access to HIV antiretroviral drugs on the medicaid drug formulary, including short- and long-term fiscal implications of eliminating current prior authorization and fail-first requirements;

(ii) Impact of drug access on public health and the statewide goal of reducing HIV transmissions; and

(iii) Maximizing pharmaceutical drug rebates for HIV antiretroviral drugs.

(b) The commission shall submit a brief report with recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 1, 2021.

(7) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the cost to support the blue ribbon commission on the intersection of the criminal justice and behavioral health crisis systems that will be established by governor executive order.

(8) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the Washington state office of equity must cofacilitate the Washington digital equity forum, as provided in section 129(70) of this act, with the statewide broadband office.

(9) $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the office of equity to develop resources and provide technical assistance to state agencies on best practices on how to engage communities regarding equity and inclusion when creating equitable budget and policy recommendations.

(10) $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and (($25,000))$59,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 ((is))are provided solely to complete an analysis on options to replace the benefits of the four lower Snake river dams as part of a comprehensive salmon recovery strategy for the Columbia and Snake river basins. The analysis shall be completed by July 30, 2022.

(((12)))(11) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and (($250,000))$519,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the governor to invite federally recognized tribes, legislative leadership, local governments, agricultural producers, commercial and recreational fisher organizations, business organizations, salmon recovery organizations, forestry and agriculture organizations, and environmental organizations to participate in a process facilitated by an independent entity to develop recommendations on proposed changes in policy and spending priorities to improve riparian habitat to ensure salmon and steelhead recovery.

(a) The recommendations must include:

(i) Ideas for improvements to land use planning and development that ensure the protection and recovery of salmon;

(ii) Standards to protect areas adjacent to streams and rivers;

(iii) Standards to restore areas adjacent to streams and rivers;

(iv) Financial incentives for landowners to protect and restore streamside habitat;

(v) Recommendations to improve salmon recovery program coordination among state agencies; and

(vi) Recommendations for additional changes when voluntary measures and financial incentives do not achieve streamside protection and restoration.

(b) Preliminary recommendations shall be submitted to the legislature and governor by October 1, 2022, with a final report by November 1, 2022.

(c) The office of the governor may contract for an independent facilitator. The contract is exempt from the competitive procurement requirements in chapter 39.26 RCW.

(((13)))(12) $207,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the office of equity to address additional workload created by legislation enacted during the 2021 legislative session.

(((14)))(13) $609,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the office of equity to establish and support a community engagement board.

(((16)))(14) $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1723 (digital equity act). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1110. 2022 c 297 s 120 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$22,662,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($49,118,000))

$55,568,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($12,894,000))

$13,399,000

Public Records Efficiency, Preservation, and Access

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$10,606,000

Charitable Organization Education Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,367,000

Washington State Library Operations Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$14,607,000

Local Government Archives Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$10,937,000

Election Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$4,401,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$405,000

Personnel Service Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,276,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($128,273,000))

$135,228,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $2,498,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $12,196,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to reimburse counties for the state's share of primary and general election costs and the costs of conducting mandatory recounts on state measures. Counties shall be reimbursed only for those costs that the secretary of state validates as eligible for reimbursement.

(2)(a) $3,051,500 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $3,051,500 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for contracting with a nonprofit organization to produce gavel-to-gavel television coverage of state government deliberations and other events of statewide significance during the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. The funding level for each year of the contract shall be based on the amount provided in this subsection. The nonprofit organization shall be required to raise contributions or commitments to make contributions, in cash or in kind, in an amount equal to forty percent of the state contribution. The office of the secretary of state may make full or partial payment once all criteria in this subsection have been satisfactorily documented.

(b) The legislature finds that the commitment of on-going funding is necessary to ensure continuous, autonomous, and independent coverage of public affairs. For that purpose, the secretary of state shall enter into a contract with the nonprofit organization to provide public affairs coverage.

(c) The nonprofit organization shall prepare an annual independent audit, an annual financial statement, and an annual report, including benchmarks that measure the success of the nonprofit organization in meeting the intent of the program.

(d) No portion of any amounts disbursed pursuant to this subsection may be used, directly or indirectly, for any of the following purposes:

(i) Attempting to influence the passage or defeat of any legislation by the legislature of the state of Washington, by any county, city, town, or other political subdivision of the state of Washington, or by the congress, or the adoption or rejection of any rule, standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of any state agency;

(ii) Making contributions reportable under chapter 42.17 RCW; or

(iii) Providing any: (A) Gift; (B) honoraria; or (C) travel, lodging, meals, or entertainment to a public officer or employee.

(3) Any reductions to funding for the Washington talking book and Braille library may not exceed in proportion any reductions taken to the funding for the library as a whole.

(4) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for humanities Washington speaker's bureau community conversations.

(5) $114,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $114,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for election reconciliation reporting. Funding provides for one staff to compile county reconciliation reports, analyze the data, and to complete an annual statewide election reconciliation report for every state primary and general election. The report must be submitted annually on July 31, beginning July 31, 2021, to legislative policy and fiscal committees. The annual report must include statewide analysis and by county analysis on the reasons for ballot rejection and an analysis of the ways ballots are received, counted, rejected and cure data that can be used by policymakers to better understand election administration.

(6) $546,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $546,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for staff dedicated to the maintenance and operations of the voter registration and election management system. These staff will manage database upgrades, database maintenance, system training and support to counties, and the triage and customer service to system users.

(7) $626,000 of the public records efficiency, preservation, and access account—state appropriation is provided solely for additional project staff to pack, catalog, and move the states archival collection in preparation for the move to the new library archives building that will be located in Tumwater.

(8) Within existing resources, the office of the secretary of state must research and evaluate availability of online trainings to include, but not be limited to, job-related, educational, and information technology trainings that are available free of charge. The office must compare those to the online trainings available from the Microsoft linked in academy. The office must report the comparative findings to fiscal committees of the legislature by September 1, 2022.

(9) $251,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5034 (nonprofit corporations).

(10) $269,000 of the government archives account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5019 (recording standards commission).

(11) $1,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) is provided solely for humanities Washington to provide grants to humanities organizations in Washington state pursuant to the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) Forty percent must be used for grants to state humanities organizations' programming and general operating expenses to cover up to 100 percent of the costs of the programs which the grants support, to prevent, prepare for, respond to, and recover from coronavirus; and

(b) Sixty percent must be used for direct grants, and relevant administrative expenses, that support humanities organizations' programming and general operating expenses to cover up to 100 percent of the costs of the programs which the grants support, to prevent, prepare for, respond to, and recover from coronavirus.

(12) $3,600,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) is provided to the state library as the designated state library administrative agency solely to administer and distribute institute of museum and library services grants to museums, tribal partners, and libraries for eligible expenses and services. Pursuant to federal directive, no more than four percent of distributed funds may be held for grant administration.

(13) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $4,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for educational outreach related to voter registration, voting, and elections; and to improve access to voting and the election process.

(14) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $700,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a contract with humanities Washington to expand the prime time family reading program.

(15) $8,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for:

(a) Funding the security operations center, including identified needs for expanded operations, systems, technology tools, training resources;

(b) Additional staff dedicated to the cyber and physical security of election operations at the office and county election offices;

(c) Expanding security assessments, threat monitoring, enhanced security training; and

(d) Providing grants to county partners to address identified threats and expand existing grants and contracts with other public and private organizations such as the Washington military department, national guard, private companies providing cyber security, and county election offices.

(16) $1,276,000 of the personnel service account—state appropriation is provided solely for administration of the productivity board established in chapter 41.60 RCW. The secretary of state shall convene the first meeting of the board by September 1, 2022. By June 30, 2023, the board must provide the legislature and all other state agencies with a topical list of all productivity awards granted in fiscal year 2023 for the purpose of providing agencies with the opportunity to adopt or modify for agency use the suggestions identified by awardees.

(17) $405,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for TVW equipment upgrades, including new encoders and router cards, and a refresh of its robotics system.

(18) $55,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for upgrading technology and usefulness of a conference room in the main office of the secretary of state with modern telecommunications tools and technology and increasing privacy.

(19) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementing a voter registration system in conjunction with the department of licensing, department of social and health services, health benefit exchange, and county election officials by December 31, 2023, that uses information and documentation already presented by eligible agency customers to automatically transmit information necessary for voter registration and voter registration updates, and enables applicants to make a decision about voter registration and any necessary corrections by returning a notice mailed by election officials. The proposal shall consider upgraded systems implemented in Colorado and other states to enact this change in their voter registration system in 2022. Recommendations must be developed with the full participation of community organizations that work in support of civic engagement. The secretary shall present their recommendations, and any barriers to their implementation, to the legislature by December 1, 2022.

(20) $2,534,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for grants to counties to support voter registration and voting within county jails. Grants may be used to develop and implement a plan to increase voting amongst the jail population, create voting materials specific to the jail population, purchase supplies and equipment for voting in jails, and provide direct staffing in jails to support voting activities. Each county grantee must submit a postelection report by February 1, 2023, to the secretary of state detailing the use of grant funding, evaluation of the grant's overall effectiveness in achieving its objective to increase voter registration and voting of the jailed population, and recommendations regarding best practices and law changes, if needed. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, up to $100,000 may be used for the office of the secretary of state to compile the reports received in this subsection into a single report. The report must include an analysis of the county grant projects, including recommended policies and procedures for county jails regarding inmate voting. The report must be delivered to the governor and legislature by June 30, 2023.

(21) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided to the state library to develop a digital literacy assessment tool and protocol to be used by organizations that provide digital literacy support; conduct a baseline assessment of digital readiness for a representative sample of Washington residents; and publish the assessment tool, protocol, and baseline assessment findings on the state library website for public use by June 1, 2023. The office must also submit a report to the governor and legislature by June 1, 2023, that describes the tool, protocol, and assessment findings.

(22) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the office to contract with the University of Washington Evans school of public policy and governance to review the data used in the 2022 state auditor's performance audit titled "evaluating Washington's ballot rejection rates," which found that voters from certain counties, younger voters, male voters, Black voters, Native American voters, and Latino voters were more likely to have their ballots rejected. The review must include an analysis of: (a) Voter interaction with the vote-by-mail and ballot return process; (b) circumstances in which voted returned ballots are not accepted due to signature mismatch, including whether the ballot was rejected due to late return, a signature by another person, a blank signature line, a different name used, or the signature could not conclude that the voter was the signatory; (c) processes used by county election offices to allow voters to cure ballots; (d) methods in which counties collect, maintain, and update voter signatures on file; (e) communication with voters concerning how to prepare and return a voted ballot for counting; (f) best practices for curing rejected signatures; and (e) education and outreach methods emphasizing the importance of voter signatures on voted returned ballots with a focus on increasing successful voting. The results of the analysis must be reported to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by October 15, 2022.

(23) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1835 (postsecondary enrollment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(24) $1,000 is for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1357 (voters' pamphlets overseas).

(25) $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for legal services costs for Vet Voice Foundation et al. v. Hobbs.

Sec. 1111. 2022 c 297 s 121 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE GOVERNOR'S OFFICE OF INDIAN AFFAIRS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$943,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($1,159,000))

$999,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($2,102,000))

$1,942,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The office shall assist the department of enterprise services on providing the government-to-government training sessions for federal, state, local, and tribal government employees. The training sessions shall cover tribal historical perspectives, legal issues, tribal sovereignty, and tribal governments. Costs of the training sessions shall be recouped through a fee charged to the participants of each session. The department of enterprise services shall be responsible for all of the administrative aspects of the training, including the billing and collection of the fees for the training.

(2) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the governor's office of Indian affairs to engage in a process to develop recommendations on improving executive and legislative tribal relationships. In developing the recommendations, the governor's office of Indian affairs may contract with a third party facilitator.

(a) The governor's office of Indian affairs or the contracted third party must host and facilitate discussions between the executive branch, the legislative branch, and Indian tribes as defined in RCW 43.376.010 to develop the recommendations.

(b) By December 20, 2021, the governor's office of Indian affairs must submit a report of recommendations to the Governor and legislature in accordance with RCW 43.01.036. At a minimum, the report should include recommendations on:

(i) An examination of government-to-government relationship with Indian tribes as in chapter 43.376 RCW;

(ii) The consultation processes; and

(iii) Training to be provided to state agencies and the legislature.

(3)(a) $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the governor's office of Indian affairs to expand capacity of the office to improve state and local executive and tribal relationships. Funds must be used to support:

(i) Consultation with tribes and local governments on implementation of the climate commitment act and growth management act;

(ii) Government-to-government engagement on natural resources, environment, and infrastructure;

(iii) Consultation with tribes and local governments on tribal legal definitions;

(iv) Early engagement on legislative and executive consultation and dispute resolution policy and processes with all agencies; and

(v) Coordination with a third party to facilitate roundtable meetings for agencies, tribes, and stakeholders to assess and provide recommendations in a report for streamlining statewide salmon recovery planning, policy, programs, and budgets. The report should be provided to the appropriate committees in the legislature by June 30, 2023.

(b) The legislature intends to provide additional funding for activities under this subsection (3) in the next fiscal biennium.

Sec. 1112. 2022 c 297 s 122 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMISSION ON ASIAN PACIFIC AMERICAN AFFAIRS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$554,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($857,000))

$537,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,411,000))

$1,091,000

Sec. 1113. 2022 c 297 s 126 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$22,392,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($27,543,000))

$25,107,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$21,913,000

Public Service Revolving Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,331,000

New Motor Vehicle Arbitration Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,781,000

Medicaid Fraud Penalty Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$6,098,000

Child Rescue Fund—State Appropriation
. . . .
$80,000

Legal Services Revolving Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($340,402,000))

$341,385,000

Local Government Archives Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,045,000

Tobacco Prevention and Control Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$275,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($425,860,000))

$424,407,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The attorney general shall report each fiscal year on actual legal services expenditures and actual attorney staffing levels for each agency receiving legal services. The report shall be submitted to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives no later than ninety days after the end of each fiscal year. As part of its by agency report to the legislative fiscal committees and the office of financial management, the office of the attorney general shall include information detailing the agency's expenditures for its agency-wide overhead and a breakdown by division of division administration expenses.

(2) Prior to entering into any negotiated settlement of a claim against the state that exceeds five million dollars, the attorney general shall notify the director of financial management and the chairs and ranking members of the senate committee on ways and means and the house of representatives committee on appropriations.

(3) The attorney general shall annually report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all new cy pres awards and settlements and all new accounts, disclosing their intended uses, balances, the nature of the claim or account, proposals, and intended timeframes for the expenditure of each amount. The report shall be distributed electronically and posted on the attorney general's web site. The report shall not be printed on paper or distributed physically.

(4) $161,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $161,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the civil rights unit to provide additional services in defense and protection of civil and constitutional rights for people in Washington.

(5) $8,392,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for child welfare and permanency staff.

(6) $617,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $617,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for multi-year arbitrations of the state's diligent enforcement of its obligations to receive amounts withheld from tobacco master settlement agreement payments.

(7) $1,600,000 of the legal services revolving fund—state appropriation is provided solely for the office to compel the United States department of energy to meet Hanford cleanup deadlines.

(8) $28,000 of the legal services revolving fund—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5022 (recycling, waste and litter).

(9) $584,000 of the legal services revolving fund—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5051 (peace & correction officers).

(10) $122,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5096 (capital gains tax).

(11) $256,000 of the legal services revolving fund—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5097 (paid leave coverage).

(12) $284,000 of the legal services revolving fund—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5126 (climate commitment).

(13) $395,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5141 (environmental justice task force).

(14) $1,198,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5163 (conditionally released SVPs).

(15) $218,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and (($5,107,000))$918,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5259 (law enforcement data).

(16) $693,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and (($1,750,000))$750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of a program for receiving and responding to tips from the public regarding risks or potential risks to the safety or well-being of youth, called the YES tip line program. Risks to safety or well-being may include, but are not limited to, harm or threats of harm to self or others, sexual abuse, assault, rape, bullying or cyberbullying, substance use, and criminal acts. Any person contacting the YES tip line, whether for themselves or for another person, must receive timely assistance and not be turned away. The program must operate within the guidelines of this subsection.

(a) During the development and implementation of the YES tip line program the attorney general shall convene an advisory committee consisting of representatives from the Washington state patrol, the department of health, the health care authority, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the Washington student achievement council, the Washington association of educational service districts, and other participants the attorney general appoints.

(b) The attorney general shall develop and implement policies and processes for:

(i) Assessing tips based on the level of severity, urgency, and assistance needed using best triage practices including the YES tip line;

(ii) Risk assessment for referral of persons contacting the YES tip line to service providers;

(iii) Threat assessment that identifies circumstances requiring the YES tip line to alert law enforcement, mental health services, or other first responders immediately when immediate emergency response to a tip is warranted;

(iv) Referral and follow-up on tips to schools or postsecondary institution teams, local crisis services, law enforcement, and other entities;

(v) YES tip line information data retention and reporting requirements;

(vi) Ensuring the confidentiality of persons submitting a tip and to allow for disclosure when necessary to respond to a specific emergency threat to life; and

(vii) Systematic review, analysis, and reporting by the YES tip line program of YES tip line data including, but not limited to, reporting program utilization and evaluating whether the YES tip line is being implemented equitably across the state.

(c) The YES tip line shall be operated by a vendor selected by the attorney general through a competitive contracting process. The attorney general shall ensure that the YES tip line program vendor and its personnel are properly trained and resourced. The contract must require the vendor to be bound confidentiality policies developed by the office. The contract must also provide that the state of Washington owns the data and information produced from the YES tip line and that vendor must comply with the state's data retention, use, and security requirements.

(d) The YES tip line program must develop and maintain a reference and best practices tool kit for law enforcement and mental health officials that identifies statewide and community mental health resources, services, and contacts, and provides best practices and strategies for investigators to use in investigating cases and assisting youths and their parents and guardians.

(e) The YES tip line program must promote and market the program and YES tip line to youth, families, community members, schools, and others statewide to build awareness of the program's resources and the YES tip line. Youth perspectives must be included and consulted in tip line development and implementation including creating marketing campaigns and materials required for the YES tip line program. The insights of youth representing marginalized and minority communities must be prioritized for their invaluable insight. The attorney general may determine the criteria for honorariums and award youth who participate in the tip line development and implementation an honorarium of up to $200 per day.

(f) In addition to honorarium amounts, youth are eligible for reasonable allowances for reimbursement, lodging, and travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(g) Nothing in this subsection creates an employment relationship, or any membership or qualification in any state or other publicly supported retirement system, due to the payment of an honorarium or lodging and travel expenses provided under this subsection where such a relationship, membership, or qualification did not already exist. (17) $196,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely to provide staff support to the joint legislative task force on jail standards created in section 957 of this act.

(18) $38,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1148 (acute care hospitals).

(19) $294,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1259 (women & minority contracting).

(20) $1,207,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1219 (youth counsel/dependency).

(21) $28,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1089 (law enforcement audits).

(22) $123,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Third Substitute House Bill No. 1091 (transportation fuel/carbon).

(23) $2,080,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1194 (parent-child visitation).

(24) $121,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1073 (paid leave coverage).

(25) $247,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $247,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1310 (uses of force by officers).

(26) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1109 (victims of sexual assault).

(27) $146,000 of the legal services revolving fund—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5172 (agricultural overtime).

(28) $275,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the office of the attorney general to support the Washington state missing and murdered indigenous women and people task force created in section 943 of this act.

(29) $5,743,000 of the legal services revolving fund—state appropriation is provided solely for additional legal services to address additional legal services necessary for dependency actions where the state and federal Indian child welfare act apply. The office must report to the fiscal committees of the legislature within 90 days of the close of fiscal year 2023 the following information for new cases initiated in fiscal year 2023 to measure quantity and use of this funding:

(a) The number and proportion of cases where the state and federal Indian child welfare act (ICWA) applies as compared to non-ICWA new cases;

(b) The amount of time spent advising on, preparing for court, and litigating issues and elements related to ICWA's requirements as compared to the amount of time advising on, preparing for court, and litigating issues and elements that are not related to ICWA's requirements;

(c) The length of state and federal Indian child welfare act cases as compared to non-ICWA cases measured by time or number of court hearings; and

(d) Any other information or metric the office determines is appropriate to measure the quantity and use of the funding in this subsection.

(30) $470,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $280,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for legal services in Wahkiakum School District v. State.

(31) $1,910,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the office to pass through to King county to adequately fund and retain its prosecution services pursuant to chapter 71.09 RCW in King county.

(32) $728,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $693,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for legal services related to the voting rights case Palmer, et al v. State.

(33) $752,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $119,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2076 (transp. network companies). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(34) $33,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1815 (catalytic converter theft). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(35) $65,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1747 (child relative placements). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(36) $17,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1286 (psychology compact). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(37) $133,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1735 (use of force). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(38)(a) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for a study regarding state and local responses to acts or potential acts of domestic terrorism in Washington state.

(b) In conducting the study, the office must review laws and policies regarding domestic terrorism, including but not limited to:

(i) Federal, state, and local laws regarding acts of domestic terrorism, including how a criminal incident is determined to be an act of domestic terrorism;

(ii) State and local data collection, tracking, and reporting practices as related to acts of domestic terrorism; and

(iii) State and local policies regarding responding to acts of domestic terrorism.

(c) By December 15, 2022, the office must submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature that includes but is not limited to:

(i) A summary of current laws and policies as identified in (b) of this subsection;

(ii) Recommended best practices for:

(A) Standardizing and improving data collection, tracking, and reporting on acts of domestic terrorism at the state and local level; and

(B) Strengthening law enforcement, prosecutorial, and other local government responses to a potential act of domestic terrorism; and

(iii) Recommendations for any statutory changes that may be necessary for clarity and consistency.

(d) The office may consult with experts or professionals involved or having expertise in the topic of domestic terrorism to complete the study.

(39) $58,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to support the sexual assault forensic examination best practices advisory group. The office of the attorney general shall reconvene a sexual assault forensic examination best practices advisory group to continue the work of the previous sexual assault forensic examination best practices advisory group as established in section 1, chapter 93, Laws of 2019. The advisory group must review best practice models for managing all aspects of sexual assault investigations and for reducing the number of untested sexual assault kits in Washington state. The advisory group must meet no less than twice annually.

(40) $25,000 of the legal services revolving fund—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5761 (wage and salary information). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(41) The attorney general must deposit the state's portion of any proceeds received during the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium from the settlement with Purdue Pharma and the Sackler families into the state general fund to be appropriated for opioid abatement programs and services.

Sec. 1114. 2022 c 297 s 128 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$201,157,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($550,623,000))

$544,359,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,450,865,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$9,083,000

Public Works Assistance Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$8,420,000

Lead Paint Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$112,000

Building Code Council Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$17,000

Liquor Excise Tax Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,316,000

Home Security Fund Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$326,423,000

Affordable Housing for All Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$105,264,000

Financial Fraud and Identity Theft Crimes

Investigation and Prosecution Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,678,000

Low-Income Weatherization and Structural

Rehabilitation Assistance Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,400,000

Statewide Tourism Marketing Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,034,000

Community and Economic Development Fee Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,252,000

Growth Management Planning and Environmental Review

Fund—State Appropriation
. . . .
$5,802,000

Liquor Revolving Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$5,921,000

Washington Housing Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$20,773,000

Prostitution Prevention and Intervention Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$146,000

Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,278,000

Model Toxics Control Stormwater Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$100,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2022)
. . . .
$1,813,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2023)
. . . .
$3,200,000

Andy Hill Cancer Research Endowment Fund Match

Transfer Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$50,281,000

Community Preservation and Development Authority

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,500,000

Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,798,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
(($937,440,000))

$891,790,000

Apple Health and Homes Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$8,740,000

Electric Vehicle Incentive Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$25,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($3,730,436,000))

$3,678,522,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Repayments of outstanding mortgage and rental assistance program loans administered by the department under RCW 43.63A.640 shall be remitted to the department, including any current revolving account balances. The department shall collect payments on outstanding loans, and deposit them into the state general fund. Repayments of funds owed under the program shall be remitted to the department according to the terms included in the original loan agreements.

(2) $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $7,096,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a grant to resolution Washington to build statewide capacity for alternative dispute resolution centers and dispute resolution programs that guarantee that citizens have access to low-cost resolution as an alternative to litigation.

(3) $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a grant to the retired senior volunteer program.

(4) The department shall administer its growth management act technical assistance and pass-through grants so that smaller cities and counties receive proportionately more assistance than larger cities or counties.

(5) $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely as pass-through funding to Walla Walla Community College for its water and environmental center.

(6) $4,304,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $4,304,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for associate development organizations. During the 2021-2023 biennium, the department shall consider an associate development organization's total resources when making contracting and fund allocation decisions, in addition to the schedule provided in RCW 43.330.086. The department must distribute the funding as follows:

(a) For associate development organizations serving urban counties, which are counties other than rural counties as defined in RCW 82.14.370, a locally matched allocation of up to $1.00 per capita, totaling no more than $300,000 per organization; and

(b) For associate development organizations in rural counties, as defined in RCW 82.14.370, a $1.00 per capita allocation with a base allocation of $75,000.

(7) $5,907,000 of the liquor revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with the municipal research and services center of Washington.

(8) The department is authorized to require an applicant to pay an application fee to cover the cost of reviewing the project and preparing an advisory opinion on whether a proposed electric generation project or conservation resource qualifies to meet mandatory conservation targets.

(9) Within existing resources, the department shall provide administrative and other indirect support to the developmental disabilities council.

(10) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the northwest agriculture business center.

(11) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the regulatory roadmap program for the construction industry and to identify and coordinate with businesses in key industry sectors to develop additional regulatory roadmap tools.

(12) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the Washington new Americans program. The department may require a cash match or in-kind contributions to be eligible for state funding.

(13) $643,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $643,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to contract with a private, nonprofit organization to provide developmental disability ombuds services.

(14) $1,000,000 of the home security fund—state appropriation, $2,000,000 of the Washington housing trust account—state appropriation, and $1,000,000 of the affordable housing for all account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department of commerce for services to homeless families and youth through the Washington youth and families fund.

(15) $2,000,000 of the home security fund—state appropriation is provided solely for the administration of the grant program required in chapter 43.185C RCW, linking homeless students and their families with stable housing.

(16)(a) $1,980,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,980,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for community beds for individuals with a history of mental illness. Currently, there is little to no housing specific to populations with these co-occurring disorders; therefore, the department must consider how best to develop new bed capacity in combination with individualized support services, such as intensive case management and care coordination, clinical supervision, mental health, substance abuse treatment, and vocational and employment services. Case-management and care coordination services must be provided. Increased case-managed housing will help to reduce the use of jails and emergency services and will help to reduce admissions to the state psychiatric hospitals. The department must coordinate with the health care authority and the department of social and health services in establishing conditions for the awarding of these funds. The department must contract with local entities to provide a mix of (i) shared permanent supportive housing; (ii) independent permanent supportive housing; and (iii) low and no-barrier housing beds for people with a criminal history, substance abuse disorder, and/or mental illness.

(b) Priority for permanent supportive housing must be given to individuals on the discharge list at the state psychiatric hospitals or in community psychiatric inpatient beds whose conditions present significant barriers to timely discharge.

(17) $557,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $557,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to design and administer the achieving a better life experience program.

(18) The department is authorized to suspend issuing any nonstatutorily required grants or contracts of an amount less than $1,000,000 per year.

(19) $1,070,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 $1,070,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the small business export assistance program. The department must ensure that at least one employee is located outside the city of Seattle for purposes of assisting rural businesses with export strategies.

(20) $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to submit the necessary Washington state membership dues for the Pacific Northwest economic region.

(21) $2,200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $4,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to contract with organizations and attorneys to provide either legal representation or referral services for legal representation, or both, to indigent persons who are in need of legal services for matters related to their immigration status. Persons eligible for assistance under any contract entered into pursuant to this subsection must be determined to be indigent under standards developed under chapter 10.101 RCW. Of the amounts provided in this section, $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 must be used for pro bono or low bono legal services to assist indigent Washington residents, who were temporarily paroled into the United States in 2021 or 2022, with asylum applications or other matters related to adjusting immigration status.

(22)(a) $37,000,000 of the affordable housing for all account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants to support the building operation, maintenance, and service costs of permanent supportive housing projects or units within housing projects that have or will receive funding from the housing trust fund—state account or other public capital funding that:

(i) Is dedicated as permanent supportive housing units;

(ii) Is occupied by low-income households with incomes at or below thirty percent of the area median income; and

(iii) Requires a supplement to rent income to cover ongoing property operating, maintenance, and service expenses.

(b) Permanent supportive housing projects receiving federal operating subsidies that do not fully cover the operation, maintenance, and service costs of the projects are eligible to receive grants as described in this subsection.

(c) The department may use a reasonable amount of funding provided in this subsection to administer the grants.

(23) $7,000,000 of the home security fund—state appropriation is provided solely for the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs to:

(a) Expand outreach, services, and housing for homeless youth and young adults including but not limited to secure crisis residential centers, crisis residential centers, and HOPE beds, so that resources are equitably distributed across the state;

(b) Contract with other public agency partners to test innovative program models that prevent youth from exiting public systems into homelessness; and

(c) Support the development of an integrated services model, increase performance outcomes, and enable providers to have the necessary skills and expertise to effectively operate youth programs.

(24) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the office of homeless youth to fund program models that prevent youth from exiting public systems into homelessness.

(25) $2,408,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $5,592,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the office of homeless youth to build infrastructure and services to support a continuum of interventions, including but not limited to prevention, crisis response, and long-term housing, to reduce youth homelessness in communities identified as part of the anchor community initiative.

(26) $2,125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $2,125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the office of homeless youth to contract with one or more nonprofit organizations to provide youth services and young adult housing on a multi-acre youth campus located in the city of Tacoma. Youth services include, but are not limited to, HOPE beds and crisis residential centers to provide temporary shelter and permanency planning for youth under the age of 18. Young adult housing includes, but is not limited to, rental assistance and case management for young adults ages 18 to 24. The department shall submit an annual report to the legislature on the use of the funds. The first report is due June 30, 2022, and each June 30th thereafter. The report shall include but is not limited to:

(a) A breakdown of expenditures by program and expense type, including the cost per bed;

(b) The number of youth and young adults helped by each program;

(c) The number of youth and young adults on the waiting list for programs, if any; and

(d) Any other metric or measure the department deems appropriate to evaluate the effectiveness of the use of the funds.

(27) $62,720,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $65,330,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $2,610,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the essential needs and housing support program and related services. The department may use a portion of the funds provided in this subsection to continue the pilot program established in section 127(106) of chapter 357, Laws of 2020, by providing grants to participating counties who request additional funding in order to continue serving participating and eligible clients.

(28) $1,436,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,436,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to identify and invest in strategic growth areas, support key sectors, and align existing economic development programs and priorities. The department must consider Washington's position as the most trade-dependent state when identifying priority investments. The department must engage states and provinces in the northwest as well as associate development organizations, small business development centers, chambers of commerce, ports, and other partners to leverage the funds provided. Sector leads established by the department must include the industries of: (a) Aerospace; (b) clean technology and renewable and nonrenewable energy; (c) wood products and other natural resource industries; (d) information and communication technology; (e) life sciences and global health; (f) maritime; and (g) military and defense. The department may establish these sector leads by hiring new staff, expanding the duties of current staff, or working with partner organizations and or other agencies to serve in the role of sector lead.

(29) The department must develop a model ordinance for cities and counties to utilize for siting community based behavioral health facilities.

(30) $198,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $198,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to retain a behavioral health facilities siting administrator within the department to coordinate development of effective behavioral health housing options and provide technical assistance in siting of behavioral health treatment facilities statewide to aide in the governor's plan to discharge individuals from the state psychiatric hospitals into community settings. This position must work closely with the local government legislative authorities, planning departments, behavioral health providers, health care authority, department of social and health services, and other entities to facilitate linkages among disparate behavioral health community bed capacity-building efforts. This position must work to integrate building behavioral health treatment and infrastructure capacity in addition to ongoing supportive housing benefits.

(31) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to contract with an entity located in the Beacon hill/Chinatown international district area of Seattle to provide low income housing, low income housing support services, or both. To the extent practicable, the chosen location must be colocated with other programs supporting the needs of children, the elderly, or persons with disabilities.

(32) $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $4,740,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $4,500,000 of the home security fund—state appropriation are provided solely for the consolidated homeless grant program.

(a) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $4,500,000 of the home security fund—state appropriation is provided solely for permanent supportive housing targeted at those families who are chronically homeless and where at least one member of the family has a disability. The department will also connect these families to medicaid supportive services.

(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for diversion services for those families and individuals who are at substantial risk of losing stable housing or who have recently become homeless and are determined to have a high probability of returning to stable housing.

(c) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $3,240,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for up to nine months of rental assistance for individuals enrolled in the foundational community supports initiative who are transitioning off of benefits under RCW 74.04.805 due to increased income or other changes in eligibility. The health care authority, department of social and health services, and department of commerce shall collaborate on this effort.

(33) $50,281,000 of the Andy Hill cancer research endowment fund match transfer account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Andy Hill cancer research endowment program. Amounts provided in this subsection may be used for grants and administration costs.

(34) $550,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $550,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the operations of the long-term care ombudsman program.

(35) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to produce the biennial report identifying a list of projects to address incompatible developments near military installations as provided in RCW 43.330.520.

(36) $35,000,000 of the home security fund—state appropriation is provided solely for increasing local temporary shelter capacity. The amount provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) A city or county applying for grant funding shall submit a sheltering proposal that aligns with its local homeless housing plan under RCW 43.185C.050. This proposal must include at a minimum:

(i) A strategy for outreach to bring currently unsheltered individuals into shelter;

(ii) Strategies for connecting sheltered individuals to services including but not limited to: Behavioral health, chemical dependency, education or workforce training, employment services, and permanent supportive housing services;

(iii) An estimate on average length of stay;

(iv) An estimate of the percentage of persons sheltered who will exit to permanent housing destinations and an estimate of those that are expected to return to homelessness;

(v) An assessment of existing shelter capacity in the jurisdiction, and the net increase in shelter capacity that will be funded with the state grant; and

(vi) Other appropriate measures as determined by the department.

(b) Eligible uses of funds include shelter operations, shelter maintenance, shelter rent, loan repayment, case management, navigation to other services, efforts to address potential impacts of shelters on surrounding neighborhoods, capital improvements and construction, and outreach directly related to bringing unsheltered people into shelter. The department shall coordinate with local governments to encourage cost-sharing through local matching funds.

(c) The department shall not reimburse more than $10,000 per shelter bed prior to occupancy, for costs associated with creating additional shelter capacity or improving existing shelters to improve occupancy rates and successful outcomes. Eligible costs prior to occupancy include acquisition, construction, equipment, staff costs, and other costs directly related to creating additional shelter capacity.

(d) For the purposes of this subsection "shelter" means any facility, the primary purpose of which is to provide space for homeless in general or for specific populations of homeless. The shelter must: Be structurally sound to protect occupants from the elements and not pose any threat to health or safety, have means of natural or mechanical ventilation, and be accessible to persons with disabilities, and the site must have hygiene facilities, which must be accessible but do not need to be in the structure.

(37) $950,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,064,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to administer a transitional housing pilot program for nondependent homeless youth. In developing the pilot program, the department will work with the adolescent unit within the department of children, youth, and families, which is focused on cross-system challenges impacting youth, including homelessness.

(38) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to establish representation in key international markets that will provide the greatest opportunities for increased trade and investment for small businesses in the state of Washington. Prior to entering into any contract for representation, the department must consult with associate development organizations and other organizations and associations that represent small business, rural industries, and disadvantaged business enterprises.

(39) $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to establish an identification assistance and support program to assist homeless persons in collecting documentation and procuring an identicard issued by the department of licensing. This program may be operated through a contract for services. The program shall operate in one county west of the crest of the Cascade mountain range with a population of one million or more and one county east of the crest of the Cascade mountain range with a population of five hundred thousand or more.

(40) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs to create a centralized diversion fund to serve homeless or at-risk youth and young adults, including those who are unsheltered, exiting inpatient programs, or in school. Funding provided in this subsection may be used for short-term rental assistance, offsetting costs for first and last month's rent and security deposits, transportation costs to go to work, and assistance in obtaining photo identification or birth certificates.

(41) $100,000 of the model toxics control stormwater account—state appropriation is provided solely for planning work related to stormwater runoff at the aurora bridge and I-5 ship canal bridge. Planning work may include, but is not limited to, coordination with project partners, community engagement, conducting engineering studies, and staff support.

(42) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a grant to assist people with limited incomes in urban areas of the state start and sustain small businesses. The grant recipient must be a nonprofit organization involving a network of microenterprise organizations and professionals to support micro entrepreneurship and access to economic development resources.

(43) $1,500,000 of the community preservation and development authority account—state/operating appropriation is provided solely for the operations of the Pioneer Square-International District community preservation and development authority established in RCW 43.167.060.

(44) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for grants and associated technical assistance and administrative costs to foster collaborative partnerships that expand child care capacity in communities. Eligible applicants include nonprofit organizations, school districts, educational service districts, and local governments. These funds may be expended only after the approval of the director of the department of commerce and must be used to support planning and activities that help communities address the shortage of child care, prioritizing partnerships serving in whole or in part areas identified as child care access deserts.

(45) $278,476,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) and $403,000,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery account—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to administer an emergency rental assistance program. The department shall distribute funding in the form of grants to local housing providers. In making distributions, the department must consider the number of unemployed persons and renters in each jurisdiction served by the provider as well as consider any funding that jurisdiction, including cities within each county, received directly from the federal government for emergency rental assistance. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) $278,476,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) is provided solely for grants to provide emergency rental and utility assistance pursuant to P.L. 117-2. A provider may use up to 14.5 percent of the grant award provided under this subsection for administrative costs and the remainder must be used for financial assistance as defined in P.L. 117-2. Unless otherwise prohibited under federal guidance, a housing provider may provide financial assistance for an eligible household's rent and rental arrears of up to 150 percent of the fair market rent for the area in which the household resides, as determined by the department of housing and urban development.

(b)(i) $403,000,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery account—federal appropriation is provided solely for grants to provide emergency rental and utility assistance, subject to (b)(ii) of this subsection. Providers must make rental payments directly to landlords and utility payments directly to utility providers. To be eligible for assistance under this subsection, households must, at a minimum, have an income at or below 80 percent of the area median income and must have a missed or partially paid rent payment. The department may establish additional eligibility criteria to target these resources to households most likely to become homeless if they do not receive rental assistance. A provider may provide financial assistance for an eligible household's rent and rental arrears of up to 150 percent of the fair market rent for the area in which the household resides, as determined by the department of housing and urban development.

(ii) From the amount provided in (b) of this subsection, each local housing provider must subgrant with community organizations that serve historically disadvantaged populations within their jurisdiction. Subgrants may be used for program outreach and assisting community members in applying for assistance under (a) and (b) of this subsection. The amount of the subgrant must be at least five percent of the total funding each provider received under (a) and (b) of this subsection.

(c) The department may retain up to 0.5 percent of the amounts provided in this subsection for administration of the program.

(46) $7,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the department to provide grants to entities that provide digital navigator services, devices, and subscriptions. These services must include but are not limited to one-on-one assistance for people with limited access to services, including individuals seeking work, families supporting students, English language learners, medicaid clients, people experiencing poverty, and elders. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, the department must prioritize allocating $1,500,000 as grants or portions of grants that serve medicaid clients.

(47) $240,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $240,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $1,000,000 of the community preservation and development authority account—state appropriation are provided solely for the operations of the Central district community preservation and development authority established in RCW 43.167.070.

(48) $607,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $607,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to assist homeowners at risk of foreclosure pursuant to chapter 61.24 RCW. Funding provided in this section may be used for activities to prevent mortgage or tax lien foreclosure, housing counselors, a foreclosure prevention hotline, legal services for low-income individuals, mediation, and other activities that promote homeownership. The department may contract with other foreclosure fairness program state partners to carry out this work.

(49) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to contract with a nonprofit entity located in Seattle that focuses on poverty reduction and racial equity to convene and staff a poverty reduction workgroup steering committee comprised of individuals that have lived experience with poverty. Funding provided in this section may be used to reimburse steering committee members for travel, child care, and other costs associated with participation in the steering committee.

(50) $29,255,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRF) and $284,200,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA), not to exceed the amount appropriated in section 3, chapter 3, Laws of 2021, that is unobligated at the end of fiscal year 2021, are provided solely for rental assistance and housing and are subject to the same terms and conditions as the appropriation in section 3, chapter 3, Laws of 2021, as amended in section 1905 of this act.

(51) $4,800,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRF), not to exceed the amount appropriated in section 4, chapter 3, Laws of 2021, that is unobligated at the end of fiscal year 2021, is provided solely for working Washington grants and is subject to the same terms and conditions as the appropriation in section 4, chapter 3, Laws of 2021.

(52) $1,147,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,629,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the statewide broadband office established in RCW 43.330.532.

(53) $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization for an initiative to advance affordable housing projects and education centers on public or tax-exempt land. The department must award the grant to an organization with an office located in the city of Seattle that has experience in catalyzing early learning and affordable housing developments. The grant recipient must use the funding to:

(a) Implement strategies to accelerate development of affordable housing projects with space for early learning centers or community space on underutilized tax-exempt properties;

(b) Analyze the suitability of properties for affordable housing, early learning centers, or community space through completing due diligence, conceptual design, and financial analysis activities;

(c) Organize community partners and build capacity to develop these sites, as well as coordinate negotiations among partners and public owners;

(d) Facilitate collaboration and co-development between affordable housing, early learning centers, or community space; and

(e) Catalyze the redevelopment of at least 10 sites to create approximately 1,500 affordable homes.

(54) $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization located in King county to operate a hunger relief response program serving individuals living in permanent supportive housing.

(55) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization located in the city of Federal Way that conducts collaborative policy development and provides access to resources and consultation to historically disadvantaged communities. The grant funding must be used for capacity-building activities to support community-based organizations serving youth and young adults in the city of Federal Way.

(56) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for capacity-building grants through the Latino community fund for emergency response services, educational programs, and human services support for children and families in rural and underserved communities.

(57) $12,000,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for a single contract with the non-profit statewide tourism marketing organization that is party to the contract pursuant to RCW 43.384.020. The funds will be used to assist recovery for tourism-related businesses, generate tourism demand for Washington communities and businesses, and sustain recovery market share with competing Western states. The department and the contractor shall submit a report to the legislature June 30, 2022, and June 30, 2023.

(58) $354,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $354,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a grant to the Port Gamble S'Klallam tribe for a reentry program providing tailored support services to moderate-needs and high-needs individuals leaving local or tribal incarceration, with the goals of reducing criminal recidivism and fostering community wellbeing. Services may be provided to clients pre-release and post-release.

(59) $217,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $477,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization serving King and Snohomish counties for a program conducted in partnership with King county serving criminal justice-involved individuals who have experienced domestic, sexual, or gender-based violence. The grant recipient may use the funding for costs including but not limited to legal advocacy, outreach, connecting clients to housing and other resources, data analytics, and staffing.

(60) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the city of Kent to contract with one or more nonprofit organizations to serve community immersion law enforcement trainees through mentorship or community-based placement, or both.

(61) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the office of homeless youth to administer a competitive grant process to award funding to licensed youth shelters, HOPE centers, and crisis residential centers to provide behavioral health support services for youth in crisis, and to increase funding for current grantees.

(62) $310,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $640,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit located in King county that develops training and support for low-income individuals, with a focus on women and people of color, to move into the construction industry for living wage jobs. The grant funding must be used to develop a pre-apprenticeship program that, through the construction of units, integrates housing and workforce development in service of the following goals:

(a) Creating a blueprint to integrating workforce development and housing for local jurisdictions;

(b) Providing construction training to underserved populations;

(c) Creating a pathway for trainees to enter construction careers; and

(d) Addressing the systemic effects of sexism and racism in housing, wealth, education, training, employment, and career development.

(63) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization operating an emergency shelter located in the Yakima valley for case management, outreach, and other homeless services.

(64) $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization for activities to advance affordable housing. The grant recipient must be an organization that partners in equitable, transit-oriented development. The grant recipient must use the funding to:

(a) Facilitate partnerships to enable equitable transit-oriented development across the Puget Sound region that builds housing at scale; and

(b) Assist the cities of Tacoma, Renton, and Everett, as well as other cities, in:

(i) Creating or updating local subarea plans to be consistent with the regional growth strategy for future population growth to be near high capacity transit and to facilitate development within the station area that will produce a mix of affordable housing;

(ii) Ensuring equitable transit-oriented development processes and outcomes that minimize displacement; and

(iii) Identifying strategies for land acquisition and assembly around high capacity transit stations that will result in a mix of housing.

(65) $700,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $3,700,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a nonprofit organization whose sole purpose is to provide grants, capacity building, and technical assistance support to a network of microenterprise development organizations. The microenterprise development organizations will support rural and urban Black, indigenous and people of color owned businesses, veteran owned businesses, and limited resourced and other hard to serve businesses with five or fewer employees throughout the state with business training, technical assistance, and microloans.

(66) $1,175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to support implementation of the 2021 state energy strategy as it pertains to emissions from energy use in new and existing buildings, including measures to support local government emission reductions, workforce measures, and utility electrification benefits.

(67) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to identify and develop effective interventions and responses to primary and secondary workplace trauma experienced by direct service staff who work in homeless shelters, homeless outreach, and permanent supportive housing. The department must collect data through methods such as surveys, interviews, and small group conversations, and engage interested parties, including but not limited to direct service staff. The department may contract with a third party to complete the work required in this subsection. By June 1, 2023, the department shall submit a report identifying interventions and providing recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature.

(68)(a) $340,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to contract with the University of Washington college of built environments to create a database and reporting system for promoting transparency on procurement of building materials that make up the primary structure and enclosure used for state-funded construction projects. The department and university may use publicly available information and data sources as well as consult with outside experts to create the database. The database may include fields for environmental product declarations, product quantity, manufacturer location, global warming potential, health certifications, supplier codes of conduct, and working conditions.

(b) When developing the reporting system required under (a) of this subsection, the department and the University of Washington must conduct a case study analysis. In conducting the analysis, the department and the university must identify up to 10 case studies of publicly funded projects and analyze considerations including but not limited to cost impacts, materials procured, embodied carbon contribution to reducing greenhouse gas emissions, and supply chain considerations. By January 1, 2022, the department and the university shall submit a progress report on the case study analysis to the legislature. By November 1, 2022, the department and the university shall submit a final report to the legislature with findings from the case study analysis and recommendations for the reporting system based on lessons learned.

(69) $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization to provide job readiness skills and training to traditionally underrepresented populations to support the transition to a registered apprenticeship, trade training, or employment. The grant recipient must be a nonprofit organization serving traditionally underrepresented populations in King and Pierce counties, with a focus on youth development programs. The grant funding must be used for activities including but not limited to counseling and training in support of the goals of:

(a) Minimizing barriers to transitioning to an apprenticeship, trade training program, or employment for participants;

(b) Increasing participants' workforce and life balance skills; and

(c) Increasing participants' specialized skills and knowledge in targeted industries, including construction, urban agriculture, and maritime trades.

(70)(a) $51,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $121,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the statewide broadband office to cofacilitate the Washington digital equity forum with the Washington state office of equity.

(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $70,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1723 (telecommunications access). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amounts provided in this subsection (70)(b) shall lapse.

(71) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for grants to law enforcement agencies to implement group violence intervention strategies in areas with high rates of gun violence. Grant funding will be awarded to two sites, with priority given to Yakima county and south King county. The sites must be located in areas with high rates of gun violence, include collaboration with the local leaders and community members, use data to identify the individuals most at risk to perpetrate gun violence for interventions, and include a component that connects individuals to services. In selecting the sites, the department must give priority to sites meeting these criteria that also can leverage existing local or federal resources.

(72) $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a contract for a business recovery program serving the city of Federal Way and surrounding area. The contract recipient must be a nongovernmental organization located in the city of Federal Way whose primary focus is the economic development of the city of Federal Way and surrounding area. The contract funding must be used for:

(a) Business development training and education for small businesses located in or serving the city of Federal Way and surrounding area, with a focus on Black, indigenous, and people of color-owned, women-owned, and veteran-owned businesses;

(b) Workforce programming for skill set development, especially as related to business retention and expansion; and

(c) Research and collection of economic baseline data for the city of Federal Way and surrounding area for the development of data-driven programming, with a focus on key economic recovery indicators.

(73) $202,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $89,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization to provide emergency housing, permanent supportive housing, and wraparound services focusing on Black transgender and nonbinary individuals who are currently experiencing or at risk of homelessness. The grant recipient must be a nonprofit organization with locations in the cities of Seattle and Tacoma that provides legal and other services for LGBTQ individuals in Washington. The grant recipient may subgrant or subcontract with other organizations to provide emergency housing, permanent supportive housing, and wraparound services.

(74) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit for a smart buildings education program to educate building owners and operators on smart building practices and technologies, including the development of onsite and digital trainings that detail how to operate residential and commercial facilities in an energy efficient manner. The grant recipient must be located in a city with a population of more than 700,000 and must serve anyone within Washington with an interest in better understanding energy efficiency in commercial and institutional buildings.

(75) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to establish a sector lead position for the creative industries, including but not limited to the performing arts, literary arts, music, and film. The sector lead must work with interested parties to further the goals of creating economic development opportunities, retaining and growing jobs, and supporting small business development and expansion within the creative industries.

(76) $221,920,000 of the home security fund—state appropriation and $58,400,000 of the affordable housing for all account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1277 (housing/revenue source). Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) $88,768,000 of the home security fund—state appropriation is provided solely to implement the eviction prevention rental assistance program created in the bill; and

(b) $133,152,000 of the home security fund—state appropriation is provided solely for project-based vouchers and related services, rapid rehousing, housing acquisition, and supportive services for individuals and families accessing vouchers and rapid rehousing. Of the total amount provided in this subsection, at least $20,000,000 must be used for hotel and motel vouchers, rapid rehousing, and supportive services for individuals and families accessing vouchers and rapid rehousing.

(77) $59,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $696,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1086 (behavioral health consumers).

(78) $163,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $159,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1443 (cannabis industry/equity).

(79) $298,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $404,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1220 (emergency shelters & housing).

(80) $121,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $668,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5237 (child care & early dev. exp.).

(81) $21,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $42,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Third Substitute House Bill No. 1091 (transportation fuel/carbon).

(82) $42,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $42,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1168 (long-term forest health).

(83) $2,798,000 of the economic development strategic reserve account manufacturing cluster acceleration subaccount—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1170 (manufacturing).

(84) $174,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) and $4,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a homeowner assistance program to provide mortgage, foreclosure, and other assistance to eligible homeowners pursuant to P.L. 117-2. The department may subgrant or contract with other entities to provide assistance under the program. Of the amount provided in this subsection, $2,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) and $4,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for foreclosure assistance.

(85) $9,864,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $9,864,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for long-term rental subsidies for individuals with mental health or substance use disorders. This funding may be used for individuals enrolled in the foundational community support program while waiting for a longer term resource for rental support or for individuals transitioning from behavioral health treatment facilities or local jails. Individuals who would otherwise be eligible for the foundational community support program but are not eligible because of their citizenship status may also be served. By December 1, 2021, and December 1, 2022, the department must submit a report identifying the expenditures and number of individuals receiving long-term rental supports through the agency budget broken out by region, treatment need, and the demographics of those served during the prior fiscal year.

(86)(a) $70,000,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide grants to small businesses through the working Washington grant program.

(b) Of the amount provided in this subsection, $42,000,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely to assist businesses maintain their operations. To be eligible for a grant under this subsection, the business must:

(i) Apply for or have applied for the grant;

(ii) Have not reported annual gross receipts of more than $5,000,000 in calendar year 2019;

(iii) Have expenses that are necessary to continue business operations and the expense is not a federal, state, or local tax, fee, license, or other government revenue;

(iv) Self–attest that the expense is not funded by any other government or private entity;

(v) Have experienced a reduction in business income or activity related to COVID-19 or state or local actions in response to COVID-19; and

(vi) Agree to operate in accordance with the requirements of applicable federal, state, and local public health guidance and directives.

(c) Of the amount provided in this subsection, $28,000,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely to assist the reopening of businesses that temporarily totally closed their operations. To be eligible for a grant under this subsection, the business must:

(i) Apply for the grant;

(ii) Have not reported annual gross receipts of more than $5,000,000 in calendar year 2019;

(iii) Demonstrate the business was actively engaged in business, and as a result of the governor's proclamations 20-25.8, issued on November 15, 2020, through 20-25.12 ("stay safe-stay healthy"), temporarily totally closed operations. Demonstration of active engagement in business can be given through but is not limited to taxable activity reported to the department of revenue. The department may use other methods to determine if this criterion has been met;

(iv) Have expenses that are necessary to reopen business operations and the expense is not a federal, state, or local tax, fee, license, or other government revenue;

(v) Self–attest that the expense is not funded by any other government or private entity; and

(vi) Agree to operate in accordance with the requirements of applicable federal, state, and local public health guidance and directives.

(d) Grant awards are subject to the availability of amounts appropriated in this subsection. The department must conduct outreach to underrepresented and unserved communities observed from prior rounds of awards. The department must ensure equitable distributions of grant funding, including considerations for geographic location and businesses owned by members of historically disadvantaged communities.

(e)(i) Eligible businesses may receive up to a $75,000 grant.

(ii) If a business was awarded one or more working Washington small business grants after February 1, 2021, the grant award under this subsection may be reduced to reflect the amounts received from previous working Washington small business grants. The department may prioritize businesses and nonprofit organizations that have not yet received a grant under the working Washington small business grant program.

(f) For purposes of this subsection, reopening costs include, but are not limited to:

(i) Upgrading physical workplaces to adhere to new safety or sanitation standards;

(ii) Procuring required personal protective supplies for employees and business patrons and clients;

(iii) Updating business plans;

(iv) Employee costs, including payroll, training, and onboarding;

(v) Rent, lease, mortgage, insurance, and utility payments; and

(vi) Securing inventory, supplies, and services for operations.

(g) Nonprofit organizations are eligible to receive funding under (b) or (c) of this subsection if they have a primary business activity that has been impacted as described in (b)(v) or (c)(iii) of this subsection.

(h) The department is authorized to shift funding among the purposes in (b) and (c) of this subsection based on overutilization or underutilization of the different types of grants.

(i) Of the total amount provided in this subsection, $45,000,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for grants under (b) or (c) of this subsection to eligible businesses and nonprofit organizations in the arts, heritage, and science sectors, including those that operate live entertainment venues. The department must develop criteria for successful applications under this subsection in combination with the Washington state arts commission.

(87) $138,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) is provided solely for the department to implement small business capital access and other credit support programs under the state small business credit initiative, pursuant to P.L. 117-2. The department may contract with other entities to implement the capital access program and other credit support programs. The department is highly encouraged to use local nonprofit community development financial institutions to deliver access to credit to the maximum extent allowed by federal law, rules, and guidelines. The department must apply for the maximum possible allocation of federal funding under P.L. 117-2, including but not limited to funds set aside for extremely small businesses and business enterprises owned and controlled by socially and economically disadvantaged individuals. The funding provided in this section also includes federal funds allocated to the state for technical assistance to businesses. The department must ensure businesses owned and controlled by socially and economically disadvantaged individuals, as defined in P.L. 117-2, have equitable access to program services.

(88)(a) $6,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the department to create a grant program to reimburse local governments for eligible costs of providing emergency noncongregate sheltering during the COVID-19 public health emergency.

(b) A city or county is eligible to apply for grant funding if it:

(i) Applies to the federal emergency management agency public assistance program for reimbursement of costs to provide emergency non-congregate sheltering; and

(ii) Incurs eligible costs.

(c) Eligible costs are costs to provide emergency noncongregate sheltering that:

(i) Were deemed eligible for reimbursement in the federal emergency management agency policy 104-009-18, version 3, titled FEMA emergency non-congregate sheltering during the COVID-19 public health emergency (interim) and dated January 29, 2021; and

(ii) Are incurred by the applicant beginning January 21, 2021, through September 30, 2021.

(d) The department must give priority to applicants who demonstrate use of funds received under P.L. 117-2 for the acquisition, development, and operation of noncongregate sheltering.

(e) The department must coordinate with the military department to confirm that grant recipients have applied to the federal emergency management agency public assistance program for costs identified in their grant application.

(f) For the purposes of this subsection, "noncongregate sheltering" means sheltering provided in locations where each individual or household has living space that offers some level of privacy such as hotels, motels, or dormitories.

(89)(a) $225,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to conduct a comprehensive equity review of state capital grant programs administered by the department. The department may, in consultation with interested parties identified in ((subsection)) (d) of this ((section))subsection, contract with a consultant to assist with the community engagement and review necessary to complete this review process.

(b) The purposes of this comprehensive equity review are: To reduce barriers to historically underserved populations' participation in the capital grant programs; to redress inequities in existing capital grant policies and programs; and to improve the equitable delivery of resources and benefits in these programs.

(c) In completing the comprehensive equity review required under this section, the department shall: (i) Identify changes to policy and operational norms and practices in furtherance of the equity review purposes identified in (b) of this subsection; (ii) identify new investments and programs that prioritize populations and communities that have been historically underserved by capital grant policies and programs; and (iii) include consideration of historic and systemic barriers that may arise due to any of the following factors: (A) Race; (B) ethnicity; (C) religion; (D) income; (E) geography; (F) disability; and (G) educational attainment.

(d) The department must collaborate with the Washington state commission on African American affairs; the Washington state commission on Asian Pacific American affairs; the Washington state commission on Hispanic affairs; the governor's office of Indian affairs; the governor's committee on disability issues and employment; the office of equity; the office of minority and women's business enterprises; the environmental justice council if established by passage of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5141; and other interested parties as appropriate to develop and conduct a community engagement process to inform the review.

(e) The department shall complete the comprehensive equity review under this section and submit a final report, containing all of the elements and considerations specified in this section, to the legislature by June 30, 2022.

(90) $23,444,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) is provided solely for the HOME investment partnerships program pursuant to P.L. 117-2. Of the amount provided in this subsection, $18,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) is provided solely for the department to issue competitive financial assistance to eligible organizations under RCW 43.185A.040 for the acquisition and development of noncongregate shelter units, subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) Grants provided under this subsection may be used to acquire real property for quick conversion into noncongregate shelter units or for renovation and building update costs associated with establishment of the acquired facilities. Grants provided under this subsection may not be used for operating or maintenance costs associated with providing housing, supportive services, or debt service. For the purposes of this subsection, "noncongregate" shelter units means units provided in locations where each individual or household has living space that offers some level of privacy, such as hotels, motels, or dormitories.

(b) Units acquired or developed under this subsection must serve qualifying individuals or families as defined in P.L. 117-2.

(c) The department must establish criteria for the issuance of the grants, which must follow the guidelines and compliance requirements of the housing trust fund program and the federal HOME investment partnership program. The criteria must include:

(i) The date upon which structural modifications or construction would begin and the anticipated date of completion of the project;

(ii) A detailed estimate of the costs associated with the acquisition and any updates or improvements necessary to make the property habitable for its intended use;

(iii) A detailed estimate of the costs associated with opening the units; and

(iv) A financial plan demonstrating the ability to maintain and operate the property and support its intended tenants throughout the end of the grant contract.

(d) The department must provide a progress report on its website by November 1, 2022. The report must include:

(i) The total number of applications and amount of funding requested; and

(ii) A list and description of the projects approved for funding including state funding, total project cost, number of units, and anticipated completion date.

(e) The funding in this subsection is not subject to the 90 day application periods in RCW 43.185.070 or 43.185A.050.

(91) $391,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $391,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for Pacific county to operate or participate in a drug task force to enhance coordination and intelligence while facilitating multijurisdictional criminal investigations.

(92) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization providing housing services in western Washington to conduct a master planning process for the development of a family-centered drug treatment and housing program. The grant recipient must be a nonprofit organization that has experience administering a comparable program in another region of the state. The program must provide housing units for families with members who have substance use disorders and who are involved in the child welfare system, and services including but not limited to case management, counseling, substance use disorder treatment, and parenting skills classes. The program site must be located within or in close proximity to King county, and include living quarters for families, space for services, and childcare and play areas for children. The nonprofit must include housing developers, service providers, and other interested parties in the master planning process. By December 31, 2021, the nonprofit must submit the plan to the department, the senate ways and means committee, and the house capital budget committee.

(93) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization to assist fathers transitioning from incarceration to family reunification. The grant recipient must have experience contracting with the department of corrections to support offender betterment projects and the department of social and health services to provide access and visitation services.

(94) $4,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $6,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for grants to community organizations that serve historically disadvantaged populations to conduct outreach and assist community members in applying for state and federal assistance programs, including but not limited to those administered by the departments of social and health services; commerce; and children, youth, and families. By June 31, 2023, the department must provide to the appropriate committees of the legislature a detailed report of the activities funded in this subsection. The report must include, but is not limited to:

(a) A list of grant recipients, their location, and the grant amount each received;

(b) Input from grantees on best practices for engagement with populations experiencing systemic inequities;

(c) Suggestions from the department and grant recipients on how to engage populations experiencing systemic inequities with future programming; and

(d) Other information and recommendations on need for this type of outreach work in future grant programs.

(95) $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to accelerate implementation of the low-income rural home rehabilitation program by contracting with up to seven home rehabilitation agencies, as defined under WAC 365-175-030, in a variety of regions of the state. Funding provided in this subsection may be used by home rehabilitation agencies for program support in order to increase the number of households participating in the program. Home rehabilitation agencies receiving funding under this subsection must provide the department with a summary of their direct and indirect costs associated with implementing the program.

(96) $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for pre-development activities for state-operated or contracted residential or supportive housing facilities at the Pacific hospital preservation and development authority buildings three through ten in Seattle, to help carry out Washington state's plans for new community-based residential facilities, including supportive housing. The facilities may be used for behavioral health, long-term care, developmentally disabled community housing, recovery residences, state-operated living alternatives, group homes, or family-centered substance use disorder recovery housing. The amounts provided in this subsection may be used for concept development, planning, lease payments, and other related expenses for pre-development of state- or nonprofit-operated residential facilities identified by the health care authority or the departments of social and health services, children, youth, and families, and commerce. The department is authorized to enter into a short-term lease, with an option to enter into a multiyear extension, for the Pacific hospital preservation and development authority quarters buildings three through ten.

(97) $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization dedicated to supporting forest health restoration located in Okanogan county for work toward a biochar research and demonstration project and initial efforts toward full-size operation of an industrial-sized facility in the Methow valley.

(98) $6,800,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $15,700,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for grants to ensure continuity of crime victim services impacted by reductions in federal victims of crime act funding and help address increased demand for crime victim services attributable to the COVID-19 pandemic. The department shall consult with crime victim service providers and other stakeholders to inform a plan to invest any amount above what is required to maintain existing services in immediate, short-term needs and in a manner that is consistent with the office of crime victims advocacy's state plan.

(99)(a) $115,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $335,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to appoint and maintain an aviation and aerospace advisory committee to generally advise the director of the department and the secretary of the department of transportation on matters related to aviation and aerospace in Washington state. The advisory committee must develop recommendations regarding operating budget and capital budget requests relating to aviation and aerospace needs, and strategies to enhance the safe and effective use of public use airports and aerospace facilities in Washington state. The aviation and aerospace advisory committee must also advise the director and secretary, or their designees, and make recommendations on the following matters:

(i) Employment of emerging aviation and aerospace technologies to include unmanned, autonomous, and alternative propulsion systems;

(ii) New, changed, or proposed federal regulations;

(iii) Industry needs to remain nationally and internationally competitive;

(iv) Policy considerations;

(v) Funding priorities and capital project needs;

(vi) Methods to reduce greenhouse gas emissions;

(vii) Workforce development needs and opportunities;

(viii) Multimodal requirements; and

(ix) Other matters pertaining to the aviation and aerospace industries as the aviation and aerospace advisory committee deems appropriate.

(b) The director of the department of commerce, or the director's designee, shall appoint members to the aviation and aerospace advisory committee including, at a minimum:

(i) Two county commissioners, one from east of the crest of the Cascade mountains and one from west of the crest of the Cascade mountains;

(ii) An owner of an aviation company and an owner of an aerospace company or their representatives;

(iii) The director of the aviation division of the department of transportation, or the director's designee;

(iv) Two individuals who are top executive officials of a commercial service airport, typically with the title of chief executive officer, airport director, or executive director, one from an airport located east of the crest of the Cascade mountains and one from an airport located west of the crest of the Cascade mountains;

(v) Advisory members from the federal aviation administration;

(vi) The aerospace lead from the department of commerce or a representative of the department;

(vii) A representative of a statewide environmental organization;

(viii) A representative of the military department;

(ix) A representative of the state board for community and technical colleges;

(x) Representatives from airport associations;

(xi) Representatives from an aviation and aerospace educational program; and

(xii) Representatives from both aviation and aerospace associations.

(c) The director of the department and the secretary of the department of transportation, or their designees, shall serve as the administrative cochairs of the aviation and aerospace advisory committee.

(d) The department must provide staff support for all aviation and aerospace advisory committee meetings.

(e) The aviation and aerospace advisory committee must meet at the call of the administrative cochairs for any purpose that directly relates to the duties set forth in (a) of this subsection, or as otherwise requested by the director, secretary, or their designees as the administrative cochairs.

(f) In consultation with the aviation and aerospace advisory committee, the department must develop a strategic plan for the department's aerospace, aviation, and airport economic development program. The strategic plan should identify: (i) Changing market conditions in the aerospace industry; (ii) emerging opportunities to diversify and grow Washington's aerospace sector; and (iii) strategies and action steps to build on the state's core strengths in aerospace infrastructure and workforce expertise to diversify and grow employment in Washington's aerospace sector. The department must submit the strategic plan to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2023.

(g) The cochairs may seek recommendations and input from the aviation and aerospace advisory committee to inform the legislature on aviation and aerospace issues.

(100)(a) $270,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $30,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to convene a work group on reducing racial disparities in Washington state homeownership rates. The goals of the work group are to assess perspectives on housing and lending laws, policies, and practices; facilitate discussion among interested parties; and develop budgetary, administrative policy, and legislative recommendations.

(b) The director of the department, or the director's designee, must chair the work group. The department must, in consultation with the Washington state office of equity and the governor's office of Indian affairs, appoint a minimum of twelve members to the work group representing groups including but not limited to:

(i) Organizations and state entities led by and serving Black, indigenous, and people of color;

(ii) State or local government agencies with expertise in housing and lending laws;

(iii) Associations representing cities and housing authorities; and

(iv) Professionals from private-sector industries including but not limited to banks, credit unions, mortgage brokers, and housing developers.

(c) The department must convene the first meeting of the work group by August 1, 2021. The department must submit a final report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by August 1, 2022. The final report must:

(i) Evaluate the distribution of state affordable housing funds and its impact on the creation of homeownership units serving Black, indigenous, and people of color;

(ii) Evaluate the eligibility requirements, access, and use of state-funded down payment assistance funds, and their impact on homeownership rate disparities;

(iii) Review barriers preventing Black, indigenous, and people of color from accessing credit and loans through traditional banks for residential loans; and

(iv) Provide budgetary, administrative policy, and legislative recommendations to increase ownership unit development and access to credit.

(101) $225,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $225,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to convene a task force to make recommendations regarding needed reforms to the state's growth policy framework, including the growth management act, state environmental policy act, and other statutes related to growth, change, economic development, housing, social equity, and environmental conservation. The process will build upon the findings, concepts, and recommendations in recent state-funded reports, including the "road map to Washington's future" issued by the William D. Ruckelshaus center in 2019, the report of the environmental justice task force issued in 2020, and "updating Washington's growth policy framework" issued by the University of Washington in 2021. The task force must involve diverse perspectives including but not limited to representatives of counties, cities, special districts, the real estate, building, and agricultural industries, planning and environmental organizations, tribal governments, and state agencies. Special effort must be made to include in these discussions the lived experiences and perspectives of people and communities who have too often been excluded from public policy decision-making and unevenly impacted by those decisions. The work group must report on its activities and recommendations prior to the 2022 and 2023 legislative sessions.

(102) $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization located in the city of Seattle for providing resident services and on-site programming for affordable housing residents in Delridge, supporting local youth with leadership pathways, and other community development initiatives that improve the health and well-being of southwest Seattle residents.

(103) $61,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $31,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for San Juan county health and community services to enter into an agreement with the United States geological survey to evaluate available groundwater, surface water, and meteorological data for the county, complete recharge estimations for the county, and update the water balance for the county.

(104) $140,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely to contract with businesses ending slavery and trafficking for a human trafficking initiative.

(a) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely to extend job readiness services and employment opportunities for survivors of human trafficking and persons at risk of human trafficking, in near-airport communities in south King county.

(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely to develop a national awareness campaign. The campaign will increase signage in seaports, airports, and near-airport communities so that people who are vulnerable to trafficking or experiencing human trafficking can access assistance through the national human trafficking hotline.

(105) $278,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $277,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization within the city of Tacoma for social services and educational programming to assist Latino and indigenous communities in honoring heritage and culture, becoming proficient in civic education, and overcoming barriers to social, political, racial, economic, and cultural community development.

(106) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to provide college accredited courses through alternative methods to disadvantaged adults, such as those experiencing homelessness, who are low-income, come from generational poverty, or have a disabling condition, including those that are further impacted by systemic racism, who do not believe they can be successful or have not yet contemplated college for their future with the intent of engaging these individuals in further education to increase their lifelong wage potential.

(107)(a) $151,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $532,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to contract with a nonprofit organization with demonstrated expertise in the creative arts and strategic planning to establish a Washington state creative economy work group that within two years, and with the advice of the work group, develops a strategic plan to improve the Washington state creative economy that can be rolled out in incremental phases to reach identified economic, social justice, and business development goals.

(b) The goal of the strategic plan must be to ensure that the state of Washington is competitive with respect to attracting creative economy business, retaining talent within the state, and developing marketable content that can be exported for national and international consumption and monetization. The strategic plan must address support for the creative community within historically marginalized communities, as well as the creative economy at large, and take into account the diverse interests, strengths, and needs of Washington's population on both sides of the Cascade mountains.

(c) The chair of the work group must be the director of the nonprofit organization contracted with by the department or the director's designee, and must have significant experience working as an artist, producer, or director and in business development, including drafting business plans and multidisciplinary planning documents. The chair must appoint representatives to the work group who represent the range of demographic diversity across the state of Washington, including:

(i) A representative from the Washington state association of counties;

(ii) A representative from the association of Washington cities;

(iii) A representative from the Washington state arts commission;

(iv) A representative from the Washington state labor council;

(v) A representative from the banking industry with experience in matters involving the federal small business administration;

(vi) An appropriate number of representatives from the Washington state arts community including, but not limited to, the following sectors:

(A) Film, television, and video production;

(B) Recorded audio and music production;

(C) Animation production;

(D) Video game development;

(E) Live theater, orchestra, dance, and opera;

(F) Live music performance;

(G) Visual arts, including sculpture, painting, graphic design, and photography;

(H) Production facilities, such as film and television studios; and

(I) Live music or performing arts venues;

(vii) A representative from a certified public accounting firm or other company with experience in financial modeling and in the creative arts;

(viii) A representative selected by the Washington state commission on African American affairs, the Washington state commission on Hispanic affairs, the governor's office of Indian affairs, and the Washington state commission on Asian Pacific American affairs to represent the entities on the work group;

(ix) A representative of a federally recognized Indian tribe with a reservation located east of the crest of the Cascade mountains;

(x) A representative of a federally recognized Indian tribe with a reservation located west of the crest of the Cascade mountains; and

(xi) Other state agency representatives or stakeholder group representatives, at the discretion of the work group, for the purpose of participating in specific topic discussions.

(d) In developing the strategic plan for the Washington state creative economy, the work group must:

(i) Identify existing studies of aspects affecting the creative economy, including studies relating to tax issues, legislation, finance, population and demographics, and employment;

(ii) Conduct a comparative analysis with other jurisdictions that have successfully developed creative economy plans and programs, including the states of Georgia and New Mexico, and the provinces of British Columbia and Ontario, Canada;

(iii) Conduct in-depth interviews to identify best practices for structuring a strategic plan for the state of Washington;

(iv) Evaluate existing banking models for financing creative economy projects in the private sector and develop a financial model to promote investment in Washington's creative economy;

(v) Evaluate existing state and county tax incentives and make recommendations for improvements to support the creative economy;

(vi) Identify the role that counties and cities play with respect to the strategic plan, and identify specific counties and cities that may need or want a stronger creative economy;

(vii) Identify opportunities for synergies with new business models and the integration of new technologies; and

(viii) Identify the role that state education programs in the creative arts play in the creative economy and with respect to advancing the strategic plan.

(e) The department of commerce shall facilitate the timely transmission of information and documents from all appropriate state departments and agencies to the nonprofit organization contracted under this subsection. The work group must report its findings and recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2022. The contracted nonprofit must administer the expenses of the work group.

(108) $153,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $147,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit museum and science and technology center located in the city of Seattle that provides youth educational programming related to discovery, experimentation, and critical thinking in the sciences for a maker and innovation lab and to develop and operate new experiential learning opportunities.

(109) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to contract with a statewide association that supports a network of local asset building coalitions for programs to increase the financial stability of low-income Washingtonians adversely affected economically by COVID-19 through increasing participation in earned income tax credit refunds, the Washington retirement marketplace, and programs that build personal savings.

(110) $971,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $3,561,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to continue starting up the Washington state office of firearm safety and violence prevention, including the creation of a state and federal grant funding plan to direct resources to cities that are most impacted by community violence. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for community-based violence prevention and intervention services to individuals identified through the King county shots fired social network analysis. The department must complete an evaluation of the program and provide a report to the governor and the appropriate legislative committees by June 30, 2023.

(b)(i) $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,800,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a grant program through the office of firearm safety and violence prevention for evidence-based services to youth who are at high risk to perpetrate gun violence and who reside in areas with high rates of gun violence. Priority shall be given to:

(A) One site serving in Yakima county, one site in south King county, one site in Federal Way, and one site in Tacoma;

(B) Sites that partner with the University of Washington public behavioral health & justice policy division to deliver culturally relevant family integrated transition services through use of credible messenger advocates;

(C) Sites that partner with the University of Washington Harborview firearm injury and policy research program for social impact evaluation; and

(D) Sites that partner an organization focused on evidence-based implementation management identified by the department.

(ii) The department must complete an evaluation of the program and provide a report to the governor and the appropriate legislative committees by June 30, 2023.

(111) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to conduct a study and report to the legislature on city and county implementation of the multifamily housing property tax exemption. The report must:

(a) Review whether cities have practices in five areas:

(i) Evaluating the financial feasibility and total costs of proposed developments under the exemption;

(ii) Monitoring rent, occupancy, and demographics of tenants of exempt housing;

(iii) Identifying direct or indirect displacement risks, and changes in income and rent distributions associated with new housing development, and plans and approaches;

(iv) Identifying practices that encourage permanent affordable rental opportunities; and

(v) Monitoring whether the exemption assists cities in meeting goals under the growth management act;

(b) Identify at least five case studies on a range of cities and provide analysis:

(i) Comparing the rent in income restricted units to market rate units in the same development and to the surrounding area;

(ii) Comparing the anticipated impact on rents and project budgets, and on public benefit under eight-year, 12-year, and 20-year property tax exemption scenarios;

(iii) Looking at permanent affordable rentals; and

(iv) Evaluating changes in income distribution, rent distribution, commute/location, and displacement risks in areas with exempt housing; and

(c) Estimate other state and local tax revenue generated by new housing developments and how it compares to the property tax exemption.

(112) $195,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for a grant to Spokane county for costs related to redistricting activities required by chapter 36.32 RCW.

(113) $130,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $130,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to contract with a nonprofit organization to provide tiny homes for veterans.

(114) $170,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $130,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to perform an analysis of the property operations and maintenance costs and tenant supportive services costs for affordable housing projects that receive funding from the Washington housing trust fund. The projects to be analyzed must include, but are not limited to, permanent supportive housing and youth housing taking into consideration housing projects that have been in service for a sufficient time that actual costs can be determined. The analysis shall include a categorized overview of the expenses and fund sources related to the maintenance, operations, and supportive services necessary for the affordable housing projects to be successful in housing the intended population, as well as identify other available funding sources for these costs. The analysis must also explore the timing and alignment challenges for pairing operational and supportive services funding with the initial capital investments, and make recommendations relating to any benchmarks that can be established regarding future costs that would impact the operating budget, and about the state's role in planning, support, and oversight to ensure long-term sustainability of these projects. The department may hire a consultant to conduct this study. The department shall report its findings and recommendations to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2022.

(115) $157,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $154,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5383 (public telecom services).

(116) $1,555,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,592,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5141 (environmental justice task force).

(117) $946,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $921,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5368 (rural economic development).

(118) $114,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $110,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5287 (affordable housing incentives).

(119) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,026,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5345 (industrial waste program). Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $951,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for grants to local industrial waste symbiosis projects as provided in the bill.

(120) $700,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,800,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5353 (law enforcement community engagement). Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $950,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for grants awarded under this bill.

(121) $66,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5183 (nonfatal strangulation).

(122) $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5126 (climate commitment).

(123) $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to administer a competitive grant program for grants to community-based programs to provide reentry services for formerly incarcerated persons and supports to facilitate successful transitions to the community. The department must work in collaboration with the statewide reentry council to administer the program. Applicants must provide a project proposal to the department as a part of the application process. Grant awards provided under this subsection may be used for costs including but not limited to housing, case management and navigators, employment services, family reunification, and legal services to respond to collateral impacts of reentry. The department must award at least 30 percent of the funding provided in this subsection to applicants located in rural counties.

(124) $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to administer grants to diaper banks for the purchase of diapers, wipes, and other essential baby products, for distribution to families in need. The department must give priority to providers serving or located in marginalized, low-income communities or communities of color; and providers that help support racial equity.

(125)(a) $5,000,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide grant funds to Clallam county to support the preservation of private marine transportation activities and jobs associated with such activities that have been directly impacted by the closure of the United States-Canada border during the COVID-19 pandemic.

(b) To be eligible for a grant from the county under this subsection the business must:

(i) Apply for or have applied for the grant from the county;

(ii) Have expenses that are necessary to continue business operations and the expense is not a federal, state, or local tax, fee, license, or other government revenue;

(iii) Provide documentation to demonstrate that the expense is not funded by any other government or private entity;

(iv) Demonstrate the business was actively engaged in business, and as a result of the border closures the business temporarily totally closed operations;

(v) Have experienced at least a significant reduction in business income or activity related to United States-Canada border closures;

(vi) Agree to operate in accordance with the requirements of applicable federal, state, and local public regulations including health and safety measures;

(vii) Demonstrate significant economic contribution of their business to the state and local economy; and

(viii) Be a majority United States owned entity operating a United States flag vessel registered and operated under the laws of the United States.

(c) Grant funds may be used only for expenses incurred on or after March 1, 2020. Eligible expenses for grant funds include:

(i) Upgrading physical workplaces to adhere to new safety or sanitation standards;

(ii) Procuring required personal protective supplies for employees and business patrons and clients;

(iii) Updating business plans;

(iv) Employee costs, including payroll, training, and onboarding;

(v) Rent, lease, mortgage, insurance, and utility payments;

(vi) Securing inventory, supplies, and services for operations; and

(vii) Maintenance and operations costs associated with vessel operations.

(d) The county must submit a report to the department by June 30, 2022, outlining the use of funds, specific expenditures of the grantees, and revenue and expenses of the grantees including additional government or private funds or grants received.

(126) $1,162,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $2,109,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to publish the guidelines and guidance set forth in (a), (b), and (c) of this subsection. The department shall publish the guidelines and guidance described in (a), (b), and (c) of this subsection no later than June 30, 2023. From amounts provided in this subsection, pursuant to an interagency agreement, the department shall provide funding to the department of ecology, the department of health, the department of fish and wildlife, the department of natural resources, the department of health, and the emergency management division of the military department to fund activities that support the work specified in (a), (b) and (c) of this subsection.

(a) The department, in consultation with the department of ecology, the department of health, and the department of transportation, shall publish guidelines that provide a set of actions counties and cities may take, under existing statutory authority, through updates to their comprehensive plans and development regulations that have a demonstrated ability to reduce greenhouse gas emissions in order to achieve the statewide greenhouse gas emissions reductions set forth in RCW 70A.45.020(1), allowing for consideration of the emissions reductions achieved through the adoption of statewide programs. The guidelines must prioritize reductions in communities that have experienced disproportionate harm due to air pollution and may draw upon the most recent health disparities data from the department of health to identify high pollution areas and disproportionately burdened communities.

(b) The department, in consultation with the department of transportation, shall publish guidelines that specify a set of actions counties and cities may take through updates to their comprehensive plans and development regulations that have a demonstrated ability to reduce per capita vehicle miles traveled, including measures that are designed to be achievable throughout the state, including in small cities and rural cities.

(c) The department shall develop, in collaboration with the department of ecology, the department of fish and wildlife, the department of natural resources, the department of health, and the emergency management division of the military department, as well as any federally recognized tribe who chooses to voluntarily participate, guidance that creates a model climate change and resiliency element that may be used by counties, cities, and multiple-county planning regions for developing and implementing climate change and resiliency plans and policies subject to the following provisions:

(i) The model element should provide guidance on identifying, designing, and investing in infrastructure that supports community resilience to climate impacts, including the protection, restoration, and enhancement of natural infrastructure as well as traditional infrastructure and protecting natural areas resilient to climate impacts, as well as areas of vital habitat for safe passage and species migration;

(ii) The model element should provide guidance on identifying and addressing natural hazards created or aggravated by climate change, including sea level rise, landslides, flooding, drought, heat, smoke, wildfires, and other effects of reasonably anticipated changes to temperature and precipitation patterns;

(iii) The model element must recognize and promote as many cobenefits of climate resilience as possible, such as salmon recovery, ecosystem services, and supporting treaty rights; and

(iv) The model element must prioritize actions in communities that will disproportionately suffer from compounding environmental impacts and will be most impacted by natural hazards due to climate change and may draw upon the most recent health disparities data from the department of health to identify disproportionately burdened communities.

(d) If the department publishes any subsequent updates to the guidelines published pursuant to (a) or (b) of this subsection, the department shall include in any such update a determination of whether adequate progress has been made toward the statewide greenhouse gas and per capita vehicle miles traveled reduction goals. If adequate progress is not being made, the department must identify in any updates to the guidelines what additional measures cities and counties may take in order to make further progress.

(e) The department, in the course of implementing this subsection, shall provide and prioritize options that support housing diversity and that assist counties and cities in meeting greenhouse gas emissions reduction and other requirements established under chapter 70A.45 RCW.

(127) $240,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $95,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to collaborate with the department of children, youth, and families to jointly convene and facilitate a child care collaborative task force to continue the work of the task force created in chapter 368, Laws of 2019 (2SHB 1344) to establish a true cost of quality of child care. The task force shall report its findings and recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 1, 2022.

(128) $10,000,000 of the Washington housing trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for housing that serves people with intellectual and developmental disabilities.

(129) $10,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department for grants for updating and implementing comprehensive plans and development regulations in order to implement the requirements of the growth management act.

(a) In allocating grant funding to local jurisdictions, awards must be based on a formula, determined by the department, to ensure that grants are distributed equitably among cities and counties. Grants will be used primarily to fund the review and update requirements for counties and cities required by RCW 36.70A.130. Funding provided on this formula basis shall cover additional county and city costs, if applicable, to implement chapter 254, Laws of 2021 (Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1220).

(b) Within the amounts not utilized under (a) of this subsection, the department shall establish a competitive grant program to implement requirements of the growth management act.

(c) Up to $500,000 per biennium may be allocated toward growth management policy research and development or to assess the ongoing effectiveness of existing growth management policy.

(d) The department must develop a process for consulting with local governments, affected stakeholders, and the legislature to establish emphasis areas for competitive grant distribution and for research priorities. The department must complete a report on emphasis areas and research priorities by June 30, 2023.

(130) $87,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1914 (motion picture program). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(131) $4,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for a grant to the city of Seattle for deposit into the Skagit environmental endowment fund to support the protection of the headwaters of the Skagit river watershed through the acquisition of land, mining, and/or timber rights. This grant must be matched by nonstate sources.

(132)(a) $45,050,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for a targeted grant program to transition persons residing on state-owned rights-of-way to safer housing opportunities, with an emphasis on permanent housing solutions. Eligible grant recipients include local governments and nonprofit organizations operating to provide housing or services. Recipients may use grant funding to provide outreach, housing, transportation, and other services needed to assist individuals residing on public rights-of-way with moving into housing.

(b) Prior to awarding grants under (a) of this subsection, the department must work with the department of transportation, representatives of local governments, and representatives of nonprofit housing and homeless services providers to determine the process and criteria that will be used to award grants. Grant criteria must include, but are not limited to:

(i) Whether a site where the grantee will conduct outreach and engagement has been identified by the department of transportation as a location where individuals residing on the public right-of-way are in specific circumstances or physical locations that expose them to especially or imminently unsafe conditions, including but not limited to active construction zones and risks of landslides, or when the location of an individual poses a significant threat to the safety of others;

(ii) Local government readiness and capacity to enter into and fulfill the grant requirements as applicable; and

(iii) Other criteria as identified by the department.

(c) When awarding grants under (a) of this subsection, the department must prioritize applicants that focus on permanent housing solutions.

(d) Grant recipients under (a) of this subsection must enter into a memorandum of understanding with the department, and other state agencies if applicable, as a condition of receiving funds. Memoranda of understanding must specify the responsibilities of the grant recipients and the state agencies, and must include specific measurable outcomes for each entity signing the memorandum. The department must publish all signed memoranda on the department's website and must publish an update on outcomes for each memorandum at least every 60 days. At a minimum, outcomes must include:

(i) The number of people living on the right-of-way whom the parties engage;

(ii) The demographics of those engaged;

(iii) The type and duration of engagement with individuals living on rights-of-way;

(iv) The types of housing options that were offered;

(v) The number of individuals who accepted offered housing;

(vi) The types of assistance provided to move individuals into offered housing;

(vii) Any services and benefits in which an individual was successfully enrolled; and

(vii) The housing outcomes of individuals who were placed into housing six months and one year after placement.

(e) Grant recipients under (a) of this subsection may not transition individuals from public rights-of-way unless they in good faith offer individuals a housing option that is safer than their current living situation. The department must establish criteria regarding the safety, accessibility, and habitability of housing options to be offered by grant recipients to ensure that such options are a meaningful improvement over an individual's current living situation and that grant recipients provide options that are well-matched to an individual's assessed needs.

(f) The department must submit a preliminary report to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature by December 15, 2022, and a full report by September 30, 2023. The reports must identify barriers to housing and gaps in services that prevented or otherwise impacted the housing outcomes of individuals engaged by the grantees, and policy and budgetary recommendations to improve the transition of individuals residing on public rights-of-way to permanent housing.

(133) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to contract with a consultant to study incorporating the unincorporated communities of Fredrickson, Midland, North Clover Creek-Collins, Parkland, Spanaway, Summit-Waller, and Summit View into a single city. The study must include, but not be limited to, the impacts of incorporation on the local tax base, crime, homelessness, infrastructure, public services, and behavioral health services, in the listed communities. The department must submit the study to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 1, 2023.

(134) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to develop a community reinvestment plan to guide the distribution of grants from the community reinvestment account created in section 947 of this act.

(a) The department shall, in partnership with the office of equity, and "by and for community organizations" as defined by the office of equity, develop a community reinvestment plan for how funds would be distributed to address racial, economic, and social disparities in communities across the state created by the historical design and enforcement of state and federal criminal laws and penalties for drug possession. The community reinvestment plan should address funding in the following areas:

(i) Economic development, which includes addressing wealth disparities to promote asset building such as home ownership and expanding access to financial resources including, but not limited to, grants and loans for small businesses and entrepreneurs, financial literacy training, and other small business training and support activities;

(ii) Civil and criminal legal assistance to provide postconviction relief and case assistance, including the expungement of criminal records and vacation of criminal convictions;

(iii) Community-based violence intervention and prevention services; and

(iv) Reentry services to facilitate successful transitions for persons formerly incarcerated in an adult correctional facility or juvenile residential facility in Washington.

(b) The plan must include a timeline for regular review by the department and the office of equity, criteria for eligible communities and programs, development of accountability measures to ensure that distribution and use of funding meets intended purposes, and tracking of outcomes for the funds. At a minimum, the plan must address how the community reinvestment account funding will:

(i) Produce significant long-term economic benefits to the state, a region of the state, or a particular community in the state;

(ii) Result in significant long-term economic benefits in the form of new jobs, job retention, increased personal wealth, or higher incomes for citizens of the state or a particular community in the state; and

(iii) Ensure that:

(A) Projects or programs do not require continuing state support;

(B) An expenditure will not supplant private investment;

(C) An expenditure is accompanied by additional public or private investment; and

(D) Nonprofit, faith-based, and grassroots organizations are prioritized for funding.

(c) In developing the plan, the department is encouraged to incorporate existing and ongoing work from relevant task forces and work groups including, but not limited to, the social equity in cannabis task force, the reentry council, and the homeownership disparities work group.

(d) The department shall submit a preliminary report to the governor and relevant committees of the legislature by December 1, 2022. A final report on the implementation plan must be submitted to the governor and relevant committees of the legislature by June 30, 2023.

(135) $10,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to conduct outreach activities for the working families tax exemption established in RCW 82.08.0206 and the federal earned income tax credit. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) $6,860,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for grants to community-based organizations to conduct outreach activities and application assistance for individuals eligible for the working families tax exemption. In awarding the funds, the department must award grants to at least two community-based organizations in each county. Of the amounts provided in this subsection (135)(a), 25 percent must be used for outreach activities serving tribal and urban Indian communities, communities of color, and households in rural areas.

(b) $2,860,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for grants to community-based organizations to conduct outreach activities and application assistance for individuals eligible for the working families tax exemption who file or may be eligible to file using a valid individual taxpayer identification number. Grant recipients may also use grant funds to assist individuals in obtaining valid individual tax identification numbers.

(c) $280,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to provide oversight, technical assistance, and training for grant recipients; conduct language access activities; create a statewide outreach plan; and for other administrative costs.

(136) $5,000,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for grants to nonprofit arts, heritage, science, and culture organizations for costs associated with COVID-19 testing and safety monitoring required by state and local governments and by union contracts. To receive a grant under this section, an applicant must certify that they have reported annual gross receipts of greater than $5,000,000 in calendar year 2019, and that they applied for but did not receive funding from a state or federal source for the same eligible costs.

(137) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization to provide programming that offers pathways to higher education and career opportunities in the arts, entertainment, and related creative industries for youth and young adults in south King county, with a focus on low-income individuals and historically disadvantaged populations. The grant recipient must be a nonprofit organization headquartered in the city of Federal Way that: Has experience working with BIPOC communities; serves youth and young adults through programs focused on cultivating creative talents through the professional entertainment and arts industries; can directly facilitate the placement of program participants in industry-related internships and job opportunities; and can demonstrate a working relationship or strategic partnerships with global commercial entertainment and digital arts industry experts, networks, and companies in areas such as music, film, television, and fashion. The organization may use the grant for activities including, but not limited to, workshops and other events that support the goal of improving the business and professional skills of youth and young adults interested in the arts and entertainment industries.

(((139)))(138) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department of commerce to develop a report on the behavioral health and long-term care facilities and residential settings that provide services within the continuum of care for individuals who are discharged from state psychiatric hospitals. For the purposes of this subsection, "continuum of care" means transitional housing or residential placements that provide supportive services and skill development needed for individuals to be permanently housed, and permanent supportive housing or residential placements that provide individuals with an appropriate place to live with services available as needed. The report must map the geographic location of each facility or residential setting, and it must highlight geographic gaps in service availability. In preparing the report, the department must coordinate with the department of social and health services, the department of health, and the health care authority. The department must submit its report to the governor and appropriate legislative committees no later than December 1, 2022.

(((140)))(139) $5,000,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the department to establish a grant program to assist businesses and nonprofits that are dependent to maintain their operations on the economic activity created through conventions hosted in Washington state. The amount provided under this subsection is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) To be eligible for a grant under this subsection, a business must:

(i) Apply for or have applied for the grant;

(ii) Have not reported annual gross receipts of more than $100,000,000 in calendar year 2019;

(iii) Have expenses that are necessary to continue business operations and the expense is not a federal, state, or local tax, fee, license, or other government revenue;

(iv) Self-attest that the expense is not funded by any other government or private entity;

(v) Have experienced a reduction in business income or activity related to COVID-19 or state or local actions in response to COVID-19;

(vi) Agree to operate in accordance with the requirements of applicable federal, state, and local public health guidance and directives; and

(vii) Have met one or more of the following criteria:

(A) Hosted a convention in Washington state;

(B) Provided support services to conventions in Washington state; or

(C) Depended on the function of conventions to sell goods and services in Washington state.

(b)(i) Eligible businesses may receive a grant of up to $500,000 for revenue lost due to a cancellation or a reduction of participants in a convention hosted in Washington state in 2020 or 2021.

(ii) To receive a grant under this subsection, eligible businesses must provide the department with:

(A) Financial records from 2019 that provide a basis for revenue received from convention activity in Washington state prior to the COVID-19 pandemic; and

(B) Financial records from 2020 and 2021 that show a reduction in gross revenue received from convention activity in Washington state during the COVID-19 pandemic.

(iii) If a business received one or more working Washington small business grants, the grant awarded under this subsection must be reduced to reflect the amounts received from previous working Washington small business grants.

(c) Nonprofit organizations are eligible to receive funding under this subsection if they have a primary business activity that has been impacted as described in (a)(v) of this subsection.

(d) The department may use up to 10 percent of the amount provided in this subsection for administrative costs.

(((141)))(140) $325,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $325,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization located in the city of Redmond that serves Latino low-income, immigrant, and Spanish-speaking communities in King and Snohomish counties through arts and culture events and community services. Grant funding may be used to expand existing programs including, but not limited to, rent assistance, vaccination assistance, COVID-19 outreach, microbusiness support, and other community services.

(((142)))(141) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for a program to build capacity and promote the development of nonprofit community land trust organizations in the state. Funds shall be granted by the department to one or more nonprofit organizations with technical expertise on community land trusts. These funds shall be used to provide technical assistance and training to help community land trusts increase the production of affordable housing.

(((143)))(142) $900,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization to conduct community outreach and culturally relevant training on prevention of digital fraud and other consumer fraud, with a focus on serving low-income, rural, and BIPOC communities. The grant recipient must be the Washington state affiliate of a national nonprofit organization that provides services, research, and advocacy for individuals aged 50 and up. Funding may be used to expand existing consumer fraud education programs; partner with locally trusted community-based organizations to provide public awareness of digital and other consumer fraud; and conduct research to capture baseline data regarding digital and fraud literacy in Washington state.

(((144)))(143) $631,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the developmental disabilities council's efforts to partner with racially diverse communities across the state and to build the capacity of a coalition of intellectual and developmental disabilities self-advocates and advocates. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the developmental disabilities council to enter into a contract with a nonprofit organization led by individuals who are Black, indigenous, or people of color to facilitate the development and implementation of recommendations on ways to reduce barriers to services and improve access to services for individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities who are from immigrant communities, communities of color, and other underserved communities. The contract must require the nonprofit organization to prepare a racial equity plan for ongoing policy development within the intellectual and developmental disabilities service delivery system for submittal to the developmental disabilities council. The developmental disabilities council must submit the plan to the governor and appropriate legislative committees no later than June 30, 2023.

(b) $131,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for one full-time equivalent policy analyst to manage the developmental disabilities council's overall policy development and diversity, equity, and inclusion efforts. The policy analyst shall serve as a liaison between self-advocates, advocates, community members, and the nonprofit organization under contract in (a) of this subsection.

(((145)))(144) $584,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for a grant to a dispute resolution center located in the city of Seattle and serving King county to develop a basic mediation training curriculum for organizations that serve communities in south King county, with a focus on organizations serving and operated by members of historically disadvantaged communities. The grant recipient may use the funding for activities including, but not limited to, conducting a needs assessment, developing and designing the curriculum, engaging subject matter experts, and conducting training sessions.

(((146)))(145) $45,000,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the eviction prevention rental assistance program created in RCW 43.185C.185.

(((147)))(146) $4,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for a grant program to community-based organizations that provide services for survivors of domestic violence. Grant recipients may use funding for domestic violence survivor advocates to provide case management, safety planning, and other services for survivors, and as flexible funding to meet the immediate needs of survivors of domestic violence.

(((148) $15,000,000))(147) $1,800,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely to expand the small business resiliency network program. Program expansion activities may include:

(a) Providing funding for new or existing network partners to provide wraparound services and support to assist small business owners, including support in accessing financing; and

(b) Establishing a credit repair pilot program by contracting with community foundations and nonprofit credit unions with existing character-based lending programs to provide credit counseling and other services to build or improve credit for small businesses and entrepreneurs who are unable to access conventional lending.

(((149)))(148) $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $290,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization that operates a resource center in the city of Ferndale to expand social services programs. Eligible social services programs include, but are not limited to, basic needs supports for low-income and vulnerable families; emergency preparedness programs that connect community volunteers to opportunities to assist community members during emergencies; and conducting antiracist events and learning opportunities in order to build community.

(((150)))(149) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the office of firearm safety and violence prevention for programs relating to firearm removals in domestic violence cases. Programs may include:

(a) Grants for local law enforcement agencies to coordinate the removal of firearms pursuant to RCW 9.41.800 and 9.41.801 in civil and criminal domestic violence cases at a regional level; and

(b) Activities to increase statewide adherence to RCW 9.41.800 and 9.41.801, including, but not limited to, technical assistance, training, and collecting data from local law enforcement agencies relating to firearm removals in cases where a court orders the surrender of weapons.

(((151) $55,000,000))(150) $49,550,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the department to administer stipends to eligible homeless service provider employees for their immediate economic needs and to conduct a homeless service provider workforce study.

(a) Of the amount provided in this subsection:

(i) $27,250,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for a stipend payment of up to $2,000 for eligible homeless service provider employees with an income at or below 80 percent of the area median income. An individual who works for two or more eligible entities in an eligible position may only receive one stipend under this subsection.

(ii) $27,250,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for a second stipend payment of up to $2,000 for individuals who received an initial stipend payment under (i) of this subsection (((151)))(150)(a) and who are still employed at the same eligible entity six months after receipt of the first stipend payment. An individual who works for two or more eligible entities in an eligible position may only receive one stipend under this subsection.

(iii)(A) $500,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with a third-party entity to conduct a study on the workforce needs of nonprofit organizations employing eligible homeless service provider employees, with the goal of developing state-level strategies for improving workforce retention among organizations providing homeless services.

(B) The study must examine topics including, but not limited to, pay and benefits; training and supervision; caseloads; safety and morale; and other factors impacting hiring and retention.

(C) The study must examine the potential impact on workforce retention of inflationary increases for administrative allowances and other automatic escalators on state-funded homelessness service contracts, including contracts administered by the office of homeless youth.

(D) The study must include a pay equity and comparable worth analysis that compares eligible homeless service provider positions with jobs with similar complexity, difficulty, and educational and skill requirements in the public and private sectors that were deemed essential during the COVID-19 pandemic.

(E) In conducting the study, the third-party entity must consult with eligible homeless service provider employees; employees of eligible entities with lived experience of homelessness; and organizations led by or serving BIPOC populations.

(F) The department must report the results of the study, including any policy recommendations, to the appropriate committees of the legislature by September 30, 2023.

(b) The department must contract with an entity located in Washington state to administer the stipend payments in (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection. The entity must demonstrate an ability to efficiently administer stipend payments statewide by showing successful administration of similar programs; an ability to adhere to federal tax requirements, including sending stipend recipients 1099 or other required tax forms; and an ability to track and report on demographic data of stipend recipients and fulfill other reporting requirements as determined by the department. The entity must conduct marketing and outreach for the program by September 1, 2022, and begin administering stipend payments under (a)(i) of this subsection by October 1, 2022. The administrator must pay the stipends on a first-come, first-served basis and there is no individual entitlement to receive a stipend.

(c) The department is authorized to shift funding among the purposes in (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection based on the level of demonstrated need.

(d) The department may retain up to five percent of the funding allocated under (a) of this subsection for administrative costs.

(e) The administrating entity selected under (b) of this subsection may use up to 15 percent of the funding allocated under (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection for administrative costs and up to five percent of the funding allocated under (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection for outreach and marketing costs.

(f) For the purposes of this subsection:

(i) "Eligible homeless service provider employee" means an individual currently employed on a full-time or part-time basis at an eligible entity that works directly on-site with persons experiencing homelessness or residents of transitional or permanent supportive housing. This includes, but is not limited to, emergency shelter and transitional housing staff; street outreach workers; caseworkers; peer advisors; reception and administrative support staff; maintenance and custodial staff; and individuals providing direct services for homeless youth and young adults. This does not include executive and senior administrative employees of an eligible entity. Nothing in this subsection creates an employment relationship, or any membership or qualification in any state or other publicly supported retirement system, due to the payment of a stipend.

(ii) "Eligible entity" means an organization with whom state agencies or local governments grant or subcontract to provide homeless services under their homeless housing program as defined in RCW 43.185C.010.

(iii) "Immediate economic needs" means costs including, but not limited to, rent or mortgage payments; utilities and other household bills; medical expenses; student loan payments; transportation-related costs; child care-related costs; behavioral health-related costs; and other basic necessities.

(((152)))(151)(a) $100,000,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the department to administer a business assistance program for qualifying hospitality industry businesses that have been negatively impacted by the COVID-19 public health emergency or its negative economic impacts. The department must administer the program under appropriate agreements. For the purposes of this subsection, "qualifying hospitality industry businesses" means restaurants, hotels, motels, and other businesses in the hospitality industry as determined by the department.

(b) Of the amount provided in this subsection, $15,000,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for grants to reimburse lodging establishments that have experienced losses during the state's eviction moratorium pursuant to the governor's proclamations. The department must work with impacted lodging establishments to develop criteria for the administration of this grant program. The department will verify actual eligible losses to be reimbursed. Actual eligible losses include room charges not paid by persons who stayed during the moratorium, any legal expenses incurred by lodging establishments as a result of the moratorium, and any repair expenses directly attributed to damages to rooms. For the purposes of this subsection (((152)))(151)(b), "lodging establishment" means a hotel, motel, or similar establishment taxable by the state under chapter 82.08 RCW that has 40 or more lodging units.

(((153)))(152) $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for housing assistance for victims of human trafficking. The department must allocate funding through contracts with service providers that have current contracts with the office of crime victims advocacy to provide services for victims of human trafficking. A provider must use at least 80 percent of contracted funds for rental payments to landlords and the remainder for other program operation costs, including services addressing barriers to acquiring housing that are common for victims of human trafficking.

(((154)))(153) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization operating a low-barrier emergency shelter located in the town of Wapato serving Native and non-Native chronically homeless individuals. Grant funds must be used to provide daytime services such as meals and hygiene services; case management; outreach; and other homeless services.

(((155)))(154) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to contract with a nonprofit organization in Kitsap county to provide services for families experiencing domestic violence. Amounts provided in this subsection must be used to expand supports for survivors and their children fleeing immediately dangerous situations, including emergency shelter, case management, housing advocacy, child care, mental health services, and resources and referrals. The nonprofit organization must be located in Kitsap county and must operate a state-certified domestic violence shelter.

(((156)))(155) $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for a grant to the city of Kent for operational improvements and other actions to improve safety and reduce train noise, with the goal of increasing quality of life and facilitating transit-oriented living in downtown Kent.

(((157)))(156)(a) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to establish a lifeline support system pilot project to assist individuals who have experienced or are at risk of entering into public systems of care. Public systems of care include office of homeless youth prevention and protection shelter and housing programs, the juvenile justice system, dependency under chapter 13.34 RCW, and inpatient behavioral health treatment.

(b)(i) The lifeline must function as a no-wrong-door access point for support and connections to services for qualifying individuals who require assistance to overcome a life challenge that could escalate into a crisis, or who are in need of general mentorship and counsel. The lifeline support system must facilitate and promote partnerships across state agencies, federally recognized tribes, counties, and community-based providers to coordinate trauma-informed and culturally responsive services for youth and young adults and their supports. The department is authorized to implement lifeline services through contracts with community partners and nonprofit organizations.

(ii) The department must establish a lifeline fund. Moneys in the fund can be used to assist community partners and nonprofit organizations to implement lifeline services when they cannot identify an existing resource to resolve a beneficiary need. The department must establish an application process and criteria for the fund.

(c) The department and a nonprofit organization, selected by the office of homeless youth, shall coconvene a work group that will design a lifeline support services system and framework for statewide implementation. This group shall have an inaugural meeting no later than August 31, 2022, and have a design ready no later than October 31, 2022. By December 31, 2022, the department, with assistance from the work group, must provide a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature on approaches to continue this pilot project in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium.

(d) By June 30, 2023, the department, with assistance from the nonprofit organization that coconvened the work group, shall provide a report to the legislature describing the success and shortcomings of the lifeline support system, as well as other data such as request-for-service conclusions and the demographics of beneficiaries. The report must include a recommendation for how the state can permanently establish the lifeline.

(((158)))(157) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization that provides services to survivors of domestic violence in north and east King county. Grant funding may be used for services including, but not limited to, staffing support for emergency and advocacy services and costs to expand emergency and transitional housing services for survivors of domestic violence with the greatest safety risks and highest barriers to acquiring safe housing.

(((159)))(158) $850,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization for costs to operate a low-barrier homeless shelter and provide housing intervention and placement services. The grant recipient must be a nonprofit organization that provides permanent supportive housing services, provides homeless services for youth and young adults, and operates a low-barrier homeless shelter for women over the age of 18 in the city of Spokane.

(((160)))(159) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for a contract with a nonprofit to provide technical assistance to manufactured home community resident organizations who wish to convert the park in which they reside to resident ownership, pursuant to RCW 59.22.039. Technical assistance includes, but is not limited to, assistance with prepurchase efforts and resident outreach and engagement activities prior to filing an intent to purchase.

(((161)))(160) $900,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to contract with one or more community-based organizations to administer a homeownership assistance program for low-income households who have been displaced from their manufactured/mobile homes due to the closure or conversion of a mobile home park or manufactured housing community in south King county. The program may offer services including credit counseling; financial education courses; assistance in locating, understanding, and preparing necessary financial and legal documentation for homeownership; outreach and engagement services, including in-language services; and other technical support to prepare households for homeownership.

(((162)))(161) $185,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization to provide advocacy, translation, emergency housing, and other services for victims of domestic violence, with a focus on serving members of the Latino and indigenous communities. The grant recipient must be a community-based nonprofit organization located in the city of Tacoma that provides educational programs, crisis intervention, family outreach services, arts and culture programming, and advocacy with a focus on serving Latino and indigenous communities.

(((163)))(162) $1,400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to contract with the municipal research and services center, in coordination with the Washington procurement technical assistance center, to provide training and technical assistance to local governments and contractors on public works contracting. Training topics may include utilization of supplemental bidding criteria, utilization of alternate public works, contracting, cost estimating, obtaining performance and payment bonds, and increasing participation of women-owned and minority-owned businesses.

(((164)))(163) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization in the city of Tacoma that provides on-water marine science and maritime programs, as well as mentoring and community service opportunities, for youth and young adults. Grant funding must be used to expand program participation of youth and young adults from underserved and underrepresented communities.

(((165)))(164) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for a grant to the city of Poulsbo to expand the service capacity of the fire cares behavioral health mobile outreach program.

(((166)))(165) $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for concept development, design, and planning of state-operated or contracted residential housing facilities and services at the Pacific hospital preservation and development authority quarters buildings three through ten in Seattle. The residential housing facilities may be used for recovery residences, group care, transitional housing, supportive housing, or family-centered substance use disorder recovery housing. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is for lease payments for the Pacific hospital preservation and development authority quarters buildings three through ten.

(b) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is for the department to convene a work group to develop a programming plan for utilization of the repurposed quarters buildings three through ten, subject to the following requirements:

(i) The department must contract with a nonprofit organization to facilitate the work group. The nonprofit organization must be located in the city of Seattle with experience working with systems of care, including foster care, juvenile justice, and behavioral health, and have statewide experience as an advocate, provider, and convener of programming needs for youth and young adults.

(ii) The work group must include members representing the department of children, youth, and families; the health care authority; social service providers led by and serving people of color; social service providers whose leadership represent and who serve LGBTQ youth and young adults; and persons with lived experience.

(iii) By December 31, 2022, the department must submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature with recommendations on housing and program models, service arrays, and estimates of operation costs.

(((167) $34,500,000))(166) $27,500,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for a small business innovation and competitiveness fund program to spur small business recovery, startup, and growth, with a focus on initiatives that will serve BIPOC entrepreneurs and small businesses located in underserved, low-income, and rural areas.

(a) The department must competitively award grants to nonprofit organizations that work with or provide assistance to small businesses.

(b) Grant funding may be used for activities such as:

(i) Small business incubator programs;

(ii) Small business accelerator programs;

(iii) Local procurement initiatives;

(iv) Small business competitiveness programs focused on hiring and retention;

(v) Improvements and repairs to physical workplaces, including in response to public health guidelines or acts of vandalism; and

(vi) Other initiatives as determined by the department.

(c) The department may require applicants to provide a description of how proposed initiatives will benefit small businesses and entrepreneurs that are not members of the recipient organization, if applicable.

(d) The department may encourage, but may not require, a local one-to-one match of state funding awarded under the program.

(e) The department may establish regional targets or other benchmarks to ensure equitable geographic distribution of funding. If regional targets or benchmarks are adopted, the department must assess and report to the legislature on the program's performance by June 1, 2023.

(f) In developing the program, the department must consult with economic development professionals and small business support organizations. The department may consult with other interested parties at its discretion.

(((168)))(167) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to contract for technical assistance services for small businesses owned or operated by members of historically disadvantaged populations located in western Washington, with a focus on Black-owned small businesses. The contract recipient must be a business in the arts, entertainment, and media services sector based in the city of Federal Way and with experience working with BIPOC communities. Technical assistance includes but is not limited to services such as: Business and intellectual property development; franchise development and expansion; digital and social media marketing and brand development; community outreach; opportunities to meet potential strategic partners or corporate sponsors; executive workshops; networking events; small business coaching; and start-up assistance.

(((169)))(168) $97,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to examine actual and potential school director compensation, including salaries, per diem rates, expense reimbursements, and health care benefits for the purpose of determining what changes in statute or practice, if any, would be necessary to align provisions governing school director compensation with those governing the compensation of other elected officials with comparable duties and responsibilities.

(a) The examination required by this subsection, at a minimum, must address:

(i) The duties and responsibilities of school directors and to what extent those duties, and the factors relevant to their completion, may have changed in the previous 10 years;

(ii) Demographic data about school district boards of directors and the communities they represent for the purpose of understanding the diversity of school district boards of directors and whether that diversity reflects the communities they serve;

(iii) The significant variances in school district budgets, student enrollments, tax bases, and revenues;

(iv) Options for periodically updating school director compensation, including the frequency and timing of potential compensation reviews, potential entities that may be qualified to conduct the reviews, and considerations related to inflationary indices or other measures that reflect cost-of-living changes; and

(v) Options for funding the actual and potential costs of school director compensation, including salaries, per diem amounts, expense reimbursements, and health care benefits.

(b) In completing the examination required by this subsection, the department shall consult with interested parties, including the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the Washington state school directors' association, the Washington association of school administrators, and educational service districts.

(c) The department shall, in accordance with RCW 43.01.036, report its findings and recommendations to the governor, the superintendent of public instruction, and the committees of the legislature with jurisdiction over fiscal matters and K-12 education by January 6, 2023.

(((170)))(169) $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for a grant to the south King fire and rescue district located in south King county to implement a workforce development initiative, with the goals of increasing recruitment and retention of employees from south King county communities and increasing the diversity of the district's workforce.

(((171)))(170) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to contract for a diversity, equity, and inclusion initiative focused on youth sports and other activities, with an emphasis on basketball. The contract recipient must be a nongovernmental entity that serves as a resource for professional, amateur, collegiate, and youth sports organizations and venues in the greater Seattle region. Contract funding may be used to provide engagement and support for Washington state youth basketball organizations, with a focus on organizations in the Puget Sound region, and to provide assistance for activities including sport academies, youth leagues and sport camps, promotion of community basketball events, scholarships, and an equity in sports summit.

(((172)))(171) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $850,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization located in the city of Seattle that provides legal assistance and representation to survivors of sexual and gender-based violence to expand their current services, including but not limited to legal assistance and representation; technical assistance for advocates, providers, and attorneys; community education and trainings; and other legal support services. In providing services, the grant recipient must protect the privacy, safety, and civil rights of survivors and utilize trauma-informed practices and equity principles.

(((173)))(172) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for a contract for a small business assistance program serving the city of Silverdale and central Kitsap county. The contract recipient must be a nongovernmental organization located in the city of Silverdale whose primary focus is the economic development of the city of Silverdale and central Kitsap county. The contract funding must be used to provide financial assistance in the form of grants or loans and other entrepreneurship opportunities for small businesses that have experienced a loss of business income or activity or have been otherwise economically disadvantaged during the COVID-19 pandemic. The contract recipient must conduct targeted outreach and education to ensure small businesses owned by members of historically marginalized communities are aware of business assistance opportunities available through the program.

(((174)))(173) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization for activities that will improve access to child care in southwest Washington, including but not limited to activities to begin using a shared services model for regional child care providers, and to convene a short-term work group on expanding child care access and affordability in the region. The grant recipient must be a nonprofit organization located in the city of Vancouver that is the lead organization in a collaborative partnership to expand child care capacity in southwest Washington.

(((175)))(174) $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization to provide sexual assault prevention programming to middle and high schools in the Tacoma school district. The grant recipient must be a nonprofit organization serving the city of Tacoma that provides education, intervention, and social advocacy programs for victims of sexual assault, domestic violence, human trafficking, and other forms of abuse.

(((176)))(175) $80,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization for information technology needs, including, but not limited to, hardware, software, and other subscriptions, so that the recipient may continue and expand services to address poverty. The grant recipient must be a nonprofit organization that works with public, private, and nonprofit partners to address poverty in Snohomish county, with a focus on serving families with young children.

(((178)))(176) $27,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the landlord mitigation program created in RCW 43.31.605(1). Of the amount provided in this subsection, $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is for program claims made pursuant to Substitute House Bill No. 1593 (landlord mitigation/victims).

(((179)))(177) $1,161,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1571 (indigenous persons/services). Of the amount provided in this subsection, $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for grants awarded under Substitute House Bill No. 1571. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((180)))(178) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1629 (aerial imaging technology). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((181)))(179) $486,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1717 (tribal participation). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((182)))(180) $953,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1723 (telecommunications access). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((183)))(181) $155,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1724 (supportive housing resources). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((184)))(182)(a) $7,790,000 of the apple health and homes account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1866 (supportive housing). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(b) Of the amount provided in this subsection, $6,500,000 of the apple health and homes account—state appropriation is provided solely for permanent supportive housing services including operations, maintenance, and service costs of permanent supportive housing units; project-based vouchers; rental subsidies; and provider grants. These funds shall not be used for costs that are eligible for coverage through the foundational community supports program established pursuant to the health care authority's federal medicaid transformation project waiver.

(((185)))(183) $4,434,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1905 (homelessness/youth discharge). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse. Of the amount provided in this subsection:

(a) $1,600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for flexible funding administered by the office of homeless youth to support persons under the age of 25 exiting publicly funded systems of care that need discrete support or funding to secure safe housing;

(b) $625,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for grants to counties to administer housing stability for youth in crisis programs; and

(c) $2,018,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for system of care grants. Of this amount, $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for grants to assist young adults discharging from inpatient behavioral health treatment facilities to obtain housing.

(((186)))(184)(a) $20,000,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for a small business disaster recovery financial assistance program to provide resources to small businesses that have sustained physical damage or economic loss due to a natural or other comparable disaster.

(b) The department may provide financial assistance in the form of grants to eligible businesses. Grant funds may be used for payroll, utilities and rent, marketing and advertising, building improvements or repairs, replacing damaged inventory and equipment, and other operations and business expenses.

(c) A business is eligible to apply for financial assistance through the program if they provide documentation to the department of:

(i) Annual gross receipts of $5,000,000 or less; and

(ii) A reduction in business income or activity as a result of a natural disaster such as a flood, earthquake, or wildfire, or a comparable disaster such as major utility disruptions resulting in property damage or prolonged outages.

(d) A department must provide assistance to an eligible business within three months of receiving an application.

(e) The department must coordinate with local economic development entities in conducting outreach to small businesses in order to increase awareness and understanding of the program.

(f) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $10,000,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for financial assistance for eligible businesses located in northwest Washington.

(((187)))(185) $214,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1015 (equitable access to credit). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((188)))(186)(a) $950,000 of the apple health and homes account—state appropriation is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization for an initiative to advance supportive housing projects, including those funded through the apple health and homes program created in Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1866 (supportive housing). The department is directed to extend the contract of the grantee of the 2021 request for qualifications and quotations advancing affordable housing and education centers due to the recipient's national experience with programs to sustain and rapidly expand housing for persons experiencing homelessness or at risk of homelessness, and who are, thereby, inherently impacted by COVID-19.

(b) The grant recipient must use the funding to:

(i) Partner with state, regional, and local public entities, nonprofit housing developers, and service providers to develop a broad range of housing types for supportive housing;

(ii) Provide technical assistance on the constructive alignment of yet-to-be-secured state or local capital funds, and other services, for the construction, acquisition, refurbishment, redevelopment, master leasing of properties for noncongregate housing, or conversion of units from nonresidential to residential, of dwelling units for supportive housing;

(iii) Analyze the suitability of properties and sites, including existing buildings for supportive housing, through completing due diligence, conceptual design, and financial analysis activities, applying and implementing an equity lens in site selection, program planning, development, and operations;

(iv) Advise and collaborate with the office of health and homes to prepare projects for capital funding;

(v) Advise on supportive housing best practices;

(vi) Advise on service delivery for vulnerable populations;

(vii) Advise on local community engagement, especially with populations with lived experience of homelessness; and

(viii) Subcontract for specialized predevelopment services as needed.

(((189)))(187) $7,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to administer grants to eligible cities for actions relating to adopting ordinances that would authorize middle housing types on at least 30 percent of lots currently zoned as single family residential.

(a) For the purposes of this subsection, a city is eligible to receive a grant if:

(i) The city is required to plan under RCW 36.70A.040; and

(ii) The city is required to take action on or before June 30, 2024, to review and, if needed, revise its comprehensive plan and development regulations pursuant to RCW 36.70A.130(5)(a).

(b) Grant recipients must use grant funding for costs to conduct at least three of the following activities:

(i) Analyzing comprehensive plan policies and municipal code to determine the extent of amendments required to meet the goal of authorizing middle housing types on at least 30 percent of lots currently zoned as single family residential;

(ii) Preparing informational material for the public;

(iii) Conducting outreach, including with the assistance of community-based organizations, to inform and solicit feedback from a representative group of renters and owner-occupied households in residential neighborhoods, and from for-profit and nonprofit residential developers;

(iv) Drafting proposed amendments to zoning ordinances for consideration by the city planning commission and city council;

(v) Holding city planning commission public hearings;

(vi) Publicizing and presenting the city planning commission's recommendations to the city council; and

(vii) Holding city council public hearings on the planning commission's recommendations.

(c) Before updating their zoning ordinances, a city must use a racial equity analysis and establish antidisplacement policies as required under RCW 36.70A.070(2)(e) through (h) to ensure there will be no net displacement of very low, low, or moderate-income households, as defined in RCW 43.63A.510, or individuals from racial, ethnic, and religious communities which have been subject to discriminatory housing policies in the past.

(d) The department shall prioritize applicants who:

(i) Aim to authorize middle housing types in the greatest proportion of zones; and

(ii) Subcontract with multiple community-based organizations that represent different vulnerable populations in overburdened communities, as defined in RCW 70A.02.010, that have traditionally been disparately impacted by planning and zoning policies and practices, to engage in eligible activities as described in (b) of this subsection.

(e) For the purposes of this subsection, "middle housing types" include duplexes, triplexes, fourplexes, fiveplexes, sixplexes, townhouses, courtyard apartments, cottage housing, and stacked flats.

(((190)))(188)(a) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to administer an energy efficient housing pilot program with the goal of reducing energy consumption and related expenses for low-income agricultural workers in the Yakima valley. Funding must be distributed in the form of grants to community-based organizations, with priority given to organizations with a proven track record of assisting agricultural workers.

(b) Grant recipients may use the funds awarded under (a) of this subsection to conduct the following activities for eligible housing:

(i) Install photovoltaic solar panel systems, solar water heating systems, and battery backups;

(ii) Replace energy inefficient appliances with energy star certified appliances;

(iii) Replace existing lighting with light emitting diode lighting; and

(iv) Conduct weatherization of homes and other residences.

(c) Eligible housing includes:

(i) Homes owned and occupied by agricultural workers; and

(ii) Homes, apartments, and other residential facilities providing rental housing to agricultural workers, provided that the owners of the facilities pass the savings in energy costs to agricultural worker tenants and commit to the use of the facilities as agricultural worker housing for 15 years as a condition of accepting assistance as described in (b) of this subsection.

(d) For the purposes of this subsection, "agricultural workers" means workers on farms and workers performing packing or processing work of agricultural products. "Agricultural workers" does not mean the owners of agricultural enterprises.

(((191)))(189)(a) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for a contract with a community-based nonprofit organization located in the Yakima valley to develop a community consortium for the purpose of developing and implementing strategies for the prevention of gang violence in Yakima county.

(b) The consortium must include representation from community-based organizations, gang-involved youth, law enforcement agencies, and state agencies involved in juvenile justice.

(c) The consortium must develop after-school activities such as counseling, tutoring, and computer literacy for gang-involved youth, in conjunction with local school districts.

(d) The consortium must, in conjunction with a public radio station, conduct a Spanish-language public radio media outreach campaign with the aim of linking gang-involved youth with employment, educational, and training opportunities. In conducting the outreach campaign, the consortium may work with schools, grassroots organizations, faith-based groups, law enforcement, families, and juvenile justice agencies.

(e) In developing its outreach and intervention activities, the consortium may facilitate workshops and conferences, either in person or virtual, with educators, parents, and youth.

(f) By June 30, 2023, the department must provide a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature. The report must include:

(i) A description of the gang violence prevention programs conducted by the consortium and how they were implemented;

(ii) A description of any virtual community events, workshops, and conferences held; and

(iii) The number of individuals who participated in or received services through the programs conducted by the consortium, including any relevant demographic data for those individuals.

(((192)))(190)(a) $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to administer grants to strengthen family resource center services and increase capacity statewide. Grant funding may be used: For an organization to provide new services in order to meet the statutory requirements of a family resource center, as defined in RCW 43.216.010; to increase capacity or enhance service provision at current family resource centers, including but not limited to direct staffing and administrative costs; and to conduct data collection, evaluation, and continuous quality improvement activities. The department may award an amount from $30,000 up to $200,000 per grant recipient.

(b) Eligible applicants for a grant under (a) of this subsection include current family resource centers, as defined in RCW 43.330.010, or organizations in the process of becoming qualified as family resource centers. Applicants must affirm their ability and willingness to serve all families requesting services in order to receive a grant. Applicants must currently be or agree to become a member of a statewide family resource center network during the grant award period in order to receive a grant.

(c) The department must co-convene an advisory group with the department of children, youth, and families that includes representatives from family resource centers; parents, caregivers, and individuals who have used family resource center services; and other stakeholders as determined by the department. The department must develop application guidelines and award funding to eligible applicants in consultation with the department of children, youth, and families and the advisory group. Advisory group members representing family resource centers or other organizations that apply for grant funding may not participate in the process of determining grant award recipients.

(d) In distributing grant funding, the department must, to the extent it is practicable, award 75 percent of funding to organizations located west of the crest of the Cascade mountains, and 25 percent of funding to organizations located east of the crest of the Cascade mountains.

(e) By July 1, 2023, grant recipients must submit a report to the department on the use of grant funding, including but not limited to progress in attaining status as a family resource center, if applicable; the number and type of services offered to families; demographic and income data for families served; and family postservice outcomes. By September 1, 2023, the department must submit a report to the legislature on topics including but not limited to the grant application process; needs identified by family resource centers; and use of funds by grant recipients.

(((193)))(191)(a) $2,800,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the office of firearm safety and violence prevention for a healthy youth and violence prevention initiative with the goal of preventing violence, decreasing engagement with the juvenile justice system, and encouraging health and well-being for youth and young adults ages 12 to 24. As part of the initiative, the office must partner with community-based organizations to serve as regional coordinators who will:

(i) Connect youth and young adults ages 12 to 24 who are most vulnerable to violence with programs that provide services including, but not limited to, street outreach, youth employment and preapprenticeship programs, case management, behavioral health services, and other services as appropriate; and

(ii) Assist local governments, service providers, and nonprofit organizations in accessing and leveraging federal, state, and local funding for violence prevention and related services.

(b) In developing the healthy youth and violence prevention initiative, the office must consult with interested parties including members of the legislature, community members with expertise in public health strategies to address youth violence, and people impacted by youth and young adult violence.

(c) Of the amount provided in this subsection:

(i) $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for a grant for a demonstration program serving south King county. The grant recipient must be a nonprofit health system currently administering a violence prevention initiative in King and Pierce counties. The grant recipient may subgrant or subcontract funds to programs providing services as described in (a)(i) of this subsection.

(ii) $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for planning grants for future programs serving Pierce county, Yakima county, and the city of Vancouver. Grant recipients must be community-based nonprofit organizations.

(iii) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the office to develop a database and reporting system for regional coordinators to report program outcomes for service providers receiving grants or subgrants through the initiative. The database must be accessible to and utilized by all organizations serving as regional coordinators. In developing the database fields, the office must, to the extent it is feasible, use categories identified as part of the developmental assets framework developed by the Search Institute.

(((194)))(192)(a) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $225,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to conduct an evaluation of the costs for cities and counties to review and revise their comprehensive plans to ensure compliance with chapter 36.70A RCW. The evaluation must include, at a minimum, the costs for each general jurisdiction size and type, and the costs to complete various types of planning requirements, including:

(i) Meeting the requirements of a new goal in RCW 36.70A.020;

(ii) Meeting the requirements of a new comprehensive plan element in RCW 36.70A.070;

(iii) Updating a critical areas ordinance;

(iv) Updating a shoreline master program ordinance;

(v) Making a minor update of a comprehensive plan element;

(vi) Making a complex update of a comprehensive plan element;

(vii) Updating a development regulation; and

(viii) Implementing a new development regulation.

(b) The department must consult with the Washington state association of counties and the association of Washington cities in conducting the evaluation.

(c) The department must submit a report of the results of the evaluation to the legislature by December 1, 2022.

(((195)))(193) $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to provide support to a public-private partnership that leverages private sector leadership and is composed of multiple interests, including public and private project developers, manufacturers and end users, research institutions, academia, government, and communities around the state, to develop and submit a competitive application for the federal department of energy regional clean hydrogen hubs grant. The application must focus on the sectors of the economy that are hardest to decarbonize, including industry, heavy transportation, maritime, and aviation.

(((196)))(194) $3,335,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $2,223,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for grants to counties to stabilize newly arriving refugees from the 2022 Ukraine-Russia conflict.

(((197)))(195) $50,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for digital equity and broadband access programs. Programs funded under this subsection may include programs to fulfill the recommendations of the Washington digital equity forum; programs to conduct activities identified by the statewide broadband office when developing the digital equity plan required as part of the state digital equity capacity grant program created in P.L. 117-58; and programs to increase broadband access for low-income and rural communities, including through low-orbit satellite broadband networks.

(((198)))(196)(a) $25,000,000 of the electric vehicle incentive account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to implement programs and incentives that promote the purchase of or conversion to alternative fuel vehicles. The department must work with the interagency electric vehicle coordinating council created in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5974 (transportation resources) to develop and implement alternative fuel vehicle programs and incentives.

(b) In developing and implementing programs and incentives under this subsection, the department must prioritize programs and incentives that:

(i) Will serve individuals living in an overburdened community, as defined in RCW 70A.02.010;

(ii) Will serve individuals who are in greatest need of this assistance in order to reduce the carbon emissions and other environmental impacts of their current mode of transportation in the overburdened community in which they live; and

(iii) Will serve low-income communities, communities with the greatest health disparities, and communities of color that are most likely to receive the greatest health benefits from the programs through a reduction in greenhouse gas emissions and other pollutants that will result in improved groundwater and stormwater quality, improved air quality, and reductions in noise pollution.

(((199)))(197) $100,000,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for grants for public and private water, sewer, garbage, electric, and natural gas utilities to address low-income customer arrearages compounded by the COVID-19 pandemic and the related economic downturn that were accrued between March 1, 2020, and December 31, 2021.

(a) By May 27, 2022, each utility that wishes to participate, must opt-in to the grant program by providing the department the following information:

(i) Current arrearage balances for residential customers as of March 31, 2022; and

(ii) Available information on arrearage balances of low-income customers, including customers who received assistance from the low-income home energy assistance program, low-income water assistance program, or ratepayer-funded assistance programs between April 1, 2020, and March 31, 2022, as of March 31, 2022. If a utility does not have access to information regarding customer participation in these programs, the department must distribute funding to the community action program serving the same service area as the utility instead of the utility.

(b) In determining the amount of funding each utility may receive, the department must consider:

(i) Each participating utility's proportion of the aggregate amount of arrearages among all participating utilities;

(ii) Utility service areas that are situated in locations experiencing disproportionate environmental health disparities;

(iii) American community survey poverty data; and

(iv) Whether the utility has leveraged other fund sources to reduce customer arrearages.

(c) The department may retain up to one percent of the funding provided in this subsection to administer the program.

(d) Each utility shall disburse funds directly to customer accounts ((by December 31, 2022)). Funding shall only be distributed to customers that have participated in the low-income home energy assistance program, low-income water assistance program, or ratepayer-funded assistance programs.

(e) Utilities may, but are not required to, work with other utilities or use community action agencies to administer these funds following the eligibility criteria for the low-income home energy assistance program and the low-income household water assistance program.

(f) By March 1, 2023, each utility who opted into the grant program must report to the department, utilities and transportation commission, and state auditor on how the funds were utilized and how many customers were supported.

(g) Utilities may account for and recover in rates administrative costs associated with the disbursement of funds provided in this subsection.

(((200)))(198) $4,092,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5566 (independent youth housing). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((201)))(199) $7,300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to increase funding for the community services block grant program. Distribution of these funds to community action agencies shall prioritize racial equity and undoing inequity from historic underinvestment in Black, indigenous, and people of color and rural communities.

(((202)))(200) $1,124,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for a grant to expand health care access points with increased services from the Tubman center for health and freedom to address disparate health outcomes of Black Washingtonians.

(((203)))(201) $3,335,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $2,223,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a grant to Snohomish county to stabilize newly arriving refugees from the 2021 Afghanistan conflict and the 2022 Ukraine conflict.

(((204)))(202) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a grant to a peer-led community and hospitality space located in south King county to expand services for women engaging in the sex trade.

(((205)))(203) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization to develop a K-12 school building ventilation technical assistance, outreach, and education program. The grant recipient must be located in a city with a population of more than 700,000 and must have experience administering a statewide technical assistance, outreach, and education program for building operators.

(((206)))(204) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for a grant to a Tacoma-based nonprofit dental clinic with a location in unincorporated Pierce county to continue to provide dental services to low-income youth.

(((207)))(205) $120,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit resource center in King county that provides sexual assault advocacy services, therapy services, and prevention and outreach to begin a three-year, multigrade sexual violence prevention program in the Renton school district.

(((208)))(206) $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a grant to a Tacoma-based nonprofit multicultural center to support the operations of food bank networks and to be reimbursed for equipment purchased for preventative maintenance on food bank network buildings.

(((209)))(207) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for a grant to a Kent-based, community-based nonprofit organization that serves culturally and linguistically diverse families of persons with developmental and intellectual disabilities for predevelopment funds to accelerate the production of new affordable housing and a multicultural community center.

(((210)))(208) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for a grant to a Tacoma-based business center that supports women and minority-owned businesses to expand outreach in underserved communities, providing targeted assistance where needed. Funding may also be used to collaborate the department, the Washington economic development association, and others to develop a more effective and efficient service delivery system for Washington's women and minority-owned small businesses.

(((211)))(209) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for a grant to a business center that provides confidential, no-cost, one-on-one, client-centered assistance to small businesses to expand outreach in underserved communities, especially Black, indigenous, and people of color-owned businesses, providing targeted assistance where needed. Funding may also be used to collaborate the department, the Washington economic development association, and others to develop a more effective and efficient service delivery system for Washington's women and minority-owned small businesses.

(((212)))(210) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs to colead a prevention work group with the department of children, youth, and families. The work group must focus on preventing youth and young adult homelessness and other related negative outcomes. The work group shall consist of members representing the department of social and health services, the employment security department, the health care authority, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the Washington student achievement council, the interagency work group on homelessness, community-based organizations, and young people and families with lived experience of housing instability, child welfare involvement, justice system involvement, or inpatient behavioral health involvement.

(a) The work group shall help guide implementation of:

(i) The state's strategic plan on prevention of youth homelessness;

(ii) Chapter 157, Laws of 2018 (SSB 6560);

(iii) Chapter 312, Laws of 2019 (E2SSB 5290);

(iv) Efforts to reform family reconciliation services; and

(v) Other state initiatives addressing the prevention of youth homelessness.

(b) The office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs must use the amounts provided in this subsection to contract with a community-based organization to support the involvement with the work group of young people and families with lived experience of housing instability, child welfare involvement, justice system involvement, or inpatient behavioral health involvement. The community-based organization must serve and be substantially governed by marginalized populations. The amounts provided in this subsection must supplement private funding to support the work group.

(((213)))(211) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for a grant to a maritime education nonprofit that will support outreach, recruitment, and maritime educational experiences at the new maritime high school in the highline public school district including developing mentorship and internship programs. Funds may be used to support the school's growth to full enrollment of 400 students, to pursue enrollment that reflects the diversity of the district, to aid recruitment activities that will include partnering with regional middle schools including hands-on learning experiences on vessels, and to support curriculum that gives students STEM skills and pathways to maritime careers, including in the sciences, vessel operations and design, and marine construction.

(((214)))(212) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to strengthen capacity of the keep Washington working act work group established in RCW 43.330.510.

(((215)))(213) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the transportation demand management program at the canyon park subarea in the city of Bothell.

(((216)))(214) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to report how the department will collect demographic and geographic information from organizations who receive direct or indirect grants from the department.

(a) The department may contract to complete the report. The department must collaborate with the one Washington enterprise resource planning team to determine what demographic and geographic data elements would be consistent with data elements in the extended financials and procurement phase of one Washington.

(b) The report must also include accurate cost and time estimates needed to collect the demographic and geographic information from department grantees and their subgrantees. The department must consult with the office of equity to ensure that demographic tracking information can be used to help create an accurate definition of "by and for organizations." The department must report to the legislature by June 30, 2023. The report must include, but is not limited to, the following information:

(i) The cost and time required for the department to revise current grant agreements to collect demographic and geographic data;

(ii) The cost and time required for the department to incorporate the collection of demographic and geographic data into future grant agreements;

(iii) The cost and time required for the department to align demographic and geographic data points to the one Washington program to serve as a data collection system and repository of demographic and geographic data on all department grant agreements;

(iv) In addition to the one Washington program, an analysis of other information technology systems that can serve as a unified single data collection system and repository for demographic and geographic data on all department grant agreements. This analysis should compare and contrast the efficiency and effectiveness of each system with the capabilities, cost, and timeliness of using the one Washington program for this purpose; and

(v) Recommendations on grants that should be excluded from the responsibility to collect demographic and geographic data.

(((217)))(215) $88,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for a grant to a Seattle-based nonprofit that teaches math using hands-on learning experiences and collaborates with community partners to create equity-based, culturally relevant math education opportunities.

(((218)))(216) $20,000,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide a grant to a public facility district created under chapter 36.100 RCW that can document losses of more than $200,000,000 in cumulative anticipated tax, event, and marketing revenues in 2020, 2021, and 2022, including lost revenue due to cancellations or a reduction of participants in conventions that would have been hosted in Washington state, less grants or loans from federal and state government programs. Eligible public facilities districts may receive a maximum $20,000,000 grant. Public facility districts must provide the department with financial records that document the lost revenue to be eligible to receive a grant.

(((219)))(217) $7,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to increase existing grantee contracts providing rental or housing subsidy and services for eligible tenants in housing and homeless programs. The department will work with stakeholders and grantees to increase current contracts and distribute funds to account for increases in housing and services costs across the state.

(((220)))(218)(a) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to conduct a cost-benefit analysis on the use of agrivoltaic and green roof systems on projected new buildings with a floor area of 10,000 square feet or larger to be developed over the next 20 years in communities of 50,000 or greater. The department shall consult with the department of ecology, private sector representatives, and an organization that has experience conducting cost-benefit analyses on green roofing. The cost-benefit analysis must include:

(i) The impact of widespread green and agrivoltaic roof installation on stormwater runoff and water treatment facilities in communities with a population of greater than 50,000;

(ii) Potential water quality and peak flow benefits of widespread green and agrivoltaic roof installation;

(iii) Public health impacts;

(iv) Air quality impacts;

(v) Reductions in fossil fuel use for buildings with agrivoltaic systems;

(vi) Energy efficiency of buildings with agrivoltaic systems;

(vii) Job creation; and

(viii) Agrivoltaic installation and maintenance costs.

(b) The department shall submit the report to the energy policy and fiscal committees of the legislature by June 30, 2023, that includes, but is not limited to:

(i) The results of the cost-benefit analysis in (a) of this subsection;

(ii) Recommendations on how agrivoltaic and green roofs can be integrated into new and existing building code requirements related to stormwater codes, energy codes, and the transition away from natural gas;

(iii) An examination of existing programs at the city and county level in Washington state;

(iv) A description of the policy components and framework for green and agrivoltaic roof policies and related incentive programs; and

(v) Incentive recommendations for building owners who cover more than 50 percent of the roof surface with a green or agrivoltaic roof.

(((221)))(219) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for a grant to a community-based organization in Whatcom county for a program that connects local food producers with retail and wholesale consumers.

(((222)))(220) $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for a grant to Yakima county to contract with a Yakima-based nonprofit organization to complete the planning and development of a community wildfire protection plan.

(((223)))(221) $1,091,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5910 (hydrogen). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((224)))(222) $1,637,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5722 (greenhouse gases/buildings). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((225)))(223) $8,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to build a mapping and forecasting tool that provides locations and information on charging and refueling infrastructure as required in chapter 300, Laws of 2021. The department shall collaborate with the interagency electric vehicle coordinating council established in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5974 (transportation resources) when developing the tool and must work to meet benchmarks established in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5974 (transportation resources).

(((226)))(224) $69,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for a grant program for the development of electric vehicle charging infrastructure in rural areas, office buildings, multifamily housing, ports, schools and school districts, and state and local government offices.

(a) Grants in this subsection are provided solely for projects that provide a benefit to the public through development, demonstration, and deployment of clean energy technologies that save energy and reduce energy costs, reduce harmful air emissions, or increase energy independence for the state.

(b) Projects that receive funds under this subsection must be implemented by local governments, federally recognized tribal governments, or by public and private electrical utilities that serve retail customers in the state. Grant funding must be used for level 2 or higher charging infrastructure.

(c) The department must give preference to projects that provide level 3 or higher charging infrastructure.

(d) The department of commerce must coordinate with other electrification programs, including projects the department of transportation is developing, to determine the most effective distribution of the systems. The department must also collaborate with the interagency electric vehicle coordinating council established in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5974 (transportation resources) to implement this subsection and must work to meet benchmarks established in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5974 (transportation resources).

(((227)))(225) $37,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for grants to increase solar deployment and installation of battery storage in community buildings to enhance grid resiliency and provide backup power for critical needs, such as plug load and refrigeration for medication, during outages. Eligible uses of the amounts provided in this subsection include, but are not limited to, planning and predevelopment work with vulnerable, highly impacted, and rural communities. For the purposes of this subsection "community buildings" means K-12 schools, community colleges, community centers, recreation centers, libraries, tribal buildings, government buildings, and other publicly owned infrastructure.

(((228)))(226) $20,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for a grant program to provide solar and battery storage community solar projects for public assistance organizations serving low-income communities.

(a) Grants are not to exceed $20,000 per community solar project and are not to exceed 100 percent of the cost of the project, taking into account any federal tax credits or other federal or nonfederal grants or incentives that the ((program))project is benefiting from.

(b) Priority must be given to projects sited on "preferred sites" such as rooftops, structures, existing impervious surfaces, landfills, brownfields, previously developed sites, irrigation canals and ponds, stormwater collection ponds, industrial areas, dual-use solar projects that ensure ongoing agricultural operations, and other sites that do not displace critical habitat or productive farmland.

(c) For the purposes of this subsection "low-income" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 19.405.020 and "community solar project" means a solar energy system that: Has a direct current nameplate capacity that is greater than 12 kilowatts but no greater than ((199))1,000 kilowatts; and has, at minimum, either two subscribers or one low-income service provider subscriber.

(((229)))(227) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5758 (condominium conversions). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((231)))(228) $1,054,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5974 (transportation resources). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((232)))(229) $200,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for a grant to a Tacoma-based automotive museum as businesses assistance to address COVID-19 pandemic impacts to revenues from decreased attendance and loss of other revenue generating opportunities.

(((233)))(230) $63,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5544 (blockchain work group). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((234)))(231)(a) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to develop strategies for cooperation with governmental agencies of Finland, including higher education institutions, and organizations around the following:

(i) 5G connectivity, end-user applications utilizing new connectivity, and 6G;

(ii) Safety, efficiency, and green transformation of ports and other logistics including digitalization and connectivity; and

(iii) Green transformation of transport, including circular economy solutions for batteries.

(b) By June 30, 2023, the department must provide a report on the use of funds in this subsection, any key metrics and deliverables, and any recommendations for further opportunities for collaboration.

Sec. 1115. 2022 c 297 s 129 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE ECONOMIC AND REVENUE FORECAST COUNCIL

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$908,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($1,001,000))

$1,068,000

Lottery Administrative Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$50,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,959,000))

$2,026,000

Sec. 1116. 2022 c 297 s 130 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$16,482,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$21,640,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$33,352,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($531,000))

$923,000

Climate Investment Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$83,000

Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$333,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$100,000

Personnel Service Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$18,813,000

Higher Education Personnel Services Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,497,000

Statewide Information Technology System Development

Revolving Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$97,432,000

Office of Financial Management Central Service

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$22,453,000

Statewide Information Technology System Maintenance

and Operations Revolving Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,609,000

Performance Audits of Government Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$692,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,560,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($219,494,000))

$219,969,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) The student achievement council and all institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.92.030 and eligible for state financial aid programs under chapters 28B.92 and 28B.118 RCW shall ensure that data needed to analyze and evaluate the effectiveness of state financial aid programs are promptly transmitted to the education data center so that it is available and easily accessible. The data to be reported must include but not be limited to:

(i) The number of Washington college grant and college bound recipients;

(ii) Persistence and completion rates of Washington college grant recipients and college bound recipients, disaggregated by institution of higher education;

(iii) Washington college grant recipients grade point averages; and

(iv) Washington college grant and college bound scholarship program costs.

(b) The student achievement council shall submit student unit record data for state financial aid program applicants and recipients to the education data center.

(2) $100,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to the office of financial management to implement career connected learning.

(3)(a) $97,428,000 of the information technology system development revolving account—state appropriation, $4,609,000 of the information technology system maintenance and operations revolving account—state appropriation, $162,000 of the personnel services account—state appropriation, and $162,000 of the office of financial management central services account—state appropriation are provided solely for the one Washington enterprise resource planning statewide program. Of this amount:

(i) $7,756,000 of the information technology system development revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for an organizational change management pool to pay for phase 1A (agency financial reporting system replacement—core financials) state agency organizational change management resources. The office of financial management will manage the pool, authorize funds, and track costs by agency by fiscal month;

(ii) $22,000,000 of the information technology system development revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for a technology pool to pay for phase 1A (agency financial reporting system replacement—core financials) state agency costs due to work associated with impacted financial systems and interfaces. The office of financial management will manage the pool, authorize funds, and track costs by agency by fiscal month;

(iii) $1,326,000 of the information technology system development revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for three dedicated information technology consultant staff to be contracted from the office of the chief information officer. These staff will work with state agencies to ensure preparation and timely decommission of information technology systems that will no longer be necessary post implementation of phase 1A (agency financial reporting system replacement—core financials);

(iv) $4,609,000 of the information technology system maintenance and operations revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for maintenance and operations costs for phase 1A (agency financial reporting system replacement—core financials), which will begin in fiscal year 2023;

(v) $9,153,000 of the information technology system development revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for phase 1B (procurement and extended financials) in fiscal year 2023;

(vi) $162,000 of the personnel services account—state appropriation is provided solely for a dedicated staff for phase 2 (human resources) coordination; and

(vii) $162,000 of the office of financial management central services account—state appropriation is provided solely for a dedicated staff for phase 3 (budget) coordination.

(b) Beginning July 1, 2021, the office of financial management shall provide written quarterly reports, within 30 calendar days of the end of each fiscal quarter, to legislative fiscal committees and the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee to include how funding was spent compared to the budget spending plan for the prior quarter by fiscal month and what the ensuing quarter budget will be by fiscal month. All reporting must be separated by phase of one Washington subprojects. The written report must also include:

(i) A list of quantifiable deliverables accomplished and the associated expenditures by each deliverable by fiscal month;

(ii) A report on the contract full time equivalent charged compared to the budget spending plan by month for each contracted vendor and what the ensuing contract equivalent budget spending plan assumes by fiscal month;

(iii) A report identifying each state agency that applied for and received organizational change management pool resources, the staffing equivalent used, and the cost by fiscal month by agency compared to budget spending plan;

(iv) A report identifying each state agency that applied for and received technology pool resources, the staffing equivalent used, and the cost by fiscal month by agency compared to the budget spending plan;

(v) A report on budget spending plan by fiscal month by phase compared to actual spending by fiscal month; and

(vi) A report on current financial office performance metrics that at least 10 state agencies use, to include the monthly performance data, starting July 1, 2021.

(c) Prior to spending any funds, the director of financial management must agree to the spending and sign off on the spending.

(d) This subsection is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(e) The phase 1A schedule must be presented to the executive steering committee by May 24, 2023, for approval, and both the decision by the committee and the schedule presented must be shared in writing with the legislative fiscal committee chairs and ranking members by May 31, 2023.

(4) $250,000 of the office of financial management central services account—state appropriation is provided solely for a dedicated information technology budget staff for the work associated with statewide information technology projects that are under the oversight of the office of the chief information officer. The staff will be responsible for providing a monthly financial report after each fiscal month close to fiscal staff of the senate ways and means and house appropriations committees to reflect at least:

(a) Fund balance of the information technology pool account after each fiscal month close;

(b) Amount by information technology project, differentiated if in the technology pool or the agency budget, of what funding has been approved to date and for the last fiscal month;

(c) Amount by agency of what funding has been approved to date and for the last fiscal month;

(d) Total amount approved to date, differentiated if in the technology pool or the agency budget, and for the last fiscal month;

(e) A projection for the information technology pool account by fiscal month through the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium close, and a calculation spent to date as a percentage of the total appropriation;

(f) A projection of each information technology project spending compared to budget spending plan by fiscal month through the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, and a calculation of amount spent to date as a percentage of total project cost; and

(g) A list of agencies and projects that have not yet applied for nor been approved for funding by the office of financial management.

(5) $6,741,000 of the personnel service account—state appropriation is provided solely for administration of orca pass benefits included in the 2021-2023 collective bargaining agreements and provided to nonrepresented employees. The office of financial management must bill each agency for that agency's proportionate share of the cost of orca passes. The payment from each agency must be deposited into the personnel service account and used to purchase orca passes. The office of financial management may consult with the Washington state department of transportation in the administration of these benefits.

(6) Within existing resources, the labor relations section shall produce a report annually on workforce data and trends for the previous fiscal year. At a minimum, the report must include a workforce profile; information on employee compensation, including salaries and cost of overtime; and information on retention, including average length of service and workforce turnover.

(7)(a) The office of financial management statewide leased facilities oversight team must identify opportunities to reduce statewide leased facility space given the change in business practices since 2020 whereby many state employees were mostly working remotely and may continue to do so going forward, or at least more state employees are anticipated to work remotely than in calendar year 2019.

(b) The office of financial management will work to identify opportunities for downsizing office space and increased collocation by state agencies, especially for any leases that will be up for renewal effective July 1, 2022, through June 30, 2024.

(c) The office of financial management must, in collaboration with the department of enterprise services, identify and make recommendations on reduction in leased office space by agency for fiscal years 2024 and 2025. The analysis must include detailed information on any reduced costs, such as lease contract costs, and include at least:

(i) Agency name;

(ii) Lease contract number and term (start and end date);

(iii) Contract amount by fiscal year; and

(iv) Current and future projected collocated agency tenants.

(d) The office of financial management must submit a report responsive to (a), (b), and (c) of this subsection to fiscal and appropriate policy committees of the legislature by June 30, 2022.

(8) $105,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $68,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5163 (conditionally released sexually violent predators).

(9) $79,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $79,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for staffing for the sentencing guidelines commission.

(10) $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $113,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the work of the office of financial management to conduct a feasibility study and make recommendations regarding the establishment of a system for streamlining the vacation of criminal conviction records in section 953 of this act.

(11)(a) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the office of financial management to provide recommendations, as described in (b) of this subsection, on the procedure for providing an equity impact statement for legislative proposals, and content and format requirements for the equity impact statement.

(b) By July 1, 2022, the office of financial management must submit a report to the governor, appropriate committees of the legislature, and statutory commissions that details recommendations on:

(i) The procedure for providing an equity impact statement for legislative proposals;

(ii) The format and content requirements for the equity impact statement;

(iii) A plan, including information technology additions or revisions, necessary to provide equity impact statements;

(iv) Recommendations on which office or agency should be principally responsible for coordinating the provision of equity impact statements with state agencies; and

(v) Recommendations on any policy changes needed to implement the provision of equity impact statements.

(c) For the purpose of implementing this subsection, the office of financial management may contract with an entity or entities that have expertise in equity impact assessments.

(d) The office of financial management must consult with the governor's interagency council on health disparities and the office of equity in developing the procedures, and content and format requirements.

(e) For purposes of this subsection, "statutory commission" means the Washington state commission on African American affairs established in chapter 43.113 RCW, the Washington state commission on Asian Pacific American affairs established in chapter 43.117 RCW, the Washington state commission on Hispanic affairs established in chapter 43.115 RCW, the Washington state women's commission established in chapter 43.119 RCW, the Washington state LGBTQ commission established in chapter 43.114 RCW, and the human rights commission established in chapter 49.60 RCW. (12) $785,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $960,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1267 (police use of force).

(13) $172,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $167,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1295 (institutional ed./release).

(14) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the office of financial management to assist the health care authority, the department of social and health services, and the department of health in coordinating efforts to transform the behavioral health system and improve the collection and availability of data. Within these amounts, the office must provide direction and ensure coordination between state agencies in the forecasting of forensic and long-term civil commitment beds, transition of civil long-term inpatient capacity from state hospital to community settings, and efforts to improve the behavioral health crisis response system. Sufficient funding within this section is provided for the staff support and other costs related to the crisis response improvement strategy committee established in section 104 of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1477 (national 988 system).

(15) $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the office of financial management to review and report on vendor rates for services provided to low-income individuals at the department of children, youth, and families, the department of corrections, and the department of social and health services. ((The))A status report must be submitted to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2022. A final report must be submitted to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by May 31, 2023, and must include review of, at least:

(a) The current rates for services by vendor;

(b) A history of increases to the rates since fiscal year 2010 by vendor;

(c) A comparison of how the vendor increases and rates compare to inflation; and

(d) A summary of the billing methodology for the vendor rates.

(16) $35,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $86,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1867 (dual credit program data). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(17)(a) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the office to contract with a third-party facilitator to convene an applicant background check work group. The purpose of the work group is to review existing requirements and processes for conducting applicant background checks for impacted individuals, and to provide a feasibility study and implementation plan for establishing a state office to centrally manage criminal background check processes for impacted individuals.

(b) For the purposes of this subsection, "impacted individuals" means applicants for state employment, current state employees, and individuals for whom an applicant background check is required as a condition of employment or to provide state services, including but not limited to individuals subject to the requirements of RCW 26.44.240, 28A.400.303, 43.43.830 through 43.43.845, 43.101.095, 43.216.270, 74.15.030, and 74.39A.056.

(c) The director of the office, or the director's designee, must chair the work group. The chair must appoint representatives to the work group including but not limited to:

(i) A representative of the department of social and health services;

(ii) A representative of the department of children, youth, and families;

(iii) A representative of the Washington state patrol;

(iv) A representative of the department of corrections;

(v) A representative of the office of the superintendent of public instruction; and

(vi) Other state agency representatives or representatives of interested parties, at the discretion of the chair, who have expertise in topics considered by the work group.

(d) By December 1, 2022, the work group must submit a preliminary feasibility study and implementation plan for a state central background check office to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature. By June 1, 2023, the work group must submit a final feasibility study and implementation plan to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature. In developing the feasibility study and implementation plan, the work group must include the following:

(i) A review of current background check requirements and processes for impacted individuals, including:

(A) A list of all state positions and purposes that require a criminal background check as a condition of employment, certification, licensure, or unsupervised access to vulnerable persons;

(B) An analysis of any "character, suitability, and competence" components that are required in addition to an applicant background check, including whether such components are warranted and whether they result in unrealistic and unnecessary barriers or result in disproportionate negative outcomes for members of historically disadvantaged communities; and

(C) A review of current costs of applicant background checks for state agencies and impacted individuals, including a comparison of current vendor contracts for fingerprint background checks; and

(ii) A proposal and implementation plan to establish a central state office to manage applicant background check processes. In developing the proposal, the work group must consider policy and budgetary factors including, but not limited to:

(A) Cost structure and sharing for impacted agencies, including any cost savings that may occur from transitioning to a centralized criminal background check process;

(B) Information technology needs for the new office and individual agencies, including any necessary information sharing agreements;

(C) Staffing;

(D) Comparable solutions and processes in other states;

(E) Potential usage of the federal rap back system, including steps necessary to join the system and associated costs and benefits;

(F) Processes and considerations to make criminal background check results portable for impacted individuals;

(G) Steps necessary to meet federal regulatory requirements and ensure federal approval of state criminal background check processes;

(H) The impact of the proposed process changes for impacted individuals who are members of historically disadvantaged populations; and

(I) Any statutory changes that may be necessary to ensure clarity and consistency.

(18) $337,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $763,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $1,560,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for staff and contract costs to conduct activities related to the receipt, coordination, and tracking of federal funds.

(19) $193,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5847 (public employee PSLF info.). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(20) $20,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the office of financial management to conduct a comprehensive study on student access to health care, including behavioral health care, at Washington's public institutions of higher education. The comprehensive study must also include students enrolled in state registered apprenticeship programs. The study must be conducted in collaboration with the health benefit exchange, the health care authority, the state board for community and technical colleges, the council of presidents, and the student achievement council.

(a) The community and technical colleges and the four-year institutions of higher education will make the following data for the 2022-23 academic year available to the office of financial management, the state board of community and technical colleges, and the student achievement council:

(i) The health insurance status of enrolled students;

(ii) The minimum requirements for enrolled students related to health insurance coverage;

(iii) Health insurance or health care coverage options available from the school;

(iv) A description of health care services and facilities available on campus for students, including type of providers, and ways students can access these services;

(v) Out-of-pocket costs associated with accessing or using on-campus health care services and facilities;

(vi) Student demographic information regarding utilization of on-campus health care services and facilities;

(vii) Barriers to accessing on-campus health care services and facilities;

(viii) How the college or university helps students obtain health care services not offered on campus; and

(ix) Information related to partnerships with off-campus health care providers or facilities to provide services to currently enrolled students.

(b) The office of financial management shall make reasonable efforts to provide the following information:

(i) The health insurance status of students enrolled in the 2022-23 academic year;

(ii) The minimum level of health insurance coverage, if any, community and technical colleges and four-year institutions of higher education require for students;

(iii) The types of health insurance schools provide for enrolled students;

(iv) The types of health care services available on campus, including primary care and specialty care, such as emergency services and behavioral health care resources;

(v) A description of health care services available in the communities around campuses, including emergency services and behavioral health providers;

(vi) Data collection gaps that exist related to student health insurance coverage and utilization of health care resources;

(vii) On-campus primary care and specialty care services that are common on school campuses; and

(viii) Other important information in addressing health insurance access and care for students at public institutions of higher education, including issues around equity.

(c) The legislature expects the office of financial management to submit a report to the appropriate health and education committees of the legislature. The final report must include a summary of the data reviewed by the office, including information specific to each type of campus and school, when available, and recommendations for the legislature and public institutions of higher education for improving student health care coverage and access to health care services, including for students enrolled in state registered apprenticeship programs.

(21) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5649 (family and medical leave). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(22)(a) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $201,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to evaluate the effectiveness, utilization, and outcomes of the voluntary incentive programs for landowners and of existing regulatory programs responsible for protecting and restoring areas along streams and rivers toward achieving a science-based standard for a fully functioning riparian ecosystem. To accomplish the evaluation, the office must:

(i) Contract with an independent entity for the analysis. The contract is exempt from the competitive procurement requirements in chapter 39.26 RCW; and

(ii) Assist agencies with funding and advice to gather and provide the data necessary for the analysis.

(b) A preliminary report is due to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by September 1, 2022, to inform the development of recommendations to be contained in a final report due by December 1, 2022.

(23) $1,326,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for additional staff for information technology and payroll support for the office of independent investigations, which was created by chapter 318, Laws of 2021 (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1267).

(24) Within existing resources, the education research and data center shall submit to the student achievement council the data received from institutions of higher education as described in RCW 28B.118.090. The data shall be submitted by June 30, 2022, and June 30, 2023, and include the most recent data received from institutions of higher education.

(25) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5793 (state boards, etc./stipends). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(26) $83,000 of the climate investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the agency to complete an analysis of laws regulating greenhouse gas emission as required by RCW 70A.65.200(10).

Sec. 1117. 2022 c 297 s 133 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMISSION ON HISPANIC AFFAIRS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$538,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($694,000))

$534,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,232,000))

$1,072,000

Sec. 1118. 2022 c 297 s 134 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMISSION ON AFRICAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$585,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($1,350,000))

$1,190,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,935,000))

$1,775,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $700,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the commission on African American affairs to contract with a Washington state based organization that focuses on the health of African Americans to conduct a Black community health needs assessment. The assessment must include the following activities:

(i) Lead and produce a statewide community assets mapping project to identify institutions, providers, and nongovernmental organizations that contribute to or have impact on Black well-being;

(ii) Collect and organize Black community health needs data and information; and

(iii) Identify priorities for additional phases of work.

(b) By June 30, 2023, the commission shall submit a report to the legislature with findings and recommended solutions that will inform the structure and establishment of an African American health board network.

Sec. 1119. 2022 c 297 s 135 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS—OPERATIONS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$609,000

Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
(($74,308,000))

$74,618,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($74,917,000))

$75,227,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $6,007,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account—state appropriation is provided solely for pension system modernization, and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(2) $619,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5367 (inactive retirement accounts).

(3) $7,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5399 (universal health care commission).

(4) $286,000 of the department of retirement systems—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5021 (effects of expenditure reduction).

(5) $48,000 of the department of retirement systems—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5676 (PERS/TRS 1 benefit increase). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(6) $82,000 of the department of retirement systems—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1669 (PSERS disability benefits). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(7) $609,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to implement a Roth individual retirement plan option in the deferred compensation program, including implementation of Engrossed House Bill No. 1752 (deferred compensation/Roth).

Sec. 1120. 2022 c 297 s 136 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$172,407,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($415,510,000))

$404,500,000

Timber Tax Distribution Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$7,616,000

Business License Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$21,071,000

Waste Reduction, Recycling, and Litter Control

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$173,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$119,000

Financial Services Regulation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$5,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($621,896,000))

$610,886,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,056,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $409,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to implement 2021 revenue legislation.

(2)(a) $1,303,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to facilitate a tax structure work group, initially created within chapter 1, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. (SSB 5883) and hereby reauthorized.

(b)(i) Members serving on the tax structure work group as of the effective date of this section may continue serving on the work group. Any member not wishing to continue serving on the tax structure work group must provide written notice to the work group and the vacancy must be filled as provided in (c) of this subsection.

(ii) The work group must include the following voting members:

(A) The president of the senate must appoint two members from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate;

(B) The speaker of the house of representatives must appoint two members from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives; and

(C) The governor must appoint one member who represents the office of the governor.

(iii) The work group must include the following nonvoting members:

(A) One representative of the department of revenue;

(B) One representative of the association of Washington cities; and

(C) One representative of the Washington state association of counties.

(c) Elected officials not reelected to their respective offices may be relieved of their responsibilities on the tax structure work group. Vacancies on the tax structure work group must be filled within 60 days of notice of the vacancy. The work group must choose a chair or cochairs from among its legislative membership. The chair is, or cochairs are, responsible for convening the meetings of the work group no less than quarterly each year. Recommendations of the work group may be approved by a simple majority vote. All work group members may have a representative attend meetings of the tax structure work group in lieu of the member, but voting by proxy is not permitted. Staff support for the work group must be provided by the department. The department may engage one or more outside consultants to assist in providing support for the work group. Members of the work group must serve without compensation but may be reimbursed for travel expenses under RCW 44.04.120, 43.03.050, and 43.03.060.

(d) The duties of the work group are to:

(i) By December 1, 2019, convene no less than one meeting to elect a chair, or cochairs, and conduct other business of the work group;

(ii) By December 31, 2020, the department and technical advisory group must prepare a summary report of their preliminary findings and alternatives described in (f) of this subsection;

(iii) By May 31, 2021, the work group must:

(A) Hold no less than one meeting in Olympia or virtually to review the preliminary findings described in (f) of this subsection. At least one meeting must engage stakeholder groups, as described in (e)(i) of this subsection;

(B) Begin to plan strategies to engage taxpayers and key stakeholder groups to encourage participation in the public meetings described in (f) of this subsection;

(C) Present the summary report described in (d)(ii) of this subsection in compliance with RCW 43.01.036 to the appropriate committees of the legislature;

(D) Be available to deliver a presentation to the appropriate committees of the legislature including the elements described in (e)(ii) of this subsection; and

(E) Finalize the logistics of the engagement strategies described in (d)(iv) of this subsection;

(iv) After the conclusion of the 2021 legislative session, the work group must:

(A) Hold no less than five public meetings organized by geographic region (in person or online) with special consideration for regional geographies throughout the state, rural areas, and border communities;

(B) Participate in no less than 10 existing meetings of various associations, community-based organizations, nonprofits, and similar groups in order to engage low-income and middle-income taxpayers, communities of color, senior citizens, and people with disabilities;

(C) Participate in no less than 10 existing meetings of various business and agricultural associations, chambers of commerce, ports, associate development organizations, and similar groups in order to engage small, start-up, and low-margin businesses, and other businesses;

(D) Hold no less than three listening sessions in a language other than English to engage taxpayers who speak languages including, but not limited to, Spanish, Vietnamese, Russian, and Somali;

(E) Present the findings described in (f) of this subsection and alternatives to the state's current tax structure at the public meetings utilizing a range of methods that account for different learning styles including, but not limited to, written documents, videos, animations, and graphics;

(F) Provide an opportunity at the public and other meetings for taxpayers to engage in a conversation about the state tax structure including, but not limited to, providing feedback on possible recommendations for changes to the state tax structure and asking questions about the report and findings and alternatives to the state's current tax structure presented by the work group;

(G) Utilize methods to collect taxpayer feedback before, during, or after the public meetings that may include, but is not limited to: Small group discussions, in-person written surveys, in-person visual surveys, online surveys, written testimony, and public testimony;

(H) Encourage legislators to inform their constituents about the public meetings that occur within and near their legislative districts (whether in person or online);

(I) Inform local elected officials about the public meetings that occur within and near their communities (whether in person or online);

(J) Summarize the feedback that taxpayers and other stakeholders communicated during the public meetings and other public engagement methods, and submit a final summary report, in accordance with RCW 43.01.036, to the appropriate committees of the legislature. This report may be submitted as an appendix or update to the summary report described in (d)(ii) of this subsection; and

(K) To the degree it is practicable, conduct analysis of the current tax structure and proposed alternatives to estimate the impact on taxpayers, including tax paid as a share of household income for various racial and ethnic groups as reported in the most current census data available, American community survey, or other similar data sources;

(v) During the 2022 legislative session, the work group must:

(A) Present the findings and reports described in (d)(ii) of this subsection to the appropriate committees of the legislature; and

(B) Be available to deliver a presentation to or participate in a work session for the appropriate committees of the legislature, or both;

(vi) Between the conclusion of the 2022 legislative session and December 31, 2022, the work group is directed to finalize policy recommendations and develop legislation to implement modifications to the tax structure, informed by the findings described in (d)(ii) of this subsection and the feedback received from taxpayers as reflected in the report described in (d)(iv) of this subsection. Legislative proposals recommended by the work group may not collectively result in a loss of revenue to the state as compared to the November 2022 biennial revenue forecast published by the economic and revenue forecast council. In making the recommendations, the work group must be guided by the following principles for a well designed tax system: Equity, adequacy, stability, and transparency;

(vii) During the 2023 legislative session, it is the intent of the legislature to consider the proposal described in (d)(vi) of this subsection;

(viii) If the proposal is not adopted during the 2023 legislative session, the work group is directed to host no less than three public meetings to collect feedback on the legislation proposed in the 2023 session, and may also collect feedback on other proposals under consideration by the work group, subject to the availability of funds in the 2023-2025 biennial budget. The work group is directed to modify the proposal to address the feedback collected during the public meetings;

(ix) During the 2024 legislative session, it is the intent of the legislature to consider the modified proposal described in (d)(iv) of this subsection; and

(x) By December 31, 2024, subject to the availability of funds in the 2023-2025 biennial budget, the work group is directed to submit a final report that is a compilation of all other reports previously submitted since July 1, 2019, and may include additional content to summarize final activities of the tax structure work group and related legislation, in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, to the appropriate committees of the legislature.

(e)(i) The stakeholder groups referenced by (d)(iii)(A) of this subsection must include, at a minimum, organizations and individuals representing the following:

(A) Small, start-up, or low-margin business owners and employees or associations expressly dedicated to representing these businesses, or both; and

(B) Individual taxpayers with income at or below 100 percent of area median income in their county of residence or organizations expressly dedicated to representing low-income and middle-income taxpayers, or both;

(ii) The presentation referenced in (d)(iii)(D) of this subsection must include the following elements:

(A) The findings and alternatives included in the summary report described in (d)(ii) of this subsection; and

(B) The preliminary plan to engage taxpayers directly in a robust conversation about the state's tax structure, including presenting the findings described in (f) of this subsection and alternatives to the state's current tax structure, and collecting feedback to inform development of recommendations.

(f) The duties of the department, with assistance of one or more technical advisory groups, are to:

(i) With respect to the final report of findings and alternatives submitted by the Washington state tax structure study committee to the legislature under section 138, chapter 7, Laws of 2001 2nd sp. sess.:

(A) Update the data and research that informed the recommendations and other analysis contained in the final report;

(B) Estimate how much revenue all the revenue replacement alternatives recommended in the final report would have generated for the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium if the state had implemented the alternatives on January 1, 2003;

(C) Estimate the tax rates necessary to implement all recommended revenue replacement alternatives in order to achieve the revenues generated during the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium as reported by the economic and revenue forecast council;

(D) Estimate the impact on taxpayers, including tax paid as a share of household income for various income levels, and tax paid as a share of total business revenue for various business activities, for (f)(i)(B) and (C) of this subsection; and

(E) Estimate how much revenue would have been generated in the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium if the incremental revenue alternatives recommended in the final report would have been implemented on January 1, 2003, excluding any recommendations implemented before May 21, 2019;

(ii) With respect to the recommendations in the final report of the 2018 tax structure work group:

(A) Conduct economic modeling or comparable analysis of replacing the business and occupation tax with an alternative, such as corporate income tax or margins tax, and estimate the impact on taxpayers, such as tax paid as a share of total business revenue for various business activities, assuming the same revenues generated by business and occupation taxes during the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium as reported by the economic and revenue forecast council; and

(B) Estimate how much revenue would have been generated for the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium if the one percent revenue growth limit on regular property taxes was replaced with a limit based on population growth and inflation if the state had implemented this policy on January 1, 2003;

(iii) Analyze our economic competitiveness with border states:

(A) Estimate the revenues that would have been generated during the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, had Washington adopted the tax structure of those states, assuming the economic tax base for the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium as reported by the economic and revenue forecast council; and

(B) Estimate the impact on taxpayers, including tax paid as a share of household income for various income levels, and tax paid as a share of total business revenue for various business activities for (f)(iii)(A) of this subsection;

(iv) Analyze our economic competitiveness in the context of a national and global economy, provide comparisons of the effective state and local tax rate of the tax structure during the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium and various alternatives under consideration, as they compare to other states and the federal government, as well as consider implications of recent changes to federal tax law;

(v) Conduct, to the degree it is practicable, tax incidence analysis of the various alternatives under consideration to account for the impacts of tax shifting, such as business taxes passed along to consumers and property taxes passed along to renters;

(vi) Present findings and alternatives, to the degree it is practicable, by geographic area, in addition to statewide; and

(vii) Conduct other analysis as directed by the work group.

(3) $292,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $162,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 4, Laws of 2021 (SHB 1095) (emergency assistance/tax).

(4) $212,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $33,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1477 (national 988 system).

(5) $213,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $55,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5000 (hydrogen/electric vehicles).

(6) $2,489,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $4,189,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5096 (capital gains tax).

(7) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $11,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5220 (salmon recovery grants/tax).

(8) $7,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5251 (tax and revenue laws).

(9) $115,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $44,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5396 (farmworker housing/tax).

(10) $97,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1480 (liquor licensee privileges).

(11) $4,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5454 (prop. tax/natural disasters).

(12) $5,567,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and (($245,997,000))$234,997,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1297 (working families tax exempt.). Of the total amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) $5,567,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $13,997,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for administration of the working families tax exemption program; and

(b) (($232,000,000))$221,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for remittances under the working families tax exemption program.

(13) From within the department's administrative expenditures from the unclaimed personal property account, the department must provide a report by December 1, 2022, to the governor and the legislature on the unclaimed property program. The report must include:

(a) Annual data for the years 2012 through 2022, that includes:

(i) The number of items of unclaimed property received by the program and the number of holders of unclaimed property who submitted items to the program; and

(ii) The top 10 holders who submitted unclaimed property and the percentage of those holders' submissions that have been subsequently claimed;

(b) Historic data since the inception of the program that shows:

(i) The cumulative number of all unclaimed property items and the aggregate, median, and mean value of those items at the end of each calendar year;

(ii) The annual number of unclaimed property items valued at less than $75 and the percentage of these items for which the department made contact with a claimant that year; and

(iii) The annual number of direct mail contacts to prospective claimants made by the department and the resulting number of claims made within the following three months; and

(c) Customer service data for the period of December 1, 2020, through December 1, 2022, that includes:

(i) The average length of time between a claim was filed and when it was paid;

(ii) The number and percentage of claims initiated online but not able to be paid to the claimant and the reasons, by percentage, for the failure to successfully pay the claim; and

(iii) The monthly website traffic for the unclaimed property website.

(14) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to implement 2022 revenue legislation. Funding in this subsection is sufficient to implement legislation for which the department has administrative costs.

(15) $146,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2076 (transp. network companies). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(16) $108,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $157,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to implement Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1015 (equitable access to credit). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(17) $141,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $190,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1643 (affordable housing/REET). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(18) $197,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $245,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1846 (data centers tax preference). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(19) $433,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5531 (uniform unclaimed property). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(20) $617,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the agency to relocate staff in the Bothell office to a more affordable location that has a lower lease cost than the current facility.

(((22)))(21) $189,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5980 (B&O tax credits). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1121. 2022 c 297 s 137 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE BOARD OF TAX APPEALS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$2,621,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($2,721,000))

$2,776,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($5,342,000))

$5,397,000

Sec. 1122. 2022 c 297 s 141 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE LIQUOR AND CANNABIS BOARD

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$407,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($1,612,000))

$1,277,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$3,083,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$75,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2022)
. . . .
$11,846,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2023)
. . . .
$12,500,000

Liquor Revolving Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($100,265,000))

$91,934,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($129,788,000))

$121,122,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The liquor and cannabis board may require electronic payment of the cannabis excise tax levied by RCW 69.50.535. The liquor and cannabis board may allow a waiver to the electronic payment requirement for good cause as provided by rule.

(2) Of the liquor revolving account—state appropriation, (($20,754,000))$13,754,000 is provided solely for the modernization of regulatory systems and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(3) $1,441,000 of the liquor revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 48, Laws of 2021 (E2SHB 1480) (liquor licensee privileges).

(4) $58,000 of the liquor revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 6, Laws of 2021 (ESSB 5272) (liquor & cannabis board fees).

(5) $38,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1443 (cannabis industry/equity).

(6) $316,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementing House Bill No. 1859 (cannabis analysis labs). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(7) $20,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementing Second Substitute House Bill No. 1210 (cannabis terminology). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(8) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding for implementation of Third Substitute House Bill No. 1359 (liquor license fees).

(9) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the board, in consultation with the office of equity and community organizations, to select a third-party contractor to prioritize applicants in the cannabis social equity program under RCW 69.50.335.

(((12)))(10) $27,000 of the liquor revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5940 (liquor licenses). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((13)))(11) $123,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5796 (dedicated cannabis distributions).

Sec. 1123. 2022 c 297 s 142 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$515,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($1,502,000))

$1,210,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($8,564,000))

$8,081,000

Public Service Revolving Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($44,196,000))

$44,256,000

Public Service Revolving Account—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$100,000

Pipeline Safety Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,593,000))

$3,537,000

Pipeline Safety Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$3,241,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($61,711,000))

$60,940,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Up to $800,000 of the public service revolving account—state appropriation in this section is for the utilities and transportation commission to supplement funds committed by a telecommunications company to expand rural broadband service on behalf of an eligible governmental entity. The amount in this subsection represents payments collected by the utilities and transportation commission pursuant to the Qwest performance assurance plan.

(2) $137,000 of the public service revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5126 (climate commitment act).

(3) $179,000 of the public service revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5295 (gas & electric rates).

(4)(a) $251,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $199,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the commission to examine feasible and practical pathways for investor-owned electric and natural gas utilities to contribute their share to greenhouse gas emissions reductions as described in RCW 70A.45.020, and the impacts of energy decarbonization on residential and commercial customers and the electrical and natural gas utilities that serve them.

(b) The examination required in (a) of this subsection must identify and consider:

(i) How natural gas utilities can decarbonize;

(ii) The impacts of increased electrification on the ability of electric utilities to deliver services to current natural gas customers reliably and affordably;

(iii) The ability of electric utilities to procure and deliver electric power to reliably meet that load;

(iv) The impact on regional electric system resource adequacy, and the transmission and distribution infrastructure requirements for such a transition;

(v) The costs and benefits to residential and commercial customers, including environmental, health, and economic benefits;

(vi) Equity considerations and impacts to low-income customers and highly impacted communities; and

(vii) Potential regulatory policy changes to facilitate decarbonization of the services that gas companies provide while ensuring customer rates are fair, just, reasonable, and sufficient.

(c) The commission may require data and analysis from investor-owned natural gas and electric utilities, and consumer owned utilities may submit data to the commission to inform the investigation. The results of the examination must be reported to the appropriate legislative committees by June 1, 2023.

(5) $76,000 of the public service revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Third Substitute House Bill No. 1091 (transportation fuel/carbon).

(6) $36,000 of the public service revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1114 (urban heat island mitigation).

(7) $667,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1723 (digital equity act). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(8) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the commission to coordinate with the office of the insurance commissioner to study the issue of utility liability insurance and report its findings to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 1, 2023.

(9) $68,000 of the public service revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5974 (transportation resources). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(10) $92,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5678 (energy project orders). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(11) (($358,000))$60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $56,000 of the pipeline safety account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5910 (hydrogen). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1124. 2022 c 297 s 143 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$10,422,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$13,291,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$132,559,000

((Enhanced)) 911 Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$54,034,000

Disaster Response Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($75,553,000))

$63,546,000

Disaster Response Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,068,847,000))

$1,668,646,000

Military Department Rent and Lease Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,000,000

Military Department Active State Service Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$400,000

Oil Spill Prevention Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,040,000

Worker and Community Right to Know Fund—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,919,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,359,065,000))

$1,946,857,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The military department shall submit a report to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees by February 1st and October 31st of each year detailing information on the disaster response account, including: (a) The amount and type of deposits into the account; (b) the current available fund balance as of the reporting date; and (c) the projected fund balance at the end of the 2021-2023 biennium based on current revenue and expenditure patterns.

(2) $40,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for homeland security, subject to the following conditions: Any communications equipment purchased by local jurisdictions or state agencies shall be consistent with standards set by the Washington state interoperability executive committee.

(3) $11,000,000 of the enhanced 911 account—state appropriation is provided solely for financial assistance to counties.

(4) $784,000 of the disaster response account—state appropriation is provided solely for fire suppression training, equipment, and supporting costs to national guard soldiers and airmen.

(5) (($200,000))$386,000 of the military department rental and lease account—state appropriation is provided solely for maintenance staff.

(6) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $700,000 of the disaster response account—state appropriation are provided solely for grants to assist eligible individuals and families with the purchase of household appliances, home repair, and home replacement including construction, building materials, site preparation, and permitting fees. The maximum grant to an eligible individual or household is $2,500. Grants will be awarded on a first-come, first-serve basis subject to availability of amounts provided in this subsection. For purposes of this subsection, "household appliance" means a machine that assists with household functions such as cooking, cleaning and food preservation. To be eligible, an individual or family must:

(a) Be a resident of Douglas, Okanogan, Pierce, or Whitman county;

(b) Have suffered damage to their home or was displaced from a rental unit used as their primary residence due to a wildfire occurring in fiscal year 2021;

(c) Not have or have inadequate private insurance to cover the cost of household appliance replacement;

(d) Not qualify for individual assistance through the federal emergency management agency; and

(e) Meet one of the following criteria:

(i) Is disabled;

(ii) Has a household income equal to or less than 80 percent of county median household income;

(iii) The home qualified for the property tax exemption program in RCW 84.36.379 through 84.36.389; or

(iv) The home qualified for the property tax deferral program in chapter 84.38 RCW.

(7) $2,136,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) is provided solely for the department to administer the emergency management performance grants according to federal laws and guidelines.

(8) $3,808,000 of the disaster response account—state appropriation and $46,039,000 of the disaster response account—federal appropriation are provided solely for agency costs for acquiring personal protective equipment as listed in LEAP omnibus document 2021-FEMA PPE, dated April 24, 2021. The department must coordinate with the agencies who have costs listed in LEAP omnibus document 2021-FEMA PPE, dated April 24, 2021, to ensure application to the federal emergency management agency for reimbursement.

(9)(a) $251,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $775,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the military department to facilitate a task force to conduct a comprehensive after-action review of the statewide pandemic response and recovery.

(b) The task force is composed of the following members:

(i) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate, appointed by the president of the senate;

(ii) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;

(iii) The secretary of the department of health, or the secretary's designee;

(iv) The adjutant general of the military department, or the adjutant general's designee;

(v) The commissioner of the employment security department, or the commissioner's designee;

(vi) The director of the department of financial institutions, or the director's designee;

(vii) The insurance commissioner, or the commissioner's designee;

(viii) The secretary of the department of social and health services, or the secretary's designee;

(ix) The superintendent of public instruction, or the superintendent's designee;

(x) The director of the department of labor and industries, or the director's designee;

(xi) The director of the department of commerce, or the director's designee;

(xii) The director of the department of enterprise services, or the director's designee;

(xiii) The secretary of the department of transportation, or the secretary's designee;

(xiv) The director of the department of licensing, or the director's designee;

(xv) The director of the office of financial management, or the director's designee;

(xvi) The director of the health care authority, or the director's designee;

(xvii) The executive director of the pharmacy quality assurance commission, or the executive director's designee;

(xviii) One member representing the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs;

(xix) One member representing the association of Washington businesses; and

(xx) Additional members to be appointed by the governor, as follows:

(A) One member representing the office of the governor;

(B) One member representing the association of Washington cities;

(C) One member representing the Washington state association of counties;

(D) One member representing emergency and transitional housing providers;

(E) One member representing a statewide association representing physicians;

(F) One member representing a statewide association representing nurses;

(G) One member representing a statewide association representing hospitals;

(H) One member representing community health centers;

(I) Two members representing local public health officials;

(J) Two members representing local emergency management agencies, one member located west of the crest of the Cascade mountains and one member located east of the crest of the Cascade mountains;

(K) At least one member representing federally recognized tribes;

(L) Up to 10 members representing demographic groups that have been disproportionately impacted by the COVID-19 pandemic, that include, but are not limited to, individuals of different race, class, gender, ethnicity, and immigration status;

(M) One member representing leisure and hospitality industries;

(N) One member representing education services; and

(O) One member representing manufacturing and trade industries.

(c) The adjutant general, or the adjutant general's designee, and the secretary of the department of health, or the secretary's designee, shall cochair the task force and convene its initial meeting.

(d)(i) The task force shall conduct the comprehensive after-action review of the COVID-19 pandemic response in accordance with established national standards for emergency or disaster after-action reviews. In order to improve the response to and recovery from future pandemics, the task force shall develop lessons learned and make recommendations that include, but are not limited to, the following:

(A) Aspects of the COVID-19 response that may inform future pandemic and all-hazards responses;

(B) Emergency responses that would benefit the business community and workers during a pandemic;

(C) Standards regarding flexible rent and repayment plans for residential and commercial tenants during a pandemic;

(D) Whether establishing regional emergency management agencies would benefit Washington state emergency response to future pandemics;

(E) Gaps and needs for volunteers to support medical professionals in performing their pandemic emergency response functions within Washington state;

(F) Gaps and needs for tools to measure the scale of an impact caused by a pandemic and tailoring the pandemic response to affected regions based on the scale of the impact in those regions;

(G) Gaps and needs in health care system capacity and case tracking, monitoring, control, isolation and quarantine, and deploying medical supplies and personnel; and

(H) Implementing guidelines for school closures during a pandemic.

(ii) The topics identified in (i) of this subsection (9)(d) are intended to be illustrative but not exhaustive. The task force should consider issues relating to equity, disparities, and discrimination in each topic it studies and for which it makes recommendations.

(e) The military department must provide staff support for the task force. The military department may employ staff and contracted support to fulfill the requirements of this subsection.

(f) The task force shall consult with owners of small businesses, epidemiologists, and representatives of immigrant communities.

(g) Legislative members of the task force are reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with chapter 43.03 RCW.

(h) The task force shall report its initial findings and recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2022. The task force shall report its final findings and recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2023.

(10)(a) Within amounts appropriated in this act, the department must coordinate with the department of commerce in the administration of the grant program created in section 129(88) of this act.

(b) If the federal emergency management agency provides reimbursement for any portion of the costs incurred by a city or county that were paid for using state grant funding provided under section 129(88) of this act, the military department shall remit the reimbursed funds to the state general fund.

(c) The department must provide technical assistance for the public assistance program application process to applicants to the grant program created in section 129(88) of this act.

(11) $438,000 of the disaster response account—state appropriation is provided solely for a dedicated access and functional needs program manager, access and functional need services, and a dedicated tribal liaison to assist with disaster preparedness and response.

(12) $275,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to provide a grant to the Ruckelshaus center to compare traditional decision making systems with other decision making structures and provide recommendations for future emergency responses.

(13) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to contract for the development of a plan for a state-level disaster individual assistance program. The program should be modeled after successful programs in other states and be linked to complimentary programs at agencies such as the departments of commerce and social and health services, and the office of the governor. The fully developed program will detail the establishment, operations, and maintenance of a state-level disaster individual assistance program. A report detailing findings and recommendations for creating the program shall be delivered to the appropriate legislative committees by June 30, 2023.

(14) $15,000 of the enhanced 911 account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5555 (safety telecommunicators). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(15) $7,500,000 of the disaster response account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to make grants for individual assistance to those impacted by extreme weather events and natural disasters in fiscal year 2022 and fiscal year 2023.

(16) (($4,853,000))$816,000 of the disaster response account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to use as matching funds for the federal emergency management agency building resilient infrastructure and communities (BRIC) grant program.

Sec. 1125. 2022 c 297 s 146 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE BOARD FOR VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTERS

Volunteer Firefighters' and Reserve Officers'

Administrative Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,978,000))

$2,575,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($4,978,000))

$2,575,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: (($3,930,000))$1,527,000 of the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative account—state appropriation is provided solely for a benefits management system, and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

Sec. 1126. 2022 c 297 s 147 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE FORENSIC INVESTIGATION COUNCIL

Death Investigations Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($754,000))

$770,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($754,000))

$770,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) $250,000 of the death investigations account—state appropriation is provided solely for providing financial assistance to local jurisdictions in multiple death investigations. The forensic investigation council shall develop criteria for awarding these funds for multiple death investigations involving an unanticipated, extraordinary, and catastrophic event or those involving multiple jurisdictions.

(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $30,000 of the death investigations account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Adams county crime lab to investigate a double homicide that occurred in fiscal year 2021.

(2) $210,000 of the death investigations account—state appropriation is provided solely for providing financial assistance to local jurisdictions in identifying human remains.

(3) Within the amount appropriated in this section, the forensic investigation council may enter into an interagency agreement with the department of enterprise services for the department to provide services related to public records requests, to include responding to, or assisting the council in responding to, public disclosure requests received by the council.

Sec. 1127. 2022 c 297 s 148 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$7,016,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($12,516,000))

$13,280,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$102,000

Building Code Council Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,277,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($21,911,000))

$22,675,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $6,151,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and (($6,127,000))$6,741,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the payment of facilities and services charges to include campus rent, parking, security, contracts, public and historic facilities charges, financial cost recovery, and capital projects surcharges allocable to the senate, house of representatives, statute law committee, legislative support services, and joint legislative systems committee. The department shall allocate charges attributable to these agencies among the affected revolving funds. The department shall maintain an interagency agreement with these agencies to establish performance standards, prioritization of preservation and capital improvement projects, and quality assurance provisions for the delivery of services under this subsection. The legislative agencies named in this subsection shall continue to enjoy all of the same rights of occupancy and space use on the capitol campus as historically established.

(2) Before any agency may purchase a passenger motor vehicle as defined in RCW 43.19.560, the agency must have written approval from the director of the department of enterprise services. Agencies that are exempted from the requirement are the Washington state patrol, Washington state department of transportation, and the department of natural resources.

(3) From the fee charged to master contract vendors, the department shall transfer to the office of minority and women's business enterprises in equal monthly installments $1,500,000 in fiscal year 2022 and $1,300,000 in fiscal year 2023.

(4) Within existing resources, beginning October 31, 2021, the department, in collaboration with consolidated technology services, must provide a report to the governor and fiscal committees of the legislative by October 31 of each calendar year that reflects information technology contract information based on a contract snapshot from June 30 of that same calendar year, and must also include any contract that was active since July 1 of the previous calendar year. The department will coordinate to receive contract information for all contracts to include those where the department has delegated authority so that the report includes statewide contract information. The report must contain a list of all information technology contracts to include the agency name, contract number, vendor name, contract term start and end dates, contract dollar amount in total, and contract dollar amounts by state fiscal year. The report must also include, by contract, the contract spending projections by state fiscal year for each ensuing state fiscal year through the contract term, and note the type of service delivered. The list of contracts must be provided electronically in Excel and be sortable by all field requirements. The report must also include trend analytics on information technology contracts, and recommendations for reducing costs where possible.

(5) $162,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2022 and $162,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to waive rent fees and charges through June 30, 2023, for vendors who are blind business enterprise program licensees by the department of services for the blind and who lease space and operate food service businesses, inclusive of delis, cafeterias, and espresso stands, in state government buildings.

(6) Within existing resources, the state building code council, in collaboration with the LGBTQ commission, must develop a plan to incorporate into future Washington state building codes options for the design and construction of inclusive bathroom facilities that are consistent with a person's own gender expression or gender identity. Coordination must begin by September 1, 2021, and a preliminary report of the plan is due by September 1, 2022.

(7)(a) The department must work with the office of financial management to identify leases that will be up for renewal effective July 1, 2022, through June 30, 2024.

(b) The department must collaborate with the office of financial management on reduction in leased office space by agency for fiscal years 2024 and 2025.

(8)(a) The department must work collaboratively with at least each state agency that has fleet vehicles to discuss the agency need for the number of fleet vehicles each agency has as of July 1, 2021. The department must identify and report, at least:

(i) The count of fleet vehicles by agency by type, and the cost by fund source by fiscal year for fiscal year 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, and 2023 for agency fleet vehicles;

(ii) The mileage data by agency by fleet vehicle for fiscal year 2019, 2020, and 2021, and the estimates for fiscal year 2022 and 2023; and

(iii) The business justification for the amount of fleet vehicles in fiscal year 2022 and 2023, by agency, given the change in business practice from in-person to remote work and video conferencing that began in 2020.

(b) The department must submit the report to fiscal and appropriate policy committees of the legislature by December 1, 2021.

(9)(a) The department must examine the motor pool fleet to determine the need for the number of vehicles. The department must identify, at least:

(i) The count of motor pool vehicles by type;

(ii) The cost recovery needed by fiscal year for fiscal year 2021, 2022, and 2023. This must include the anticipated recovery by fund source by fiscal year for fiscal year 2021, 2022, and 2023;

(iii) The mileage data by motor pool vehicle for fiscal year 2019, 2020, and 2021, and the estimates for 2022 and 2023; and

(iv) The business justification for the amount of motor vehicles in fiscal year 2022 and 2023, given the change in business practice from in-person to remote work and video conferencing.

(b) The department must report to fiscal and appropriate policy committees of the legislature by December 1, 2021.

(10) $69,000 of the building code council account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1184 (risk-based water quality standards).

(11)(a) $654,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department, in collaboration with the state efficiency and environmental performance program, to:

(i) Prepare a zero emission vehicle implementation strategy, to include standard metrics and reporting requirements, for the department's managed vehicles, as outlined in executive order 21-04, to include at least passenger vehicles and maintenance vehicles;

(ii) Prepare a zero emission vehicle implementation strategy in collaboration with state agencies, to include standard metrics and reporting requirements, for state-owned agency fleet vehicles, as outlined in executive order 21-04, to include at least passenger vehicles and maintenance vehicles;

(iii) Collect and report on what vehicles from (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection are covered under executive order 21-04 as EV ready, and at what interval by fiscal year and at what cost by vehicle make and model;

(iv) Identify current barriers to EV replacement strategies and outline strategies to overcome these barriers for (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection and report on these discretely;

(v) Identify optimal charging hub locations by fiscal year for (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection and the estimated costs to do so by fiscal year;

(vi) Prepare a comprehensive fleet transition schedule for (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection;

(vii) Create implementation plan templates for use by state agencies; and

(viii) Estimate fiscal impacts of EV costs by vehicle type compared to the base funding that was used to purchase or lease the vehicles being replaced for (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection.

(b) The department must submit a preliminary report responsive to (a)(i) through (viii) of this subsection by April 30, 2023, to the fiscal committees of the legislature, and a final report by June 30, 2023.

(12) $2,952,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for zero emission electric vehicle supply equipment infrastructure at state-owned facilities to accommodate charging station installation. The electric vehicle charging equipment must allow for the collection of usage data and must be coordinated with the state efficiency and environmental performance program. The department must prioritize locations based on state efficiency and environmental performance location priorities, and at least where zero emission fleet vehicles are scheduled to be purchased in fiscal year 2023. The department must report when and where the equipment was installed, usage data at each charging station, and the state agencies and state facilities that benefit from the installation of the charging station to the fiscal committees of the legislature by June 30, 2023, for those installed in fiscal year 2023, and each fiscal year thereafter if further funding is provided. The department shall collaborate with the interagency electric vehicle coordinating council established in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5974 (transportation resources) to implement this subsection and must work to meet benchmarks established in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5974 (transportation resources).

Sec. 1128. 2022 c 297 s 150 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE CONSOLIDATED TECHNOLOGY SERVICES AGENCY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$581,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($631,000))

$531,000

Consolidated Technology Services Revolving Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$60,113,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($61,325,000))

$61,225,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $11,598,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the office of the chief information officer. Of this amount:

(a) $2,000,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for experienced information technology project managers to provide critical support to agency IT projects that are under oversight from the office of the chief information officer. The staff or vendors will:

(i) Provide master level project management guidance to agency IT stakeholders;

(ii) Consider statewide best practices from the public and private sectors, independent review and analysis, vendor management, budget and timing quality assurance and other support of current or past IT projects in at least Washington state and share these with agency IT stakeholders and legislative fiscal staff at least twice annually and post these to the statewide IT dashboard; and

(iii) Provide independent recommendations to legislative fiscal committees by December of each calendar year on oversight of IT projects to include opportunities for accountability and performance metrics.

(b) $2,960,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the office of privacy and data protection.

(2) $12,168,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the office of cyber security.

(3) The consolidated technology services agency shall work with customer agencies using the Washington state electronic records vault (WASERV) to identify opportunities to:

(a) Reduce storage volumes and costs associated with vault records stored beyond the agencies' record retention schedules; and

(b) Assess a customized service charge as defined in chapter 304, Laws of 2017 for costs of using WASERV to prepare data compilations in response to public records requests.

(4)(a) In conjunction with the office of the chief information officer's prioritization of proposed information technology expenditures, agency budget requests for proposed information technology expenditures must include the following:

(i) The agency's priority ranking of each information technology request;

(ii) The estimated cost by fiscal year and by fund for the current biennium;

(iii) The estimated cost by fiscal year and by fund for the ensuing biennium;

(iv) The estimated total cost for the current and ensuing biennium;

(v) The total cost by fiscal year, by fund, and in total, of the information technology project since it began;

(vi) The estimated cost by fiscal year and by fund over all biennia through implementation and close out and into maintenance and operations;

(vii) The estimated cost by fiscal year and by fund for service level agreements once the project is implemented;

(viii) The estimated cost by fiscal year and by fund for agency staffing for maintenance and operations once the project is implemented; and

(ix) The expected fiscal year when the agency expects to complete the request.

(b) The office of the chief information officer and the office of financial management may request agencies to include additional information on proposed information technology expenditure requests.

(5) The consolidated technology services agency must not increase fees charged for existing services without prior approval by the office of financial management. The agency may develop fees to recover the actual cost of new infrastructure to support increased use of cloud technologies.

(6) Within existing resources, the agency must provide oversight of state procurement and contracting for information technology goods and services by the department of enterprise services.

(7) Within existing resources, the agency must host, administer, and support the state employee directory in an online format to provide public employee contact information.

(8) The health care authority, the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, the department of health, the department of corrections, and the department of children, youth, and families shall work together within existing resources to establish the health and human services enterprise coalition (the coalition). The coalition, led by the health care authority, must be a multi-organization collaborative that provides strategic direction and federal funding guidance for projects that have cross-organizational or enterprise impact, including information technology projects that affect organizations within the coalition. The office of the chief information officer shall maintain a statewide perspective when collaborating with the coalition to ensure that the development of projects identified in this report are planned for in a manner that ensures the efficient use of state resources and maximizes federal financial participation. The work of the coalition and any project identified as a coalition project is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(9) $4,330,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the creation and ongoing delivery of information technology services tailored to the needs of small agencies. The scope of services must include, at a minimum, full-service desktop support, service assistance, security, and consultation.

(10) $23,150,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the procurement and distribution of Microsoft 365 licenses which must include advanced security features and cloud-based private branch exchange capabilities for state agencies. The office must report annually to fiscal committees of the legislature beginning December 31, 2021, and each December 31 thereafter, on the count and type of licenses distributed by consolidated technology services to each state agency. The report must also separately report on the count and type of Microsoft 365 licenses that state agencies have in addition to those that are distributed by consolidated technology services so that the total count, type of license, and cost is known for statewide Microsoft 365 licenses.

(11)(a) The statewide information technology dashboard elements must include, at a minimum, the:

(i) Start date of the project;

(ii) End date of the project, when the project will close out and implementation will commence;

(iii) Term of the project in state fiscal years across all biennia to reflect the start of the project through the end of the project;

(iv) Total project cost from start date through the end date of the project in total dollars, and a subtotal of near general fund outlook;

(v) Near general fund outlook budget and actual spending in total dollars and by fiscal month for central service agencies that bill out project costs;

(vi) Start date of maintenance and operations;

(vii) Estimated annual state fiscal year cost of maintenance and operations after implementation and close out;

(viii) Actual spending by state fiscal year and in total for state fiscal years that have closed;

(ix) Date a feasibility study was completed; and

(x) A list of funding received by fiscal year by enacted session law, and how much was received citing chapter law as a list of funding provided by fiscal year.

(b) The office of the chief information officer may recommend additional elements to include but must have agreement with legislative fiscal committees and the office of financial management prior to including additional elements.

(c) The agency must ensure timely posting of project data on the statewide information technology dashboard for at least each project funded in the budget and under oversight to include, at a minimum, posting on the dashboard:

(i) The budget funded level by project for each project under oversight within 30 calendar days of the budget being signed into law;

(ii) The project historical expenditures through fiscal year 2021, by December 31, 2021, for all projects that started prior to July 1, 2021;

(iii) The project historical expenditures through fiscal year 2022, by December 31, 2022, for all projects that started prior to July 1, 2022; and

(iv) Whether each project has completed a feasibility study.

(12) Within existing resources, consolidated technology services must collaborate with the department of enterprise services on the annual contract report that provides information technology contract information. Consolidated technology services will:

(a) Provide data to the department of enterprise services annually beginning September 1, 2021, and each September 1 of each year; and

(b) Provide analysis on contract information for all agencies comparing spending across state fiscal years by, at least, the contract spending towers.

(13) $12,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the office of the chief information officer who must convene a work group to examine how automated decision making systems can best be reviewed before adoption and while in operation and be periodically audited to ensure that such systems are fair, transparent, accountable and do not improperly advantage or disadvantage Washington residents.

(a) The work group must be composed of:

(i) A representative of the department of children, youth, and families;

(ii) A representative of the department of corrections;

(iii) A representative of the department of social and health services;

(iv) A representative of the department of enterprise services;

(v) At least two representatives from universities or research institutions who are experts in the design and effect of an algorithmic system; and

(vi) At least five representatives from advocacy organizations that represent communities that are disproportionately vulnerable to being harmed by algorithmic bias, including but not limited to, African American, Hispanic American, Native American, and Asian American communities, religious minorities, people with disabilities, and other vulnerable communities.

(b) The purpose of the work group is to develop recommendations for changes in state law and policy regarding the development, procurement, and use of automated decision systems by public agencies. The work group must examine:

(i) When state agency use of automated decision making systems should be prohibited;

(ii) When state agency use of artificial intelligence-enabled profiling systems should be prohibited;

(iii) Changes in the procurement of automated decision systems, including when the procurement must receive prior approval by the office of chief information officer;

(iv) How to review, identify, and audit systems to ensure that the system prior to procurement and after placed into service does not discriminate against an individual, or treat an individual less favorably than another, in whole or in part, on the basis of one or more factors enumerated in RCW 49.60.010;

(v) How to provide public notice when an automated decision system is in use and how to appeal such decisions;

(vi) How automated decision system data should be stored and whether such data should be shared outside the system; and

(vii) Other issues determined by the office of chief information officer or the department of enterprise services that are necessary to govern state agency procurement and use of automated decision systems.

(c) To demonstrate the impacts of its recommendations, the work group must select one of following automated decision making systems and describe how their implementation would affect the procurement of a new system and the use the existing system:

(i) The department of children, youth, and families system used to determine risk in the family child welfare system;

(ii) The department of corrections system used to determine risk for purposes of evaluating early release and/or sentencing; or

(iii) The department of social and health services system used for hospital admissions.

(d) The work group shall meet at least four times, or more frequently to accomplish its work. The office of the chief information officer must lead the work group. Each of the state agencies identified in (a) of this subsection must provide staff support to the work group and its activities.

(e) The work group must submit a report to the fiscal committees of the legislature and the governor no later than December 1, 2021.

(f) For purposes of this subsection, "automated decision system" or "system" means any algorithm, including one incorporating machine learning or other artificial intelligence techniques, that uses data-based analysis or calculations to make or support government decisions, judgments, or conclusions that cause a Washington resident to be treated differently than another Washington resident in the nature or amount of governmental interaction with that individual including, without limitation, benefits, protections, required payments, penalties, regulations, timing, application, or process requirements.

(14) $81,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1274 (cloud computing solutions).

(15)(a) $381,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $343,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the office of the chief information officer to provide a common platform for hosting existing state data on natural hazards risks into a comprehensive, multihazard, statewide, geospatial data portal to assist with state hazard risk and resilience mapping and analysis. In performing this work, the office of the chief information officer will:

(i) Coordinate with the state emergency management division, office of the insurance commissioner, University of Washington climate impacts group and Washington sea grant, Washington State University water research center, and the state departments of ecology, health, natural resources, and transportation on the project scope, user needs, and deliverables;

(ii) Organize data in standardized and compatible formats including temporal data, where able; and

(iii) Address credentialing for secure access to protect sensitive data needed for risk analyses.

(b) By December 1, 2022, in consultation with the governor's office and the other agencies listed above, the office of the chief information officer will provide a progress report to the relevant legislative committees on the development of the platform and data sharing agreements.

(c) By June 1, 2023, in consultation with the governor's office and the other agencies listed above, the office of the chief information officer will provide a final report with recommendations for further enhancing natural hazards resiliency by using data to inform the development of a statewide resilience strategy.

(d) This subsection is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review of section 701 of this act.

(16) $1,493,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5432 (cybersecurity/state gov.).

(17) $4,333,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of the enterprise cloud computing program as outlined in the December 2020 Washington state cloud readiness report. Funding provided includes, but is not limited to, cloud service broker resources, cloud center of excellence, cloud management tools, a network assessment, cybersecurity governance, and a cloud security roadmap.

(18) $2,375,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of the recommendations of the cloud transition task force report to include:

(a) Establishing a cloud readiness program to help agencies plan and prepare for transitioning to cloud computing;

(b) Establishing the cloud retraining program to provide a coordinated approach to skills development and retraining; and

(c) Staffing to define career pathways and core competencies for the state's information technology workforce.

(19)(a) The office must develop a statewide electronic health records plan, in coordination with the department of social and health services, department of corrections, and health care authority. Each agency must provide staff support for developing the statewide electronic health records plan. The purpose of the plan is to implement a common technology solution to leverage shared business processes and data across the state in support of client services.

(b) The statewide electronic health records plan must include, but is not limited to, the following elements:

(i) A proposed governance model for the electronic health records solution;

(ii) An implementation plan for the technology solution from kickoff through five years maintenance and operations post implementation;

(iii) A technology budget to include estimated budget and resources needed to implement the electronic health records solution by agency and across the state, including fund sources and all technology budget element requirements as outlined in section 701(4), chapter 297, Laws of 2022;

(iv) A licensing plan in consultation with the department of enterprise services that seeks to utilize the state data center;

(v) A procurement approach, in consultation with the department of enterprise services;

(vi) A system that must be capable of being continually updated, as necessary;

(vii) A system that will use an agile development model holding live demonstrations of functioning software, developed using incremental user research, held at the end of every two-week sprint;

(viii) A system that will deploy usable functionality into production for users within 180 days from the date of an executed procurement contract in response to a competitive request for proposal;

(ix) A system that uses quantifiable deliverables that must include live, accessible demonstrations of software in development to program staff and end users at each sprint or at least monthly;

(x) A requirement that the agency implementing its electronic health record solution must invite the office and the agency comptrollers or their designee to sprint reviews;

(xi) A requirement that there is an annual independent audit of the system to evaluate compliance of the software solution vendor's performance standards and contractual requirements and technical code quality, and that it meets user needs;

(xii) A recommended program structure for implementing a statewide electronic health records solution;

(xiii) A list of individual state agency projects that will need to implement a statewide electronic health records solution and the readiness of each agency to successfully implement;

(xiv) The process for agencies to request funding from the consolidated technology services for their electronic health records projects. The submitted application must:

(A) Include at least a technology budget in compliance with the requirements of section 701(4), chapter 297, Laws of 2022 that each impacted agency budget office will assist with; and

(B) Be posted to the statewide information technology dashboard and meet all statewide dashboard posting requirements; and

(xv) The approval criteria for agencies to receive funds for their electronic health records project. Approval for funds to be released may not be given without an approved current technology budget, and the office must notify the fiscal committees of the legislature. The office may not approve funding for the project any earlier than 10 business days from the date of notification to the fiscal committees of the legislature.

(End of part)

PART XII

HUMAN SERVICES

SUPPLEMENTAL

Sec. 1201. 2022 c 297 s 201 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

(1) The appropriations to the department of social and health services in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. Appropriations made in this act to the department of social and health services shall initially be allotted as required by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not include transfers of moneys between sections of this act except as expressly provided in this act, nor shall allotment modifications permit moneys that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for other than that purpose.

(2) The department of social and health services shall not initiate any services that require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation providing appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.

(3) The legislature finds that medicaid payment rates, as calculated by the department pursuant to the appropriations in this act, bear a reasonable relationship to the costs incurred by efficiently and economically operated facilities for providing quality services and will be sufficient to enlist enough providers so that care and services are available to the extent that such care and services are available to the general population in the geographic area. The legislature finds that cost reports, payment data from the federal government, historical utilization, economic data, and clinical input constitute reliable data upon which to determine the payment rates.

(4) The department shall to the maximum extent practicable use the same system for delivery of spoken-language interpreter services for social services appointments as the one established for medical appointments in the health care authority. When contracting directly with an individual to deliver spoken language interpreter services, the department shall only contract with language access providers who are working at a location in the state and who are state-certified or state-authorized, except that when such a provider is not available, the department may use a language access provider who meets other certifications or standards deemed to meet state standards, including interpreters in other states.

(5) Information technology projects or investments and proposed projects or investments impacting time capture, payroll and payment processes and systems, eligibility, case management, and authorization systems within the department of social and health services are subject to technical oversight by the office of the chief information officer.

(6)(a) The department shall facilitate enrollment under the medicaid expansion for clients applying for or receiving state funded services from the department and its contractors. Prior to open enrollment, the department shall coordinate with the health care authority to provide referrals to the Washington health benefit exchange for clients that will be ineligible for medicaid.

(b) To facilitate a single point of entry across public and medical assistance programs, and to maximize the use of federal funding, the health care authority, the department of social and health services, and the health benefit exchange will coordinate efforts to expand HealthPlanfinder access to public assistance and medical eligibility staff. The department shall complete medicaid applications in the HealthPlanfinder for households receiving or applying for public assistance benefits.

(7) The health care authority, the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, the department of health, the department of corrections, and the department of children, youth, and families shall work together within existing resources to establish the health and human services enterprise coalition (the coalition). The coalition, led by the health care authority, must be a multi-organization collaborative that provides strategic direction and federal funding guidance for projects that have cross-organizational or enterprise impact, including information technology projects that affect organizations within the coalition. The office of the chief information officer shall maintain a statewide perspective when collaborating with the coalition to ensure that projects are planned for in a manner that ensures the efficient use of state resources, support the adoption of a cohesive technology and data architecture, and maximizefederal financial participation. The work of the coalition is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(8)(a) The appropriations to the department of social and health services in this act must be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, ((2022))2023, unless prohibited by this act, the department may transfer general fund—state appropriations for fiscal year ((2022))2023 among programs and subprograms after approval by the director of the office of financial management. However, the department may not transfer state appropriations that are provided solely for a specified purpose except as expressly provided in (b) of this subsection.

(b) To the extent that transfers under (a) of this subsection are insufficient to fund actual expenditures in excess of fiscal year ((2022))2023 in response to the COVID-19 pandemic or caseload forecasts and utilization assumptions in the long-term care, developmental disabilities, and public assistance programs, the department may transfer state appropriations that are provided solely for a specified purpose. The department may not transfer funds, and the director of the office of financial management may not approve the transfer, unless the transfer is consistent with the objective of conserving, to the maximum extent possible, the expenditure of state funds. The director of the office of financial management shall notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature in writing seven days prior to approving any allotment modifications or transfers under this subsection. The written notification shall include a narrative explanation and justification of the changes, along with expenditures and allotments by budget unit and appropriation, both before and after any allotment modifications or transfers.

(9) The department may not transfer appropriations for the developmental disabilities program to any other program or subprograms of the department of social and health services.

Sec. 1202. 2022 c 297 s 202 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—MENTAL HEALTH PROGRAM

(1) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$395,156,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($477,498,000))

$541,371,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($183,198,000))

$178,872,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($15,528,000))

$13,392,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$5,961,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,077,341,000))

$1,134,752,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The state psychiatric hospitals and residential treatment facilities may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods, services, and supplies through hospital group purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.

(b) $311,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $310,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a community partnership between western state hospital and the city of Lakewood to support community policing efforts in the Lakewood community surrounding western state hospital. The amounts provided in this subsection (1)(b) are for the salaries, benefits, supplies, and equipment for one full-time investigator, one full-time police officer, and one full-time community service officer at the city of Lakewood. The department must collect data from the city of Lakewood on the use of the funds and the number of calls responded to by the community policing program and submit a report with this information to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature each December of the fiscal biennium.

(c) $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for payment to the city of Lakewood for police services provided by the city at western state hospital and adjacent areas.

(d) $19,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $19,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for payment to the city of Medical Lake for police services provided by the city at eastern state hospital and adjacent areas.

(e) $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to maintain an on-site safety compliance officer, stationed at Western State Hospital, to provide oversight and accountability of the hospital's response to safety concerns regarding the hospital's work environment.

(f) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to track compliance with RCW 71.05.365 requirements for transition of state hospital patients into community settings within fourteen days of the determination that they no longer require active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient level of care. The department must use these funds to track the following elements related to this requirement: (i) The date on which an individual is determined to no longer require active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient level of care; (ii) the date on which the behavioral health entities and other organizations responsible for resource management services for the person is notified of this determination; and (iii) the date on which either the individual is transitioned to the community or has been re-evaluated and determined to again require active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient level of care. The department must provide this information in regular intervals to behavioral health entities and other organizations responsible for resource management services. The department must summarize the information and provide a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature on progress toward meeting the fourteen day standard by December 1, 2021, and December 1, 2022.

(g) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department, in collaboration with the health care authority, to develop and implement a predictive modeling tool which identifies clients who are at high risk of future involvement with the criminal justice system and for developing a model to estimate demand for civil and forensic state hospital bed needs pursuant to the following requirements.

(i) By the first day of each December during the biennium, the department, in coordination with the health care authority, must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature which summarizes how the predictive modeling tool has been implemented and includes the following: (A) The numbers of individuals identified by the tool as having a high risk of future criminal justice involvement; (B) the method and frequency for which the department is providing lists of high-risk clients to contracted managed care organizations and behavioral health administrative services organizations; (C) a summary of how the managed care organizations and behavioral health administrative services organizations are utilizing the data to improve the coordination of care for the identified individuals; and (D) a summary of the administrative data to identify whether implementation of the tool is resulting in increased access and service levels and lower recidivism rates for high-risk clients at the state and regional level.

(ii) The department must provide staff support for the forensic and long-term civil commitment bed forecast which must be conducted under the direction of the office of financial management. The forecast methodology, updates, and methodology changes must be conducted in coordination with staff from the department, the health care authority, the office of financial management, and the appropriate fiscal committees of the state legislature. The model shall incorporate factors for capacity in state hospitals as well as contracted facilities, which provide similar levels of care, referral patterns, wait lists, lengths of stay, and other factors identified as appropriate for estimating the number of beds needed to meet the demand for civil and forensic state hospital services. Factors should include identification of need for the services and analysis of the effect of community investments in behavioral health services and other types of beds that may reduce the need for long-term civil commitment needs. The forecast must be updated each February, June, and November during the biennium and the department must submit a report to the legislature and the appropriate committees of the legislature summarizing the updated forecast based on the caseload forecast council's schedule for entitlement program forecasts.

(h) $5,049,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and (($5,075,000))$5,761,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the phase-in of the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States District Court for the Western District of Washington, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP. The department, in collaboration with the health care authority and the criminal justice training commission, must implement the provisions of the settlement agreement pursuant to the timeline and implementation plan provided for under the settlement agreement. This includes implementing provisions related to competency evaluations, competency restoration, forensic navigators, crisis diversion and supports, education and training, and workforce development.

(i) $7,147,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $7,147,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to maintain implementation of efforts to improve the timeliness of competency evaluation services for individuals who are in local jails pursuant to chapter 5, Laws of 2015 (timeliness of competency treatment and evaluation services). This funding must be used solely to maintain increases in the number of competency evaluators that began in fiscal year 2016 pursuant to the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States District Court for the Western District of Washington, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP.

(j) $71,690,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $77,825,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $2,541,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of efforts to improve the timeliness of competency restoration services pursuant to chapter 5, Laws of 2015 (timeliness of competency treatment and evaluation services) and the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States District Court for the Western District of Washington, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP. These amounts must be used to maintain increases that were implemented between fiscal year 2016 and fiscal year 2021, and further increase the number of forensic beds at western state hospital during the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. Pursuant to chapter 7, Laws of 2015 1st sp. sess. (timeliness of competency treatment and evaluation services), the department may contract some of these amounts for services at alternative locations if the secretary determines that there is a need.

(k) $76,029,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $65,875,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to continue to implement an acuity based staffing tool at western state hospital and eastern state hospital in collaboration with the hospital staffing committees. The staffing tool must be used to identify, on a daily basis, the clinical acuity on each patient ward and determine the minimum level of direct care staff by profession to be deployed to meet the needs of the patients on each ward. The department must evaluate interrater reliability of the tool within each hospital and between the two hospitals. The department must also continue to update, in collaboration with the office of financial management's labor relations office, the staffing committees, and state labor unions, an overall state hospital staffing plan that looks at all positions and functions of the facilities.

(i) Within the amounts provided in this section, the department must establish, monitor, track, and report monthly staffing and expenditures at the state hospitals, including overtime and use of locums, to the functional categories identified in the recommended staffing plan. The allotments and tracking of staffing and expenditures must include all areas of the state hospitals, must be done at the ward level, and must include contracted facilities providing forensic restoration services as well as the office of forensic mental health services.

(ii) By December 1, 2021, and December 1, 2022, the department must submit reports to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature that provide a comparison of monthly spending, staffing levels, overtime, and use of locums for the prior year compared to allotments and to the recommended state hospital staffing model. The format for these reports must be developed in consultation with staff from the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature. The reports must include a summary of the results of the evaluation of the interrater reliability in use of the staffing acuity tool and an update from the hospital staffing committees.

(iii) Monthly staffing levels and related expenditures at the state hospitals must not exceed official allotments without prior written approval from the director of the office of financial management. In the event the director of the office of financial management approves an increase in monthly staffing levels and expenditures beyond what is budgeted, notice must be provided to the appropriate committees of the legislature within 30 days of such approval. The notice must identify the reason for the authorization to exceed budgeted staffing levels and the time frame for the authorization. Extensions of authorizations under this subsection must also be submitted to the director of the office of financial management for written approval in advance of the expiration of an authorization. The office of financial management must notify the appropriate committees of the legislature of any extensions of authorizations granted under this subsection within 30 days of granting such authorizations and identify the reason and time frame for the extension.

(l) $4,681,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $10,581,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to implement strategies to improve patient and staff safety at eastern and western state hospitals. These amounts must be used for continuing to implement a new intensive care model program at western state hospital and maintaining prior investments in training and other safety-related staff support at both hospitals. A report must be submitted by December 1, 2021, and December 1, 2022, which includes a description of the violence reduction or safety strategy, a profile of the types of patients being served, the staffing model being used, and outcomes associated with each strategy. The outcomes section should include tracking data on facility-wide metrics related to patient and staff safety as well as individual outcomes related to the patients served.

(m) $2,593,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $2,593,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to increase services to patients found not guilty by reason of insanity under the Ross v. Lashway settlement agreement.

(n) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the department must develop and submit an annual state hospital performance report for eastern and western state hospitals. Each measure included in the performance report must include baseline performance data, agency performance targets, and performance for the most recent fiscal year. The performance report must include a one page dashboard as well as charts for each fiscal and quality of care measure broken out by hospital and including but not limited to (i) monthly FTE expenditures compared to allotments; (ii) monthly dollar expenditures compared to allotments; (iii) monthly FTE expenditures per thousand patient bed days; (iv) monthly dollar expenditures per thousand patient bed days; (v) percentage of FTE expenditures for overtime; (vi) average length of stay by category of patient; (vii) average monthly civil wait list; (viii) average monthly forensic wait list; (ix) rate of staff assaults per thousand patient bed days; (x) rate of patient assaults per thousand patient bed days; (xi) average number of days to release after a patient has been determined to be clinically ready for discharge; and (xii) average monthly vacancy rates for key clinical positions. The department must submit the state hospital performance report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by the first day of each December of the biennium.

(o) $3,773,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $4,099,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $4,772,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to open a new unit at the child study treatment center which shall serve up to 18 children.

(p) $159,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to prepare for opening a 16 bed facility located in Clark county to provide long-term inpatient care beds as defined in RCW 71.24.025. The department must use this facility to provide treatment services for individuals who have been committed to a state hospital pursuant to the dismissal of criminal charges and a civil evaluation ordered under RCW 10.77.086 or 10.77.088. The department must develop and implement a protocol to assess the risk of patients being considered for placement in this facility and determine whether the level of security and treatment services is appropriate to meet the patient's needs. The department must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2022, providing a description of the protocol and a status update on progress toward opening the new facility.

(q) $1,382,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022((, $5,092,000))and $7,993,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023((, and $5,092,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is))are provided solely for the department to operate a ((16))46 bed facility on the Maple Lane campus ((to provide long-term inpatient care beds as defined in RCW 71.24.025. The facility must have the capacity to provide treatment services to individuals committed under chapter 71.05 RCW including))and provide long-term inpatient care beds as defined in RCW 71.24.025. The department shall provide treatment services to individuals who have been acquitted of a crime by reason of insanity and subsequently ordered to receive treatment services under RCW 10.77.120 and to individuals who have been committed to a state hospital pursuant to the dismissal of criminal charges and a civil evaluation ordered under RCW 10.77.086 or 10.77.088. The department must develop and implement a protocol to assess the risk of patients being considered for placement in this facility and determine whether the level of security and treatment services is appropriate to meet the patient's needs. The department must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2021, providing a description of the protocol and a status update on progress toward opening the new facility.

(r) (($4,316,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to operate the Columbia cottage at Maple Lane as a 30 bed facility to serve individuals who have been acquitted of a crime by reason of insanity and subsequently ordered to receive treatment services under RCW 10.77.120. The department must develop and implement a protocol to assess the risk of patients being considered for placement in this facility and determine whether the level of security and treatment services is appropriate to meet the patient's needs. The department must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2022, providing a description of the protocol and a status update on progress toward the opening of Columbia cottage.

(s))) Within the amounts provided in this section, the department is provided funding to operate civil long-term inpatient beds at the state hospitals as follows:

(i) Funding is sufficient for the department to operate 192 civil beds at eastern state hospital in both fiscal year 2022 and fiscal year 2023.

(ii) Funding for civil beds at western state hospital is reduced during this period to allow for a phased reduction of six wards from 467 to 287 civil beds.

(iii) The closure of western state hospital civil wards shall be implemented according to the following schedule: (A) First ward closure by July 1, 2021; (B) second ward closure by November 1, 2021; (C) third ward closure by March 1, 2022; (D) fourth ward closure by July 1, 2022; (E) fifth ward closure by ((November 1, 2022))January 1, 2023; and (F) sixth ward closure by ((April 1, 2023))June 30, 2023.

(iv) The department shall fully operate funded civil capacity at eastern state hospital, including reopening and operating civil beds that are not needed for eastern Washington residents to provide services for western Washington residents.

(v) The department shall coordinate with the health care authority toward development of the plan for increasing community capacity for long-term inpatient services required under section 215(67) of this act.

(vi) It is the intent of the legislature to close additional civil wards at western state hospital during the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium.

(vii) It is the intent of the legislature to stop using western state hospital buildings 17, 19, 20, and 21, which were built before the 1950s, for patient care by fiscal year 2027.

(((t)))(s) $360,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to implement Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1086 (behavioral health consumers). The amount in this subsection is provided solely for the department's costs associated with providing access to and following up on referrals from behavioral health consumer advocates in state operated mental health facilities. The department must track the number of monthly cases in which access to behavioral health consumer advocates was provided for patients in state operated mental health facilities and the number of these which resulted in subsequent follow-up investigation by the department. The department must submit a preliminary report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature on the number of monthly cases and follow-up investigations by December 1, 2022, and a final report by June 30, 2023.

(((u)))(t) $1,190,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5664 (forensic competency programs). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((v)))(u) $36,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1890 (children behavioral health). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((w)))(v) $455,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for western state hospital's vocational rehabilitation program and eastern state hospital's work readiness program to pay patients working in the programs an hourly wage that is equivalent to the state's minimum hourly wage under RCW 49.46.020.

(((x)))(w) $487,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $601,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for design and planning activities for the new forensic hospital being constructed on the grounds of western state hospital.

(((y)))(x) $88,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $2,920,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for relocation, storage, and other costs associated with building demolition on the western state hospital campus.

(((z)))(y) $34,289,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRF) is provided solely for COVID-19 related payroll and benefit expenditures that were incurred between July 1, 2021, and December 31, 2021, for public safety and health employees whose services are presumed to be substantially dedicated to responding to the COVID-19 public health emergency. This funding expires December 31, 2021.

(z) $1,799,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to contract with the south correctional entity for the provision of behavioral health services to class members of the Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al. settlement agreement who are waiting in jail for admission for inpatient services.

(aa) $2,730,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to hire additional forensic evaluators to provide in-jail competency evaluations and community-based evaluations.

(bb) $1,053,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to address delays in patient discharge. The department shall hire staff dedicated to discharge reviews, including psychologists to complete reviews and staff for additional discharge review work including, but not limited to, scheduling, planning, and providing transportation; and establish and implement a sex offense and problematic behavior program as part of the sex offense review and referral team program.

(2) PROGRAM SUPPORT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$5,885,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$6,079,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$409,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$12,373,000

Sec. 1203. 2022 c 297 s 203 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES PROGRAM

(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$704,242,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($1,113,004,000))

$957,676,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,303,783,000))

$2,349,223,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$4,058,000

Developmental Disabilities Community Services

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($52,000,000))

$21,880,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($4,177,087,000))

$4,037,079,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) Individuals receiving services as supplemental security income (SSI) state supplemental payments may not become eligible for medical assistance under RCW 74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state supplemental payments.

(b) In accordance with RCW 18.51.050, 18.20.050, 70.128.060, and 43.135.055, the department is authorized to increase nursing facility, assisted living facility, and adult family home fees as necessary to fully support the actual costs of conducting the licensure, inspection, and regulatory programs. The license fees may not exceed the department's annual licensing and oversight activity costs and shall include the department's cost of paying providers for the amount of the license fee attributed to medicaid clients.

(i) The current annual renewal license fee for adult family homes is $225 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2022 and $225 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2023. A processing fee of $2,750 must be charged to each adult family home when the home is initially licensed. This fee is nonrefundable. A processing fee of $700 must be charged when adult family home providers file a change of ownership application.

(ii) The current annual renewal license fee for assisted living facilities is $116 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2022 and $116 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2023.

(iii) The current annual renewal license fee for nursing facilities is $359 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2022 and $359 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2023.

(c)(i) $2,648,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $8,946,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $16,665,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of the agreement reached between the governor and the service employees international union healthcare 775nw under the provisions of chapters 74.39A and 41.56 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, as provided in section 946 of this act.

(ii) $8,764,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $11,156,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of the agreement reached between the governor and the service employees international union healthcare 775nw under the provisions of chapters 74.39A and 41.56 RCW for fiscal year 2023, as provided in section 939 of this act.

(d)(i) $291,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $992,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $1,844,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the homecare agency parity impacts of the agreement between the governor and the service employees international union healthcare 775nw.

(ii) $953,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $1,214,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the homecare agency parity impacts of the agreement between the governor and the service employees international union healthcare 775nw.

(e)(i) $540,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $860,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $1,881,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of an agreement reached between the governor and the adult family home council under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, as provided in section 948 of this act.

(ii) $1,389,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $1,278,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of an agreement reached between the governor and the adult family home council under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for fiscal year 2023, as provided in section 941 of this act.

(f) The department may authorize a one-time waiver of all or any portion of the licensing and processing fees required under RCW 70.128.060 in any case in which the department determines that an adult family home is being relicensed because of exceptional circumstances, such as death or incapacity of a provider, and that to require the full payment of the licensing and processing fees would present a hardship to the applicant. In these situations the department is also granted the authority to waive the required residential administrator training for a period of 120 days if necessary to ensure continuity of care during the relicensing process.

(g) Community residential cost reports that are submitted by or on behalf of contracted agency providers are required to include information about agency staffing including health insurance, wages, number of positions, and turnover.

(h) Sufficient appropriations are provided to continue community alternative placement beds that prioritize the transition of clients who are ready for discharge from the state psychiatric hospitals, but who have additional long-term care or developmental disability needs.

(i) Community alternative placement beds include enhanced service facility beds, adult family home beds, skilled nursing facility beds, shared supportive housing beds, state operated living alternative beds, and assisted living facility beds.

(ii) Each client must receive an individualized assessment prior to leaving one of the state psychiatric hospitals. The individualized assessment must identify and authorize personal care, nursing care, behavioral health stabilization, physical therapy, or other necessary services to meet the unique needs of each client. It is the expectation that, in most cases, staffing ratios in all community alternative placement options described in (h)(i) of this subsection will need to increase to meet the needs of clients leaving the state psychiatric hospitals. If specialized training is necessary to meet the needs of a client before he or she enters a community placement, then the person centered service plan must also identify and authorize this training.

(iii) When reviewing placement options, the department must consider the safety of other residents, as well as the safety of staff, in a facility. An initial evaluation of each placement, including any documented safety concerns, must occur within thirty days of a client leaving one of the state psychiatric hospitals and entering one of the community placement options described in (h)(i) of this subsection. At a minimum, the department must perform two additional evaluations of each placement during the first year that a client has lived in the facility.

(iv) In developing bed capacity, the department shall consider the complex needs of individuals waiting for discharge from the state psychiatric hospitals.

(i) Sufficient appropriations are provided for discharge case managers stationed at the state psychiatric hospitals. Discharge case managers will transition clients ready for hospital discharge into less restrictive alternative community placements. The transition of clients ready for discharge will free up bed capacity at the state psychiatric hospitals.

(j) $4,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $37,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $42,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a cost of living adjustment to the personal needs allowance pursuant to RCW 74.09.340.

(k) The department will work with the health care authority and Washington state's managed care organizations to establish recommendations for clients who live in the community to access the developmental disabilities administration's facility-based professionals to receive care covered under the state plan. If feasible, these recommendations should detail how to enable facility-based professionals to deliver services at mobile or brick-and-mortar clinical settings in the community. The department must submit its recommendations to the appropriate legislative committees no later than December 1, 2022.

(l) The department of social and health services must claim the enhanced federal medical assistance participation rate for home and community-based services offered under section 9817 of the American rescue plan act of 2021 (ARPA). Appropriations made that constitute supplementation of home and community-based services as defined in section 9817 of ARPA are listed in LEAP omnibus document HCBS-2021.

(m) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $226,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1086 (behavioral health consumers).

(n) $408,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $416,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $474,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 1061 (child welfare/developmental disability).

(o) $3,474,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $88,692,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $92,530,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase rates for community residential service providers offering supported living, group home, group training home, and licensed staff residential services to individuals with developmental disabilities. Of the amounts provided in this subsection (o):

(i) $3,474,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $11,423,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $15,262,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase the provider rate by 2.0 percent effective January 1, 2022, and by an additional 2.0 percent effective January 1, 2023. Both 2.0 percent rate increases must be used to support providers' ability to maintain direct care staff wages above the statewide minimum wage.

(ii) $77,269,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $77,268,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase the provider rate effective July 1, 2022. It is the intent of the legislature that contracted providers use the funding provided in this subsection (1)(o)(ii) to provide hourly wage increases for direct care workers.

(p) The annual certification renewal fee for community residential service businesses is $859 per client in fiscal year 2022 and $859 per client in fiscal year 2023. The annual certification renewal fee may not exceed the department's annual licensing and oversight activity costs.

(q) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding to implement chapter 220, Laws of 2020 (adult family homes/8 beds). A nonrefundable fee of $485 shall be charged for each application to increase bed capacity at an adult family home to seven or eight beds.

(r) $39,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $49,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $131,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase the administrative rate for home care agencies by five cents per hour effective July 1, 2021.

(s) $1,705,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $1,688,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $1,465,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the development and implementation of 13 enhanced respite beds across the state for children. These services are intended to provide families and caregivers with a break in caregiving, the opportunity for behavioral stabilization of the child, and the ability to partner with the state in the development of an individualized service plan that allows the child to remain in his or her family home. The department must provide the legislature with a respite utilization report in January of each year that provides information about the number of children who have used enhanced respite in the preceding year, as well as the location and number of days per month that each respite bed was occupied.

(t) $2,025,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $2,006,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the development and implementation of 13 community respite beds across the state for adults. These services are intended to provide families and caregivers with a break in caregiving and the opportunity for stabilization of the individual in a community-based setting as an alternative to using a residential habilitation center to provide planned or emergent respite. The department must provide the legislature with a respite utilization report by January of each year that provides information about the number of individuals who have used community respite in the preceding year, as well as the location and number of days per month that each respite bed was occupied.

(u) $43,535,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $47,243,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $152,070,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for rate add-ons for contracted service providers to address the increased costs associated with serving clients during the COVID-19 pandemic. Beginning July 1, 2022, the rate add-ons shall be reduced by 20 percent every two fiscal quarters.

(v) $78,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $113,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5284 (subminimum wage/disabilities).

(w) Funding in this section is sufficient to implement chapter 352, laws of 2020 (developmental disabilities budgeting), including a review of the no-paid services caseload and to update the information to accurately reflect a current headcount of eligible persons and the number of persons contacted who are currently interested in receiving a paid service. It is the intent of the legislature that the department will, as required in chapter 252, laws of 2020 (developmental disabilities budgeting), submit a report of this information to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2021. It is also the intent of the legislature that the necessary paid services identified with completion of this report will be adequately funded by the conclusion of fiscal year 2024.

(x) $1,387,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $2,641,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $4,250,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase the capacity of the children's intensive in-home behavioral supports waiver by 100 slots.

(y) $19,648,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $25,006,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the purposes of settling all claims in the two related cases Liang et al v. Washington DSHS et al, Thurston county superior court case no. 20-2-02506-34 and SEIU 775 v. Washington DSHS et al, Thurston county superior court case no. 18-2-05584-34, Washington supreme court case no. 99658-8. The expenditure of these amounts is contingent upon the release of all claims in both cited cases, and total settlement costs shall not exceed the amounts provided in this subsection and section 204(45) of this act. If the settlement agreement is not fully executed and approved by the Thurston county superior court by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(z) $205,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $232,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $590,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department of social and health services to examine the capabilities of the community residential settings and services; to improve cross-system coordination; and to begin the process of redesigning state-operated intermediate care facilities to function as short-term crisis stabilization and intervention. Of the amounts provided in this subsection (1)(z):

(i) $159,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $186,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $310,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department of social and health services to:

(A) Beginning with the governor's budget proposal submitted in December 2022, submit a budget request for expenditures associated with anticipated demand for services under the individual and family services waiver, the basic plus waiver, and the number of individuals who are expected to reside in state-operated living alternatives for consideration by the governor and the legislature for inclusion in maintenance level budgets;

(B) Examine the need for community respite beds to serve eligible individuals and stabilization, assessment, and intervention beds to provide crisis stabilization services for individuals with complex behavioral needs. A preliminary report must be submitted no later than October 1, 2022, with a final report submitted no later than October 1, 2023, to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature that estimates the number of beds needed in fiscal years 2023 through 2025, recommends geographic locations of these beds, provides options for contracting with community providers for these beds, provides options for utilizing existing intermediate care facilities to meet these needs, and recommends whether or not an increase to respite hours is needed;

(C) Contract with a private vendor for a study of medicaid rates for contracted community residential service providers. The study must be submitted to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than December 1, 2023, and must include:

(I) A recommendation of rates needed for facilities to cover their costs and adequately recruit, train, and retain direct care professionals;

(II) Recommendations for an enhanced rate structure, including when and for whom this rate structure would be appropriate; and

(III) An assessment of options for an alternative, opt-in rate structure for contracted supported living providers who voluntarily serve individuals with complex behaviors, complete additional training, and submit to additional monitoring;

(D) Submit by October 1, 2022, a five-year plan to phase-in the appropriate level of funding and staffing to achieve case management ratios of one case manager to no more than 35 clients. The five-year plan must include:

(I) An analysis of current procedures to hire and train new staff within the developmental disabilities administration of the department of social and health services;

(II) Identification of any necessary changes to these procedures to ensure a more efficient and timely process for hiring and training staff; and

(III) Identification of the number of new hires needed on an annual basis to achieve the phased implementation included in the five-year plan;

(E) Collaborate with appropriate stakeholders to develop uniform quality assurance metrics that are applied across community residential settings, intermediate care facilities, and state-operated nursing facilities and submit a report of these activities to the governor and the legislature no later than June 30, 2023;

(F) Collaborate with the developmental disabilities council to improve cross-system coordination and submit a report of the activities and any recommendations for policy or fiscal changes to the governor and the legislature no later than October 1, 2022, for consideration in the 2023 legislative session that describes collaborating with the developmental disabilities council to:

(I) Coordinate collaboration efforts among relevant stakeholders to develop and disseminate best practices related to serving individuals with cooccurring intellectual and developmental disabilities and mental health conditions;

(II) Work with Washington state's apprenticeship and training council, colleges, and universities to establish medical, dental, nursing, and direct care apprenticeship programs that would address gaps in provider training and overall competence;

(III) Devise options for consideration by the governor and the legislature to prioritize funding for housing for individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities when a lack of affordable housing is the barrier preventing an individual from moving to a least restrictive community setting; and

(IV) Coordinate collaboration efforts among relevant stakeholders to examine existing law with regard to guardianship and protective proceedings and make any necessary recommendations for changes to existing law to ensure that guardianship or other protective proceedings are designed to provide individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities with the decision making support they require to live as independently as possible in the least restrictive environment, including consideration of mechanisms that enable regular payment for services rendered by these legal representatives when appropriate; and

(G) Develop procedures that ensure that placement in an intermediate care facility is temporary and submit a report of these efforts, including any necessary recommendations for policy or fiscal changes, to the governor and the legislature for consideration in the 2022 legislative session no later than November 1, 2021, that describes the development of procedures that ensure that:

(I) Clear, written, and verbal information is provided to the individual and their family member that explains that placement in the intermediate care facility is temporary and what constitutes continuous aggressive active treatment and its eligibility implications;

(II) Discharge planning begins immediately upon placement of an individual within the intermediate care facility and that the individual and their family member is provided clear descriptions of all placement options and their requirements;

(III) When crisis stabilization services are available in the community, the individual is presented with the option to receive services in the community prior to placement in an intermediate care facility; and

(IV) When the individual has not achieved crisis stabilization after 60 days of initial placement in the intermediate care facility, the department of social and health services must convene the individual's team of care providers including, but not limited to, the individual's case manager, the individual's community-based providers, and, if applicable, the individual's managed care organization to review and make any necessary changes to the individual's crisis stabilization care plan.

(ii) Reporting dates in this subsection (1)(z) are modified by Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5268 (dev. disability services).

(iii) $46,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2022, $46,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2023, and $280,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to establish peer mentors to connect each client in an intermediate care facility with a mentor to assist in their transition planning. No later than November 1, 2021, the department of social and health services must submit a report describing these efforts and make any necessary recommendations for policy or fiscal changes to the governor and the legislature for consideration in the 2022 legislative session. (aa) Appropriations provided in this section are sufficient to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5258 (consumer directed employers).

(bb) $63,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $13,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $77,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 1411 (health care workforce).

(cc) $123,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $156,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to make up for a gap in the employer tax rates paid to agency providers. Funds must be used to ensure wages and benefits of home care agency workers who provide direct care are increased to satisfy wage parity requirements set forth in RCW 74.39A.310, except in situations where agency providers covered the gap in the tax rate by reducing agency administrative expenses.

(dd) $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $61,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to hire one full-time employee to provide advice, evaluations, and recommendations on technological tools to clients, providers, and case managers.

(ee)(i) $2,172,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $1,666,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to establish transition coordination teams to coordinate transitions of care for clients who move from one care setting to another. No later than December 1, 2022, the department of social and health services shall submit a preliminary report to the appropriate committees of the legislature that details how the funds were utilized and the associated outcomes including but not limited to:

(A) A detailed reporting of the number of clients served, the settings in which clients received care, and the progress made toward increasing stability of client placements;

(B) A comparison of these outcomes against the outcomes achieved in prior fiscal years;

(C) A description of lessons learned since the transition coordination teams were first implemented, including an identification of what processes were improved to reduce the timelines for completion; and

(D) Recommendations for changes necessary to the transition coordination teams to improve increasing stability of client placements.

(ii) It is the intent of the legislature that the department of social and health services submit annual reports of this information beginning in fiscal year 2024.

(ff) $204,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $1,511,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $988,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for service rate increases paid to contracted providers of community engagement, supported parenting, and respite services. No later than December 1, 2022, the department of social and health services shall submit a preliminary report to the appropriate committees of the legislature that details how the funds were utilized and the associated outcomes, including a detailed accounting of utilization of services and any changes in the utilization as a result of this funding. The department shall submit a final report of this information no later than June 30, 2023. The department shall also conduct a comprehensive study of the current rate structure paid to supported employment and community inclusion providers. No later than October 1, 2022, the department must submit to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature a report of this study that includes, but is not limited to, the following:

(i) An overview of the current system and how it operates, including an overview of the current rate structure;

(ii) A description of the organizational components and costs associated with the delivery of supported employment and community inclusion services that achieve client outcomes;

(iii) A recommendation of the rates needed for providers to cover their costs and maintain the infrastructure required to achieve and support client outcomes; and

(iv) A recommendation for a methodology to utilize in the future for regularly analyzing costs associated with service delivery and the rate adjustments, and associated frequency of these adjustments, needed to ensure that services achieve client outcomes.

(gg) $1,413,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $1,084,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to hire additional staff to reduce the timeline for completion of financial eligibility determinations. No later than December 31, 2022, the department of social and health services shall submit a preliminary report to the appropriate committees of the legislature that details how the funds were utilized and the associated outcomes, including, but not limited to, a description of how the timeline for completion of these determinations has changed. ((A final report of this information must be submitted no later than June 30, 2023.))

(hh) $228,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $284,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase funding of the assisted living medicaid methodology established in RCW 74.39A.032 to 68 percent of full methodology funding, effective July 1, 2022.

(ii) $1,719,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $49,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5268 (dev. disability services). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(jj) $2,581,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $2,060,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5819 (DDA no-paid caseload). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(kk) $54,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 1890 (children behavioral health). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(ll) $8,428,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $5,179,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 1980 (concurrent services). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(mm) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to contract with an organization that provides benefits planning training to attorneys and other professionals to help them assist individuals with developmental disabilities with retaining state and federal benefits while working.

(nn) $820,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $322,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement one, three-bed intensive habilitation services facility.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$110,829,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($135,393,000))

$111,329,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($253,002,000))

$270,356,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($27,043,000))

$23,775,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($526,267,000))

$516,289,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) Individuals receiving services as supplemental security income (SSI) state supplemental payments may not become eligible for medical assistance under RCW 74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state supplemental payments.

(b) $495,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $495,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are for the department to fulfill its contracts with the school districts under chapter 28A.190 RCW to provide transportation, building space, and other support services as are reasonably necessary to support the educational programs of students living in residential habilitation centers.

(c) The residential habilitation centers may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods, services, and supplies through hospital group purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.

(d) $3,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $21,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a cost of living increase adjustment to the personal needs allowance pursuant to RCW 74.09.340.

(e) The department is directed to develop a plan to reduce the footprint of the Rainier residential habilitation center campus and other property facilities taking into consideration recommendations of the Ruckleshaus residential habilitation center work group report and the department's Rainier school master plan.

(i) The plan must include the following:

(A) Input from interested stakeholders to ensure a thoughtful, safe, and well-supported residential transition to the community;

(B) An outline for maintaining a state-operated safety net for individuals who transition to the community and who may later be in crisis or who need a greater level of care;

(C) Barriers to successful community transitions and how to mitigate those;

(D) A report of stakeholder feedback received and how it was incorporated or not into the plan; and

(E) A proposed timeline to implement the plan and a target date for reducing the footprint of Rainier if the plan is followed.

(ii) The stakeholders must include, at minimum: Individuals who reside or have resided at Rainier within the last two decades, families and guardians of individuals who reside or have resided at Rainier, the city of Buckley, and current or former staff at Rainier and their respective labor organizations.

(iii) The department must confer with and have approval from the governor's office prior to submission of the plan. A final plan shall be submitted to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than June 30, 2023.

(3) PROGRAM SUPPORT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$2,717,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($2,940,000))

$3,535,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,233,000))

$3,732,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($8,890,000))

$9,984,000

(4) SPECIAL PROJECTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$94,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$66,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,125,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,285,000

Sec. 1204. 2022 c 297 s 204 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—AGING AND ADULT SERVICES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$1,344,251,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($2,049,486,000))

$1,764,324,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,913,077,000))

$5,019,196,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($37,804,000))

$45,841,000

Traumatic Brain Injury Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$5,586,000

Skilled Nursing Facility Safety Net Trust Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$133,360,000

Long-Term Services and Supports Trust Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$15,003,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($8,498,567,000))

$8,327,561,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) For purposes of implementing chapter 74.46 RCW, the weighted average nursing facility payment rate may not exceed $259.84 for fiscal year 2022 and may not exceed $319.82 for fiscal year 2023.

(b) The department shall provide a medicaid rate add-on to reimburse the medicaid share of the skilled nursing facility safety net assessment as a medicaid allowable cost. The nursing facility safety net rate add-on may not be included in the calculation of the annual statewide weighted average nursing facility payment rate.

(2) In accordance with RCW 18.51.050, 18.20.050, 70.128.060, and 43.135.055, the department is authorized to increase nursing facility, assisted living facility, and adult family home fees as necessary to fully support the actual costs of conducting the licensure, inspection, and regulatory programs. The license fees may not exceed the department's annual licensing and oversight activity costs and shall include the department's cost of paying providers for the amount of the license fee attributed to medicaid clients.

(a) The current annual renewal license fee for adult family homes is $225 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2022 and $225 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2023. A processing fee of $2,750 must be charged to each adult family home when the home is initially licensed. This fee is nonrefundable. A processing fee of $700 shall be charged when adult family home providers file a change of ownership application.

(b) The current annual renewal license fee for assisted living facilities is $116 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2022 and $116 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2023.

(c) The current annual renewal license fee for nursing facilities is $359 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2022 and $359 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2023.

(3) The department is authorized to place long-term care clients residing in nursing homes and paid for with state-only funds into less restrictive community care settings while continuing to meet the client's care needs.

(4)(i) $6,113,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $19,799,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $37,161,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of the agreement reached between the governor and the service employees international union healthcare 775nw under the provisions of chapters 74.39A and 41.56 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, as provided in section 946 of this act.

(ii) $18,787,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $23,910,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of the agreement reached between the governor and the service employees international union healthcare 775nw under the provisions of chapters 74.39A and 41.56 RCW for fiscal year 2023, as provided in section 939 of this act.

(5)(i) $1,941,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $6,439,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $12,064,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the homecare agency parity impacts of the agreement between the governor and the service employees international union healthcare 775nw.

(ii) $6,028,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $7,669,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the homecare agency parity impacts of the agreement between the governor and the service employees international union healthcare 775nw.

(6) The department may authorize a one-time waiver of all or any portion of the licensing and processing fees required under RCW 70.128.060 in any case in which the department determines that an adult family home is being relicensed because of exceptional circumstances, such as death or incapacity of a provider, and that to require the full payment of the licensing and processing fees would present a hardship to the applicant. In these situations the department is also granted the authority to waive the required residential administrator training for a period of 120 days if necessary to ensure continuity of care during the relicensing process.

(7) In accordance with RCW 18.390.030, the biennial registration fee for continuing care retirement communities shall be $900 for each facility.

(8) Within amounts appropriated in this subsection, the department shall assist the legislature to continue the work of the joint legislative executive committee on planning for aging and disability issues.

(a) A joint legislative executive committee on aging and disability is continued, with members as provided in this subsection.

(i) Four members of the senate, with the leaders of the two largest caucuses each appointing two members, and four members of the house of representatives, with the leaders of the two largest caucuses each appointing two members;

(ii) A member from the office of the governor, appointed by the governor;

(iii) The secretary of the department of social and health services or his or her designee;

(iv) The director of the health care authority or his or her designee;

(v) A member from disability rights Washington and a member from the office of long-term care ombuds;

(vi) The insurance commissioner or his or her designee, who shall serve as an ex officio member; and

(vii) Other agency directors or designees as necessary.

(b) The committee must make recommendations and continue to identify key strategic actions to prepare for the aging of the population in Washington and to serve people with disabilities, including state budget and policy options, and may conduct, but are not limited to, the following tasks:

(i) Identify strategies to better serve the health care needs of an aging population and people with disabilities to promote healthy living and palliative care planning;

(ii) Identify strategies and policy options to create financing mechanisms for long-term service and supports that allow individuals and families to meet their needs for service;

(iii) Identify policies to promote financial security in retirement, support people who wish to stay in the workplace longer, and expand the availability of workplace retirement savings plans;

(iv) Identify ways to promote advance planning and advance care directives and implementation strategies for the Bree collaborative palliative care and related guidelines;

(v) Identify ways to meet the needs of the aging demographic impacted by reduced federal support;

(vi) Identify ways to protect the rights of vulnerable adults through assisted decision-making and guardianship and other relevant vulnerable adult protections;

(vii) Identify options for promoting client safety through residential care services and consider methods of protecting older people and people with disabilities from physical abuse and financial exploitation; and

(viii) Identify other policy options and recommendations to help communities adapt to the aging demographic in planning for housing, land use, and transportation.

(c) Staff support for the committee shall be provided by the office of program research, senate committee services, the office of financial management, and the department of social and health services.

(d) Within existing appropriations, the cost of meetings must be paid jointly by the senate, house of representatives, and the office of financial management. Joint committee expenditures and meetings are subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their successor committees. Meetings of the task force must be scheduled and conducted in accordance with the rules of both the senate and the house of representatives. The joint committee members may be reimbursed for travel expenses as authorized under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, and chapter 44.04 RCW as appropriate. Advisory committee members may not receive compensation or reimbursement for travel and expenses.

(9) Appropriations in this section are sufficient to fund discharge case managers stationed at the state psychiatric hospitals. Discharge case managers will transition clients ready for hospital discharge into less restrictive alternative community placements. The transition of clients ready for discharge will free up bed capacity at the state psychiatric hospitals.

(10) Appropriations in this section are sufficient to fund financial service specialists stationed at the state psychiatric hospitals. Financial service specialists will help to transition clients ready for hospital discharge into alternative community placements. The transition of clients ready for discharge will free up bed capacity at the state hospitals.

(11) The department shall continue to administer tailored support for older adults and medicaid alternative care as described in initiative 2 of the 1115 demonstration waiver. This initiative will be funded by the health care authority through the medicaid quality improvement program. The secretary in collaboration with the director of the health care authority shall report to the office of financial management all expenditures of this subsection and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested. The department shall not increase general fund—state expenditures on this initiative.

(12)(i) $3,378,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $5,561,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $11,980,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of an agreement reached between the governor and the adult family home council under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, as provided in section 948 of this act.

(ii) $8,922,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $8,212,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of an agreement reached between the governor and the adult family home council under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for fiscal year 2023, as provided in section 941 of this act.

(13) $1,761,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $1,761,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $4,162,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for case managers at the area agencies on aging to coordinate care for medicaid clients with mental illness who are living in their own homes. Work shall be accomplished within existing standards for case management and no requirements will be added or modified unless by mutual agreement between the department of social and health services and area agencies on aging.

(14) Appropriations provided in this section are sufficient for the department to contract with an organization to provide educational materials, legal services, and attorney training to support persons with dementia. The funding provided in this subsection must be used for:

(a) An advance care and legal planning toolkit for persons and families living with dementia, designed and made available online and in print. The toolkit should include educational topics including, but not limited to:

(i) The importance of early advance care, legal, and financial planning;

(ii) The purpose and application of various advance care, legal, and financial documents;

(iii) Dementia and capacity;

(iv) Long-term care financing considerations;

(v) Elder and vulnerable adult abuse and exploitation;

(vi) Checklists such as "legal tips for caregivers," "meeting with an attorney," and "life and death planning;"

(vii) Standardized forms such as general durable power of attorney forms and advance health care directives; and

(viii) A selected list of additional resources.

(b) Webinars about the dementia legal and advance care planning toolkit and related issues and topics with subject area experts. The subject area expert presenters must provide their services in-kind, on a volunteer basis.

(c) Continuing legal education programs for attorneys to advise and assist persons with dementia. The continuing education programs must be offered at no cost to attorneys who make a commitment to participate in the pro bono program.

(d) Administrative support costs to develop intake forms and protocols, perform client intake, match participating attorneys with eligible clients statewide, maintain records and data, and produce reports as needed.

(15) Appropriations provided in this section are sufficient to continue community alternative placement beds that prioritize the transition of clients who are ready for discharge from the state psychiatric hospitals, but who have additional long-term care or developmental disability needs.

(a) Community alternative placement beds include enhanced service facility beds, adult family home beds, skilled nursing facility beds, shared supportive housing beds, state operated living alternative beds, assisted living facility beds, adult residential care beds, and specialized dementia beds.

(b) Each client must receive an individualized assessment prior to leaving one of the state psychiatric hospitals. The individualized assessment must identify and authorize personal care, nursing care, behavioral health stabilization, physical therapy, or other necessary services to meet the unique needs of each client. It is the expectation that, in most cases, staffing ratios in all community alternative placement options described in (a) of this subsection will need to increase to meet the needs of clients leaving the state psychiatric hospitals. If specialized training is necessary to meet the needs of a client before he or she enters a community placement, then the person centered service plan must also identify and authorize this training.

(c) When reviewing placement options, the department must consider the safety of other residents, as well as the safety of staff, in a facility. An initial evaluation of each placement, including any documented safety concerns, must occur within thirty days of a client leaving one of the state psychiatric hospitals and entering one of the community placement options described in (a) of this subsection. At a minimum, the department must perform two additional evaluations of each placement during the first year that a client has lived in the facility.

(d) In developing bed capacity, the department shall consider the complex needs of individuals waiting for discharge from the state psychiatric hospitals.

(16) No later than December 31, 2021, the department of social and health services and the health care authority shall submit a waiver request to the federal department of health and human services to authorize presumptive medicaid eligibility determinations for clients preparing for acute care hospital discharge who may need long-term services and supports. The department and the authority shall hold stakeholder discussions, including opportunities for public review and comment, during development of the waiver request. Upon submission of the waiver request, the department and the authority shall submit a report to the governor and the appropriate legislative committees that describes the request and identifies any statutory changes that may be necessary if the federal government approves the request.

(17) The annual certification renewal fee for community residential service businesses is $859 per client in fiscal year 2022 and $859 per client in fiscal year 2023. The annual certification renewal fee may not exceed the department's annual licensing and oversight activity costs.

(18) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding to implement chapter 220, Laws of 2020 (adult family homes/8 beds). A nonrefundable fee of $485 shall be charged for each application to increase bed capacity at an adult family home to seven or eight beds.

(19) $261,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $320,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $861,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase the administrative rate for home care agencies by five cents per hour effective July 1, 2021.

(20) The department of social and health services must claim the enhanced federal medical assistance participation rate for home and community-based services offered under section 9817 of the American rescue plan act of 2021 (ARPA). Appropriations made that constitute supplementation of home and community-based services as defined in section 9817 of ARPA are listed in LEAP omnibus document HCBS-2021.

(21) $1,458,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and (($1,646,000))$2,491,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to provide personal care services for up to ((20))30 clients who are not United States citizens and who are ineligible for medicaid upon their discharge from an acute care hospital. The department must prioritize the funding provided in this subsection for such clients in acute care hospitals who are also on the department's wait list for services.

(22) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for community-based dementia education and support activities in two areas of the state, including dementia resource catalyst staff and direct services for people with dementia and their caregivers.

(23) $237,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $226,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $572,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 1218 (long-term care residents).

(24) $4,329,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $4,329,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for services and support to individuals who are deaf, hard of hearing, or deaf-blind.

(25) $85,981,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $85,463,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $292,979,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for rate add-ons for contracted service providers to address the increased costs associated with serving clients during the COVID-19 pandemic. Beginning July 1, 2022, the rate add-ons shall be reduced by 20 percent every two fiscal quarters.

(26) $11,609,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $11,609,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase the fixed rate paid for skilled nursing facility medicaid direct care to one hundred and five percent of statewide case mix neutral median costs.

(27) Within the amounts provided in this section, the department of social and health services must develop a statewide agency emergency preparedness plan with which to respond to future public health emergencies.

(28) The traumatic brain injury council shall collaborate with other state agencies in their efforts to address traumatic brain injuries to ensure that efforts are complimentary and continue to support the state's broader efforts to address this issue.

(29) $1,858,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,857,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for operation of the volunteer services program. Funding must be prioritized towards serving populations traditionally served by long-term care services to include senior citizens and persons with disabilities.

(30) $479,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $479,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the kinship navigator program in the Colville Indian reservation, Yakama Nation, and other tribal areas.

(31) Within available funds, the aging and long term support administration must maintain a unit within adult protective services that specializes in the investigation of financial abuse allegations and self-neglect allegations.

(32) $1,344,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,344,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the kinship care support program.

(33) $7,938,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $13,412,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $22,456,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for nursing home services and emergent building costs at the transitional care center of Seattle. No later than December 1, 2022, the department must submit to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature a report that includes, but is not limited to:

(a) An itemization of the costs associated with providing direct care services to residents and managing and caring for the facility; and

(b) An examination of the impacts of this facility on clients and providers of the long-term care and medical care sectors of the state that includes, but is not limited to:

(i) An analysis of areas that have realized cost containment or savings as a result of this facility;

(ii) A comparison of individuals transitioned from hospitals to this facility compared to other skilled nursing facilities over the same period of time; and

(iii) Impacts of this facility on lengths of stay in acute care hospitals, other skilled nursing facility, and transitions to home and community-based settings.

(34) $58,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $90,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5229 (health equity continuing education).

(35) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for fall prevention training. The department of social and health services will provide one-time grant funding to an association representing long-term care facilities to develop and provide fall prevention training for long-term care facilities. The training must include information about environmental modifications to help reduce falls, tools to assess an individual's risk for falling, and evidence-based interventions for reducing falls amongst individuals with dementia or cognitive impairments. The training must be offered at no cost and made available online for the general public to access at any time. The recipient of the grant funds must work with the department of social and health services and the department of health on developing and promoting the training.

(36) $4,504,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $9,072,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $452,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for behavioral health personal care services for individuals with exceptional care needs due to their psychiatric diagnosis as determined through the department's CARE assessment and for three full-time positions to coordinate with the health care authority and medicaid managed care organizations for the care of these individuals. Future caseload and per capita changes for behavioral health personal care services will be incorporated into the department's medicaid forecast. The department shall coordinate with the authority for purposes of developing and submitting to the centers for medicare and medicaid, a 1915(i) state plan.

(37) Within existing appropriations, and no later than December 31, 2021, the department of social and health services must work with stakeholders to consider modifications to current practices that address the current challenges adult family homes are facing with acquiring and maintaining liability insurance coverage. In consultation with stakeholders, the department of social and health services must:

(a) Transition language contained in citation and enforcement actions to plain talk language that helps insurers and consumers understand the nature of the regulatory citations; and

(b) Display the severity and resolution of citation and enforcement actions in plain talk language for consumers and insurers to better understand the nature of the situation.

(38) $435,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $435,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to continue the current pilot project in Pierce county to provide personal care services to homeless seniors and people with disabilities from the time the person presents at a shelter to the time they become eligible for medicaid and to establish two new pilot project sites in King county, one site in Clark county, and one site in Spokane county. The department of social and health services shall submit a report by December 1, 2022, to the governor and appropriate legislative committees that addresses the following for each site:

(a) The number of people served in the pilot;

(b) The number of people served in the pilot who transitioned to medicaid personal care;

(c) The number of people served in the pilot who found stable housing; and

(d) Any additional information or data deemed relevant by the contractors or the department of social and health services.

(39) $3,063,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $4,517,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely to offset COVID-19 related cost impacts on the in-home medicaid long-term care case management program operated by area agencies on aging.

(40) Appropriations provided in this section are sufficient to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5258 (consumer directed employers).

(41) $69,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $65,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $98,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5163 (conditionally released sexually violent predators).

(42) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $54,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $130,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 1411 (health care workforce).

(43) $15,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $111,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $61,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a cost of living adjustment to the personal needs allowance pursuant to RCW 74.09.340.

(44) $12,890,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $12,891,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to adjust the minimum occupancy assumption used to calculate the indirect care median to 75 percent.

(45) $38,265,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $48,666,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the purposes of settling all claims in the two related cases Liang et al v. Washington DSHS et al, Thurston county superior court case no. 20-2-02506-34 and SEIU 775 v. Washington DSHS et al, Thurston county superior court case no. 18-2-05584-34, Washington supreme court case no. 99658-8. The expenditure of these amounts is contingent upon the release of all claims in both cited cases, and total settlement costs shall not exceed the amounts provided in this subsection and section 203(1)(y) of this act. If the settlement agreement is not fully executed and approved by the Thurston county superior court by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(46) $799,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $1,016,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to make up for a gap in the employer tax rates paid to agency providers. Funds must be used to ensure wages and benefits of home care agency workers who provide direct care are increased to satisfy wage parity requirements set forth in RCW 74.39A.310, except in situations where agency providers covered the gap in the tax rate by reducing agency administrative expenses.

(47) $133,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $181,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $313,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to continue the overpayment resolution team through the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. No later than June 30, 2023, the department shall submit to the appropriate committees of the legislature a report describing the work undertaken by this team and the associated outcomes.

(48) $1,081,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $1,200,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase rates by 20 percent for in-home private duty nursing agencies and to increase rates by 10 percent for private duty nursing adult family homes effective ((July 1, 2022))January 1, 2023.

(49) $1,750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $350,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for area agency on aging care coordinators stationed in acute care hospitals to help transition clients ready for hospital discharge into home and community-based settings. Care coordinators shall keep data on numbers of patients discharged and readmission impacts and report that information to the department of social and health services.

(50) $23,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $15,879,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $17,378,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase funding of the assisted living medicaid methodology established in RCW 74.39A.032 and of the specialized dementia care rate methodology to 68 percent of full methodology funding, effective July 1, 2022.

(a) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $23,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $39,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $62,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a one-time project staff position at the department to develop and submit a report to the governor and appropriate legislative committees no later than December 30, 2022. The report must include a review and summary of discharge regulations and notification requirements for assisted living providers and include recommendations related to disclosure of providers' terms and conditions for medicaid acceptance.

(b) Following the submission of the report in (a) of this subsection and through the end of the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the department shall regularly review and report on medicaid resident utilization of and access to assisted living facilities.

(51) $12,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $12,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase the rate paid for area agency on aging case management services by 23 percent.

(52) $68,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $67,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5866 (medicaid LTSS/tribes). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(53) $24,138,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $24,138,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase skilled nursing facility medicaid rates in order to increase low-wage direct and indirect care worker wages by up to four dollars per hour effective July 1, 2022. Funding provided in this subsection is provided for purposes of wage equity.

(a) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $21,910,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $21,910,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase the fixed rate paid for direct care to no less than 111 percent of statewide case mix neutral median costs to increase low-wage direct care worker wages by up to four dollars per hour effective July 1, 2022. For the purpose of this subsection, "low-wage direct care workers" means certified nursing assistants, dietary workers, laundry workers, and other workers who provide direct care to patients and who have no managerial roles. The department shall determine each facility-specific wage equity funding amount in the direct care rate component by comparing the rate at 105 percent of the direct care median to the rate at 111 percent of the direct care median, and by multiplying the rate difference by the actual paid medicaid days over the July 1, 2022, through June 30, 2023 period.

(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $2,229,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $2,228,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase the fixed rate paid for indirect care to no less than 92 percent of statewide median costs to increase low-wage indirect care worker wages by up to four dollars per hour effective July 1, 2022. For the purpose of this subsection, "low-wage indirect care workers" means central supply workers and housekeeping workers. The department shall determine each facility-specific wage equity funding amount for the indirect care rate component by comparing the rate at 90 percent of the indirect care median to the rate at 92 percent of the indirect care median, and by multiplying the rate difference by the actual paid medicaid days over the July 1, 2022, through June 30, 2023 period.

(c) Working with stakeholders, the department shall develop and adopt rules to establish a verification process for each skilled nursing facility provider to demonstrate how the provider has used its wage equity funding to increase wages for low-wage workers by up to four dollars per hour, and for the department to recover any funding difference between each provider's wage equity funding and the amount of wage equity funding that the provider utilizes to increase low-wage worker wages. The verification process must use wages paid as of December 31, 2021, as the base wage to compare providers' wage spending in the designated job categories to the facility-specific amounts of wage equity funding provided in (a) and (b) of this subsection, excluding any amounts adjusted by settlement. The verification and recovery process in this subsection is a distinct and separate process from the settlement process described in RCW 74.46.022.

(d) It is the intent of the legislature that wage equity funding provided in this subsection be carried forward into the department's appropriation for the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium.

(54) $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for a study of the feasibility of placing individuals under the jurisdiction of the department of corrections in nursing home facilities licensed or to be licensed by the department to better meet the client's care needs. By October 1, 2022, in collaboration with the department of corrections and the health care authority, the department must submit a preliminary report to the governor and the relevant fiscal and policy committees of the legislature. At a minimum, the preliminary report must review the medical, behavioral health, and long-term care needs of the individuals and assess whether the state could obtain and be eligible for federal funding for providing health care and long-term care services for individuals under the jurisdiction of the department of corrections placed in nursing home facilities. By June 30, 2023, the department, in collaboration with the department of corrections, must submit a final report to the governor and the relevant fiscal and policy committees of the legislature. The final report shall:

(a) Assess the relevant characteristics and needs of the potential patient population;

(b) Assess the feasibility, daily operating costs, staffing needs, and other relevant factors of potential locations or contractors, including the Maple Lane corrections center, for placement of long-term care individuals under the jurisdiction of the department of corrections for a potential nursing home facility to be licensed by the department;

(c) A cost-benefit analysis of placing individuals under the jurisdiction of department of corrections clients in potential facilities identified in subsection (b) of this subsection, including the possibility or absence of federal funding for operations. The department of corrections must provide daily operating costs of prisons where these individuals may be coming from, the fiscal year 2021 daily costs per incarcerated individual assigned to the sage living unit, and the costs associated with electronic home monitoring costs per individual. This analysis shall take into account both state-run and privately contracted options;

(d) Assess the ability of potential facilities identified in subsection (b) of this subsection to better meet clients' medical and personal needs; and

(e) Assess the ability to provide medicaid funded services to meet the health care needs of these individuals.

(55) $438,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $558,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase the rates paid for adult day health and adult day care providers effective July 1, 2022, by the amount of the temporary rate add-on in effect through June 30, 2022.

(56) $900,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to expand the availability of home-delivered meals for eligible long-term care clients.

(57) $82,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $82,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 1980 (concurrent services). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(58) The long-term services and supports trust commission established in RCW 50B.04.030 must submit the results of the following activities, including any legislative recommendations, to the governor and appropriate legislative committees no later than January 1, 2023:

(a) The commission shall develop options for allowing persons who become qualified individuals and subsequently move outside of Washington to access benefits in another state if they meet the minimum assistance requirements to become an eligible beneficiary. The commission must include consideration of options for conducting eligibility determinations for qualified individuals who subsequently move outside of Washington, alternative forms of benefits for out-of-state eligible beneficiaries, methods of cross-state coordination on long-term services and supports providers, and timing implications of extending benefits to out-of-state eligible beneficiaries with respect to short-term program implementation and long-term collaboration with other states establishing similar programs.

(b) The commission shall develop options for requiring the ongoing verification of the maintenance of long-term care insurance coverage by persons who have received an exemption under RCW 50B.04.085, including consideration of procedures that minimize administrative burden, minimize negative impact on long-term services and supports trust account solvency, and incentivize maintenance of coverage.

(c) The commission shall develop options for providing workers who have received exemptions based on having private long-term care insurance pursuant to RCW 50B.04.085 an opportunity to rescind their exemption and permanently reenter the long-term services and supports trust program.

Sec. 1205. 2022 c 297 s 205 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—ECONOMIC SERVICES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$393,972,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($511,507,000))

$553,129,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,658,341,000))

$1,759,241,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$5,274,000

Domestic Violence Prevention Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,404,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
(($345,399,000))

$355,870,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($2,916,897,000))

$3,069,890,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) $69,453,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, (($122,583,000))$130,523,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and (($860,217,000))$855,217,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for all components of the WorkFirst program. Within the amounts provided for the WorkFirst program, the department may provide assistance using state-only funds for families eligible for temporary assistance for needy families. The department must create a WorkFirst budget structure that allows for transparent tracking of budget units and subunits of expenditures where these units and subunits are mutually exclusive from other department budget units. The budget structure must include budget units for the following: Cash assistance, child care, WorkFirst activities, and administration of the program. Within these budget units, the department must develop program index codes for specific activities and develop allotments and track expenditures using these codes. The department shall report to the office of financial management and the relevant fiscal and policy committees of the legislature prior to adopting a structure change.

(b) (($366,071,000))$394,373,000 of the amounts in (a) of this subsection is for assistance to clients, including grants, diversion cash assistance, and additional diversion emergency assistance including but not limited to assistance authorized under RCW 74.08A.210. The department may use state funds to provide support to working families that are eligible for temporary assistance for needy families but otherwise not receiving cash assistance. Of the amounts provided in this subsection (1)(b):

(i) $7,776,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $9,729,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $27,226,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to increase the temporary assistance for needy family grant standard by 15 percent, effective July 1, 2021.

(ii) $10,744,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation of the amounts in (a) of this subsection are provided solely for the department to provide cash assistance to households who have exceeded the 60 month time limit in the temporary assistance for needy families program, pursuant to RCW 74.08A.010(5), through June 30, 2022. Because funding for this specific purpose is provided only through fiscal year 2022, pursuant to section 4 of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5214, the bill takes effect 90 days after final adjournment of the legislative session in which it is enacted.

(iii) $9,950,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $2,126,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to provide cash assistance to households who have exceeded the 60 month time limit in the temporary assistance for needy families program, pursuant to RCW 74.08A.010(5), through June 30, 2023.

(iv) $217,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $863,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for costs in state fiscal year 2022 that are associated with the temporary suspension of the mid-certification review and extension of the eligibility review between November 2020 and June 2021 for the temporary assistance for needy families program.

(v) $50,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely to increase the monthly payment standard for households with nine or more assistance unit members that are receiving temporary assistance for needy families or state family assistance benefits, effective July 1, 2022.

(c) (($176,446,000))$161,855,000 of the amounts in (a) of this subsection is for WorkFirst job search, education and training activities, barrier removal services, limited English proficiency services, and tribal assistance under RCW 74.08A.040. The department must allocate this funding based on client outcomes and cost effectiveness measures. Within amounts provided in this subsection (1)(c), the department shall implement the working family support program.

(i) $5,952,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $157,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation of the amounts in (a) of this subsection are provided solely for the WorkFirst services costs associated with the expansion of the 60 month time limit in the temporary assistance for needy families program for households described in RCW 74.08A.010(5).

(ii) $2,474,000 of the amounts provided in this subsection (1)(c) is for enhanced transportation assistance. The department must prioritize the use of these funds for the recipients most in need of financial assistance to facilitate their return to work. The department must not utilize these funds to supplant repayment arrangements that are currently in place to facilitate the reinstatement of drivers' licenses.

(iii) $378,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $568,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for WorkFirst services costs associated with the implementation of chapter 320, Laws of 2020 (revising economic assistance programs).

(iv) $748,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $760,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $1,706,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for WorkFirst services costs associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 2020 (improving access to temporary assistance for needy families).

(v) $7,230,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the WorkFirst costs associated with the extension of the 60 month time limit through June 30, 2023.

(d) Of the amounts in (a) of this subsection, (($318,402,000))$307,083,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is for the working connections child care program under RCW 43.216.020 within the department of children, youth, and families. The department is the lead agency for and recipient of the federal temporary assistance for needy families grant. A portion of this grant must be used to fund child care subsidies expenditures at the department of children, youth, and families.

(i) The department of social and health services shall work in collaboration with the department of children, youth, and families to determine the appropriate amount of state expenditures for the working connections child care program to claim towards the state's maintenance of effort for the temporary assistance for needy families program. The departments will also collaborate to track the average monthly child care subsidy caseload and expenditures by fund type, including child care development fund, general fund—state appropriation, and temporary assistance for needy families for the purpose of estimating the annual temporary assistance for needy families reimbursement from the department of social and health services to the department of children, youth, and families.

(ii) Effective September 30, 2022, and annually thereafter, the department of children, youth, and families must report to the governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature the total state contribution for the working connections child care program claimed the previous fiscal year towards the state's maintenance of effort for the temporary assistance for needy families program and the total temporary assistance for needy families reimbursement from the department of social and health services for the previous fiscal year.

(e) Of the amounts in (a) of this subsection, $68,496,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is for child welfare services within the department of children, youth, and families.

(f) Of the amounts in (a) of this subsection, (($122,836,000))$123,384,000 is for WorkFirst administration and overhead. Of the amounts provided in this subsection (1)(f):

(i) $399,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $805,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 of the amounts in (a) of this subsection are provided solely for administrative and overhead costs associated with the expansion of the 60 month time limit through June 30, 2023 in the temporary assistance for needy families program for households described in RCW 74.08A.010(5).

(ii) $43,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2022 and $43,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for administrative and overhead costs associated with the implementation of chapter 320, Laws of 2020 (revising economic assistance programs).

(iii) $1,215,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for administrative and overhead costs associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 2020 (improving access to temporary assistance for needy families).

(iv) $512,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for administrative and overhead costs associated with the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5214 (economic assistance programs). The department is directed to use the funding provided in this subsection to make information technology changes necessary to provide the high-unemployment time-limit extension approved under the bill beginning July 1, 2022.

(v) $489,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for administrative and overhead costs associated with the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5838 (diaper subsidy/TANF). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(g)(i) The department shall submit quarterly expenditure reports to the governor, the fiscal committees of the legislature, and the legislative WorkFirst poverty reduction oversight task force under RCW 74.08A.341. In addition to these requirements, the department must detail any fund transfers across budget units identified in (a) through (e) of this subsection. The department shall not initiate any services that require expenditure of state general fund moneys that are not consistent with policies established by the legislature.

(ii) The department may transfer up to ten percent of funding between budget units identified in (b) through (f) of this subsection. The department shall provide notification prior to any transfer to the office of financial management and to the appropriate legislative committees and the legislative-executive WorkFirst poverty reduction oversight task force. The approval of the director of financial management is required prior to any transfer under this subsection.

(h) Each calendar quarter, the department shall provide a maintenance of effort and participation rate tracking report for temporary assistance for needy families to the office of financial management, the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature, and the legislative-executive WorkFirst poverty reduction oversight task force. The report must detail the following information for temporary assistance for needy families:

(i) An overview of federal rules related to maintenance of effort, excess maintenance of effort, participation rates for temporary assistance for needy families, and the child care development fund as it pertains to maintenance of effort and participation rates;

(ii) Countable maintenance of effort and excess maintenance of effort, by source, provided for the previous federal fiscal year;

(iii) Countable maintenance of effort and excess maintenance of effort, by source, for the current fiscal year, including changes in countable maintenance of effort from the previous year;

(iv) The status of reportable federal participation rate requirements, including any impact of excess maintenance of effort on participation targets;

(v) Potential new sources of maintenance of effort and progress to obtain additional maintenance of effort;

(vi) A two-year projection for meeting federal block grant and contingency fund maintenance of effort, participation targets, and future reportable federal participation rate requirements; and

(vii) Proposed and enacted federal law changes affecting maintenance of effort or the participation rate, what impact these changes have on Washington's temporary assistance for needy families program, and the department's plan to comply with these changes.

(i) In the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, it is the intent of the legislature to provide appropriations from the state general fund for the purposes of (a) of this subsection if the department does not receive additional federal temporary assistance for needy families contingency funds in each fiscal year as assumed in the budget outlook.

(2) $2,545,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $2,546,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for naturalization services.

(3) $2,366,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for employment services for refugees and immigrants, of which $1,774,000 is provided solely for the department to pass through to statewide refugee and immigrant assistance organizations for limited English proficiency pathway services; and $2,366,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for employment services for refugees and immigrants, of which $1,774,000 is provided solely for the department to pass through to statewide refugee and immigrant assistance organizations for limited English proficiency pathway services.

(4) On January 1, 2022, and January 1, 2023, the department must report to the governor and the legislature on all sources of funding available for both refugee and immigrant services and naturalization services during the current fiscal year and the amounts expended to date by service type and funding source. The report must also include the number of clients served and outcome data for the clients.

(5) To ensure expenditures remain within available funds appropriated in this section, the legislature establishes the benefit under the state food assistance program, pursuant to RCW 74.08A.120, to be one hundred percent of the federal supplemental nutrition assistance program benefit amount.

(6) The department shall review clients receiving services through the aged, blind, or disabled assistance program, to determine whether they would benefit from assistance in becoming naturalized citizens, and thus be eligible to receive federal supplemental security income benefits. Those cases shall be given high priority for naturalization funding through the department.

(7) The department shall continue the interagency agreement with the department of veterans' affairs to establish a process for referral of veterans who may be eligible for veterans' services. This agreement must include out-stationing department of veterans' affairs staff in selected community service office locations in King and Pierce counties to facilitate applications for veterans' services.

(8) $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for operational support of the Washington information network 211 organization.

(9) $609,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $380,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of section 2, chapter 9, Laws of 2021 (SHB 1151) (public assistance), a state-funded cash benefit program and transitional food assistance program for households with children that are recipients of the supplemental nutrition assistance program of the food assistance program but are not recipients of the temporary assistance for needy families program.

(10) $377,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $377,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the consolidated emergency assistance program.

(11) $77,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the department to conduct a study, jointly with the poverty reduction work group, on the feasibility of implementing a universal basic income pilot program. The study must include research of other universal basic income programs, recommendations for a pilot in Washington, a cost-benefit analysis, operational costs, and an implementation plan that includes a strategy to ensure pilot participants who voluntarily quit a public assistance program to enroll in the universal basic income pilot will not experience gaps in service upon completion of the pilot. The department shall submit recommendations required by this section to the governor and appropriate legislative committees no later than June 1, 2022.

(12) $251,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for costs in state fiscal year 2022 that are associated with the temporary suspension of mid-certification reviews and extension of the eligibility review between November 2020 and June 2021 for the aged, blind, or disabled program.

(13) $388,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for costs in fiscal year 2022 that are associated with the temporary suspension of mid-certification reviews and extension of the eligibility review between November 2020 and June 2021 for the food assistance program.

(14) (($5,399,000))$15,870,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery account—federal appropriation is provided solely for the department to increase benefits for the food assistance program to maintain parity with benefits provided under the supplemental nutrition assistance program, for the period of July 1, 2021, through ((January 31, 2022))February 28, 2023.

(15) $340,000,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the Washington immigrant relief fund, a disaster assistance program to provide grants to eligible persons. Administrative costs may not exceed 10 percent of the funding in this subsection.

(a) A person is eligible for a grant who:

(i) Lives in Washington state;

(ii) Is at least 18 years of age;

(iii) After January 1, 2021, and before June 30, 2023, has been significantly affected by the coronavirus pandemic, such as loss of employment or significant reduction in work hours, contracting the coronavirus, having to self-quarantine as a result of exposure to the coronavirus, caring for a family member who contracted the coronavirus, or being unable to access childcare for children impacted by school or childcare closures; and

(iv) Is not eligible to receive federal economic impact (stimulus) payments or unemployment insurance benefits due to the person's immigration status.

(b) The department may not deny a grant to a person on the basis that another adult in the household is eligible for federal economic impact (stimulus) payments or unemployment insurance benefits or that the person previously received a grant under the program. However, a person may not receive more than three grants.

(c) The department's duty to provide grants is subject to the availability of the amounts specified in this subsection, and the department must prioritize grants to persons who are most in need of financial assistance using factors that include, but are not limited to: (i) Having an income at or below 250 percent of the federal poverty level; (ii) being the primary or sole income earner of household; (iii) experiencing housing instability; and (iv) having contracted or being at high risk of contracting the coronavirus.

(d) The department may contract with one or more entities to administer the program. If the department engages in a competitive contracting process for administration of the program, experience in administering similar programs must be given weight in the selection process to expedite the delivery of benefits to eligible applicants.

(16) $204,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $22,766,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) are provided solely for the department to provide a one-time or short-term cash benefit to families eligible for pandemic emergency assistance under section 9201 of the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2, and to offer an equivalent benefit to eligible state family assistance or food assistance program recipients.

(17) $88,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $89,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 90, Laws of 2021 (SSB 5068) (postpartum period/Medicaid).

(18) $41,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $81,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $237,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1416 (insurers/child support coll.).

(19) $11,884,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $15,248,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to cover the variance in total child support arrears collected in fiscal year 2022 compared to the total arrears collected in fiscal year 2021.

(20) $36,860,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to increase the grant standard for the aged, blind, or disabled program to a maximum of $417 per month for a one-person grant and $528 for a two-person grant effective September 1, 2022.

(21) $513,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to eliminate the mid-certification review for blind or disabled participants in the aged, blind, or disabled program, effective July 1, 2022.

(22) $195,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to expand the aged, blind, or disabled program's clothing, personal maintenance, and necessary incidentals grant to individuals between the ages of 21 and 64 who are residing in a public mental institution, effective September 1, 2022.

(23) $207,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1748 (human trafficking/ABD prog.). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(24) $560,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to implement a state-funded employment and training program for recipients of the state's food assistance program, effective July 1, 2022.

(25) $219,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5785 (transitional food assistance). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(26) $95,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $61,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to remove the asset limit test for the medicare savings plan program in collaboration with the health care authority, effective January 1, 2023.

(27) $207,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for system upgrades necessary for the anticipated expansion of medicaid equivalent health care coverage to uninsured adults with income up to 138 percent of the federal poverty level regardless of immigration status in collaboration with the health care authority. Funding is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(28) $8,489,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $19,909,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to contract with nonprofit organizations to provide services to refugees and immigrants that have arrived in Washington state on or after July 1, 2021, and are eligible for federal refugee resettlement services, including those from Afghanistan and Ukraine. The services shall include, but are not limited to, emergency, temporary, and long-term housing and assistance with food, transportation, accessing childhood education services, applying for benefits and immigrant services, education and employment support, and social services navigation.

(29) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to provide funding to domestic violence services providers in Washington state that receive funding through the domestic violence services program and provide shelter services. The funding to each entity shall be proportionate, based upon bed capacity. This funding shall be in addition to any other funds previously provided to or scheduled to be provided under a contract with the domestic violence services program in the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.

(30) $1,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2075 (DSHS service requirements).

(31) $211,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $5,727,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $13,762,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the integrated eligibility and enrollment modernization project to create a comprehensive application and benefit status tracker for multiple programs and to establish a foundational platform. Funding is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(32) $27,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5729 (hearing deadlines/good cause). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1206. 2022 c 297 s 206 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$17,363,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($24,443,000))

$24,448,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($109,830,000))

$109,821,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($151,636,000))

$151,632,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1061 (child welfare/dev disability).

(2) $5,087,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $235,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5790 (community support services). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1207. 2022 c 297 s 207 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—SPECIAL COMMITMENT PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$65,051,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($69,743,000))

$75,007,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($134,794,000))

$140,058,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The special commitment center may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods and supplies through hospital group purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.

(2) $1,204,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,079,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for specialized equipment and additional medical staff to provide more capacity to deliver care to individuals housed at the total confinement facility. No later than November 1, 2023, the department shall report to the legislature on the number of individuals treated on the island that previously would have been transported off the island for treatment.

(3) $16,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $15,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the increased costs for personal computers leased through the department of enterprise services.

(4) $6,768,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $4,496,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5163 (conditionally released SVPs).

Sec. 1208. 2022 c 297 s 208 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$41,169,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($45,628,000))

$46,564,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($53,582,000))

$60,088,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($140,379,000))

$147,821,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the department shall provide to the department of health, where available, the following data for all nutrition assistance programs funded by the United States department of agriculture and administered by the department. The department must provide the report for the preceding federal fiscal year by February 1, 2022, and February 1, 2023. The report must provide:

(a) The number of people in Washington who are eligible for the program;

(b) The number of people in Washington who participated in the program;

(c) The average annual participation rate in the program;

(d) Participation rates by geographic distribution; and

(e) The annual federal funding of the program in Washington.

(2)(a) $3,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $5,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $8,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of an agreement reached between the governor and the Washington federation of state employees for the language access providers under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.

(b) $20,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $11,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of an agreement reached between the governor and the Washington federation of state employees for the language access providers under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for fiscal year 2023 as provided in section 938 of this act.

(3) By October 1, 2021, the department must submit a report to the fiscal committees of the legislature detailing shortcomings of the previously funded electronic health records system and contract, the clinical validity of existing software, approaches to mitigate the shortcomings of previously funded system, and a recommended approach to establishing a comprehensive electronic health records system at state facilities in the future.

(4) $39,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 1411 (health care workforce).

(5) $364,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the creation of a program director position and a project manager position tasked with ensuring an enterprise-wide approach to poverty reduction across Washington. These positions will convene and facilitate the poverty reduction subcabinet, track agency progress on poverty reduction efforts to build a stronger continuum of care, coordinate budget and policy proposals, and ensure that recommendations incorporate data prepared by the poverty reduction technical advisory group.

(6) $461,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to create a poverty reduction technical advisory group that is tasked with developing a statewide measurement and data framework that can help inform future budget and policy decisions. This group must also track the state's progress towards creating a just and equitable future. This group must collaborate with communities experiencing poverty and the state office of equity to ensure their input is factored into the analysis of data.

(7) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department, in collaboration with the Washington state health care authority, to study the cost and benefit of adopting available options to expand medicare savings programs and classic medicaid programs, including categorically needy and medically needy, to promote affordable care, premiums, and cost-sharing for medicare enrollees. The cost analysis must identify available federal funding for each option. The department shall consider options that create affordability comparable to affordable care act programs available to adults without medicare, as well as intermediate options that move toward comparability. The study must analyze equity impacts of each option, considering gender, race, and ethnicity. The department shall submit the study and recommendations to the fiscal and health care committees of the legislature, as well as the joint legislative-executive committee on planning for aging and disability issues, by November 1, 2022.

(8) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to design and conduct a study describing the service experiences and characteristics of persons receiving medicaid-funded long-term services and supports and persons receiving services related to developmental or intellectual disabilities, and associated social and health services expenditures. Where feasible, this analysis shall include service experiences and expenditures of these populations within and across medicaid-funded long-term services and supports, medicaid-funded medical programs, medicaid-funded behavioral health programs, and medicare programs in Washington state. The department analysis shall be developed in consultation with relevant stakeholders, including but not limited to the Washington state health care authority. The department shall submit a final study report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2022.

(9) $65,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to prepare an annual report in consultation with the department of commerce on the projected demand for permanent supportive housing. This report is to be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2022.

Sec. 1209. 2022 c 297 s 209 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—PAYMENTS TO OTHER AGENCIES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$68,048,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($60,750,000))

$57,643,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($55,969,000))

$55,802,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($184,767,000))

$181,493,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department must extend master property insurance to all buildings owned by the department valued over $250,000 and to all locations leased by the department with contents valued over $250,000.

Sec. 1210. 2022 c 297 s 210 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY

(1)(a) During the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the health care authority shall provide support and data as required by the office of the state actuary in providing the legislature with health care actuarial analysis, including providing any information in the possession of the health care authority or available to the health care authority through contracts with providers, plans, insurers, consultants, or any other entities contracting with the health care authority.

(b) Information technology projects or investments and proposed projects or investments impacting time capture, payroll and payment processes and systems, eligibility, case management, and authorization systems within the health care authority are subject to technical oversight by the office of the chief information officer.

(2) The health care authority shall not initiate any services that require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The health care authority may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the health care authority receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation providing appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.

(3)(a) The health care authority, the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, the department of health, the department of corrections, and the department of children, youth, and families shall work together within existing resources to establish the health and human services enterprise coalition (the coalition). The coalition, led by the health care authority, must be a multi-organization collaborative that provides strategic direction and federal funding guidance for projects that have cross-organizational or enterprise impact, including information technology projects that affect organizations within the coalition. The office of the chief information officer shall maintain a statewide perspective when collaborating with the coalition to ensure that projects are planned for in a manner that ensures the efficient use of state resources, supports the adoption of a cohesive technology and data architecture, and maximizes federal financial participation. The work of the coalition and any project identified as a coalition project is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(b) The health care authority must submit a report on November 1, 2021, and annually thereafter, to the fiscal committees of the legislature. The report must include, at a minimum:

(i) A list of active coalition projects as of July 1st of the fiscal year. This must include all current and ongoing coalition projects, which coalition agencies are involved in these projects, and the funding being expended on each project, including in-kind funding. For each project, the report must include which federal requirements each coalition project is working to satisfy, and when each project is anticipated to satisfy those requirements; and

(ii) A list of coalition projects that are planned in the current and following fiscal year. This must include which coalition agencies are involved in these projects, including the anticipated in-kind funding by agency, and if a budget request will be submitted for funding. This must reflect all funding required by fiscal year and by fund source and include the budget outlook period.

(4) The appropriations to the health care authority in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, ((2022))2023, unless prohibited by this act, the authority may transfer general fund—state appropriations for fiscal year 2022 among programs after approval by the director of the office of financial management. The authority must notify the fiscal committees of the legislature prior to receiving approval from the director of the office of financial management. To the extent that appropriations in sections 211 through 215 of this act are insufficient to fund actual expenditures in excess of caseload forecast and utilization assumptions or for expenses in response to the COVID-19 pandemic, the authority may transfer general fund—state appropriations for fiscal year ((2022))2023 that are provided solely for a specified purpose. The authority may not transfer funds, including for expenses in response to the COVID-19 pandemic in fiscal year ((2022))2023, and the director of the office of financial management shall not approve the transfer, unless the transfer is consistent with the objective of conserving, to the maximum extent possible, the expenditure of state funds. The director of the office of financial management shall notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature in writing seven days prior to approving any allotment modifications or transfers under this section. The written notification must include a narrative explanation and justification of changes, along with expenditures and allotments by budget unit and appropriation, both before and after any allotment modifications and transfers.

Sec. 1211. 2022 c 297 s 211 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY—MEDICAL ASSISTANCE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$2,391,518,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($2,600,611,000))

$2,744,912,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($13,934,556,000))

$15,566,628,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($465,890,000))

$452,226,000

Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems

Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$15,086,000

Hospital Safety Net Assessment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($685,383,000))

$685,724,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2022)
. . . .
$26,063,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2023)
. . . .
(($27,241,000))

$23,280,000

Medical Aid Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$540,000

Telebehavioral Health Access Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$8,034,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$59,600,000

Ambulance Transport Fund—State Appropriation
. . . .
$14,317,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($20,228,839,000))

$21,987,928,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The authority shall not accept or expend any federal funds received under a medicaid transformation waiver under healthier Washington except as described in subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section until specifically approved and appropriated by the legislature. To ensure compliance with legislative directive budget requirements and terms and conditions of the waiver, the authority shall implement the waiver and reporting requirements with oversight from the office of financial management. The legislature finds that appropriate management of the innovation waiver requires better analytic capability, transparency, consistency, timeliness, accuracy, and lack of redundancy with other established measures and that the patient must be considered first and foremost in the implementation and execution of the demonstration waiver. In order to effectuate these goals, the authority shall: (a) Require the Dr. Robert Bree collaborative and the health technology assessment program to reduce the administrative burden upon providers by only requiring performance measures that are nonduplicative of other nationally established measures. The joint select committee on health care oversight will evaluate the measures chosen by the collaborative and the health technology assessment program for effectiveness and appropriateness; (b) develop a patient satisfaction survey with the goal to gather information about whether it was beneficial for the patient to use the center of excellence location in exchange for additional out-of-pocket savings; (c) ensure patients and health care providers have significant input into the implementation of the demonstration waiver, in order to ensure improved patient health outcomes; and (d) in cooperation with the department of social and health services, consult with and provide notification of work on applications for federal waivers, including details on waiver duration, financial implications, and potential future impacts on the state budget, to the joint select committee on health care oversight prior to submitting waivers for federal approval. The authority shall submit an application to the centers for medicaid and medicare services to extend the duration of the medicaid transformation waiver under healthier Washington as described in subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section by one year. If not extended, by federal standard, the medicaid transformation demonstration waiver shall not exceed the duration originally granted by the centers for medicare and medicaid services and any programs created or funded by this waiver do not create an entitlement. The demonstration period for the waiver as described in subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section concludes ((December 31, 2022))June 30, 2023.

(2)(a) No more than (($78,409,000))$93,107,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation and no more than (($66,264,000))$88,826,000 of the general fund—local appropriation may be expended for transformation through accountable communities of health described in initiative 1 of the medicaid transformation demonstration wavier under healthier Washington, including preventing youth drug use, opioid prevention and treatment, and physical and behavioral health integration. Under this initiative, the authority shall take into account local input regarding community needs. In order to ensure transparency to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature, the authority shall provide fiscal staff of the legislature query ability into any database of the fiscal intermediary that authority staff would be authorized to access. The authority shall not increase general fund—state expenditures under this initiative. The director shall also report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all of the expenditures under this subsection and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested by the legislative fiscal committees.

(b) No more than (($198,909,000))$315,678,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation and no more than (($81,245,000))$128,939,000 of the general fund—private/local appropriation may be expended for the medicaid quality improvement program. Under federal regulations, the medicaid quality improvement program is authorized and allows states to design quality improvement programs for the medicaid population in ways that support the state's quality goals. Medicaid quality improvement program payments will not count against the medicaid transformation demonstration waiver spending limits and are excluded from the waiver's budget neutrality calculation. Apple health managed care organizations and their partnering providers will receive medicaid quality improvement program payments as they meet designated milestones. Partnering providers and apple health managed care organizations will work together to achieve medicaid quality improvement program goals according to the performance period timelines and reporting deadlines as set forth by the authority. The authority shall only utilize the medicaid quality improvement program to support the transformation waiver and shall not pursue its use for other purposes. Any programs created or funded by the medicaid quality improvement program does not create an entitlement. The authority shall not increase general fund—state, federal, or private/local expenditures under this program. The director shall report to the joint select committee on health care oversight not less than quarterly on financial and health outcomes. The director shall report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all of the expenditures under this subsection and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested by the legislative fiscal committees.

(3) No more than (($26,837,000))$46,739,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation and (($26,839,000))$46,742,000 of the general fund—local appropriation may be expended for tailored support for older adults and medicaid alternative care described in initiative 2 of the medicaid transformation demonstration waiver under healthier Washington as well as administrative expenses for initiative 3. The authority shall contract and provide funding to the department of social and health services to administer initiative 2. The director in cooperation with the secretary of the department of social and health services shall report to the office of financial management all of the expenditures of this section and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested. The authority shall not increase general fund—state expenditures on this initiative.

(4) No more than (($28,680,000))$41,915,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation and no more than (($12,992,000))$20,310,000 of the general fund—local appropriation may be expended for supported housing and employment services described in initiative 3a and 3b of the medicaid transformation demonstration waiver under healthier Washington. Under this initiative, the authority and the department of social and health services shall ensure that allowable and necessary services are provided to eligible clients as identified by the department or its third party administrator. The authority shall not increase general fund—state expenditures under this initiative. The director shall report to the joint select committee on health care oversight no less than quarterly on financial and health outcomes. The director shall also report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all of the expenditures of this subsection and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested by the legislative fiscal committees.

(5) The authority shall submit an application to the centers for medicare and medicaid services to renew the 1115 demonstration waiver for an additional five years as described in subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section. The authority may not accept or expend any federal funds received under an 1115 demonstration waiver except as described in this section unless the legislature has appropriated the federal funding. To ensure compliance with legislative requirements and terms and conditions of the waiver, the authority shall implement the renewal of the 1115 demonstration waiver and reporting requirements with oversight from the office of financial management. The legislature finds that appropriate management of the renewal of the 1115 demonstration waiver ((as set forth in subsections (6), (7), and (8) of this section)) requires sound, consistent, timely, and transparent oversight and analytic review in addition to lack of redundancy with other established measures. The patient must be considered first and foremost in the implementation and execution of the demonstration waiver. To accomplish these goals, the authority shall develop consistent performance measures that focus on population health and health outcomes. The authority shall limit the number of projects that accountable communities of health may participate in under initiative 1 to a maximum of six and shall seek to develop common performance measures when possible. The joint select committee on health care oversight will evaluate the measures chosen: (a) For effectiveness and appropriateness; and (b) to provide patients and health care providers with significant input into the implementation of the demonstration waiver to promote improved population health and patient health outcomes. In cooperation with the department of social and health services, the authority shall consult with and provide notification of work on applications for federal waivers, including details on waiver duration, financial implications, and potential future impacts on the state budget to the joint select committee on health care oversight prior to submitting these waivers for federal approval. Prior to final approval or acceptance of funds by the authority, the authority shall submit the special terms and conditions as submitted to the centers for medicare and medicaid services and the anticipated budget for the duration of the renewed waiver to the governor, the joint select committee on health care, and the fiscal committees of the legislature. By federal standard any programs created or funded by this waiver do not create an entitlement. The demonstration period for the waiver ((as described in subsections (6), (7), and (8) of this section))renewal begins ((January))July 1, 2023.

(6)(((a) $32,432,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation and $40,296,000 of the general fund—local appropriation are provided solely for accountable communities of health described in initiative 1 of the 1115 demonstration waiver and this is the maximum amount that may be expended for this purpose. In renewing this initiative, the authority shall consider local input regarding community needs and shall limit total local projects to no more than six. To provide transparency to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature, the authority shall provide fiscal staff of the legislature query ability into any database of the fiscal intermediary that authority staff would be authorized to access. The authority shall not supplement the amounts provided in this subsection with any general fund—state moneys appropriated in this section or any moneys that may be transferred pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. The director shall report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all expenditures under this subsection and provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested by the legislative fiscal committees.

(b) $110,778,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation and $45,248,000 of the general fund—private/local appropriation are provided solely for the medicaid quality improvement program and this is the maximum amount that may be expended for this purpose. Medicaid quality improvement program payments do not count against the 1115 demonstration waiver spending limits and are excluded from the waiver's budget neutrality calculation. The authority may provide medicaid quality improvement program payments to apple health managed care organizations and their partnering providers as they meet designated milestones. Partnering providers and apple health managed care organizations must work together to achieve medicaid quality improvement program goals according to the performance period timelines and reporting deadlines as set forth by the authority. The authority may only use the medicaid quality improvement program to support initiatives 1, 2, and 3 as described in the 1115 demonstration waiver and may not pursue its use for other purposes. Any programs created or funded by the medicaid quality improvement program do not constitute an entitlement for clients or providers. The authority shall not supplement the amounts provided in this subsection with any general fund—state, general fund—federal, or general fund—local moneys appropriated in this section or any moneys that may be transferred pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. The director shall report to the joint select committee on health care oversight not less than quarterly on financial and health outcomes. The director shall report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all expenditures under this subsection and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested by the legislative fiscal committees.

(c) In collaboration with the accountable communities of health, the authority will submit a report to the governor and the joint select committee on health care oversight describing how each of the accountable community of health's work aligns with the community needs assessment no later than December 1, 2022.

(d) Performance measures and payments for accountable communities of health shall reflect accountability measures that demonstrate progress toward transparent, measurable, and meaningful goals that have an impact on improved population health and improved health outcomes, including a path to financial sustainability. While these goals may have variation to account for unique community demographics, measures should be standardized when possible.

(7) $19,902,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation and $19,903,000 of the general fund—local appropriation are provided solely for long-term support services as described in initiative 2 of the 1115 demonstration waiver as well as administrative expenses for initiative 3 and this is the maximum amount that may be expended for this purpose. The authority shall contract with and provide funding to the department of social and health services to administer initiative 2. The director in cooperation with the secretary of the department of social and health services shall report to the office of financial management all of the expenditures of this section and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested. The authority shall not supplement the amounts provided in this subsection with any general fund—state moneys appropriated in this section or any moneys that may be transferred pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

(8)(a) $13,235,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation and $7,318,000 of the general fund—local appropriation are provided solely for supported housing and employment services described in initiative 3a and 3b of the 1115 demonstration waiver and this is the maximum amount that may be expended for this purpose. Under this initiative, the authority and the department of social and health services shall ensure that allowable and necessary services are provided to eligible clients as identified by the department or its third-party administrator. The authority and the department, in consultation with the medicaid forecast work group, shall ensure that reasonable reimbursements are established for services deemed necessary within an identified limit per individual. The authority shall not supplement the amounts provided in this subsection with any general fund—state moneys appropriated in this section or any moneys that may be transferred pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. The director shall report to the joint select committee on health care oversight no less than quarterly on financial and health outcomes. The director shall also report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all of the expenditures of this subsection and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested by the legislative fiscal committees.

(b) The authority and the department shall seek additional flexibilities for housing supports through the centers for medicare and medicaid services and shall coordinate with the office of financial management and the department of commerce to ensure that services are not duplicated.

(c) The director shall report to the joint select committee on health care oversight no less than quarterly on utilization and caseload statistics for both supportive housing and employment services and its progress toward increasing uptake and availability for these services.

(9))) $202,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for supported employment services and $208,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for supported housing services, similar to the services described in initiatives 3a and 3b of the 1115 demonstration waiver to individuals who are ineligible for medicaid. Under these initiatives, the authority and the department of social and health services shall ensure that allowable and necessary services are provided to eligible clients as identified by the authority or its third-party administrator. Before authorizing services, eligibility for initiative 3a or 3b of the 1115 demonstration waiver must first be determined.

(((10)))(7) The authority shall submit a plan to preserve the waiver that allows for the full cost of stays in institutions for mental diseases to be included in managed care rates by November 1, 2021, to the appropriate committees of the legislature.

(((11)))(8) The authority shall submit a plan to preserve the waiver allowing for full federal financial participation for medical clients in mental health facilities classified as institutions for mental diseases by November 1, 2021, to the appropriate committees of the legislature.

(((12)))(9) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this subsection to implement the medicaid expansion as defined in the social security act, section 1902(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII).

(((13)))(10) The legislature finds that medicaid payment rates, as calculated by the health care authority pursuant to the appropriations in this act, bear a reasonable relationship to the costs incurred by efficiently and economically operated facilities for providing quality services and will be sufficient to enlist enough providers so that care and services are available to the extent that such care and services are available to the general population in the geographic area. The legislature finds that the cost reports, payment data from the federal government, historical utilization, economic data, and clinical input constitute reliable data upon which to determine the payment rates.

(((14)))(11) Based on quarterly expenditure reports and caseload forecasts, if the health care authority estimates that expenditures for the medical assistance program will exceed the appropriations, the health care authority shall take steps including but not limited to reduction of rates or elimination of optional services to reduce expenditures so that total program costs do not exceed the annual appropriation authority.

(((15)))(12) In determining financial eligibility for medicaid-funded services, the health care authority is authorized to disregard recoveries by Holocaust survivors of insurance proceeds or other assets, as defined in RCW 48.104.030.

(((16)))(13) The legislature affirms that it is in the state's interest for Harborview medical center to remain an economically viable component of the state's health care system.

(((17)))(14) When a person is ineligible for medicaid solely by reason of residence in an institution for mental diseases, the health care authority shall provide the person with the same benefits as he or she would receive if eligible for medicaid, using state-only funds to the extent necessary.

(((18)))(15) $3,733,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, (($4,261,000))$3,785,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and (($9,050,000))$9,553,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for low-income disproportionate share hospital payments.

(((19)))(16) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the health care authority shall provide disproportionate share hospital payments to hospitals that provide services to children in the children's health program who are not eligible for services under Title XIX or XXI of the federal social security act due to their citizenship status.

(((20)))(17) $7,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for supplemental payments to nursing homes operated by public hospital districts. The public hospital district shall be responsible for providing the required nonfederal match for the supplemental payment, and the payments shall not exceed the maximum allowable under federal rules. It is the legislature's intent that the payments shall be supplemental to and shall not in any way offset or reduce the payments calculated and provided in accordance with part E of chapter 74.46 RCW. It is the legislature's further intent that costs otherwise allowable for rate-setting and settlement against payments under chapter 74.46 RCW shall not be disallowed solely because such costs have been paid by revenues retained by the nursing home from these supplemental payments. The supplemental payments are subject to retrospective interim and final cost settlements based on the nursing homes' as-filed and final medicare cost reports. The timing of the interim and final cost settlements shall be at the health care authority's discretion. During either the interim cost settlement or the final cost settlement, the health care authority shall recoup from the public hospital districts the supplemental payments that exceed the medicaid cost limit and/or the medicare upper payment limit. The health care authority shall apply federal rules for identifying the eligible incurred medicaid costs and the medicare upper payment limit.

(((21)))(18) The health care authority shall continue the inpatient hospital certified public expenditures program for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. The program shall apply to all public hospitals, including those owned or operated by the state, except those classified as critical access hospitals or state psychiatric institutions. The health care authority shall submit reports to the governor and legislature by November 1, 2021, and by November 1, 2022, that evaluate whether savings continue to exceed costs for this program. If the certified public expenditures (CPE) program in its current form is no longer cost-effective to maintain, the health care authority shall submit a report to the governor and legislature detailing cost-effective alternative uses of local, state, and federal resources as a replacement for this program. During fiscal year 2022 and fiscal year 2023, hospitals in the program shall be paid and shall retain one hundred percent of the federal portion of the allowable hospital cost for each medicaid inpatient fee-for-service claim payable by medical assistance and one hundred percent of the federal portion of the maximum disproportionate share hospital payment allowable under federal regulations. For the purpose of determining the amount of any state grant under this subsection, payments will include the federal portion of medicaid program supplemental payments received by the hospitals. Inpatient medicaid payments shall be established using an allowable methodology that approximates the cost of claims submitted by the hospitals. Payments made to each hospital in the program in each fiscal year of the biennium shall be compared to a baseline amount. The baseline amount will be determined by the total of (a) the inpatient claim payment amounts that would have been paid during the fiscal year had the hospital not been in the CPE program based on the reimbursement rates developed, implemented, and consistent with policies approved in the 2021-2023 biennial operating appropriations act and in effect on July 1, 2015, (b) one-half of the indigent assistance disproportionate share hospital payment amounts paid to and retained by each hospital during fiscal year 2005, and (c) all of the other disproportionate share hospital payment amounts paid to and retained by each hospital during fiscal year 2005 to the extent the same disproportionate share hospital programs exist in the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium. If payments during the fiscal year exceed the hospital's baseline amount, no additional payments will be made to the hospital except the federal portion of allowable disproportionate share hospital payments for which the hospital can certify allowable match. If payments during the fiscal year are less than the baseline amount, the hospital will be paid a state grant equal to the difference between payments during the fiscal year and the applicable baseline amount. Payment of the state grant shall be made in the applicable fiscal year and distributed in monthly payments. The grants will be recalculated and redistributed as the baseline is updated during the fiscal year. The grant payments are subject to an interim settlement within eleven months after the end of the fiscal year. A final settlement shall be performed. To the extent that either settlement determines that a hospital has received funds in excess of what it would have received as described in this subsection, the hospital must repay the excess amounts to the state when requested. $425,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and (($391,000))$273,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for state grants for the participating hospitals.

(((22)))(19) The health care authority shall seek public-private partnerships and federal funds that are or may become available to provide on-going support for outreach and education efforts under the federal children's health insurance program reauthorization act of 2009.

(((23)))(20) The health care authority shall target funding for maternity support services towards pregnant women with factors that lead to higher rates of poor birth outcomes, including hypertension, a preterm or low birth weight birth in the most recent previous birth, a cognitive deficit or developmental disability, substance abuse, severe mental illness, unhealthy weight or failure to gain weight, tobacco use, or African American or Native American race. The health care authority shall prioritize evidence-based practices for delivery of maternity support services. To the extent practicable, the health care authority shall develop a mechanism to increase federal funding for maternity support services by leveraging local public funding for those services.

(((24)))(21) The authority shall submit reports to the governor and the legislature by September 15, 2021, and no later than September 15, 2022, that delineate the number of individuals in medicaid managed care, by carrier, age, gender, and eligibility category, receiving preventative services and vaccinations. The reports should include baseline and benchmark information from the previous two fiscal years and should be inclusive of, but not limited to, services recommended under the United States preventative services task force, advisory committee on immunization practices, early and periodic screening, diagnostic, and treatment (EPSDT) guidelines, and other relevant preventative and vaccination medicaid guidelines and requirements.

(((25)))(22) Managed care contracts must incorporate accountability measures that monitor patient health and improved health outcomes, and shall include an expectation that each patient receive a wellness examination that documents the baseline health status and allows for monitoring of health improvements and outcome measures.

(((26)))(23) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the authority to provide an adult dental benefit.

(((27)))(24) The health care authority shall coordinate with the department of social and health services to provide referrals to the Washington health benefit exchange for clients that will be ineligible for medicaid.

(((28)))(25) To facilitate a single point of entry across public and medical assistance programs, and to maximize the use of federal funding, the health care authority, the department of social and health services, and the health benefit exchange will coordinate efforts to expand HealthPlanfinder access to public assistance and medical eligibility staff. The health care authority shall complete medicaid applications in the HealthPlanfinder for households receiving or applying for medical assistance benefits.

(((29)))(26) $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $180,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to continue operation by a nonprofit organization of a toll-free hotline that assists families to learn about and enroll in the apple health for kids program. By November 15, 2022, the authority shall submit a report to the appropriate committees to the legislature that provides, at a minimum, information about the number of calls received by the nonprofit organization in the previous year, the amount of time spent on each call, comparisons to previous years, where available, and information about what data is collected related to this service.

(((30)))(27) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall reimburse for primary care services provided by naturopathic physicians.

(((31)))(28) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall continue to provide coverage for pregnant teens that qualify under existing pregnancy medical programs, but whose eligibility for pregnancy related services would otherwise end due to the application of the new modified adjusted gross income eligibility standard.

(((32)))(29) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section to remove the mental health visit limit and to provide the shingles vaccine and screening, brief intervention, and referral to treatment benefits that are available in the medicaid alternative benefit plan in the classic medicaid benefit plan.

(((33)))(30) The authority shall use revenue appropriated from the dedicated ((marijuana fund))cannabis account for contracts with community health centers under RCW 69.50.540 in lieu of general fund—state payments to community health centers for services provided to medical assistance clients, and it is the intent of the legislature that this policy will be continued in subsequent fiscal biennia.

(((34)))(31) Beginning no later than January 1, 2018, for any service eligible under the medicaid state plan for encounter payments, managed care organizations at the request of a rural health clinic shall pay the full published encounter rate directly to the clinic. At no time will a managed care organization be at risk for or have any right to the supplemental portion of the claim. Payments will be reconciled on at least an annual basis between the managed care organization and the authority, with final review and approval by the authority.

(((35)))(32) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the authority to provide a medicaid equivalent adult dental benefit to clients enrolled in the medical care service program.

(((36)))(33) During the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, sufficient amounts are provided in this section for the authority to provide services identical to those services covered by the Washington state family planning waiver program as of August 2018 to individuals who:

(a) Are over nineteen years of age;

(b) Are at or below two hundred and sixty percent of the federal poverty level as established in WAC 182-505-0100;

(c) Are not covered by other public or private insurance; and

(d) Need family planning services and are not currently covered by or eligible for another medical assistance program for family planning.

(((37)))(34) Sufficient amounts are appropriated within this section for the authority to incorporate the expected outcomes and criteria to measure the performance of service coordination organizations as provided in chapter 70.320 RCW into contracts with managed care organizations that provide services to clients. The authority is directed to:

(a) Contract with an external quality improvement organization to annually analyze the performance of managed care organizations providing services to clients under this chapter based on seven performance measures. The analysis required under this subsection must:

(i) Measure managed care performance in four common measures across each managed care organization, including:

(A) At least one common measure must be weighted towards having the potential to impact managed care costs; and

(B) At least one common measure must be weighted towards population health management, as defined by the measure; and

(ii) Measure managed care performance in an additional three quality focus performance measures specific to a managed care organization. Quality focus performance measures chosen by the authority must:

(A) Be chosen from the statewide common measure set;

(B) Reflect specific measures where a managed care organization has poor performance; and

(C) Be substantive and clinically meaningful in promoting health status.

(b) The authority shall set the four common measures to be analyzed across all managed care organizations.

(c) The authority shall set three quality focus performance measures specific to each managed care organization. The authority must determine performance measures for each managed care organization based on the criteria established in (a)(ii) of this subsection.

(d) By September 15, 2021, and annually thereafter, the authority shall notify each managed care organization of the performance measures for the organization for the subsequent plan year.

(e) Two percent of the total plan year funding appropriated to each managed care organization that provides services to clients under chapter 70.320 RCW shall be withheld. At least seventy-five percent of the withhold shall be held contingent on each managed care organization's performance on the seven performance measures identified in this section. Each managed care organization may earn back the annual withhold if the external quality improvement organization finds that the managed care organization:

(i) Made statistically significant improvement in the seven performance measures as compared to the preceding plan year; or

(ii) Scored in the top national medicaid quartile of the performance measures.

(f) The amount of withhold annually paid to each managed care organization shall be proportional to findings of statistically significant improvement or top national medicaid quartile scoring by a managed care organization.

(g) For no more than two of the four quality focus performance measures, the authority may use an alternate methodology to approximate top national medicaid quartile performance where top quartile performance data is unavailable.

(h) For the purposes of this subsection, "external quality improvement organization" means an organization that meets the competence and independence requirements under 42 C.F.R. Sec. 438.354, as it existed on the effective date of this section.

(((38)))(35)(a) The authority shall ensure that appropriate resources are dedicated to implementing the recommendations of the centers for medicare and medicaid services center for program integrity as provided to the authority in the January 2019 Washington focused program integrity review final report. Additionally, the authority shall:

(i) Work to ensure the efficient operations of the managed care plans, including but not limited to, a deconflicting process for audits with and among the managed care plans and the medicaid fraud division at the attorney general's office, to ensure the authority staff perform central audits of cases that appear across multiple managed care plans, versus the audits performed by the individual managed care plans or the fraud division; and

(ii) Remain accountable for operating in an effective and efficient manner, including performing program integrity activities that ensure high value in the medical assistance program in general and in medicaid managed care specifically;

(A) Work with its contracted actuary and the medicaid forecast work group to develop methods and metrics related to managed care program integrity activity that shall be incorporated into annual rate setting; and

(B) Work with the medicaid forecast work group to ensure the results of program integrity activity are incorporated into the rate setting process in a transparent, timely, measurable, quantifiable manner.

(b) The authority shall submit a report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by October 1, 2021, that includes, but is not limited to:

(i) Specific, quantified actions that have been taken, to date, related to the recommendations of the centers for medicare and medicaid services center for program integrity as provided to the authority in the January 2019 Washington focused program integrity review final report; and

(ii) Specific, quantified information regarding the steps taken toward (a)(i), (iii), and (iv) of this subsection.

(((39)))(36) No later than December 31, 2021, the health care authority, in partnership with the department of social and health services as described in section 204(16) of this act, shall submit a waiver request to the federal department of health and human services to authorize presumptive medicaid eligibility determinations for clients preparing for acute care hospital discharge who may need long-term services and supports. The department and the authority shall hold stakeholder discussions, including opportunities for public review and comment, during development of the waiver request. Upon submission of the waiver request, the department and the authority shall submit a report to the governor and the appropriate legislative committees that describes the request and identifies any statutory changes that may be necessary if the federal government approves the request.

(((40)))(37) $2,786,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $3,714,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $11,009,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to maintain and increase access for behavioral health services through increased provider rates. The rate increases are effective October 1, 2021, and must be applied to the following codes for children and adults enrolled in the medicaid program: 90832, 90833, 90834, 90837, H0004, H0036, H2015, H2021, H0023, 90836, 90838, 96156, 96158, 96159, 96164, 96165, 96167, 96168, 96170, 96171, 90845, 90846, 90847, 90849, 90853, 90785, and 90791. The authority may use a substitute code in the event that any of the codes identified in this subsection are discontinued and replaced with an updated code covering the same service. Within the amounts provided in this subsection the authority must:

(a) Implement this rate increase in accordance with the process established in chapter 285, Laws of 2020 (EHB 2584) (behavioral health rates);

(b) Raise the state fee-for-service rates for these codes by up to 15 percent, except that the state medicaid rate may not exceed the published medicare rate or an equivalent relative value unit rate if a published medicare rate is not available;

(c) Require in contracts with managed care organizations that, beginning October 2021, managed care organizations pay no lower than the fee-for-service rate for these codes, and adjust managed care capitation rates accordingly; and

(d) Not duplicate rate increases provided in subsections (((41) and (42)))(38) and (39) of this section.

(((41)))(38) $19,664,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $26,218,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $77,996,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to maintain and increase access for primary care services for medicaid-enrolled patients through increased provider rates beginning October 1, 2021. Within the amounts provided in this subsection the authority must:

(a) Increase the medical assistance rates for adult primary care services that are reimbursed solely at the existing medical assistance rates on a fee-for-service basis, as well as through managed care plans, by at least 15 percent above medical assistance rates in effect on January 1, 2019;

(b) Increase the medical assistance rates for pediatric primary care services that are reimbursed solely at the existing medical assistance rates on a fee-for-service basis, as well as through managed care plans, by at least 21 percent above medical assistance rates in effect on January 1, 2019;

(c) Increase the medical assistance rates for pediatric critical care, neonatal critical care, and neonatal intensive care services that are reimbursed solely at the existing medical assistance rates on a fee-for-service basis, as well as through managed care plans, by at least 21 percent above medical assistance rates in effect on January 1, 2019;

(d) Apply reimbursement rates required under this subsection to payment codes in a manner consistent with the temporary increase in medicaid reimbursement rates under federal rules and guidance in effect on January 1, 2014, implementing the patient protection and affordable care act, except that the authority may not require provider attestations;

(e) Pursue state plan amendments to require medicaid managed care organizations to increase rates under this subsection through adoption of a uniform percentage increase for network providers pursuant to 42 C.F.R. Sec. 438.6(c)(1)(iii)(B), as existing on January 1, 2019; and

(f) Not duplicate rate increases provided in subsections (((40) and (42)))(37) and (39) of this section.

(((42)))(39) $2,233,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $2,977,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $10,871,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase provider rates to maintain and increase access for family planning services for patients seeking services through department of health sexual and reproductive health program family planning providers. The rate increases are effective October 1, 2021, and must be applied to the following codes for eligible apple health and family planning only clients seeking services through department of health sexual and reproductive health program providers: 36415, 36416, 55250, 57170, 58340, 58600, 58605, 58611, 58615, 58670, 58671, 59840, 59841, 59850, 59851, 59852, 59855, 59856, 59857, 76817, 81025, 84702, 84703, 86631, 86632, 86901, 87110, 87270, 87320, 87490, 87491, 87590, 87591, 87624, 87625, 87800, 87810, 88141, 88142, 88143, 88147, 88148, 88150, 88152, 88153, 88164, 88165, 88166, 88167, 88174, 88175, 96372, 99071, 99201, 99202, 99203, 99204, 99211, 99212, 99213, 99214, 99384, 99385, 99386, 99394, 99395, 99396, 99401, and S0199. The authority may use a substitute code if any of the codes identified in this subsection are discontinued and replaced with an updated code covering the same service. Within the amounts provided in this subsection the authority must:

(a) Increase the family planning rates for services that are included on and reimbursed solely at the existing family planning fee schedule on a fee-for-service basis, as well as through managed care plans, by at least 162 percent above family planning fee schedule rates in effect on January 1, 2021;

(b) Pursue state plan amendments to require medicaid managed care organizations to increase rates under this subsection through adoption of a uniform percentage increase for network providers pursuant to 42 C.F.R. Sec. 438.6(c)(1)(iii)(B), as existing on January 1, 2021; and

(c) Not duplicate rate increases provided in subsections (((40) and (41)))(37) and (38) of this section.

(((43)))(40)(a) Beginning with fiscal year 2020, and for each subsequent year thereafter, the authority shall reconcile on an annual basis with rural health clinics.

(b) Beginning with fiscal year 2020, and for each subsequent year thereafter, the authority shall properly accrue for any anticipated reconciliations with rural health clinics during the fiscal year close process following generally accepted accounting practices.

(((44)))(41)(a) The authority in collaboration with the office of financial management and representatives from fiscal committees of the legislature shall conduct an evaluation of the APM4 model to determine its cost effectiveness and impact on patient outcomes and report its findings and recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 15, 2022.

(b) The authority shall not enter into any future value-based arrangements with federally qualified health centers or rural health clinics prior to receiving approval from the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature.

(c) The authority shall not modify the reconciliation process or the APM4 program with federally qualified health centers or rural health clinics without notification to and the opportunity to comment from the office of financial management.

(d) The authority shall require all managed care organizations to provide information to the authority to account for all payments to federally qualified health centers to include how payments are made, including any additional payments and whether there is a sub-capitation arrangement or value-based purchasing arrangement.

(e) Beginning with fiscal year 2021 and for each subsequent year thereafter, the authority shall reconcile on an annual basis with federally qualified health centers contracting under APM4.

(f) Beginning with fiscal year 2021 and for each subsequent year thereafter, the authority shall properly accrue for any anticipated reconciliations with federally qualified health centers contracting under APM4 during the fiscal year close process following generally accepted accounting practices.

(((45)))(42) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority is to include allergen control bed and pillow covers as part of the durable medical equipment benefit for children with an asthma diagnosis enrolled in medical assistance programs.

(((46)))(43) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall reimburse for maternity services provided by doulas.

(((47)))(44) $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $60,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for evaluation of the Washington rural health access preservation pilot program.

(((48)))(45) $160,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,440,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for health care interoperability costs and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(((49)))(46) $275,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, (($160,000))$605,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and (($3,913,000))$7,608,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for modular replacement costs of the ProviderOne pharmacy point of sale system and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(((50)))(47) $484,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $466,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to implement Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5399 (universal health care commission).

(((51)))(48) $654,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $655,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $2,154,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to increase the nonemergency medical transportation broker administrative rate to ensure access to health care services for medicaid patients.

(((52)))(49) $1,715,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $1,804,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $6,647,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase the rates paid to rural hospitals that meet the criteria in (a) through (e) of this subsection. Payments for state and federal medical assistance programs for services provided by such a hospital, regardless of the beneficiary's managed care enrollment status, must be increased to 150 percent of the hospital's fee-for-service rates. The authority must discontinue this rate increase after June 30, 2023, and return to the payment levels and methodology for these hospitals that were in place as of January 1, 2018. Hospitals participating in the certified public expenditures program may not receive increased reimbursement for inpatient services. Hospitals qualifying for this rate increase must:

(a) Be certified by the centers for medicare and medicaid services as sole community hospitals as of January 1, 2013;

(b) Have had less than 150 acute care licensed beds in fiscal year 2011;

(c) Have a level III adult trauma service designation from the department of health as of January 1, 2014;

(d) Be owned and operated by the state or a political subdivision; and

(e) Accept single bed certification patients pursuant to RCW 71.05.745 by July 1, 2022. If the hospitals qualifying for this rate increase do not accept single bed certification patients by July 1, 2022, the authority must discontinue this rate increase after October 1, 2022, and must return to the payment levels and methodology for these hospitals that were in place as of January 1, 2018.

(((53)))(50) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $200,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for pass through funding for a citizens of the compact of free association (COFA) community member led organization through a Washington state based organization contract as outlined in RCW 43.71A.030 to provide additional supports to COFA community members statewide who are seeking access to health coverage and health care services. The amounts provided in this subsection for fiscal year 2022 must be distributed no later than October 1, 2021. The amounts provided in this subsection for fiscal year 2023 must be distributed no later than October 1, 2022.

(((54)))(51) The authority shall collaborate with the Washington state LGBTQ commission, the department of health, advocates for people living with HIV in Washington, consumers, and medical professionals with expertise in serving the medicaid population living with HIV, to consider and develop recommendations regarding:

(a) Access to HIV antiretroviral drugs on the medicaid drug formulary, including short- and long-term fiscal implications of eliminating current prior authorization and fail-first requirements;

(b) Impact of drug access on public health and the statewide goal of reducing HIV transmissions; and

(c) Maximizing pharmaceutical drug rebates for HIV antiretroviral drugs.

(((55)))(52) $22,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $22,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $134,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5157 (behavioral disorders/justice).

(((56)))(53) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall extend the oral health connections pilot project in Spokane, Thurston, and Cowlitz counties. The authority shall continue to work in collaboration with a state-based oral health foundation to jointly develop and implement the program. The purpose of the pilot is to test the effect that enhanced dental benefits for medicaid clients with diabetes and pregnant clients have on access to dental care, health outcomes, and medical care costs. The pilot program must continue to include enhanced reimbursement rates for participating dental providers, including denturists licensed under chapter 18.30 RCW, and an increase in the allowable number of periodontal treatments to up to four per calendar year. The authority has the option of extending pilot program eligibility to dually eligible medicaid clients who are diabetic or pregnant and to pregnant medicaid clients under the age of 20. The authority has the option of adjusting the pilot program benefit design and fee schedule based on previous findings, within amounts appropriated in this section. Diabetic or pregnant medicaid clients who are receiving dental care within the pilot regions, regardless of location of the service within the pilot regions, are eligible for the increased number of periodontal treatments. The state-based oral health foundation shall continue to partner with the authority and provide wraparound services to link patients to care. The authority and foundation shall provide a joint report to the appropriate committees of the legislature on October 1, 2021, outlining the findings of the original three-year pilot program, and on December 1, 2022, outlining the progress of the extended pilot program.

(((57)))(54)(a) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $200,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for contracting with the office of equity to implement chapter 293, Laws of 2020 (baby, child dentistry access). By November 15, 2021, the authority shall submit a report to the appropriate committees to the legislature describing its progress implementing chapter 293, Laws of 2020 (baby, child dentistry access) and chapter 242, Laws of 2020 (access to baby and child dentistry for children with disabilities).

(b) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $200,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to contract with access to baby and child dentistry local programs for the purpose of maintaining and expanding capacity for local program coordinators. The goals of this contracting include, but are not limited to, reducing racial and ethnic disparities in access to care and oral health outcomes, increasing the percentage of medicaid-enrolled children under the age of two accessing dental care, and continued provider engagement and outreach. The authority may contract with the office of equity and other statewide and local equity partners to provide training and identify activities and deliverables.

(((58)))(55) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $75,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for contracting by the health care authority to further the development and implementation of its Washington primary care transformation initiative, intended to increase team-based primary care and the percentage of overall health care spending in the state devoted to primary care. By October 1, 2021, the authority must update the legislature on the status of the initiative, including any fiscal impacts of this initiative, potential implementation barriers, and needed legislation.

(((59)))(56) Sufficient funds are provided to continue reimbursing dental health aid therapists for services performed in tribal facilities for medicaid clients. The authority must leverage any federal funding that may become available as a result of appeal decisions from the centers for medicare and medicaid services or the United States court of appeals for the ninth circuit.

(((60)))(57) $149,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $140,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to implement Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5377 (standardized health plans).

(((61)))(58) Within the amount appropriated within this section, the authority shall implement the requirements of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5068 (postpartum period/medicaid) and the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2, in extending health care coverage during the postpartum period. The authority shall make every effort to expedite and complete eligibility determinations for individuals who are likely eligible to receive health care coverage under Title XIX or Title XXI of the federal social security act to ensure the state is receiving maximum federal match. This includes, but is not limited to, working with managed care organizations to provide continuous outreach in various modalities until the individual's eligibility determination is completed. Beginning June 1, 2022, the authority must submit quarterly reports to the caseload forecast work group on the number of individuals who are likely eligible to receive health care coverage under Title XIX or Title XXI of the federal social security act but are waiting for the authority to complete eligibility determination, the number of individuals who were likely eligible but are now receiving health care coverage with the maximum federal match under Title XIX or Title XXI of the federal social security act, and outreach activities including the work with managed care organizations.

(((62)))(59) $10,695,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $10,695,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $54,656,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to maintain and increase access for adult dental services for medicaid enrolled patients through increased provider rates beginning July 1, 2021. Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the authority must increase the medical assistance rates for adult dental services that are reimbursed solely at the existing medical assistance rates on a fee-for-service basis up to 100 percent above medical assistance rates in effect on January 1, 2019.

(((63)))(60) $551,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $770,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $3,288,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5195 (opioid overdose medication).

(((64)))(61) The authority must claim the enhanced federal medical assistance participation rate for home and community-based services offered under section 9817 of the American rescue plan act of 2021 (ARPA). Appropriations made that constitute supplementation of home and community-based services as defined in section 9817 of ARPA are listed in the LEAP omnibus document HCBS-2021.

(((65)))(62) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the authority to continue a public-private partnership with a state-based oral health foundation to connect medicaid patients to dental services and reduce barriers to accessing care. The authority shall submit a progress report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2022.

(((66)))(63)(a) $35,000,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the authority to distribute grants for the provision of health care services for uninsured and underinsured individuals, regardless of immigration status. Grants provided under this subsection must be used for the direct care of uninsured and underinsured individuals under 200 percent of the federal poverty level, including on-site care as well as referrals to and payment for services provided off-site, for:

(i) The testing, assessment, or treatment of the severe acute respiratory syndrome coronavirus 2 (COVID-19), including facility and provider fees;

(ii) Primary and preventive care;

(iii) Behavioral health services;

(iv) Oral health care;

(v) Assessment, treatment, and management of acute or chronic conditions, including but not limited to the cost of laboratory, prescription medications, specialty care, therapies, radiology, and other diagnostics; and

(vi) Outreach and education needed to inform patients and prospective patients that care is available free of charge.

(b) To be eligible for a grant under this subsection, a federally qualified health center, rural health clinic, free clinic, public hospital district, behavioral health provider or facility, behavioral health administrative service organization, or community-based organization must apply for a grant and agree to not:

(i) Bill individuals for any portion of the services provided that involve the use of amounts appropriated in this section; or

(ii) Use the amounts provided in this subsection for services for which other funds are available, such as federal funds from the families first coronavirus response act and the American rescue plan act.

(c) Grants provided under this subsection may be used to provide on-site care, care delivered via telehealth, and referrals to and payments for services provided off-site. Recipients may use funds distributed in this subsection to reimburse other providers or facilities for the cost of care. Only free clinics may use grants provided under this subsection to cover general operating costs, including staffing, supplies, and equipment purchases.

(d) The agency shall employ fund allocation approaches that engage community residents, organizations, and leaders in identifying priorities and implementing projects and initiatives that reflect community values and priorities. At a minimum, this must include consultation with community health boards and organizations that advocate for access to health care for uninsured state residents.

(e) Recipients of the amounts provided in this subsection must submit reports to the authority on the use of grant funds, including data about utilization of services. The authority shall prepare and post on its website an annual report detailing the amount of funds disbursed and aggregating information submitted by recipients.

(f) The authority may retain no more than three percent of the amounts provided in this subsection for administrative costs.

(g) As used in this subsection, "free clinics" mean private, nonprofit, community, or faith-based organizations that provide medical, dental, and mental health services at little or no cost to uninsured and underinsured people through the use of volunteer health professionals, community volunteers, and partnerships with other health providers.

(((67)))(64) $123,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $46,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $743,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1348 (incarcerated persons/medical).

(((68)))(65) $1,350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $2,570,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of House Bill No. 1096 (nonmedicare plans).

(((69)))(66) Within the amounts provided in this section, sufficient funding is provided for the authority to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 1325 (behavioral health/youth).

(((70)))(67) $184,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1196 (audio-only telemedicine).

(((71)))(68) $232,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $599,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for reimbursement for a social worker as part of the medical assistance home health benefit.

(((72)))(69) $1,303,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $285,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5203 (generic prescription drugs).

(((73)))(70) $18,669,000 from the Indian health improvement reinvestment account is provided solely for Indian health improvement advisory plan projects, programs, and activities authorized by RCW 43.71B.030.

(((74)))(71) $434,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $489,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the authority to partner with the department of social and health services to create surge capacity in acute care hospitals by supporting non-citizens who are both in acute care hospitals awaiting discharge and on the department of social and health services waitlist for services. The amounts provided in this subsection are for the authority to cover the cost of medical assistance for 20 new non-citizen clients.

(((75)))(72) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $25,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to develop an implementation plan to incorporate medical and psychiatric respite care as statewide medicaid benefits. The plan must include an analysis of the cost effectiveness of providing medical and psychiatric respite care benefits for medicaid enrollees. In developing the plan, the authority shall consult with interested stakeholders, including medicaid managed care organizations, community health centers, organizations providing respite care, and hospitals. Amounts provided in this subsection may be used for staff support and one-time contracting. No later than January 15, 2022, the authority shall report its findings to the relevant committees of the legislature, the office of the governor, and the office of financial management.

(((76)))(73) $281,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $192,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $803,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5304 (reentry services).

(((77)))(74)(a) The authority shall assess the feasibility and fiscal impacts of an 1115 medicaid waiver to extend continuous eligibility for apple health covered children ages zero through five as a component of school readiness. The authority may seek support for the analysis. Prior to submitting the waiver application, the authority shall provide a status update no later than September 30, 2021, to the governor and fiscal committees of the legislature.

(b) $6,090,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $6,125,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to extend continuous eligibility for apple health to children ages zero to six with income at or below 215 percent of the federal poverty level. The centers for medicare and medicaid services must approve the 1115 medicaid waiver prior to the implementation of this policy.

(((78)))(75) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the perinatal support warm line to provide peer support, resources, and referrals to new and expectant parents and people in the emotional transition to parenthood experiencing, or at risk of, postpartum depression or other mental health issues.

(((79)))(76) Sufficient funding is provided to remove the asset test from the medicare savings program review process.

(((80)))(77) $77,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $286,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1728 (insulin work group reauth.). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((81)))(78) Sufficient funding is provided to eliminate the mid-certification review process for the aged, blind, or disabled and housing and essential needs referral programs.

(((82)))(79) $103,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $253,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $2,724,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to procure an electronic consent management solution for patients and health care providers to exchange health-related information and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(((83)))(80) $1,788,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $1,788,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $994,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for electronic health record expansion that must be based on the operational and technical needs necessary to implement the national 988 system and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act. As a condition of funding under this subsection, the authority must complete all reporting required under RCW 71.24.898.

(((84)))(81) $3,250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the authority to make information technology system and provider network upgrades necessary for the anticipated expansion of medicaid equivalent health care coverage for uninsured adults with incomes up to 138 percent of the federal poverty level regardless of immigration status ((in collaboration with the department of social and health services and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act)).

(((85)))(82) $10,406,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $10,715,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to maintain and increase access for children's dental services for medicaid enrolled patients through increased provider rates beginning January 1, 2023. Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the authority must increase the medical assistance rates for children's dental services that are reimbursed solely at the existing medical assistance rates on a fee-for-service basis as follows:

(a) Increase the rates for codes for the access to baby and child dentistry (ABCD) program by 40 percent;

(b) Increase the rates for codes for children's dental program rates for persons aged zero to 20 years old that have a corresponding ABCD code to the current ABCD code rate, plus an additional 10 percent rate increase; and

(c) Increase the rates for codes for children's dental program rates for persons aged zero to 20 years old without a corresponding ABCD code to 70 percent of the medical assistance rates on a fee-for-service basis for adult dental services in effect on January 1, 2022. This increase does not apply to codes with rates already greater than 70 percent of the adult dental services rate.

(((86)))(83) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $250,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to conduct a feasibility study for planning, design, implementation, and administration of a case management solution that supports acquisition, storage, and retrieval of data and data analysis pursuant to Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States district court for the western district of Washington, cause no. 14-cv-00178-MJP.

(((87)))(84) $56,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,548,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for health information technology and evaluations necessary to support the 1115 demonstration waiver as it relates to institutions for mental diseases and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(((88)))(85) $272,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $149,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to align services provided through both fee-for-service and managed care to the bright futures guidelines, or a comparable schedule, for early and periodic screening, diagnosis, and treatment beginning January 1, 2023.

(((89)))(86) $3,174,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5745 (personal needs allowance). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((90)))(87) $297,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5589 (primary care spending). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((91)))(88) $1,460,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5532 (Rx drug affordability board). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((92)))(89) $61,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $183,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5736 (minors/behavioral health). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((93)))(90) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the authority to design a standardized payment methodology for a palliative care benefit for the state medicaid program and the employee and retiree benefits programs. The authority may contract with a third party to design the palliative care model and complete the work required in this subsection.

(((94)))(91) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall develop a state plan amendment, rules, and payment policies; complete necessary system changes related to payment processing and provider enrollment; and update managed care contracts and provider communications in anticipation of providing an adult acupuncture benefit.

(((95)))(92) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall develop a state plan amendment, rules, and payment policies; complete necessary system changes related to payment processing and provider enrollment; and update managed care contracts and provider communications in anticipation of providing an adult chiropractic benefit.

(((96)))(93) $640,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $655,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a 20 percent rate increase, effective January 1, 2023, for in-home private duty nursing agencies.

(((97)))(94) $180,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $187,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a 10 percent rate increase, effective January 1, 2023, for private duty nursing in medically intensive children's group home settings.

(((98)))(95) $140,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $266,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a 10 percent rate increase, effective January 1, 2023, for home health services.

(((99)))(96)(a) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the authority to provide a report on psilocybin services wellness and opportunities in consultation with stakeholders as described in this subsection.

(b) The director of the authority, or the director's designee, must chair the stakeholder group.

(c) The stakeholder group must include, but not be limited to, the following members:

(i) The secretary of the department of health or the secretary's designee;

(ii) The director of the liquor and cannabis board or the director's designee;

(iii) The director of the department of agriculture or the director's designee; and

(iv) As appointed by the director of the authority, or the director's designee:

(A) A military veteran, or representative of an organization that advocates on behalf of military veterans, with knowledge of psilocybin;

(B) Up to two recognized indigenous practitioners with knowledge of the use of psilocybin or other psychedelic compounds in their communities;

(C) An individual with expertise in disability rights advocacy;

(D) A member of the nursing profession with knowledge of psilocybin;

(E) A psychologist with knowledge of psilocybin;

(F) A mental health counselor, marriage and family therapist, or social worker with knowledge of psilocybin;

(G) A physician with knowledge of psilocybin;

(H) A health researcher with expertise in health equity;

(I) A representative of the cannabis industry with knowledge of regulation of cannabis businesses in Washington;

(J) An advocate from the LGBTQIA community with knowledge of the experience of behavioral health issues within that community;

(K) A member of the psychedelic medicine alliance of Washington; and

(L) Up to two members with lived experience of utilizing psilocybin.

(d) The authority must convene the first meeting of the stakeholder group no later than June 30, 2022.

(e) The authority must provide a preliminary brief report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2022, focusing on (f)(i), (ii), and (iii) of this subsection, and a final report by December 1, 2023. The authority may form subcommittees within the stakeholder group and adopt procedures necessary to facilitate its work.

(f) The duties of the authority in consultation with the stakeholder group shall include, but not be limited to, the following activities:

(i) Review the Oregon health authority's proposed rules for the regulation of psilocybin and assess the impact the adoption of substantially similar laws and rules or Senate Bill No. 5660 would have in Washington state, and identify specific areas where a different approach may be necessary or desirable;

(ii) Review systems and procedures established by the liquor and cannabis board to monitor manufacturing, testing, and tracking of cannabis to determine suitability and adaptations required for use with psilocybin if Washington adopts legislation substantially similar to the Oregon psilocybin services act or Senate Bill No. 5660;

(iii) Review the social opportunity program proposed in Senate Bill No. 5660 for the purpose of recommending improvements or enhancements to promote equitable access to a potential legal psilocybin industry within an operable administrative framework;

(iv) Assess functional requirements of Senate Bill No. 5660 that would exceed the expertise and capacity of the department of health and identify opportunities for development or collaboration with other state agencies and entities to meet the requirements; and

(v) Discuss options to integrate licensed behavioral health professionals into the practice of psilocybin therapy under the framework of Senate Bill No. 5660 where appropriate.

(g) The department of health, liquor and cannabis board, and department of agriculture must provide subject matter expertise and support to stakeholder group and any subcommittee meetings of the stakeholder group. For the department of health, subject matter expertise includes an individual or individuals with knowledge and experience with rulemaking, with the regulation of health professionals, and with the regulation of health facilities.

(h) Meetings of the stakeholder group under this section shall be open to participation by members of the public.

(i) Stakeholder group members participating on behalf of an employer, governmental entity, or other organization are not entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses if they are elected officials or are participating on behalf of an employer, governmental entity, or other organization. Any reimbursement for other nonlegislative members is subject to chapter 43.03 RCW.

(((100)))(97) $24,600,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the authority to provide one-time funding to community health centers paid under either APM3 or APM4 that experienced overpayments because of COVID-19 service-related reductions or had funds withheld due to missing targeted benchmarks because of extraordinary community pandemic response needs in calendar year 2020.

(((101)))(98) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $250,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for project management and contracting to assist the authority with post-eligibility review planning in anticipation of the end of the COVID-19 public health emergency.

(((102)))(99) $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, $80,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation, and $320,000 of the telebehavioral access account—state appropriation are provided solely for additional staff support for the mental health referral service for children and teens.

(((103)))(100)(a) $2,087,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the authority to establish a two-year grant program for reimbursement for services to patients up to age 18 provided by community health workers in primary care clinics whose patients are significantly comprised of pediatric patients enrolled in medical assistance under chapter 74.09 RCW beginning January 1, 2023. Community health workers funded under this subsection may provide outreach, informal counseling, and social supports for health-related social needs. The authority shall seek a state plan amendment or federal demonstration waiver should they determine these services are eligible for federal matching funds. Within the amounts provided within this subsection, the authority will provide an initial report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by January 1, 2024, and a final report by January 1, 2025. The report shall include, but not be limited to, the quantitative impacts of the grant program, how many community health workers are participating in the grant program, how many clinics these community health workers represent, how many clients are being served, and evaluation of any measurable health outcomes identified in the planning period prior to January 2023.

(b) In collaboration with key stakeholders including pediatric primary care clinics and medicaid managed care organizations, the authority shall explore longer term, sustainable reimbursement options for the integration of community health workers in primary care to address the health-related social needs of families, including approaches to incorporate federal funding.

(((104)))(101)(a) No more than $156,707,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation and no more than $60,942,000 of the general fund—local appropriation may be expended for an outpatient directed payment program.

(b) The authority shall:

(i) Design the program to support the state's access and other quality of care goals and to not increase general fund—state expenditures;

(ii) Seek approval from the centers for medicare and medicaid services to create a medicaid outpatient directed payment program for hospital outpatient services provided to medicaid program managed care recipients by University of Washington medical center and harborview medical center;

(iii) Upon approval, direct managed care organizations to make payments to eligible providers at levels required to ensure enrollees have timely access to critical high-quality care as allowed under 42 C.F.R. 438.6(c); and

(iv) Increase medicaid payments for hospital outpatient services provided by University of Washington medical center and harborview medical center to the average payment received from commercial payers.

(c) Any incremental costs incurred by the authority in the development, implementation, and maintenance of this program shall be the responsibility of the participating hospitals.

(d) Participating hospitals shall retain the full amount of payments provided under this program.

(e) Participating hospitals will provide the local funds to fund the required nonfederal contribution.

(f) This program shall be effective as soon as administratively possible.

(((106)))(102) $16,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $31,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $420,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a technology solution for an authoritative client identifier, or master person index, for state programs within the health and human services coalition to uniformly identify clients across multiple service delivery systems. The coalition will clearly identify all state programs impacted by and all fund sources used in development and implementation of this project. This subsection is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(((107)))(103) $5,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $22,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $75,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5664 (forensic competency hearings). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((108)))(104)(a) $3,735,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $14,075,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to provide coverage for all federal food and drug administration-approved HIV antiviral drugs without prior authorization beginning January 1, 2023.

(b) Beginning January 1, 2023, upon initiation or renewal of a contract with the authority to administer a medicaid managed care plan, a managed health care system shall provide coverage without prior authorization for all federal food and drug administration-approved HIV antiviral drugs.

(c) By December 1, 2022, and annually thereafter, the authority must submit to the fiscal committees of the legislature the projected and actual expenditures and percentage of medicaid clients who switch to a new drug class without prior authorization as described in (a) and (b) of this subsection.

(((109)))(105)(a) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the authority, in consultation with the office of the insurance commissioner, to complete an analysis of the cost to implement a fertility treatment benefit as described in the department of health's December 2021 mandated benefit sunrise review.

(b) The authority must contract with one or more consultants to:

(i) Obtain utilization and cost data from the state to provide an estimate of aggregate utilization and cost impacts of fertility treatment coverage for medicaid recipients, expressed as total annual cost and as a per member per month cost for plan years 2024 through 2027; and

(ii) Obtain utilization and cost data from the public employees benefits board and school employees benefits board programs to provide an estimate of aggregate utilization and cost impacts of fertility treatment coverage, expressed as total annual cost and as a per member per month cost for plan years 2024 through 2027.

(c) The analysis must include, but is not limited to, a utilization and cost analysis of each of the following services:

(i) Infertility diagnosis;

(ii) Fertility medications;

(iii) Intrauterine insemination;

(iv) In vitro fertilization; and

(v) Egg freezing.

(d) The authority must report the findings of the analysis to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2023.

(((110)))(106)(a) $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for one-time grants for eligible clinics to establish behavioral health integration in primary care clinics for children and adolescents. The authority may award grants of up to $200,000 per clinic.

(b) Recipients may use grants under this subsection for:

(i) Training to create operational workflows that promote team-based care and evidence-based practices;

(ii) System development to implement universal screening of patients using standardized assessment tools;

(iii) Development of a registry to track patient outcomes;

(iv) Behavioral health professional recruitment and retainment;

(v) Psychiatric supervision recruitment and retainment for consultation services for the behavioral health integration program;

(vi) Partnership development with community mental health centers for referral of patients with higher level needs;

(vii) Information technology infrastructure, including electronic health record adjustments and registry creation; and

(viii) Physical space modifications to accommodate additional staff.

(c) To be eligible for grants under this subsection, clinics must have:

(i) At least 35 percent of their total patients enrolled in medicaid. Priority for funding must be given to clinics with the highest proportion of patients enrolled in medicaid;

(ii) A primary care advocate or proponent of the behavioral health integration program;

(iii) Support for the behavioral health integration program at the highest level of clinic leadership;

(iv) An arrangement for psychiatric consultation and supervision;

(v) A team-based approach to care, including the primary care provider, behavioral health professional, psychiatric consultant, patient, and patient's family; and

(vi) A plan to:

(A) Hire a behavioral health professional to be located within the clinic;

(B) Create a registry that monitors patient engagement and symptom improvement;

(C) Implement universal screening for behavioral health needs;

(D) Provide care coordination with schools, emergency departments, hospitals, and other points of care; and

(E) Ensure closed-loop referrals to specialty behavioral health care when indicated, as well as engagement in specialty treatment as clinically indicated.

(((111)))(107) $55,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $122,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 1860 (behavioral health discharge). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((112)))(108) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the Bree collaborative to support collaborative learning and targeted technical assistance for quality improvement initiatives.

(((113)))(109)(a) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $1,500,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority, in consultation with the health and human services enterprise coalition, community-based organizations, health plans, accountable communities of health, and safety net providers, to determine the cost and implementation impacts of a statewide community information exchange (CIE). A CIE platform must serve as a tool for addressing the social determinants of health, defined as nonclinical community and social factors such as housing, food security, transportation, financial strain, and interpersonal safety, that affect health, functioning, and quality-of-life outcomes.

(b) Prior to issuing a request for proposals or beginning this project, the authority must work with stakeholders in (a) of this subsection to determine which platforms already exist within the Washington public and private health care system to determine interoperability needs and fiscal impacts to both the state and impacted providers and organizations that will be using a single statewide community information exchange platform.

(c) Any community information exchange solution must ensure patient privacy and the ability for the patient to self-navigate.

(d) The authority shall provide the office of financial management and fiscal committees of the legislature a proposal to leverage medicaid enterprise financing or other federal funds prior to beginning this project and shall not expend funds under an 1115 waiver or any other waiver without legislative authorization.

(e) This subsection is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(((114)))(110) $226,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, $1,072,000 of the general fund—private/local appropriation, and $2,588,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1866 (supportive housing). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((115)))(111) $8,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for one-time bridge grants to hospitals in financial distress. To qualify for these grants, a hospital must:

(a) Be located in Washington;

(b) Serve individuals enrolled in state and federal medical assistance programs;

(c) Continue to maintain a medicaid population at similar utilization levels as in calendar year 2021;

(d) Be necessary for an adequate provider network for the medicaid program;

(e) Demonstrate a plan for long-term financial sustainability; and

(f) Meet one of the following criteria:

(i) Lack adequate cash-on-hand to remain financially solvent;

(ii) Have experienced financial losses during hospital fiscal year 2021; or

(iii) Be at risk of bankruptcy.

(((116)))(112) The authority shall consider evidence-based recommendations from the Oregon health evidence review commission when making coverage decisions for the treatment of pediatric autoimmune neuropsychiatric disorders associated with streptococcal infections and pediatric acute-onset neuropsychiatric syndrome.

(113) The authority shall seek a waiver from the federal department of health and human services necessary to implement the requirements of RCW 74.09.670 (medical assistance benefits—incarcerated or committed persons—suspension). Additionally, the authority shall explore expanding its waiver application for prerelease services from 30 to 90 days; and provide the governor and fiscal committees of the legislature estimates of any cost estimates for implementation or maintenance of effort requirements of this expansion prior to entering into agreement with the centers for medicare and medicaid services.

Sec. 1212. 2022 c 297 s 214 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY—HEALTH BENEFIT EXCHANGE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$4,881,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($9,547,000))

$7,959,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($54,032,000))

$54,371,000

Health Benefit Exchange Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($80,860,000))

$80,110,000

State Health Care Affordability Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($55,000,000))

$25,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($204,320,000))

$172,321,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The receipt and use of medicaid funds provided to the health benefit exchange from the health care authority are subject to compliance with state and federal regulations and policies governing the Washington apple health programs, including timely and proper application, eligibility, and enrollment procedures.

(2)(a) By July 15th and January 15th of each year, the authority shall make a payment of one-half the general fund—state appropriation, one-half the health benefit exchange account—state appropriation, and one-half the health care affordability account—state appropriation to the exchange. By July 15, 2021, the authority shall make the payments of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA) and the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) to the exchange.

(b) The exchange shall monitor actual to projected revenues and make necessary adjustments in expenditures or carrier assessments to ensure expenditures do not exceed actual revenues.

(c) Payments made from general fund—state appropriation and health benefit exchange account—state appropriation shall be available for expenditure for no longer than the period of the appropriation from which it was made. When the actual cost of materials and services have been fully determined, and in no event later than the lapsing of the appropriation, any unexpended balance of the payment shall be returned to the authority for credit to the fund or account from which it was made, and under no condition shall expenditures exceed actual revenue.

(3)(a) $146,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $554,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the exchange, in close consultation with the health and human services enterprise coalition (coalition), to develop a report on the next steps required for information technology solutions for an integrated health and human services eligibility solution. The report must include, but is not limited to a:

(i) Technical approach and architecture;

(ii) Roadmap and implementation plan for modernizing and integrating the information technology eligibility and enrollment system for including, but not limited to, medicaid, basic food, child care assistance, cash assistance, and other health and human service program benefits, beginning with classic medicaid; and

(iii) Discussion of how an integrated health and human services solution would:

(A) Comply with federal requirements;

(B) Maximize efficient use of staff time;

(C) Support accurate and secure client eligibility information;

(D) Improve the client enrollment experience; and

(E) Provide other notable coalition agency impacts.

(b) The exchange, in coordination with the coalition, must submit the report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by January 15, 2022.

(4) $1,634,000 of the health benefit exchange account—state appropriation and $592,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for healthplanfinder enhancement activities. These amounts are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(5) $1,324,000 of the health benefit exchange account—state appropriation and $2,740,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the modernizing healthplanfinder project. These amounts are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(6) $250,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA) and $150,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) are provided solely for pass-through funding to one or more lead navigator organizations to promote access to health services through outreach and insurance plan enrollment assistance for employees working in a licensed child care facility.

(7)(a) $1,171,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA) and $2,595,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) are provided solely for the exchange to implement a health care insurance premium assistance program for employees who work in licensed child care facilities. The general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA) must be expended by September 30, 2022.

(b) An individual is eligible for the child care premium assistance program for the remainder of the plan year if the individual:

(i) Is an employee working in a licensed child care facility;

(ii) Enrolls in a silver standardized health plan under RCW 43.71.095;

(iii) Prior to January 1, 2024, has income that is less than 300 percent of the federal poverty level;

(iv) Applies for and accepts all federal advance premium tax credits for which he or she may be eligible before receiving any state premium assistance;

(v) Is ineligible for minimum essential coverage through medicare, a federal or state medical assistance program administered by the health care authority under chapter 74.09 RCW, or for premium assistance under RCW 43.71A.020; and

(vi) Meets other eligibility criteria as established by the exchange.

(c) Subject to the availability of amounts provided in this subsection, the exchange shall pay the premium cost for a qualified health plan for an individual who is eligible for the child care premium assistance program under (b) of this subsection.

(d) The exchange may disqualify a participant from the program if the participant:

(i) No longer meets the eligibility criteria in (b) of this subsection;

(ii) Fails, without good cause, to comply with procedural or documentation requirements established by the exchange in accordance with (e) of this subsection;

(iii) Fails, without good cause, to notify the exchange of a change of address in a timely manner;

(iv) Voluntarily withdraws from the program; or

(v) Performs an act, practice, or omission that constitutes fraud, and, as a result, an insurer rescinds the participant's policy for the qualified health plan.

(e) The exchange shall establish:

(i) Procedural requirements for eligibility and continued participation in any premium assistance program under this section, including participant documentation requirements that are necessary to administer the program; and

(ii) Procedural requirements for facilitating payments to and from carriers.

(f) The program must be implemented no later than November 1, 2021.

(g) No later than October 1, 2022, the exchange shall submit a report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature on the implementation of the child care premium assistance program including, but not limited to:

(i) The number of individuals participating in the program to date; and

(ii) The actual costs of the program to date, including agency administrative costs.

(h) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the exchange may create an outreach program to help employees who work in licensed child care facilities enroll in the premium assistance program, beginning for plan year 2023, as established in chapter 246, Laws of 2021 (Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5377) (standardized health plans).

(i) The health care insurance premium assistance program for employees who work in licensed child care facilities is effective through plan year 2023.

(8) $136,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $136,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, $254,000 of the health benefit exchange account—state appropriation, and $274,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for pass through funding in the annual amount of $100,000 for the lead navigator organization in the four regions with the highest concentration of COFA citizens to:

(a) Support a staff position for someone from the COFA community to provide enrollment assistance to the COFA community beyond the scope of the current COFA program; and

(b) Support COFA community led outreach and enrollment activities that help COFA citizens obtain and access health and dental coverage.

(9) $142,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $538,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5068 (postpartum period/medicaid) and section 9812 of the American rescue plan act of 2021.

(10) $8,162,000 of the health benefit exchange account—state appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5377 (standardized health plans).

(11) (($50,000,000))$20,000,000 of the state health care affordability account—state appropriation is provided solely for the exchange to administer a premium assistance program, beginning for plan year 2023, as established in ((Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5377 (standardized health plans)))RCW 43.71.110, and this is the maximum amount the exchange may expend for this purpose. An individual is eligible for the premium assistance provided if the individual: (a) Has income up to 250 percent of the federal poverty level; and (b) meets other eligibility criteria as established in ((section 1(4)(a) of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5377 (standardized health plans)))RCW 43.71.110.

(12)(a) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the exchange, in close consultation with the authority and the office of the insurance commissioner, shall explore opportunities to facilitate enrollment of Washington residents who do not qualify for non-emergency medicaid or federal affordability programs in a state-funded program no later than plan year 2024.

(b) If an opportunity to apply to the secretary of health and human services under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 18052 for a waiver is identified or other federal flexibilities are available, the exchange, in collaboration with the office of the insurance commissioner and the authority may develop an application to be submitted by the authority. If an application is submitted, the authority must notify the chairs and ranking minority members of the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature.

(c) Any application submitted under this subsection must meet all federal public notice and comment requirements under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 18052(a)(4)(B), including public hearings to ensure a meaningful level of public input.

(d) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and (($2,891,000))$1,891,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for system updates and community-led engagement activities necessary to implement the waiver.

(13) $733,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for system upgrades necessary for the anticipated expansion of medicaid equivalent health care coverage to uninsured adults with income up to 138 percent of the federal poverty level regardless of immigration status in collaboration with the health care authority.

(14) (($1,000,000))$700,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for one-time activities to promote continuous coverage for individuals losing coverage through Washington apple health at the end of the COVID-19 public health emergency.

(15) $20,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the exchange, in collaboration with the state board of community and technical colleges, the student achievement council, and the council of presidents, to provide educational resources and ongoing assister training to support the operations of a pilot program to help connect students, including those enrolled in state registered apprenticeship programs, with health care coverage.

(16) $5,000,000 of the state health care affordability account—state appropriation is provided solely to provide premium assistance for ((customers))individuals ineligible for federal premium tax credits who meet the eligibility criteria established in subsection (11)(a) of this section, and is contingent upon approval of the ((applicable)) waiver described in ((subsection (12)(b) of this section))RCW 43.71.120.

Sec. 1213. 2022 c 297 s 215 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY—COMMUNITY BEHAVIORAL HEALTH PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$687,270,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($914,234,000))

$891,172,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,876,776,000))

$3,111,080,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($37,675,000))

$37,788,000

Criminal Justice Treatment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$21,988,000

Problem Gambling Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,113,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2022)
. . . .
$28,493,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2023)
. . . .
$28,493,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$131,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($4,728,042,000))

$4,939,397,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) For the purposes of this section, "behavioral health entities" means managed care organizations and behavioral health administrative services organizations that reimburse providers for behavioral health services.

(2) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is provided for implementation of the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States District Court for the Western District of Washington, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP. In addition to amounts provided solely for implementation of the settlement agreement, class members must have access to supports and services funded throughout this section for which they meet eligibility and medical necessity requirements. The authority must include language in contracts that requires regional behavioral health entities to develop and implement plans for improving access to timely and appropriate treatment for individuals with behavioral health needs and current or prior criminal justice involvement who are eligible for services under these contracts.

(3) $23,271,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $30,514,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $11,503,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to continue the phase-in of the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States District Court for the Western District of Washington, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP. The authority, in collaboration with the department of social and health services and the criminal justice training commission, must implement the provisions of the settlement agreement pursuant to the timeline and implementation plan provided for under the settlement agreement. This includes implementing provisions related to competency evaluations, competency restoration, crisis diversion and supports, education and training, and workforce development.

(4) $10,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $219,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to continue diversion grant programs funded through contempt fines pursuant to Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States District Court for the Western District of Washington, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP. The authority must consult with the plaintiffs and court monitor to determine, within the amounts provided, which of the programs will continue to receive funding through this appropriation. The programs shall use this funding to provide assessments, mental health treatment, substance use disorder treatment, case management, employment, and other social services. By June 30, 2023, the authority, in consultation with the plaintiffs and the court monitor, must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature which includes: Identification of the programs that receive funding through this subsection; a narrative description of each program model; the number of individuals being served by each program on a monthly basis; metrics or outcomes reported as part of the contracts; and recommendations related to further support of these programs in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium.

(5) $12,359,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $12,359,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $23,444,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority and behavioral health entities to continue to contract for implementation of high-intensity programs for assertive community treatment (PACT) teams. In determining the proportion of medicaid and nonmedicaid funding provided to behavioral health entities with PACT teams, the authority shall consider the differences between behavioral health entities in the percentages of services and other costs associated with the teams that are not reimbursable under medicaid. The authority may allow behavioral health entities which have nonmedicaid reimbursable costs that are higher than the nonmedicaid allocation they receive under this section to supplement these funds with local dollars or funds received under subsection (7) of this section. The authority and behavioral health entities shall maintain consistency with all essential elements of the PACT evidence-based practice model in programs funded under this section.

(6) $3,520,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the authority to maintain a pilot project to incorporate peer bridging staff into behavioral health regional teams that provide transitional services to individuals returning to their communities.

(7) $95,822,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $116,633,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for persons and services not covered by the medicaid program. To the extent possible, levels of behavioral health entity spending must be maintained in the following priority order: Crisis and commitment services; community inpatient services; and residential care services, including personal care and emergency housing assistance. These amounts must be distributed to behavioral health entities as follows:

(a) $72,275,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $88,275,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the authority to contract with behavioral health administrative service organizations for behavioral health treatment services not covered under the medicaid program. Within these amounts, behavioral health administrative service organizations must provide a two percent rate increase to providers receiving state funds for nonmedicaid services under this section effective July 1, 2021, and a seven percent rate increase effective January 1, 2023.

(b) $23,547,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $28,358,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the authority to contract with medicaid managed care organizations for wraparound services to medicaid enrolled individuals that are not covered under the medicaid program and for the state share of costs for exceptional medicaid behavioral health personal care services. Within the amounts provided in this subsection:

(i) Medicaid managed care organizations must provide a two percent rate increase to providers receiving state funding for nonmedicaid services under this section effective July 1, 2021, and a seven percent rate increase effective January 1, 2023.

(ii) The authority shall assure that managed care organizations reimburse the department of social and health services aging and long term support administration for the general fund—state cost of exceptional behavioral health personal care services for medicaid enrolled individuals who require these because of a psychiatric disability. Funding for the federal share of these services is separately appropriated to the department of social and health services.

(c) The authority shall coordinate with the department of social and health services to develop and submit to the centers for medicare and medicaid services an application to provide a 1915(i) state plan home and community-based services benefit. The application shall be developed to allow for the delivery of wraparound supportive behavioral health services for individuals with mental illnesses who also have a personal care need. The waiver shall be developed to standardize coverage and administration, improve the current benefit design, and clarify roles in administration of the behavioral health personal care services benefit. By December 1, 2021, the authority, in coordination with the department of social and health services, must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature which provides the following:

(i) A description of the new benefit design developed for the waiver, including a description of the services to be provided and the responsibility for payment under the waiver;

(ii) Estimates of the number of individuals to be served annually under the new waiver and the estimated state and federal fiscal costs for the managed care organizations and the department of social and health services;

(iii) A comparison estimate of the number of individuals to receive behavioral health personal care services annually under the current benefit structure and the estimated state and federal fiscal costs for the managed care organizations and the department of social and health services; and

(iv) A status update on the development and submission of the waiver with an estimated timeline for approval and implementation of the new wraparound services benefit.

(d) The authority must require behavioral health administrative service organizations to submit information related to reimbursements to counties made for involuntary treatment act judicial services and submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature with complete fiscal year 2022 reimbursements by December 1, 2022.

(8) The authority is authorized to continue to contract directly, rather than through contracts with behavioral health entities for children's long-term inpatient facility services.

(9) $1,204,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,204,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to reimburse Pierce and Spokane counties for the cost of conducting one hundred eighty-day commitment hearings at the state psychiatric hospitals.

(10) Behavioral health entities may use local funds to earn additional federal medicaid match, provided the locally matched rate does not exceed the upper-bound of their federally allowable rate range, and provided that the enhanced funding is used only to provide medicaid state plan or waiver services to medicaid clients. Additionally, behavioral health entities may use a portion of the state funds allocated in accordance with subsection (7) of this section to earn additional medicaid match, but only to the extent that the application of such funds to medicaid services does not diminish the level of crisis and commitment, community inpatient, residential care, and outpatient services presently available to persons not eligible for medicaid.

(11) $2,291,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $2,291,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for mental health services for mentally ill offenders while confined in a county or city jail and for facilitating access to programs that offer mental health services upon release from confinement. The authority must collect information from the behavioral health entities on their plan for using these funds, the numbers of individuals served, and the types of services provided and submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1st of each year of the biennium.

(12) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is provided for the authority to develop and phase in intensive mental health services for high needs youth consistent with the settlement agreement in T.R. v. Dreyfus and Porter.

(13) The authority must establish minimum and maximum funding levels for all reserves allowed under behavioral health administrative service organization contracts and include contract language that clearly states the requirements and limitations. The authority must monitor and ensure that behavioral health administrative service organization reserves do not exceed maximum levels. The authority must monitor revenue and expenditure reports and must require a behavioral health administrative service organization to submit a corrective action plan on how it will spend its excess reserves within a reasonable period of time, when its reported reserves exceed maximum levels established under the contract. The authority must review and approve such plans and monitor to ensure compliance. If the authority determines that a behavioral health administrative service organization has failed to provide an adequate excess reserve corrective action plan or is not complying with an approved plan, the authority must reduce payments to the entity in accordance with remedial actions provisions included in the contract. These reductions in payments must continue until the authority determines that the entity has come into substantial compliance with an approved excess reserve corrective action plan.

(14) During the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, any amounts provided in this section that are used for case management services for pregnant and parenting women must be contracted directly between the authority and pregnant and parenting women case management providers.

(15) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority may contract with the University of Washington and community-based providers for the provision of the parent-child assistance program or other specialized chemical dependency case management providers for pregnant, post-partum, and parenting women. For all contractors: (a) Service and other outcome data must be provided to the authority by request; and (b) indirect charges for administering the program must not exceed ten percent of the total contract amount.

(16) $3,500,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the continued funding of existing county drug and alcohol use prevention programs.

(17) Within the amounts provided in this section, behavioral health entities must provide outpatient chemical dependency treatment for offenders enrolled in the medicaid program who are supervised by the department of corrections pursuant to a term of community supervision. Contracts with behavioral health entities must require that behavioral health entities include in their provider network specialized expertise in the provision of manualized, evidence-based chemical dependency treatment services for offenders. The department of corrections and the authority must develop a memorandum of understanding for department of corrections offenders on active supervision who are medicaid eligible and meet medical necessity for outpatient substance use disorder treatment. The agreement will ensure that treatment services provided are coordinated, do not result in duplication of services, and maintain access and quality of care for the individuals being served. The authority must provide all necessary data, access, and reports to the department of corrections for all department of corrections offenders that receive medicaid paid services.

(18) The criminal justice treatment account—state appropriation is provided solely for treatment and treatment support services for offenders with a substance use disorder pursuant to RCW 71.24.580. The authority must offer counties the option to administer their share of the distributions provided for under RCW 71.24.580(5)(a). If a county is not interested in administering the funds, the authority shall contract with behavioral health entities to administer these funds consistent with the plans approved by local panels pursuant to RCW 71.24.580(5)(b). Funding from the criminal justice treatment account may be used to provide treatment and support services through the conclusion of an individual's treatment plan to individuals participating in a drug court program as of February 24, 2021, if that individual wishes to continue treatment following dismissal of charges they were facing under RCW 69.50.4013(1). Such participation is voluntary and contingent upon substantial compliance with drug court program requirements. The authority must provide a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature which identifies the distribution of criminal justice treatment account funds by September 30, 2021.

(19) $6,858,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $6,858,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $8,046,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to maintain crisis triage or stabilization centers that were originally funded in the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium. Services in these facilities may include crisis stabilization and intervention, individual counseling, peer support, medication management, education, and referral assistance. The authority shall monitor each center's effectiveness at lowering the rate of state psychiatric hospital admissions.

(20) $9,795,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $10,015,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $15,025,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the operation of secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities. The authority may not use any of these amounts for services in facilities that are subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions for mental diseases, unless they have received a waiver that allows for full federal participation in these facilities. Within these amounts, funding is provided to increase the fee for service rate for these facilities up to $650 per day. The authority must require in contracts with behavioral health entities that, beginning in calendar year 2020, they pay no lower than the fee for service rate. The authority must coordinate with regional behavioral health entities to identify and implement purchasing strategies or regulatory changes that increase access to services for individuals with complex behavioral health needs at secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities.

(21) $23,090,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $23,090,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $92,444,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to maintain the enhancement of community-based behavioral health services that was initially funded in fiscal year 2019. Twenty percent of the general fund—state appropriation amounts for each regional service area must be contracted to the behavioral health administrative services organizations and used to increase their nonmedicaid funding allocations and the remainder must be provided to the medicaid managed care organizations providing apple health integrated managed care. The medicaid funding is intended to maintain increased rates for behavioral health services provided by licensed and certified community behavioral health agencies as defined by the department of health. For the behavioral health administrative services organizations, this funding must be allocated to each region based upon the population of the region. For managed care organizations, this funding must be provided through the behavioral health portion of the medicaid integrated managed care capitation rates. The authority must require the managed care organizations to provide a report that details the methodology the managed care organization used to distribute this funding to their contracted behavioral health providers. The report submitted by behavioral health administrative service organizations and managed care organizations must identify mechanisms employed to disperse the funding as well as estimated impacts to behavioral health providers in the community. The authority must submit a report to the legislature by December 1st of each year of the biennium, summarizing the information regarding the distribution of the funding provided under this subsection.

(22) $1,401,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $1,401,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $3,210,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of intensive behavioral health treatment facilities within the community behavioral health service system pursuant to chapter 324, Laws of 2019 (2SHB 1394).

(23)(a) $12,878,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $12,878,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided for:

(i) A memorandum of understanding with the department of children, youth, and families to provide substance abuse treatment programs;

(ii) A contract with the Washington state institute for public policy to conduct a cost-benefit evaluation of the implementations of chapter 3, Laws of 2013 (Initiative Measure No. 502);

(iii) Designing and administering the Washington state healthy youth survey and the Washington state young adult behavioral health survey;

(iv) Maintaining increased services to pregnant and parenting women provided through the parent child assistance program;

(v) Grants to the office of the superintendent of public instruction for life skills training to children and youth;

(vi) Maintaining increased prevention and treatment service provided by tribes and federally recognized American Indian organization to children and youth;

(vii) Maintaining increased residential treatment services for children and youth;

(viii) Training and technical assistance for the implementation of evidence-based, research based, and promising programs which prevent or reduce substance use disorder;

(ix) Expenditures into the home visiting services account; and

(x) Grants to community-based programs that provide prevention services or activities to youth.

(b) The authority must allocate the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection amongst the specific activities proportionate to the fiscal year 2021 allocation.

(24)(a) $1,125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for Spokane behavioral health entities to implement services to reduce utilization and the census at eastern state hospital. Such services must include:

(i) High intensity treatment team for persons who are high utilizers of psychiatric inpatient services, including those with co-occurring disorders and other special needs;

(ii) Crisis outreach and diversion services to stabilize in the community individuals in crisis who are at risk of requiring inpatient care or jail services;

(iii) Mental health services provided in nursing facilities to individuals with dementia, and consultation to facility staff treating those individuals; and

(iv) Services at the sixteen-bed evaluation and treatment facility.

(b) At least annually, the Spokane county behavioral health entities shall assess the effectiveness of these services in reducing utilization at eastern state hospital, identify services that are not optimally effective, and modify those services to improve their effectiveness.

(25) $1,850,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $1,850,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $13,312,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for substance use disorder peer support services included in behavioral health capitation rates in accordance with section 213(5)(ss), chapter 299, Laws of 2018. The authority shall require managed care organizations to provide access to peer support services for individuals with substance use disorders transitioning from emergency departments, inpatient facilities, or receiving treatment as part of hub and spoke networks.

(26) $1,256,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $1,256,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $2,942,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to maintain an increase in the number of residential beds for pregnant and parenting women originally funded in the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium.

(27) $1,423,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $1,423,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $5,908,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to continue to implement discharge wraparound services for individuals with complex behavioral health conditions transitioning or being diverted from admission to psychiatric inpatient programs. The authority must coordinate with the department of social and health services in establishing the standards for these programs.

(28) $350,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely to contract with a nationally recognized recovery residence organization and to provide technical assistance to operators of recovery residences seeking certification in accordance with chapter 264, Laws of 2019 (2SHB 1528).

(29) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $1,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to maintain a memorandum of understanding with the criminal justice training commission to provide funding for community grants pursuant to chapter 378, Laws of 2019 (2SHB 1767).

(30) $3,396,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $3,396,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $16,200,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for support of and to continue to increase clubhouse programs across the state. The authority shall work with the centers for medicare and medicaid services to review opportunities to include clubhouse services as an optional "in lieu of" service in managed care organization contracts in order to maximize federal participation. The authority must provide a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature on the status of efforts to implement clubhouse programs and receive federal approval for including these services in managed care organization contracts as an optional "in lieu of" service by December 1, 2022.

(31) $947,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $947,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $1,896,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to implement a statewide plan to implement evidence-based coordinated specialty care programs that provide early identification and intervention for psychosis in behavioral health agencies in accordance with chapter 360, Laws of 2019 (2SSB 5903).

(32) $708,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $708,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $1,598,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementing mental health peer respite centers and a pilot project to implement a mental health drop-in center in accordance with chapter 324, Laws of 2019 (2SHB 1394).

(33) $800,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $800,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $1,452,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to implement the recommendations of the state action alliance for suicide prevention, to include suicide assessments, treatment, and grant management.

(34) $446,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $446,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $178,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the University of Washington's evidence-based practice institute which supports the identification, evaluation, and implementation of evidence-based or promising practices. The institute must work with the authority to develop a plan to seek private, federal, or other grant funding in order to reduce the need for state general funds. The authority must collect information from the institute on the use of these funds and submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1st of each year of the biennium.

(35) As an element of contractual network adequacy requirements and reporting, the authority shall direct managed care organizations to make all reasonable efforts to develop or maintain contracts with provider networks that leverage local, federal, or philanthropic funding to enhance effectiveness of medicaid-funded integrated care services. These networks must promote medicaid clients' access to a system of services that addresses additional social support services and social determinants of health as defined in RCW 43.20.025 in a manner that is integrated with the delivery of behavioral health and medical treatment services.

(36) $500,000 of the problem gambling account—state appropriation is provided solely for the authority to contract for a problem gambling adult prevalence study. The prevalence study must review both statewide and regional results about beliefs and attitudes toward gambling, gambling behavior and preferences, and awareness of treatment services. The study should also estimate the level of risk for problem gambling and examine correlations with broader behavioral and mental health measures. The health care authority shall submit results of the prevalence study to the problem gambling task force and the legislature by June 30, 2022.

(37) $9,000,000 of the criminal justice treatment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the authority to maintain funding for new therapeutic courts created or expanded during fiscal year 2021, or to maintain the fiscal year 2021 expansion of services being provided to an already existing therapeutic court that engages in evidence-based practices, to include medication assisted treatment in jail settings pursuant to RCW 71.24.580. Funding provided under this subsection shall not supplant existing funds utilized for this purpose.

(38) In establishing, re-basing, enhancing, or otherwise updating medicaid rates for behavioral health services, the authority and contracted actuaries shall use a transparent process that provides an opportunity for medicaid managed care organizations, behavioral health administrative service organizations, and behavioral health provider agencies, and their representatives, to review and provide data and feedback on proposed rate changes within their region or regions of service operation. The authority and contracted actuaries shall transparently incorporate the information gained from this process and make adjustments allowable under federal law when appropriate.

(39) The authority shall seek input from representatives of the managed care organizations (MCOs), licensed community behavioral health agencies, and behavioral health administrative service organizations to develop specific metrics related to behavioral health outcomes under integrated managed care. These metrics must include, but are not limited to: (a) Revenues and expenditures for community behavioral health programs, including medicaid and nonmedicaid funding; (b) access to services, service denials, and utilization by state plan modality; (c) claims denials and record of timely payment to providers; (d) client demographics; and (e) social and recovery measures and managed care organization performance measures. The authority must work with managed care organizations and behavioral health administrative service organizations to integrate these metrics into an annual reporting structure designed to evaluate the performance of the behavioral health system in the state over time. The authority must submit a report by June 30, 2023, outlining the specific metrics implemented. Thereafter, the authority shall submit the report for the preceding calendar year to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature on or before December 30th of each year detailing the implemented metrics and relevant performance outcomes for the prior calendar year.

(40) $3,377,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $8,027,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the authority to implement pilot programs for intensive outpatient services and partial hospitalization services for certain children and adolescents.

(a) The effective date of the pilot sites is January 1, 2021.

(b) The two pilots must be contracted with a hospital that provides psychiatric inpatient services to children and adolescents in a city with the largest population east of the crest of the Cascade mountains and a hospital that provides psychiatric inpatient services to children and adolescents in a city with the largest population west of the crest of the Cascade mountains.

(c) The authority must establish minimum standards, eligibility criteria, authorization and utilization review processes, and payment methodologies for the pilot programs in contract.

(d) Eligibility for the pilot sites is limited pursuant to the following:

(i) Children and adolescents discharged from an inpatient hospital treatment program who require the level of services offered by the pilot programs in lieu of continued inpatient treatment;

(ii) Children and adolescents who require the level of services offered by the pilot programs in order to avoid inpatient hospitalization; and

(iii) Services may not be offered if there are less costly alternative community based services that can effectively meet the needs of an individual referred to the program.

(e) The authority must collect data on the pilot sites and work with the actuaries responsible for establishing managed care rates for medicaid enrollees to develop and submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature. A preliminary report must be submitted by December 1, 2021, and a final report must be submitted by December 1, 2022. The reports must include the following information:

(i) A narrative description of the services provided at each pilot site and identification of any specific gaps the sites were able to fill in the current continuum of care;

(ii) Clinical outcomes and estimated reductions in psychiatric inpatient costs associated with each of the pilot sites;

(iii) Recommendations for whether either or both of the pilot models should be expanded statewide; whether modifications should be made to the models to better address gaps in the continuum identified through the pilot sites, whether the models could be expanded to community behavioral health providers, and whether statewide implementation should be achieved through a state plan amendment or some other mechanism for leveraging federal medicaid match; and

(iv) Actuarial projections on the statewide need for services related to the pilot sites and estimated costs of adding each of the services to the medicaid behavioral health benefit for children and adolescents and adults.

(f) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $2,850,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to expand the number of pilot sites to a third location. The criteria in (c) and (d) of this subsection shall also apply to this pilot site. Data from this pilot site must be incorporated into the final report required in (e) of this subsection.

(41)(a) $100,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the authority to convene a task force to examine impacts and changes proposed to the use of criminal background checks in employment in behavioral health settings, with the goal of reducing barriers to developing and retaining a robust behavioral health workforce, while maintaining patient safety measures. The task force membership must include representatives from:

(i) The office of the attorney general;

(ii) The department of health;

(iii) The department of social and health services;

(iv) The office of the governor; and

(v) Others appointed by the authority, including behavioral health employers and those with lived experience.

(b) The task force shall consider any relevant information and recommendations made available by the work group created under Substitute House Bill No. 1411 (health care workforce).

(c) By December 1, 2021, the authority must submit a report of the task force's recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature.

(42) $6,042,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $561,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $35,415,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRSSA) are provided solely to promote the recovery of individuals with substance use disorders through expansion of substance use disorder services. The authority shall implement this funding to promote integrated, whole-person care to individuals with opioid use disorders, stimulant use disorders, and other substance use disorders. The authority shall use this funding to support evidence-based and promising practices as follows:

(a) $11,170,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRSSA) is provided solely for treatment services to low-income individuals with substance use disorders who are not eligible for services under the medicaid program and for treatment services that are not covered under the medicaid program. A minimum of $9,070,000 of this amount must be contracted through behavioral health administrative services organizations. The amounts in this subsection may be used for services including, but not limited to, outpatient treatment, residential treatment, mobile opioid use disorder treatment programs, law enforcement assisted diversion programs, contingency management interventions, modified assertive community treatment, trauma informed care, crisis respite, and for reimbursement of one-time start-up operating costs for opening new beds in withdrawal management treatment programs.

(b) $2,407,000 of the general fund state—appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $561,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $3,245,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRSSA) are provided solely for outreach programs that link individuals with substance use disorders to treatment options to include medication for opioid use disorder. The authority must contract for these services with programs that use interdisciplinary teams, which include peer specialists, to engage and facilitate linkage to treatment for individuals in community settings such as homeless encampments, shelters, emergency rooms, harm reduction programs, churches, community service offices, food banks, libraries, legal offices, and other settings where individuals with substance use disorders may be engaged. The services must be coordinated with emergency housing assistance and other services administered by the authority to promote access to a full continuum of treatment and recovery support options.

(c) $1,535,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $10,417,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRSSA) are provided solely for substance use disorder recovery support services not covered by the medicaid program including, but not limited to, emergency housing, recovery housing vouchers, supported employment, skills training, peer support, peer drop-in centers, and other community supports.

(d) $1,100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,750,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRSSA) are provided solely for efforts to support the recovery of American Indians and Alaska natives with substance use disorders. This funding may be used for grants to urban Indian organizations, tribal opioid prevention media campaigns, and support for government to government communication, planning, and implementation of opioid use disorder related projects.

(e) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for a public awareness campaign to educate youth and young adults with opioid use disorders about harm reduction, secondary prevention, overdose awareness, fentanyl, and naloxone.

(f) $7,083,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRSSA) is provided solely for community services grants that support the implementation and evaluation of substance use disorder prevention services.

(g) Up to $1,750,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRSSA) may be used for the authority's administrative costs associated with services funded in this subsection (42).

(43) $3,109,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $3,109,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for short-term rental subsidies for individuals with mental health or substance use disorders. This funding may be used for individuals enrolled in the foundational community support program while waiting for a longer term resource for rental support or for individuals transitioning from behavioral health treatment facilities or local jails. Individuals who would otherwise be eligible for the foundational community support program but are not eligible because of their citizenship status may also be served. By December 1, 2021, and December 1, 2022, the authority must submit a report identifying the expenditures and number of individuals receiving short-term rental supports through the agency budget during the prior fiscal year broken out by region, treatment need, and the demographics of those served, including but not limited to age, country of origin within racial/ethnic categories, gender, and immigration status.

(44) Within the amounts provided in this section, sufficient funding is provided for the authority to implement requirements to provide up to five sessions of intake and assessment pursuant to Second Substitute House Bill No. 1325 (behavioral health/youth).

(45) $19,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRSSA) and $1,600,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) are provided solely to promote the recovery of individuals with mental health disorders through expansion of mental health services. The authority shall implement this funding to promote integrated, whole-person care through evidence based and promising practices as follows:

(a) $7,303,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRSSA) is provided solely for treatment services to low-income individuals with mental health disorders who are not eligible for services under the medicaid program and for treatment services that are not covered under the medicaid program. A minimum of $6,150,000 of this amount must be contracted through behavioral health administrative services organizations. The amounts in this subsection may be used for services including, but not limited to, outpatient treatment, residential treatment, law enforcement assisted diversion programs, modified assertive community treatment, and trauma informed care.

(b) $6,344,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRSSA) is provided solely for mental health recovery support services not covered by the medicaid program including, but not limited to, supportive housing, emergency housing vouchers, supported employment, skills training, peer support, peer drop-in centers, and other community supports.

(c) $961,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRSSA) is provided solely for efforts to support the recovery of American Indians and Alaska natives with mental health disorders.

(d) $1,346,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRSSA) is provided solely to enhance crisis services and may be used for crisis respite care.

(e) $2,307,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRSSA) is provided solely for the expansion of first episode psychosis programs.

(f) Up to $961,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRSSA) may be used for the authority's administrative costs associated with services funded in this subsection.

(46) The authority must pursue opportunities for shifting state costs to the state's unused allocation of federal institutions for mental disease disproportionate share hospital funding. The authority must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2021, which identifies any activities the authority has implemented or identified to shift state costs to the unused federal funds and an analysis of the fiscal impacts for these activities and options.

(47) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the authority to implement one-time behavioral health workforce pilot programs and training support grants pursuant to Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1504 (workforce education development act). Of these amounts, $440,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $440,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the three behavioral health workforce pilot programs and $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for training support grants.

(48) $1,400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $3,600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the authority to expand efforts to provide opioid use disorder medication in city, county, regional, and tribal jails. The authority must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2021, on the allocation of the fiscal year 2021 funding within this subsection. The authority must provide a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2022, on the allocation of the fiscal year 2022 funding and the expenditures and number of individuals served in fiscal year 2021 by location.

(49) $500,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely to establish an emotional support network program for individuals employed as peer specialists. The authority must contract for these services which shall include, but not be limited to, facilitating support groups for peer specialists, support for the recovery journeys of the peer specialists themselves, and targeted support for the secondary trauma inherent in peer work.

(50) $1,800,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the authority to contract on a one-time basis with the University of Washington behavioral health institute to continue and enhance its efforts related to training and workforce development. The behavioral health institute shall develop and disseminate model programs and curricula to address the treatment needs of individuals with substance use disorders and cooccurring disorders. The behavioral health institute shall provide consultation and training to behavioral health agencies in order to improve the delivery of evidence-based and promising practices and overall quality of care. Training for providers may include technical assistance related to payment models, integration of peers, team-based care, utilization reviews, care transitions, and the infusion of recovery and resiliency into programming and culture. Additionally, the behavioral health institute shall provide continued access to telehealth training and support, including innovative digital health content. The behavioral health institute shall evaluate behavioral health inequities in Washington and create a center of excellence to address behavioral health inequity, including the need for a more diverse workforce. The behavioral health institute shall offer an annual conference on race, equity, and social justice and create a learning management system to provide access to training for publicly funded behavioral health providers across a range of topics. Specific curricula to be developed within the amounts provided in this subsection must include:

(a) A training for law enforcement officers focused on understanding substance use disorder and the recovery process and options and procedures for diversion from the criminal legal system for individuals with substance use disorder, to be developed in consultation with the criminal justice training commission; and

(b) A curriculum for correctional officers and community corrections officers focused on motivational interviewing, recovery coaching, and trauma informed care, developed in consultation with the department of corrections.

(51) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a grant to the north sound behavioral health administrative services organization to provide trauma-informed counseling services to children and youth in Whatcom county schools. The services must be provided by licensed behavioral health professionals who have training in the provision of trauma-informed care. The behavioral health administrative services organization must request, from the office of the superintendent of public instruction, a listing of the Whatcom county schools that are eligible for high-poverty allocations from the learning assistance program and prioritize services in these schools.

(52) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided on a one-time basis solely for the authority to contract with the north sound behavioral health administrative services organization to establish the Whatcom county crisis stabilization center as a pilot project for diversion from the criminal justice system to appropriate community based treatment. The pilot shall allow for police officers to place involuntary holds for up to 12 hours for persons placed at the facility in accordance with RCW 10.31.110. The amounts provided must be used to pay for the cost of services at the site not covered under the medicaid program. The authority must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2022, including the following information:

(a) The total number of individuals served in the crisis stabilization center broken out by those served on a voluntary basis versus those served under involuntary treatment holds placed pursuant to RCW 10.31.110;

(b) A summary of the outcomes for each of the groups identified in (a) of this subsection; and

(c) Identification of methods to incentivize or require managed care organizations to implement payment models for crisis stabilization providers that recognize the need for the facilities to operate at full staffing regardless of fluctuations in daily census.

(53) $1,250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the authority to contract with the King county behavioral health administrative services organization to maintain children's crisis outreach response system services that were previously funded through the department of children, youth, and families. The authority, in consultation with the behavioral health administrative services organization, medicaid managed care organizations, and the actuaries responsible for developing medicaid managed care rates, must work to maximize federal funding provided for the children's crisis outreach response system program and submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2021, on the status of these efforts and the associated savings in state funds.

(54) $881,000 of the general fund— state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $881,000 of the general fund—state for fiscal year 2023 are provided on a one-time basis solely for maintaining and increasing resources for peer support programs and for the authority to contract with an organization to assist with the recruitment of individuals to work as behavioral health peers with a specific focus on black, indigenous, and people of color communities. The authority must submit a preliminary report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature on the status of these efforts by December 1, 2021, and a final report including identification of the number and demographics of individuals recruited into behavioral health peer positions by December 1, 2022.

(55) $250,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the authority to provide crisis response training to behavioral health peer specialists. The authority must use these amounts to contract for the development of a specialized 40 hour crisis response training curriculum for behavioral health peer specialists and to conduct a minimum of one statewide training session during fiscal year 2022 and one statewide training session during fiscal year 2023. The training shall focus on preparing behavioral health peer specialists to work with individuals in crisis, including providing peer services in emergency departments, as coresponders with law enforcement, and as part of mobile crisis teams. The training sessions must be offered free of charge to the participants and may be offered either virtually or in person as determined by the authority. By December 1, 2022, the authority must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature on the peer crisis response curriculum and the number of individuals that received training.

(56) $500,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the authority to contract on a one-time basis with the University of Washington alcohol and drug abuse institute to develop policy solutions in response to the public health challenges of high tetrahydrocannabinol potency cannabis. The institute must use this funding to: Conduct individual interviews with stakeholders and experts representing different perspectives, facilitate joint meetings with stakeholders to identify areas of common ground and consensus, and develop recommendations for state policies related to cannabis potency and mitigating detrimental health impacts. The authority must submit the following reports to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature:

(a) An initial report must be submitted by December 31, 2021, and shall summarize progress made to date, preliminary policy recommendations, and next steps; and

(b) A final report must be submitted by December 31, 2022, and shall summarize the analysis conducted by the institute, the process and stakeholders involved, an inventory of relevant cannabis policies in other states, and recommendations for policy changes to reduce the negative impacts of high potency cannabis in Washington state.

(57) $8,197,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $8,819,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $38,025,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to continue in the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium the two percent increase to medicaid reimbursement for community behavioral health providers contracted through managed care organizations that was provided in April 2021. The authority must employ mechanisms such as directed payment or other options allowable under federal medicaid law to assure the funding is used by the managed care organizations for a two percent provider rate increase as intended and verify this pursuant to the process established in chapter 285, Laws of 2020 (EHB 2584). The rate increase shall be implemented to all behavioral health inpatient, residential, and outpatient providers receiving payment for services under this section contracted through the medicaid managed care organizations.

(58) $17,128,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $32,861,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement a 7 percent increase to medicaid reimbursement for community behavioral health providers contracted through managed care organizations to be effective January 1, 2023. The authority must employ mechanisms such as directed payment or other options allowable under federal medicaid law to assure the funding is used by the managed care organizations for a 7 percent provider rate increase as intended and verify this pursuant to the process established in chapter 285, Laws of 2020 (EHB 2584). The rate increase shall be implemented to all behavioral health inpatient, residential, and outpatient providers contracted through the medicaid managed care organizations. Providers receiving rate increases under other subsections of this section must be excluded from the rate increase directed in this subsection.

(59) $1,307,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $5,217,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $6,524,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase the number of beds and rates for community children's long-term inpatient program providers. The number of beds is increased on a phased in basis to 62 beds by the end of fiscal year 2022 and to 72 beds by the end of fiscal year 2023((. The rates are increased by two percent effective July 1, 2021, and by an additional 4.5 percent effective January 1, 2023))at a per diem rate of $1,030 for existing and new beds.

(60) $117,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $251,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $265,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase rates for parent child assistance program providers by two percent effective July 1, 2021, and by an additional 4.5 percent effective January 1, 2023.

(61) $205,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $205,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the authority to contract with the Washington state behavioral health institute to engage consumers, the University of Washington evidence based practice institute, and other stakeholders to review current and emerging data and research and make recommendations regarding best practices for virtual behavioral health services to children from prenatal stages through age 25. This work shall focus on the development of services and supports that deliver clinically-effective outcomes for children and families and identify safeguards for "in-person," "audio-video," and "audio only" modes. The review conducted by the institute shall include the collection and analysis of data about clinical efficacy of behavioral health services and supports through virtual modes and methods for determining and maximizing the health benefits of the different modes. The authority shall submit data required for this research to the behavioral health institute in accordance with federal and state laws regarding client protected information. The department shall submit the following reports to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature:

(a) A preliminary report on the 2022 workplan by December 31, 2021;

(b) An initial report with recommendations for standards of care and best practices for behavioral health services by June 30, 2022; and

(c) A final report with additional refined recommendations and a research agenda and proposed budget for fiscal year 2024 and beyond by December 31, 2022.

(62) The authority must claim the enhanced federal medical assistance participation rate for home and community-based services offered under section 9817 of the American rescue plan act of 2021 (ARPA). Appropriations made that constitute supplementation of home and community-based services as defined in section 9817 of ARPA are listed in LEAP omnibus document HCBS-2021.

(63) $150,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for training of behavioral health consumer advocates. Beginning in July 2022, the authority must enter into a memorandum of understanding with the department of commerce to provide support for training of behavioral health consumer advocates pursuant to Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1086 (behavioral health consumers).

(64) $5,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the authority to maintain funding for grants to law enforcement assisted diversion programs outside of King county established pursuant to chapter 314, Laws of 2019 (SSB 5380). By December 1, 2023, the authority, in coordination with the law enforcement assisted diversion national support bureau, must collect information and submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature on the grant program including a description of the program model or models used and the number, demographic information, and measurable outcomes of the individuals served with the funding provided under this subsection.

(65) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the authority to contract with a statewide mental health nonprofit organization that provides free community and school-based mental health education and support programs for consumers and families. The contractor must use this funding to provide access to programs tailored to peers living with mental illness as well as family members of people with mental illness and the community at large. Services provided by the contracted program shall include education, support, and assistance to reduce isolation and help consumers and families understand the services available in their communities.

(66) $13,374,000 of the generalfund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $15,474,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $13,743,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for increasing local behavioral health mobile crisis response team capacity and ensuring each region has at least one adult and one children and youth mobile crisis team that is able to respond to calls coming into the 988 crisis hotline.

(a) In prioritizing this funding, the health care authority shall assure that a minimum of six new children and youth mobile crisis teams are created and that there is one children and youth mobile crisis team in each region by the end of fiscal year 2022.

(b) In implementing funding for adult and youth mobile crisis response teams, the authority must establish standards in contracts with managed care organizations and behavioral health administrative services organizations for the services provided by these teams.

(c) Of these amounts, $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $1,012,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase capacity for mobile crisis services in King county. These amounts must supplement and not supplant funding to the county previously allocated by the authority under this subsection.

(67) $29,671,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, (($37,628,000))$38,835,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and (($44,606,000))$48,600,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to contract with community hospitals or freestanding evaluation and treatment centers to provide long-term inpatient care beds as defined in RCW 71.24.025. Within these amounts, the authority must meet the requirements for reimbursing counties for the judicial services for patients being served in these settings in accordance with RCW 71.05.730. The authority must coordinate with the department of social and health services in developing the contract requirements, selecting contractors, and establishing processes for identifying patients that will be admitted to these facilities. Of the amounts in this subsection, sufficient amounts are provided in fiscal year 2022 and fiscal year 2023 for the authority to reimburse community hospitals and nonhospital residential treatment centers serving clients in long-term inpatient care beds as defined in RCW 71.24.025 as follows:

(a) For a hospital licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW that requires a hospital specific medicaid inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate for long-term civil commitment patients because the hospital has completed a medicare cost report, the authority shall analyze the most recent medicare cost report of the hospital after a minimum of 200 medicaid inpatient psychiatric days. The authority shall establish the inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate for long-term civil commitment patients for the hospital at 100 percent of the allowable cost of care, based on the most recent medicare cost report of the hospital.

(b) For a hospital licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW that has not completed a medicare cost report with more than 200 medicaid inpatient psychiatric days, the authority shall establish the medicaid inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate for long-term civil commitment patients for the hospital at the higher of the hospital's current medicaid inpatient psychiatric rate; or the annually updated statewide average of the medicaid inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate of all acute care hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW providing long-term civil commitment services.

(c) For a hospital licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW and currently providing long-term civil commitment services, the authority shall establish the medicaid inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate at $940 plus adjustments that may be needed to capture costs associated with long-term psychiatric patients that are not allowable on the medicare cost report or reimbursed separately. The hospital may provide the authority with supplemental data to be considered and used to make appropriate adjustments to the medicaid inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate of the hospital. Adjustment of costs may include:

(i) Costs associated with professional services and fees not accounted for in the hospital's medicare cost report or reimbursed separately;

(ii) Costs associated with the hospital providing the long-term psychiatric patient access to involuntary treatment court services that are not reimbursed separately; and

(iii) Other costs associated with caring for long-term psychiatric patients that are not reimbursed separately.

(d) For a hospital licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW that requires an initial medicaid inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate for long-term civil commitment services because it has not yet completed a medicare cost report, the authority shall establish the medicaid inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate at the higher of:

(i) The hospital's current medicaid inpatient psychiatric rate; or

(ii) The annually updated statewide average of the medicaid long-term inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate of all freestanding psychiatric hospitals licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW providing long-term civil commitment services.

(e) For nonhospital residential treatment centers certified to provide long-term inpatient care beds as defined in RCW 71.24.025, the authority shall increase the fiscal year 2021 rate by three percent each year of the biennium.

(f) Beginning in fiscal year 2023, provider payments for vacant bed days shall not exceed six percent of their annual contracted bed days.

(g) The legislature intends to recognize the additional costs associated with student teaching related to long-term civil commitment patients to be provided in a new teaching hospital expected to open during the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium.

(h) The authority, in coordination with the department of social and health services, the office of the governor, the office of financial management, and representatives from medicaid managed care organizations, behavioral health administrative service organizations, and community providers, must develop and implement a plan to continue the expansion of civil community long-term inpatient capacity. The plan shall identify gaps and barriers in the current array of community long-term inpatient beds in serving higher need individuals including those committed to a state hospital pursuant to the dismissal of criminal charges and a civil evaluation ordered under RCW 10.77.086 or 10.77.088. The plan shall identify strategies to overcome these barriers including, but not limited to, potential rate enhancements for high needs clients. The authority must submit its implementation plan to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 2021, and submit a status update on the implementation plan by October 15, 2022.

(68)(a) $31,000,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided on a one-time basis solely for the authority to provide assistance payments to behavioral health providers serving medicaid and state-funded clients. In prioritizing the allocation of this funding, the authority must take the following into account:

(i) The differential impact the pandemic has had on different types of providers;

(ii) Other state and federal relief funds providers have received or are eligible to apply for; and

(iii) Equitable distribution of assistance including consideration of geographic location and providers serving members of historically disadvantaged communities.

(b) To be eligible for assistance, the behavioral health providers must:

(i) Have experienced lost revenue or increased expenses that are a result of the COVID-19 public health emergency;

(ii) Self–attest that the lost revenue or expenses are not funded by any other government or private entity;

(iii) Agree to operate in accordance with the requirements of applicable federal, state, and local public health guidance and directives; and

(iv) Agree to comply with federal guidance on the use of coronavirus state and local fiscal recovery funds.

(c) Provider assistance is subject to the availability of amounts provided in this subsection.

(69)(a) $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a one-time grant to Island county to fund a pilot program to improve behavioral health outcomes for young people in rural communities. In administering the pilot program, Island county shall coordinate with school districts, community groups, and health care providers to increase access to behavioral health programs for children and youth aged birth to 24 years of age. The grant funds shall be used to coordinate and expand behavioral health services. The grant funding must not be used to supplant funding from existing programs. No more than 10 percent of the funds may be used for administrative costs incurred by Island county in administering the program. Services that may be provided with the grant funding include, but are not limited to:

(i) Support for children and youth with significant behavioral health needs to address learning loss caused by COVID-19 and remote learning;

(ii) School based behavioral health education, assessment, and brief treatment;

(iii) Screening and referral of children and youth to long-term treatment services;

(iv) Behavioral health supports provided by community agencies serving youth year-round;

(v) Expansion of mental health first aid, a program designed to prepare adults who regularly interact with youth for how to help people in both crisis and noncrisis mental health situations;

(vi) Peer support services; and

(vii) Compensation for the incurred costs of clinical supervisors and internships.

(b) The authority, in coordination with Island county, must submit the following reports to the legislature:

(i) By December 1, 2022, a report summarizing how the funding was used and providing the number of children and youth served by the pilot during fiscal year 2022; and

(ii) By December 1, 2023, a report summarizing how the funding was used and providing the number of children and youth served by the pilot during fiscal year 2023.

(70) State general fund appropriations in this section and in sections 219 and 221 of this act are made to address the harms caused to the state and its citizens by the opioid epidemic, and these include appropriations of $13,466,000 attributable to the settlement in State v. McKinsey & Co., Inc.

(71) (($260,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $3,028,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $3,028,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to contract for a twelve bed children's long-term inpatient program facility specializing in the provision of habilitative mental health services for children and youth with intellectual or developmental disabilities who have intensive behavioral health support needs. The authority must provide a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature providing data on the demand and utilization of this facility by June 30, 2023.

(72))) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the authority to continue the University of Washington's project extension for community health care outcomes (ECHO) for:

(a) Telecommunication consultation with local physicians to discuss medications appropriate to patients who have developmental disabilities and behavioral issues; and

(b) Training to both behavioral health and developmental disabilities professionals to support individuals with both developmental disabilities and behavioral health needs.

(((73) $1,991,000))(72) $2,104,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation and (($1,147,000))$1,260,000 of the general fund—local appropriation are provided solely for supported housing and employment services described in initiative 3a and 3b of the 1115 demonstration waiver and this is the maximum amount that may be expended for this purpose. Under this initiative, the authority and the department of social and health services shall ensure that allowable and necessary services are provided to eligible clients as identified by the authority or its providers or third party administrator. The department and the authority in consultation with the medicaid forecast work group, shall ensure that reasonable reimbursements are established for services deemed necessary within an identified limit per individual. The authority shall not increase general fund—state expenditures above appropriated levels for this specific purpose. The secretary in collaboration with the director of the authority shall report to the joint select committee on health care oversight no less than quarterly on financial and health outcomes. The secretary in cooperation with the director shall also report to the fiscal committees of the legislature the expenditures of this subsection and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested by the legislative fiscal committees.

(((74)))(73)(a) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the authority to convene a work group to develop a recommended teaching clinic enhancement rate for behavioral health agencies training and supervising students and those seeking their certification or license. This work should include: Developing standards for classifying a behavioral health agency as a teaching clinic; a cost methodology to determine a teaching clinic enhancement rate; and a timeline for implementation. The work group must include representatives from:

(i) The department of health;

(ii) The office of the governor;

(iii) The Washington workforce training and education board;

(iv) The Washington council for behavioral health;

(v) Licensed and certified behavioral health agencies; and

(vi) Higher education institutions.

(b) By October 15, 2021, the health care authority must submit a report of the work group's recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature.

(((75)))(74) $343,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $344,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $687,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for increasing services to pregnant and parenting women provided through the parent child assistance program.

(((76)))(75) $130,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $130,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for maintaining and increasing the capabilities of a tool to track medication assisted treatment provider capacity.

(((77)))(76) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for grants to support substance use disorder family navigators across the state.

(((78)))(77) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for grants to support recovery cafes across the state.

(((79)))(78) $69,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $63,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $198,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5071 (civil commitment transition).

(((80)))(79) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $195,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $755,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a grant program to award funding to fire departments in the state of Washington to implement safe station pilot programs. Programs that combine the safe station approach with fire department mobile integrated health programs such as the community assistance referral and education services program under RCW 35.21.930 are encouraged. Certified substance use disorder peer specialists may be employed in a safe station pilot program if the authority determines that a plan is in place to provide appropriate levels of supervision and technical support. Safe station pilot programs shall collaborate with behavioral health administrative services organizations, local crisis providers, and other stakeholders to develop a streamlined process for referring safe station clients to the appropriate level of care. Funding for pilot programs under this subsection shall be used for new or expanded programs and may not be used to supplant existing funding.

(((81)))(80) $71,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $66,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $136,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5195 (opioid overdose medication).

(((82)))(81) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the authority to evaluate options for a medicaid waiver to provide respite care for youth with behavioral health challenges while avoiding adverse impacts with respite waivers at the department of social and health services developmental disabilities administration and the department of children, youth, and families.

(((83)))(82) $2,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for grants to law enforcement and other first responders to include a mental health professional on the team of personnel responding to emergencies.

(((84)))(83) $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a grant to the city of Arlington in partnership with the North County regional fire authority for a mobile integrated health pilot project. The project shall provide mobile integrated health services for residents who cannot navigate resources through typical methods through brief therapeutic intervention, biopsychosocial assessment and referral, and community care coordination.

(((85)))(84) $26,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $26,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $48,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1196 (audio only telemedicine).

(((86)))(85) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5073 (involuntary commitment).

(((87)))(86) $349,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $1,849,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $942,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to contract for services at two distinct 16 bed programs in a facility located in Clark county to provide long-term inpatient care beds as defined in RCW 71.24.025. The beds must be used to provide treatment services for individuals who have been involuntarily committed to long-term inpatient treatment pursuant to the dismissal of criminal charges and a civil evaluation ordered under RCW 10.77.086 or 10.77.088. The authority, in coordination with the department of social and health services, must develop and implement a protocol to assess the risk of patients being considered for placement in this facility and determine whether the level of security and treatment services is appropriate to meet the patient's needs. The department must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2022, providing a description of the protocol and a status update on progress toward opening the new facility.

(((88)))(87) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $956,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for wraparound with intensive services for youth ineligible for medicaid as outlined in the settlement agreement under AGC v. Washington State Health Care Authority, Thurston county superior court no. 21-2-00479-34.

(((89)))(88) $38,230,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $18,188,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for claims for services rendered to medicaid eligible clients admitted to institutions of mental disease that were determined to be unallowable for federal reimbursement due to medicaid's institutions for mental disease exclusion rules. Of these amounts, $20,042,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for belated claims for services that were rendered prior to fiscal year 2022.

(((90)))(89) $6,010,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $990,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority, in coordination with the department of health, to deploy an opioid awareness campaign and to contract with syringe service programs and other service settings assisting people with substance use disorders to: Prevent and respond to overdoses; provide other harm reduction services and supplies, including but not limited to distributing naloxone, fentanyl, and other drug testing supplies; and for expanding contingency management services. The authority is encouraged to use these funds to leverage federal funding for this purpose to expand buying power. The authority should prioritize funds for naloxone distribution for programs or settings that are least likely to be able to bill medicaid. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the authority to deploy an opioid awareness campaign targeted at youth to increase the awareness of the dangers of fentanyl. Any moneys deposited into the general fund pursuant to section 126(41) of this act from the Purdue Pharma and Sackler family settlement must be used for the purposes of this subsection.

(((91)))(90) $2,382,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $6,438,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely ((for a transition to bundled payment arrangement methodology for opioid treatment providers. Within these amounts, providers will receive a rate increase through the new methodology and the))to increase rates for opioid treatment program services provided through medicaid managed care. The authority must direct medicaid managed care organizations, to the extent allowed under federal medicaid law, to ((adopt a value based))continue a bundled payment methodology in contracts with providers offering opioid treatment ((providers))services. This increase is effective January 1, 2023.

(((92)))(91) $2,387,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to support the creation of a bridge period for individuals also enrolled in the foundational community supports initiative who are transitioning from benefits under RCW 74.04.805 due to increased income or other changes in eligibility. The authority, department of social and health services, and department of commerce shall collaborate on this effort.

(((93)))(92) $1,574,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the authority to contract with a program to provide medical respite care for individuals with behavioral health needs. The program must serve individuals with significant behavioral health needs and medical issues who do not require hospitalization but are unable to provide adequate self-care for their medical conditions. The program must prioritize services to individuals with complex medical and behavioral health issues who are homeless or who were recently discharged from a hospital setting. The services must meet quality standards and best practices developed by the national health care for the homeless council and may include, but are not limited to, medical oversight and health education; care transitions; and discharge planning to and from primary care, inpatient hospital, emergency rooms, and supportive housing. In selecting the contractor, the authority must prioritize projects that demonstrate the active involvement of an established medical provider that is able to leverage federal medicaid funding in the provision of these services. The authority must work with the medicaid managed care organizations to encourage their participation and assist the plans and the contractor in identifying mechanisms for appropriate use of medicaid reimbursement in this setting.

(((94)))(93) $490,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to create a master leasing incentive program with specific emphasis on Trueblood programs. The authority shall also create a toolkit for use by landlords serving special populations. The authority and department of commerce shall collaborate on this effort.

(((95)))(94) $664,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $154,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to contract for three regional behavioral health mobile crisis response teams focused on supported housing to prevent individuals with behavioral health conditions at high risk of losing housing from becoming homeless, identify and prioritize serving the most vulnerable people experiencing homelessness, and increase alternative housing options to include short-term alternatives which may temporarily deescalate situations where there is high risk of a household from becoming homeless.

(((96)))(95) $6,027,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $2,009,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to create and expand access to no barrier, and low-barrier programs using a housing first model designed to assist and stabilize housing supports for adults with behavioral health conditions. Housing supports and services shall be made available with no requirement for treatment for their behavioral health condition and must be individualized to the needs of the individual. The authority and department of commerce shall collaborate on this effort. The authority and department of commerce shall collaborate on this effort and must submit a preliminary report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2022.

(((97)))(96) $775,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to create a rental voucher and bridge program and implement strategies to reduce instances where an individual leaves a state operated behavioral or private behavioral health facility directly into homelessness. The authority must prioritize this funding for individuals being discharged from state operated behavioral health facilities.

(((98)))(97) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $400,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to contract for a behavioral health comparison rate study. The study must be conducted to examine provider resources involved in developing individual covered behavioral health services and to establish benchmark payment rates that reflect the reasonable and necessary costs associated with the delivery of behavioral health services. The study must include an evaluation of actual medicaid managed care organization payment rates to the benchmark rates and summarize the results of this evaluation. The study must be conducted in a manner so that the benchmark comparison rates are incorporated into a full behavioral health fee schedule that can be used for assessing the costs associated with expansion of services, rate increases, and medicaid managed care plan state directed payments. The authority must provide a preliminary report on the study to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2023.

(((99)))(98) $382,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $254,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority, in collaboration with the department of social and health services research and data analysis division, to implement community behavioral health service data into the existing executive management information system. Of these amounts, $288,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $192,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to reimburse the research and data analysis division for staff costs associated with this project. The data elements shall be incorporated into the monthly executive management information system reports on a phased-in basis, allowing for elements which are readily available to be incorporated in the initial phase, and elements which require further definition and data collection changes to be incorporated in a later phase. The authority must collaborate with the research and data analysis division to ensure data elements are clearly defined and must include requirements in medicaid managed care organization and behavioral health administrative services organization contracts to provide the data in a consistent and timely manner for inclusion into the system. The community behavioral health executive management system information data elements must include, but are not limited to: Psychiatric inpatient bed days; evaluation and treatment center bed days; long-term involuntary community psychiatric inpatient bed days; children's long-term inpatient bed days; substance use disorder inpatient, residential, withdrawal evaluation and management, and secure withdrawal evaluation and management bed days; crisis triage and stabilization services bed days; mental health residential bed days; mental health and substance use disorder outpatient treatment services; opioid substitution and medication assisted treatment services; program of assertive treatment team services; wraparound with intensive services; mobile outreach crisis services; recovery navigator team services; foundational community supports housing and employment services; projects for assistance in transition from homelessness services; housing and recovery through peer services; other housing services administered by the authority; mental health and substance use disorder peer services; designated crisis responder investigations and outcomes; involuntary commitment hearings and outcomes; pregnant and parenting women case management services; and single bed certifications and no available bed reports. Wherever possible and practical, the data must include historical monthly counts and shall be broken out to distinguish services to medicaid and nonmedicaid individuals and children and adults. The authority and the research and data analysis division must consult with the office of financial management and staff from the fiscal committees of the legislature on the development and implementation of the community behavioral health data elements.

(((100)))(99) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the authority to contract with a consultant to develop a Washington state behavioral health service delivery guide. The guide must include, but is not limited to, information on the service modalities, facilities, and providers that make up Washington's behavioral health delivery system. The authority must consult with behavioral health stakeholders and is permitted to enter into a data sharing agreement necessary to facilitate the production of the guide. The authority must publish the guide for the public and submit the guide to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2023.

(((101)))(100) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the authority to conduct a study on involuntary treatment access barriers related to transportation issues. The study must assess: Challenges ambulance companies and emergency responders have in billing medicaid for involuntary transportation services; whether current transportation rates are a barrier to access and if so what type of increase is needed to address this; and the possibility of creating a specialized type of involuntary transportation provider. The authority must also modify the current unavailable detention facilities report to identify whether the reason a bed was not available was due to: Transportation issues; all beds being full at the facility; staffing shortages; inability of facilities with available beds to meet the behavioral needs of the patient; inability of facilities with available beds to meet the medical needs of the patient; or other specified reasons. The authority must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature with findings and recommendations from the study by December 31, 2022.

(((102)))(101) $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the authority to increase contracts for recovery navigator services established in chapter 311, Laws of 2021 (ESB 5476). These amounts must be allocated to increase funding for recovery navigator services in King, Pierce, and Snohomish counties. These amounts must supplement and not supplant funding allocated, pursuant to section 22(1), chapter 311, Laws of 2021, to the regional behavioral health administrative services organizations serving those counties.

(((103)))(102) $4,213,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the authority to support efforts by counties and cities to implement local response teams. Of these amounts:

(a) $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the authority to provide a grant to the association of Washington cities to assist cities with the costs of implementing alternative response teams. This funding must be used to reimburse cities for documented costs associated with creating co-responder teams within different alternative diversion models including law enforcement assisted diversion programs, community assistance referral and education programs, and as part of mobile crisis teams. Cities are encouraged to partner with each other to create a regional response model. In awarding these funds, the association must prioritize applicants with demonstrated capacity for facility-based crisis triage and stabilization services. The association and authority must collect and report information regarding the number of facility-based crisis stabilization and triage beds available in the locations receiving funding through this subsection and submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature with this information by December 1, 2022.

(b) $2,213,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for Whatcom county to establish an alternative response base station. Within these amounts: $1,477,000 is provided solely for facility renovation and equipment; $149,000 is provided solely for acquisition of an alternative response transport vehicle; and $587,000 is provided solely for operating expenses, including personnel, maintenance, and utility expenses.

(((104)))(103) $100,000,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for, on a one-time basis, the authority to address behavioral health treatment access issues resulting from workforce shortages and impacts of the COVID-19 public health emergency. This funding must be used to provide one-time assistance payments to nonhospital-based community behavioral health treatment providers receiving payment for medicaid services contracted through the medicaid managed care organizations or behavioral health administrative service organizations. The authority shall begin distributing funding under this subsection as soon as possible, and shall complete the distribution of funds by October 1, 2022. The authority must distribute funding in accordance with the following requirements:

(a) The authority must enter into appropriate agreements with recipients to ensure that this stabilization funding is used for purposes of this subsection. Prior to the receipt of funds, providers must agree to expend these assistance payments by June 30, 2023.

(b) Allocation methodologies must be administratively efficient and based on previous medicaid utilization, modeled after prior nongrant-based allocations, so that funding can be distributed more timely than through grant or application-based allocations. The authority must consider individuals served through medicaid and behavioral health administrative service organizations contracts in its allocation methodology.

(c) Providers must use the funding for immediate workforce retention and recruitment needs or costs incurred due to the COVID-19 public health emergency. Funds may also be used to support other needed investments to help stabilize the community behavioral health workforce including, but not limited to, childcare stipends, student loan repayment, tuition assistance, relocation expenses, or other recruitment efforts to begin adding new staff and rebuilding lost capacity.

(d) By December 1, 2022, the authority must submit an accounting to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature that includes a list of all recipients of funding under this subsection and the amount of funding received.

(e) Within the amounts appropriated in this subsection, the authority may utilize up to $200,000 to conduct a qualitative analysis of how recipients utilized funds for workforce retention and recruitment, which may include hiring a consultant and a survey of selected recipients. The authority must report on the findings of the qualitative analysis to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2023.

(((105)))(104) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the authority to contract with the University of Washington addictions, drug, and alcohol institute. This funding must be used to develop, refine, and pilot a new, advanced, evidence-based training for law enforcement to improve interactions with individuals who use drugs. The training must be developed so it can be adapted and used statewide to decrease stigmatizing beliefs among law enforcement through positive contact with people who use drugs and improve officer well-being and effectiveness by providing skills and techniques to address the drug overdose epidemic. The institute must develop and refine this training, leveraging prior work, and in partnership with a steering committee that includes people with lived or living experience of substance use disorder and criminal legal involvement, researchers, clinicians, law enforcement officers, and others. The training must complement, but not duplicate, existing curricula already provided by the criminal justice training commission. The institute must pilot the advanced training in a subset of regional law enforcement agencies and evaluate its acceptability and feasibility through participant interviews and pretraining and posttraining ratings of stigmatizing beliefs. The institute must incorporate feedback from the pilot training sessions into a final training program that it must make available to law enforcement agencies across the state.

(((106)))(105) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $300,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided on a one-time basis solely for the authority to explore the development and implementation of a sustainable, alternative payment model for comprehensive community behavioral health services, including the certified community behavioral health clinic (CCBHC) model. Funding must be used to secure actuarial expertise; conduct research into national data and other state models, including obtaining resources and expertise from the national council for mental well-being CCBHC success center; and engage stakeholders, including representatives of licensed community behavioral health agencies and medicaid managed care organizations, in the process. The authority must provide a preliminary report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature with findings, recommendations, and preliminary cost estimates by December 31, 2022. The study must include:

(a) Overviews of alternate payment models and options and considerations for implementing the certified community behavioral health clinic model within Washington state;

(b) An analysis of the impact of expanding alternate payment models on the state's behavioral health systems;

(c) Relevant federal regulations and options to implement alternate payment models under those regulations;

(d) Options for payment rate designs;

(e) An analysis of the benefits and potential challenges in integrating the CCBHC reimbursement model within an integrated managed care environment;

(f) Actuarial analysis on the costs for implementing alternative payment model options, including opportunities for leveraging federal funding; and

(g) Recommendations to the legislature on a pathway for statewide implementation.

(((107)))(106) $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided on a one-time basis solely for the authority to provide a grant to develop an integrative cultural healing model to be implemented and managed by the Confederated Tribes of the Colville Reservation. For the purposes of this subsection, "integrative cultural healing model" means a behavioral health model developed for and by tribal and urban-based Native American partners in eastern Washington. Grant funds must be used for staff costs for implementing the model; acquisition of cultural tools, materials, and other group facilitation supplies; securing access to outdoor environments in traditional places of gathering foods, medicines, and materials; salaries for training time; and stipends, travel, and mileage reimbursement to support the participation of local elders or knowledge keepers.

(((108)))(107) $1,135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $568,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to develop and operate a 16-bed substance use disorder inpatient facility in Grays Harbor county that specializes in treating pregnant and parenting women using a family preservation model. The authority must contract for these services through behavioral health entities in a manner that allows leveraging of federal medicaid funds to pay for a portion of the costs. The authority must consult with the department of children, youth, and families in the implementation of this funding. The facility must allow families to reside together while a parent is receiving treatment. Of these amounts, $568,000 may be used for documented startup costs including the recruitment, hiring, and training of staff.

(((109)))(108) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided on a one-time basis solely for the authority to provide a grant to the city of Snoqualmie to pilot behavioral health emergency response and coordination services through a regional behavioral health coordinator. The regional behavioral health coordinator shall be a licensed mental health or substance use disorder professional who works directly with and accompanies law enforcement officers and fire and rescue first responders to help respond to crises involving persons with behavioral health needs. The coordinator shall plan, implement, and coordinate services related to crisis response and social service needs with the city of Snoqualmie, the city of North Bend, the Snoqualmie police and fire departments, and the eastside fire and rescue agency serving North Bend, and local community services, school districts, hospitals, and crisis response systems provided by King county for the region. The coordinator shall support the social services needs identified through police and fire response in the lower Snoqualmie valley and serve as a liaison between law enforcement, first responders, and persons accessing or requesting emergency services with social service needs. The authority shall collect information on the pilot project and, in coordination with the city of Snoqualmie, must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2023, summarizing the services provided through the grant funds and identifying recommendations on how to implement effective, integrated, coordinated behavioral health emergency response and community care services. The authority must also provide the report to the criminal justice training commission, the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, and the Washington fire commissioners association.

(((110)))(109) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided on a one-time basis solely for the authority to conduct a study and provide data regarding challenges to receiving behavioral health services in rural communities. The study by the authority must review timely access to behavioral health services in rural areas including: (a) Designated crisis responder response times; (b) the availability of behavioral health inpatient and outpatient services; (c) wait times for hospital beds; and (d) the availability of adult and youth mobile crisis teams. The study must include recommendations on strategies to improve access to behavioral health services in rural areas in the short-term as the state works to develop and implement the recommendations of the crisis response improvement strategy committee established in chapter 302, Laws of 2021. The authority must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature with a summary of the data, findings, and recommendations by December 1, 2022.

(((111)))(110) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the authority to contract for services with a statewide recovery community organization. The authority must award this funding to an organization that: (a) Has experience building the capacity of the recovery community to advance substance use recovery and mental health wellness by catalyzing public understanding and shaping public policy; (b) is led and governed by representatives of local communities of recovery; (c) centers the voices of people with lived experience who are touched by addiction and mental health challenges, and harnesses the power of story to drive change in the mental health and addiction treatment systems; and (d) provides free community education, skills trainings, events, and a conference in order to increase the understanding of issues around behavioral health and recovery. Services provided by the contracted program must include education, support, and assistance to increase connection of the recovery community, recovery capital, and knowledge about recovery and mental health resources. In conducting this work, the contractor must engage diverse individuals in recovery, impacted families, and providers from all regions of the state and leverage the assistance of affiliated groups and organizations. The organization must also prioritize diversity, equity, and justice in their work to eradicate health disparities of marginalized communities.

(((112)))(111) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the authority to provide a one-time grant to a nonprofit organization to establish a program to provide pro bono counseling and behavioral health services to uninsured individuals with incomes below 300 percent of the federal poverty level. The grantee must have experience in leveraging local and philanthropic funding to coordinate pro bono health care services within Washington. The authority must provide the funding pursuant to an appropriate agreement for documented capacity-building to begin providing pro bono counseling and behavioral health services no later than April 1, 2023. The agreement must require the grantee to seek, document, and report to the authority on efforts to leverage local, federal, or philanthropic funding to provide sustained operational support for the program.

(((113)))(112) $2,148,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $499,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to contract for youth inpatient navigator services in four regions of the state. The services must be provided through clinical response teams that receive referrals for children and youth inpatient services and manage a process to coordinate placements and alternative community treatment plans. Of these amounts, $445,000 of the general fund—state appropriation and $79,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to contract for services through an existing program located in Pierce county.

(((114)))(113) $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for a contract with a licensed youth residential psychiatric substance abuse and mental health agency located in Clark and Spokane counties for reopening evaluation and treatment units, increasing staff capacity, treating patients with cooccurring substance use and acute mental health disorders, and expanding outpatient services for young adults ages 18 through 24.

(((115)))(114) $4,377,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $919,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1773 (assisted outpatient treatment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((116)))(115) $257,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1800 (behavioral health/minors). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((117)))(116) $115,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $218,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1860 (behavioral health discharge). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((118)))(117) $563,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the children and youth behavioral health work group to consider and develop longer term strategies and recommendations regarding the delivery of behavioral health services for children, transitioning youth, and their caregivers and meet the requirements of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1890 (children behavioral health).

(((119)))(118) $427,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $183,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1905 (homelessness/youth discharge). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((120)))(119) $759,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $759,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to extend continuous eligibility for apple health to children ages zero to six with income at or below 215 percent of the federal poverty level. The centers for medicare and medicaid services must approve the 1115 medicaid waiver prior to the implementation of this policy.

(((121)))(120) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to increase contingency management resources in accordance with chapter 311, Laws of 2021 (ESB 5476).

(((122)))(121) $79,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $78,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1866 (supportive housing). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((123)))(122) $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for bridge funding grants to community behavioral health agencies participating in federal certified community behavioral health clinic expansion grant programs to sustain their continued level of operations following expiration of federal grant funding during the planning process for adoption of the certified community behavioral health clinic model statewide.

(((124)))(123) $12,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5664 (forensic competency programs). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((125)))(124) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the authority to contract with worldbridgers for a peer workforce expansion pilot project to increase certified peer support counselors in Clark county.

(((126)))(125) $48,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $49,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to create a short-term residential crisis stabilization program (RCSP) for youth with severe behavioral health diagnoses. It is the intent of the legislature to fund the contracted costs of these facilities beginning in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium.

(((127)))(126) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to provide information and support related to safe housing and support services for youth exiting inpatient mental health and/or substance use disorder facilities to stakeholders, inpatient treatment facilities, young people, and other community providers that serve unaccompanied youth and young adults.

(((128)))(127) $2,825,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $797,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to contract with opioid treatment providers to purchase five mobile methadone units and to contract for the operations of those units to fill treatment gaps statewide.

(((130)))(128) $3,990,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely with the downtown emergency service center to contract for three behavioral health response teams in King county. These teams must collaborate with regional outreach teams and agencies throughout King county and follow up with individuals after an acute crisis episode for up to three months to establish long-term community linkages and referrals to behavioral health treatment.

Sec. 1214. 2022 c 297 s 216 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$3,220,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($3,630,000))

$3,947,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,706,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($9,556,000))

$9,873,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $1,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5027 (television closed captions).

Sec. 1215. 2022 c 297 s 218 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$38,905,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($51,034,000))

$52,920,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($8,016,000))

$8,519,000

Death Investigations Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,598,000

Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$460,000

Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$10,667,000

Washington Internet Crimes Against Children Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,270,000

24/7 Sobriety Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$20,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($112,970,000))

$115,359,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, are provided to the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs solely to verify the address and residency of registered sex offenders and kidnapping offenders under RCW 9A.44.130.

(2) $3,393,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $5,317,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for 75 percent of the costs of providing 9.5 additional statewide basic law enforcement trainings in fiscal year 2022 and 13.5 additional statewide basic law enforcement trainings in fiscal year 2023. This provides a total of 19.5 classes in fiscal year 2022 and 23.5 classes in fiscal year 2023. The criminal justice training commission must schedule its funded classes to minimize wait times throughout each fiscal year and meet statutory wait time requirements. The criminal justice training commission must track and report the average wait time for students at the beginning of each class and provide the findings in an annual report to the legislature due in December of each year. At least three classes must be held in Spokane each year.

(3) The criminal justice training commission may not run a basic law enforcement academy class of fewer than 30 students.

(4) $2,270,000 of the Washington internet crimes against children account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 84, Laws of 2015.

(5) $4,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $4,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the mental health field response team program administered by the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs. The association must distribute $7,000,000 in grants to the phase one and phase two regions as outlined in the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et. al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et. al., U.S. District Court-Western District, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP. The association must submit an annual report to the Governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by September 1st of each year of the biennium. The report shall include best practice recommendations on law enforcement and behavioral health field response and include outcome measures on all grants awarded.

(6) $899,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $899,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for crisis intervention training for the phase one regions as outlined in the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et. al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et. al., U.S. District Court-Western District, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP.

(7) $1,598,000 of the death investigations account—state appropriation is provided solely for the commission to provide 240 hours of medicolegal forensic investigation training to coroners and medical examiners to meet the recommendations of the national commission on forensic science for certification and accreditation.

(8) $13,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $26,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $12,000 of the general fund—local appropriation are provided solely for an increase in vendor rates on the daily meals provided to basic law enforcement academy recruits during their training.

(9)(a) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to implement chapter 378, Laws of 2019 (alternatives to arrest/jail).

(b) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for evaluation of grant-funded programs under chapter 378, Laws of 2019 (alternatives to arrest/jail).

(10) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs to administer the sexual assault kit initiative project under RCW 36.28A.430, to assist multidisciplinary community response teams seeking resolutions to cases tied to previously unsubmitted sexual assault kits, and to provide support to survivors of sexual assault offenses. The commission must report to the governor and the chairs of the senate committee on ways and means and the house of representatives committee on appropriations by June 30, 2022, on the number of sexual assault kits that have been tested, the number of kits remaining to be tested, the number of sexual assault cases that had hits to other crimes, the number of cases that have been reinvestigated, the number of those cases that were reinvestigated using state funding under this appropriation, and the local jurisdictions that were a recipient of a grant under the sexual assault kit initiative project.

(11) $20,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $20,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a helmet distribution program in order to reduce traumatic brain injuries throughout the state. Of these amounts:

(a) $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a grant to the Washington fire chiefs association to provide helmets to persons contacted by an official of a local fire department for not wearing a helmet while riding a skateboard or bicycle; and

(b) $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs to distribute to local law enforcement agencies to provide helmets to persons contacted by an official of a local law enforcement agency for not wearing a helmet while riding a skateboard or bicycle.

(12) $307,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for chapter 294, Laws of 2020 (critical stress management programs).

(13) $727,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $727,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $248,000 of the general fund—local appropriation are provided solely for chapter 119, Laws of 2020 (correctional officer certification).

(14) $406,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $408,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided to the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs solely to establish a behavioral health support and suicide prevention program for law enforcement officers. The program will begin with grants to three pilot locations and will leverage access to mental health professionals, critical stress management, and resiliency training.

(15) $1,883,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and (($1,986,000))$2,051,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5051 (peace officer oversight).

(16) $474,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $446,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5066 (officer duty to intervene).

(17) $151,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $148,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to support the participation of the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs in the joint legislative task force on jail standards created in section 957 of this act.

(18) $374,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $296,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1267 (office of independent investigations).

(19) $31,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $31,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1088 (impeachment disclosures).

(20) $269,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $261,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of House Bill No. 1001 (law enforcement professional development).

(21) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1054 (peace officer tactics and equipment).

(22) $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1310 (use of force).

(23) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1109 (victims of sexual assault).

(24) $30,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $30,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for additional grants to local jurisdictions to investigate instances where a purchase or transfer of a firearm was attempted by an individual who is prohibited from owning or possessing a firearm.

(25) $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the criminal justice training commission to provide grant funding to local law enforcement agencies to support law enforcement wellness programs. Of the amount provided in this subsection:

(a) $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the commission to provide grants to local law enforcement agencies for the purpose of establishing officer wellness programs. Grants provided under this subsection may be used for, but not limited to building resilience, injury prevention, peer support programs, physical fitness, proper nutrition, stress management, suicide prevention, and physical or behavioral health services. The commission must consult with a representative from the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs and a representative of the Washington state fraternal order of police and the Washington council of police and sheriffs in the development of the grant program.

(b) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs to establish and coordinate an online or mobile-based application for any Washington law enforcement officer; 911 operator or dispatcher; and any other current or retired employee of a Washington law enforcement agency, and their families, to anonymously access on-demand wellness techniques, suicide prevention, resilience, physical fitness, nutrition, and other behavioral health and wellness supports.

(26) $290,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for academy training for limited authority Washington peace officers employed by the Washington state gambling commission, Washington state liquor and cannabis board, Washington state parks and recreation commission, department of natural resources, and the office of the insurance commissioner.

(a) Up to 30 officers must be admitted to attend the basic law enforcement academy and up to 30 officers must be admitted to attend basic law enforcement equivalency academy.

(b) Allocation of the training slots amongst the agencies must be based on the earliest application date to the commission. Training does not need to commence within six months of employment.

(c) The state agencies must reimburse the commission for the actual cost of training.

(27) $1,575,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs to distribute to local law enforcement agencies for training of chapter 324, Laws of 2021 (permissible uses of force).

(28) $2,150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs to distribute to local law enforcement agencies for training of chapter 321, Laws of 2021 (duty to intervene).

(29) $525,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs to distribute to local law enforcement agencies for training required under Substitute House Bill No. 1735 (use of force by peace officers). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(30) $1,050,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs to distribute to local law enforcement agencies for training required under Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2037 (use of force by peace officers). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((32)))(31) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for body camera grant funding to local law enforcement agencies.

(a) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall develop and implement a body-worn camera grant program. The purpose of the program is to assist law enforcement agencies to establish and expand body-worn camera programs.

(b) Law enforcement agencies may use the grants for: (i) The initial purchase, maintenance, and replacement of body-worn cameras; (ii) ongoing costs related to the maintenance and storage of data recorded by body-worn cameras; (iii) costs associated with public records requests for body-worn camera footage; and (iv) hiring of personnel necessary to operate a body-worn camera program.

(c) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall develop and implement a grant application process and review applications from agencies based on locally developed proposals to establish or expand body-worn camera programs.

(d) Law enforcement agencies that are awarded grants must:

(i) Comply with the provisions of chapter 10.109 RCW;

(ii) Demonstrate the ability to redact body-worn camera footage consistent with RCW 42.56.240 and other applicable provisions;

(iii) Provide training to officers who will wear body-worn cameras and other personnel associated with implementation of the body-worn camera program; and

(iv) Agree to comply with any data collection and reporting requirements that are established by the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs.

(e) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs must submit an annual report regarding the grant program to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1st of each year the program is funded. The report must be submitted in compliance with RCW 43.01.036.

(((33)))(32) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to the criminal justice training commission to support an instructor to teach a model use of force and deescalation tactics training to local peace officers across the state. The goal is to establish and disseminate a standard use of force training program that is uniform throughout the state for currently employed peace officers.

(33) $2,225,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to establish and provide basic law enforcement academy classes at two new regional training academies, one in Pasco and one in another location with demonstrated demand. Funding in this subsection is sufficient for 75 percent of the costs of providing two classes in fiscal year 2023.

Sec. 1216. 2022 c 297 s 219 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF INDEPENDENT INVESTIGATIONS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$8,289,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$15,656,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$23,945,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1267 (establishing an office of independent investigations), to create an office within the office of the governor for the purposes of investigating deadly force incidents involving peace officers.

(2) $1,295,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for contracting with the Washington state patrol for laboratory-based testing and processing of crime scene evidence collected during investigations.

(3) $1,173,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,148,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the purchase of information technology equipment.

(4) $251,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for contracted specialized training for investigators relating to death investigations in cases involving deadly force.

(5) $4,723,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided for the office to pay for one-time tenant improvements necessary for a central evidence storage facility.

Sec. 1217. 2022 c 297 s 220 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$12,070,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($27,358,000))

$26,304,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$20,839,000

Asbestos Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$598,000

Electrical License Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($59,225,000))

$59,278,000

Farm Labor Contractor Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$28,000

Worker and Community Right to Know Fund—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,062,000

Construction Registration Inspection Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($30,231,000))

$28,867,000

Public Works Administration Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($11,420,000))

$11,420,000

Manufactured Home Installation Training Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
(($424,000))

$425,000

Accident Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($383,862,000))

$385,328,000

Accident Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$16,071,000

Medical Aid Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($383,187,000))

$383,214,000

Medical Aid Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$3,617,000

Plumbing Certificate Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,481,000))

$3,482,000

Pressure Systems Safety Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,800,000))

$4,805,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($958,273,000))

$957,408,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $4,363,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $4,363,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for the labor and industries workers' compensation information system replacement project. This subsection is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act. The department must:

(a) Submit a report by August 1, 2021, on the quantifiable deliverables accomplished in fiscal years 2020 and 2021 and the amount spent by each deliverable in each of the following subprojects:

(i) Business readiness;

(ii) Change readiness;

(iii) Commercial off the shelf procurement;

(iv) Customer access;

(v) Program foundations;

(vi) Independent assessment; and

(vii) In total by fiscal year;

(b) Submit quarterly data within 30 calendar days of the end of each quarter, effective July 1, 2021, on:

(i) All of the quantifiable deliverables accomplished by subprojects identified in (a)(i) through (vi) of this subsection and in total and the associated expenditures by each deliverable by fiscal month;

(ii) The contract full time equivalent charged by subprojects identified in (a)(i) through (vi) of this subsection, and in total, compared to the budget spending plan by month for each contracted vendor and what the ensuing contract equivalent budget spending plan by subprojects identified in (a)(i) through (vi) of this subsection, and in total, assumes by fiscal month;

(iii) The performance metrics by subprojects identified in (a)(i) through (vi) of this subsection, and in total, that are currently used, including monthly performance data; and

(iv) The risks identified independently by at least the quality assurance vendor and the office of the chief information officer, and how the project:

(A) Has mitigated each risk; and

(B) Is working to mitigate each risk, and when it will be mitigated;

(c) Submit the reports in (a) and (b) of this subsection to fiscal and policy committees of the legislature; and

(d) Receive an additional gated project sign off by the office of financial management, effective September 1, 2021. Prior to spending any project funding in this subsection each quarter, there is an additional gate of approval required for this project. The director of financial management must agree that the project shows accountability, effective and appropriate use of the funding, and that risks are being mitigated to the spending and sign off on the spending for the ensuing quarter.

(2) $250,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation and $250,000 of the accident account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department of labor and industries safety and health assessment and research for prevention program to conduct research to address the high injury rates of the janitorial workforce. The research must quantify the physical demands of common janitorial work tasks and assess the safety and health needs of janitorial workers. The research must also identify potential risk factors associated with increased risk of injury in the janitorial workforce and measure workload based on the strain janitorial work tasks place on janitors' bodies. The department must conduct interviews with janitors and their employers to collect information on risk factors, identify the tools, technologies, and methodologies used to complete work, and understand the safety culture and climate of the industry. The department must produce annual progress reports through the year 2022 or until the tools are fully developed and deployed. The annual progress report must be submitted to the governor and legislature by December 1st of each year such report is due.

(3) $258,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $258,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department of labor and industries safety and health assessment research for prevention program to conduct research to prevent the types of work-related injuries that require immediate hospitalization. The department will develop and maintain a tracking system to identify and respond to all immediate in-patient hospitalizations and will examine incidents in defined high-priority areas, as determined from historical data and public priorities. The research must identify and characterize hazardous situations and contributing factors using epidemiological, safety-engineering, and human factors/ergonomics methods. The research must also identify common factors in certain types of workplace injuries that lead to hospitalization. The department must submit a report to the governor and appropriate legislative committees by August 30, 2021, and annually thereafter, summarizing work-related immediate hospitalizations and prevention opportunities, actions that employers and workers can take to make workplaces safer, and ways to avoid severe injuries.

(4)(a) $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for grants to promote workforce development in aerospace and aerospace related supply chain industries by: Expanding the number of registered apprenticeships, preapprenticeships, and aerospace-related programs; and providing support for registered apprenticeships or programs in aerospace and aerospace-related supply chain industries.

(b) Grants awarded under this section may be used for:

(i) Equipment upgrades or new equipment purchases for training purposes;

(ii) New training space and lab locations to support capacity needs and expansion of training to veterans and veteran spouses, and underserved populations;

(iii) Curriculum development and instructor training for industry experts;

(iv) Tuition assistance for degrees in engineering and high-demand degrees that support the aerospace industry; and

(v) Funding to increase capacity and availability of child care options for shift work schedules.

(c) An entity is eligible to receive a grant under this subsection if it is a nonprofit, nongovernmental, or institution of higher education that provides training opportunities, including apprenticeships, preapprenticeships, preemployment training, aerospace-related degree programs, or incumbent worker training to prepare workers for the aerospace and aerospace-related supply chain industries.

(d) The department may use up to 5 percent of these funds for administration of these grants.

(5) $3,632,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $876,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for the creation of an agriculture compliance unit within the division of occupational safety and health. The compliance unit will perform compliance inspections and provide bilingual outreach to agricultural workers and employers.

(6) (($2,849,000))$1,467,000 of the construction registration inspection account—state appropriation, (($152,000))$78,000 of the accident account—state appropriation, and (($31,000))$16,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for the conveyance management system replacement project and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(7) (a) $4,044,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of the provider credentialing system project and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(b) $336,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation is provided solely for the maintenance and operation of the provider credentialing project.

(8) $530,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $94,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department to conduct infectious disease rule making to ensure the state has general guidelines to follow in the case of an infectious disease outbreak and to provide education and outreach.

(9) $334,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $60,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided for the maintenance and operating costs of the isolated worker protection information technology project.

(10) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to analyze patients who are maintained on chronic opioids. The department must submit a report of its findings to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than October 1, 2023. The report shall include analysis of patient data, describing the characteristics of patients who are maintained on chronic opioids and their clinical needs, and a preliminary evaluation of potential interventions to improve care and reduce harms in this population.

(11) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a grant to an organization in Pierce county experienced in providing peer-to-peer training, in order to develop and implement a program aimed at reducing workplace sexual harassment in the agricultural sector, with the following deliverables:

(a) Peer-to-peer training and evaluation of sexual harassment training curriculum; and

(b) The building of a statewide network of peer trainers as farmworker leaders whose primary purpose is to prevent workplace sexual harassment and assault through leadership, education, and other tools.

(12) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a work group to investigate how to make Washington's industrial insurance system easier to access for employers and hiring entities to provide industrial insurance coverage for domestic workers.

(a) Domestic workers include, but are not limited to: Housecleaners, nannies, gardeners, and day laborers, including but not limited to those who may perform maintenance or repair work in or about the private home of the employer or hiring entity.

(b) The work group shall make recommendations to the governor and appropriate legislative committees on legislative, regulatory, or other changes that would make the industrial insurance system easier for day laborers and their employers to access. This work group will also explore the possible role of intermediary nonprofit organizations that assist and refer domestic workers and day laborers.

(c) The work group shall be comprised of the following representatives, to be appointed by the governor by July 1, 2021:

(i) Two representatives who are directly impacted domestic workers who work for private home employers or hiring entities;

(ii) Two representatives who are directly impacted day laborers who work for private home employers or hiring entities;

(iii) Two representatives from unions, workers' centers, or intermediary nonprofit organizations that assist and/or refer such directly impacted workers;

(iv) Two employer or hiring entity representatives who directly employ or hire single domestic workers in private homes;

(v) One employer or hiring entity representative who directly employs or hires day laborers in a private home;

(vi) One representative from a nonprofit organization that educates and organizes household employers; and

(vii) Representatives from the department, serving in an ex officio capacity.

(d) The department shall convene the work group by August 1, 2021, and shall meet at least once every two months and may meet remotely in order to accommodate the involvement of domestic worker and day laborer representatives.

(e) The work group shall deliver its report and recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than November 4, 2022.

(13) $237,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $184,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for costs associated with the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5115 (health emergency/labor).

(14) $1,228,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $217,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for costs associated with the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5172 (agricultural overtime).

(15) $760,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,393,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5183 (nonfatal strangulation).

(16) (($367,000))$2,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and (($366,000))$3,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5190 (health care workers/benefits).

(17) $1,626,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $288,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for the purpose of providing a temporary 7.5 percent increase to the base rate of pay for the compliance field positions in the following job classifications: Safety and health specialist 3, safety and health specialist 4, industrial hygienist 3, and industrial hygienist 4, who are responsible for inspections, investigations, and enforcement related to the COVID-19 pandemic, not including consultation staff within these classifications. The increase shall be effective July 1, 2021, until June 30, 2023. Expenditure of the amount provided for this purpose is contingent upon execution of an appropriate memorandum of understanding between the governor or the governor's designee and the exclusive bargaining representative, consistent with the terms of this subsection.

(18) $298,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $53,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1097 (increasing worker protections).

(19) $1,360,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $240,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department of labor and industries, in coordination with the Washington state apprenticeship training council, to establish behavioral health apprenticeship programs. The behavioral health apprenticeship programs shall be administered by the Washington state apprenticeship training council. The amounts provided in this subsection must be used to compensate behavioral health providers for the incurred operating costs associated with the apprenticeship program, including apprentice compensation, staff support and supervision of apprentices, development of on-the-job training catalogs for apprentices, and provider incentives for implementing a behavioral health apprenticeship program. In awarding this funding, special preference must be given to small or rural behavioral health providers and those that serve higher percentages of individuals from black, indigenous, and people of color communities.

(20) $65,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $66,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1455 (social security/L&I & ESD).

(21) $584,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $584,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for costs associated with staff overtime affiliated with the state emergency operations center. Prior to utilizing these funds, the department of labor and industries must collaborate with the military department to determine if any overtime costs may be eligible for reimbursement from the federal emergency management agency.

(22) $961,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $169,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for enhancements to the apprenticeship registration and tracking computer system to align data collection with federal regulations and to create functionality that allows for web-based document uploading. This project is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(23) $350,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $350,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for the completion of the licensing and certification administrators IT project to meet the implementation requirements of chapter 277, Laws of 2020 (SHB 2409). This project is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(24) $897,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation is provided solely to cover the overhead rent costs to increase the number of labor and industry vocational specialists embedded in WorkSource offices and to implement a comprehensive quality-assurance team to ensure the continuous improvement of vocational services for injured workers through the workers' compensation program.

(25) $821,000 of the public works administration account—state appropriation is provided solely to expand capacity to investigate and enforce prevailing-wage complaints.

(26) $794,000 of the public works administration account—state appropriation is provided solely for planning and requirements gathering to make system improvements to the prevailing wage program information technology system. Of the amount in this subsection, $300,000 is for two permanent information technology developers to maintain the system. This project is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(27) $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to create and administer a grant program intended to modernize the technology and remote learning infrastructure within existing state registered apprenticeship programs as provided in Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5600 (apprenticeship programs). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse. Grant applications must include a plan to sustain the investment over time. Up to five percent of the total amount provided in this subsection can be used to cover administrative expenses.

(28) $4,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to create and administer a grant program intended to upgrade apprenticeship program equipment to better replicate conditions on the job during the training of apprentices as provided in Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5600 (apprenticeship programs). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse. The grant program is limited to state registered apprenticeship programs. Up to five percent of the total within this subsection can be used to cover administrative expenses.

(29) $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to create and administer a grant program intended to provide wraparound support services to mitigate barriers to beginning or participating in state registered apprenticeship programs as provided in Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5600 (apprenticeship programs). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse. Up to five percent of the amount provided in this subsection may be used to cover administrative expenses.

(30) $12,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for vouchers to cover the cost of driver's education courses for minors enrolled in a state registered apprenticeship program as provided in Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5600 (apprenticeship programs). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(31) $205,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to start conducting a four-year retention study of state registered apprentices as provided in Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5600 (apprenticeship programs). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse. The study shall include the collection of data from all apprentices three months into their apprenticeship to understand challenges and barriers they face towards program participation. The aggregate data by trade must be displayed on a publicly available dashboard. Study data must be provided with apprenticeship coordinators to implement an early response to connect apprentices with needed supports. The department shall submit an annual report to the governor and appropriate legislative committees beginning June 30, 2023.

(32) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to explore requirements needed to create a centralized technical support system for new nontraditional apprenticeship programs to help applicants navigate and start the process.

(33) $207,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5814 (child abuse/medical evaluation). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(34) $191,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5600 (apprenticeship programs). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(35) $454,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5714 (solar canopies tax deferral). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(36) (($412,000))$350,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and (($73,000))$61,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5761 (wage and salary information). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(37) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization that will support development, outreach, and recruitment to provide job readiness skills and apprenticeship training to public school paraeducators to support college degree attainment to become certified teachers. The grant recipient must be a nonprofit organization serving classified public school employees statewide.

(38) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to create a certified nursing assistant model joint labor-management apprenticeship program to address the certified nursing assistant staffing crisis in skilled nursing facilities by improving workforce recruitment and retention, reducing barriers to entry, and restoring the pipeline of entry level health care professionals into skilled nursing facilities.

(39) $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the crime victims' compensation program to pay for medical exams for suspected victims of domestic violence. Neither the hospital, medical facility, nor victim is to pay for the cost of the medical exam. This funding must not supplant existing funding for sexual assault medical exams. If the cost of medical exams exceeds the funding provided in this subsection, the program shall not reduce the reimbursement rates for medical providers seeking reimbursement for other claimants, and instead the program shall return to paying for domestic violence medical exams after insurance.

(40) $454,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1988 (clean tech. tax deferrals). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(41) $6,000,000 of the driver resource center fund nonappropriated account—state appropriation, (($313,000))$2,177,000 of the accident account—state appropriation, and (($57,000))$386,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2076 (transp. network companies). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1218. 2022 c 297 s 221 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

(1) The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The department of veterans affairs shall not initiate any services that will require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys that are unrelated to the coronavirus response and not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys that are unrelated to the coronavirus response, those moneys must be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation that provides appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.

(b) Each year, there is fluctuation in the revenue collected to support the operation of the state veteran homes. When the department has foreknowledge that revenue will decrease, such as from a loss of census or from the elimination of a program, the legislature expects the department to make reasonable efforts to reduce expenditures in a commensurate manner and to demonstrate that it has made such efforts. In response to any request by the department for general fund—state appropriation to backfill a loss of revenue, the legislature shall consider the department's efforts in reducing its expenditures in light of known or anticipated decreases to revenues.

(2) HEADQUARTERS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$4,094,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($4,199,000))

$4,332,000

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$10,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($8,303,000))

$8,436,000

(3) FIELD SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$8,200,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$9,313,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($9,116,000))

$9,679,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$6,730,000

Veteran Estate Management Account—Private/Local

Appropriation
. . . .
$717,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($34,076,000))

$34,639,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $449,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $449,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for supporting the statewide plan to reduce suicide among service members, veterans, and their families. No later than December 1, 2022, the department must submit to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature a report that describes how the funding provided in this subsection was spent, including the numbers of individuals served and the types of services provided.

(b) $233,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $233,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the traumatic brain injury program to reduce homelessness, domestic violence, and intimate partner violence impacts to the behavioral health system and justice system. No later than December 1, 2022, the department must submit to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature a report that describes how the funding provided in this subsection was spent, including the numbers of individuals served and the types of services provided.

(c) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for two veterans service officers, one located in eastern Washington and one located in western Washington, in fiscal year 2022 and for four veterans service officers in fiscal year 2023. In fiscal year 2023, two veterans service officers must be located in eastern Washington and two veterans service officers must be located in western Washington.

(d) $677,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1181 (veterans & military suicide). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(e) $57,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to contract with an entity that provides accredited peer support training for both veterans and community service members. The funding provided in this subsection is in addition to the department's existing appropriation for its in-house peer support program. No later than June 30, 2023, the department must report to the legislature regarding the number of peer supporters trained pursuant to the contract under this subsection.

(4) STATE VETERANS HOMES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$16,346,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($23,581,000))

$21,393,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($110,588,000))

$113,617,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($18,635,000))

$16,847,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($169,150,000))

$168,203,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) If the department receives additional unanticipated federal resources that are unrelated to the coronavirus response at any point during the remainder of the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, an equal amount of general fund—state must be placed in unallotted status so as not to exceed the total appropriation level specified in this subsection. The department may submit as part of the policy level budget submittal documentation required by RCW 43.88.030 a request to maintain the general fund—state resources that were unallotted as required by this subsection.

(b) $234,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $222,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 1218 (long-term care residents).

(5) CEMETERY SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$85,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$124,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($710,000))

$1,060,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($919,000))

$1,269,000

Sec. 1219. 2022 c 297 s 222 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$112,474,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($133,094,000))

$148,049,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($577,500,000))

$576,177,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($248,316,000))

$248,332,000

Hospital Data Collection Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$472,000

Health Professions Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($157,658,000))

$159,886,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$637,000

Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems

Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$10,105,000

Safe Drinking Water Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$7,237,000

Drinking Water Assistance Account—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$20,908,000

Waterworks Operator Certification Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,006,000

Drinking Water Assistance Administrative Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,634,000

Site Closure Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$186,000

Biotoxin Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,727,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($7,750,000))

$7,823,000

Medical Test Site Licensure Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,275,000

Secure Drug Take-Back Program Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,435,000

Youth Tobacco and Vapor Products Prevention Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$3,242,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2022)
. . . .
$10,584,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2023)
. . . .
$11,800,000

Public Health Supplemental Account—Private/Local

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,702,000

Accident Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$368,000

Medical Aid Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$57,000

Statewide 988 Behavioral Health Crisis Response Line

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($10,280,000))

$5,056,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
(($144,364,000))

$182,884,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,470,811,000))

$1,520,056,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department of health shall not initiate any services that will require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department of health and the state board of health shall not implement any new or amended rules pertaining to primary and secondary school facilities until the rules and a final cost estimate have been presented to the legislature, and the legislature has formally funded implementation of the rules through the omnibus appropriations act or by statute. The department may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation that provides appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.

(2) During the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, each person subject to RCW 43.70.110(3)(c) is required to pay only one surcharge of up to twenty-five dollars annually for the purposes of RCW 43.70.112, regardless of how many professional licenses the person holds.

(3) In accordance with RCW 43.70.110 and 71.24.037, the department is authorized to adopt license and certification fees in fiscal years 2022 and 2023 to support the costs of the regulatory program. The department's fee schedule shall have differential rates for providers with proof of accreditation from organizations that the department has determined to have substantially equivalent standards to those of the department, including but not limited to the joint commission on accreditation of health care organizations, the commission on accreditation of rehabilitation facilities, and the council on accreditation. To reflect the reduced costs associated with regulation of accredited programs, the department's fees for organizations with such proof of accreditation must reflect the lower costs of licensing for these programs than for other organizations which are not accredited.

(4) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, and in accordance with RCW 70.41.100, the department shall set fees to include the full costs of the performance of inspections pursuant to RCW 70.41.080.

(5) In accordance with RCW 43.70.110 and 71.24.037, the department is authorized to adopt fees for the review and approval of mental health and substance use disorder treatment programs in fiscal years 2022 and 2023 as necessary to support the costs of the regulatory program. The department's fee schedule must have differential rates for providers with proof of accreditation from organizations that the department has determined to have substantially equivalent standards to those of the department, including but not limited to the joint commission on accreditation of health care organizations, the commission on accreditation of rehabilitation facilities, and the council on accreditation. To reflect the reduced costs associated with regulation of accredited programs, the department's fees for organizations with such proof of accreditation must reflect the lower cost of licensing for these programs than for other organizations which are not accredited.

(6) The health care authority, the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, the department of health, the department of corrections, and the department of children, youth, and families shall work together within existing resources to establish the health and human services enterprise coalition (the coalition). The coalition, led by the health care authority, must be a multi-organization collaborative that provides strategic direction and federal funding guidance for projects that have cross-organizational or enterprise impact, including information technology projects that affect organizations within the coalition. The office of the chief information officer shall maintain a statewide perspective when collaborating with the coalition to ensure that projects are planned for in a manner that ensures the efficient use of state resources, supports the adoption of a cohesive technology and data architecture, and maximizes federal financial participation. The work of the coalition and any project identified as a coalition project is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(7) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the midwifery licensure and regulatory program to supplement revenue from fees. The department shall charge no more than five hundred twenty-five dollars annually for new or renewed licenses for the midwifery program.

(8) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, and in accordance with RCW 43.70.110 and 71.12.470, the department shall set fees to include the full costs of the performance of inspections pursuant to RCW 71.12.485.

(9) $26,855,000 of the general fund—local appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide core medical services, case management, and support services for individuals living with human immunodeficiency virus.

(10) $17,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5018 (acupuncture and eastern med.)

(11) $703,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $703,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5052 (health equity zones).

(12) $79,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $76,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5119 (individuals in custody).

(13) $873,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,577,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5141 (env. justice task force recs).

(14) $13,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $13,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5195 (opioid overdose medication).

(15) $187,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5229 (health equity continuing ed.).

(16) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for a grant to the Pierce county center for dispute resolution to convene a task force, staffed by the Pierce county center for dispute resolution, to review and make recommendations on bringing the current practice of dental therapy on tribal lands to a statewide scale, and on the practice, supervision, and practice settings needed to maximize the effectiveness of dental therapy. The Pierce county center for dispute resolution must submit a report to the legislature by December 1, 2021.

(a) Members of the task force must include:

(i) Three representatives from different organizations that represent individuals or underserved communities, including but not limited to children, seniors, African Americans, Latino Americans, Native Americans, Pacific Islander Americans, and low income and rural communities;

(ii) One member of the dental quality assurance commission;

(iii) One representative from the University of Washington school of dentistry;

(iv) One member from the Washington state dental association;

(v) One member from the Washington state dental hygienists' association;

(vi) One dental therapist;

(vii) One dentist who has or is currently supervising a dental therapist or therapists;

(viii) One representative from a dental only integrated delivery system;

(ix) One representative from an urban Indian health clinic;

(x) One representative from a federally qualified health center or the Washington association for community health;

(xi) One representative from a dental therapy education program;

(xii) One representative from a Washington tribe that currently employs dental therapists; and

(xiii) One representative from a labor union representing care providers that has experience providing dental coverage and promoting dental care among their members.

(b) In addition, members of the task force may include members from the legislature as follows:

(i) The president of the senate may appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate; and

(ii) The speaker of the house of representatives may appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives.

(17) $492,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $492,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to coordinate with local health jurisdictions to establish and maintain comprehensive group B programs to ensure safe drinking water. These funds shall be used to support the costs of the development and adoption of rules, policies, and procedures, and for technical assistance, training, and other program-related costs.

(18) $96,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $92,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for community outreach to prepare culturally and linguistically appropriate hepatitis B information in a digital format to be distributed to ethnic and cultural leaders and organizations to share with foreign-born and limited or non-English speaking community networks.

(19) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to continue the collaboration between the local public health jurisdiction, related accountable communities of health, and health care providers to reduce potentially preventable hospitalizations in Pierce county. This collaboration will build from the first three years of the project, planning to align care coordination efforts across health care systems and support the related accountable communities of health initiatives, including innovative, collaborative models of care. Strategies to reduce costly hospitalizations include the following: (a) Working with partners to prevent chronic disease; (b) improving heart failure rates; (c) incorporating community health workers as part of the health care team and improving care coordination; (d) supporting the COVID-19 response with improved access to immunizations; and (e) the use of community health workers to provide necessary resources to prevent hospitalization of people who are in isolation and quarantine. By December 15, 2022, the members of the collaboration shall report to the legislature regarding the effectiveness of each of the strategies identified in this subsection. In addition, the report shall describe the most significant challenges and make further recommendations for reducing costly hospitalizations.

(20)(a) $65,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a task force, chaired by the secretary of the department, implemented by August 1, 2021, to assist with the development of a "parks Rx" health and wellness pilot program that can be implemented in the Puget Sound, eastern Washington, and southwest Washington regions of Washington state.

(b) Members of the task force must include:

(i) The secretary of health, or the secretary's designee;

(ii) The following members to be appointed by the secretary of health:

(A) Two representatives of local parks and recreation agencies, from recommendations by the Washington recreation and park association;

(B) Two representatives of health care providers and community health workers, from recommendations by the association of Washington healthcare plans from recommendations by the department community health worker training program;

(C) Two representatives from drug-free health care professions, one representing the interests of state associations representing chiropractors and one representing the interests of physical therapists and athletic trainers from recommendations by their respective state associations;

(D) Two representatives from hospital and health systems, from recommendations by the Washington state hospital association;

(E) Two representatives of local public health agencies, from recommendations by the Washington state association of local public health officials; and

(F) Two representatives representing health carriers, from recommendations from the association of Washington healthcare plans; and

(iii) A representative from the Washington state parks, as designated by the Washington state parks and recreation commission.

(c) The secretary of health or the secretary's designee must chair the task force created in this subsection. Staff support for the task force must be provided by the department of health.

(d) The task force shall establish an ad hoc advisory committee in each of the three pilot regions for purposes of soliciting input on the design and scope of the parks Rx program. Advisory committee membership may not exceed 16 persons and must include diverse representation from the pilot regions, including those experiencing significant health disparities.

(e) The task force must meet at least once bimonthly through June 2022.

(f) The duties of the task force are to advise the department of health on issues including but not limited to developing:

(i) A process to establish the pilot program described in this subsection around the state with a focused emphasis on diverse communities and where systematic inequities and discrimination have negatively affected health outcomes;

(ii) Model agreements that would enable insurers to offer incentives to public, nonprofit, and private employers to create wellness programs that offer employees a discount on health insurance in exchange for a certain usage level of outdoor parks and trails for recreation and physical activity; and

(iii) Recommendations on ways in which a public-private partnership approach may be utilized to fund the implementation of the pilot program described in this subsection.

(g) The members of the task force are encouraged to consider grant funding and outside funding options that can be used toward the pilot program.

(h) The department of health must report findings and recommendations of the task force to the governor and relevant committees of the legislature in compliance with RCW 43.01.036 by September 1, 2022.

(21) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a work group to make recommendations concerning funding and policy initiatives to address the spread of sexually transmitted infections in Washington.

(a) The work group membership must include, but is not limited to, the following members appointed by the governor:

(i) A representative from the department of health office of infectious disease;

(ii) A representative from the pharmacy quality assurance commission;

(iii) A representative from the Washington medical commission;

(iv) A representative from an organization representing health care providers;

(v) A representative from a local health jurisdiction located east of the crest of the Cascade mountains;

(vi) A representative from a local health jurisdiction located west of the crest of the Cascade mountains;

(vii) At least one representative from an organization working to address health care access barriers for LGBTQ populations;

(viii) At least one representative from an organization working to address health care access barriers for communities of color; and

(ix) At least one representative from an organization working to address health care access barriers for justice involved individuals.

(b) Staff support for the work group shall be provided by the department of health.

(c) The work group shall submit a report to the legislature by December 1, 2022, that includes recommendations to: (i) Eradicate congenital syphilis and hepatitis B by 2030; (ii) control the spread of gonorrhea, syphilis, and chlamydia; (iii) end the need for confirmatory syphilis testing by the public health laboratory; and (d) expand access to PrEP and PEP.

(d) Recommendations provided by the work group must be prioritized based on need and available funding.

(22) $236,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $236,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to implement Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1152 (comprehensive public health districts).

(23) $332,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,885,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to establish and operate regional shared service centers, regional health officers, and regional coordinators, as follows:

(a) The role and duties of the regional shared service centers shall be determined by the department and may include the coordination and facilitation of shared delivery of services under the foundational public health services, the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5052 (health equity zones), and the development of relationships with other regional bodies, such as accountable communities of health.

(b) Regional health officers and regional coordinators must be employees of the department. The department may seek to colocate these employees with local health jurisdictions or other government agencies.

(c) The regional health officers shall be deputies of the state health officer. Regional health officers may: (i) Work in partnership with local health jurisdictions, the department, the state board of health, and federally recognized Indian tribes to provide coordination across counties; (ii) provide support to local health officers and serve as an alternative for local health officers during vacations and other absences, emergencies, and vacancies; and (iii) provide mentorship and training to new local health officers.

(d) A regional health officer must meet the same qualifications as local health officers provided in RCW 70.05.050.

(24) $34,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $58,000 of the general fund—local appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1148 (acute care hospitals).

(25) $832,000 of the general fund—local appropriation and $554,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1086 (behavioral health consumers).

(26) $21,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1063 (behav. health credentials).

(27) $374,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $362,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1443 (cannabis industry/equity).

(28) $97,000 of the general fund—local appropriation is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1031 (birth cert., stillbirth).

(29) $17,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1007 (supervised exp./distance).

(30) $1,188,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $2,488,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $64,000 of the hospital data collection account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1272 (health system transparency). Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $2,000,000 of general fund—state appropriation is for assistance to 37 rural hospitals that are required to comply with the provisions under the bill.

(31) $71,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1129 (international medical grads).

(32) $2,809,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1139 (lead in drinking water).

(33) $17,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1383 (respiratory care).

(34) $92,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1184 (risk-based water standards).

(35) $516,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,873,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1225 (school-based health centers).

(36) $301,000 of the secure drug take-back program account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1161 (drug take-back programs).

(37) $22,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $78,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed House Bill No. 1311 (SUD apprenticeships/certs).

(38) $17,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1378 (medical assistants).

(39) Within amounts appropriated in this section from the health professions account, the Washington nursing commission shall contract with the state auditor's office to conduct a performance audit, specifically addressing the length of time required to license individuals who come from other states. The audit should address the obstacles contributing to any delay and make recommendations for improvement.

(40) Within amounts appropriated in this section from the health professions account, the Washington medical commission shall contract with the state auditor's office to conduct a performance audit, which must address the length of time required to license individuals and comparatively analyze disciplinary processes with those of other states. The audit should address the obstacles contributing to inefficiencies and make recommendations for improvement.

(41) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the Washington nursing commission must hire sufficient staff to process applications for nursing licenses so that the time required for processing does not exceed seven days.

(42) $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to contract with a community-based nonprofit organization located in Yakima Valley to develop a Spanish language public radio media campaign aimed at providing education on the COVID-19 pandemic through an outreach program. The goal of the radio media campaign is to reach residents considered "essential workers," including but not limited to farmworkers, and provide information on best practices for limiting exposure, preventing transmission, and seeking treatment for COVID-19. The nonprofit organization must coordinate with medical professionals and other stakeholders on the content of the radio media campaign. The department, in coordination with the nonprofit, must provide a preliminary report to the legislature no later than December 31, 2021. A final report to the legislature must be submitted no later than June 30, 2023. Both reports must include: (a) A description of the outreach program and its implementation; (b) the number of individuals reached through the outreach program; and (c) any relevant demographic data regarding those individuals.

(43) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $725,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the Washington poison center. This funding is provided in addition to funding pursuant to RCW 69.50.540.

(44) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to contract with a community-based nonprofit organization located in Yakima Valley to develop a Spanish-language public radio media campaign aimed at preventing opioid use disorders through education outreach programs. The goal of the radio media campaign is reaching underserved populations, who may have limited literacy and who may experience cultural and informational isolation, to address prevention, education and treatment for opioid users or those at risk for opioid use. The nonprofit organization must coordinate with stakeholders who are engaged in promoting healthy and educated choices about drug use and abuse to host four workshops and two conferences that present the latest research and best practices. The department, in coordination with the nonprofit, must provide a preliminary report to the legislature no later than December 31, 2022. A final report must be submitted to the legislature no later than June 30, 2023. Both reports must include: (a) A description of the outreach programs and their implementation; (b) a description of the workshops and conferences held; (c) the number of individuals who participated in or received services in relation to the outreach programs; and (d) any relevant demographic data regarding those individuals.

(45) $2,122,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $2,122,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the ongoing operations and maintenance of the prescription monitoring program maintained by the department.

(46) $2,325,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $2,625,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for:

(a) Staffing by the department, the department of veterans affairs, and the department of corrections to expand statewide suicide prevention efforts, which efforts include suicide prevention efforts for military service members and veterans and incarcerated persons;

(b) A suicide prevention public awareness campaign to provide education regarding the signs of suicide, interventions, and resources for support;

(c) Additional staffing for call centers to support the increased volume of calls to suicide hotlines;

(d) Training for first responders to identify and respond to individuals experiencing suicidal ideation;

(e) Support for tribal suicide prevention efforts;

(f) Strengthening behavioral health and suicide prevention efforts in the agricultural sector;

(g) Support for the three priority areas of the governor's challenge regarding identifying suicide risk among service members and their families, increasing the awareness of resources available to service members and their families, and lethal means safety planning;

(h) Expansion of training for community health workers to include culturally informed training for suicide prevention;

(i) Coordination with the office of the superintendent of public instruction; and

(j) Support for the suicide prevention initiative housed in the University of Washington.

(47) $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the fruit and vegetable incentive program.

(48) $474,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 1218 (long-term care residents).

(49) $1,779,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 1504 (workforce education development act).

(50) $627,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $627,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to implement the recommendations from the community health workers task force to provide statewide leadership, training, and integration of community health workers with insurers, health care providers, and public health systems.

(51) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for one-time grants to family planning clinics that are at risk of imminent closure, did not receive a paycheck protection program loan, and are ineligible for funding through the coronavirus aid, relief, and economic security (CARES) act or the coronavirus response and relief supplemental appropriations act of 2021 (CRRSA).

(52) $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the nursing care quality assurance commission, in collaboration with the workforce training and education coordinating board and the department of labor and industries, to plan a home care aide to nursing assistant certified to licensed practical nurse (HCA-NAC-LPN) apprenticeship pathway. The plan must provide the necessary groundwork for the launch of at least three licensed practical nurse apprenticeship programs in the next phase of work. The plan for the apprenticeship programs must include programs in at least three geographically disparate areas of the state experiencing high levels of long-term care workforce shortages for corresponding health professions and incorporate the participation of local workforce development councils for implementation.

(53) $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $23,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation are provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5124 (colon hydrotherapy).

(54) $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and (($3,000,000))$6,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the Washington nursing commission to manage a grant process to incentivize nurses to supervise nursing students in health care settings. The goal of the grant program is to create more clinical placements for nursing students to complete required clinical hours to earn their nursing degree and related licensure.

(55) $761,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the Washington nursing commission to continue to implement virtual nursing assistant training and testing modalities, create an apprenticeship pathway into nursing for nursing assistants, implement rule changes to support a career path for nursing assistants, and collaborate with the workforce training and educational coordinating board on a pilot project to transform the culture and practice in long term care settings. The goal of these activities is to expand the nursing workforce for long term care settings.

(((57)))(56) $212,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5821 (cardiac & stroke response). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((58)))(57) $41,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $777,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1859 (cannabis analysis labs). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((59)))(58) $223,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $186,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to test for lead in child care facilities to prevent child lead exposure and to research, identify, and connect facilities to financial resources available for remediation costs.

(((60)))(59) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to provide a grant to a statewide community based environmental justice organization to establish an environmental justice community participation fund. The participation fund must allocate the funding as grants to community-based organizations serving vulnerable populations in highly impacted communities in rural and urban areas for the purpose of supporting their communities' access, understanding, and participation in environmental justice council deliberations and the implementation of chapter 70A.02 RCW.

(((61)))(60) $2,488,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for additional resources for the department to issue provider credentials within seven calendar days of receiving a complete application.

(((62)))(61) $532,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to create a program within the office of drinking water to offer engineering assistance to nonfluoridated water systems with over 5,000 connections. The program will assist water systems to plan for future community water fluoridation.

(((63)))(62) $74,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1881 (birth doulas). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((64)))(63) $121,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to expand access to the smoking cessation quitline, implement electronic referrals to the quitline, and provide grants to develop messaging related to smoking cessation.

(((65)))(64) $7,400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for one-time grants to providers of abortion care that participate in the department's family planning and reproductive health program and which experienced drops in patient visit volume during the pandemic in order to maintain the availability of services for low-income Washingtonians.

(((66)))(65) $268,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5753 (board & commission sizes). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((67)))(66) $166,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to conduct an oral health equity assessment. The department must use available data and community needs assessments to identify unmet oral health needs and develop recommendations to advance positive oral health outcomes while reducing inequities through increased access to community water fluoridation. The department must consult with the state office of equity and may collaborate with public health oral health care providers and community-based organizations to conduct the assessment and develop recommendations. The department must submit the oral health equity assessment report and recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2023.

(((68)))(67) $14,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5496 (health prof. monitoring). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((69) $100,000))(68) $173,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to convene a nonregulatory stakeholder forum to discuss solutions to per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances (PFAS) chemical contamination of surface and groundwater.

(((70)))(69) $19,088,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the costs of public health data systems and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(((71)))(70) $814,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to expand grants to establish new school-based health centers and to add behavioral health capacity to existing school-based health centers.

(((72)))(71) $54,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to coordinate and lead a multi-agency approach to youth suicide prevention and intervention.

(((73)))(72) $654,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department, in collaboration with an organization that represents pediatric care needs in Washington state, to establish a curriculum and provide training for community health workers in primary care clinics whose patients are significantly comprised of pediatric patients enrolled in medical assistance under chapter 74.09 RCW, beginning January 1, 2023, in support of the health care authority's two-year grant program. The department will coordinate ongoing curriculum development meetings with the relational health training work group.

(((74)))(73) $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for a grant to the greater Columbia accountable community of health to develop and implement an innovative emergency medical services program to bridge the gap of unmet health care needs in the community.

(((75)))(74) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for a grant to cancer pathways to provide statewide education and support for adults, children, and families impacted by cancer, including support groups, camps for kids impacted by cancer, and risk reduction education for teens.

(((76)))(75) $66,956,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the department's continued vaccine administration efforts, including mass vaccination sites where needed and pass-through contracts with local health jurisdictions. If the federal emergency management agency reimbursement at full cost for eligible activities is renewed beyond June 30, 2022, the department must conserve this appropriation and maximize the use of federal reimbursements. The legislature intends this funding to be sufficient to cover the department's vaccine administration activities through January 1, 2023. By October 1, 2022, the department must submit a report to the health care and fiscal committees of the legislature detailing a cost-based COVID-19 vaccine administration fiscal response plan for the remainder of the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium as well as any vaccine administration costs the department projects into the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium. This report must include a funding strategy for specific agency COVID-19 vaccine administration initiatives, including, but not limited to, mass vaccination sites, primary care provider outreach, mobile vaccination administration, and outreach. This report must also include specific and itemized individual local health jurisdiction initiatives in which the department has or plans to request funding from the legislature on behalf of the local health jurisdiction.

(((77)))(76) $58,320,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the department to respond to the COVID-19 pandemic through means including diagnostic testing, case investigation, outbreak response, care coordination, community outreach, operational and technical support, disease surveillance, client services, and support for local health jurisdictions and tribes. If the federal emergency management agency reimbursement at full cost for eligible activities is renewed beyond June 30, 2022, the department must conserve this appropriation and maximize the use of federal reimbursements. The legislature intends this funding to be sufficient to cover the department's response through January 1, 2023, at which point the legislature plans to reevaluate the scope of the public health threat posed by COVID-19. By October 1, 2022, the department must submit a report to the health care and fiscal committees of the legislature detailing a cost-based COVID-19 fiscal response plan for the remainder of the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium as well as any costs the department projects into the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium. This report must include a funding strategy for specific agency COVID-19 response initiatives, including, but not limited to, mass testing sites, testing contracts, laboratory and scientific analysis, and other agency initiatives in response to the pandemic. This report must also include specific and itemized individual local health jurisdiction initiatives in which the department has or plans to request funding from the legislature on behalf of the local health jurisdiction.

(77) $38,520,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to respond to the COVID-19 pandemic and continue vaccination administration efforts. The department must conserve this appropriation and maximize the use of federal reimbursements, including seeking federal emergency management agency reimbursement for eligible activities.

(78) $5,517,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to respond to the monkey pox virus. The department must conserve this appropriation and maximize the use of federal reimbursements.

(((78)))(79) $85,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5518 (OT licensure compact). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((79)))(80) $91,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5702 (donor human milk coverage). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((80)))(81) $22,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5765 (midwifery). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(82) $39,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5974 (transportation resources). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(83) $428,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $855,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the continued operations of the Washington medical coordination center.

(84) $17,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to conduct a survey of home care and home health agencies as defined in RCW 70.127.010, to gather financial information for tax or fee planning purposes, including but not limited to total by service line. Any such financial information reported must be de-identified so it does not identify individual recipients of care. The department shall provide this information to the department of social and health services and service employees international union 775 for analysis upon completion of the survey.

(85) $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to conduct a mass public awareness campaign targeted at alerting the public to the dangers caused by methamphetamines and fentanyl, including outreach to both youth and adults aimed at preventing addiction and overdose deaths.

(((87)))(86) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to provide a grant to a community organization in Greenwater to establish temporary portable toilets to be accessible to tourists and other individuals traveling on state route 410.

(((88)))(87) $552,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 203, Laws of 2021 (long-term services/emergency).

(((89)))(88) $48,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $7,000 of the general fund—private/local appropriation are provided solely to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 1210 (cannabis terminology). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((90)))(89) $88,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $44,000 of the hospital data collection account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1616 (charity care). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((91)))(90) $17,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1675 (dialysate & dialysis devices). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((92)))(91) $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1074 (fatality reviews). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((93)))(92) $44,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1739 (hospital policies/pathogens). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((94)))(93) $17,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1124 (nurse delegation/glucose). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((95)))(94) $243,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1286 (psychology compact). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((96)))(95)(a) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to contract with the department of environmental and occupational health sciences within the University of Washington to develop a report to the legislature regarding school environmental health policies, recommendations, and standards. In developing the report, the department of environmental and occupational health sciences shall collaborate with other school of public health programs within the University of Washington, the department of health, and the department of ecology.

(b) The report shall include:

(i) A review of policies and regulations in other states pertaining to environmental health in K-12 schools;

(ii) Literature and recommendations for exposure standards and remediation levels which are protective of health and safety for students in schools;

(iii) A summarization of activities, such as inspections, management, control levels, and remediation of a variety of contaminants and issues, including PCBs, lead, asbestos, poor ventilation, and mold; and

(iv) Recommendations for next steps for policies and standards in Washington schools.

(c) The report is due by December 31, 2022.

(((97)))(96) $680,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to establish a stipend program for licensed nurses to receive reimbursement of up to $2,500 to cover eligible expenses incurred in order to complete the training necessary to become a certified sexual assault nurse examiner.

(((98)))(97) $408,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to establish a grant program for hospitals to obtain the services of a certified sexual assault nurse examiner from other sources if the hospital does not have those services available internally.

(((99)))(98) $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for tobacco, vapor product, and nicotine control, cessation, treatment and prevention, and other substance use prevention and education, with an emphasis on community-based strategies. These strategies must include programs that consider the disparate impacts of nicotine addiction on specific populations, including youth and racial or other disparities.

(((100)))(99) $550,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a one-time contract with the Yakima neighborhood health services to increase the number of certified and licensed health professionals practicing in community health centers serving low-income and rural populations. The amounts provided in this subsection must be used to support faculty, training, and scholarship costs for a newly established, one-year advanced registered nurse practitioner (ARNP) residency program in Yakima.

(((101)))(100) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the child profile health promotion notification system. Pursuant to the department's recommendation in its December 2020 report, which reviewed its processes for efficiencies and possible technological advances to reduce costs, the department must further explore how to integrate a fee to support the program in the future. A report regarding the department's further exploration of a fee to support the program is due to the legislature by December 15, 2022.

(((102)))(101) This section includes a general fund—federal appropriation (CRF) that is provided solely for COVID-19 response activities including staffing, increased travel, equipment, and grants to local health jurisdictions and tribes, and to manage hospital capacity issues. This funding expires December 31, 2021.

(((103)))(102) $1,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $117,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of chapter 316, Laws of 2021 (climate commitment act).

(((104)))(103) $1,084,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5796 (cannabis revenue).

(((105)))(104) $34,000 of the general fund—private/local appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5695 (DOC body scanner pilot). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(105) $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for grants to providers of abortion care that participate in the department's sexual and reproductive health program and are experiencing an increase in clients seeking abortion services resulting from the decision in Dobbs v. Jackson Women's Health Organization, which changed abortion access nationally, and to maintain the availability of services for low-income people in Washington.

Sec. 1220. 2022 c 297 s 223 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

(1)(a) The appropriations to the department of corrections in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, ((2022))2023, unless prohibited by this act, the department may transfer general fund—state appropriations for fiscal year ((2022))2023 among programs after approval by the director of the office of financial management. The department of corrections must notify the fiscal committees of the legislature prior to receiving approval from the director of financial management. To the extent that appropriations under this section are insufficient to fund actual expenditures in excess of caseload forecast assumptions or for expenses in response to the COVID-19 pandemic, the department may transfer general fund—state appropriations for fiscal year ((2022))2023 that are provided solely for a specified purpose. The department may not transfer funds, including for expenses in response to the COVID-19 pandemic in fiscal year ((2022))2023, and the director of financial management shall not approve the transfer, unless the transfer is consistent with the objective of conserving, to the maximum extent possible, the expenditure of state funds. The director of the office of financial management shall notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature in writing seven days prior to approving any allotment modifications or transfers under this section. The written notification must include a narrative explanation and justification of the changes, along with expenditures and allotments by budget unit and appropriation, both before and after any allotment modifications or transfers.

(b) The health care authority, the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, the department of health, the department of corrections, and the department of children, youth, and families shall work together within existing resources to establish the health and human services enterprise coalition (the coalition). The coalition, led by the health care authority, must be a multiorganization collaborative that provides strategic direction and federal funding guidance for projects that have cross-organizational or enterprise impact, including information technology projects that affect organizations within the coalition. The office of the chief information officer shall maintain a statewide perspective when collaborating with the coalition to ensure that projects are planned for in a manner that ensures the efficient use of state resources, supports the adoption of a cohesive technology and data architecture, and maximizes federal financial participation. The work of the coalition and any project identified as a coalition project is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701, chapter 297, Laws of 2022.

(((1)))(2) ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$79,197,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($89,195,000))

$89,779,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$400,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$71,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($168,792,000))

$169,447,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $1,135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,731,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for expansion of reentry supports and transition services for incarcerated individuals including development and implementation of a coaching model approach to supervision, and staffing must provide expanded reentry and discharge services to include, but not limited to, transition services, preemployment testing, enhanced health care discharge planning, housing voucher assistance, cognitive behavioral interventions, educational programming, and community partnership programs.

(b) Within the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection, $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the department to develop an implementation plan for a community supervision coaching model to begin in fiscal year 2023. The department must solicit input from incarcerated individuals, family members of incarcerated individuals, experts in supervision and reentry, community stakeholder and advocacy groups, and impacted labor organizations. The plan shall propose appropriate policies and procedures for the coaching model, including ongoing training and organizational culture assessments. During development of the plan, the department must consider potential inequities that may arise from any changes or additional requirements of supervision resulting from the model and mitigate those concerns to the greatest extent possible in its final plan. This plan must be submitted to the office of financial management prior to implementation.

(c) Within the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection, $706,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of the plan to be developed under (b) of this subsection and for the department to submit an initial report to the legislature on the progress of implementation of the coaching supervision model by no later than February 1, 2023.

(d) $17,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $17,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5304 (providing reentry services to persons releasing from state and local institutions).

(e) $197,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $187,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5259 (law enforcement data).

(f)(i) $779,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $817,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for increasing access to educational opportunities for incarcerated individuals.

(ii) Of the amounts provided in (f)(i) of this subsection, $680,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $285,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1044 (prison to postsecondary ed.).

(g) (($1,116,000))$734,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to acquire and implement a sentencing calculation module for the offender management network information system and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act. This project must use one discrete organizational index across all department of corrections programs. Implementation of this sentencing calculation module must result in a reduction of tolling staff within six months of the project implementation date and the department must report this result. In addition, the report must include the budgeted and actual tolling staffing levels by fiscal month in fiscal year 2023 and the count of tolling staff reduced by fiscal month from date of implementation through six months post implementation. The report must be submitted to the senate ways and means and house appropriations committees within 30 calendar days after six months post implementation.

(h) $609,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for staff and vendor costs to transform correctional culture in prisons and work releases, and to improve health and safety for all, through additional training. The prison rape elimination act compliance specialists must be among the first staff trained.

(i) $130,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for a human resource consultant to implement Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5695 (body scanners). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(j) $70,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $223,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1956 (incarcerated individuals/PRA). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(k) $12,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1818 (reentry and rehabilitation). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(l) $71,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for expenses incurred in response to the COVID-19 pandemic during fiscal year 2023.

(m) $164,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to resolve the 2021-017 audit finding by the state auditor's office related to the use of coronavirus state fiscal recovery funds.

(((2)))(3) CORRECTIONAL OPERATIONS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$450,287,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($683,573,000))

$693,875,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($161,465,000))

$163,126,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$335,000

Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,468,000))

$2,078,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
(($28,409,000))

$35,125,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,328,537,000))

$1,344,826,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The department may contract for local jail beds statewide to the extent that it is at no net cost to the department. The department shall calculate and report the average cost per offender per day, inclusive of all services, on an annual basis for a facility that is representative of average medium or lower offender costs. The department shall not pay a rate greater than $85 per day per offender excluding the costs of department of corrections provided services, including evidence-based substance abuse programming, dedicated department of corrections classification staff on-site for individualized case management, transportation of offenders to and from department of corrections facilities, and gender responsive training for jail staff. The capacity provided at local correctional facilities must be for offenders whom the department of corrections defines as close medium or lower security offenders. Programming provided for offenders held in local jurisdictions is included in the rate, and details regarding the type and amount of programming, and any conditions regarding transferring offenders must be negotiated with the department as part of any contract. Local jurisdictions must provide health care to offenders that meets standards set by the department. The local jail must provide all medical care including unexpected emergent care. The department must utilize a screening process to ensure that offenders with existing extraordinary medical/mental health needs are not transferred to local jail facilities. If extraordinary medical conditions develop for an inmate while at a jail facility, the jail may transfer the offender back to the department, subject to terms of the negotiated agreement. Health care costs incurred prior to transfer are the responsibility of the jail.

(b) $574,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $671,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to maintain the facility, property, and assets at the institution formerly known as the maple lane school in Rochester. Additional funds are provided for a stationary engineer and a custodian.

(c) Funding in this subsection is sufficient for the department to track and report to the legislature on the changes in working conditions and overtime usage as a result of increased funding provided for custody relief and health care delivery by December 1, 2022.

(d) $39,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1054 (peace officer tactics, equip).

(e) (($2,000,000))$1,045,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to acquire and implement a sentencing calculation module for the offender management network information system and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act. This project must use one discrete organizational index across all department of corrections programs. Implementation of this sentencing calculation module must result in a reduction of tolling staff within six months of the project implementation date and the department must report this result. In addition, the report must include the budgeted and actual tolling staffing levels by fiscal month in fiscal year 2023 and the count of tolling staff reduced by fiscal month from date of implementation through six months post implementation. The report must be submitted to the senate ways and means and house appropriations committees within 30 calendar days after six months post implementation.

(f) $714,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $695,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for dedicated prison rape elimination act compliance specialists. Of the amount provided in this subsection, one compliance specialist staff must be provided at each of the following prisons:

(i) Monroe correctional center;

(ii) Larch correctional center;

(iii) Olympic correctional center;

(iv) Cedar creek correctional center;

(v) Washington corrections center for women; and

(vi) Mission creek corrections center for women.

(g) $2,750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for three body scanners, correctional officer staffing, corrections specialist staffing, a drug recovery system, body scanner training, and body scanner installation costs to implement Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5695 (body scanners). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(h) $5,962,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $9,106,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to restore graduated reentry reductions made in the 2021-2023 biennial operating budget.

(i) $28,409,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for expenses incurred in response to the COVID-19 pandemic during fiscal year 2022.

(j) $1,251,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,294,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for reentry investments to include reentry and discharge staffing. The staffing must provide expanded reentry and discharge services to include, but not limited to, transition services, pre-employment testing, enhanced health care discharge planning, cognitive behavioral interventions, educational programming, and community partnership programs.

(k) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to collaborate with the department of social and health services to conduct a study of the feasibility of placing long-term care individuals under the jurisdiction of the department in nursing home facilities licensed or to be licensed by the department of social and health services to better meet the client's care needs. The department of corrections must provide daily operating costs of prisons where these individuals may be coming from, the fiscal year 2021 daily costs per incarcerated individual assigned to the sage living unit, and the costs associated with electronic home monitoring costs per individual.

(l) $160,072,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRF) is provided solely for COVID-19 related payroll and benefit expenditures that were incurred between July 1, 2021, and December 31, 2021, for public safety and health employees whose services are presumed to be substantially dedicated to responding to the COVID-19 public health emergency. This funding expires December 31, 2021.

(m) $6,716,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for expenses incurred in response to the COVID-19 pandemic during fiscal year 2023.

(n) $12,570,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to resolve the 2021-017 audit finding by the state auditor's office related to the use of coronavirus state fiscal recovery funds.

(((3)))(4) COMMUNITY SUPERVISION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$161,098,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($222,989,000))

$214,480,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($29,733,000))

$29,988,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
(($8,480,000))

$8,515,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($422,300,000))

$414,081,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The department of corrections shall contract with local and tribal governments for jail capacity to house offenders who violate the terms of their community supervision. A contract rate increase may not exceed five percent each year. The department may negotiate to include medical care of offenders in the contract rate if medical payments conform to the department's offender health plan and pharmacy formulary, and all off-site medical expenses are preapproved by department utilization management staff. If medical care of offender is included in the contract rate, the contract rate may exceed five percent to include the cost of that service.

(b) The department shall engage in ongoing mitigation strategies to reduce the costs associated with community supervision violators, including improvements in data collection and reporting and alternatives to short-term confinement for low-level violators.

(c) $1,749,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $10,536,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for reentry investments to include reentry and discharge staffing. The staffing must provide expanded reentry and discharge services to include, but not limited to, transition services, preemployment testing, housing voucher assistance, cognitive behavioral interventions, educational programming, and community partnership programs. Of this amount $7,394,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of the plan to be developed under subsection (((1)))(2)(b) of this section.

(d) Within existing resources the department must update the response to violations and new criminal activity policy to reflect the savings assumed in this section as related to mandatory maximum confinement sanctions.

(e) $661,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $725,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for increased costs associated with the relocation of leased facilities. The department shall engage in ongoing strategies to reduce the need for relocating facilities and when necessary contract only with lessors with rates that align with comparable market rates in the area.

(f) $59,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $23,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5071 (civil commitment transition).

(g) $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 ((is))and $285,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for conducting a community corrections caseload study. The department of corrections shall contract with an independent third party to provide a comprehensive review of the community corrections staffing model and develop an updated staffing model for use by the department of corrections. The updated model must include additional time and flexibility for community corrections officers to focus on case management, engagement, and interventions. The department of corrections shall submit a report, including a summary of the review and update, to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by ((July 1, 2022))December 31, 2022.

(h) (($2,521,000))$1,948,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to acquire and implement a sentencing calculation module for the offender management network information system and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act. This project must use one discrete organizational index across all department of corrections programs. Implementation of this sentencing calculation module must result in a reduction of tolling staff within six months of the project implementation date and the department must report this result. In addition, the report must include the budgeted and actual tolling staffing levels by fiscal month in fiscal year 2023 and the count of tolling staff reduced by fiscal month from date of implementation through six months post implementation. The report must be submitted to the senate ways and means and house appropriations committees within 30 calendar days after six months post implementation.

(i) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (((3)))(4) for work release programs, the department will operate the Helen B. Ratcliff work release facility.

(j) $1,810,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1818 (reentry and rehabilitation). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(k) $1,930,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for expenses incurred in response to the COVID-19 pandemic during fiscal year 2022.

(l) $29,733,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRF) is provided solely for COVID-19 related payroll and benefit expenditures that were incurred between July 1, 2021, and December 31, 2021, for public safety and health employees whose services are presumed to be substantially dedicated to responding to the COVID-19 public health emergency. This funding expires December 31, 2021.

(m) $35,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for expenses incurred in response to the COVID-19 pandemic during fiscal year 2023.

(n) $870,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to resolve the 2021-017 audit finding by the state auditor's office related to the use of coronavirus state fiscal recovery funds.

(((4)))(5) CORRECTIONAL INDUSTRIES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$8,757,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($9,097,000))

$12,224,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$17,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($17,854,000))

$20,998,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $17,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for expenses incurred in response to the COVID-19 pandemic during fiscal year 2023.

(b) $533,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to resolve the 2021-017 audit finding by the state auditor's office related to the use of coronavirus state fiscal recovery funds.

(((5)))(6) INTERAGENCY PAYMENTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$58,192,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($51,865,000))

$52,733,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$267,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($110,324,000))

$111,192,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $21,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to acquire and implement a sentencing calculation module for the offender management network information system and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act. This project must use one discreet organizational index across all department of corrections programs. Implementation of this sentencing calculation module must result in a reduction of tolling staff within six months of the project implementation date, which the department must report on. The report must include the budgeted and actual tolling staffing levels by fiscal month in fiscal year 2023 and the count of tolling staff reduced by fiscal month from date of implementation through six months post implementation. The report must be submitted to the senate ways and means and house appropriations committees within 30 calendar days after six months post implementation.

(b) $192,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for medical staffing in prisons for patient centered care and behavioral health care to increase access to care and expanded screening of individuals in prison facilities to include chronic illnesses, infectious disease, diabetes, heart disease, serious mental health, and behavioral health services.

(c) $4,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $9,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for an electronic health records system solution and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act. The department must collaborate with the Washington state department of veterans affairs on the development of the system's business requirements.

(d) $19,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5695 (body scanners). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(e) $26,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $161,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for reentry investments to include reentry and discharge staffing. The staffing must provide expanded reentry and discharge services to include, but not limited to, transition services, pre-employment testing, enhanced health care discharge planning, housing voucher assistance, cognitive behavioral interventions, educational programming, and community partnership programs.

(f) $4,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $4,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1956 (incarcerated individuals/PRA). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(g) $2,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1818 (reentry and rehabilitation). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((6)))(7) OFFENDER CHANGE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$73,267,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($84,376,000))

$84,107,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,303,000))

$4,914,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,001,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($161,946,000))

$165,289,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The department of corrections shall use funds appropriated in this subsection (((6)))(7) for offender programming. The department shall develop and implement a written comprehensive plan for offender programming that prioritizes programs which follow the risk-needs-responsivity model, are evidence-based, and have measurable outcomes. The department is authorized to discontinue ineffective programs and to repurpose underspent funds according to the priorities in the written plan.

(b) The department of corrections shall collaborate with the state health care authority to explore ways to utilize federal medicaid funds as a match to fund residential substance use disorder treatment-based alternative beds under RCW 9.94A.664 under the drug offender sentencing alternative program and residential substance use disorder treatment beds that serve individuals on community custody. The department of corrections must complete a report and submit its findings and recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 15, 2021.

(c) $3,106,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $3,106,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the housing voucher program.

(d) $3,300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for temporary court facilities, staffing, and to provide release assistance, including limited housing and food assistance, and other costs associated with individuals resentenced or ordered released from confinement as a result of the State v. Blake decision.

(e)(i) $1,001,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $675,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for increasing access to educational opportunities for incarcerated individuals.

(ii) Of the amounts provided in (e)(i) of this subsection, $272,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $247,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1044 (prison to postsecondary ed.).

(f) $784,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for reentry support items such as disposable cell phones, prepaid phone cards, hygiene kits, housing vouchers, and release medications associated with individuals resentenced or ordered released from confinement as a result of policies or court decisions including, but not limited to, the State v. Blake decision.

(g) $1,268,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for resentencing and reentry staffing associated with individuals resentenced or ordered released from confinement as a result of policies or court decisions including, but not limited to, the State v. Blake decision.

(h) $438,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for program specialist staffing for increased comprehensive assessments and treatments, and substance use disorder treatment to implement Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5695 (body scanners). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(i) $4,508,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $7,893,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for reentry investments to include reentry and discharge staffing. The staffing must provide expanded reentry and discharge services to include, but not limited to cognitive behavioral interventions and educational programming.

(j) $121,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department of corrections to collaborate with the Washington state board for community and technical colleges and the department of licensing to develop a prerelease commercial driving license training pilot program.

(k) $655,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1818 (reentry and rehabilitation). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(l) $1,168,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to expand library services to incarcerated individuals in adult correctional facilities. The department of corrections must work in conjunction with the Washington state library to provide additional library materials, collections, and one additional library staff position at each of the nine institutional library service branches located throughout the state. Library materials and collections include but are not limited to Washington state newspapers, current consumer medical information, and other current reference collections that will support the department's reentry efforts in supporting the recovery and personal growth of incarcerated individuals.

(m) $320,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for two contracted parent navigator positions. One parent navigator must be located at the Washington correction center for women and one parent navigator position must be located at the Airway Heights corrections center or another state correctional facility that houses incarcerated male individuals and is selected by the department of corrections as a more suitable fit for a parent navigator. The parent navigators must have lived experience in navigating the child welfare system. The parent navigators must provide guidance and support to incarcerated individuals towards family reunification, including, but not limited to, how to access services, navigating the court system, assisting with guardianship arrangements, and facilitating visitation with their children. The goal of the parent navigator programs is to assist incarcerated parents involved in dependency or child welfare cases to maintain connections with their children and to assist these individuals in successfully transitioning and reuniting with their families upon release from incarceration. As part of the parent navigation program, the department of corrections must also review and provide a report to the legislature on the effectiveness of the program that includes the number of incarcerated individuals that received assistance from the parent navigators and that tracks outcomes of the parenting navigator program. A preliminary report must be submitted to the legislature by June 30, 2023, with the expectation that a final report be funded in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium budget and submitted by December 1, 2024. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $20,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department's review and preliminary report on the effectiveness of the parent navigator program.

(n) $4,088,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRF) is provided solely for COVID-19 related payroll and benefit expenditures that were incurred between July 1, 2021, and December 31, 2021, for public safety and health employees whose services are presumed to be substantially dedicated to responding to the COVID-19 public health emergency. This funding expires December 31, 2021.

(o) $3,001,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for expenses incurred in response to the COVID-19 pandemic during fiscal year 2023.

(p) $89,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to resolve the 2021-017 audit finding by the state auditor's office related to the use of coronavirus state fiscal recovery funds.

(((7)))(8) HEALTH CARE SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$134,471,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($205,666,000))

$205,600,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($47,507,000))

$48,348,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$2,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
(($11,968,000))

$13,354,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($399,614,000))

$401,775,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The state prison medical facilities may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods, supplies, and services through hospital or other group purchasing organizations when it is cost effective to do so.

(b) $183,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $167,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5304 (providing reentry services to persons releasing from state and local institutions).

(c) $13,947,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to increase medical staffing in prisons for patient centered care and behavioral health care. Funding must be used to increase access to care and expanded screening of individuals in prison facilities to include chronic illnesses, infectious disease, diabetes, heart disease, serious mental health, and behavioral health services.

(d) $999,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,030,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for medical staff, telehealth carts, necessary technology costs, and the build out of 64 dedicated teleservice rooms that will allow for legal and medical telepresence at all 12 prison facilities.

(e) $77,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $900,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for an electronic health records system solution and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act. The department must collaborate with the Washington state department of veterans affairs on the development of the system's business requirements.

(f) $829,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for nursing staff for dry cell watch at Washington corrections center for men to implement Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5695 (body scanners). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(g) $5,395,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $8,239,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to restore graduated reentry reductions in the 2021-2023 biennial operating budget.

(h) $11,968,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for expenses incurred in response to the COVID-19 pandemic during fiscal year 2022.

(i) $613,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,069,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for reentry investments to include reentry and discharge staffing. The staffing must provide expanded reentry and discharge services to include, but not limited to, enhanced health care discharge planning.

(j) The department of corrections must prepare a report on and an analysis of its medical staffing.

(i) The report must identify barriers relating to incarcerated individuals receiving timely treatment.

(ii) The report must specifically include a chart that shows:

(A) The incarcerated population caseloads from fiscal year 2019 through the first quarter of fiscal year 2023. The incarcerated caseloads must be shown by each of the department's individual 12 institutions;

(B) The number of funded, unfunded, and contracted-equivalent medical/health care staff at each institution, by major position type that includes, but is not limited to, physicians, psychologists, psychiatrists, registered nurses, supervising nursing staff, medical assistants, patient service representatives, medical directors, clinical pharmacists, and medical adjudicators;

(C) The caseloads for health care staff that shows the ratio of each medical staff position referenced in (j)(ii)(B) of this subsection to incarcerated individuals by institution;

(D) The number of funded medical staffing vacancies referenced in (j)(ii)(B) of this subsection by institution and quarter in fiscal year 2022 through the first quarter of fiscal year 2023; and

(E) A staffing model that shows the number of additional health care staff needed by position referenced in (j)(ii)(B) of this subsection for each institution.

(iii) The department must submit a final report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by October 30, 2022.

(k) $46,107,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRF) is provided solely for COVID-19 related payroll and benefit expenditures that were incurred between July 1, 2021, and December 31, 2021, for public safety and health employees whose services are presumed to be substantially dedicated to responding to the COVID-19 public health emergency. This funding expires December 31, 2021.

(l) $1,386,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for expenses incurred in response to the COVID-19 pandemic during fiscal year 2023.

(m) $3,154,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to resolve the 2021-017 audit finding by the state auditor's office related to the use of coronavirus state fiscal recovery funds.

Sec. 1221. 2022 c 297 s 225 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$3,448,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$11,356,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($337,132,000))

$298,674,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$37,325,000

Unemployment Compensation Administration Account—

Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($444,688,000))

$426,241,000

Administrative Contingency Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$27,029,000

Employment Service Administrative Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$68,128,000

Family and Medical Leave Insurance Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$145,594,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$11,283,000

Long-Term Services and Supports Trust Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$35,902,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
(($66,128,000))

$50,510,000

Unemployment Insurance Relief Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$500,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,688,013,000))

$1,615,490,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department is directed to maximize the use of federal funds. The department must update its budget annually to align expenditures with anticipated changes in projected revenues.

(2) $30,458,000 of the long-term services and supports trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of the long-term services and support trust program. Of this amount, $10,932,833 is provided for implementation of the long-term services and support trust program information technology project and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(3) Within existing resources, the department must reassess its ongoing staffing and funding needs for the paid family medical leave program and submit documentation of the updated need to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by September 1, 2021, and annually thereafter.

(4) $101,000 of the employment service administrative account—state appropriation is provided solely for information technology enhancements necessary for implementation of job title reporting and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(5)(a) Within existing resources, the department shall coordinate outreach and education to paid family and medical leave benefit recipients with a statewide family resource, referral, and linkage system that connects families with children prenatal through age five and residing in Washington state to appropriate services and community resources. This coordination shall include but is not limited to placing information about the statewide family resource, referral, and linkage system on the paid family and medical leave program web site and in printed materials, and conducting joint events.

(b) Within existing resources, by December 1, 2021, and each year thereafter, the department shall submit a report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature concerning the ability for the paid family and medical leave program and a statewide family resource, referral, and linkage system to provide integrated services to eligible beneficiaries. The report shall include an analysis of any statutory changes needed to allow information and data to be shared between the statewide family resource, referral, and linkage system and the paid family and medical leave program.

(6) Within existing resources, the department shall report the following to the legislature and the governor by September 30, 2021, and each year thereafter:

(a) An inventory of the department's programs, services, and activities, identifying federal, state, and other funding sources for each;

(b) Federal grants received by the department, segregated by line of business or activity, for the most recent five fiscal years, and the applicable rules;

(c) State funding available to the department, segregated by line of business or activity, for the most recent five fiscal years;

(d) A history of staffing levels by line of business or activity, identifying sources of state or federal funding, for the most recent five fiscal years;

(e) A projected spending plan for the employment services administrative account and the administrative contingency account. The spending plan must include forecasted revenues and estimated expenditures under various economic scenarios.

(7) $3,264,000 of the employment services administrative account—state appropriation is provided solely for the continuation of the office of agricultural and seasonal workforce services.

(8) $476,000 of the unemployment compensation administration account—federal appropriation is provided for the department to implement chapter 2, Laws of 2021 (unemployment insurance). If the department does not receive adequate funding from the United States department of labor to cover these costs, the department may use funding made available to the state through section 903 (d), (f), and (g) of the social security act (Reed act) in an amount not to exceed the amount provided in this subsection (8).

(9)(a) $875,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022and $8,260,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation are provided solely for career connected learning grants as provided in RCW 28C.30.050.

(b) $3,000,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for career connect learning grants to sector intermediaries. Up to five percent of the amount in this subsection may be used for administrative expenses associated with the sector intermediary grant program.

(10) $1,222,000 of the employment services administrative account—state appropriation and $1,500,000 of the family and medical leave insurance account—state appropriation are provided solely for the maintenance and operation of the disaster recovery continuity of operations information technology project.

(11) $80,000 of the employment services administrative account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to produce a report on the feasibility of replicating the existing unemployment insurance program to serve individuals not eligible for unemployment insurance due to immigration status. The study shall identify programmatic differences that would mitigate barriers to access and reduce fear of participation and identify the operational and caseload costs associated with the replication. If using a replica of the unemployment insurance program conflicts with federal law, the study shall assess the operational and caseload costs of similar social net programs that serve individuals regardless of their citizenship status. The departments shall jointly submit recommendations required by this section to the governor and appropriate legislative committees no later than November 5, 2021. The department shall:

(a) Work with the departments of labor and industries, social and health services, and commerce and the office of the governor;

(b) Convene and meet at least three times with a group of eight to ten external stakeholders comprised of representatives from geographically diverse immigrant advocacy groups, labor organizations with a state-wide presence, workers' rights groups, and legal and policy advocacy groups focused on immigration and employment law; and

(c) Hold at least one listening session with community members.

(12) $31,288,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation, $2,684,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRF), and (($13,063,000))$11,063,000 of the unemployment compensation administration account—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to address the impacts of COVID-19 on the state unemployment system in order to prevent and detect fraud, promote equitable access to the unemployment insurance system, and ensure the timely payment of unemployment insurance benefits. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) $22,346,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the department to address an anticipated increase in the unemployment insurance appeals caseload.

(b) $6,223,000 of the unemployment compensation account—federal appropriation is provided solely for the department to ensure adequate security measures are in place to prevent unemployment insurance fraud and cases are investigated in a timely manner.

(c) $4,465,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the department to migrate and upgrade the unemployment insurance customer call center phone system to a cloud-based system. Prior to executing a contract, the department shall consult with the office of the chief information officer. The department must ensure that the project plan, timeline with quantifiable deliverables, and budget by fiscal year by fund, to include ongoing costs by fiscal year, are adhered to. The department shall report on the status of the project to the office of financial management and the relevant committees of the legislature by December 1, 2021.

(d) $4,477,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided for the department to process the unemployment insurance claimant backlog and to make program changes that enhance user experience in order to reduce claimant errors.

(e) $1,417,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRF) is provided solely for the department to contract with the national guard to assist the department with its unemployment insurance claims backlog.

(f) $1,267,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRF) is provided solely for the department to contract with a vendor to provide fact-finding services related to unemployment insurance claims.

(g) (($6,840,000))$4,840,000 of the unemployment compensation administration account—federal appropriation is provided solely for the department to implement the federal United States department of labor equity grant. This grant includes improving the translation of notices sent to claimants as part of their unemployment insurance claims into any of the 10 languages most frequently spoken in the state and other language, demographic, and geographic equity initiatives approved by the grantor. The department must also ensure that letters, alerts, and notices produced manually or by the department's unemployment insurance technology system are written in plainly understood language and evaluated for ease of claimant comprehension before they are approved for use.

(13) $10,000,000 of the unemployment compensation administration account—federal appropriation is provided solely for the department to make information technology improvements to improve user experience and increase security to prevent unemployment insurance fraud. If the department does not receive adequate funding from the United States department of labor to cover these costs, the department may use funding made available to the state through section 903 (d), (f), and (g) of the social security act (Reed act) in an amount not to exceed the amount provided in this subsection. This subsection is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(14) Within existing resources, the department shall report to the legislature by September 2, 2021, the following information pertaining to the unemployment insurance program:

(a) The number of full time equivalent employees of the department who were working in the unemployment insurance program, including those who were reassigned internally to the unemployment insurance program, the number of full time equivalent employees that were contracted by the department from other state agencies, and the number of contractors or consultants engaged by the department, on a monthly basis beginning March 1, 2020, through the latest available month;

(b) A projection of full-time equivalent staffing or contractor needs that would be affordable within anticipated base and above-base federal unemployment administrative revenues;

(c) A spending plan for anticipated federal unemployment revenues other than base or above-base revenues, including any proposed additional full-time equivalent staff, consultants, contractors, or other investments related to helping the department reduce the backlog of unemployment insurance claims, appeals, denials, overpayments, and other claimant issues; and

(d) A budget for the unemployment insurance program, showing expenditures by object and fund source, for fiscal years 2022 and 2023, along with any projected shortfalls in revenues.

(15) $797,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $1,874,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $979,000 of the family medical leave insurance account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5097 (paid leave coverage).

(16) $90,000 of the unemployment account—federal appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5190 (health care workers/benefits).

(17) $5,322,000 of the unemployment account—federal appropriation is provided solely for the department to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5193 (unemployment ins. system).

(18) (($34,840,000))$19,222,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1073 (paid leave coverage).

(19) $500,000,000 of the unemployment insurance relief fund—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of unemployment insurance relief provided pursuant to Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5478 (unemployment insurance). The department is directed to implement the bill within existing resources.

(20) $1,806,000 of the long-term services and supports trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1323 (long-term services trust).

(21) $1,075,000 of the unemployment account—federal appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1455 (social security/L&I & ESD).

(22) (($10,571,000))$5,285,000 of the unemployment compensation administration account—federal appropriation is provided solely for administration costs related to the federal unemployment insurance programs extended under the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2.

(23) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the North Central educational service district 171 to support the development of industry and education partnerships and expand career awareness, exploration and preparation activities for youth in Grant county.

(24) $4,843,000 of the employment service administrative account—state appropriation is provided solely for the replacement of the WorkSource integrated technology platform. The replacement system must support the workforce administration statewide to ensure adoption of the United States department of labor's integrated service delivery model and program performance requirements for the state's workforce innovation and opportunity act and other federal grants. This subsection is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(25) $6,208,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the continuation of the economic security for all program. The department must collect quarterly data on the number of participants that participate in the program, the costs associated with career, training, and other support services provided, and progress made towards self-sufficiency. The department must provide a report to the governor and the legislature on December 1, 2022, and June 1, 2023, that includes an analysis of the program, a summary of the quarterly data collected, and associated recommendations for program delivery.

(26) $1,720,000 of the family and medical leave insurance account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5649 (family and medical leave). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(27) $702,000 of the unemployment compensation administration account—federal appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5873 (unemployment insurance). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(28) $262,000 of the employment services administrative account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5847 (public employee PSLF info). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(29) $140,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for one full-time employee to provide casework on behalf of constituents who contact their legislators to escalate unresolved claims.

(30) $1,691,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $3,049,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to temporarily hire additional staff during the COVID-19 pandemic if existing resources are not sufficient to manage unemployment insurance program claims and backlogs. Prior to hiring additional staff under this subsection, the department must consult with the office of financial management.

(31) $3,105,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of the quality jobs, equity strategy, and training (QUEST) grant to enhance the workforce system's ongoing efforts to support employment equity and employment recovery from the COVID-19 pandemic. The funds are for partnership development, community outreach, business engagement, and comprehensive career and training services.

Sec. 1222. 2022 c 297 s 226 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES—GENERAL

(1)(a) The appropriations to the department of children, youth, and families in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. Appropriations made in this act to the department of children, youth, and families shall initially be allotted as required by this act. The department shall seek approval from the office of financial management prior to transferring moneys between sections of this act except as expressly provided in this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not include transfers of moneys between sections of this act except as expressly provided in this act, nor shall allotment modifications permit moneys that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for other than that purpose. However, after May 1, ((2022))2023, unless prohibited by this act, the department may transfer general fund—state appropriations for fiscal year ((2022))2023 among programs after approval by the director of the office of financial management. However, the department may not transfer state appropriations that are provided solely for a specified purpose except as expressly provided in (b) of this subsection.

(b) To the extent that transfers under (a) of this subsection are insufficient to fund actual expenditures in excess of fiscal year 2022 caseload forecasts and utilization assumptions in the foster care, adoption support, child protective services, working connections child care, and the juvenile rehabilitation programs or in response to the COVID-19 pandemic, the department may transfer appropriations that are provided solely for a specified purpose.

(2) The health care authority, the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, the department of health, the department of corrections, and the department of children, youth, and families shall work together within existing resources to establish the health and human services enterprise coalition (the coalition). The coalition, led by the health care authority, must be a multi-organization collaborative that provides strategic direction and federal funding guidance for projects that have cross-organizational or enterprise impact, including information technology projects that affect organizations within the coalition. The office of the chief information officer shall maintain a statewide perspective when collaborating with the coalition to ensure that projects are planned for in a manner that ensures the efficient use of state resources, supports the adoption of a cohesive technology and data architecture, and maximizes federal financial participation.

(3) Information technology projects or investments and proposed projects or investments impacting time capture, payroll and payment processes and systems, eligibility, case management, and authorization systems within the department are subject to technical oversight by the office of the chief information officer.

Sec. 1223. 2022 c 297 s 227 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES—CHILDREN AND FAMILIES SERVICES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$374,129,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($456,485,000))

$427,811,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($486,218,000))

$491,735,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$2,824,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$5,500,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,325,156,000))

$1,301,999,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $748,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $748,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to contract for the operation of one pediatric interim care center. The center shall provide residential care for up to thirteen children through two years of age. Seventy-five percent of the children served by the center must be in need of special care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers. The center shall also provide on-site training to biological, adoptive, or foster parents. The center shall provide at least three months of consultation and support to the parents accepting placement of children from the center. The center may recruit new and current foster and adoptive parents for infants served by the center. The department shall not require case management as a condition of the contract. No later than December 1, 2021, the department must, in consultation with the health care authority, report to the appropriate legislative committees on potential options to maximize federal funding for the center, including any potential for the center to bill managed care organizations for services provided to medicaid recipients.

(2) $453,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $722,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the costs of hub home foster and kinship families that provide a foster care delivery model that includes a hub home. Use of the hub home model is intended to support foster parent retention, provide support to biological families, improve child outcomes, and encourage the least restrictive community placements for children in out-of-home care.

(a) $453,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $572,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the costs of hub home foster and kinship family constellations, and for a contract with an organization with expertise in implementing the hub home model with fidelity to provide technical assistance to hub home families and the department.

(b) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to support long-term implementation of the hub home model, including integrating the hub home model within the department's current and future service array and multiyear expansion planning. The department shall submit a preliminary report to the governor and appropriate legislative committees by December 1, 2022, and a final report to the governor and appropriate legislative committees by June 30, 2023, that details its progress and plans for long-term implementation of the hub home model.

(3) $579,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $579,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $110,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a receiving care center east of the Cascade mountains.

(4) $1,245,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,245,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for services provided through children's advocacy centers.

(5) In fiscal year 2022 and in fiscal year 2023, the department shall provide a tracking report for social service specialists and corresponding social services support staff to the office of financial management, and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature. The report shall detail progress toward meeting the targeted 1:18 caseload ratio standard for child and family welfare services caseload-carrying staff and targeted 1:8 caseload ratio standard for child protection services caseload carrying staff. To the extent to which the information is available, the report shall include the following information identified separately for social service specialists doing case management work, supervisory work, and administrative support staff, and identified separately by job duty or program, including but not limited to intake, child protective services investigations, child protective services family assessment response, and child and family welfare services:

(a) Total full time equivalent employee authority, allotments and expenditures by region, office, classification and band, and job duty or program;

(b) Vacancy rates by region, office, and classification and band; and

(c) Average length of employment with the department, and when applicable, the date of exit for staff exiting employment with the department by region, office, classification and band, and job duty or program.

(6) $94,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $94,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a contract with a child advocacy center in Spokane to provide continuum of care services for children who have experienced abuse or neglect and their families.

(7)(a) $539,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, $656,000 of the general fund private/local appropriation, and $252,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a contract with an educational advocacy provider with expertise in foster care educational outreach. The amounts in this subsection are provided solely for contracted education coordinators to assist foster children in succeeding in K-12 and higher education systems and to assure a focus on education during the department's transition to performance-based contracts. Funding must be prioritized to regions with high numbers of foster care youth, regions where backlogs of youth that have formerly requested educational outreach services exist, or youth with high educational needs. The department is encouraged to use private matching funds to maintain educational advocacy services.

(b) The department shall contract with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, which in turn shall contract with a nongovernmental entity or entities to provide educational advocacy services pursuant to RCW 28A.300.590.

(8) $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $112,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to develop, implement, and expand strategies to improve the capacity, reliability, and effectiveness of contracted visitation services for children in temporary out-of-home care and their parents and siblings. Strategies may include, but are not limited to, increasing mileage reimbursement for providers, offering transportation-only contract options, and mechanisms to reduce the level of parent-child supervision when doing so is in the best interest of the child. The department shall report to the office of financial management and the relevant fiscal and policy committees of the legislature regarding these strategies by November 1, 2022. The report shall include the number and percentage of parents requiring supervised visitation and the number and percentage of parents with unsupervised visitation, prior to reunification.

(9) For purposes of meeting the state's maintenance of effort for the state supplemental payment program, the department of children, youth, and families shall track and report to the department of social and health services the monthly state supplemental payment amounts attributable to foster care children who meet eligibility requirements specified in the state supplemental payment state plan. Such expenditures must equal at least $3,100,000 annually and may not be claimed toward any other federal maintenance of effort requirement. Annual state supplemental payment expenditure targets must continue to be established by the department of social and health services. Attributable amounts must be communicated by the department of children, youth, and families to the department of social and health services on a monthly basis.

(10) $2,230,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $2,230,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $156,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase the travel reimbursement for in-home service providers.

(11) $197,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $197,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to conduct biennial inspections and certifications of facilities, both overnight and day shelters, that serve those who are under 18 years old and are homeless.

(12) $6,195,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $6,195,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $1,188,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to operate emergent placement and enhanced emergent placement contracts.

(a) The department shall not include the costs to operate emergent placement contracts in the calculations for family foster home maintenance payments and shall submit as part of the budget submittal documentation required by RCW 43.88.030 any costs associated with increases in the number of emergent placement contract beds after the effective date of this section that cannot be sustained within existing appropriations.

(b) Beginning October 1, 2021, and every quarter thereafter, the department shall publish on its website the rates or fees paid for emergent placement contracts, the number of beds retained, and the number of beds purchased. If the department determines that there is a need to increase the rates or fees paid or the number of beds retained or purchased under this subsection, the secretary shall request authorization from the office of financial management and notify the fiscal committees of the legislature.

(13) Beginning January 1, 2022, and continuing through the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the department must provide semi-annual reports to the governor and appropriate legislative committees that includes the number of in-state behavioral rehabilitation services providers and licensed beds, the number of out-of-state behavioral rehabilitation services placements, and a comparison of these numbers to the same metrics expressed as an average over the prior six months. The report shall identify separately beds with the enhanced behavioral rehabilitation services rate. Effective January 1, 2022, and to the extent the information is available, the report will include the same information for emergency placement services beds and enhanced emergency placement services beds.

(14) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementing the supportive visitation model that utilizes trained visit navigators to provide a structured and positive visitation experience for children and their parents.

(15) $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for enhanced adoption placement services for legally free children in state custody, through a partnership with a national nonprofit organization with private matching funds. These funds must supplement, but not supplant, the work of the department to secure permanent adoptive homes for children with high needs.

(16) The department of children, youth, and families shall make foster care maintenance payments to programs where children are placed with a parent in a residential program for substance abuse treatment. These maintenance payments are considered foster care maintenance payments for purposes of forecasting and budgeting at maintenance level as required by RCW 43.88.058.

(17) $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $2,000,000 of the general fund— state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to contract with one or more nonprofit, nongovernmental organizations to purchase and deliver concrete goods to low-income families.

(18) $5,500,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for one-time $250 per child grants to families on behalf of up to 22,000 children who may be at risk of child welfare system involvement and have experienced economic impacts of the COVID-19 pandemic.

(19) The department is authorized to use the amounts provided in this section for services and maintenance payments to former dependent youth as authorized and directed in the supporting foster youth and families through the pandemic act, P.L. 116-260, division X.

(20) $387,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $393,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $143,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase all fees paid to child-placing agencies by 7.5 percent, effective July 1, 2021.

(21)(a) $739,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $702,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $482,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department of children, youth, and families to create and implement a new approach to transition planning for young people preparing to exit the child welfare system and juvenile rehabilitation institutions, pursuant to the recommendations in the improving stability for youth exiting systems of care report submitted in January 2020 as required by RCW 43.330.720. The department must engage young people, caregivers, providers, and other stakeholders in the creation and implementation of the approach by:

(i) Providing one statewide adolescent transitions program manager and six adolescent liaisons, one in each region of the department, who are dedicated to supporting the transition planning approaches developed by the department, providing program oversight, and supporting improved outcomes for adolescents during the transition to adulthood; and

(ii) Strengthening the administration and competency of the independent living program and direct independent living services. No later than June 1, 2022, the department must centralize administration of its independent living program and develop a framework for service delivery, including best practice recommendations. The framework must be codesigned with adolescents, caregivers, providers, and stakeholders. No later than June 30, 2022, the department must develop and launch a competitive request for proposal process to solicit bidders to provide independent living services under the new framework.

(b) No later than November 30, 2022, the department must report to the governor and appropriate legislative committees on the implementation of the new approach to transition planning, the new independent living framework, and the state's capacity to provide high-quality transition services, including independent living services, to youth and young adults exiting the child welfare system and juvenile rehabilitation institutions. The report must identify any remaining service gaps that prevent statewide implementation and address the additional resources needed to improve outcomes for young people exiting these systems of care.

(22) $2,400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $2,400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of performance-based contracts for family support and related services pursuant to RCW 74.13B.020.

(23) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding for continued implementation of chapter 80, Laws of 2018 (2SSB 6453) (kinship caregiver legal support).

(24) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding to implement chapter 51, Laws of 2020 (SHB 2873) (families in conflict).

(25) $511,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $153,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 1219 (youth counsel/dependency).

(26) $219,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $208,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $295,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 1061 (child welfare/developmental disability).

(27) $451,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $662,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to contract with a community organization with expertise in the LifeSet case management model to serve youth and adults currently being served in or exiting the foster care, juvenile justice, and mental health systems to successfully transition to adulthood.

(28) $326,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $326,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $148,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1194 (parent-child visitation).

(29) $499,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $499,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $310,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to expand the family connections program in ((two))eight areas of the state in which the program is not already established as of the effective date of this section. One expansion site must be located west of the crest of the Cascade mountain range and the other expansion site must be located east of the crest of the Cascade mountain range. The program expansion must follow the family connections program model pursuant to RCW 74.13.715. To operate the ((two))eight expansion sites, the department must contract with a community-based organization that has experience working with the foster care population and administering the family connections program.

(30) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $25,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) are provided solely for the department to implement Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1227 (child abuse allegations).

(31) If the department receives an allocation of federal funding through an unanticipated receipt, the department shall not expend more than what was approved or for another purpose than what was approved by the governor through the unanticipated receipt process pursuant to RCW 43.79.280.

(32) $1,513,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for a new behavioral rehabilitation services facility in Vancouver.

(33) $449,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $1,203,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $353,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to revise and update its policies, procedures, and the state Title IV-E plan to reflect that it is appropriate to only refer child welfare cases to the department of social and health services division of child support enforcement when the court has found a child to have been abandoned by their parent or guardian as defined in RCW 13.34.030.

(34) $800,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $200,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to contract for a child welfare workload study, which must include an evaluation of workload impacts required by state and federal law and make recommendations for staffing models and system improvements.

(a) The study must consider, but is not limited to, enacted laws and forthcoming legislation related to child welfare such as the keeping families together act, chapter 211, Laws of 2021, and the family first prevention services act.

(b) The study must include, at a minimum, all child welfare case-carrying workers including but not limited to: Child protective services, child welfare case workers, and child welfare licensing staff, including foster care assessment, safety and monitoring, and child protective services licensing.

(c) The study must evaluate the workload impacts related to changes in the application of the federal Indian child welfare act, 25 U.S.C. Secs. 1901-1963 and the Washington state Indian child welfare act, chapter 13.38 RCW as required by In re Dependency of G.J.A., A.R.A., S.S.A., J.J.A., and V.A., 197 Wn.2d 868 (2021) and In re Dependency of Z.J.G. and M.E.J.G., 196 Wn.2d 152 (2020).

(d) The department must establish a steering committee inclusive of members who are familiar with public child welfare practice and who have had substantial experience with similar studies. The steering committee members will be appointed by the agency secretary and must include internal and external members.

(e) A final report must also include recommendations to streamline internal processes; to more equitably allocate staff and contracted resources statewide; to reduce workload through technology; to reduce staff attrition; and to increase direct service time. The report must be submitted to the governor and appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature by June 30, 2023.

(35) Within the amounts provided in this section, sufficient funding is provided for the department to contract with a community organization to administer monthly stipends to young adults who were impacted by the federal moratorium that prohibited states from discharging them from extended foster care due to age through September 30, 2021, and young adults who age out of extended foster care between October 1, 2021, and June 30, 2023. To the extent feasible, the organization must administer the monthly stipends at consistent amounts per young adult each month.

(36) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to contract for a systems assessment of state and federally funded services and benefits for young adults enrolled in or exiting extended foster care and make recommendations to improve the continuum of supports for the extended foster care population to support successful transitions to independent adulthood.

(a) The systems assessment must include, but is not limited to, the following:

(i) A survey of state and federally funded services and benefits, and the utilization of such services and benefits, including but not limited to economic services, housing programs and payment vouchers, independent living programs, educational supports, and access to postsecondary opportunities, including vocational training and placement programs, legal services, navigation assistance, and peer mentoring. The survey must examine how these services and benefits contribute to a continuum of supports for young adults enrolled in extended foster care and those who have exited since September 2021;

(ii) A young adult needs assessment, including collecting data on young adults enrolled in extended foster care and those who have exited since September 2021. The needs assessment must also gauge young adults' awareness of and ability to access the available services and benefits;

(iii) Identification of gaps or redundancies within the existing array of state and federally funded programs serving the extended foster care population;

(iv) Identification of funding sources or programs that could be used to address any gaps in the array of services and benefits available; and

(v) An assessment of the various data systems currently used or capable of being used to report on the young adult population served by the extended foster care program. The data assessment must include a discussion of any system limitations and recommendations to support future data tracking of outcomes for this population.

(b) The department and contractor must engage with state agencies administering relevant programs, contracted organizations serving the extended foster care population, and young adults currently in extended foster care and those who have exited since September 2021 to conduct the systems assessment. A status update must be submitted to the governor and appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature by November 30, 2022. A final report must be submitted to the governor and appropriate fiscal and policy committees by June 30, 2023.

(37) $492,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $133,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 1747 (child relative placements). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(38) $3,920,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $15,679,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $4,302,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to, effective April 1, 2022, increase the hourly rate for contracted visitation providers, implement standards regarding Indian child welfare act quality enhancement and compliance in visitation contracts, and reimburse visitation providers for mileage travelled between zero and 60 miles. It is the intent of the legislature that contracted visitation providers use funding provided in this subsection to increase hourly wages for visitation workers.

(39) $767,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the child welfare housing assistance pilot program authorized in RCW 74.13.802.

(40) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the provision of SafeCare, an evidence-based parenting program, for families in Grays Harbor county.

(41) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to establish and implement two play-and-learn groups for families in Grays Harbor county.

(42) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to contract with a clinic that treats prenatal substance exposure in children up to age 13 and that primarily serves families from Snohomish and King counties. It is the intent of the legislature that the department's contract with the clinic prioritize children for services who are at risk of being removed from their family home, who were recently reunified with their family following an out-of-home placement, who have experienced multiple out-of-home placements and are at risk of additional placements, and any other priority populations identified by the department.

(43) $1,926,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $7,704,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $3,745,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase the monthly rate paid to contracted behavioral rehabilitation services facilities to $16,861.91 per youth, effective April 1, 2022. It is the intent of the legislature that the department's vendor contracts specify that the funding provided in this subsection is to increase the hourly wage for direct care workers, with the intent of the legislature to achieve at least $25.00.

(44) $650,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $2,598,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $1,263,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase the monthly rate paid for contracted behavioral rehabilitation services therapeutic foster care to $10,126.92 per youth, effective April 1, 2022. It is the intent of the legislature that the department's vendor contracts specify that funding provided in this subsection is provided to increase pass-through payments to therapeutic foster care homes.

(45) $8,440,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to increase the reimbursement rates for combined in-home services providers as recommended in the October 2021 combined in-home services cost study.

(46) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $275,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for improving the financial capability of dependent youth.

(a) The department shall develop a report with recommendations of how to improve access to private, self-controlled bank accounts for dependent youth ages 14 and up as well as other strategies for improving financial capability of dependent youth. The department must consult with stakeholders on development of the recommendations and report. The report shall include but is not limited to an analysis of the following:

(i) The documentation and information necessary for youth to establish bank accounts;

(ii) Appropriate mechanisms to support youth in establishing the accounts;

(iii) Issues related to compliance with current state and federal laws that could impact the availability of accounts and release of funds; and

(iv) Data on the number of dependent youth, including youth in extended foster care, ages 14 and up with private, self-controlled bank accounts.

(b) The report must include recommendations on how to ensure statewide access to high quality, developmentally, and culturally appropriate financial education for dependent youth ages 12 and up.

(c) The report must include recommendations for statutory or policy changes, including the number of youth who have established a private self-controlled bank account, to implement the recommendations of the report.

(d) The analysis and recommendations are due to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2022, in compliance with RCW 43.01.036.

(46) $568,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $78,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the phase-in of the settlement agreement under D.S. et al. v. Department of Children, Youth, and Families et al., United States district court for the western district of Washington, cause no. 2:21-cv-00113-BJR. The department must implement the provisions of the settlement agreement pursuant to the timeline and implementation plan provided for under the settlement agreement. This includes implementing provisions related to monitoring and implementation.

(47) $3,725,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $818,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for contracted visitation services for children in temporary out-of-home care. Funding is provided to reimburse providers for certain uncompensated services, which may include work associated with missed or canceled visits.

Sec. 1224. 2022 c 297 s 228 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES—JUVENILE REHABILITATION PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$123,463,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($131,424,000))

$128,153,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$694,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($166,000))

$254,000

Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
(($196,000))

$98,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($255,943,000))

$252,662,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $2,841,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $2,841,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for grants to county juvenile courts for the programs identified by the Washington state institute for public policy in its report: "Inventory of Evidence-based, Research-based, and Promising Practices for Prevention and Intervention Services for Children and Juveniles in the Child Welfare, Juvenile Justice, and Mental Health Systems." Additional funding for this purpose is provided through an interagency agreement with the health care authority. County juvenile courts shall apply to the department of children, youth, and families for funding for program-specific participation and the department shall provide grants to the courts consistent with the per-participant treatment costs identified by the institute.

(2) $1,537,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,537,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for expansion of the juvenile justice treatments and therapies in department of children, youth, and families programs identified by the Washington state institute for public policy in its report: "Inventory of Evidence-based, Research-based, and Promising Practices for Prevention and Intervention Services for Children and Juveniles in the Child Welfare, Juvenile Justice, and Mental Health Systems." The department may concentrate delivery of these treatments and therapies at a limited number of programs to deliver the treatments in a cost-effective manner.

(3)(a) $6,198,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $6,198,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to implement evidence- and research-based programs through community juvenile accountability grants, administration of the grants, and evaluations of programs funded by the grants. In addition to funding provided in this subsection, funding to implement alcohol and substance abuse treatment programs for locally committed offenders is provided through an interagency agreement with the health care authority.

(b) The department of children, youth, and families shall administer a block grant to county juvenile courts for the purpose of serving youth as defined in RCW 13.40.510(4)(a) in the county juvenile justice system. Funds dedicated to the block grant include: Consolidated juvenile service (CJS) funds, community juvenile accountability act (CJAA) grants, chemical dependency/mental health disposition alternative (CDDA), and suspended disposition alternative (SDA). The department of children, youth, and families shall follow the following formula and must prioritize evidence-based programs and disposition alternatives and take into account juvenile courts program-eligible youth in conjunction with the number of youth served in each approved evidence-based program or disposition alternative: (i) Thirty-seven and one-half percent for the at-risk population of youth ten to seventeen years old; (ii) fifteen percent for the assessment of low, moderate, and high-risk youth; (iii) twenty-five percent for evidence-based program participation; (iv) seventeen and one-half percent for minority populations; (v) three percent for the chemical dependency and mental health disposition alternative; and (vi) two percent for the suspended dispositional alternatives. Funding for the special sex offender disposition alternative (SSODA) shall not be included in the block grant, but allocated on the average daily population in juvenile courts. Funding for the evidence-based expansion grants shall be excluded from the block grant formula. Funds may be used for promising practices when approved by the department of children, youth, and families and juvenile courts, through the community juvenile accountability act committee, based on the criteria established in consultation with Washington state institute for public policy and the juvenile courts.

(c) The department of children, youth, and families and the juvenile courts shall establish a block grant funding formula oversight committee with equal representation from the department of children, youth, and families and the juvenile courts. The purpose of this committee is to assess the ongoing implementation of the block grant funding formula, utilizing data-driven decision making and the most current available information. The committee will be co-chaired by the department of children, youth, and families and the juvenile courts, who will also have the ability to change members of the committee as needed to achieve its purpose. The committee may make changes to the formula categories in (d)(ii) of this subsection if it determines the changes will increase statewide service delivery or effectiveness of evidence-based program or disposition alternative resulting in increased cost/benefit savings to the state, including long-term cost/benefit savings. The committee must also consider these outcomes in determining when evidence-based expansion or special sex offender disposition alternative funds should be included in the block grant or left separate.

(d) The juvenile courts and administrative office of the courts must collect and distribute information and provide access to the data systems to the department of children, youth, and families and the Washington state institute for public policy related to program and outcome data. The department of children, youth, and families and the juvenile courts must work collaboratively to develop program outcomes that reinforce the greatest cost/benefit to the state in the implementation of evidence-based practices and disposition alternatives.

(4) $645,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $645,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for funding of the teamchild project.

(5) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a grant program focused on criminal street gang prevention and intervention. The department of children, youth, and families may award grants under this subsection. The department of children, youth, and families shall give priority to applicants who have demonstrated the greatest problems with criminal street gangs. Applicants composed of, at a minimum, one or more local governmental entities and one or more nonprofit, nongovernmental organizations that have a documented history of creating and administering effective criminal street gang prevention and intervention programs may apply for funding under this subsection. Each entity receiving funds must report to the department of children, youth, and families on the number and types of youth served, the services provided, and the impact of those services on the youth and the community.

(6) The juvenile rehabilitation institutions may use funding appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods, supplies, and services through hospital group purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.

(7) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for grants to county juvenile courts to establish alternative detention facilities similar to the proctor house model in Jefferson county, Washington, that will provide less restrictive confinement alternatives to youth in their local communities. County juvenile courts shall apply to the department of children, youth, and families for funding and each entity receiving funds must report to the department on the number and types of youth serviced, the services provided, and the impact of those services on the youth and the community.

(8) $432,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $432,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to provide housing services to clients releasing from incarceration into the community.

(9) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely to assess the juvenile court assessment tool. The juvenile rehabilitation program shall contract with the Washington state institute for public policy to review the standardized juvenile court assessment tool to access whether it accurately determines eligibility criteria and properly assigns youth to programs that meet their needs. The institute must work in collaboration with the juvenile block grant proviso committee.

(10)(a) $773,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $986,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1186 (concerning juvenile rehabilitation community transition services).

(b) Of the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection, $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $105,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for housing vouchers.

(11) $128,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1295 (institutional ed./release).

(12) $122,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $123,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5118 (supporting successful reentry).

(13) Sufficient funding is provided within this section for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5304 (reentry services/state and local institutions).

(14) Within existing resources, the department shall evaluate the Martin hall juvenile detention facility located in Medical Lake as an option for increased capacity needs for the juvenile rehabilitation program.

(15) $711,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $848,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2050 (parent pay/child detention). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(16)(a) The block grant oversight committee, as defined in RCW 13.40.511, shall work in collaboration with the Washington state institute for public policy, the University of Washington's evidence-based practice institute, and the children and family and early learning divisions of the department of children, youth, and families to develop recommendations for the expansion of community juvenile accountability programs funded through juvenile court block grant funding provided by the juvenile rehabilitation division of the department of children, youth, and families and the juvenile courts. The committee's recommendations shall include consideration of the expansion of:

(i) Block grant funding to community juvenile programs that provide services to juveniles assessed as low risk;

(ii) Block grant funding to community juvenile programs that provide services that are not solely focused on reducing recidivism;

(iii) Available block grant funding needed to complete evaluations of programs such that more programs may be evaluated to be classified as evidence-based; and

(iv) Classifications used by the Washington state institute for public policy to demonstrate the effectiveness of programs provided by juvenile court.

(b) The block grant oversight committee must report its findings and recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 1, 2022.

(17) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the juvenile rehabilitation administration to contract with a peer navigator program that currently mentors and assists with the needs of justice-involved youth and young adults who are from the city of Federal Way and who are currently residing at the Green Hill school. The mentorship program must provide peer coaching and support by aiding in the personal and professional development of incarcerated youth and young adults through life skills, job readiness, youth leadership, and results-based projects.

(18) $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $156,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for two juvenile education-security staff positions for juvenile rehabilitation's GED education programs. One education-security position must be located at the Echo Glen children's center to assist with the open doors program and one education-security position must be located at the Green Hill school. The goal of the education-security positions is to provide dependable, daily education opportunities for students participating in the GED programs located at the respective institutional facilities. The education-security positions are responsible for providing daily escort to and from the classroom for students attending school and for providing classroom management during the period while students are attending classes.

(19) $2,100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for maintaining staffing levels at juvenile rehabilitation facilities independent from fluctuating caseloads.

(20) The department of children, youth, and families—juvenile rehabilitation must cease new placements at the Naselle youth camp, with the goal of closing the camp by June 30, 2023. It is the intention of the legislature after the closure to transfer management of the Naselle youth camp land and facilities to the department of natural resources in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium and develop the facilities into an outdoor school. The department must assist the department of natural resources and the office of the superintendent of public instruction with the proposal on the use of the Naselle youth camp for an outdoor school as needed pursuant to section 310 of this act.

(21) $1,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5657 (juvenile instit./comp sci).

Sec. 1225. 2022 c 297 s 229 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES—EARLY LEARNING PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$327,631,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($402,195,000))

$400,406,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,070,579,000))

$1,106,032,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$100,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$28,172,000

Home Visiting Services Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$25,579,000

Home Visiting Services Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$29,776,000

Washington Opportunity Pathways Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$80,000,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$8,482,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,972,514,000))

$2,006,178,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) $82,040,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $132,776,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, $24,070,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation, $80,000,000 of the opportunity pathways account—state appropriation, and $25,452,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA/GEER) are provided solely for the early childhood education and assistance program. These amounts shall support at least 15,162 slots in fiscal year 2022 and 16,278 slots in fiscal year 2023. Of the total slots in each fiscal year, 100 slots must be reserved for foster children to receive school-year-round enrollment.

(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $14,930,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $14,889,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA/GEER) are for a slot rate increase of ten percent beginning July 1, 2021. The funding provided in this subsection is sufficient for the department to increase rates according to inflation, pursuant to Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5237 (child care & early dev. exp.), beginning in fiscal year 2023 and annually thereafter.

(c) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $2,664,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided to convert 777 part day slots to full day slots in fiscal year 2023.

(d) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $409,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $859,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a $54 per slot quality support rate, which will increase by 1.5 percent annually beginning in fiscal year 2024.

(e) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $1,358,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $4,612,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to provide early childhood education and assistance program services during summer 2022 to 2,212 ((part))school day program slots, including 2,011 slots in an in-person learning program and 201 slots provided other additional services.

(f) The department of children, youth, and families must develop a methodology to identify, at the school district level, the geographic locations of where early childhood education and assistance program slots are needed to meet the entitlement specified in RCW 43.216.556. This methodology must be linked to the caseload forecast produced by the caseload forecast council and must include estimates of the number of slots needed at each school district and the corresponding facility needs required to meet the entitlement in accordance with RCW 43.216.556. This methodology must be included as part of the budget submittal documentation required by RCW 43.88.030.

(2) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to develop and provide culturally relevant supports for parents, family, and other caregivers.

(3) The department is the lead agency for and recipient of the federal child care and development fund grant. Amounts within this grant shall be used to fund child care licensing, quality initiatives, agency administration, and other costs associated with child care subsidies.

(4) The legislature recognizes that the federal government has provided substantial additional funding through the coronavirus response and relief supplemental appropriations act, P.L. 116-260, division M. and the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2. The purpose of the additional federal funding is to ensure access to affordable child care and to stabilize and support child care providers from the effects of the COVID-19 pandemic. The legislature intends with the passage of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5237 (child care & early dev. exp.) to implement these federal purposes by expanding eligibility for subsidized child care, reducing parent copayments, increasing provider base rates to recognize increased costs, and providing other financial support to stabilize the child care sector to remain open or to reopen. The legislature finds that the state lacked the fiscal capacity to make these investments and the additional federal funding has provided the opportunity to supplement state funding to expand and accelerate child care access, affordability, and provider support as the state navigates the COVID-19 pandemic and its aftermath.

(5) $39,723,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2022, (($54,505,000))$34,062,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2023, $8,482,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation, (($283,375,000))$242,980,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation, $59,893,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CARES), $98,723,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA), and $153,814,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) are provided solely for the working connections child care program under RCW 43.216.135. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) The department of children, youth, and families shall work in collaboration with the department of social and health services to determine the appropriate amount of state expenditures for the working connections child care program to claim towards the state's maintenance of effort for the temporary assistance for needy families program. The departments will also collaborate to track the average monthly child care subsidy caseload and expenditures by fund type, including child care development fund, general fund—state appropriation, and temporary assistance for needy families for the purpose of estimating the annual temporary assistance for needy families reimbursement from the department of social and health services to the department of children, youth, and families. Effective December 1, 2022, and annually thereafter, the department of children, youth, and families must report to the governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature the total state contribution for the working connections child care program claimed the previous fiscal year towards the state's maintenance of effort for the temporary assistance for needy families program and the total temporary assistance for needy families reimbursement from the department of social and health services for the previous fiscal year.

(b) $6,390,000 is for the compensation components of the 2021-2023 collective bargaining agreement covering family child care providers as provided in section 947 of this act. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(i) $4,410,000 is for a 35 cent per hour per child rate increase for family, friends, and neighbor providers (FFNs) beginning July 1, 2022;

(ii) $854,000 is to increase the rate paid to providers who reach level 3.5 of the state's early achievers quality rating system by two percent beginning July 1, 2021; and

(iii) $1,126,000 is to increase the nonstandard hour care rate by $10.00 per child per month beginning July 1, 2021.

(c) $42,562,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) and $2,785,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA) are provided solely for the implementation of an agreement reached between the governor and the service employees international union local 925 for a cost of care rate enhancement for family child care providers under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for fiscal year 2023 as provided in section 940 of this act.

(d) $45,935,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for a 16 percent subsidy base rate enhancement for child care centers for fiscal year 2023.

(e) It is the intent of the legislature to continue to rebase child care provider subsidy base rates to the 85th percentile of market in subsequent fiscal biennia.

(f) $59,893,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CARES), $65,925,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA), and $99,918,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) are provided solely for enhancements to the working connections child care ((connections)) program, pursuant to Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5237 (child care & early dev. exp.). Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(i) $28,759,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CARES), $11,993,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA), and $35,979,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) are provided solely for the implementation of reduced household child care monthly copayments. For households at or below 50 percent of the state median income, copayments are capped at $115 through January 1, 2022, and $90 from January 1, 2022, through fiscal year 2023. For households at or below 60 percent of the state median income, copayments are capped at $115 through June 30, 2023.

(ii) $31,134,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CARES), $40,195,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA), and $45,476,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) are provided solely to increase subsidy base rates to the 85th percentile of market for child care providers. The state and the representative for family child care providers must enter into bargaining over the implementation of subsidy rate increases, and apply those increases consistent with the terms of this proviso and the agreement reached between the parties.

(iii) $3,930,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA) and $4,903,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) are provided solely to waive work requirements for student parents utilizing the working connections child care program.

(iv) $6,726,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA) and $10,633,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) are provided solely to expand eligibility for the working connections child care program to households at or below 60 percent of state median income, beginning October 1, 2021.

(v) $1,549,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA) and $982,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) are provided solely for the department to implement an infant rate enhancement for child care providers.

(g) $21,215,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA) is provided solely for enrollment based payments from April 2022 through June 2022.

(h) On July 1, 2021, and July 1, 2022, the department, in collaboration with the department of social and health services, must report to the governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature on the status of overpayments in the working connections child care program. The report must include the following information for the previous fiscal year:

(i) A summary of the number of overpayments that occurred;

(ii) The reason for each overpayment;

(iii) The total cost of overpayments;

(iv) A comparison to overpayments that occurred in the past two preceding fiscal years; and

(v) Any planned modifications to internal processes that will take place in the coming fiscal year to further reduce the occurrence of overpayments.

(6) Within available amounts, the department in consultation with the office of financial management shall report enrollments and active caseload for the working connections child care program to the governor and the legislative fiscal committees and the legislative-executive WorkFirst poverty reduction oversight task force on an agreed upon schedule. The report shall also identify the number of cases participating in both temporary assistance for needy families and working connections child care. The department must also report on the number of children served through contracted slots.

(7) $623,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $935,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $6,701,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the seasonal child care program.

(8) $871,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $871,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department of children, youth, and families to contract with a countywide nonprofit organization with early childhood expertise in Pierce county for a pilot project to prevent child abuse and neglect using nationally recognized models.

(a) The nonprofit organization must continue to implement a countywide resource and referral linkage system for families of children who are prenatal through age five.

(b) The nonprofit organization must offer a voluntary brief newborn home visiting program. The program must meet the diverse needs of Pierce county residents and, therefore, it must be flexible, culturally appropriate, and culturally responsive. The department, in collaboration with the nonprofit organization, must examine the feasibility of leveraging federal and other fund sources, including federal Title IV-E and medicaid funds, for home visiting provided through the pilot. The department must report its findings to the governor and appropriate legislative committees by September 1, 2022.

(9)(a) $5,899,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $8,382,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the early childhood intervention prevention services (ECLIPSE) program. The department shall contract for ECLIPSE services to provide therapeutic child care and other specialized treatment services to abused, neglected, at-risk, and/or drug-affected children. The department shall pursue opportunities to leverage other funding to continue and expand ECLIPSE services. Priority for services shall be given to children referred from the department.

(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection (9), $1,246,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $3,719,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the expansion of ECLIPSE services, pursuant to Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5237 (child care & early dev. exp.). Funding provided for the expansion of services is intended to serve new geographic areas not currently served by ECLIPSE services.

(10) The department shall place a ten percent administrative overhead cap on any contract entered into with the University of Washington. In a bi-annual report to the governor and the legislature, the department shall report the total amount of funds spent on the quality rating and improvements system and the total amount of funds spent on degree incentives, scholarships, and tuition reimbursements.

(11) $1,728,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,728,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for reducing barriers for low-income providers to participate in the early achievers program.

(12) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a contract with a nonprofit entity experienced in the provision of promoting early literacy for children through pediatric office visits.

(13) $4,000,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for early intervention assessment and services.

(14) The department shall work with state and local law enforcement, federally recognized tribal governments, and tribal law enforcement to develop a process for expediting fingerprinting and data collection necessary to conduct background checks for tribal early learning and child care providers.

(15) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 202, Laws of 2017 (children's mental health).

(16) Within existing resources, the department shall implement chapter 409, Laws of 2019 (early learning access).

(17)(a) $7,355,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $11,126,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, $11,032,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA), and $9,632,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5237 (child care & early dev. exp.). The legislature intends for the appropriations provided in this subsection to stabilize and support child care providers and early learning contractors and to expand families' access to affordable, quality child care and early learning during and after the COVID-19 public health emergency. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(i) $2,535,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $2,535,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $4,604,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA) are provided solely for the implementation of complex needs funds.

(ii) $966,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA) and $1,836,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) are provided solely for the implementation of trauma-informed care supports.

(iii) $180,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $3,200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to implement dual language rate enhancements.

(iv) $671,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $656,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $3,982,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) are provided solely for the implementation of equity grants.

(v) $773,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $958,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, $1,500,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA), and $900,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) are provided solely for infant and early childhood mental health consultation.

(vi) $365,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA) and $495,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) are provided solely for the expansion of family, friend, and neighbor child care play and learn groups.

(vii) $930,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $1,075,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, $3,597,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA), and $2,419,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) are provided solely for the implementation of trainings, early achievers scholarships, and other professional development activities. Amounts provided in this subsection may be used to contract with a nonprofit organization that provides relationship-based professional development support to family, friend, and neighbor, child care center, and licensed family care providers.

(viii) $1,585,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $2,196,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to expand the birth-to-three early childhood education and assistance program.

(ix) $421,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $408,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to collaborate with the department of commerce on technical assistance to employers interested in providing child care to employees.

(b) The state and the representative for family child care providers must enter into bargaining over the implementation of grants and rate increases included in this proviso, and apply those increases consistent with the terms of this proviso and the agreement reached between the parties.

(18) $265,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $265,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a statewide family resource and referral linkage system, with coordinated access point of resource navigators who will connect families with children prenatal through age five with services, programs, and community resources through a facilitated referral and linkage process.

(19)(a) $414,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) is provided solely for the department to establish a pilot project to determine the feasibility of a child care license category for multi-site programs operating under one owner or one entity. The department shall adopt rules to implement the pilot project and may waive or adapt licensing requirements when necessary to allow for the operation of a new license category. Pilot participants must include, at least:

(i) One governmental agency;

(ii) One nonprofit organization; and

(iii) One for-profit private business.

(b) New or existing license child care providers may participate in the pilot. When selecting and approving pilot project locations, the department shall aim to select a mix of rural, urban, and suburban locations. By July 1, 2024, the department shall submit to the relevant committees of the legislature recommendations on whether to permanently implement this license category and what, if any, changes are needed to law to accomplish this.

(20)(a) $2,771,000 of the home visiting account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $5,299,000 of the home visiting account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $3,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) are provided to expand home visiting services, enhance data collection, and support the local implementing agencies providing home visiting services. The department shall:

(i) Contract with local implementing agencies to expand home visiting services by October 1, 2021; and

(ii) Provide semiannual updates to the home visiting advisory committee established in RCW 43.216.130 that includes an updated number of families served in home visiting programs and a status of the home visiting services account balance.

(iii) The home visiting advisory committee established in RCW 43.216.130 shall make recommendations to the department and the legislature by June 1, 2022, containing strategies for supporting home visiting providers and serving additional families. Recommendations should include, but are not limited to, strategies in the 2019 report to the legislature Opportunities and Considerations for Expanding Home Visiting Services in Washington State, such as enhancing data system collections and reporting, professional development supports, and rate adjustments to reimburse for the true cost of service delivery.

(b) Of the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection, $2,528,000 of the home visiting account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $3,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) are provided for additional home visiting services in order to implement Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5237 (child care & early dev. exp.).

(21) The appropriations in this section are sufficient funding to implement section 29 of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5151 (foster care & child care).

(22)(a) $390,600,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) and $9,400,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CARES) are provided solely for the department to distribute grants to child care providers to stabilize the child care industry as part of the state's response to the COVID-19 public health emergency. Child care providers are eligible for grants if they are eligible for child care development fund moneys or if they are licensed, regulated, or registered within the state. The funding provided in this subsection must be expended consistent with federal law. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(i) (($27,342,000))$14,342,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) is provided solely for the department to administer the grant program, including but not limited to costs related to creating and administering the online grant application, providing technical assistance and support for applying for and accessing the grants, publicizing the availability of the grants, and processing applications on a rolling basis.

(ii) $11,718,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) is provided solely for the department to contract with an organization to provide language access support to child care providers during the grant application process, including but not limited to translation services, community-based support related to the grant application process, and other grant application support.

(iii) $351,540,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) and $9,400,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CARES) are provided solely for child care stabilization grants to eligible child care providers as defined in section 2202 of the American rescue plan act of 2021 (ARPA). In applying for grants, child care providers are expected to meet the certification requirements defined in section 2202(d)(2)(D)(i) of ARPA. To the extent practicable, at least 10 percent of each grant awarded to an eligible child care provider must be used for compensation increases to employees working at a provider's facility. The department must make its best efforts to distribute 75 percent of the funding provided in this subsection by January 1, 2022, with the remaining 25 percent distributed by June 30, 2022. To the extent practicable, the department must prioritize: Providers in child care deserts; providers serving or located in marginalized, low-income communities or communities of color; and providers that help support racial equity across the state. In processing applications, to the extent practicable the department must also prioritize grant applications that include funding for the following purposes:

(A) Rent or mortgage payments;

(B) Copayment or tuition waivers for families receiving care, including refunds or credits to families who are not attending but are paying tuition in order to maintain a child's spot in the facility;

(C) Child care for historically disadvantaged populations;

(D) Child care during the summer months;

(E) Child care during nonstandard hours;

(F) Child care for school-age children;

(G) Outreach to families who may have stopped attending due to cost;

(H) Mental health supports for children and employees;

(I) Broadband access for child care providers that care for school-age children; and

(J) Personnel costs, including compensation, benefits, health care premium pay, or paid leave.

(iv) $13,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) is provided solely for the department to administer noncompetitive workforce retention grants that will provide a one-time payment to on-site workers at providers meeting the licensing requirements outlined in (a) of this subsection (22) and who previously applied for a child care stabilization grant. The one-time payments will be the same amount for each worker. The department must make its best effort to distribute the funding by October 31, 2022.

(b) Nothing in this subsection changes the department's responsibility to collectively bargain over mandatory subjects consistent with RCW 41.56.028(3) or limits the legislature's authority to make programmatic modifications to licensed child care and early learning programs consistent with legislative reservation of rights under RCW 41.56.028(4)(d).

(23) $500,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CARES) is provided solely for the department to hire two temporary language access coordinators with specialties in Spanish and Somali to address immediate language access needs at the department related to COVID-19 child care relief and recovery in department programs, including but not limited to:

(a) Translation of department materials;

(b) Outreach to community organizations serving multilingual children and families regarding department programs;

(c) Webinars and other technical assistance provided in Spanish and Somali for department programs; and

(d) Other means of increasing language access and equity for early learning providers and caregivers in health and safety, licensing and regulations, and public funding opportunities for programs offered by the department.

(24) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $30,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to convene a work group that assesses and provides recommendations for creating new infrastructures and funding streams that support youth development. The work group must include representatives from community-based organizations providing youth development programs, including expanded learning, mentoring, school age child care, and wrap around supports and integrated student support. The department must report its findings and recommendations to the governor and legislature by September 1, 2022. The report must include the following recommendations:

(a) Programmatic changes for breaking down silos and barriers for youth programming between state agencies;

(b) The appropriate program within the department to develop meaningful youth-level, research-based prevention and promotion outcomes, and to support community-based organizations providing those outcomes;

(c) The establishment of a state grant program to provide quality youth development opportunities for children and youth ages five through high school graduation; and

(d) Strategies to increase access to youth development programs for prioritized populations such as children of color, foster children, children experiencing homelessness, and children involved in the justice system.

(25) $5,548,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) is provided solely for allocations from federal funding as authorized in section 2014, the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2.

(26)(a) The department must provide to the education research and data center, housed at the office of financial management, data on all state-funded early childhood programs. These programs include the early support for infants and toddlers, early childhood education and assistance program (ECEAP), and the working connections and seasonal subsidized childcare programs including license-exempt facilities or family, friend, and neighbor care. The data provided by the department to the education research data center must include information on children who participate in these programs, including their name and date of birth, and dates the child received services at a particular facility.

(b) ECEAP early learning professionals must enter any new qualifications into the department's professional development registry starting in the 2015-16 school year, and every school year thereafter. By October 2017, and every October thereafter, the department must provide updated ECEAP early learning professional data to the education research data center.

(c) The department must request federally funded head start programs to voluntarily provide data to the department and the education research data center that is equivalent to what is being provided for state-funded programs.

(d) The education research and data center must provide an updated report on early childhood program participation and K-12 outcomes to the house of representatives appropriations committee and the senate ways and means committee using available data every March for the previous school year.

(e) The department, in consultation with the department of social and health services, must withhold payment for services to early childhood programs that do not report on the name, date of birth, and the dates a child received services at a particular facility.

(27) Funding in this section is sufficient for the department to collaborate with the department of commerce to jointly convene and facilitate a child care collaborative task force to continue the work of the task force created in chapter 368, Laws of 2019 (2SHB 1344) to establish a true cost of quality of child care. The task force shall report its findings and recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 1, 2022.

(28) $900,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the department to provide early childhood education and assistance program services during July and August of 2021 to address learning loss and to meet the unique educational and other needs of 468 children whose enrollment was interrupted or delayed due to the COVID-19 public health emergency.

(29) $260,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to implement an infant and early childhood mental health consultation initiative to support tribal child care and early learning programs. Funding may be used to provide culturally congruent infant and early childhood mental health supports for tribal child care, tribal early childhood education and assistance program, and tribal head start providers. The department must consult with federally recognized tribes which may include round tables through the Indian policy early learning committee.

(30) $640,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to help expand and support family, friend, or neighbor caregivers with a focus on the provision of play and learn groups. Funding provided in this subsection may be used for the department to:

(a) Fund consistent staffing across the state's six geographic regions to support the needs of family, friend, or neighbor caregivers;

(b) Contract with a statewide child care resource and referral program to sustain and expand the number of facilitated play groups to meet the needs of communities statewide;

(c) Support existing infrastructure for organizations that have developed the three existing play and learn program models so they have capacity to provide training, technical assistance, evaluation, data collection, and other support needed for implementation; and

(d) Provide direct implementation support to community-based organizations that offer play and learn groups.

(31) $1,267,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to pay the application and fingerprint processing fees on behalf of child care providers to reduce the time involved to complete background checks.

(32) $900,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the Washington communities for children for costs to complete its work pursuant to a federal preschool development grant that expires at the end of calendar year 2022. Allowable costs are only those incurred from January 2023 through June 2023.

Sec. 1226. 2022 c 297 s 230 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES—PROGRAM SUPPORT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$192,655,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($207,977,000))

$231,197,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($190,601,000))

$168,612,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($459,000))

$579,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$180,000

Home Visiting Services Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$472,000

Home Visiting Services Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$380,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($592,724,000))

$594,075,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a Washington state mentoring organization to continue its public-private partnerships providing technical assistance and training to mentoring programs that serve at-risk youth.

(2)(a) $1,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $1,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $2,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of an agreement reached between the governor and the Washington federation of state employees for the language access providers under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, as provided in section 945 of this act.

(b) $6,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $2,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of an agreement reached between the governor and the Washington federation of state employees for the language access providers under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for fiscal year 2023 as provided in section 938 of this act.

(3) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a full-time employee to coordinate policies and programs to support pregnant and parenting individuals receiving chemical dependency or substance use disorder treatment.

(4) $505,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $505,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to collaborate with the office of the superintendent of public instruction to complete a report with options and recommendations for administrative efficiencies and long-term strategies that align and integrate high-quality early learning programs administered by both agencies and consistent with implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5237 (child care dev. exp.). The report, due September 1, 2022, shall address capital needs, data collection and data sharing, licensing changes, quality standards, options for community-based and school-based settings with inclusive facilities and operations, fiscal modeling, statutory changes needed to achieve administrative efficiencies, and all other requirements of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5237 (child care & early dev. exp.).

(5) Within existing resources, the department shall submit a brief report to the governor and appropriate legislative committees by December 1, 2022, outlining options for creating a new dedicated account for adoption support that will meet 42 U.S.C. Sec. 473 requirements. The report shall include a methodology for calculating savings in a manner that can be incorporated into the adoption support forecast budget process, statutory needs, and expenditure guidelines for the account.

(6) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a statewide nonprofit with demonstrated capability of partnering with state agencies and community organizations to develop public-facing regionalized data dashboards and reports to support the goals of the department and the early learning advisory council, pursuant to Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5237 (child care & early learning dev. exp.).

(7) $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $5,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1227 (child abuse allegations).

(8) $20,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $20,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5118 (reentry).

(9) $6,532,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $7,385,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $6,083,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA) are provided solely for the department to migrate the social service payment system to a cloud-based payment system in order to implement child care stabilization grants, child care subsidy rate enhancements, and other payments intended to support child care providers during and after the COVID-19 public health emergency, to implement changes to the social service payment system necessary to implement these payments, and for other improvements necessary for the successful implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5237 (child care & early dev. exp.). The amounts in this section are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(10) $250,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CARES) is provided solely for the department to develop or contract to develop a language access plan that addresses equity and access for immigrant, multilingual providers, caregivers, and families. The plan must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2022. The plan must include, but is not limited to, the following:

(a) A needs assessment and staffing recommendation for program accessibility at the department for individuals with limited English and a geographic landscape analysis of language needs for providers, caregivers, and families in their interactions with the department;

(b) A review of successful language access policies and practices in public agencies to effectively address the needs of non-English speaking families, providers, and other stakeholders;

(c) An alignment of best practices across the department in multilingual workforce development;

(d) A framework for proactive community engagement to provide child care providers, early learning providers, or families that speak languages other than English access to information and support in navigating English-dominant state resources at the department;

(e) Recommendations for a continuous improvement model of measuring progress and success in language access at the department; and

(f) Compliance with federal and state laws at the department.

(11) $40,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA) is provided solely for the department to establish a process for informing, upon clearance of required background checks, employees of licensed family home, center-based, and outdoor nature-based childcares about available financial supports and options for accessing health coverage. On at least an annual basis, no less than 45 days before the start of open-enrollment, the department must share with the health benefits exchange (exchange) and designated navigator organizations, but no additional third-party entity, workforce data identifying licensed childcare employees for the sole purpose of outreach, enrollment, verification, and other program implementation activities identified by the exchange. The department must share with the exchange and designated navigator organizations, but no additional third-party entity, workforce data identifying newly licensed childcare employees on an ongoing basis as needed during the plan year for the sole purpose of outreach, enrollment, verification, and other program implementation activities identified by the exchange.

(12) $1,494,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the department to implement the family first prevention services act requirements, including technology enhancements to support the automated assessments, data quality, and reporting requirements. Funding provided in this subsection is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(13) $267,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $717,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $223,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1219 (youth counsel/dependency).

(14) $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1295 (institutional ed/release).

(15) $848,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $848,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $384,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1194 (parent-child visitation).

(16) $1,292,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to expand its housing pilot to two additional sites. The housing pilot will serve hard-to-place foster youth who are at least 16 years old with housing and intensive case management.

(17) $32,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $64,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $24,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the extraordinary litigation expenses of the attorney general's office related to the case of D.S., et al. v. DCYF, United States district court western district of Washington case no. 2:21-cv-00111-BJR.

(18) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to contract with a nonprofit organization to provide culturally relevant support services to children and families when a child is removed from their parents due to potential abuse or neglect as defined in RCW 26.44.020(1). The nonprofit organization must have experience providing culturally relevant support services to children and families through daycare, the early childhood education and assistance program, and department of social and health services contracted services.

(19) $65,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1747 (child relative placements). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(20) $341,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $85,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1905 (homelessness/youth discharge). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(21) $26,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2068 (imagination library). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(22) $30,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $70,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department of children, youth, and families to partner with the department of commerce to codesign community-based family reconciliation services to assess and stabilize youth and families in crisis through primary prevention services. The codesign team shall include youth and families with lived experience, tribes, child welfare professionals, community-based providers, and representatives from state and local agencies, including the department of social and health services, the health care authority, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the employment security department, and juvenile court administrators. The codesign team must develop a community-based family reconciliation services program model that addresses entry points to services, program eligibility, utilization of family assessments, provision of concrete economic supports, referrals to and utilization of in-home services, and the identification of trauma-informed and culturally responsive practices. Preliminary recommendations from the codesign team must be submitted to the governor and appropriate legislative committees no later than December 1, 2022, with the annual family reconciliation services data required under RCW 13.32A.045.

(23) $83,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $12,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the phase-in of the settlement agreement under D.S. et al. v. Department of Children, Youth, and Families et al., United States district court for the western district of Washington, cause no. 2:21-cv-00113-BJR. The department must implement the provisions of the settlement agreement pursuant to the timeline and implementation plan provided for under the settlement agreement. This includes implementing provisions related to monitoring and implementation.

(24) $580,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for housing support services associated with the family reunification program located in King county.

(End of part)

PART XIII

NATURAL RESOURCES

SUPPLEMENTAL

Sec. 1301. 2022 c 297 s 301 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COLUMBIA RIVER GORGE COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$752,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($845,000))

$1,195,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$32,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$1,374,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($3,003,000))

$3,353,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $94,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $94,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a land use planner to provide land use planning services dedicated to Klickitat county. Because the activities of the land use planner are solely for the benefit of Washington state, Oregon is not required to provide matching funds for this activity.

(2) $88,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $213,000 of the general fund—private/local appropriation are provided solely for the access database replacement project, and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

Sec. 1302. 2022 c 297 s 303 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($754,000))

$838,000

Pollution Liability Insurance Agency Underground

Storage Tank Revolving Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($957,000))

$952,000

Pollution Liability Insurance Program Trust Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,427,000))

$1,422,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($3,138,000))

$3,212,000

Sec. 1303. 2022 c 297 s 304 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$29,496,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($33,312,000))

$33,914,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$7,154,000

Winter Recreation Program Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,906,000

Millersylvania Park Current Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$5,000

ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$387,000

Snowmobile Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$5,682,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$367,000

Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($142,302,000))

$143,710,000

Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account—Private/Local

Appropriation
. . . .
$420,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($224,031,000))

$226,041,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $129,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $129,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a grant for the operation of the Northwest weather and avalanche center.

(2) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the commission to pay assessments charged by local improvement districts.

(3) $406,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $322,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $88,000 of the parks renewal and stewardship account—state appropriation are provided solely for operating budget impacts from capital budget projects funded in the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium.

(4) $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $464,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for an update to the Seashore conservation area survey and plan.

(5) $130,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $130,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the commission to hire a diversity, equity, and inclusion coordinator to expand the diversity of the agency's workforce.

(6) $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the facilitation of a work group that includes representation from the state parks and recreation commission, the commission on African American affairs, and stakeholders with expertise of the black experience in outdoor recreation to identify barriers to inclusion and develop recommendations to increase participation of Black Washingtonians in the state parks system and other outdoor recreation spaces and public parks. The work group will be selected by the governor's office and will consist of at least twelve participants representing diverse geographic, socioeconomic, and experiential backgrounds. The parks commission will enter into an interagency agreement with the commission on African American affairs to procure a contractor to facilitate the work group and develop a report with recommendations. The amount provided in this subsection may also be used for a survey or focus group to assess the needs of Black Washingtonians related to state parks and outdoor recreation. The work group will submit a report to the governor's office and appropriate committees of the legislature no later than April 1, 2022.

(7) $7,900,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $7,900,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the commission to increase customer service, conduct more custodial maintenance, expand interpretive services, accelerate work on preventative maintenance and improve the conditions of park facilities, and expand public safety.

(8) $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $6,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5259 (law enforcement data).

(9) $76,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $757,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the commission to address needs identified in the "2017 vulnerability assessment" conducted by the climate impacts group.

(10) $114,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $705,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for 2023 are provided solely for the commission to dedicate resources to government-to-government consultations with Indian tribes and implement executive order 21-02, archaeological and cultural resources.

(11)(a) $160,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for a contract with a statewide trail maintenance and hiking nonprofit organization to provide the emerging leaders program: expanding equity in the outdoors. The goal of the program is expanding both the number and diversity of trained, qualified individuals available for employment in the outdoor recreation and natural resource management sectors.

(b) The program must demonstrate a commitment to diversity, equity, and inclusion by providing a safe and supportive environment for individuals of diverse backgrounds, including those who have been historically underrepresented in the outdoor recreation and natural resource sectors, such as indigenous people and people of color.

(c) The program must provide both technical outdoor skills training and professional development opportunities that include, but are not limited to, outdoor leadership, representation in the outdoors, and team building.

(12) $1,250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to address the maintenance backlog associated with providing recreation on lands managed by the commission. Allowable uses include, but are not limited to, general maintenance of facilities and grounds, equipment, and construction materials, and maintenance of trails and trailheads, restrooms, campgrounds, picnic sites, water access areas, signs, kiosks, and access roads. The commission is encouraged to partner with nonprofit organizations in the maintenance of public lands.

(13) $5,500,000 of the parks renewal and stewardship account—state appropriation is provided solely for the commission to replace major equipment that has been used for over 15 years. The commission must prioritize selecting electric motors over gasoline engines when the option is available and the machinery is compatible for the intended task.

Sec. 1304. 2022 c 297 s 305 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$4,273,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($29,175,000))

$4,175,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$4,329,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$24,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$385,000

Firearms Range Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$37,000

Recreation Resources Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,355,000

NOVA Program Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,486,000

Youth Athletic Facility Nonappropriated Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$181,000

((Salmon Recovery Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$75,000,000))

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($119,245,000))

$19,245,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to pass through to the Spokane tribe of Indians for a pilot study of salmon migratory behavior and survival upstream of the Chief Joseph and Grand Coulee dams.

(2)(a) $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely to conduct a comprehensive equity review of state grant programs administered by the office. The office may, in consultation with the interested parties identified in (d) of this subsection, contract with a consultant to assist with the community engagement and review necessary to complete this review process.

(b) The purposes of this comprehensive equity review are:

(i) To reduce barriers to historically underserved populations' participation in recreation and conservation office grant programs;

(ii) To redress inequities in existing recreation and conservation office policies and programs; and

(iii) To improve the equitable delivery of resources and benefits in these programs.

(c) In completing the comprehensive equity review required under this section, the office shall:

(i) Identify changes to policy and operational norms and practices in furtherance of the equity review purposes identified in (b) of this subsection;

(ii) Identify new investments and programs that prioritize populations and communities that have been historically underserved by conservation and recreation policies and programs; and

(iii) Include consideration of historic and systemic barriers that may arise due to any of the following factors: Race, ethnicity, religion, income, geography, disability, and educational attainment.

(d) The office must collaborate with: (i) The Washington state commission on African American affairs; (ii) the Washington state commission on Asian Pacific American affairs; (iii) the Washington state commission on Hispanic affairs; (iv) the governor's office of Indian affairs; (v) the governor's committee on disability issues and employment; (vi) the office of equity; (vii) the office of minority and women's business enterprises; (viii) the environmental justice council if established by passage of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5141; and (ix) other interested parties as appropriate to develop and conduct a community engagement process to inform the review.

(e) The office must complete the comprehensive equity review under this section and submit a final report, containing all of the elements and considerations specified in this section, to the legislature by June 30, 2022.

(3) $76,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $76,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1382 (salmon recovery projects).

(4) $200,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation, $12,000 of the general fund—private/local appropriation, and $116,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account—state appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5063 (invasive species council expiration).

(5) $37,000 of the firearms range account—state appropriation is provided solely to the recreation and conservation funding board for administration of the firearms range grant program as described in RCW 79A.25.210.

(6) $4,355,000 of the recreation resources account—state appropriation is provided solely to the recreation and conservation funding board for administrative and coordinating costs of the recreation and conservation office and the board as described in RCW 79A.25.080(1).

(7) $1,486,000 of the NOVA program account—state appropriation is provided solely to the recreation and conservation funding board for administration of the nonhighway and off-road vehicle activities program as described in chapter 46.09 RCW.

(8) $1,809,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,809,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization with a mission for salmon and steelhead restoration to install near-term solutions to prevent steelhead mortality at the Hood Canal bridge.

(9) $140,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $140,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the governor's salmon recovery office to coordinate ongoing recovery efforts of southern resident orcas and monitor progress toward implementation of recommendations from the governor's southern resident killer whale task force.

(10) $175,000 of the youth athletic facility nonappropriated account—state appropriation is provided solely for a task force to consider ways to improve equitable access to K-12 schools' fields and athletic facilities and local parks agency facilities with the goal of increasing physical activity for youth and families. The task force shall be created and managed by the recreation and conservation office. A portion of the funds must be used to inventory K-12 school fields and athletic facilities and park agency facilities, and for joint use agreements for these facilities. The task force participants must represent geographic diversity and must include representatives from the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the Washington association of school administrators, the association of Washington principals, and the Washington recreation and parks association; participants with a background in public health; and stakeholders who represent diverse communities and communities of color. The task force shall consider joint use agreements, partnerships, improved scheduling practices with local parks agencies including facility rental fees, and other strategies, and submit a report with best practices and policy recommendations to the recreation and conservation funding board. A final report from the board must be submitted to the governor's office and legislature no later than February 1, 2022.

(11) $209,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $209,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to contract for implementation of the Nisqually watershed stewardship plan.

(12) $30,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the office to facilitate the transfer of management authority over the project known as the beach lake conservation area from the current owner to a tribal government or local public government entity. If the current owner does not accept the offer to transfer management authority, then the office must pursue all legal means to enforce the right of public access consistent with the deed restrictions as set forth in the contract PSAR #15-1045. The amount provided in this subsection is intended to secure daily public access, during daylight hours, with minimal closures to the beach lake conservation area.

(13) $345,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $345,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the connections program to provide outdoor learning experiences and virtual learning support for vulnerable youth in the Blaine and Mount Baker school districts. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $25,000 in each fiscal year is provided solely for an organization in Whatcom county that increases access to environmental education.

(14) $139,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the governor's salmon recovery office to implement the governor's salmon recovery strategy update by convening the natural resources sub-cabinet on a regular basis and developing biennial statewide work priorities with a recommended budget for salmon recovery pursuant to RCW 77.85.030(4)(e) that align with tribal priorities and regional salmon recovery plans. The office shall submit the biennial implementation plan to the governor's office and the office of financial management no later than October 31, 2022.

(15) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the governor's salmon recovery office to provide a grant to the Spokane Tribe of Indians for purposes of forming a Spokane river watershed lead entity pursuant to RCW 77.85.050(1) and developing a habitat restoration strategy to support reintroduction of salmon upstream of Chief Joseph and Grand Coulee dams.

(16) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for motorized and nonmotorized boater education and outreach on Lake Union, with a specific goal of preventing boat and airplane conflicts on the lake during peak recreation season, given the provisions of United States coast guard navigation rules that seaplanes must in general keep well clear of other vessels. The office may grant funding to local or federal government agencies or nonprofit organizations. The office must publish a publicly available summary report by June 30, 2023, on funding recipients, uses of the funding, and the successes and failures of programs funded. Funding provided in this subsection may not be used to preclude or restrict public use of Lake Union, including recreational, commercial, or tribal use of the waters of the state.

(((17) $50,000,000 of the salmon recovery account—state appropriation is provided solely for the salmon recovery board to provide grants for projects valued at greater than $5,000,000 each that will benefit salmon recovery.

(18) $25,000,000 of the salmon recovery account—state appropriation is provided solely for the salmon recovery board to provide grants for watershed projects typically valued at less than $5,000,000 each that will benefit salmon recovery.

(19) $25,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the office to provide a grant for the Duckabush estuary restoration project.))

Sec. 1305. 2022 c 297 s 306 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE ENVIRONMENTAL AND LAND USE HEARINGS OFFICE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$2,735,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($2,981,000))

$3,006,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($5,716,000))

$5,741,000

Sec. 1306. 2022 c 297 s 307 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$11,189,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$19,405,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,482,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$100,000

Public Works Assistance Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$8,464,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,110,000

((Salmon Recovery Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$15,000,000))

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($57,750,000))

$42,750,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $100,000 of the general fund—private/local appropriation are provided solely for the sustainable farms and fields program created in RCW 89.08.615 to provide technical assistance, education, and outreach to promote carbon storage and reduce greenhouse gas emissions. Grant funds may be used to promote cover crops, cost-share opportunities such as purchases of equipment, seeds, soil amendments, and development of conservation plans that increase carbon storage and reduce greenhouse gas emissions.

(2) $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for conservation district technical assistance, project cultural resources review, project engineering, agency administration, and cost-share grants to landowners for recovery from wildfire damage, including, but not limited to, rebuilding fences, seeding unstable slopes, controlling weeds, and planting shrubs and trees for wildlife habitat.

(3) $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the commission to:

(a) Enter into an agreement with the department of ecology for a water bank in Okanogan county, which must focus solely on retaining agricultural water rights for use by other agricultural producers in the watershed of origin; and

(b) Report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2022, on the effectiveness of the Okanogan water bank at retaining agricultural water rights, and the potential for developing additional water banks in Washington using this model.

(4) $8,464,000 of the public works assistance account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of the voluntary stewardship program. This amount may not be used to fund agency indirect and administrative expenses.

(5) $170,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $170,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the commission to continue to convene and facilitate a food policy forum.

(6) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the commission to share evenly with conservation districts to increase assistance to landowners to achieve environmental stewardship and agricultural sustainability.

(7) $23,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $4,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5253 (pollinator health).

(8) $1,300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the commission to develop a riparian plant propagation program of native trees and shrubs to implement riparian restoration projects that meet riparian zone requirements established by the department of fish and wildlife. Plants will be made available for free or at a reduced cost to restoration projects.

(9) $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 ((and $5,000,000 of the salmon recovery account—state appropriation are))is provided solely for the purposes of the conservation reserve enhancement program, including additional project management and cost-share funding.

(10)(a) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to provide a grant to the King county conservation district for a pilot program to reduce the impacts of artificial lighting on or near the water (on-water lighting) on the behavior of salmon and other aquatic life in Lake Sammamish. The grant funding may be used for:

(i) Supporting local efforts to develop a model ordinance to reduce on-water lighting impacts on salmon for new and existing construction;

(ii) Education and outreach on the impacts of on-water lighting;

(iii) Development of methods to reduce the impacts of on-water lighting; and

(iv) A contract with the United States geologic survey to conduct a baseline survey of artificial light levels, including light location and intensity along the Lake Sammamish nearshore, artificial light hotspots, and a survey report.

(b) The department must report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2023, on the use of the funding in this subsection and the resulting reductions in on-water lighting.

(11) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2051 (agricultural disaster assist). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(12) $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the commission to grant to the Washington resource conservation and development council to complete a community wildfire protection plan.

(13) $2,700,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the commission to make available to local conservation districts for project engineering services to enable permit and design work for conservation projects.

(((14) $10,000,000 of the salmon recovery account—state appropriation is provided solely for the commission to provide grants for riparian restoration projects with landowners.))

Sec. 1307. 2022 c 297 s 308 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$99,986,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($153,153,000))

$153,712,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($133,906,000))

$133,920,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($64,980,000))

$64,982,000

ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$678,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($12,663,000))

$12,746,000

Recreational Fisheries Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,363,000))

$3,466,000

Warm Water Game Fish Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$3,481,000

Eastern Washington Pheasant Enhancement Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$865,000

Limited Fish and Wildlife Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($39,217,000))

$39,229,000

Special Wildlife Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,911,000

Special Wildlife Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$520,000

Special Wildlife Account—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$3,688,000

Wildlife Rehabilitation Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$661,000

Ballast Water and Biofouling Management Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$10,000

Regional Fisheries Enhancement Salmonid Recovery

Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$5,001,000

Oil Spill Prevention Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,219,000

Aquatic Invasive Species Management Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,037,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,979,000

Fish, Wildlife, and Conservation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($77,589,000))

$77,795,000

Oyster Reserve Land Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$524,000

((Salmon Recovery Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$3,000,000))

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($611,431,000))

$609,410,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1054 (peace officer tactics, equip).

(2) $29,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1310 (uses of force by officers).

(3) $534,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $472,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1382 (salmon recovery projects).

(4) $1,777,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,777,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to grant to the northwest Indian fisheries commission for hatchery operations that are prioritized to increase prey abundance for southern resident orcas, including $200,000 per fiscal year for tagging and marking costs, and the remainder to grant to tribes in the following amounts per fiscal year: $150,000 for the Quinault Indian Nation, $199,000 for the Tulalip Tribes, $268,000 for the Quileute Tribe, $186,000 for the Puyallup Tribe, $122,000 for the Port Gamble S'Klallam Tribe, $25,000 for the Muckleshoot Indian Tribe, $207,000 for the Squaxin Island Tribe, $142,000 for the Skokomish Indian Tribe, and $278,000 for the Lummi Nation. It is the intent of the legislature to continue this funding in future biennia.

(5) $330,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $330,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to provide to the Yakama Nation for hatchery operations that are prioritized to increase prey abundance for southern resident orcas. It is the intent of the legislature to continue this funding in future biennia.

(6) $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to grant to public utility districts for additional hatchery production that is prioritized to increase prey abundance for southern resident orcas. It is the intent of the legislature to continue this funding in future biennia.

(7) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to the department for hatchery maintenance.

(8) $3,139,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $467,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to pay for emergency fire suppression costs. These amounts may not be used to fund agency indirect and administrative expenses.

(9) $503,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $503,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $440,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for county assessments.

(10) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a state match to support the Puget Sound nearshore partnership between the department and the United States army corps of engineers.

(11) $555,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $558,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for operating budget impacts from capital budget projects funded in the 2019-2021 and 2021-2023 fiscal biennia.

(12) $477,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $477,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to develop conflict mitigation strategies for wolf recovery and staff resources in northeast Washington for response to wolf-livestock conflicts. The department must provide focus on minimizing wolf-livestock issues in the Kettle range. The department is discouraged from the use of firearms from helicopters for removing wolves.

(13) $251,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $251,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for suppression, eradication, and monitoring of northern pike in the Columbia river. The department must work with the Spokane Tribe of Indians, the Confederated Tribes of the Colville Reservation, and the Kalispel Tribe of Indians on identifying appropriate actions to reduce threats to anadromous salmon from invasive northern pike.

(14) $753,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $753,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for expanded management of pinniped populations on the lower Columbia river and its tributaries with the goal of increasing chinook salmon abundance and prey availability for southern resident orcas.

(15) $1,262,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,262,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the costs for the department to maintain shellfish sanitation activities necessary to implement its memorandum of understanding with the department of health to ensure the state is compliant with its federal obligations under the model ordinance of the national shellfish sanitation program.

(16) $603,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $603,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to create a statewide permittee assistance program as part of hydraulic project approvals, in which department staff collaborate with landowners during construction to help resolve risks of permit noncompliance.

(17) $470,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $470,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to expand efforts to survey the diets of seals and sea lions in Puget Sound and identify nonlethal management actions to deter them from preying on salmon and steelhead.

(18) $518,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $519,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to continue to provide policy and scientific support to the department of ecology regarding surface and groundwater management issues as part of implementing chapter 90.94 RCW streamflow restoration.

(19) $271,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $271,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 291, Laws of 2019 (southern resident orca whales–protection from vessels), contracts with nonprofit organizations to monitor vessel traffic and educate boaters to be whale wise, and participation in other orca recovery efforts.

(20) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the department, in coordination with statewide law enforcement agencies, must provide a report to the legislature by January, 2022 on the number of cougars reported to the department as harvested by local government law enforcement agencies, training opportunities provided to local law enforcement agencies, and how cougar removals by local enforcement agencies impact the department's cougar management strategies.

(21) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to implement priority actions in the state pinto abalone recovery plan. Of the amounts provided, $85,000 each fiscal year must be used to locate, monitor, and safeguard wild populations of pinto abalone along the strait of Juan de Fuca, outer coast, and San Juan islands and the remaining amounts must be granted to the Puget Sound restoration fund to increase production, diversity, and resilience of out-planted abalone.

(22) $315,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $315,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to research and monitor the impacts of polychlorinated biphenyls (PCB) on indicator species. The department must coordinate with the department of ecology on implementation of this subsection.

(23) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to conduct an evaluation of the forest practices adaptive management program. The evaluation will be carried out generally consistent with the proposal provided to the timber, fish, and wildlife (TFW) policy committee in January 2020 titled Assessing Changes in Uncertainty During Adaptive Management: A Case Study of the Washington State Forest Practices Habitat Conservation Plan. To the extent practicable, the evaluation shall satisfy the cooperative monitoring, evaluation, and research five-year peer review process as required in WAC 222-12-045(2)(f), and support other ongoing forest practices adaptive management program evaluation and improvement efforts. The department shall consult with TFW policy caucus participants during the evaluation and provide for public review and comment of the draft report. A progress report shall be delivered to TFW policy participants and appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2022, and a final report by June 30, 2023.

(24) $1,175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to restore shrubsteppe habitat and associated wildlife impacted by wildfires.

(a) This funding is intended for the restoration of habitat on public lands as well as private lands by landowners who are willing to participate. The restoration effort must be coordinated with other natural resource agencies and interested stakeholders.

(b) Restoration actions may include: (i) Increasing the availability of native plant materials; (ii) increasing the number of certified and trained personnel for implementation at scale; (iii) support for wildlife-friendly fencing replacement; (iv) support for private landowners/ranchers to defer wildland grazing and allow natural habitat regeneration; and (v) species-specific recovery actions.

(c) The department must submit a progress report to the appropriate committees of the legislature on the investments made under this subsection by December 1, 2022, with a final report submitted by September 1, 2023.

(d) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, $250,000 must be used by the department to form a collaborative group process representing diverse stakeholders and facilitated by a neutral third-party to develop a long-term strategy for shrubsteppe conservation and fire preparedness, response, and restoration to meet the needs of the state's shrubsteppe wildlife and human communities. The collaborative may serve as providing expertise and advice to the wildland fire advisory committee administered by the department of natural resources and build from the wildland fire 10-year strategic plan. Components to be addressed by the collaborative include the restoration actions described in (b) of this subsection and on spatial priorities for shrubsteppe conservation, filling gaps in fire coverage, management tools to reduce fire-prone conditions on public and private lands, and identifying and making recommendations on any other threats. Any reports and findings resulting from the collaborative may be included in the report specified in (c) of this subsection.

(25) $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to contract with the Washington state academy of sciences to provide policymakers with a report on current evidence on pinniped predation of salmon, with an emphasis on Washington's portion of the Salish sea and Washington's outer coast. The academy must provide an independent study that reviews the existing science regarding pinniped predation of salmonids, including what is known about pinniped predation of salmonids, and with what level of certainty; where the knowledge gaps are; where additional research is needed; how the science may inform decisionmakers; and assessment of the scientific and technical aspects of potential management actions. Early in this process, the academy must convene separate meetings with comanagers and scientists to share relevant research and data and provide context for the academy's work.

(26) $198,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $70,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5253 (pollinator health).

(27) $21,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5273 (shoreline armoring).

(28) $44,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $24,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5381 (fish passage project permits).

(29) $132,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $48,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5452 (electric-assisted bicycles).

(30) $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the department to conduct a pilot project to test New Zealand style elk fencing, similar to the style used by the United States Department of Agriculture at the Starkey Experimental Forest and Range, including materials and construction techniques, and determine the cost and effectiveness of the fence design in reducing damage to school property and agricultural lands within the range of the north Cascades elk herd. The department of fish and wildlife shall work with at least one agricultural property owner in Skagit county with property abutting state highway 20 and one school district located in Skagit county with enrollment of less than 650 students that volunteer to build and test the elk fence design and, in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, report back to the natural resources committees of the legislature by November 1, 2022, on the results of the pilot project.

(31) $155,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $310,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to implement strategies to control against chronic wasting disease in native species of the state.

(32) $841,000 of the fish, wildlife and conservation account—state appropriation, $430,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, and $411,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to work with stakeholders to improve steelhead spawning estimates for improved fishing regulations such that enhanced conservation and equitable fisheries are established.

(33) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to assist local jurisdictions in responding to cougar related public safety issues. The funding is available to a local jurisdiction if they have a signed agreement with the department that recognizes cougar management authority is vested in the department and provides criteria to determine if a cougar creates an actionable public safety risk eligible for financial assistance. For the purposes of this subsection, a cougar presence on private property alone does not create an actionable public safety risk.

(34) $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the department to complete the final phase of the Cowlitz river salmon and steelhead hook mortality study. No less than $60,000 of the amount provided in this subsection is provided for the original contractor of the study to complete their work. A final report shall be provided to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2022.

(35) $130,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $130,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for an external facilitator to seek solutions through a collaborative process using the department's wolf advisory group.

(36) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to develop a plan to protect native and hatchery produced steelhead for each river system of Grays harbor, Willapa bay, and coastal Olympic peninsula. The plan must adequately protect those fisheries for healthy runs year-after-year as well as provide reasonable fishing opportunities. The plan must include active stakeholder input and include an outreach strategy sufficient to keep conservation and angler interests well informed of proposed changes in advance of annual fishing seasons. The plan must be reported to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2022.

(37) $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to implement executive order 21-02, archaeological and cultural resources.

(38) $313,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $408,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to perform forage fish spawning surveys in Puget Sound.

(39) $294,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to complete rule making related to chapter 77.57 RCW, fishways, flow, and screening.

(40) $402,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to provide technical assistance and permitting guidance on solar facility proposals with the intent of limiting impacts to threatened and endangered species and critical and sensitive habitat areas, including shrubsteppe.

(41) $1,297,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to increase technical assistance to local jurisdictions to better integrate salmon recovery plans into growth management comprehensive plans and critical areas ordinances.

(((43)))(42) $3,802,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to monitor recreational salmon and steelhead harvest in freshwater streams and rivers in Puget Sound and along the Washington coast.

(((44)))(43) $2,116,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to monitor salmon harvest from the ocean and Puget Sound.

(((45)))(44) $994,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to monitor salmon harvest from commercial fisheries.

(((46)))(45) $226,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for a marine fisheries compliance liaison to collaborate with other law enforcement partners on commercial and recreational fisheries issues.

(((47)))(46) $1,283,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for additional law enforcement officers for marine and freshwater fisheries compliance.

(((48)))(47) $372,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to develop and implement a mobile-based electronic catch record card system for statewide marine and freshwater fisheries.

(((49)))(48) $852,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to provide additional capacity to the attorney general's office to prosecute environmental crimes. The department must provide an annual report by December 1st of each year, to the appropriate committees of the legislature, on the progress made in prosecuting environmental crimes.

(((50)))(49) $4,283,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to develop a monitoring and evaluation program for salmon and steelhead hatcheries in western Washington with the goal to improve survival of hatchery fish to adult returns and adaptively manage hatchery programs to better achieve management goals, including rebuilding natural populations for conservation purposes and increasing fishing opportunities.

(((51)))(50) $2,392,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to conduct fish in/fish out monitoring for the purposes of measuring freshwater systems salmon productivity for purposes of salmon recovery.

(((52)))(51) $1,040,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $295,000 of the limited fish and wildlife account are provided solely to monitor recreational shellfish harvest in Puget Sound.

(((53)))(52) $710,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to monitor recreational Dungeness crab harvest along the Washington coast.

(((54)))(53) $360,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to complete a statewide prioritization of fish passage barriers in collaboration with regional salmon recovery organizations.

(((55)))(54) $494,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to participate in hydropower licensing efforts for the purposes of mitigating impacts to salmon and other fish and wildlife species as a result of new or renewing federal and nonfederal hydropower facilities.

(((56)))(55) $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $166,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to complete the following activities:

(a) By December 1, 2022, and consistent with RCW, the department must submit a report to the legislature that assesses how to incorporate a net ecological gain standard into state land use, development, and environmental laws and rules to achieve a goal of better statewide performance on endangered species recovery and ecological health. The report must address each environmental, development, or land use law or rule where the existing standard is less protective of ecological integrity than the standard of net ecological gain, including the shoreline management act (chapter 90.58 RCW), the growth management act (chapter 36.70A RCW), construction projects in state waters (chapter 77.55 RCW), and the model toxics control act.

(b) In developing the report under this section, the department must consult with the appropriate local governments, state agencies, federally recognized Indian tribes, and stakeholders with subject matter expertise on environmental, land use, and development laws including but not limited to cities, counties, ports, the department of ecology, and the department of commerce.

(c) The report must include:

(i) Development of a definition, objectives, and goals for the standard of net ecological gain;

(ii) An assessment and comparison analysis of opportunities and challenges, including legal issues and costs on state and local governments to achievement of overall net ecological gain through both:

(A) Implementation of a standard of net ecological gain under different environmental, development, and land use laws; and

(B) An enhanced approach to implementing and monitoring no net loss in existing environmental, development, and land use laws;

(iii) Recommendations on funding, incentives, technical assistance, legal issues, monitoring, and use of scientific data, and other applicable considerations to the integration of needs to assess progress made toward achieving net ecological gain into each environmental, development, and land use law or rule; and

(iv) An assessment of how applying a standard of net ecological gain in the context of each environmental, land use, or development law is likely to achieve substantial additional environmental or social cobenefits.

(((57)))(56) $70,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $997,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to assess the status of current riparian ecosystems, beginning with areas where sufficient information exists to conduct the assessment. The assessment must include identifying any gaps in vegetated cover relative to a science-based standard for a fully functioning riparian ecosystem and comparing the status and gaps to water temperature impairments, known fish passage barriers, and status of salmonid stocks.

(((58)))(57) $70,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for removal efforts for invasive bullfrogs and habitat preservation for species threatened by the bullfrogs, including the western pond turtle, Oregon spotted frog, and northern leopard frog.

(((59)))(58) $95,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for research on shell disease in western pond turtles.

(((60)))(59) $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to address the maintenance backlog associated with providing recreation on lands managed by the department. Allowable uses include, but are not limited to, maintenance, repair, or replacement of trails, toilet facilities, roads, parking lots, campgrounds, picnic sites, water access areas, signs, kiosks, and gates. The department is encouraged to partner with nonprofit organizations in the maintenance of public lands.

(((61)))(60) $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1753 (climate funding/tribes). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((62)))(61) $39,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1735 (peace officers/use of force). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((63)))(62) $16,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1181 (veterans & military suicide). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((65)))(63) $14,400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to reduce the number of nontribal commercial gillnet fishing licenses on the Columbia river through a voluntary buy-back program.

(a) Until November 30, 2022, the department may pay up to $25,000 each for licenses that have been inactive since 2019 and up to $120,000 each for licenses that have been active since 2019. After November 30, 2022, the department may pay up to $20,000 each for licenses that have been inactive since 2019 and up to $96,000 each for licenses that have been active since 2019. It is the intent of the legislature that this will be the last appropriation made to buy back licenses for the Columbia river gillnet fishery.

(b) For all licenses purchased, the department shall calculate the reduced impacts to wild and endangered stocks based on the most recent five-year average of harvest and reserve those impacts for conservation through increased wild salmonid escapement or mark-selective fisheries capable of harvesting surplus hatchery-reared salmon where needed to meet federal genetic protection requirements for wild salmon populations in a manner consistent with state-tribal fishery management agreements.

(c) The department must make recommendations to the legislature for any necessary changes in statute, regulations, or program funding levels to transition lower Columbia river mainstem gillnet fisheries to alternative, selective fishing gears, including pound nets or other gears capable of benefitting wild salmon conservation through mark-selective harvest practices. The recommendation must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2022.

(((66)))(64) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department, in consultation with the department of ecology, the department of natural resources, the Colville confederated tribes, the Okanogan PUD, and other interested entities to analyze the steps required, including coordination and ownership, associated with the possible removal of Enloe dam and analyze options for sediment removal in order to restore the Similkameen river, minimize impacts downriver, and allow access to over 300 miles of habitat for federally-threatened steelhead and other native salmonids. Any contract required to fulfill this analysis is exempt from the competitive procurement requirements in chapter 39.26 RCW. A report of the department's findings, analysis, and recommendations for funding or further considerations for the Enloe dam removal must be made to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2022.

(((67)))(65) $2,472,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2022 and $6,096,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to implement eradication and control measures on European green crabs through coordination and grants with partner organizations. The department must provide quarterly progress reports on the success and challenges of the measures to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2022.

(((68)))(66) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to increase the support of regional fish enhancement groups.

(((69)))(67) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to install elk fencing in the Skagit river valley to help mitigate crop damage.

(((70) $3,000,000 of the salmon recovery account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to provide grants and coordinate with the tribes of the upper Columbia river to reintroduce Chinook salmon.

(71)))(68) The legislature intends to fund the monitoring items contained in subsections (((43) through (45) and (50) through (53)))(42) through (44) and (49) through (52) of this section through fiscal year 2025. A brief status report of the data collected and findings from each monitoring item funded in this section is due to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1st of each fiscal year through 2025.

(((73) $3,510,000))(69) $2,410,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for grants for the following activities:

(a) (($900,000 for the Lummi Nation to make infrastructure updates at the Skookum hatchery;

(b))) $250,000 for the Confederated Tribes of the Colville Reservation to upgrade heating, ventilation, and air conditioning systems at the Colville trout hatchery, and to acquire a hatchery fish transport truck with aquaculture adaptations;

(((c)))(b) $230,000 for the Yakama Nation to incorporate rearing vessels at the Cle Elum facility and to build circular covers at the lower Yakima facility;

(((d)))(c) $1,180,000 to the Puyallup Tribe to build an augmentation well at Voights creek hatchery, upgrade the water supply system and alarms at the Clarks creek hatchery, and convert rearing ponds into eight raceways at Diru creek chum hatchery;

(((e)))(d) $600,000 to the Suquamish Tribe to install an abatement pond at Grovers creek hatchery and replace raceways at Gorst coho raceways; and

(((f)))(e) $350,000 to the Jamestown S'Klallam Tribe to upgrade water supply systems at Point Whitney and expand shellfish seed production capacity at the shellfish hatchery in Kona.

Sec. 1308. 2022 c 297 s 310 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$215,075,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($118,842,000))

$214,627,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($52,453,000))

$102,752,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,188,000))

$6,034,000

Forest Development Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($55,326,000))

$55,590,000

ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$7,366,000

Surveys and Maps Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,232,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$9,132,000

Resource Management Cost Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($113,787,000))

$114,323,000

Surface Mining Reclamation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,291,000

Disaster Response Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$23,181,000

Forest and Fish Support Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$11,492,000

Aquatic Land Dredged Material Disposal Site Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$405,000

Natural Resources Conservation Areas Stewardship

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$286,000

Forest Fire Protection Assessment Nonappropriated

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$191,000

State Forest Nursery Revolving Nonappropriated

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$75,000

Access Road Revolving Nonappropriated Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$233,000

Forest Practices Application Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,080,000

Air Pollution Control Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$907,000

Forest Health Revolving Nonappropriated Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$240,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$14,515,000

Wildfire Response, Forest Restoration, and Community

Resilience Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$87,107,000

NOVA Program Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$807,000

Derelict Vessel Removal Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$6,317,000

Community Forest Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$52,000

Agricultural College Trust Management Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,039,000

Natural Resources Federal Lands Revolving

Nonappropriated Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$16,000

Salmon Recovery Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($7,000,000))

$2,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($740,635,000))

$885,365,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,857,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,857,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to carry out the forest practices adaptive management program pursuant to RCW 76.09.370 and the May 24, 2012, settlement agreement entered into by the department and the department of ecology. Scientific research must be carried out according to the master project schedule and work plan of cooperative monitoring, evaluation, and research priorities adopted by the forest practices board.

(2) $43,316,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $87,107,000 of the wildfire response, forest restoration, and community resilience account—state appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1168 (long-term forest health).

(3) $873,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,816,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1216 (urban and community forestry).

(4) $176,000 of the forest development account—state appropriation, $164,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account—state appropriation, $377,000 of the resource management cost account—state appropriation, and $22,000 of the agricultural college trust management account—state appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1355 (noxious weeds).

(5) $12,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account—state appropriation and $10,000 of the resource management cost account—state appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1382 (salmon recovery projects).

(6) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the small forest landowner office, in order to restore staffing capacity reduced during the great recession and to support small forest landowners, including assistance related to forest and fish act regulations.

(7) $1,583,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,515,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for deposit into the agricultural college trust management account and are provided solely to manage approximately 70,700 acres of Washington State University's agricultural college trust lands.

(8) $112,582,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, (($20,668,000))$116,453,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $16,050,000 of the disaster response account—state appropriation are provided solely for emergency response, including fire suppression. The department shall provide a monthly report to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature with an update of fire suppression costs incurred and the number and type of wildfires suppressed.

(9) $2,823,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $66,000 of the disaster response account—state appropriation are provided solely for indirect and administrative expenses related to fire suppression. It is the intent of the legislature that the amount of state general fund and disaster response account appropriations to support administrative expenses for fire suppression will be phased in through fiscal year 2025.

(10) $5,500,000 of the forest and fish support account—state appropriation is provided solely for outcome-based performance contracts with tribes to participate in the implementation of the forest practices program. Contracts awarded may only contain indirect costs set at or below the rate in the contracting tribe's indirect cost agreement with the federal government. Of the amount provided in this subsection, $500,000 is contingent upon receipts under RCW 82.04.261 exceeding eight million dollars per biennium. If receipts under RCW 82.04.261 are more than eight million dollars but less than eight million five hundred thousand dollars for the biennium, an amount equivalent to the difference between actual receipts and eight million five hundred thousand dollars shall lapse.

(11) Consistent with the recommendations of the Wildfire Suppression Funding and Costs (18-02) report of the joint legislative audit and review committee, the department shall submit a report to the governor and legislature by December 1, 2021, and December 1, 2022, describing the previous fire season. At a minimum, the report shall provide information for each wildfire in the state, including its location, impact by type of land ownership, the extent it involved timber or range lands, cause, size, costs, and cost-share with federal agencies and nonstate partners. The report must also be posted on the agency's website.

(12) $4,206,000 of the aquatic land enhancement account—state appropriation is provided solely for the removal of creosote pilings and debris from the marine environment and to continue monitoring zooplankton and eelgrass beds on state-owned aquatic lands managed by the department. Actions will address recommendations to recover the southern resident orca population and to monitor ocean acidification as well as help implement the Puget Sound action agenda.

(13) $448,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $448,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to coordinate with the Olympic natural resources center to study emerging ecosystem threats such as Swiss needlecast disease, conduct field trials for long-term ecosystem productivity and T3 watershed experiments, and engage stakeholders through learning-based collaboration. The department may retain up to $30,000 in one fiscal year to conduct Swiss needlecast surveys.

(14) $185,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $185,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for compensation to the trust beneficiaries and department for lost revenue from leases to amateur radio operators who use space on the department managed radio towers for their equipment. The department is authorized to lease sites at the rate of up to one hundred dollars per year, per site, per lessee. The legislature makes this appropriation to fulfill the remaining costs of the leases at market rate per RCW 79.13.510.

(15) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding for the department to review its burn permit fee schedule, and to develop options and recommendations on changes to the fee schedule to meet the requirement in RCW 70A.15.5020. The agency must report on options and recommendations to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by September 1, 2021.

(16) $569,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely to implement recommendations in the aerial herbicides in forestlands report submitted to the legislature in December 2019 from the aerial herbicide application working group. Specific work will include researching alternatives to chemicals for control of unwanted competing vegetation, compliance monitoring of aerial herbicides application, and updating the pesticide board manual.

(17) $925,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $779,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to undertake geologic research to understand the geology and hydrology of the Columbia basin with regard to geothermal and groundwater resources. Funding must also be used for outreach and education to industries and regional communities to increase awareness of underground resources, how to access and use them, and the regulatory processes for doing so.

(18) $77,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, $82,000 of the forest development account—state appropriation, $10,000 of the ORV and nonhighway vehicle account—state appropriation, $19,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account—state appropriation, $189,000 of the resource management cost account—state appropriation, $7,000 of the surface mining reclamation account—state appropriation, $9,000 of the forest and fish support account—state appropriation, $43,000 of the forest fire protection assessment nonappropriated account—state appropriation, $13,000 of the state forest nursery revolving nonappropriated account—state appropriation, $45,000 of the access road revolving nonappropriated account—state appropriation, $26,000 of the forest health revolving nonappropriated account—state appropriation, and $9,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department to move its data center currently located in the natural resources building to the state data center located in the Jefferson building as required by office of the chief information officer policy 184 and RCW 43.105.375. Funding is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(19) $466,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $189,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, $404,000 of the forest development account—state appropriation, $254,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account—state appropriation, $836,000 of the resource management cost account—state appropriation, $27,000 of the surface mining reclamation account—state appropriation, $148,000 of the forest fire protection assessment nonappropriated account—state appropriation, $62,000 of the state forest nursery revolving nonappropriated account—state appropriation, $188,000 of the access road revolving nonappropriated account—state appropriation, $214,000 of the forest health revolving nonappropriated account—state appropriation, and $16,000 of the natural resources federal lands revolving nonappropriated account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department to replace the NaturE revenue and leasing administration system and integrate with the new One Washington financial system. Funding is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(20)(a) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to maintain existing administrative facility infrastructure operated by the six regions of the department.

(b) The department's allocation of this appropriation and existing expenditure authority in certain other funds will be spread equitably across agency funds based on a model of positions by program or activity that utilize existing facility spaces within the agency's operating regions. The remaining costs at each site will remain the burden of existing management fund distribution. Department allocation of funds in this appropriation will be trackable by region and by project code.

(c) This appropriation is provided solely for the maintenance of existing administrative infrastructure, inclusive of ordinary maintenance, preventive maintenance, and maintenance services and inspections, minor repairs, system component replacement, and the delivery of utility and facility services.

(d) The department must provide a comparison of quarterly agency allotments and expenditures relating to this subsection, including a summary of the maintenance work for all regional facilities subject to this section to the office of financial management beginning in October 2021.

(21) $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to implement a pilot project to evaluate the costs and benefits of marketing and selling specialty forest products including cedar salvage, alder, and other hardwood products. The pilot project must include: Identifying suitable areas for hardwood or cedar sales within the administrative areas of the Olympic and Pacific Cascade regions, preparing and conducting sales, and evaluating the costs and benefits from conducting the sales.

(a) The pilot project must include an evaluation that:

(i) Determines if revenues from the sales are sufficient to cover the costs of preparing and conducting the sales;

(ii) Identifies and evaluates factors impacting the sales, including regulatory constraints, staffing levels, or other limitations;

(iii) Compares the specialty sales to other timber sales that combine the sale of cedar and hardwoods with other species;

(iv) Evaluates the bidder pool for the pilot sales and other factors that impact the costs and revenues received from the sales; and

(v) Evaluates the current and future prices and market trends for cedar salvage and hardwood species.

(b) The department must work with affected stakeholders and report to the appropriate committees of the legislature with the results of the pilot project and make recommendation for any changes to statute by June 30, 2023.

(22) $112,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5158 (utility wildland fire cmte.).

(23) $407,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the department to complete development of a programmatic safe harbor agreement, and the associated environmental analysis and draft enrollment language for inclusion in the forest practices rules. Within the amount provided in this subsection, the department must provide $182,000 to the department of fish and wildlife to assist in the development of the programmatic safe harbor agreement. The department must provide a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 15, 2021, on the status of the rule making and the resources needed to implement the rule effective October 1, 2022.

(24) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the department on behalf of the forest practices board must provide an update to the natural resource policy committees of the legislature on the progress of its projects, including progress made to address recommendations from the 2021 state auditor's report on the adaptive management program, by December 1, 2021, and December 1, 2022.

(25) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to grant to local law enforcement agencies to assist in enforcing vessel registration laws. Funding is also provided for a pilot recycling project with a nonprofit maritime education center that has the capacity to coordinate with a local port and local businesses that can accommodate vessel waste material.

(26) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the department, acting in its capacity as the agency responsible for implementing Washington state's section 10 permit under the endangered species act for aquatic species, and for ensuring maintenance of clean water act assurances granted by the department of ecology, must report to the legislature by no later than June 30, 2022, on the status of forest practices board activities related to: (a) Permanent water typing rulemaking and associated board manual development and (b) rulemaking and associated board manual development regarding the protection of type N streams.

(27) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the department, in collaboration with motorized and nonmotorized outdoor recreation stakeholders, must submit to the appropriate committees of the legislature recommendations for the use of NOVA account appropriations, by September 30, 2022.

(28) $2,336,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,591,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5141 (environmental justice task force recommendations).

(29) $36,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $36,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5253 (pollinator health).

(30) $180,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $4,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5452 (electric-assisted bicycles).

(31) $1,765,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to:

(a) Replace the statewide forest practices permit database system. Funding is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act; and

(b) Provide a recommendation for ways that the forest products industry could help cover the cost of the new forest practice online system. The recommendation must include proposed changes to the fees that are paid for forest practice applications and notifications, as well as a description and table that illustrates the operating costs of the program and how those costs are covered by fund source including fee revenue. The recommendation must be reported to the fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 2021, and may be included as a decision package to the office of financial management for consideration in the governor's proposed 2022 supplemental operating budget.

(32) $225,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $225,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to implement a pilot project to evaluate the costs and benefits of entering into such stewardship agreements with individual neighboring landowners who would take on the responsibility for protecting small segments of shared boundary with department managed lands. The pilot project must include identifying the legal limits and bounds of such stewardship agreements, identifying suitable areas, preparing and entering into shared stewardship agreements, and evaluating the costs and benefits of these agreements.

(a) The pilot project evaluation must include:

(i) A determination of an appropriate mechanism for the sale of valuable materials from state trust lands harvested under a stewardship agreement;

(ii) Identification of regulatory constraints, staffing levels necessary to administer a statewide program, and other limitations; and

(iii) Identification of legal risk and insurance and indemnification requirements that may be necessary on the part of private individuals entering into these agreements.

(b) The pilot project must include agreements on at least the Teanaway or Klickitat Community Forests and on state trust lands in the vicinity of the town of Darrington, Washington. The department of natural resources must work with affected stakeholders and report to the appropriate committees of the legislature with the results of the pilot project and any recommendations for changes and statewide implementation by July 1, 2023.

(33) $134,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $134,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to grant non-tribal outcome-based performance participation grants for implementation of the forest practices adaptive management program. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $54,000 per fiscal year is provided for grants to the Washington farm forestry association and $80,000 per fiscal year is provided for grants to the Washington state association of counties.

(34) $488,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of chapter 316, Laws of 2021 (Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5126) (climate commitment act).

(35) $3,481,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to collect and refresh statewide lidar data.

(36) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the department must improve performance of the forest practices adaptive management program by implementing recommendations made by the state auditor's office in its January 2021 performance audit of the program.

(37) $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to conduct a targeted analysis of the current and projected impact from drought and opportunities for drought resilience on department owned and managed uplands and agricultural lands.

(38) $225,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to hire a watershed steward to expedite salmon recovery actions and projects, including education, with a primary focus on agency owned and managed uplands and aquatic lands.

(39)(a) $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for a pilot project to improve salmon habitat across the department's aquatic, commercial, industrial, and agricultural lands. Of the amount provided in this subsection:

(i) $2,000,000 is provided solely to improve nearshore habitat by accelerating restoration of state-owned aquatic lands; and

(ii) $3,000,000 is provided solely to improve riparian function, including riparian planting and riparian set-asides on state-owned lands.

(b) The department must consult with federally recognized tribes and partner with relevant state agencies and local governments in implementing this pilot.

(c) The department must provide a report on the cost, monitoring, and effectiveness of investments in salmon habitat improvements to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2023.

(40) $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to address the maintenance backlog associated with providing recreation on lands managed by the department. Allowable uses include, but are not limited to, maintenance, repair, or replacement of trails, toilet facilities, roads, campgrounds, picnic sites, water access areas, signs, kiosks, and gates. The department is encouraged to partner with nonprofit organizations in the maintenance of public lands.

(41) $4,284,000 of the derelict vessel removal account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1700 (derelict vessel removal). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(42) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the purpose of establishing demonstration areas for wildfire ready neighbors, a wildland fire resiliency outreach, assessment, and education program, in portions of Pierce, Mason, and Thurston counties. Wildfire ready neighbor demonstration areas must be located where there is a demonstrated high risk of wildland fire, a mix of suburban and small private forestland ownership, and significant areas of wildland urban interface. Further, demonstration areas must be selected by employing principles of environmental justice and equity, with an effort to select areas for inclusion that have a significant proportion of vulnerable populations and "highly impacted communities" as defined by RCW 19.405.020.

(43) The department, in coordination with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, must provide recommendations on the development of an outdoor school at the site of the Naselle youth camp. The department must consider, at a minimum, the suitability of the current facilities, operating and capital budget needs and estimated costs, any potential transfers of land ownership or management, partnership opportunities, and other potential procedural or operational challenges and proposed solutions. The department must submit a proposal to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2022.

(44) (($5,000,000 of the salmon recovery account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to purchase easements under the forestry riparian easement program, pursuant to RCW 76.13.120.

(45))) $1,149,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5619 (kelp & eelgrass conservation). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((46)))(45) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to continue convening the work group pertaining to making improvements to the trust land transfer program. Of the amount provided in this subsection, up to $75,000 may be used for completing a trust land transfer project in Jefferson county.

(((47)))(46) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to provide a grant to a nonprofit organization that will offer environmental education and career development skills training in nature for youth and young adults from south King county.

(((48)))(47)(a) $10,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to purchase state forestland, as described in RCW 79.22.010, to begin a program to benefit counties who have lost revenue from existing state forestlands encumbered by wildlife species listed as endangered or threatened by the federal endangered species act. The department must transfer the appropriated amount into the natural resources real property replacement account in accordance with RCW 79.17.210 to purchase state forestlands.

(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(i) $5,000,000 must be used to purchase state forestland for the benefit of Clallam county and Jefferson county; and

(ii) $5,000,000 must be used to purchase state forestland for the benefit of Pacific county, Skamania county, and Wahkiakum county.

(c) The purchased forestlands shall be owned and managed by the department as state forest transfer lands and shall be placed in trust for the benefit of the counties. The purchase of these state forestlands is not limited to lands within the geographic bounds of the counties listed in this subsection.

(d) The purchase of state forestlands must be made in concurrence with the Washington state association of counties before a transaction is finalized.

(e) The department shall work with the Washington state association of counties to determine if any statutory changes are necessary to address issues regarding beneficiary revenue distribution or any other fiscal matters related to state forestlands. The department and the Washington state association of counties shall report to the legislature on any needed statutory changes by December 31, 2022.

(((49)))(48) $2,000,000 of the salmon recovery account—state appropriation is provided solely for an increase in the Puget Sound corp program to employ work crews statewide to carry out aquatic recreation, natural areas, resource protection, and urban forestry projects.

(((50)))(49) $167,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to advance research and cooperation with governmental agencies of Finland and Finnish organizations to implement sustainable forestry practices. The department must report to the appropriate committees of the legislature, by June 30, 2023, on how the funding was used, what kinds of research and cooperation were accomplished, and make recommendations for further opportunities for collaboration.

Sec. 1309. 2022 c 297 s 311 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$28,418,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($43,910,000))

$47,213,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($40,631,000))

$46,021,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$193,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,743,000

Water Quality Permit Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$73,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$9,545,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2022)
. . . .
$628,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2023)
. . . .
$635,000

Northeast Washington Wolf-Livestock Management

Nonappropriated Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,042,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$148,045,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($275,863,000))

$284,556,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $103,045,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely to develop a state alternative to the United States department of agriculture farmers to families food box program and provide resources for hunger relief organizations, including organizations that serve BIPOC and other socially disadvantaged communities.

(2) $5,000,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the farm-to-school program under RCW 15.64.060.

(3) $8,000,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for local food system infrastructure and market access grants, prioritized for women, minority, and small business owners.

(4) $9,000,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for a grant program to improve food supply chain infrastructure and market access for farms, food processors, and food distributors.

(5)(a) $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to coordinate with the office of equity, the conservation commission, underrepresented farmers and ranchers, organizations that represent historically underrepresented farmers and ranchers, farmworkers, and labor advocates to:

(i) Ensure inclusion of historically underrepresented farmers and ranchers in the agricultural industry;

(ii) Evaluate related boards, commissions, and advisory panels to ensure inclusion of historically underrepresented farmers and ranchers;

(iii) Include historically underrepresented farmers and ranchers in the development, implementation, and enforcement of food and agriculture laws, rules, regulations, policies, and programs; and

(iv) Consider ways to increase engagement in agricultural education and workforce development opportunities by communities who have been historically underrepresented in agriculture.

(b) The department must report to the governor and legislature, in accordance with RCW 43.01.036, by October 31, 2022, on its activities and efforts to include historically underrepresented farmers and ranchers. The report must describe the department's efforts to serve historically underrepresented farmers and ranchers, identify existing gaps and financial barriers to land ownership and obtaining equipment, and must include recommendations to improve outreach to and services for historically underrepresented farmers and ranchers.

(6) $4,936,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and (($938,000))$4,121,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementing a Japanese beetle monitoring and eradication program in central Washington.

(7) $6,605,445 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $23,230,905 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $23,000,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementing the emergency food assistance program as defined in RCW 43.23.290.

(8) $170,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $170,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to continue a shellfish coordinator position. The shellfish coordinator assists the industry with complying with regulatory requirements and will work with regulatory agencies to identify ways to streamline and make more transparent the permit process for establishing and maintaining shellfish operations.

(9) $194,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $194,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $1,134,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementing a Vespa mandarinia eradication program.

(10) $1,042,000 of the northeast Washington wolf-livestock management nonappropriated account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to conduct the following:

(a) Fund the northeast Washington wolf-livestock management grant program as provided in RCW 16.76.020, at $432,000. Funds from the grant program must be used only for the deployment of nonlethal deterrence, specifically with the goal to reduce the likelihood of cattle being injured or killed by wolves by deploying proactive, preventative methods that have a good probability of producing effective results. Grant proposals will be assessed partially on this intent. Grantees who use funds for range riders or herd monitoring must deploy this tool in a manner so that targeted areas with cattle are visited daily or near daily. Grantees must collaborate with other entities providing prevention efforts resulting in coordinated wolf-livestock conflict deterrence efforts, both temporally and spatially, therefore providing well-timed and placed preventative coverage on the landscape. The department retains the final decision-making authority over disbursement of funds. Annual reports from grantees will be assessed for how well grant objectives were met and used to decide whether future grant funds will be awarded to past grantees.

(b) Contract with the northeast Washington wolf-cattle collaborative, a nonprofit organization, for $410,000 for range riders to conduct proactive deterrence activities with the goal to reduce the likelihood of cattle being injured or killed by wolves. The contract must provide that the organization share all relevant information with the department of fish and wildlife in a timely manner to aid in wolf management decisions. Additionally, range riders must document their activities with geo-referenced photo points and provide written description of their efforts to the department of fish and wildlife by December 31, 2021, and December 31, 2022. Work is to be conducted solely on United States forest service grazing allotments and adjoining private lands in the Kettle mountains in Ferry county. This includes an area from the northern boundary of the Colville Confederated Tribes reservation, west of the Columbia river north to state route 20, and then west of United States route 395 to the Canadian border, and from the northern boundary of the Colville Confederated Tribes reservation east of state highway 21 to the Canadian border. Also included are federal grazing allotments and adjoining private lands in the Vulcan mountain area, an area which is north of the Kettle river where it enters the United States at Midway, British Columbia and leaves the United States near Danville, Washington. Of the amount provided in this subsection, $90,000 may be contracted for range rider deterrence activities in Pend Oreille, Stevens, or Ferry counties.

(c) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the department must provide $120,000 in fiscal year 2022 and $80,000 in fiscal year 2023 to the sheriffs offices of Ferry and Stevens counties for providing a local wildlife specialist to aid the department of fish and wildlife in the management of wolves in northeast Washington.

(11) $1,400,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for research grants to assist with development of an integrated pest management plan to find a suitable replacement for imidacloprid to address burrowing shrimp in Willapa bay and Grays harbor and facilitate continued shellfish cultivation on tidelands. In selecting research grant recipients for this purpose, the department must incorporate the advice of the Willapa-Grays harbor working group formed from the settlement agreement with the department of ecology signed on October 15, 2019. Up to eight percent of the total amount provided may be used by the departments of agriculture, commerce, ecology, and natural resources to cover overhead expenses relating to their continued participation in the working group for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.

(12) $323,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $477,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5141 (environmental justice task force recommendations).

(13) $78,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $276,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5253 (pollinator health).

(14) $2,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation, not to exceed the amount appropriated in section 11, chapter 3, Laws of 2021, that is unobligated at the end of fiscal year 2021, is provided solely to assist hunger relief organizations to achieve food security and is subject to the same terms and conditions as the appropriation in section 11, chapter 3, Laws of 2021.

(15) $168,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $168,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to assist small and midsize farms and small and midsize processors in exploring options to expand capacity for processing meat or meat and poultry for sale and direct marketing efforts. In carrying out this duty, the department must:

(a) Assist farms in complying with federal, state, and local rules and regulations as they apply to direct marketing of meat and poultry products;

(b) Assist in developing infrastructure including, but not limited to, custom meat facilities and slaughter facilities inspected by the United States department of agriculture as appropriate to increase direct marketing opportunities for farms;

(c) Assist processors in complying with federal, state, and local rules and regulations as they apply to processing meat and poultry and the marketing of meat and poultry;

(d) Assist in developing, in consultation with Washington State University extension, training opportunities or apprenticeship opportunities for slaughterers or inspectors;

(e) Provide information on direct marketing opportunities for farms;

(f) Identify and help reduce market barriers facing farms in direct marketing;

(g) Identify and help reduce barriers facing processors in operating slaughter facilities;

(h) Assist in developing and submitting proposals to grant programs to assist farm direct marketing efforts; and

(i) Perform other functions that will assist farms in directly marketing their meat and poultry products.

(16) $1,832,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,832,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department, in consultation with the state conservation commission, to develop a grant program to provide funding to conservation districts or other entities to provide access to meat and poultry processing and inspection. In addition to other funding needs to provide access to meat and poultry processing and inspection, grant funding may be used to establish a mobile slaughter unit or to provide needed infrastructure to provide for the retail sale of meat or poultry. The department must conduct outreach to gain input from other entities, such as conservation districts, Washington State University and the food policy forum in developing the grant program described in this subsection.

(17) $156,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $213,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5192 (electric vehicle equipment).

(18) $366,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $366,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to support the department's emergency management planning responsibilities related to agricultural systems, radiological preparedness and response, foodborne outbreaks, food security, and other emergency management responsibilities.

(19) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for rulemaking for a voluntary cannabis certification program that is consistent with the department's existing organics program, as authorized by chapter 317, Laws of 2017 (ESSB 5131).

(20) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for a grant to a community-based organization in Whatcom county for the food and farm finder program, which connects local food producers with retail and wholesale consumers.

(21) $81,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $139,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a hemp in food task force and a hemp commission task force.

(a) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $75,000 in fiscal year 2022 and $125,000 in fiscal year 2023 are for a hemp in food task force. The department must appoint task force members representing relevant state agencies, the scientific community, and stakeholder organizations. The department must provide staff support for the task force and contract for relevant scientific expertise. The department must report to the appropriate committees of the legislature with recommendations for the regulation of hemp in food by December 1, 2022.

(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $6,000 in fiscal year 2022 and $14,000 in fiscal year 2023 are for a hemp commission task force. The department must appoint task force members representing relevant state agencies, the scientific community, and stakeholder organizations, including the hemp industry. The department must provide staff support for the task force. The department must report to the appropriate committees of the legislature with recommendations for the creation of a commodity commission for hemp by December 1, 2022.

(22) $790,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1859 (cannabis analysis labs). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(23) $301,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1799 (organic materials management). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(24) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to support local and regional markets and for agricultural infrastructure development in southwest Washington.

(25) $9,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5544 (blockchain work group). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(26) $9,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5974 (transportation resources). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1310. 2022 c 297 s 312 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE ENERGY FACILITY SITE EVALUATION COUNCIL

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($776,000))

$912,000

Energy Facility Site Evaluation Council Account—

Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($13,116,000))

$13,397,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($13,892,000))

$14,309,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $208,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $8,333,000 of the energy facility site evaluation council account—private/local appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1812 (energy facility site council). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(End of part)

PART XIV

TRANSPORTATION

SUPPLEMENTAL

Sec. 1401. 2022 c 297 s 402 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$66,750,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($68,712,000))

$69,285,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$16,766,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$3,091,000

Death Investigations Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($8,794,000))

$8,852,000

County Criminal Justice Assistance Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,622,000))

$4,645,000

Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,681,000))

$1,691,000

Fire Service Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$131,000

Vehicle License Fraud Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$119,000

Disaster Response Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($12,500,000))

$23,260,000

Fire Service Training Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($12,797,000))

$12,497,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$591,000

Fingerprint Identification Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$12,956,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2022)
. . . .
$2,423,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2023)
. . . .
$2,423,000

Washington Internet Crimes Against Children Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($215,356,000))

$226,480,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($12,500,000))$23,260,000 of the disaster response account—state appropriation is provided solely for Washington state fire service resource mobilization costs incurred in response to an emergency or disaster authorized under RCW 43.43.960 through 43.43.964. The state patrol shall submit a report quarterly to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing information on current and planned expenditures from this account. This work shall be done in coordination with the military department.

(2) $2,423,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $2,423,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the Washington state patrol to partner with multi-jurisdictional drug and gang task forces to detect, deter, and dismantle criminal organizations involved in criminal activity including diversion of cannabis from the legalized market and the illicit production and distribution of cannabis and cannabis-related products in Washington state.

(3) $643,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $643,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for addressing a backlog of toxicology tests in the toxicology laboratory.

(4) $356,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $356,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $298,000 of the death investigations account—state appropriations are provided solely for increased supply and maintenance costs for the crime laboratory division and toxicology laboratory division.

(5) $510,000 of the county criminal justice assistance account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Washington state patrol to support local police, sheriffs' departments, and multiagency task forces in the prosecution of criminals. However, the office of financial management must reduce the allotment of the amount provided in this subsection if allotment of the full appropriation will put the account into deficit.

(6)(a) $700,000 of the fire service training account—state appropriation is provided solely for the firefighter apprenticeship training program.

(b) The joint apprenticeship training committee shall submit a report to the fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 2022, describing how the funding appropriated in this section was spent during the biennium. At a minimum, the report shall include information about the number of individuals that completed the training, the level of training or type of training being taught, the total cost of training everyone through completion, the percentage of passage rate for trainees, and the geographic location of the fire department sponsoring the trainee.

(7) $316,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $1,000,000 of the Washington internet crimes against children account—state appropriation are provided solely for the missing and exploited children's task force within the patrol to help prevent possible abuse to children and other vulnerable citizens from sexual abuse.

(8) $1,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5055 (law enforcement grievances), which changes methods for selecting an arbitrator for labor disputes involving law enforcement disciplinary matters.

(9) $213,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $163,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1223 (custodial interrogations).

(10) $1,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1054 (peace officer tactics and equipment).

(11) $2,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1310 (use of force).

(12) $1,334,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $2,373,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for facility and staff costs associated with construction of a second toxicology laboratory facility in Federal Way. The Washington state patrol must provide a report on the progress of the toxicology lab construction semiannually to the fiscal committees of the legislature with a final report due 90 days after completion of the project. The report must include, but is not limited to:

(a) A detailed list of expenditures so far;

(b) A detailed list of expenditure yet to be made before the completion of the project;

(c) An updated project timeline with expected end date; and

(d) Other project details that the Washington state patrol finds important to relay.

(13) $213,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the Washington state patrol to outsource death investigation cases to reduce the current backlog of cases awaiting toxicology testing.

(14) $1,320,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for an enhanced forensic capabilities pilot program that provides expedited DNA technology and forensic services to assist in the processing of crime scene evidence, expediting investigative leads, and reducing the backlog of other cases. To ensure readiness to proceed with implementation, the Washington state patrol must identify needed resources, complete prehiring, and develop a competitive procurement process by July 1, 2022. The Washington state patrol must complete a preliminary report by December 2, 2022, describing major milestones and achievements of the program to date and submit a final report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2023. The preliminary report must include, but is not limited to, the following:

(a) Protocols on the operation and use of the program while maintaining civil liberties and protecting individual privacy;

(b) A description of how expedited DNA technology and forensic services will tie into the current operations of the state patrol's existing crime lab; and

(c) Details of how the Washington state patrol will protect individual privacy and civil liberties in relation to the program described in this subsection.

(15) $94,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2057 (state patrol workforce). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(16) $191,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1725 (missing indigenous persons). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(17) $330,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1735 (peace officers/use of force). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((20)))(18) $441,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to process the backlog of court orders and dispositions. By June 30, 2023, the department must provide a report to the appropriate legislative committees that describes any continued staffing needs for this purpose.

(((21)))(19) $1,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is for implementation of Engrossed Fourth Substitute House Bill No. 1412 (legal financial obligations).

(End of part)

PART XV

EDUCATION

SUPPLEMENTAL

Sec. 1501. 2022 c 297 s 501 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$31,995,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($41,420,000))

$41,366,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$106,299,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$8,064,000

Washington Opportunity Pathways Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$8,609,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2022)
. . . .
$520,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2023)
. . . .
$550,000

Performance Audits of Government Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$213,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$7,420,000

Elementary and Secondary School Emergency Relief III

Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$7,116,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($212,206,000))

$212,152,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) BASE OPERATIONS AND EXPENSES OF THE OFFICE

(a) $15,228,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $17,635,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(i) The superintendent shall recognize the extraordinary accomplishments of four students who have demonstrated a strong understanding of the civics essential learning requirements to receive the Daniel J. Evans civic education award.

(ii) Districts shall report to the office of the superintendent of public instruction daily student unexcused absence data by school, using a uniform definition of unexcused absence as established by the superintendent.

(iii) By October 31st of each year, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall produce an annual status report on implementation of the budget provisos in section 501, chapter 415, Laws of 2019 and sections 515 and 522 of this act. The status report of each proviso shall include, but not be limited to, the following information: Purpose and objective, number of state staff funded by the proviso, number of contractors, status of proviso implementation, number of beneficiaries by year, list of beneficiaries, a comparison of budgeted funding and actual expenditures, other sources and amounts of funding, and proviso outcomes and achievements.

(iv) The superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the secretary of state, shall update the program prepared and distributed under RCW 28A.230.150 for the observation of temperance and good citizenship day to include providing an opportunity for eligible students to register to vote at school.

(v) Districts shall annually report to the office of the superintendent of public instruction on: (A) The annual number of graduating high school seniors within the district earning the Washington state seal of biliteracy provided in RCW 28A.300.575; and (B) the number of high school students earning competency-based high school credits for world languages by demonstrating proficiency in a language other than English. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide a summary report to the office of the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1st of each year.

(vi) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide statewide oversight and coordination to the regional nursing corps program supported through the educational service districts.

(vii) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (1)(a), $318,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $310,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are for 2.0 FTE to support multi-tiered systems of support (MTSS) data management and implementation activities.

(viii) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (1)(a), $79,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for a contract to assess the feasibility, specifications, and cost estimates for full development and implementation of a MTSS database.

(ix) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (1)(a), $53,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for a contract with regional and/or national experts to train the MTSS staff and staff from the center on the improvement of student learning on MTSS implementation science and evidence-based practices as distinct but complementary to the Washington integrated student supports protocol.

(x) Within amounts provided in this subsection (1)(a), $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for a climate science curriculum staff position within the office of the superintendent of public instruction and to integrate climate change content into the Washington state learning standards across subject areas and grade levels. The office shall develop materials and resources that accompany the updated learning standards that encourage school districts to develop interdisciplinary units focused on climate change that include authentic learning experiences, that integrate a range of perspectives, and that are action oriented.

(xi) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (1)(a), sufficient funding is provided for the office to implement House Bill No. 1833 (school meals/electronic info).

(xii) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (1)(a), sufficient funding is provided for the office to implement House Bill No. 1834 (student absences/mental health).

(b) $1,217,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,217,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for maintenance of the apportionment system, including technical staff and the data governance working group.

(c) $494,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $494,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 240, Laws of 2010, including staffing the office of equity and civil rights.

(d) $61,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $61,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the ongoing work of the education opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee.

(e) $61,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $96,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 380, Laws of 2009 (enacting the interstate compact on educational opportunity for military children).

(f) $268,000 of the Washington opportunity pathways account—state appropriation is provided solely for activities related to public schools other than common schools authorized under chapter 28A.710 RCW.

(g) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the state board of education shall adopt a rule that the minimum number of students to be used for public reporting and federal accountability purposes is ten.

(h) $123,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $123,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 163, Laws of 2012 (foster care outcomes). The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall annually report each December on the implementation of the state's plan of cross-system collaboration to promote educational stability and improve education outcomes of foster youth.

(i) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 178, Laws of 2012 (open K-12 education resources).

(j) $14,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $14,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 242, Laws of 2013 (state-tribal education compacts).

(k) $131,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $131,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $213,000 of the performance audits of government account—state appropriation are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to perform on-going program reviews of alternative learning experience programs, dropout reengagement programs, and other high risk programs. Findings from the program reviews will be used to support and prioritize the office of the superintendent of public instruction outreach and education efforts that assist school districts in implementing the programs in accordance with statute and legislative intent, as well as to support financial and performance audit work conducted by the office of the state auditor.

(l) $117,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $117,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 3, Laws of 2015 1st sp. sess. (computer science).

(m) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 237, Laws of 2017 (paraeducators).

(n) $385,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $385,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the office of native education to increase services to tribes, including but not limited to, providing assistance to tribes and school districts to implement Since Time Immemorial, applying to become tribal compact schools, convening the Washington state native American education advisory committee, and extending professional learning opportunities to provide instruction in tribal history, culture, and government. The professional development must be done in collaboration with school district administrators and school directors. Funding in this subsection is sufficient for the office, the Washington state school directors' association government-to-government task force, and the association of educational service districts to collaborate with the tribal leaders congress on education to develop a tribal consultation training and schedule. The tribal consultation training and schedule must be developed by January 1, 2022.

(o) $205,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,205,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to promote the financial literacy of students. The effort will be coordinated through the financial literacy public-private partnership. The amounts provided in this subsection are sufficient for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5720 (student financial literacy). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(p) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for staff at the office of the superintendent of public instruction to coordinate and promote efforts to develop integrated math, science, technology, and engineering programs in schools and districts across the state.

(q) $481,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $481,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for additional full-time equivalent staff to support the work of the safety net committee and to provide training and support to districts applying for safety net awards.

(r) Districts shall report to the office the results of each collective bargaining agreement for certificated staff within their district using a uniform template as required by the superintendent, within thirty days of finalizing contracts. The data must include but is not limited to: Minimum and maximum base salaries, supplemental salary information, and average percent increase for all certificated instructional staff. Within existing resources by December 1st of each year, the office shall produce a report for the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee summarizing the district level collective bargaining agreement data.

(s) $4,631,000 of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account—federal appropriation from funds attributable to subsection 2001(f)(4), the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2 is provided solely for administrative costs related to the management of federal funds provided for COVID-19 response and other emergency needs.

(t) $70,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to provide centralized support and coordination, including supervision and training, for social workers hired by or contracting with school districts.

(u) $2,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5764 (apprenticeships and higher ed). If this bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(v) $72,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for IT project funding for a contract to assess the feasibility, specifications, and cost estimates for full development and implementation of the school apportionment system.

(2) DATA SYSTEMS

(a) $1,802,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,802,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementing a comprehensive data system to include financial, student, and educator data, including development and maintenance of the comprehensive education data and research system (CEDARS).

(b) $281,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $281,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for K-20 telecommunications network technical support in the K-12 sector to prevent system failures and avoid interruptions in school utilization of the data processing and video-conferencing capabilities of the network. These funds may be used to purchase engineering and advanced technical support for the network.

(c) $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided for the superintendent of public instruction to develop and implement a statewide accountability system to address absenteeism and to improve student graduation rates. The system must use data to engage schools and districts in identifying successful strategies and systems that are based on federal and state accountability measures. Funding may also support the effort to provide assistance about successful strategies and systems to districts and schools that are underperforming in the targeted student subgroups.

(3) WORK GROUPS

(a) $335,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $335,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 206, Laws of 2018 (career and college readiness).

(b) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to meet statutory obligations related to the provision of medically and scientifically accurate, age-appropriate, and inclusive sexual health education as authorized by chapter 206, Laws of 1988 (AIDS omnibus act) and chapter 265, Laws of 2007 (healthy youth act).

(c) $118,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $118,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 75, Laws of 2018 (dyslexia).

(d) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 386, Laws of 2019 (social emotional learning).

(e) $130,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $130,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to collaborate with the department of children, youth, and families to complete a report with options and recommendations for administrative efficiencies and long term strategies that align and integrate high-quality early learning programs administered by both agencies and consistent with implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5237 (child care & early dev. exp.). The report, due September 1, 2022, shall address capital needs, data collection and data sharing, licensing changes, quality standards, options for community-based and school-based settings with inclusive facilities and operations, fiscal modeling, and any statutory changes needed to achieve administrative efficiencies.

(f) $107,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $107,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the office to support the children and youth behavioral health work group created in chapter 130, Laws of 2020 (child. mental health wk. grp).

(g) $310,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $249,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the development and implementation of a language access technical assistance program for school districts and to reconvene an expanded work group under section 2, chapter 256, Laws of 2019. The activities of and resources provided by the language access technical assistance program must align with the recommendations in the October 2020 report of the language access work group created by section 2, chapter 256, Laws of 2019 in order to improve awareness and fulfillment of language access rights for families in educational settings. The work group under this subsection shall, by December 1, 2021, report to the appropriate committees of the legislature recommendations for standards, training, testing, and credentialing for spoken and sign language interpreters for students' families and for collecting information related to language access services in schools and school districts. Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the office must provide a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2021. The report shall include, at a minimum, information regarding the different languages in which students and students' families prefer to communicate by each school district.

(h)(i) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the superintendent of public instruction to convene a work group to identify trauma informed strategies, approaches, and curricula for supporting students in distress and with challenging behaviors that prioritize relational safety. Stipends may be provided for work group members who are representing families and individuals as experts with lived experiences to compensate for time and travel to meetings. The work group at a minimum must include the following:

(A) One representative from the department of children, youth, and families with expertise on inclusion, equitable access, trauma informed practices, and relational safety in education settings;

(B) One representative from an organization representing youth with intellectual and developmental disabilities;

(C) Individuals representing youth with communication disorders, students or young adults who have lived experience with restraint and isolation, and students or adults who are survivors of the school-to-prison pipeline;

(D) One representative from an organization working to eliminate racial inequities in education;

(E) One representative from an organization working to eliminate disparities for families and students with a native language other than English;

(F) One representative from an organization working to improve inclusive practices in Washington that works with families and communities;

(G) One member of an organization representing youth in foster care;

(H) One member of an organization representing youth experiencing homelessness; and

(I) An administrator, teacher, and paraeducator professional with experience working in or around a self-contained behavior program.

(ii) The work group shall submit a report to the education committees of the legislature, the governor's office, and the education ombuds by December 1, 2022. The report must include a list of approved crisis response protocols and deescalation techniques for schools that are trauma informed and prioritize relational safety, recommended elements needed to improve access to mental health supports for all students, building-based strategies to enhance fidelity to multi-tiered systems of support and student behavior plans for students with challenging behaviors and strategies to track and reduce/eliminate restraint and isolation use, and best practices for implementation of identified strategies, with recommendations for district compliance and tracking mechanisms.

(4) STATEWIDE PROGRAMS

(a) $2,590,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $2,590,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills. State funding shall support statewide administration and district implementation of the inventory under RCW 28A.655.080.

(b) $703,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $703,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 72, Laws of 2016 (educational opportunity gap).

(c) $950,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $950,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the Washington reading corps. The superintendent shall allocate reading corps members to schools identified for comprehensive or targeted support and school districts that are implementing comprehensive, proven, research-based reading programs. Two or more schools may combine their Washington reading corps programs.

(d) $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for chapter 102, Laws of 2014 (biliteracy seal).

(e)(i) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for school bullying and harassment prevention activities.

(ii) $15,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $15,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 240, Laws of 2016 (school safety).

(iii) $570,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $570,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to provide statewide support and coordination for the regional network of behavioral health, school safety, and threat assessment established in chapter 333, Laws of 2019 (school safety and well-being). Within the amounts provided in this subsection (4)(e)(iii), $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for grants to schools or school districts for planning and integrating tiered suicide prevention and behavioral health supports. Grants must be awarded first to districts demonstrating the greatest need and readiness. Grants may be used for intensive technical assistance and training, professional development, and evidence-based suicide prevention training.

(iv) $196,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $196,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the school safety center within the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(A) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (4)(e)(iv), $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a school safety program to provide school safety training for all school administrators and school safety personnel. The school safety center advisory committee shall develop and revise the training program, using the best practices in school safety.

(B) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (4)(e)(iv), $96,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $96,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for administration of the school safety center. The safety center shall act as an information dissemination and resource center when an incident occurs in a school district in Washington or in another state, coordinate activities relating to school safety, review and approve manuals and curricula used for school safety models and training, and maintain a school safety information web site.

(f)(i) $162,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $162,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for youth suicide prevention activities.

(ii) $76,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $76,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 64, Laws of 2018 (sexual abuse of students).

(g)(i) $280,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $280,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $1,070,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation are provided solely for dropout prevention, intervention, and reengagement programs, including the jobs for America's graduates (JAG) program, dropout prevention programs that provide student mentoring, and the building bridges statewide program. Students in the foster care system or who are homeless shall be given priority by districts offering the jobs for America's graduates program. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall convene staff representatives from high schools to meet and share best practices for dropout prevention. Of these amounts, $520,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, and $550,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the building bridges statewide program.

(ii) $293,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $293,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to support district implementation of comprehensive guidance and planning programs in support of high-quality high school and beyond plans consistent with RCW 28A.230.090.

(iii) $178,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $178,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 291, Laws of 2017 (truancy reduction efforts).

(h) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to create a process and provide assistance to school districts in planning for future implementation of the summer knowledge improvement program grants.

(i) $358,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $358,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 221, Laws of 2019 (CTE course equivalencies).

(j) $196,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $196,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 252, Laws of 2019 (high school graduation reqs.).

(k) $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $680,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 295, Laws of 2019 (educator workforce supply). Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $680,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for title II SEA state-level activities to implement section 103, chapter 295, Laws of 2019 relating to the regional recruiters program.

(l) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a tribal liaison at the office of the superintendent of public instruction to facilitate access to and support enrollment in career connected learning opportunities for tribal students, including career awareness and exploration, career preparation, and career launch programs, as defined in RCW 28C.30.020, so that tribal students may receive high school or college credit to the maximum extent possible.

(m) $57,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $57,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 288, Laws of 2020 (school meals at no cost).

(n) $269,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $142,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 353, Laws of 2020 (innovative learning pilot).

(o) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to provide statewide coordination towards multicultural, culturally responsive, and anti-racist education to support academically, socially, and culturally literate learners. The office must engage community members and key interested parties to:

(i) Develop a clear definition and framework for African American studies to guide instruction in grades seven through twelve;

(ii) Develop a plan for aligning African American studies across all content areas; and

(iii) Identify professional development opportunities for educators and administrators to build capacity in creating high-quality learning environments centered in belonging and racial equity, anti-racist approaches, and asset-based methodologies that pull from all students' cultural funds of knowledge.

(p) $275,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to convene and provide staff support to the K-12 basic education compensation advisory committee established in section 951 of this act.

(q) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to develop resources, share best practices, and provide technical assistance for school districts to support implementation of comprehensive, culturally responsive, and high-quality civics education. Within amounts provided in this subsection, the office shall administer competitive grant awards of up to $1,500 per first class school district and $750 per second class school district to support in-service training and the development or adoption of curriculum and instructional materials. The office shall utilize a portion of this funding to assess the learning outcomes related to civic education curriculum and to support related assessments that gauge the degree to which high quality civic education is taking place in school districts throughout the state.

(r) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to provide technical assistance to school districts through the center for the improvement of student learning. The technical assistance must support the implementation of trauma-informed practices, policies, and procedures, including implementation of social emotional learning programs, multi-tiered systems of support, and other evidence-based programs that improve school climate and student emotional wellbeing.

(s) $49,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $49,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1214 (K-12 safety & security serv.).

(t) $35,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1363 (secondary trauma/K-12).

(u) $140,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1208 (learning assistance program).

(v) $505,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $486,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1295 (institutional ed./release).

(w) $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to evaluate and implement best practices and procedures for ensuring that student lunch periods include a seated lunch duration of at least 20 minutes. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall, through an application-based process, select six public schools to serve as demonstration sites. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(i) $30,000 of the general fund—state appropriation is provided solely for annual grant awards of $5,000 each provided to the six school districts selected to serve as school demonstration sites;

(ii) $20,000 of the general fund—state appropriation is provided solely for the office to hire a consultant with expertise in nutrition programs to oversee the demonstration projects and provide technical support; and

(iii) $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation is provided solely for the office to provide technical support to the demonstration sites and report its findings and recommendations to the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate by October 1, 2022.

(x) $27,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5030 (school counseling programs).

(y) $16,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $16,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5237 (child care & early dev. exp.).

(z) $553,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to develop and implement a mathematics pathways pilot to modernize algebra II. The office should use research and engage stakeholders to develop a revised and expanded course.

(((bb)))(aa) $3,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the office to contract for regional multitiered systems of support (MTSS) implementation specialists during the 2022-23 school year to help districts administer the MTSS assessments and adopt evidence-based strategies that address the specific academic, social, emotional, and behavioral health needs of students exacerbated by the pandemic. Funding may also be used for the specialists to provide MTSS training and technical assistance to help school districts and educational service districts connect students with appropriate supports to improve student outcomes and reduce educational opportunity gaps.

(((cc)))(bb) $367,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1153 (language access in schools). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((dd)))(cc) $8,341,000 of the Washington state opportunity pathways account—state appropriation is provided solely for support to small school districts and public schools receiving allocations under chapters 28A.710 and 28A.715 RCW that have less than 800 enrolled students, are located in urban or suburban areas, and budgeted for less than $18,000 per pupil in general fund expenditures in the 2021-22 school year. For eligible school districts and schools, the superintendent of public instruction must allocate an amount equal to the lesser of (((dd)))(cc)(i) or (ii) of this subsection multiplied by the school district or school's budgeted enrollment in the 2021-22 school year.

(i) The state local effort assistance threshold in RCW 28A.500.015 in the 2022 calendar year.

(ii) $18,000 minus the school district or school's budgeted general fund expenditures per pupil in the 2021-22 school year.

(((ee)))(dd)(i) $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the office to assist sexual assault survivors in Washington public schools. Funding provided in this subsection must be used by the office to:

(A) Research best practices for a victim-centered, trauma-informed approach to responding to sexual assault and supporting survivors in schools;

(B) Conduct listening sessions across the state for the purpose of assessing challenges with responding to sexual assault and supporting survivors in schools;

(C) Update model protocols for responding to sexual assault and supporting survivors in schools;

(D) Develop a plan for deploying victim-centered, trauma-informed training for school administrators and counselors, based on best practices for responding to sexual assault and supporting survivors in schools and informed by the requirements of title IX of the education amendments of 1972; and

(E) Review current legal requirements mandating that educators and staff report suspected sexual assault and assess whether changes to those requirements should be made to align them with best practices for responding to sexual assault and supporting survivors in schools.

(ii) The office must consult with the department of children, youth, and families, law enforcement professionals, national and state organizations supporting the interests of sexual assault survivors, victims' advocates, educators, school administrators, school counselors, and sexual assault survivors.

(iii) The office must submit to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature a preliminary report by December 1, 2022. It is the intent of the legislature to provide funding for the office to submit a final report, including a summary of its findings and recommendations, by October 1, 2023.

(((ff)))(ee) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the office to create and distribute promotional and educational materials to school districts for Americans of Chinese descent history month.

(((gg)))(ff) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the superintendent to contract with a community-based youth development nonprofit organization for a pilot program to provide behavioral health support for youth and trauma-informed, culturally responsive staff training.

(((hh)))(gg) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the superintendent to establish a media literacy and digital citizenship ambassador program to promote the integration of media literacy and digital citizenship instruction.

(((ii)))(hh) $294,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5252 (school consultation/tribes). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(5) CAREER CONNECTED LEARNING

(a) $852,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for expanding career connected learning as provided in RCW 28C.30.020.

(b) $960,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for increasing the funding per full-time equivalent for career launch programs as described in RCW 28A.700.130. In the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, for career launch enrollment exceeding the funding provided in this subsection, funding is provided in section 504 of this act.

(c) $500,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Federal Way school district to establish pre-apprenticeship pathways and career connected learning programs in the skilled trades in Federal Way.

(d) $1,500,000 of the workforce education investment account—state is provided solely for Marysville school district to collaborate with Arlington school district, Everett Community College, other local school districts, local labor unions, local Washington state apprenticeship and training council registered apprenticeship programs, and local industry groups to continue the regional apprenticeship pathways program.

(e) $3,600,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to administer grants to skill centers for nursing programs to purchase or upgrade simulation laboratory equipment.

Sec. 1502. 2022 c 297 s 504 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR GENERAL APPORTIONMENT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$9,481,252,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($8,975,955,000))

$8,971,964,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$204,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,608,115,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
(($280,875,000))

$258,048,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($20,346,401,000))

$20,319,583,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(b) For the 2021-22 and 2022-23 school years, the superintendent shall allocate general apportionment funding to school districts as provided in the funding formulas and salary allocations in sections 504 and 505 of this act, excluding (c) of this subsection.

(c) From July 1, 2021, to August 31, 2021, the superintendent shall allocate general apportionment funding to school districts programs as provided in sections 503 and 504, chapter 357, Laws of 2020, as amended.

(d) The enrollment of any district shall be the annual average number of full-time equivalent students and part-time students as provided in RCW 28A.150.350, enrolled on the fourth day of school in September and on the first school day of each month October through June, including students who are in attendance pursuant to RCW 28A.335.160 and 28A.225.250 who do not reside within the servicing school district. Any school district concluding its basic education program in May must report the enrollment of the last school day held in May in lieu of a June enrollment.

(e)(i) Funding provided in part V of this act is sufficient to provide each full-time equivalent student with the minimum hours of instruction required under RCW 28A.150.220.

(ii) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall align the agency rules defining a full-time equivalent student with the increase in the minimum instructional hours under RCW 28A.150.220, as amended by the legislature in 2014.

(f) The superintendent shall adopt rules requiring school districts to report full-time equivalent student enrollment as provided in RCW 28A.655.210.

(g) For the 2021-22 and 2022-23 school years, school districts must report to the office of the superintendent of public instruction the monthly actual average district-wide class size across each grade level of kindergarten, first grade, second grade, and third grade classes. The superintendent of public instruction shall report this information to the education and fiscal committees of the house of representatives and the senate by September 30th of each year.

(2) CERTIFICATED INSTRUCTIONAL STAFF ALLOCATIONS

Allocations for certificated instructional staff salaries for the 2021-22 and 2022-23 school years are determined using formula-generated staff units calculated pursuant to this subsection.

(a) Certificated instructional staff units, as defined in RCW 28A.150.410, shall be allocated to reflect the minimum class size allocations, requirements, and school prototypes assumptions as provided in RCW 28A.150.260. The superintendent shall make allocations to school districts based on the district's annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment in each grade.

(b) Additional certificated instructional staff units provided in this subsection (2) that exceed the minimum requirements in RCW 28A.150.260 are enhancements outside the program of basic education, except as otherwise provided in this section.

(c)(i) The superintendent shall base allocations for each level of prototypical school, including those at which more than fifty percent of the students were eligible for free and reduced-price meals in the prior school year, on the following regular education average class size of full-time equivalent students per teacher, except as provided in (c)(ii) of this subsection:

General education class size:

Grade

RCW 28A.150.260

2021-22

School Year

2022-23

School Year

Grade K

17.00

17.00

Grade 1

17.00

17.00

Grade 2

17.00

17.00

Grade 3

17.00

17.00

Grade 4

27.00

27.00

Grades 5-6

27.00

27.00

Grades 7-8

28.53

28.53

Grades 9-12

28.74

28.74

The superintendent shall base allocations for: Laboratory science average class size as provided in RCW 28A.150.260; career and technical education (CTE) class size of 23.0; and skill center program class size of 19. Certificated instructional staff units provided for skills centers that exceed the minimum requirements of RCW 28A.150.260 achieve class size reductions under RCW 28A.400.007 and are part of the state's program of basic education.

(ii) Pursuant to RCW 28A.150.260(4)(a), the assumed teacher planning period, expressed as a percentage of a teacher work day, is 13.42 percent in grades K-6, and 16.67 percent in grades 7-12; and

(iii) Advanced placement and international baccalaureate courses are funded at the same class size assumptions as general education schools in the same grade; and

(d)(i) Funding for teacher librarians, school nurses, social workers, school psychologists, and guidance counselors is allocated based on the school prototypes as provided in RCW 28A.150.260, as amended by Second Substitute House Bill No. 1664 (schools/support funding), and is considered certificated instructional staff, except as provided in (d)(ii) of this subsection.

(ii)(A) For the twenty schools with the lowest overall school score for all students in the 2018-19 school year, as determined by the Washington school improvement framework among elementary schools, middle schools, and other schools not serving students up to twelfth grade, having enrollments greater than one hundred fifty students, in addition to the allocation under (d)(i) of this subsection the superintendent shall allocate additional funding for guidance counselors for each level of prototypical school in the 2021-22 school year as follows:

Elementary

Middle

Guidance counselors

0.307

0.512

To receive additional allocations under this subsection (2)(d)(ii)(A), a school eligible to receive the allocation must have demonstrated actual staffing for guidance counselors for its prototypical school level that meets or exceeds the staffing for guidance counselors in (d)(i) of this subsection and this subsection (2)(d)(ii)(A) for its prototypical school level. School districts must distribute the additional guidance counselors allocation in this subsection to the schools that generate the allocation. The enhancement within this subsection is not part of the state's program of basic education.

(B) For qualifying high-poverty schools in the 2022-23 school year, at which more than 50 percent of the students were eligible for free and reduced-price meals in the prior school year, in addition to the allocation under (d)(i) of this subsection, the superintendent shall allocate additional funding for guidance counselors for each level of prototypical school as follows:

Elementary

Middle

High

Guidance counselors

0.333

0.333

0.333

(C) Students in approved career and technical education and skill center programs generate certificated instructional staff units to provide for the services of teacher librarians, school nurses, social workers, school psychologists, and guidance counselors at the following combined rate per 1000 student full-time equivalent enrollment:

2021-22

School Year

2022-23

School Year

Career and Technical Education

3.07

3.35

Skill Center

3.41

3.69

(3) ADMINISTRATIVE STAFF ALLOCATIONS

(a) Allocations for school building-level certificated administrative staff salaries for the 2021-22 and 2022-23 school years for general education students are determined using the formula generated staff units calculated pursuant to this subsection. The superintendent shall make allocations to school districts based on the district's annual average full-time equivalent enrollment in each grade. The following prototypical school values shall determine the allocation for principals, assistant principals, and other certificated building level administrators:

Prototypical School Building:

Elementary School

1.253

Middle School

1.353

High School

1.880

(b) Students in approved career and technical education and skill center programs generate certificated school building-level administrator staff units at per student rates that are a multiple of the general education rate in (a) of this subsection by the following factors:

Career and Technical Education students. . . .1.025

Skill Center students. . . .1.198

(4) CLASSIFIED STAFF ALLOCATIONS

Allocations for classified staff units providing school building-level and district-wide support services for the 2021-22 and 2022-23 school years are determined using the formula-generated staff units provided in RCW 28A.150.260 and pursuant to this subsection, and adjusted based on each district's annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment in each grade.

(5) CENTRAL OFFICE ALLOCATIONS

In addition to classified and administrative staff units allocated in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, classified and administrative staff units are provided for the 2021-22 and 2022-23 school years for the central office administrative costs of operating a school district, at the following rates:

(a) The total central office staff units provided in this subsection (5) are calculated by first multiplying the total number of eligible certificated instructional, certificated administrative, and classified staff units providing school-based or district-wide support services, as identified in RCW 28A.150.260(6)(b) and the increased allocations provided pursuant to subsections (2) and (4) of this section, by 5.3 percent.

(b) Of the central office staff units calculated in (a) of this subsection, 74.53 percent are allocated as classified staff units, as generated in subsection (4) of this section, and 25.48 percent shall be allocated as administrative staff units, as generated in subsection (3) of this section.

(c) Staff units generated as enhancements outside the program of basic education to the minimum requirements of RCW 28A.150.260, and staff units generated by skill center and career-technical students, are excluded from the total central office staff units calculation in (a) of this subsection.

(d) For students in approved career-technical and skill center programs, central office classified units are allocated at the same staff unit per student rate as those generated for general education students of the same grade in this subsection (5), and central office administrative staff units are allocated at staff unit per student rates that exceed the general education rate established for students in the same grade in this subsection (5) by 12.58 percent in the 2021-22 school year and 12.11 percent in the 2022-23 school year for career and technical education students, and 17.92 percent in the 2021-22 school year and 17.42 percent in the 2022-23 school year for skill center students.

(6) FRINGE BENEFIT ALLOCATIONS

Fringe benefit allocations shall be calculated at a rate of 22.71 percent in the 2021-22 school year and 22.98 percent in the 2022-23 school year for certificated salary allocations provided under subsections (2), (3), and (5) of this section, and a rate of 22.75 percent in the 2021-22 school year and 22.80 percent in the 2022-23 school year for classified salary allocations provided under subsections (4) and (5) of this section.

(7) INSURANCE BENEFIT ALLOCATIONS

Insurance benefit allocations shall be calculated at the rates specified in section 506 of this act, based on the number of benefit units determined as follows: Except for nonrepresented employees of educational service districts, the number of calculated benefit units determined below. Calculated benefit units are staff units multiplied by the benefit allocation factors established in the collective bargaining agreement referenced in section 934 of this act. These factors are intended to adjust allocations so that, for the purpose of distributing insurance benefits, full-time equivalent employees may be calculated on the basis of 630 hours of work per year, with no individual employee counted as more than one full-time equivalent. The number of benefit units is determined as follows:

(a) The number of certificated staff units determined in subsections (2), (3), and (5) of this section multiplied by 1.02; and

(b) The number of classified staff units determined in subsections (4) and (5) of this section multiplied by 1.43.

(8) MATERIALS, SUPPLIES, AND OPERATING COSTS (MSOC) ALLOCATIONS

Funding is allocated per annual average full-time equivalent student for the materials, supplies, and operating costs (MSOC) incurred by school districts, consistent with the requirements of RCW 28A.150.260.

(a)(i) MSOC funding for general education students are allocated at the following per student rates:

MSOC RATES/STUDENT FTE

MSOC Component

2021-22

School Year

2022-23

School Year

Technology

$140.84

$173.59

Utilities and Insurance

$382.70

$403.75

Curriculum and Textbooks

$151.22

$159.54

Other Supplies

$299.50

$316.73

Library Materials

$21.54

$21.97

Instructional Professional Development for Certificated

and Classified Staff

$23.39

$24.67

Facilities Maintenance

$189.59

$200.02

Security and Central Office

$131.35

$138.57

TOTAL MSOC/STUDENT FTE

$1,340.13

$1,438.84

(ii) For the 2021-22 school year and 2022-23 school year, as part of the budget development, hearing, and review process required by chapter 28A.505 RCW, each school district must disclose: (A) The amount of state funding to be received by the district under (a) and (d) of this subsection (8); (B) the amount the district proposes to spend for materials, supplies, and operating costs; (C) the difference between these two amounts; and (D) if (A) of this subsection (8)(a)(ii) exceeds (B) of this subsection (8)(a)(ii), any proposed use of this difference and how this use will improve student achievement.

(iii) Within the amount provided in (a)(i) of this subsection (8), allocations for MSOC technology in excess of RCW 28A.150.260 are not part of the state's basic education.

(b) Students in approved skill center programs generate per student FTE MSOC allocations of $1,585.55 for the 2021-22 school year and $1,672.76 for the 2022-23 school year.

(c) Students in approved exploratory and preparatory career and technical education programs generate per student FTE MSOC allocations of $1,585.55 for the 2021-22 school year and $1,672.76 for the 2022-23 school year.

(d) Students in grades 9-12 generate per student FTE MSOC allocations in addition to the allocations provided in (a) through (c) of this subsection at the following rate:

MSOC Component

2021-22

School Year

2022-23

School Year

Technology

$40.50

$42.72

Curriculum and Textbooks

$44.18

$46.61

Other Supplies

$86.06

$90.79

Library Materials

$5.99

$6.32

Instructional Professional Development for Certified

and Classified Staff

$7.36

$7.77

TOTAL GRADE 9-12 BASIC EDUCATION MSOC/STUDENT FTE

$184.09

$194.21

(9) SUBSTITUTE TEACHER ALLOCATIONS

For the 2021-22 and 2022-23 school years, funding for substitute costs for classroom teachers is based on four (4) funded substitute days per classroom teacher unit generated under subsection (2) of this section, at a daily substitute rate of $151.86.

(10) ALTERNATIVE LEARNING EXPERIENCE PROGRAM FUNDING

(a) Amounts provided in this section from July 1, 2021, to August 31, 2021, are adjusted to reflect provisions of chapter 357, Laws of 2020, as amended (allocation of funding for students enrolled in alternative learning experiences).

(b) The superintendent of public instruction shall require all districts receiving general apportionment funding for alternative learning experience (ALE) programs as defined in WAC 392-121-182 to provide separate financial accounting of expenditures for the ALE programs offered in district or with a provider, including but not limited to private companies and multidistrict cooperatives, as well as accurate, monthly headcount and FTE enrollment claimed for basic education, including separate counts of resident and nonresident students.

(11) DROPOUT REENGAGEMENT PROGRAM

The superintendent shall adopt rules to require students claimed for general apportionment funding based on enrollment in dropout reengagement programs authorized under RCW 28A.175.100 through 28A.175.115 to meet requirements for at least weekly minimum instructional contact, academic counseling, career counseling, or case management contact. Districts must also provide separate financial accounting of expenditures for the programs offered by the district or under contract with a provider, as well as accurate monthly headcount and full-time equivalent enrollment claimed for basic education, including separate enrollment counts of resident and nonresident students.

(12) ALL DAY KINDERGARTEN PROGRAMS

(((a))) Funding in this section is sufficient to fund all day kindergarten programs in all schools in the 2021-22 school year and 2022-23 school year, pursuant to RCW 28A.150.220 and 28A.150.315.

(13) ADDITIONAL FUNDING FOR SMALL SCHOOL DISTRICTS AND REMOTE AND NECESSARY PLANTS

For small school districts and remote and necessary school plants within any district which have been judged to be remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction, additional staff units are provided to ensure a minimum level of staffing support. Additional administrative and certificated instructional staff units provided to districts in this subsection shall be reduced by the general education staff units, excluding career and technical education and skills center enhancement units, otherwise provided in subsections (2) through (5) of this section on a per district basis.

(a) For districts enrolling not more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within any school district which have been judged to be remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction and enroll not more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8:

(i) For those enrolling no students in grades 7 and 8, 1.76 certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five students, plus one-twentieth of a certificated instructional staff unit for each additional student enrolled; and

(ii) For those enrolling students in grades 7 or 8, 1.68 certificated instructional staff units and 0.32 certificated administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five students, plus one-tenth of a certificated instructional staff unit for each additional student enrolled;

(b) For specified enrollments in districts enrolling more than twenty-five but not more than one hundred average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within any school district which enroll more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8 and have been judged to be remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction:

(i) For enrollment of up to sixty annual average full-time equivalent students in grades K-6, 2.76 certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units; and

(ii) For enrollment of up to twenty annual average full-time equivalent students in grades 7 and 8, 0.92 certificated instructional staff units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units;

(c) For districts operating no more than two high schools with enrollments of less than three hundred average annual full-time equivalent students, for enrollment in grades 9-12 in each such school, other than alternative schools, except as noted in this subsection:

(i) For remote and necessary schools enrolling students in any grades 9-12 but no more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-12, four and one-half certificated instructional staff units and one-quarter of a certificated administrative staff unit;

(ii) For all other small high schools under this subsection, nine certificated instructional staff units and one-half of a certificated administrative staff unit for the first sixty average annual full-time equivalent students, and additional staff units based on a ratio of 0.8732 certificated instructional staff units and 0.1268 certificated administrative staff units per each additional forty-three and one-half average annual full-time equivalent students;

(iii) Districts receiving staff units under this subsection shall add students enrolled in a district alternative high school and any grades nine through twelve alternative learning experience programs with the small high school enrollment for calculations under this subsection;

(d) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more than seventy annual average full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-8 program or a grades 1-8 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional staff unit;

(e) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-6 program or a grades 1-6 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional staff unit;

(f)(i) For enrollments generating certificated staff unit allocations under (a) through (e) of this subsection, one classified staff unit for each 2.94 certificated staff units allocated under such subsections;

(ii) For each nonhigh school district with an enrollment of more than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty students, an additional one-half of a classified staff unit; and

(g) School districts receiving additional staff units to support small student enrollments and remote and necessary plants under this subsection (13) shall generate additional MSOC allocations consistent with the nonemployee related costs (NERC) allocation formula in place for the 2010-11 school year as provided section 502, chapter 37, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess. (2010 supplemental budget), adjusted annually for inflation.

(14) Any school district board of directors may petition the superintendent of public instruction by submission of a resolution adopted in a public meeting to reduce or delay any portion of its basic education allocation for any school year. The superintendent of public instruction shall approve such reduction or delay if it does not impair the district's financial condition. Any delay shall not be for more than two school years. Any reduction or delay shall have no impact on levy authority pursuant to RCW 84.52.0531 and local effort assistance pursuant to chapter 28A.500 RCW.

(15) The superintendent may distribute funding for the following programs outside the basic education formula during fiscal years 2022 and 2023 as follows:

(a) $650,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $650,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for fire protection for school districts located in a fire protection district as now or hereafter established pursuant to chapter 52.04 RCW.

(b) $436,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $436,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for programs providing skills training for secondary students who are enrolled in extended day school-to-work programs, as approved by the superintendent of public instruction. The funds shall be allocated at a rate not to exceed $500 per full-time equivalent student enrolled in those programs.

(16) Funding in this section is sufficient to fund a maximum of 1.6 FTE enrollment for skills center students pursuant to chapter 463, Laws of 2007.

(17) Funding in this section is sufficient to fund a maximum of 1.2 FTE enrollment for career launch students pursuant to RCW 28A.700.130. Expenditures for this purpose must come first from the appropriations provided in section 501(5) of this act; funding for career launch enrollment exceeding those appropriations is provided in this section. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide a summary report to the office of the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by January 1, 2022. The report must include the total FTE enrollment for career launch students, the FTE enrollment for career launch students that exceeded the appropriations provided in section 501(5) of this act, and the amount expended from this section for those students.

(18) Students participating in running start programs may be funded up to a combined maximum enrollment of 1.2 FTE including school district and institution of higher education enrollment consistent with the running start course requirements provided in chapter 202, Laws of 2015 (dual credit education opportunities). In calculating the combined 1.2 FTE, the office of the superintendent of public instruction may average the participating student's September through June enrollment to account for differences in the start and end dates for courses provided by the high school and higher education institution. Additionally, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the state board for community and technical colleges, the student achievement council, and the education data center, shall annually track and report to the fiscal committees of the legislature on the combined FTE experience of students participating in the running start program, including course load analyses at both the high school and community and technical college system. The office of the superintendent of public instruction must adopt rules to fund the participating student's enrollment in running start courses during the summer term.

(19) If two or more school districts consolidate and each district was receiving additional basic education formula staff units pursuant to subsection (13) of this section, the following apply:

(a) For three school years following consolidation, the number of basic education formula staff units shall not be less than the number of basic education formula staff units received by the districts in the school year prior to the consolidation; and

(b) For the fourth through eighth school years following consolidation, the difference between the basic education formula staff units received by the districts for the school year prior to consolidation and the basic education formula staff units after consolidation pursuant to subsection (13) of this section shall be reduced in increments of twenty percent per year.

(20)(a) Indirect cost charges by a school district to approved career and technical education middle and secondary programs shall not exceed the lesser of five percent or the cap established in federal law of the combined basic education and career and technical education program enhancement allocations of state funds. Middle and secondary career and technical education programs are considered separate programs for funding and financial reporting purposes under this section.

(b) Career and technical education program full-time equivalent enrollment shall be reported on the same monthly basis as the enrollment for students eligible for basic support, and payments shall be adjusted for reported career and technical education program enrollments on the same monthly basis as those adjustments for enrollment for students eligible for basic support.

(21) Funding in this section is sufficient to provide full general apportionment payments to school districts eligible for federal forest revenues as provided in RCW 28A.520.020. For the 2021-2023 biennium, general apportionment payments are not reduced for school districts receiving federal forest revenues.

(22) $16,211,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely to ensure that school districts receive at least $500 per pupil for COVID-19 relief funding when combined with federal relief dollars. These funds are one-time allocations to school districts and may be used according to the allowable uses defined in section 2001(2)(e) of the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2. Prior to receiving funds, a school district must submit an academic and student well-being recovery plan to the office of the superintendent of public instruction as required in section 12(3), chapter 3, Laws of 2021, and must also report progress on implementing the plan in a manner identified by the superintendent.

(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must calculate a relief per pupil amount for each district defined as: The quotient from dividing the total funding allocated to each district from the federal relief funds, as defined in (b) of this subsection, by a school district's total enrollment as defined in (c) of this subsection. A school district with a relief per pupil amount less than $500 shall receive the difference between $500 and the relief per pupil amount, multiplied by the school district's total enrollment.

(b) For the purposes of this subsection, federal relief funds allocated to school districts include:

(i) Subgrants authorized under section 18003, the coronavirus aid, relief, and economic security act, P.L. 116-136;

(ii) Subgrants authorized under section 313, the coronavirus response and relief supplemental appropriations act, P.L. 116-260; and

(iii) Subgrants authorized under section 2001, the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2.

(c) For the purposes of this subsection, a school district's total enrollment means the district's 2019-20 school year annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment, excluding full-time equivalent student enrollments for which funds are separately calculated and allocated under RCW 28A.232.020, 28A.600.310(4), 28A.245.020, and 28A.175.110.

(d) For the purposes of this subsection, this subsection applies to state-tribal compact schools established under chapter 28A.715 RCW.

(23) $14,859,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for enrollment stabilization allocations required in section 1519 of this act.

(24) $566,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $204,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA/ESSER) are provided solely for an enrollment stabilization allocation for the Washington youth academy national guard youth challenge program. Federal funding is provided in response to the COVID-19 pandemic as authorized in subsection 313(e), the coronavirus response and relief supplemental appropriations act, P.L. 116-260, division M.

(25) $280,875,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for enrollment stabilization allocations pursuant to Substitute House Bill No. 1590 (enrollment stabilization). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(26) (($145,489,000))$90,573,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1664 (schools/support funding). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1503. 2022 c 297 s 505 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—BASIC EDUCATION EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION

(1) The following calculations determine the salaries used in the state allocations for certificated instructional, certificated administrative, and classified staff units as provided in RCW 28A.150.260, and under section 504 of this act: For the 2021-22 school year and the 2022-23 school year salary allocations for certificated instructional staff, certificated administrative staff, and classified staff units are determined for each school district by multiplying the statewide minimum salary allocation for each staff type by the school district's regionalization factor shown in LEAP Document 3.

Statewide Minimum Salary Allocation

Staff Type

2021-22

School Year

2022-23

School Year

Certificated Instructional

$68,937

$72,728

Certificated Administrative

$102,327

$107,955

Classified

$49,453

$52,173

(2) For the purposes of this section, "LEAP Document 3" means the school district regionalization factors for certificated instructional, certificated administrative, and classified staff, as developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee on February 18, 2022, at 6:09 hours.

(3) Incremental fringe benefit factors are applied to salary adjustments at a rate of 22.07 percent for school year 2021-22 and 22.34 percent for school year 2022-23 for certificated instructional and certificated administrative staff and 19.25 percent for school year 2021-22 and ((19.30))19.44 percent for the 2022-23 school year for classified staff.

(4) The salary allocations established in this section are for allocation purposes only except as provided in this subsection, and do not entitle an individual staff position to a particular paid salary except as provided in RCW 28A.400.200, as amended by chapter 13, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. (fully funding the program of basic education).

Sec. 1504. 2022 c 297 s 506 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR SCHOOL EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$97,080,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($580,811,000))

$572,305,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,720,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($679,611,000))

$671,105,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The salary increases provided in this section are 2.0 percent for the 2021-22 school year, and 5.5 percent for the 2022-23 school year, the annual inflationary adjustments pursuant to RCW 28A.400.205.

(2)(a) In addition to salary allocations, the appropriations in this section include funding for professional learning as defined in RCW 28A.415.430, 28A.415.432, and 28A.415.434. Funding for this purpose is calculated as the equivalent of three days of salary and benefits for each of the funded full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff units. Nothing in this section entitles an individual certificated instructional staff to any particular number of professional learning days.

(b) Of the funding provided for professional learning in this section, the equivalent of one day of salary and benefits for each of the funded full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff units in the 2021-22 school year must be used to train school district staff on cultural competency, diversity, equity, or inclusion, as required in chapter 197, Laws of 2021.

(3)(a) The appropriations in this section include associated incremental fringe benefit allocations at 22.07 percent for the 2021-22 school year and 22.34 percent for the 2022-23 school year for certificated instructional and certificated administrative staff and 19.25 percent for the 2021-22 school year and 19.30 percent for the 2022-23 school year for classified staff.

(b) The appropriations in this section include the increased or decreased portion of salaries and incremental fringe benefits for all relevant state-funded school programs in part V of this act. Changes for general apportionment (basic education) are based on the salary allocations and methodology in sections 504 and 505 of this act. Changes for special education result from changes in each district's basic education allocation per student. Changes for educational service districts and institutional education programs are determined by the superintendent of public instruction using the methodology for general apportionment salaries and benefits in sections 504 and 505 of this act. Changes for pupil transportation are determined by the superintendent of public instruction pursuant to RCW 28A.160.192, and impact compensation factors in sections 504, 505, and 506 of this act.

(c) The appropriations in this section include no salary adjustments for substitute teachers.

(4) The appropriations in this section are sufficient to fund the collective bargaining agreement referenced in section 934 of this act and reflect the incremental change in cost of allocating rates as follows: For the 2021-22 school year, $968 per month and for the 2022-23 school year, $1,026 per month.

(5) When bargaining for funding for school employees health benefits for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, any proposal agreed upon must assume the imposition of a twenty-five dollar per month surcharge payment from members who use tobacco products and a surcharge payment of not less than fifty dollars per month from members who cover a spouse or domestic partner where the spouse or domestic partner has chosen not to enroll in another employer-based group health insurance that has benefits and premiums with an actuarial value of not less than ninety-five percent of the actuarial value of the public employees' benefits board plan with the largest enrollment. The surcharge payments shall be collected in addition to the member premium payment.

(6) The rates specified in this section are subject to revision each year by the legislature.

Sec. 1505. 2022 c 297 s 507 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR PUPIL TRANSPORTATION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$605,160,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($672,475,000))

$729,427,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,277,635,000))

$1,334,587,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2)(a) For the 2021-22 and 2022-23 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school district programs for the transportation of eligible students as provided in RCW 28A.160.192. Funding in this section constitutes full implementation of RCW 28A.160.192, which enhancement is within the program of basic education. Students are considered eligible only if meeting the definitions provided in RCW 28A.160.160.

(b) From July 1, 2021, to August 31, 2021, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts programs for the transportation of students as provided in section 506, chapter 357, Laws of 2020, as amended.

(3) Within amounts appropriated in this section, up to $10,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and up to $10,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are for a transportation alternate funding grant program based on the alternate funding process established in RCW 28A.160.191. The superintendent of public instruction must include a review of school district efficiency rating, key performance indicators and local school district characteristics such as unique geographic constraints in the grant award process.

(4) A maximum of $939,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and a maximum of $939,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 may be expended for regional transportation coordinators and related activities. The transportation coordinators shall ensure that data submitted by school districts for state transportation funding shall, to the greatest extent practical, reflect the actual transportation activity of each district.

(5) Subject to available funds under this section, school districts may provide student transportation for summer skills center programs.

(6) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide reimbursement funding to a school district for school bus purchases only after the superintendent of public instruction determines that the school bus was purchased from the list established pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195(2) or a comparable competitive bid process based on the lowest price quote based on similar bus categories to those used to establish the list pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195.

(7) The superintendent of public instruction shall base depreciation payments for school district buses on the presales tax five-year average of lowest bids in the appropriate category of bus. In the final year on the depreciation schedule, the depreciation payment shall be based on the lowest bid in the appropriate bus category for that school year.

(8) Funding levels in this section reflect waivers granted by the state board of education for four-day school weeks as allowed under RCW 28A.305.141.

(9) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall annually disburse payments for bus depreciation in August.

(10) The superintendent must provide student transportation allocations for the 2021-22 school year equal to the greater of allocations provided in the 2019-20 school year or the student transportation allocations calculated under RCW 28A.160.192. These allocations satisfy the formula requirements for transportation allocations under RCW 28A.160.192.

(11) $29,745,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for transportation emergency allocations required in section 1504(12) of this act.

(12)(a) $13,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the superintendent to provide transportation safety net funding to school districts with a demonstrated need for additional transportation funding for special passengers. Transportation safety net awards shall only be provided when a school district's allowable transportation expenditures attributable to serving special passengers exceeds the amount allocated under subsection (2)(a) of this section and any excess transportation costs reimbursed by federal, state, tribal, or local child welfare agencies.

(b) To be eligible for additional transportation safety net award funding, the school district must report, in accordance with statewide accounting guidance, the amount of the excess costs and the specific activities or services provided to special passengers that created the excess costs. The office of the superintendent of public instruction must request from school districts an application for transportation safety net funding no later than May 1st. The application must contain the school district's anticipated excess costs through the end of the current school year.

(c) Transportation safety net awards allocated under this subsection are not part of the state's program of basic education.

Sec. 1506. 2022 c 297 s 508 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—SCHOOL FOOD SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$11,667,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($33,334,000))

$59,834,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($573,246,000))

$788,702,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($618,247,000))

$860,203,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $11,548,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $11,548,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for state matching money for federal child nutrition programs, and may support the meals for kids program through the following allowable uses:

(a) Elimination of breakfast copays for eligible public school students and lunch copays for eligible public school students in grades pre-kindergarten through twelfth grades who are eligible for reduced-price lunch as required in Engrossed House Bill No. 1342 (reduced-price lunch copays);

(b) Assistance to school districts and authorized public and private nonprofit organizations for supporting summer food service programs, and initiating new summer food service programs in low-income areas;

(c) Reimbursements to school districts for school breakfasts served to students eligible for free and reduced-price lunch, pursuant to chapter 287, Laws of 2005; and

(d) Assistance to school districts in initiating and expanding school breakfast programs.

(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall report annually to the fiscal committees of the legislature on annual expenditures in subsection (1)(a) through (c) of this section.

(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall provide the department of health with the following data, where available, for all nutrition assistance programs that are funded by the United States department of agriculture and administered by the office of the superintendent of public instruction. The superintendent must provide the report for the preceding federal fiscal year by February 1, 2022, and February 1, 2023. The report must provide:

(a) The number of people in Washington who are eligible for the program;

(b) The number of people in Washington who participated in the program;

(c) The average annual participation rate in the program;

(d) Participation rates by geographic distribution; and

(e) The annual federal funding of the program in Washington.

(4)(a) (($21,500,000))$48,167,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for reimbursements to school districts for schools and groups of schools required to participate in the federal community eligibility program under section 1, chapter 7, Laws of 2022 (schools/comm. eligibility) for meals not reimbursed at the federal free meal rate. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(b) $119,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $286,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 271, Laws of 2018 (school meal payment) to increase the number of schools participating in the federal community eligibility program and to support breakfast after the bell programs authorized by the legislature that have adopted the community eligibility provision, and for staff at the office of the superintendent of public instruction to implement section 1, chapter 7, Laws of 2022 (schools/comm. eligibility).

(5) $14,200,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA) is provided solely for emergency costs for child nutrition programs provided under section 722 of P.L. 116-260, the consolidated appropriations act, 2021, title VII, chapter 3 to school food programs.

(6) (($18,223,000))$27,073,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for reimbursement of local education agencies expenditures for the acquisition of unprocessed or minimally processed domestic food products from the United States department of agriculture supply chain assistance funds authorized by the commodity credit corporation charter act of 2021.

(7) $3,645,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for food assistance purchases of domestic local foods for distribution to schools from the United States department of agriculture local food for schools cooperative agreement program authorized by the commodity credit corporation charter act of 2021.

Sec. 1507. 2022 c 297 s 509 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR SPECIAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$1,464,854,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($1,459,576,000))

$1,487,468,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$571,229,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$54,694,000

Elementary and Secondary School Emergency Relief III

Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$7,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($3,557,353,000))

$3,585,245,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) Funding for special education programs is provided on an excess cost basis, pursuant to RCW 28A.150.390. School districts shall ensure that special education students as a class receive their full share of the general apportionment allocation accruing through sections 504 and 506 of this act. To the extent a school district cannot provide an appropriate education for special education students under chapter 28A.155 RCW through the general apportionment allocation, it shall provide services through the special education excess cost allocation funded in this section.

(b) Funding provided within this section is sufficient for districts to provide school principals and lead special education teachers annual professional development on the best-practices for special education instruction and strategies for implementation. Districts shall annually provide a summary of professional development activities to the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(2)(a) The superintendent of public instruction shall ensure that:

(i) Special education students are basic education students first;

(ii) As a class, special education students are entitled to the full basic education allocation; and

(iii) Special education students are basic education students for the entire school day.

(b) The superintendent of public instruction shall continue to implement the full cost method of excess cost accounting, as designed by the committee and recommended by the superintendent, pursuant to section 501(1)(k), chapter 372, Laws of 2006.

(3) Each fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(4)(a) For the 2021-22 and 2022-23 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school district programs for special education students as provided in RCW 28A.150.390, except that the calculation of the base allocation also includes allocations provided under section 504 (2) and (4) of this act and RCW 28A.150.415, which enhancement is within the program of basic education.

(b) From July 1, 2021, to August 31, 2021, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school district programs for special education students as provided in section 507, chapter 357, Laws of 2020, as amended.

(5) The following applies throughout this section: The definitions for enrollment and enrollment percent are as specified in RCW 28A.150.390(3). Each district's general fund—state funded special education enrollment shall be the lesser of the district's actual enrollment percent or 13.5 percent.

(6) At the request of any interdistrict cooperative of at least 15 districts in which all excess cost services for special education students of the districts are provided by the cooperative, the maximum enrollment percent shall be calculated in accordance with RCW 28A.150.390(3) (c) and (d), and shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than individual district units. For purposes of this subsection, the average basic education allocation per full-time equivalent student shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than individual district units.

(7) $76,334,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, (($91,192,000))$106,931,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $29,574,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for safety net awards for districts with demonstrated needs for special education funding beyond the amounts provided in subsection (4) of this section. If the federal safety net awards based on the federal eligibility threshold exceed the federal appropriation in this subsection (7) in any fiscal year, the superintendent shall expend all available federal discretionary funds necessary to meet this need. At the conclusion of each school year, the superintendent shall recover safety net funds that were distributed prospectively but for which districts were not subsequently eligible.

(a) For the 2021-22 and 2022-23 school years, safety net funds shall be awarded by the state safety net oversight committee as provided in section 109(1) chapter 548, Laws of 2009 (education).

(b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall make award determinations for state safety net funding in August of each school year, except that the superintendent of public instruction shall make award determinations for state safety net funding in July of each school year for the Washington state school for the blind and for the center for childhood deafness and hearing loss. Determinations on school district eligibility for state safety net awards shall be based on analysis of actual expenditure data from the current school year.

(8) A maximum of $1,250,000 may be expended from the general fund—state appropriations to fund teachers and aides at Seattle children's hospital. This amount is in lieu of money provided through the home and hospital allocation and the special education program.

(9) The superintendent shall maintain the percentage of federal flow-through to school districts at 85 percent. In addition to other purposes, school districts may use increased federal funds for high-cost students, for purchasing regional special education services from educational service districts, and for staff development activities particularly relating to inclusion issues.

(10) A school district may carry over from one year to the next year up to 10 percent of the general fund—state funds allocated under this program; however, carryover funds shall be expended in the special education program.

(11) $88,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $87,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $214,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a special education family liaison position within the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(12) $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $12,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $7,000,000 of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account—federal appropriation are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to provide an allocation to school districts for extension of transition services for students with disabilities who turned age 21 during the 2019-20 or 2020-21 school years, did not graduate with a regular diploma, and require recovery services on or after July 1, 2021, as determined by the student's individualized education plan team. The extension of these services does not reduce or supplant any other services for which the individual would be eligible. Allocations for this purpose may not exceed the amounts provided in this subsection. The office of the superintendent of public instruction may adopt formulas and procedures to define a per-student amount to be provided to students that meet the criteria, so that allocations do not exceed amounts provided in this subsection. Amounts provided in this subsection are outside the state's program of basic education.

(13)(a) $52,704,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) is provided solely for allocations from federal funding as authorized in section 2014, the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2.

(b) $4,411,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) is provided solely for providing preschool services to qualifying special education students under section 619 of the federal individuals with disabilities education act, pursuant to section 2002, the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2.

(14) $7,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to support professional development in inclusionary practices for classroom teachers. The primary form of support to public school classroom teachers must be for mentors who are experts in best practices for inclusive education, differentiated instruction, and individualized instruction. Funding for mentors must be prioritized to the public schools with the highest percentage of students with individualized education programs aged three through 21 who spend the least amount of time in general education classrooms.

Sec. 1508. 2022 c 297 s 510 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR EDUCATIONAL SERVICE DISTRICTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$28,636,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($30,886,000))

$30,678,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($59,522,000))

$59,314,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The educational service districts shall continue to furnish financial services required by the superintendent of public instruction and RCW 28A.310.190 (3) and (4).

(2) Funding within this section is provided for regional professional development related to mathematics and science curriculum and instructional strategies aligned with common core state standards and next generation science standards. Funding shall be distributed among the educational service districts in the same proportion as distributions in the 2007-2009 biennium. Each educational service district shall use this funding solely for salary and benefits for a certificated instructional staff with expertise in the appropriate subject matter and in professional development delivery, and for travel, materials, and other expenditures related to providing regional professional development support.

(3) Funding in this section is provided for regional professional development related to English language arts curriculum and instructional strategies aligned with common core state standards. Each educational service district shall use this funding solely for salary and benefits for certificated instructional staff with expertise in the appropriate subject matter and in professional development delivery, and for travel, materials, and other expenditures related to providing regional professional development support.

(4) Funding in this section is provided for regional technical support for the K-20 telecommunications network to prevent system failures and avoid interruptions in school utilization of the data processing and video-conferencing capabilities of the network. These funds may be used to purchase engineering and advanced technical support for the network.

(5) Funding in this section is provided for a corps of nurses located at the educational service districts, to be dispatched in coordination with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, to provide direct care to students, health education, and training for school staff. Beginning in fiscal year 2022, allocations for the corps of nurses is sufficient to provide one day per week of nursing services for all second-class school districts.

(6) Funding in this section is provided for staff and support at the nine educational service districts to provide a network of support for school districts to develop and implement comprehensive suicide prevention and behavioral health supports for students.

(7) Funding in this section is provided for staff and support at the nine educational service districts to provide assistance to school districts with comprehensive safe schools planning, conducting needs assessments, school safety and security trainings, coordinating appropriate crisis and emergency response and recovery, and developing threat assessment and crisis intervention teams. Beginning in fiscal year 2022, allocations for staff and support for regional safety centers are increased to 3 full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff for each regional safety center.

(8) Funding in this section is provided for regional English language arts coordinators to provide professional development of teachers and principals around the new early screening for dyslexia requirements.

(9) The educational service districts, at the request of the state board of education pursuant to RCW 28A.310.010 and 28A.305.130, may receive and screen applications for school accreditation, conduct school accreditation site visits pursuant to state board of education rules, and submit to the state board of education post-site visit recommendations for school accreditation. The educational service districts may assess a cooperative service fee to recover actual plus reasonable indirect costs for the purposes of this subsection.

(10) $2,150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $2,169,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for each educational service district to provide technology consultation, procurement, and training required under Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1365 (schools/computers & devices).

(11) $1,009,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5539 (ed. service district funding). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1509. 2022 c 297 s 511 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR LOCAL EFFORT ASSISTANCE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$272,986,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($250,542,000))

$232,169,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$63,909,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($587,437,000))

$569,064,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $63,909,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for enrollment stabilization local effort assistance funding as required in Substitute House Bill No. 1590 (enrollment stabilization). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1510. 2022 c 297 s 512 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR INSTITUTIONAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$14,074,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($13,894,000))

$14,787,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($27,968,000))

$28,861,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund—state fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2) State funding provided under this section is based on salaries and other expenditures for a 220-day school year. The superintendent of public instruction shall monitor school district expenditure plans for institutional education programs to ensure that districts plan for a full-time summer program.

(3) State funding for each institutional education program shall be based on the institution's annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment. Staffing ratios for each category of institution shall remain the same as those funded in the 1995-97 biennium.

(4) The funded staffing ratios for education programs for juveniles age 18 or less in department of corrections facilities shall be the same as those provided in the 1997-99 biennium.

(5) $701,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and (($701,000))$810,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to maintain at least one certificated instructional staff and related support services at an institution whenever the K-12 enrollment is not sufficient to support one full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff to furnish the educational program. The following types of institutions are included: Residential programs under the department of social and health services for developmentally disabled juveniles, programs for juveniles under the department of corrections, programs for juveniles under the juvenile rehabilitation administration, and programs for juveniles operated by city and county jails.

(6) $1,944,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $2,090,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to increase the capacity of institutional education programs to differentiate instruction to meet students' unique educational needs, including students with individualized educational plans. Those needs may include but are not limited to one-on-one instruction, enhanced access to counseling for social emotional needs of the student, and services to identify the proper level of instruction at the time of student entry into the facility. Allocations of amounts for this purpose in a school year must be based on 45 percent of full-time enrollment in institutional education receiving a differentiated instruction amount per pupil equal to the total statewide allocation generated by the distribution formula under RCW 28A.150.260 (4)(a), (5), (6), and (8) and the allocation under RCW 28A.150.415, per the statewide full-time equivalent enrollment in common schools.

(7) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2022 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to support three student records coordinators to manage the transmission of academic records for each of the long-term juvenile institutions. One coordinator is provided for each of the following: The Issaquah school district for the Echo Glen children's center, the Chehalis school district for Green Hill academic school, and the Naselle-Grays River Valley school district for Naselle youth camp school.

(8) Ten percent of the funds allocated for the institution may be carried over from one year to the next.

(9) $588,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $897,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for one educational advocate to each institution with enrollments above 40 full-time equivalent students beginning in the 2021-22 school year in addition to any educational advocates supported by federal funding. Educational advocates will provide the following supports to students enrolled in or just released from institutional education programs:

(a) Advocacy for institutional education students to eliminate barriers to educational access and success;

(b) Consultation with juvenile rehabilitation staff to develop educational plans for and with participating youth;

(c) Monitoring educational progress of participating students;

(d) Providing participating students with school and local resources that may assist in educational access and success upon release from institutional education facilities; and

(e) Coaching students and caregivers to advocate for educational needs to be addressed at the school district upon return to the community.

(10) $49,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to increase materials, supplies, and operating costs by $85 per pupil beginning in the 2021-22 school year for technology supports for institutional education programs. This funding is in addition to general education materials, supplies, and operating costs provided to institutional education programs, which exclude formula costs supported by the institutional facilities.

(11) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to support instruction in cohorts of students grouped by similar age and academic levels.

Sec. 1511. 2022 c 297 s 513 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$31,926,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($32,176,000))

$32,153,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($64,102,000))

$64,079,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2)(a) For the 2021-22 and 2022-23 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school district programs for highly capable students as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(c) except that allocations must be based on 5.0 percent of each school district's full-time equivalent enrollment. In calculating the allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following: (i) Additional instruction of 2.1590 hours per week per funded highly capable program student; (ii) fifteen highly capable program students per teacher; (iii) 36 instructional weeks per year; (iv) 900 instructional hours per teacher; and (v) the compensation rates as provided in sections 505 and 506 of this act.

(b) From July 1, 2021, to August 31, 2021, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts programs for highly capable students as provided in section 511, chapter 357, Laws of 2020, as amended.

Sec. 1512. 2022 c 297 s 515 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—EDUCATION REFORM PROGRAMS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$134,083,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($138,519,000))

$134,042,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$96,683,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$1,450,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,642,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($372,377,000))

$367,900,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) ACCOUNTABILITY

(a) $26,975,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $26,975,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, $1,350,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation, and $15,868,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for development and implementation of the Washington state assessment system.

(b) $14,352,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $14,352,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 159, Laws of 2013 (K-12 education - failing schools).

(2) EDUCATOR CONTINUUM

(a) $71,644,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and (($75,805,000))$71,328,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the following bonuses for teachers who hold valid, unexpired certification from the national board for professional teaching standards and who are teaching in a Washington public school, subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(i) For national board certified teachers, a bonus of $5,705 per teacher in the 2021-22 school year and a bonus of $6,019 per teacher in the 2022-23 school year;

(ii) An additional $5,000 annual bonus shall be paid to national board certified teachers who teach in either: (A) High schools where at least 50 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free or reduced-price lunch, (B) middle schools where at least 60 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free or reduced-price lunch, or (C) elementary schools where at least 70 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free or reduced-price lunch;

(iii) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to ensure that national board certified teachers meet the qualifications for bonuses under (b) of this subsection for less than one full school year receive bonuses in a prorated manner. All bonuses in this subsection will be paid in July of each school year. Bonuses in this subsection shall be reduced by a factor of 40 percent for first year NBPTS certified teachers, to reflect the portion of the instructional school year they are certified; and

(iv) During the 2021-22 and 2022-23 school years, and within available funds, certificated instructional staff who have met the eligibility requirements and have applied for certification from the national board for professional teaching standards may receive a conditional loan of two thousand dollars or the amount set by the office of the superintendent of public instruction to contribute toward the current assessment fee, not including the initial up-front candidacy payment. The fee shall be an advance on the first annual bonus under RCW 28A.405.415. The conditional loan is provided in addition to compensation received under a district's salary allocation and shall not be included in calculations of a district's average salary and associated salary limitation under RCW 28A.400.200. Recipients who fail to receive certification after fully exhausting all years of candidacy as set by the national board for professional teaching standards are required to repay the conditional loan. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to define the terms for initial grant of the assessment fee and repayment, including applicable fees. To the extent necessary, the superintendent may use revenues from the repayment of conditional loan scholarships to ensure payment of all national board bonus payments required by this section in each school year.

(b) $3,418,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $3,418,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of a new performance-based evaluation for certificated educators and other activities as provided in chapter 235, Laws of 2010 (education reform) and chapter 35, Laws of 2012 (certificated employee evaluations).

(c) $477,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $477,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the leadership internship program for superintendents, principals, and program administrators.

(d) $810,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $810,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the development of a leadership academy for school principals and administrators. The superintendent of public instruction shall contract with an independent organization to operate a state-of-the-art education leadership academy that will be accessible throughout the state. Semiannually the independent organization shall report on amounts committed by foundations and others to support the development and implementation of this program. Leadership academy partners shall include the state level organizations for school administrators and principals, the superintendent of public instruction, the professional educator standards board, and others as the independent organization shall identify.

(e) $10,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $10,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a beginning educator support program (BEST). The program shall prioritize first year educators in the mentoring program. School districts and/or regional consortia may apply for grant funding. The program provided by a district and/or regional consortia shall include: A paid orientation; assignment of a qualified mentor; development of a professional growth plan for each beginning educator aligned with professional certification; release time for mentors and new educators to work together; and educator observation time with accomplished peers. Funding may be used to provide statewide professional development opportunities for mentors and beginning educators.

(f) $4,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $4,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the provision of training for teachers, principals, and principal evaluators in the performance-based teacher principal evaluation program.

Sec. 1513. 2022 c 297 s 516 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR TRANSITIONAL BILINGUAL PROGRAMS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$217,022,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($218,054,000))

$227,384,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($102,242,000))

$113,065,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($537,318,000))

$557,471,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2)(a) For the 2021-22 and 2022-23 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts for transitional bilingual programs under RCW 28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080, including programs for exited students, as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(b) and the provisions of this section. In calculating the allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following averages: (i) Additional instruction of 4.7780 hours per week per transitional bilingual program student in grades kindergarten through six and 6.7780 hours per week per transitional bilingual program student in grades seven through twelve in school years 2021-22 and 2022-23; (ii) additional instruction of 3.0000 hours per week in school years 2021-22 and 2022-23 for the head count number of students who have exited the transitional bilingual instruction program within the previous two years based on their performance on the English proficiency assessment; (iii) fifteen transitional bilingual program students per teacher; (iv) 36 instructional weeks per year; (v) 900 instructional hours per teacher; and (vi) the compensation rates as provided in sections 505 and 506 of this act. Pursuant to RCW 28A.180.040(1)(g), the instructional hours specified in (a)(ii) of this subsection (2) are within the program of basic education.

(b) From July 1, 2021, to August 31, 2021, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts for transitional bilingual instruction programs as provided in section 514, chapter 357, Laws of 2020, as amended.

(3) The superintendent may withhold allocations to school districts in subsection (2) of this section solely for the central provision of assessments as provided in RCW 28A.180.090 (1) and (2) up to the following amounts: 1.89 percent for school year 2021-22 and 1.88 percent for school year 2022-23.

(4) The general fund—federal appropriation in this section is for migrant education under Title I Part C and English language acquisition, and language enhancement grants under Title III of the elementary and secondary education act.

(5) $35,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $35,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to track current and former transitional bilingual program students.

(6) $1,185,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2022 and $1,185,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the central provision of assessments as provided in RCW 28A.180.090, and is in addition to the withholding amounts specified in subsection (3) of this section.

Sec. 1514. 2022 c 297 s 517 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR THE LEARNING ASSISTANCE PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$449,472,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($447,888,000))

$424,536,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$533,481,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
(($26,382,000))

$9,200,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,457,223,000))

$1,416,689,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The general fund—state appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The appropriations include such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(b)(i) For the 2021-22 and 2022-23 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts for learning assistance programs as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(a), except that the allocation for the additional instructional hours shall be enhanced as provided in this section, which enhancements are within the program of the basic education. In calculating the allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following averages: (A) Additional instruction of 2.3975 hours per week per funded learning assistance program student for the 2021-22 and 2022-23 school years; (B) additional instruction of 1.1 hours per week per funded learning assistance program student for the 2021-22 and 2022-23 school years in qualifying high-poverty school building; (C) fifteen learning assistance program students per teacher; (D) 36 instructional weeks per year; (E) 900 instructional hours per teacher; and (F) the compensation rates as provided in sections 505 and 506 of this act.

(ii) From July 1, 2021, to August 31, 2021, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts for learning assistance programs as provided in section 515, chapter 357, Laws of 2020, as amended.

(c) A school district's funded students for the learning assistance program shall be the sum of the district's full-time equivalent enrollment in grades K-12 for the prior school year multiplied by the district's percentage of October headcount enrollment in grades K-12 eligible for free or reduced-price lunch in the prior school year. The prior school year's October headcount enrollment for free and reduced-price lunch shall be as reported in the comprehensive education data and research system.

(2) Allocations made pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be adjusted to reflect ineligible applications identified through the annual income verification process required by the national school lunch program, as recommended in the report of the state auditor on the learning assistance program dated February, 2010.

(3) The general fund—federal appropriation in this section is provided for Title I Part A allocations of the every student succeeds act of 2016.

(4) A school district may carry over from one year to the next up to 10 percent of the general fund—state funds allocated under this program; however, carryover funds shall be expended for the learning assistance program.

(5) Within existing resources, during the 2021-22 and 2022-23 school years, school districts are authorized to use funds allocated for the learning assistance program to also provide assistance to high school students who have not passed the state assessment in science.

(6) In addition to funding allocated under RCW 28A.150.260(10), the superintendent must allocate the following additional learning assistance program amounts to school districts from the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation:

(a) High poverty-based allocations in the 2022-23 school year for schools not eligible in the 2022-23 school year that were eligible for high poverty allocation in the previous school year.

(b) Allocations necessary to increase a school district's allocations under RCW 28A.150.260(10)(a)(i) up to an amount that would be generated based on the district's percentage of October headcount in grades K-12 eligible for free or reduced-price lunch in the 2019-20 school year if greater than the percentage allowed under RCW 28A.150.260(10)(a)(i).

Sec. 1515. 2022 c 297 s 518 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—PER PUPIL ALLOCATIONS

Statewide Average Allocations

Per Annual Average Full-Time Equivalent Student

Basic Education Program

2021-22

School Year

2022-23

School Year

General Apportionment

$9,405

(($10,098))

$10,094

Pupil Transportation

$623

(($644))

$698

Special Education Programs

$9,976

(($10,812))

$10,916

Institutional Education Programs

$26,347

(($27,779))

$27,973

Programs for Highly Capable Students

$611

(($645))

$644

Transitional Bilingual Programs

$1,442

(($1,509))

$1,551

Learning Assistance Program

$964

(($1,011))

$1,003

Sec. 1516. 2022 c 297 s 520 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR CHARTER SCHOOLS

Washington Opportunity Pathways Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($145,786,000))

$135,998,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,667,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($147,453,000))

$137,665,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The superintendent shall distribute funding appropriated in this section to charter schools under chapter 28A.710 RCW. Within amounts provided in this section the superintendent may distribute funding for safety net awards for charter schools with demonstrated needs for special education funding beyond the amounts provided under chapter 28A.710 RCW.

(2) $23,000 of the Washington opportunity pathways account—state appropriation is provided solely for enrollment stabilization allocations required in section 1519 of this act.

(3) $147,000 of the Washington opportunity pathways account—state appropriation is provided solely for transportation emergency allocations required in section 1516(3) of this act.

(4) $1,667,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for enrollment stabilization allocations pursuant to Substitute House Bill No. 1590 (enrollment stabilization). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1517. 2022 c 297 s 522 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR GRANTS AND PASS THROUGH FUNDING

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$80,493,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$78,255,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($989,995,000))

$948,147,000

Elementary and Secondary School Emergency Relief

III—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,850,527,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($2,999,270,000))

$2,957,422,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $4,894,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $4,894,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to administer programs and grants which increase equitable access to dual credit programs, including subsidizing or eliminating student costs for dual credit courses or exams. By November 2022, the office shall submit a report to relevant committees of the legislature describing options for entering into statewide agreements with dual credit exam companies that will reduce the overall costs for all students and eliminate costs for students who are low income.

(2)(a) $2,752,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $2,752,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for secondary career and technical education grants pursuant to chapter 170, Laws of 2008, including parts of programs receiving grants that serve students in grades four through six. If equally matched by private donations, $1,075,000 of the 2022 appropriation and $1,075,000 of the 2023 appropriation shall be used to support FIRST robotics programs in grades four through twelve. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $800,000 of the fiscal year 2022 appropriation and $800,000 of the fiscal year 2023 appropriation are provided solely for the purpose of statewide supervision activities for career and technical education student leadership organizations.

(b) $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for science, technology, engineering and mathematics lighthouse projects, consistent with chapter 238, Laws of 2010.

(c) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for advanced project lead the way courses at ten high schools. To be eligible for funding in 2022, a high school must have offered a foundational project lead the way course during the 2020-21 school year. The 2022 funding must be used for one-time start-up course costs for an advanced project lead the way course, to be offered to students beginning in the 2021-22 school year. To be eligible for funding in 2023, a high school must have offered a foundational project lead the way course during the 2021-22 school year. The 2023 funding must be used for one-time start-up course costs for an advanced project lead the way course, to be offered to students beginning in the 2022-23 school year. The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the education research and data center at the office of financial management shall track student participation and long-term outcome data. The office may require the recipient of these funds to report the impacts of the recipient's efforts in alignment with the measures of the Washington school improvement framework.

(d) $2,127,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $2,127,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for annual startup, expansion, or maintenance of core plus programs in maritime, construction, and aerospace and advanced manufacturing programs. To be eligible for funding to start up, maintain, or expand programs under (i) through (iii) of this subsection (d), the skills center and high schools must be selected through a competitive grant process administered by the office of the superintendent of public instruction in consultation with the advisory committee established in (vi) of this subsection (d). The office and the education research and data center shall report annually student participation and long-term outcome data. Within the amounts provided in this subsection:

(i) $900,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $900,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for grants for the annual startup, expansion, or maintenance of core plus programs in aerospace and advanced manufacturing programs.

(ii) $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for grants for the annual startup, expansion, or maintenance of core plus programs in construction programs.

(iii) $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for grants for the annual startup, expansion, or maintenance of core plus programs in maritime programs.

(iv) For (i) through (iii) of this subsection (d), when the grant demand does not align with the specified allocation, the superintendent may allocate funding toward sector areas that meet criteria based on agreement from industry sector representatives.

(v) $527,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $527,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the office to administer, evaluate, and promote programs under (i) through (iii) of this subsection (d) based on industry sector recommendations, including contracts with sector-specific entities to expand sector-specific employer engagement programs, increase work placement opportunities, validate credentials necessary for direct employment, and provide professional development to support schools, teachers, and students. The office may also contract with an entity with experience promoting core plus programming across industry sectors and education providers to expand awareness and adoption of core plus programs.

(vi) The office shall convene and manage an advisory committee of industry sector leadership from the core plus program areas and a representative from a statewide business and manufacturing association to inform the administration and continual improvement of core plus programs, including grant determinations, reviewing data and outcomes, recommending program improvements, and ensuring the use of qualified contractors. The committee will advise the superintendent on appropriate credentials, industry-based competencies, and programs of study for high-demand sectors represented in these program areas.

(3)(a) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for project citizen and we the people: The citizen and the constitution programs sponsored by the national conference of state legislatures and the center for civic education to promote participation in government by middle and high school students. Of the amounts provided, $15,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $15,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for awarding a travel grant to the winner of the we the people: The citizen and the constitution state competition.

(b) $373,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $373,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 127, Laws of 2018 (civics education). Of the amounts provided in this subsection (3)(b), $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for grant programs to school districts to help cover travel costs associated with civics education competitions.

(4)(a) $55,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $55,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction for statewide implementation of career and technical education course equivalency frameworks authorized under RCW 28A.700.070 for math and science. This may include development of additional equivalency course frameworks, course performance assessments, and professional development for districts implementing the new frameworks.

(b) Within the amounts appropriated in this section the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall ensure career and technical education courses are aligned with high-demand, high-wage jobs. The superintendent shall verify that the current list of career and technical education courses meets the criteria established in RCW 28A.700.020(2). The superintendent shall remove from the list any career and technical education course that no longer meets such criteria.

(c) $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to provide grants to school districts and educational service districts for science teacher training in the next generation science standards including training in the climate science standards. At a minimum, school districts shall ensure that teachers in one grade level in each elementary, middle, and high school participate in this science training. Of the amount appropriated $1,000,000 is provided solely for community-based nonprofits including tribal education organizations to partner with public schools for next generation science standards.

(5) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the Kip Tokuda memorial Washington civil liberties public education program. The superintendent of public instruction shall award grants consistent with RCW 28A.300.410.

(6) $5,895,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $5,895,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a contract with a nongovernmental entity or entities for demonstration sites to improve the educational outcomes of students who are dependent pursuant to chapter 13.34 RCW pursuant to chapter 71, Laws of 2016 (foster youth edu. outcomes). The office may require the recipient of these funds to report the impacts of the recipient's efforts in alignment with the measures of the Washington school improvement framework.

(a) Of the amount provided in this subsection (6), $446,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $446,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the demonstration site established pursuant to the 2013-2015 omnibus appropriations act, section 202(10), chapter 4, Laws of 2013, 2nd sp. sess.

(b) Of the amount provided in this subsection (6), $1,015,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,015,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the demonstration site established pursuant to the 2015-2017 omnibus appropriations act, section 501(43)(b), chapter 4, Laws of 2015, 3rd sp. sess., as amended.

(c) Of the amounts provided in this subsection (6), $684,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $684,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the demonstration site established with funding provided in the 2017-2019 omnibus appropriations act, chapter 1, Laws of 2017, 3rd sp. sess., as amended.

(d) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the demonstration site established with funding provided in this act.

(e) $55,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $55,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for maintaining and implementing the data sharing agreement between the office, the department of children, youth, and families, and the contractors to support targeted service delivery, program evaluation, and statewide education outcomes measurement for students served under this section.

(7)(a) $1,200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 157, Laws of 2016 (homeless students).

(b) $36,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $36,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for chapter 212, Laws of 2014 (homeless student educational outcomes).

(8) $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a nonviolence and ethical leadership training and professional development program provided by the institute for community leadership.

(9)(a) $1,425,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,425,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for dual language grants to grow capacity for high quality dual language learning. Grant funding may be used for new and existing dual language programs, heritage language programs for immigrant and refugee students, and indigenous language programs for native students.

(b) Each grant recipient must convene an advisory board to guide the development and continuous improvement of its dual language program, including but not limited to: Determining which schools and languages will be prioritized; conducting outreach to the community; and addressing enrollment considerations and the hiring of staff. At least half the members of the board must be parents of English learner students or current or former English learner students. The other members of the board must represent teachers, students, school leaders, governing board members, youth, and community-based organizations that support English learners.

(10)(a) $4,940,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $4,940,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the Washington state achievers scholarship and Washington higher education readiness program. The funds shall be used to: Support community involvement officers that recruit, train, and match community volunteer mentors with students selected as achievers scholars; and to identify and reduce barriers to college for low-income and underserved middle and high school students. The office may require the recipient of these funds to report the impacts of the recipient's efforts in alignment with the measures of the Washington school improvement framework.

(b) $1,454,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,454,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for contracting with a college scholarship organization with expertise in conducting outreach to students concerning eligibility for the Washington college bound scholarship consistent with chapter 405, Laws of 2007. The office may require the recipient of these funds to report the impacts of the recipient's efforts in alignment with the measures of the Washington school improvement framework.

(c) $362,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $362,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 180, Laws of 2017 (Washington Aim program).

(11)(a) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the Washington state leadership and assistance for science education reform (LASER) regional partnership activities, including instructional material purchases, teacher and principal professional development, and school and community engagement events. The office may require the recipient of these funds to report the impacts of the recipient's efforts in alignment with the measures of the Washington school improvement framework.

(b)(i) $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a statewide information technology academy program. This public-private partnership will provide educational software, as well as information technology certification and software training opportunities for students and staff in public schools for the 2021-22 and 2022-23 school years only. The office must evaluate other options that may be available in the state for a future public-private partnership to deliver similar services to students and staff of public schools at no cost to the state.

(ii) The office must require the recipient of these funds to report the impacts of the recipient's efforts in alignment with the measures of the Washington school improvement framework. The report must include the number of students served disaggregated by gender, race, ethnicity, and free-and-reduced lunch eligibility as well as the number of industry certificates attained by type of certificate.

(c) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for grants of $2,500 to provide twenty middle and high school teachers each year with professional development training for implementing integrated math, science, technology, and engineering programs in their schools.

(d) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the computer science and education grant program to support the following three purposes: Train and credential teachers in computer sciences; provide and upgrade technology needed to learn computer science; and, for computer science frontiers grants to introduce students to and engage them in computer science. The office of the superintendent of public instruction must use the computer science learning standards adopted pursuant to chapter 3, Laws of 2015 (computer science) in implementing the grant, to the extent possible. Additionally, grants provided for the purpose of introducing students to computer science are intended to support innovative ways to introduce and engage students from historically underrepresented groups, including girls, low-income students, and minority students, to computer science and to inspire them to enter computer science careers. The office of the superintendent of public instruction may award up to $500,000 each year, without a matching requirement, to districts with greater than fifty percent of students eligible for free and reduced-price meals. All other awards must be equally matched by private sources for the program, including gifts, grants, or endowments.

(e) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to contract with a qualified 501(c)(3) nonprofit community-based organization physically located in Washington state that has at least 18 years of experience collaborating with the office and school districts statewide to integrate the state learning standards in English language arts, mathematics, and science with FieldSTEM outdoor field studies and project-based and work-based learning opportunities aligned with the environmental, natural resource, and agricultural sectors. The office may require the recipient of these funds to report the impacts of the recipient's efforts in alignment with the measures of the Washington school improvement framework.

(f) $62,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $62,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for competitive grants to school districts to increase the capacity of high schools to offer AP computer science courses. In making grant allocations, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must give priority to schools and districts in rural areas, with substantial enrollment of low-income students, and that do not offer AP computer science. School districts may apply to receive either or both of the following grants:

(i) A grant to establish partnerships to support computer science professionals from private industry serving on a voluntary basis as coinstructors along with a certificated teacher, including via synchronous video, for AP computer science courses; or

(ii) A grant to purchase or upgrade technology and curriculum needed for AP computer science, as well as provide opportunities for professional development for classroom teachers to have the requisite knowledge and skills to teach AP computer science.

(g) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the Mobius science center to expand mobile outreach of science, technology, engineering, and mathematics (STEM) education to students in rural, tribal, and low-income communities.

(12) $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the centrum program at Fort Worden state park.

(13) (a) $788,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for contracts with Washington state based nonprofit organizations that provide a career-integrated one-to-one mentoring program for disadvantaged high school students facing academic and personal challenges with the goal of keeping them on track for graduation and post-high school success. The mentoring must include a focus on college readiness, career exploration and social-emotional learning. An applicant requesting funding for these dollars must successfully demonstrate to the department that it currently provides a career-integrated one-to-one volunteer mentoring program and has been mentoring high school youth for at least twenty years in the state prior to application.

(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $38,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the office to contract with a Washington-based nonprofit organization that provides one-to-one mentoring through a volunteer-supported network for disadvantaged youth facing academic and personal challenges to provide supportive services for youth who are experiencing mental and behavioral health crises due to the pandemic. Funding may also be used to assist youth mentors, and for staff who provide services to youth and their families and are experiencing secondary trauma. The organization must be affiliated with a national volunteer-supported mentoring network and have been providing one-to-one volunteer mentoring programs for at least 20 years in the state.

(14) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the office to contract with an organization to create an after-school and summer learning program in the city of Federal Way. The program shall provide comprehensive, culturally competent academic support and cultural enrichment for primarily latinx, spanish-speaking, low-income sixth, seventh, and eighth grade students. The department must contract with an organization with over forty years of experience that serves the latino community in Seattle and King county and has previously established an after-school and summer learning program.

(15) $850,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $850,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to create and administer a grant program for districts to reduce associated student body fees or participation fees for students who are eligible to participate in the federal free and reduced-price meals program. The office must distribute grants for the 2021-22 school year to school districts by August 10, 2021, and grants for the 2022-23 school year by August 1, 2022.

(a) Grant awards must be prioritized in the following order:

(i) High schools implementing the United States department of agriculture community eligibility provision;

(ii) High schools with the highest percentage of students in grades nine through twelve eligible to participate in the federal free and reduced-price meals program; and

(iii) High schools located in school districts enrolling 5,000 or fewer students.

(b) High schools that do not comply with the data collection and reporting requirements in RCW 28A.320.540 are not eligible for grant funding.

(c) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall award grants that are the lesser of the cost of the high school's associated student body card multiplied by the number of students eligible for the free or reduced-price meals program that purchased a student body card in either 2018-19 or 2019-20 school year, whichever is higher, or $10,000.

(d) The office may award additional funding if:

(i) The appropriations provided are greater than the total amount of funding requested at the end of the application cycle; and

(ii) The applicant shows a demonstrated need for additional support.

(16) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the south Kitsap school district to codevelop a pilot strategy to increase completion rates for the free application for federal student aid (FAFSA).

(17) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to contract with a Washington-based nonprofit organization to promote equitable access in science, technology, engineering, and math education for historically underserved students and communities. The nonprofit shall provide a system of science educational programming specifically for migrant and bilingual students, including teacher professional development, culturally responsive classroom resources that are aligned with Washington state science and environmental and sustainability learning standards, and implementation support. At least 50 percent of the funding provided in this subsection must serve schools and school districts in eastern Washington. The nonprofit organization must have experience developing and implementing science and environmental science programming and resources for migrant and bilingual students.

(18) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to contract with a nonprofit organization serving opportunity youth in Pierce, King and Snohomish counties. The organization must assist traditionally underrepresented students on nontraditional educational pathways by providing mentorship and technical assistance in navigating higher education and financial aid. The office may require the recipient of these funds to report the impacts of the efforts in alignment with the measures of the Washington school improvement framework.

(19) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to administer a grants program for school districts to acquire and use research-based, social emotional learning curricula in accordance with the state social emotional learning standards. The office must prioritize school districts that do not have existing research based social emotional learning programs and that are also eligible for high-poverty allocations from the learning assistance program.

(20) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the office to contract with a nonprofit organization that specializes in using e-sports to engage students in seven career clusters to bring team-based, career related e-sports programs to each high school in the Battle Ground, Evergreen, and Vancouver school districts. Any funding remaining may be used for e-sports programs in the middle schools of the three school districts.

(21) $1,399,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,399,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for school districts to support youth who are truant under chapter 28A.225 RCW or at risk of becoming truant, and for costs associated with filing or serving petitions under RCW 28A.225.030.

(22) The general fund—state appropriations in this section for fiscal year 2022 have been reduced by $24,000to reflect global compensation savings. The office of financial management, in consultation with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, shall adjust allotments from the appropriations in this section, including allotments of amounts provided solely for a specific purpose, to reflect the reduction to the overall appropriation.

(23) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the office to contract with an organization that works with educators to secure salmon eggs, offer learning opportunities as the fry develop, and assist when students release their fry into local creeks and lakes. Funding may only be used for new programs located in elementary schools that are eligible for high-poverty allocations from the learning assistance program. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, the office may use no more than $35,000 each fiscal year for office administration costs related to the contract.

(24) $9,850,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $9,850,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to administer the technology grant program established under Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1365 (schools/computers & devices).

(25) $199,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $247,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the media literacy and digital citizenship grant program created in Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1365 (schools/computers & devices). Total grant awards may not exceed $150,000. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for two regional conferences.

(26) $70,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the southwest boys & girls club to provide community mentoring, academic intervention, and culturally specific supports through the "be great-graduate initiative" for a cohort of White Center youth identified as high risk.

(27) $236,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $14,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for grants to support teachers with costs associated with becoming certified, endorsed, or licensed in computer science including, but not limited to, professional development, training, licensure exams, courses in pedagogy, and courses in computer science content. Entities eligible for these funds include, but are not limited to, individual teachers, local education agencies, approved professional learning providers, and institutions of higher education located in Washington state.

(28) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the Highline school district to contract with an organization to offer pre-apprenticeship opportunities for at least two cohorts of students each year in south King county during the summer months of 2021, 2022, and 2023. Students from the Highline school district and neighboring school districts in south King county are eligible for the program.

(29) $255,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $255,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the continuation of the math improvement pilot program. The entirety of the funds appropriated for fiscal year 2022 must be disbursed by the office to the recipients of the grants no later than August 1, 2021, and the entirety of the funds appropriated for fiscal year 2023 must be disbursed by the office to the recipients of the grants no later than August 1, 2022. Of the amounts provided in the subsection:

(a) $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the Spokane school district.

(b) $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the Chehalis school district.

(c) $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the Bremerton school district.

(30) Within existing resources, the office shall develop recommendation to the legislature to merge the grant programs and specific appropriations of pass-through funding for certain activities or entities in this section into a competitive grant funding process in future biennia. A competitive process must allocate funding using the following five separate categories:

(a) Student supports and safety. Programs under this category will support the mental, social-emotional, and physical safety of students;

(b) Educator growth and development. Programs under this category will support the recruitment and retention of educators, and support their continual professional growth;

(c) Curricula development, dissemination, and supports. Programs under this category will support the development, implementation, and continuous improvement of curricula and other programs specific to state learning standards and content areas;

(d) Eliminating inequitable student outcomes. Programs under this category will increase outcomes for specific student groups, including students experiencing homelessness or foster care; and

(e) Graduation success and preparation for postsecondary pathways. Programs under this category will increase access to graduation pathways aligned with students' postsecondary goals and support for each student to graduate ready to achieve those goals. These may include dual credit programs; dropout prevention, intervention, and reengagement programs; core plus programs; and other high demand career and technical education programs.

(31) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the south Kitsap school district for the controls programmer apprenticeship program.

(32) $800,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $5,300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for transitional support grants to school districts to support schools that incur costs transitioning from Native American school mascots, logos, or team names under section 3 of Substitute House Bill No. 1356 (Native American names, etc.).

(33) $10,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the office to administer an outdoor learning grant program to develop and support outdoor educational experiences for students in Washington public schools. The office must award grants to eligible school districts and outdoor education program providers starting in the 2022-23 school year. The office may consult with the Washington recreation and conservation office on outdoor learning program grants. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) $195,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the office to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 2078 (outdoor learning grant prg.). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(b) $3,903,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the outdoor learning grant program, which consists of two types of grants:

(i) Allocation-based grants for school districts to develop or support outdoor educational experiences; and

(ii) Competitive grants for outdoor education providers that are designed to support existing capacity and to increase future capacity for outdoor learning experiences.

(c) $5,902,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the outdoor education experiences program. The office must prioritize providing the program to fifth and sixth grade students in high poverty schools, expanding to other fifth and sixth grade students subject to available funds.

(34) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for an education and workforce pathway pilot program at the northwest career and technical academy. The pilot program will oversee a pathway including high schools, skills centers, community and technical colleges, and employers that results in students earning a high school diploma and an associate in technical arts degree, while maintaining summer employment.

(35) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to administer grants to school districts for a plant-based school meals pilot program. Grant recipients may use the funding for food supplies, delivery costs, equipment purchases, education, and other expenditures to increase access to plant-based school meals. Grant awards to school districts may not exceed $10,000 per district.

(36) $148,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to provide before and after-school programming to low-income elementary school students in the Tukwila school district. Funding in this subsection may be distributed to the Tukwila school district or to local before or after-school program providers that provide child care for low-income elementary school students in the school district.

(37) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the Tacoma school district to identify specific career-relevant coursework and facility needs for the development of a comprehensive maritime-focused career and technical education program in the south Puget Sound area. Funding must be used by the district to engage with the maritime industry in and around the port of Tacoma to conduct a workforce training gap analysis. The district must also coordinate with the office, the state board of education, and the workforce training board to create the relevant curriculum and identify facility needs to establish a new marine trades program.

(38) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the office to contract with an organization to expand the senior support initiative that helps high school seniors in the Tacoma school district navigate their postsecondary pathway options. The organization may provide support to Tacoma school district seniors through academic supports, financial aid and scholarships, college entry and communication, workforce entry and apprenticeships, housing, child care, and other basic needs. The organization must be a foundation focused on students that coordinates the efforts of parents, youth, community, and policymakers across multiple sectors to address equity gaps facing children and youth in the Tacoma school district.

(39) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the office to contract with a nonprofit organization to develop and provide a Latino youth-on-youth gang violence prevention program for students. The program must target Latino students ages 11 through 17 who are either involved in or at risk of becoming involved in a gang or in gang activities. Eligible students must be enrolled in either the Moses Lake or Federal Way school districts. The nonprofit organization must have at least 15 years of experience serving Latino communities and promoting advocacy and must provide kindergarten through 12th grade social emotional learning, mental health wraparound services, and parent engagement programs in Washington.

(40)(a) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the office to administer a pilot program to subsidize eligible dual or concurrent enrollment course costs for students who qualify for free or reduced-price meals and are participating in dual enrollment courses offered by one of three community colleges designated by the office and the state board of community and technical colleges. Eligible dual enrollment course programs include the running start and college in the high school programs. One of the community colleges must be located in a county with a population greater than 125,000 but less than 150,000.

(b) The office must subsidize the course costs by transmitting to each of the three institutions of higher education $1,000 per full-time equivalent student during the 2022-23 academic year. For eligible students who qualify for free or reduced-price meals and are enrolled in running start courses, the pilot program must subsidize:

(i) Any student-voted fees, technology fees, course fees, laboratory fees, or other fees required for enrollment, up to 17 credits per quarter, that were not waived by the institution of higher education under RCW 28A.600.310; and

(ii) Textbooks and other course materials required by the institution of higher education.

(c) Any funds remaining after the office subsidizes the costs included in (b) of this subsection may be used to subsidize waived fees or transportation costs for eligible students who qualify for free or reduced-price meals and are enrolled in running start courses.

(d) The office must submit a preliminary report to the legislature by June 30, 2023, on the results of the pilot program. It is the intent of the legislature to provide funding for a final report due to the legislature by August 31, 2023.

(41) $468,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the office to contract with a nonprofit organization to establish a workforce pilot program with the Vancouver school district that provides targeted training to expand the school district's candidate pool for school bus drivers and paraeducators. The nonprofit organization must be based in Vancouver, Washington and must have experience assisting individuals in becoming economically self-sufficient by providing resources, training, and job placement opportunities. By June 30, 2023, the office will collaborate with the nonprofit organization and the Vancouver school district to submit a report to the legislature with results of the workforce pilot program and recommendations for expanding the program.

(42) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the office to contract with the association of Washington school principals to provide support, mentoring, mediation, and professional learning services to school principals and assistant principals in the greater Seattle area.

(43) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for grants to school districts and educational service districts operating institutional education programs for youth in state long-term juvenile institutions to provide access to computer science elective courses created in Senate Bill No. 5657 (computer science instruction). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(44) $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the grant program created in Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5720 (student financial literacy) which provides grants to school districts for integrating financial literacy education into professional development for certificated staff. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(45) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for grants to school districts, charter schools, and state-tribal education compact schools to establish K-12 intensive tutoring programs. Grants shall be used to recruit, train, and hire tutors to provide one-on-one tutoring services to K-12 students experiencing learning loss as a result of the COVID-19 pandemic. The tutors must receive training in proven tutoring models to ensure their effectiveness in addressing learning loss.

(46) $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the office to distribute after-exit running start grants to school districts that identify running start students that have exceeded maximum enrollment under running start formulas and high school graduates who have 15 or fewer college credits to earn before meeting associate degree requirements for instruction not funded under section 504(18) of this act. High school graduates who meet these requirements are eligible to receive funds from these grants for fees to the community and technical college to earn up to 15 college credits during the summer academic term following their high school graduation.

(47) FEDERAL GRANTS FOR COVID-19 RECOVERY

(a) $12,885,000 of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account—federal appropriation from funds attributable to subsection 2001(f)(4), the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2 is provided solely to administer a grant program for community-based organizations to collaborate with school districts to support learning recovery and acceleration.

(b) $742,367,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA/ESSER) from funds attributable to subsection 313(c), the coronavirus response and relief supplemental appropriations act, P.L. 116-260, division M is provided solely for subgrants to local education agencies. Total subgrants awarded under this subsection (47)(b) and section 12, chapter 3, Laws of 2021 may not exceed the federal amounts provided under subsection 313(c), the coronavirus response and relief supplemental appropriations act, P.L. 116-260, division M.

(c)(i) (($46,263,000))$4,415,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA/GEER) is provided solely to provide emergency assistance to nonpublic schools, as authorized in section 312(d), the coronavirus response and relief supplemental appropriations act, P.L. 116-260, division M. Total funds provided under this subsection (47)(c)(i) and section 13, chapter 3, Laws of 2021 may not exceed the federal amounts provided in section 312(d), the coronavirus response and relief supplemental appropriations act, P.L. 116-260, division M.

(ii) $43,708,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) is provided solely to provide emergency assistance to nonpublic schools, as authorized in section 2002, the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2.

(d) $1,333,801,000 of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account—federal appropriation is provided solely for allocations from funds attributable to subsection 2001(e)(2) the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2 for subgrants to local education agencies.

(e) $333,450,000 of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account—federal appropriation is provided solely for allocations from funds attributable to subsection 2001(e)(1), the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2 for subgrants to local education agencies to address learning loss. Total funds provided under this subsection (47)(e) and section 1518(33)(b) of this act for the same purpose may not exceed the funding authorized in this subsection (47)(e).

(f) $18,525,000 of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account—federal appropriation from funds attributable to subsection 2001(f)(2), the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2 is provided solely for grants to entities or organizations to provide outdoor education summer enrichment programs to youth. Recipients must prioritize activities or programs that:

(i) Promote students connecting socially with their classmates;

(ii) Encourage students to engage in physical activity; and

(iii) Support families who have struggled with child care needs.

(g) $18,525,000 of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account—federal appropriation from funds attributable to subsection 2001(f)(3), the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2 is provided solely to support evidence-based comprehensive afterschool programs.

(h) $10,000,000 of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account—federal appropriation from funds attributable to subsection 2001(f)(4), the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2 is provided solely for grants to districts to expand the number of dual language classrooms in early grades and professional development to accelerate literacy gains in early grades, especially for English learners.

(i) $4,000,000 of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account—federal appropriation from funds attributable to subsection 2001(f)(4), the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2 is provided solely for grants to school districts to expand career and technical education graduation pathway options, including career-connected learning opportunities.

(j) $4,000,000 of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account—federal appropriation from funds attributable to subsection 2001(f)(4), the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2 is provided solely for grants for supplies, equipment, staffing, and services to increase access to summer meals and safe school meals in the 2021-22 school year and summer prior to the start of the school year.

(k) $60,000 of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account—federal appropriation from funds attributable to subsection 2001(f)(4), the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2 is provided solely to support a technical advisory workgroup to explore and recommend residency options for pre-service educators, with a focus on educators of color and bilingual speakers and how the apportionment system could support a teacher residency initiative. The workgroup will provide preliminary recommendations by November 1, 2021, and final recommendations by November 1, 2022.

(l) $78,172,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for allocations from federal funding in response to the COVID-19 pandemic as authorized in section 18003, the coronavirus aid, relief, and economic security act, P.L. 116-136, division B. Total funds provided under this subsection (47)(l) and amounts expended in the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium for the same purpose may not exceed the federal amounts provided in section 18003, the coronavirus response and relief supplemental appropriation act, P.L. 116-136, division B.

(m) $10,000,000 of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account—federal appropriation from funds attributable to subsection 2001(b), the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2, is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to contract with the Washington school principals' education foundation to support pandemic related learning loss through outdoor learning and overnight camp experiences. The association, in consultation with the office, must provide grants to school districts that partner with an accredited residential outdoor school to provide up to 20,000 fifth and sixth grade students with up to five days of outdoor learning at an overnight camp. Prioritization must be given to schools that have been identified for improvement and students who are most impacted by opportunity gaps as determined by measures of the Washington school improvement framework. Outdoor schools must provide curriculum that is aligned to state learning standards and provide opportunities for accelerated learning, including career connected learning in field based environmental science, technology, engineering, and math. Funds may be used by residential outdoor schools for operational activities necessary for reopening.

(n) $12,141,000 of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account—federal appropriation from funds attributable to subsection 2001(b), the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2, is provided solely for the purposes of identifying children and youth experiencing homelessness and providing children and youth experiencing homelessness with:

(i) Wrap-around services due to the challenges of the COVID-19 public health emergency; and

(ii) Assistance needed to enable children and youth experiencing homelessness to attend school and participate fully in school activities.

(o) $27,375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $79,485,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA/ESSER), and $93,140,000 of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account—federal appropriation are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to administer grants for the purposes of learning recovery and acceleration. Allowable uses of the funds are limited to:

(i) One-time contracts for classified, certificated, or administrative staff who will provide tiered academic and social-emotional supports to students most impacted by the disruption of in-person learning, including locating and reengaging students who have disengaged from school, one-on-one and small-group instruction, and other intensive learning supports;

(ii) Professional learning for educators focused on learning recovery and acceleration, including assessing student learning and social-emotional needs, transitioning to standards-based curricula and grading, adopting competency or mastery-based options specifically for credit retrieval purposes, and family and student engagement strategies;

(iii) Procuring assessment or data systems that provide actionable just-in-time data regarding student progress throughout the school year; and

(iv) Direct supports to students to improve school engagement and accelerate learning.

(End of part)

PART XVI

HIGHER EDUCATION

SUPPLEMENTAL

Sec. 1601. 2022 c 297 s 602 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$744,893,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($832,406,000))

$833,821,000

Community/Technical College Capital Projects

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$22,436,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$159,900,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$237,295,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,996,930,000))

$1,998,345,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $33,261,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $33,261,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely as special funds for training and related support services, including financial aid, as specified in RCW 28C.04.390. Funding is provided to support at least 7,170 full-time equivalent students in fiscal year 2022 and at least 7,170 full-time equivalent students in fiscal year 2023.

(2) $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $5,450,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation are provided solely for administration and customized training contracts through the job skills program. The state board shall make an annual report by January 1st of each year to the governor and to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature under RCW 43.01.036 regarding implementation of this section, listing the scope of grant awards, the distribution of funds by educational sector and region of the state, and the results of the partnerships supported by these funds.

(3) $425,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $425,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for Seattle Central College's expansion of allied health programs.

(4)(a) $5,250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $5,250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the student achievement initiative.

(b) By December 1, 2021, the state board for community and technical colleges must report to the appropriate committees of the legislature an update on the student achievement initiative including, but not limited to, the following:

(i) Annual change in student achievement initiative funds by institution;

(ii) Student achievement initiative funds awarded by college by performance funding category including basic skills, first 15 and 30 credits, retention, and completion;

(iii) Impact of guided pathways implementation on student achievement initiative awards; and

(iv) Any additional private or foundation dollars invested in the student achievement initiative.

(5) $1,610,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, and $1,610,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the mathematics, engineering, and science achievement program.

(6) $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for operating a fabrication composite wing incumbent worker training program to be housed at the Washington aerospace training and research center.

(7) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the aerospace center of excellence currently hosted by Everett community college to:

(a) Increase statewide communications and outreach between industry sectors, industry organizations, businesses, K-12 schools, colleges, and universities;

(b) Enhance information technology to increase business and student accessibility and use of the center's web site; and

(c) Act as the information entry point for prospective students and job seekers regarding education, training, and employment in the industry.

(8) $21,428,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and (($21,920,000))$23,056,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.

(9) Community and technical colleges are not required to send mass mailings of course catalogs to residents of their districts. Community and technical colleges shall consider lower cost alternatives, such as mailing postcards or brochures that direct individuals to online information and other ways of acquiring print catalogs.

(10) The state board for community and technical colleges shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

(11) $157,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $157,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the Wenatchee Valley college wildfire prevention program.

(12) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the Puget Sound welcome back center at Highline College to create a grant program for internationally trained individuals seeking employment in the behavioral health field in Washington state.

(13) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for increased enrollments in the integrated basic education and skills training program. Funding will support approximately 120 additional full-time equivalent enrollments annually.

(14)(a) The state board must provide quality assurance reports on the ctcLink project at the frequency directed by the office of chief information officer for review and for posting on its information technology project dashboard.

(b) The state board must develop a technology budget using a method similar to the state capital budget, identifying project costs, funding sources, and anticipated deliverables through each stage of the investment and across fiscal periods and biennia from project initiation to implementation. The budget must be updated at the frequency directed by the office of chief information officer for review and for posting on its information technology project dashboard.

(c) The office of the chief information officer may suspend the ctcLink project at any time if the office of the chief information officer determines that the project is not meeting or is not expected to meet anticipated performance measures, implementation timelines, or budget estimates. Once suspension or termination occurs, the state board shall not make additional expenditures on the ctcLink project without approval of the chief information officer. The ctcLink project funded through the community and technical college innovation account created in RCW 28B.50.515 is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(15) $216,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $216,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the opportunity center for employment and education at North Seattle College.

(16) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for Highline College to implement the Federal Way higher education initiative in partnership with the city of Federal Way and the University of Washington Tacoma campus.

(17) $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for Peninsula College to maintain the annual cohorts of the specified programs as follows:

(a) Medical assisting, 40 students;

(b) Nursing assistant, 60 students; and

(c) Registered nursing, 32 students.

(18) $338,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $338,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the Washington state labor education and research center at South Seattle College.

(19) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the aerospace and advanced manufacturing center of excellence hosted by Everett Community College to develop a semiconductor and electronics manufacturing branch in Vancouver.

(20) $15,220,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for college operating costs, including compensation and central services, in recognition that these costs exceed estimated increases in undergraduate operating fee revenue as a result of RCW 28B.15.067.

(21) $15,220,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for employee compensation, academic program enhancements, student support services, and other institutional priorities that maintain a quality academic experience for Washington students.

(22) $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $75,847,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation are provided solely for statewide implementation of guided pathways at each of the state's community and technical colleges or similar programs designed to improve student success, including, but not limited to, academic program redesign, student advising, and other student supports.

(23) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal 2023 are provided solely for a reentry navigator position at Olympic College to assist formerly incarcerated people gain admittance into college. A report shall be submitted to the legislature by December 1, 2022, on admittance rates on formerly incarcerated individuals, effective methods of contact and engagement of formerly incarcerated individuals, and how guided pathways can be assisted with reentry navigator positions.

(24) $40,800,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to continue to fund nurse educator salaries.

(25) $40,000,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided to continue to fund high-demand program faculty salaries, including but not limited to nurse educators, other health-related professions, information technology, computer science, and trades.

(26) $8,000,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the state board for community and technical colleges to expand high-demand and career launch enrollments, as provided under RCW 28C.30.020. Within the amounts provided in this subsection (26):

(a) $6,000,000 of the amounts in this subsection (26) are provided for expansion of career launch enrollments, as provided under RCW 28C.30.020.

(b) $2,000,000 of the amounts in this subsection (26) are provided for expansion of enrollments in high demand programs. These programs include, but are not limited to, allied health, computer and information science, manufacturing, and other fields identified by the state board for community and technical colleges.

(c) The state board for community and technical colleges may transfer amounts between (a) and (b) of this subsection (26) if either program does not have sufficient demand to spend the allocated funding. Any transfer must be approved by the state board for community and technical colleges and the office of financial management.

(27) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to the state board for community and technical colleges to support the completion of the English 101 curriculum review to remove barriers to student success. A report should be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature under RCW 43.01.036 by June 30, 2023, or upon the completion of the English 101 review to report on lessons learned, best practices, and recommendations for completion of additional curricula reviews.

(28) $8,000,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the emergency assistance grant program in RCW 28B.50.295.

(29) $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the state board for community and technical colleges to coordinate with the Washington student achievement council task force as described in section 609(6) of this act to provide the following running start data for fiscal year 2019, fiscal year 2020, and fiscal year 2021, for each community and technical college:

(a) The total number of running start students served by headcount and full-time equivalent;

(b) The total amount of running start revenue received through apportionment as allocated with the running start rate by the office of the superintendent of public instruction through local school districts;

(c) Course completion rates for running start students;

(d) A list of courses by two-digit classification of instructional program code and the number of running start students in each course;

(e) A list of career and technical education area courses and the number of running start students in each course;

(f) The number of students at each community or technical college receiving complete fee waivers as required by RCW 28A.600.310(3)(a); and

(g) The method used by each college to determine running start fee waiver eligibility, including any policies adopted by the college or its program.

(30) $16,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $91,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1044 (prison to postsecondary ed.).

(31) $516,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $516,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1166 (college students pilot).

(32) $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1273 (menstrual products/schools).

(33) $2,048,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,119,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5227 (diversity, etc./higher education).

(34) $15,848,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5194 (equity and access in higher education).

(35)(a) $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for grants to promote workforce development in trucking and trucking-related supply chain industries and the school bus driving industry by expanding the number of registered apprenticeships, pre-apprenticeships, and trucking related training programs; and providing support for registered apprenticeships or programs in trucking and trucking-related supply chain industries and the school bus driving industry.

(b) Grants awarded under this subsection may be used for:

(i) Equipment upgrades or new equipment purchases for training purposes;

(ii) New training spaces and locations to support capacity needs and expansion of training to veterans and veteran spouses, and underserved populations to include foster care and homeless transition populations;

(iii) Curriculum development and instructor training for driving, repair and service of technological advancements facing the industries;

(iv) Tuition assistance for commercial vehicle driver training, mechanical, and support functions that support the trucking industry and the school bus driving industry; and

(v) Funding to increase capacity and availability of child care options for shift work schedules.

(c) An entity is eligible to receive a grant if it is a nonprofit, nongovernmental, or institution of primary or higher education that provides training opportunities, including apprenticeships, pre-apprenticeships, pre-employment training, commercial vehicle driver training, vocational training related to mechanical and support functions that support the trucking industry or the school bus driving industry; or incumbent worker training to prepare workers for the trucking and trucking-related supply chain industries or the school bus driving industry. Preference will be given to entities in compliance with government approved or accredited programs. Reporting requirements, as determined by the board, shall be required.

(d) The board may use up to 5 percent of funds for administration of grants.

(36) $8,000,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants for nursing programs to purchase or upgrade simulation laboratory equipment.

(37)(a) $7,018,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to expand cybersecurity academic enrollments by 500 FTE students.

(b) The state board for community and technical colleges must coordinate with the student achievement council as provided in section 609(17) of this act to submit a progress report on the new or expanded cybersecurity academic programs, including the number of students enrolled.

(38) $205,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to establish a center for excellence in cybersecurity.

(39) $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $3,497,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for legal services related to litigation by employees within the community and technical college system challenging the denial of retirement and sick leave benefits. The cases include Wolf v. State and SBCTC, Rush v. State and SBCTC (retirement), and Rush v. State and SBCTC (sick leave).

(40) $7,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $1,000,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation are provided solely to expand the opportunity grant program to provide health care workforce grants for students.

(41) $2,720,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for each community and technical college to contract with a community-based organization to assist with financial aid access and support in communities.

(42) In addition to the homeless student assistance pilot program sites funded in subsection (31) of this section, $2,932,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the expansion of the program in RCW 28B.50.916 to all community colleges.

(43) $1,728,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the expansion of existing programming to accommodate refugees and immigrants who have arrived in Washington state on or after July 1, 2021, and are eligible for federal refugee resettlement services, including those from Afghanistan and Ukraine.

(44) $4,146,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for institution compensation costs in recognition that these costs exceed estimated increases in undergraduate operating fee revenue.

(45)(a) $3,760,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for nursing education, to increase the number of nursing slots for academic year 2022-23 by at least 50 and build capacity for at least 200 new slots in the 2023-2025 biennium, and to purchase two simulation vans.

(b) Of the amount provided in this subsection, $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for community and technical colleges who enroll new cohorts of at least 25 nursing students in the 2023 spring academic quarter.

(c) The state board for community and technical colleges must coordinate with the student achievement council as provided in section 609(17) of this act to submit a progress report on the new or expanded nursing academic programs, including the number of students enrolled per program.

(46)(a) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the state board in collaboration with the dental industry to report on strategies to support and transform the education and training of the dental hygiene and dental assistant professions.

(b) The report shall include, but is not limited to, recommendations on the following topics:

(i) Examining options to enhance workforce diversity;

(ii) Reducing barriers to entry; and

(iii) Proposing changes for education program sustainability.

(c) The state board must solicit input and collaborate on the report with a representative from a dental association, a representative from a hygienist association, an expert in dental hygiene education, a representative from the dental assistant profession, and a representative from the dental benefits industry.

(d) The report must be submitted to the legislature pursuant to RCW 43.01.036 by December 1, 2022.

(47) $30,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $243,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for Renton Technical College to establish a pilot program to increase outreach and participation in running start and adult education programs. A report on participation rates and student engagement must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature pursuant to RCW 43.01.036 by December 1, 2022.

(48) $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the development of a climate solutions and climate justice curriculum.

(49)(a) $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for a pilot program to help students, including those enrolled in state registered apprenticeship programs, connect with health care coverage. The state board for community and technical colleges must provide resources for up to two community or technical colleges, one on the east side and one on the west side of the Cascade mountains, to hire or train an employee to:

(i) Provide information to students and college staff about available health insurance options;

(ii) Develop culturally relevant materials and conduct outreach for historically marginalized and underserved student populations to assist these populations in their knowledge of access to low cost or free health insurance plans;

(iii) Provide ongoing technical assistance to students about health insurance options or health insurance application process; and

(iv) Provide technical assistance to students as a health benefit exchange certified assister, to help students understand, shop, apply, and enroll in health insurance through Washington health planfinder.

(b) Participation in the exchange assister program is contingent on fulfilling applicable contracting, security, and other program requirements.

(c) The legislature expects the state board, in collaboration with the student achievement council and the health benefit exchange, to report to the appropriate committees of the legislature information about barriers students, including those enrolled in state registered apprenticeship programs, encountered to accessing health insurance coverage; and to provide recommendations on how to improve student access to health coverage based on data gathered from the pilot program.

(50) $331,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5764 (apprenticeships and higher ed). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(51) $170,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1751 (hazing prevention). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount in this subsection shall lapse.

(52) $36,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2019 (careers in retail). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount in this subsection shall lapse.

(53) $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1835 (postsecondary enrollment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1602. 2022 c 297 s 603 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$391,802,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($423,726,000))

$443,981,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,630,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$32,000,000

University of Washington Building Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,546,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$37,020,000

Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,101,000

Biotoxin Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$609,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2022)
. . . .
$263,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2023)
. . . .
$325,000

Accident Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$7,988,000

Medical Aid Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$7,564,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$52,333,000

Geoduck Aquaculture Research Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$22,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($927,929,000))

$980,184,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $44,474,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and (($45,497,000))$47,854,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.

(2) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for labor archives of Washington. The university shall work in collaboration with the state board for community and technical colleges.

(3) $8,000,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for the family medicine residency network at the university to maintain the number of residency slots available in Washington.

(4) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in computer science and engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in computer science and engineering programs above the prior academic year.

(5) $14,000,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for the expansion of degrees in the department of computer science and engineering at the Seattle campus.

(6) $3,062,000 of the economic development strategic reserve account—state appropriation is provided solely to support the joint center for aerospace innovation technology.

(7) The University of Washington shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

(8) $7,345,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $7,345,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the continued operations and expansion of the Washington, Wyoming, Alaska, Montana, Idaho medical school program.

(9) $2,625,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $2,625,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the institute for stem cell and regenerative medicine. Funds appropriated in this subsection must be dedicated to research utilizing pluripotent stem cells and related research methods.

(10) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided to the University of Washington to support youth and young adults experiencing homelessness in the university district of Seattle. Funding is provided for the university to work with community service providers and university colleges and departments to plan for and implement a comprehensive one-stop center with navigation services for homeless youth; the university may contract with the department of commerce to expand services that serve homeless youth in the university district.

(11) $1,200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,800,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the adult psychiatry residency program at the University of Washington to offer additional residency positions that are approved by the accreditation council for graduate medical education.

(12) $172,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $172,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a University of Washington study in the south Cascades to determine current wolf use and density, and to gather baseline data to understand the effects of wolf recolonization on predator-prey dynamics of species that currently have established populations in the area.

(a) The study objectives shall include:

(i) Determination of whether wolves have started to recolonize a 5,000 square kilometer study area in the south Cascades of Washington, and if so, an assessment of their distribution over the landscape as well as their health and pregnancy rates;

(ii) Baseline data collection, if wolves have not yet established pack territories in this portion of the state, that will allow for the assessment of how the functional densities and diets of wolves across the landscape will affect the densities and diets in the following predators and prey: Coyote, cougar, black bear, bobcat, red fox, wolverine, elk, white tailed deer, mule deer, moose, caribou, and snowshoe hare;

(iii) Examination of whether the microbiome of each species changes as wolves start to occupy suitable habitat; and

(iv) An assessment of the use of alternative wildlife monitoring tools to cost-effectively monitor size of the wolf population over the long-term.

(b) A report on the findings of the study shall be shared with the Washington department of fish and wildlife.

(13)(a) $20,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 ((and $20,000,000)), $38,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $32,000,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to support the operations and teaching mission of the Harborview Medical Center and the University of Washington Medical Center.

(b) By December 1, 2022, the University of Washington must report to the appropriate committees of the legislature the impact of the funding in (a) of this subsection on the fiscal position of Harborview medical center and the University of Washington medical center in the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. To ensure transparency, consistency, accuracy, and clarity, the report must:

(i) Follow generally accepted accounting principles;

(ii) Use generally accepted terms and define those terms;

(iii) Provide data on revenue and expenses, using standard formats already in existence, such as comprehensive hospital abstract reporting system (CHARS) data, and delineated by functional areas of state government;

(iv) Incorporate wherever possible publicly available data, as a public institution including, but not limited to, the following sources:

(A) CHARS;

(B) Comprehensive annual financial reports; and

(C) The most recent independent auditor report, including financial statements connected to the report; and

(v) Provide supporting documentation.

(14) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the University of Washington's psychiatry integrated care training program.

(15) $426,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $640,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for child and adolescent psychiatry residency positions that are approved by the accreditation council for graduate medical education, as provided in RCW 28B.20.445.

(16) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the University of Washington School of Dentistry to support its role as a major oral health provider to individuals covered by medicaid and the uninsured.

(17) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the pre-law pipeline and social justice program at the University of Washington-Tacoma.

(18) $226,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $226,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the university's neurology department to create a telemedicine program to disseminate dementia care best practices to primary care practitioners using the project ECHO model. The program shall provide a virtual connection for providers and content experts and include didactics, case conferences, and an emphasis on practice transformation and systems-level issues that affect care delivery. The initial users of this program shall include referral sources in health care systems and clinics, such as the university's neighborhood clinics and Virginia Mason Memorial in Yakima with a goal of adding 15 to 20 providers from smaller clinics and practices per year.

(19) $102,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $102,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the university's center for international trade in forest products.

(20) $625,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $625,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the Latino center for health.

(21) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a firearm policy research program. The program will:

(a) Support investigations of firearm death and injury risk factors;

(b) Evaluate the effectiveness of state firearm laws and policies;

(c) Assess the consequences of firearm violence; and

(d) Develop strategies to reduce the toll of firearm violence to citizens of the state.

(22) $463,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the climate impacts group in the college of the environment.

(23) $225,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the climate impacts group in the college of the environment to provide an updated climate impacts risk assessment designed to inform future updates to the statewide climate resilience strategy. The group must coordinate with the office of the governor to refine the scope of assessment. The final report and associated deliverables must be completed and submitted to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by December 15, 2022.

(24) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the college of education to collaborate with teacher preparation programs and the office of the superintendent of public instruction to develop open access climate science educational curriculum for use in teacher preparation programs.

(25) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the Harry Bridges center for labor studies. The center shall work in collaboration with the state board for community and technical colleges.

(26) $21,461,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for institution operating costs, including compensation and central services, in recognition that these costs exceed estimated increases in undergraduate operating fee revenue as a result of RCW 28B.15.067.

(27) $8,000,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for employee compensation, academic program enhancements, student support services, and other institutional priorities that maintain a quality academic experience for Washington students.

(28) $8,000,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to maintain degree production in the college of engineering at the Seattle campus.

(29) $1,000,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to maintain the Washington state academic redshirt program.

(30) $2,700,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to maintain degree capacity and undergraduate enrollments in engineering, mathematics, and science programs to support the biomedical innovation partnership zone at the Bothell campus.

(31) $3,268,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to maintain bachelor of science programs in mechanical and civil engineering to support increased student and local employer demand for graduates in these fields at the Tacoma campus.

(32) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for Washington mathematics, engineering, science achievement programs to provide enrichment opportunities in mathematics, engineering, science, and technology to students who are traditionally underrepresented in these programs.

(33) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a community care coordinator for transitional-age youth for the doorway project in partnership with the Seattle campus.

(34) $6,000,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the expansion of the Paul G. Allen school of computer science and engineering in order to award an additional 100 degrees per year focusing on traditionally underrepresented students. A report on degrees awarded must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature June 30, 2022, and June 30, 2023.

(35) $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the community immersion law enforcement project at the Tacoma campus.

(36)(a) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for research to determine the use and effectiveness of restorative justice, including for hate crime victims and individuals who commit hate crimes. Researchers shall engage in listening sessions with impacted communities, which must include tribal governments and community-based organizations. Researchers shall consult with judges, prosecutors, defense attorneys, victim advocates, impacted communities, and community based restorative justice agencies to inform whether restorative justice would be an effective public policy option to:

(i) Provide healing support for individual hate crime victims and their communities;

(ii) Provide accountability processes for individuals who commit hate crimes;

(iii) Provide opportunities for individuals who commit hate crimes to learn about the impact of their crimes and repair the damage;

(iv) Repair interpersonal and communal relationships;

(v) Reduce hate crime offender recidivism; and

(vi) Determine if restorative justice could be equally available to all victims and communities.

(b) The researcher shall provide a report to the relevant committees of the legislature under RCW 43.01.036 by December 1, 2021. The report must include best practice recommendations for establishing a restorative justice program and required data collection to address hate crimes in Washington. The report shall include how restorative justice recommendations can be implemented in conjunction with the recommendations of the hate crime advisory working group established in RCW 43.10.300.

(37) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for scholarships to students in the applied child and adolescent psychology masters program. Priority should be given to traditionally underrepresented students and those students who are bilingual.

(38) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to expand a series of online courses related to behavioral health and student well-being that are currently offered at the Bothell campus for school district staff. The standards for the courses must be consistent with knowledge, skill, and performance standards related to mental health and well-being of public school students. The online courses must provide:

(a) Foundational knowledge in behavioral health, mental health, and mental illness;

(b) Information on how to assess, intervene upon, and refer behavioral health and intersection of behavioral health and substance use issues; and

(c) Approaches to promote health and positively influence student health behaviors.

(39) To ensure transparency and accountability, in the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium the University of Washington shall comply with any and all financial and accountability audits by the Washington state auditor including any and all audits of university services offered to the general public, including those offered through any public-private partnership, business venture, affiliation, or joint venture with a public or private entity, except the government of the United States. The university shall comply with all state auditor requests for the university's financial and business information including the university's governance and financial participation in these public-private partnerships, business ventures, affiliations, or joint ventures with a public or private entity. In any instance in which the university declines to produce the information to the state auditor, the university will provide the state auditor a brief summary of the documents withheld and a citation of the legal or contractual provision that prevents disclosure. The summaries must be compiled into a report by the state auditor and provided on a quarterly basis to the legislature.

(40) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the department of environmental and occupational health sciences to provide an air quality report. The report will study the relationship between indoor and outdoor ultrafine particle air quality at sites with vulnerable populations, such as schools or locations underneath flight paths within 10 miles of Sea-Tac airport. The report recommendations must include an item addressing filtration systems at select locations with vulnerable populations. The report shall be submitted to the house environment and energy committee and the senate environment, energy and technology committee by December 15, 2021.

(41) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the Burke museum of natural history and culture to make education programs offered by the museum accessible to more students across Washington, especially students in underserved schools and locations. The funding shall be used for:

(a) Increasing the number of students who participate in Burke education programs at reduced or no cost, including virtual programs;

(b) Providing bus reimbursement for students visiting the museum on field trips and to support travel to bring museum programs across the state; and

(c) Staff who will form partnerships with school districts to serve statewide communities more efficiently and equitably, including through the Burkemobile program.

(42)(a) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the center for cannabis research at the university to collaborate with the Washington State University collaboration on cannabis policy, research, and outreach to create frameworks for future studies. Each framework will include the length of time to complete, research licenses necessary, cost, literature review of national and international research, and a scope of work to be completed. The following frameworks shall be compiled in a report:

(i) Measuring and assessing impairment due to cannabis use; and

(ii) Correlation between age of use, dosage of use, and appearance of occurrence of cannabis induced psychosis.

(b) The report on the frameworks must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2021.

(43) $205,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $410,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the university's center for human rights. The appropriation must be used to supplement, not supplant, other funding sources for the center for human rights.

(44) $143,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $143,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to the University of Washington for the establishment and operation of the state forensic anthropologist. The university shall work in conjunction with and provide the full funding directly to the King county medical examiner's office to support the statewide work of the state forensic anthropologist.

(45) $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely to the University of Washington school of medicine for the development of simulation training devices at the Harborview medical center's paramedic training program.

(46) $64,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $64,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for one full-time mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW who has experience and training specifically related to working with active members of the military or military veterans.

(47) $557,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $443,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the creation of the center for environmental forensic science.

(48) $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the college of education to partner with school districts to continue the math improvement pilot program.

(49) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the university to conduct monitoring and research related to Puget Sound kelp conservation and recovery.

(50) $20,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to expand online tutorial and link to web-based, continuing education funded by the centers for disease control for training for the primary care health workforce regarding the protocols for perinatal monitoring, birth-dose immunization, early diagnosis, linkage to care, and treatment for persons diagnosed with chronic hepatitis B or hepatitis using a telehealth model operated by the University of Washington.

(a) Training shall:

(i) Focus on increased provider proficiency and increased number of trained providers in areas with high rates of reported cases of hepatitis B or hepatitis, including regions with high incidence of drug use or upward trend of children who have not received hepatitis B virus vaccinations according to centers for disease control recommendations; and

(ii) Provide access to:

(A) University of Washington medicine specialists in infectious diseases, hepatology, and addiction medicine;

(B) Brief updates on evidence-based strategies to diagnose, treat, and manage acute and chronic hepatitis B, acute and chronic hepatitis C, or coinfections;

(C) Continuing medical education credits per hour of participation; and

(D) Phone consultation with specialists during nonscheduled time for patients who experience complications.

(b) All digital and hardcopy training, educational, and outreach materials for this program must be culturally relevant and linguistically diverse.

(51)(a) $108,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $52,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the University of Washington Evans school of public policy and governance to conduct a boater safety analysis, including, but not limited to, the following:

(i) The prevalence of boating fatalities and rescues in Washington state;

(ii) A comparison of Washington's rates of fatalities and rescues to other states; and

(iii) Recommendations of effective and collective ways to increase boater safety in the state.

(b) The Evans school may convene stakeholders to analyze data and make recommendations. By December 31, 2022, the Evans school must submit a report of findings and recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature.

(52) $736,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1272 (health system transparency).

(53) $159,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1273 (menstrual products/schools).

(54) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1335 (racial restrictions/review).

(55) $24,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1196 (audio-only telemedicine).

(56) $69,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $69,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5194 (equity and access in higher education).

(57) $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5141 (environmental justice task force recs).

(58) $146,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $158,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5227 (diversity, etc./higher education).

(59) $422,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for implementation of chapter 6, Laws of 2021 (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5272).

(60) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding for the implementation of chapter 96, Laws of 2021 (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5228).

(61) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,782,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5126 (climate commitment act).

(62) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $225,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for an increase in financial student assistance in public service oriented graduate and professional degree programs, referred to as "fee-based" programs, whose tuition for public service degrees is over $18,000 per year. Programs shall create mechanisms to prioritize assistance to traditionally underrepresented students, specifically those who have expressed a commitment to service in the physician assistant, community oriented public health, or social work programs. The institution may offer financial assistance for students that volunteer or work with public health agencies, including as contact tracers.

(63) $1,250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the community-engagement test to facilitate clean energy transitions by partnering with communities, utilities, and project developers.

(64) $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for staffing and operational expenditures related to the battery fabrication testbed.

(65) $621,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for maintenance and operation costs for the Milgard hall at University of Washington—Tacoma.

(66) $505,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for pharmacy behavioral health. The University of Washington school of pharmacy/medicine pharmacy services will hire two residency training positions and one behavioral health faculty to create a residency program focused on behavioral health.

(67) $3,777,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for institution compensation costs in recognition that these costs exceed estimated increases in undergraduate operating fee revenue.

(68) $225,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the center for health workforce studies to develop a program to track dental workforce trends, needs, and enhancements to better serve the increasing population and demand for access to adequate oral health care. The center shall develop the program in consultation with dental stakeholders, including, but not limited to, provider associations and oral health philanthropic leaders. The workforce reporting program is to be considered a public-private partnership. The institutions may accept matching funds from interested stakeholders to help facilitate and administer the workforce reporting program. The program shall:

(a) Provide ongoing assessment of the supply and distribution of, and demand for, the state's oral health workforce;

(b) Conduct studies to describe the demographic, education, and practice characteristics of occupations engaged in providing oral health care and to improve understanding of workplace factors that influence workforce recruitment and retention; and

(c) Display and disseminate findings through a public facing website dashboard, in a deidentified and aggregate format, and through findings briefs accessible from the website, among other methods of dissemination.

(69) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the institution to contract with a nonprofit organization to provide a report on the community inventory to help align the Washington park arboretum planning with the diverse needs and priorities of the community.

(70) $1,242,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for an increase in the number of nursing slots and graduates in the already established accelerated bachelor of science in nursing program. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $273,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the Tacoma school of nursing and healthcare leadership.

(71) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the memory and brain wellness center to support the statewide expansion of the dementia friends program.

(72) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for a $2,500 monthly stipend to students during the 20-week training period of the business certificate program at the Bothell campus established in partnership with the MLK Gandhi empowerment initiative. The business certificate program must consist of two cohorts of 20 students.

(73) $455,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the startup program within the school of computer science and engineering.

(74)(a) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the colab for community and behavioral health policy to work in collaboration with the Latino center for health and allies in healthier systems for health & abundance in youth to convene a community coalition and design team to develop recommendations for the expansion of culturally responsive community mental health services focused on children and adolescents in Washington. Community and lived experience stakeholders, representing communities of color, must make up over half of the team. The coalition's recommendations shall address:

(i) Expansion of clinical training for a lived experience workforce to provide culturally responsive and evidence-informed mental health services focused on families, children, and youth;

(ii) An implementation plan that allows for local flexibility and local community input; and

(iii) An evaluation plan that will yield information about the success in implementation statewide and the improved experiences of those seeking mental health services.

(b) The coalition must report its findings and recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 15, 2022.

(75)(a) $89,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to establish a data repository to assist the state and all political subdivisions with evaluating whether and to what extent existing laws and practices with respect to voting and elections are consistent with public policy, implementing best practices in voting and elections, and to investigate potential infringements upon the right to vote.

(b) The operation of the repository shall be the responsibility of the director of the repository who shall be employed by the University of Washington with doctoral level expertise in demography, statistical analysis, and electoral systems. The director shall be appointed by the governor. The director shall appoint necessary staff to implement and maintain the repository.

(c) The repository shall maintain in electronic format at least the following data and records, where available, for at least the previous 12-year period:

(i) Estimates of the total population, voting age population, and citizen voting age population by race, ethnicity, and language-minority groups, broken down to the election district and precinct level on a year-by-year basis for every political subdivision in the state, based on data from the United States census bureau, American community survey, or data of comparable quality collected by a public office;

(ii) Election results at the precinct level for every statewide election and every election in every political subdivision;

(iii) Regularly updated voter registration lists, voter history files, voting center locations, ballot drop box locations, and student engagement hub locations for every election in every political subdivision;

(iv) Contemporaneous maps, descriptions of boundaries, and shapefiles for election districts and precincts;

(v) Ballot rejection lists, curing lists, and reasoning for ballot rejection for every election in every political subdivision;

(vi) Apportionment plans for every election in every political subdivision; and

(vii) Any other data that the director deems advisable.

(d) The director shall update the data in the repository no later than 30 business days after certification of each election as required by RCW 29A.60.190 or 29A.60.250.

(e) Except for any data, information, or estimates that identifies individual voters, the data, information, and estimates maintained by the repository shall be posted online and made available to the public at no cost.

(f) The repository shall prepare any estimates made pursuant to this section by applying the most advanced, peer-reviewed, and validated methodologies.

(g) On or before January 1, 2023, the repository shall publish on its website and transmit to the state for dissemination to county auditors secretary of a list of political subdivisions required pursuant to section 203 of the federal voting rights act to provide assistance to members of language-minority groups and each language in which those political subdivisions are required to provide assistance. Each county auditor shall transmit the list described herein to all political subdivisions within their jurisdiction.

(h) Upon the certification of election results and the completion of the voter history file after each election, the secretary of state shall transmit copies of:

(i) Election results at the election district level;

(ii) Contemporaneous voter registration lists;

(iii) Voter history files;

(iv) Maps, descriptions, and shapefiles for election districts; and

(v) Lists of voting centers and student engagement hubs.

(i) Staff at the repository may provide nonpartisan technical assistance to political subdivisions, scholars, and the general public seeking to use the resources of the repository.

(76) $122,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for sexual assault nurse examiner training.

(77) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the University of Washington must explore pathways for providing direct admissions to the nursing programs at the Seattle campus. By December 1, 2022, the university must report pursuant to RCW 43.01.036 to the appropriate committees of the legislature recommendations for direct admissions, including a timeline for implementation and estimated costs.

(78) $232,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the center for environmental forensic science for the procurement of an AccuTOF DART mass spectrometry system to perform rapid forensic wood identification to combat illegal logging and associated trade.

(79) $167,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to the center for an informed public for research to identify new technologies and strategies to resist strategic misinformation in collaboration with Finnish higher education institutions and organizations. By June 30, 2023, the center must submit a report pursuant to RCW 43.01.036 to the appropriate committees of the legislature on the use of funds, key metrics and deliverables, and recommendations for further opportunities for collaboration.

(80) $18,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5764 (apprenticeships and higher ed). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(81) $277,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for Substitute Senate Bill No. 5644 (behavior health co-response). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(82) $15,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5874 (military student residency). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((84)))(83) $121,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1751 (hazing prevention). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((85)))(84) $16,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1181 (veterans & military suicide). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((86)))(85)(a) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to the institution to conduct a study, in consultation with the department of health and with approval from the Washington state institutional review board, of the ability of Washington residents to make use of the rights established in chapter 70.245 RCW to achieve full access to the Washington death with dignity act. The institution and department shall enter into a signed data sharing agreement for the purpose of the study. Pursuant to RCW 42.56.070, 42.56.360, and 70.245.150, the data sharing agreement must specify that data shared or obtained in the course of this study are not subject to public disclosure. The study shall review the extent to which there are barriers to achieving full access to the Washington death with dignity act.

(b) The department shall provide to the institution the data requested on deaths of all Washington residents and legal next of kin by August 1, 2022.

(c) By December 1, 2022, the institution shall report its findings to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature under RCW 43.01.036. Pursuant to RCW 42.56.070, 42.56.360, and 70.245.150, the report must protect the confidentiality of the subjects of any data that it receives while conducting its research, including the names of any patients and health care providers.

Sec. 1603. 2022 c 297 s 604 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$246,492,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($264,669,000))

$266,170,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$500,000

Washington State University Building Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$792,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$33,995,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,076,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2022)
. . . .
$138,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2023)
. . . .
$175,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$31,736,000

Waste Reduction, Recycling, and Litter Control

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$331,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($580,904,000))

$582,405,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a rural economic development and outreach coordinator.

(2) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in computer science and engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in computer science and engineering programs above the prior academic year.

(3) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for state match requirements related to the federal aviation administration grant.

(4) Washington State University shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletic programs.

(5) $7,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $7,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $22,800,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation are provided solely for the continued development and operations of a medical school program in Spokane.

(6) $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a honey bee biology research position.

(7) $31,614,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and (($32,341,000))$34,016,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.

(8) $580,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $580,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the development of an organic agriculture systems degree program located at the university center in Everett.

(9) $630,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $630,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the creation of an electrical engineering program located in Bremerton. At full implementation, the university is expected to increase degree production by 25 new bachelor's degrees per year. The university must identify these students separately when providing data to the education research data center as required in subsection (2) of this section.

(10) $1,370,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,370,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the creation of software engineering and data analytic programs at the university center in Everett. At full implementation, the university is expected to enroll 50 students per academic year. The university must identify these students separately when providing data to the education research data center as required in subsection (2) of this section.

(11) General fund—state appropriations in this section are reduced to reflect a reduction in state-supported tuition waivers for graduate students. When reducing tuition waivers, the university will not change its practices and procedures for providing eligible veterans with tuition waivers.

(12) $1,154,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,154,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 36, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. (renewable energy, tax incentives).

(13) $376,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $376,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for chapter 202, Laws of 2017 (E2SHB 1713) (children's mental health).

(14) $585,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $585,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 159, Laws of 2017 (2SSB 5474) (elk hoof disease).

(15)(a) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the joint center for deployment and research in earth abundant materials.

(b) By December 1, 2021, the joint center for deployment and research in earth abundant materials must report to the appropriate committees of the legislature on the center's research grant program, including but not limited to the following:

(i) The annual amount of funding available for the grant program, including any private or foundation dollars;

(ii) The average award amount per project;

(iii) The educational impact of funded projects on high schools and community and technical colleges; and

(iv) The impact of project findings on technologies in Washington using earth-abundant materials.

(16) $2,076,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for the university's soil health initiative and its network of long-term agroecological research and extension (LTARE) sites. The network must include a Mount Vernon REC site.

(17) $6,880,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for institution operating costs, including compensation and central services, in recognition that these costs exceed estimated increases in undergraduate operating fee revenue as a result of RCW 28B.15.067.

(18) $20,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $20,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the office of clean technology to convene a sustainable aviation biofuels work group to further the development of sustainable aviation fuel as a productive industry in Washington. The work group must include members from the legislature and sectors involved in sustainable aviation biofuels research, development, production, and utilization. The work group must provide a report including any pertinent recommendations to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2022.

(19) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for Washington State University's energy program to launch a least-conflict priority solar siting pilot project in the Columbia basin of eastern and central Washington. This program shall engage all relevant stakeholders to identify priority areas where there is the least amount of potential conflict in the siting of utility scale PV solar and to develop a map highlighting these areas. The program shall also compile the latest information on opportunities for dual-use and colocation of PV solar with other land values. The appropriation is the maximum amount the department may expend for this purpose.

(20) $42,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $42,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for one full-time mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW who has experience and training specifically related to working with active members of the military or military veterans.

(21) $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $215,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the William D. Ruckelshaus center to partner with the Washington State University for the continued work of the Washington state criminal sentencing task force established in section 944 of this act.

(22)(a) $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the William D. Ruckelshaus center to conduct a situation assessment to gauge the prospects for a collaborative approach to integration of leadership, aligning roles and responsibilities, and increasing efficiency and responsiveness of the state's K-12 education governance structure. The assessment must:

(i) Identify issues, challenges, and opportunities related to administration and governance of K-12 education in Washington state;

(ii) Consist of interviews with representatives of state-funded K-12 education agencies, boards, commissions, and other relevant entities identified by the center;

(iii) Explore potential opportunities for the integration, alignment, and/or consolidation of roles and responsibilities of entities; and

(iv) Identify key areas of focus.

(b) The center must report the assessment's findings and recommendations to the education committees of the legislature by March 31, 2022, with a preliminary report by February 1, 2022, as to whether circumstances support the convening and facilitation of a collaborative work group.

(23)(a) $331,000 of the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account—state appropriation is provided solely for the university to conduct an organic waste study to:

(i) Assess local and state government compost usage in projects and buy-back programs under RCW 43.19A.120 and 43.19A.130 including but not limited to participation, effectiveness, and amount and types of usage of compost; and

(ii) Develop a model to estimate carbon sequestration from organic waste-derived soil amendment application to soil, and identify technologies, methods, and potential funding for carbon sequestration from Washington's organic wastes including but not limited to the potential inclusion of these materials in carbon markets and trading.

(b) The university must submit a report on the assessment's findings and model development to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2022.

(24) $500,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA) is provided solely to support farm stress programs in response to the COVID-19 pandemic, as authorized in section 766, division N, consolidated appropriations act, 2021, P.L. 116-260.

(25) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Third Substitute House Bill No. 1091 (transportation fuel/carbon).

(26) $86,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1273 (menstrual products/schools).

(27) $101,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $101,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5227 (diversity, etc./higher education).

(28) $281,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for implementation of chapter 6, Laws of 2021 (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5272).

(29) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding for the implementation of chapter 96, Laws of 2021 (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5228).

(30) $224,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $221,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5253 (pollinator health).

(31) $1,718,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5126 (climate commitment act).

(32) $412,000 from the institutions of higher education—grant and contracts account is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5317 (pesticide registration).

(33) $33,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for compensation funding for Western Washington University employees that work on the Washington State University Everett campus.

(34) $341,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for pharmacy behavioral health. Washington State University college of pharmacy and pharmaceutical sciences will hire two residency training positions and one behavioral health faculty to create a residency program focused on behavioral health.

(35) $1,337,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for institution compensation costs in recognition that these costs exceed estimated increases in undergraduate operating fee revenue.

(36) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the Washington state commission on pesticide registration to fund research to develop alternatives for growers currently using organophosphate pesticides.

(37) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for residential energy code education and support, including training, hotline support to the building industry, and informational material and web resources. The energy program shall engage stakeholders in a discussion of overall enforcement support and work to identify workforce development needs and opportunities.

(38) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the Washington state academy of sciences to provide support for core operations and to accomplish its mission of providing science in the service of Washington, pursuant to its memorandum of understanding with the university.

(((40)))(39) $188,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for stormwater research to study the long-term efficacy of green stormwater infrastructure that incorporates compost to remove pollutants.

(((41)))(40) $2,056,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to establish a bachelor's degree in cybersecurity operations.

(((42)))(41) $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5764 (apprenticeships and higher ed). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((43)))(42) $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1814 (community solar projects). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((44)))(43) $121,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1751 (hazing prevention). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((45)))(44) $122,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1622 (sex. assault nurse education). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((46)))(45) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for
fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for Washington State University to partner with a nonprofit entity based in Olympia that focuses on sustainable infrastructure solutions to develop recommendations for increasing the economic value and sustainability of Washington's agricultural sector through the use of industrial symbiosis principles, to connect agriculture producers and processors with partners to achieve synergies through systems-based resource sharing resulting in economic benefits and value creation for all participants, through sustainable resource recovery and optimization of energy, water, and organic waste streams. By June 30, 2023, the Washington State University must report recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature pursuant to RCW 43.01.036.

Sec. 1604. 2022 c 297 s 605 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$58,296,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($61,496,000))

$62,098,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$16,838,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$15,244,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($151,874,000))

$152,476,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) At least $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and at least $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 must be expended on the Northwest autism center.

(2) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in computer science and engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in computer science and engineering programs above the prior academic year.

(3) Eastern Washington University shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

(4) $11,356,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and (($11,617,000))$12,219,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.

(5) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the university is encouraged to increase the number of tenure-track positions created and hired.

(6) $56,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for a comprehensive analysis of the deep lake watershed involving land owners, ranchers, lake owners, one or more conservation districts, the department of ecology, and the department of natural resources.

(7) $2,274,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for institution operating costs, including compensation and central services, in recognition that these costs exceed estimated increases in undergraduate operating fee revenue as a result of RCW 28B.15.067.

(8) $2,636,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to maintain a computer engineering degree program in the college of science, technology, engineering, and math.

(9) $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for one full-time mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW who has experience and training specifically related to working with active members of the military or military veterans.

(10) $300,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to establish a center for inclusive excellence for faculty and staff.

(11) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for increasing dual credit options, to address issues of equity in higher education access.

(12) $110,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $110,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a new summer bridge program.

(13) $27,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1273 (menstrual products/schools).

(14) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1335 (racial restrictions/review).

(15) $121,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $121,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5227 (diversity, etc./higher education).

(16) $548,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for a professional masters of science cyber operations degree option.

(17) $2,262,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to establish a bachelor of science in cybersecurity degree option through the computer science program.

(18) $1,054,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of a coordinated care network that will help to maximize the collaboration of various student support services to create wraparound care for students to address obstacles to degree completion. The amount provided in this subsection must be used to supplement, not supplant, other funding sources for the program.

(19) $262,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for institution compensation costs in recognition that these costs exceed estimated increases in undergraduate operating fee revenue.

(20) $6,170,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to establish a bachelor of science in nursing program.

(21) $68,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5764 (apprenticeships and higher ed). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(22) $43,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1751 (hazing prevention). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1605. 2022 c 297 s 606 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$60,220,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($64,057,000))

$64,823,000

Central Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$76,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$19,076,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$5,071,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($148,500,000))

$149,266,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in engineering programs above the prior academic year.

(2) Central Washington University shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

(3) $12,800,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and (($13,094,000))$13,773,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.

(4) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the university is encouraged to increase the number of tenure-track positions created and hired.

(5) $2,236,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for institution operating costs, including compensation and central services, in recognition that these costs exceed estimated increases in undergraduate operating fee revenue as a result of RCW 28B.15.067.

(6) $1,050,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to increase the number of certified K-12 teachers.

(7) $736,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to maintain mental health counseling positions.

(8) $240,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $240,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for two psychologists to increase access to mental health counseling for traditionally underrepresented students.

(9) $52,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $52,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for one full-time mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW who has experience and training specifically related to working with active members of the military or military veterans.

(10) $155,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely to implement chapter 295, Laws of 2019 (educator workforce supply).

(11) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to establish a bachelor of science in computer science at the university's Des Moines center.

(12) $31,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1273 (menstrual products/schools).

(13) $131,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $131,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5227 (diversity, etc./higher education).

(14) $16,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $16,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5259 (law enforcement data).

(15) $613,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for expanding cybersecurity capacity by adding additional faculty resources in the department of computer science.

(16) $293,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for a peer mentoring program. The amount provided in this subsection must be used to supplement, not supplant, other funding sources for the program.

(17) $325,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for institution compensation costs in recognition that these costs exceed estimated increases in undergraduate operating fee revenue.

(18) $143,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the creation of an extended orientation program to help promote retention of underserved students. The amount provided in this subsection must be used to supplement, not supplant, other funding sources for the program.

(19) $20,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1751 (hazing prevention). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(20) $55,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for community collaborations to document and preserve the Roslyn cemetery.

Sec. 1606. 2022 c 297 s 607 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$32,123,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($35,611,000))

$35,650,000

The Evergreen State College Capital Projects

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$80,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$5,450,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,906,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($77,170,000))

$77,209,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $3,893,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and (($3,983,000))$4,189,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.

(2) Funding provided in this section is sufficient for The Evergreen State College to continue operations of the Longhouse Center and the Northwest Indian applied research institute.

(3) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the college is encouraged to increase the number of tenure-track positions created and hired.

(4) $2,760,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and (($3,560,000))$3,393,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the Washington state institute for public policy to initiate, sponsor, conduct, and publish research that is directly useful to policymakers and manage reviews and evaluations of technical and scientific topics as they relate to major long-term issues facing the state. Within the amounts provided in this subsection (4):

(a) $1,391,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2022 and $1,399,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2023 are provided for administration and core operations.

(b) $828,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2022 and (($937,000))$810,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for ongoing and continuing studies on the Washington state institute for public policy's work plan.

(c) $60,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2022 are provided solely to the Washington state institute for public policy for the continued work and research on behalf of the domestic violence risk assessment work group.

(d) $25,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2022 and $40,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to the Washington state institute for public policy for the continued work and research on behalf of the Washington state criminal sentencing task force established in section 944 of this act.

(e)(i) $14,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2022 and $76,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the Washington state institute for public policy to study net nanny and similar fictitious victim sting operations. The study must:

(A) Describe the current research on net nanny-type sting operations, including any evidence of their effectiveness in deterring or reducing crime, their costs, and the potential advantages or drawbacks of their use in crime prevention; and

(B) Compare the characteristics of individuals convicted under net nanny stings with individuals convicted of child sex offenses through other avenues.

(ii) The Washington state patrol shall provide the Washington state institute for public policy with the data necessary to conduct the analysis in (e)(i)(B) of this subsection. A net nanny sting operation is a collaborative operation that includes local, state, and federal law enforcement that targets the arrest and prosecution of individuals involved in child abuse and exploitation using the internet by using a fictious victim. By June 30, 2023, the institute must submit results from the study to the appropriate committees of the legislature.

(f) $124,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $76,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the Washington state institute for public policy to study legal financial obligations as defined in RCW 9.94A.030.

(i) The study should explore the following topics:

(A) The amount of legal and financial obligations imposed over the last three years;

(B) The total amounts outstanding and the total amounts collected annually, including annual collection rates; including all restitution, costs, fees, fines, penalty assessments, and interest, disaggregated;

(C) Statutes which allow for the imposition of legal and financial obligations;

(D) The percentage of the judicial branch's budget which has been supported by legal and financial obligations since the system's inception;

(E) The programs funded by legal financial obligations; and

(F) How other states fund their court system including but not limited to whether they use legal financial obligations to provide support.

(ii) The study should recommend to the legislature potential methods and processes to delink court related funding and other county and local funding from the collection of legal financial obligations and to provide such funding through other means.

(iii) The Washington state institute for public policy may solicit input for the study from interested parties to include but not be limited to the Washington state association of counties, the Washington state association of county officials, the Washington state association of prosecuting attorneys, superior court judges, civil legal aid, civil rights attorneys, disability rights advocates, crime victim advocates, persons formerly incarcerated, advocates for persons who are currently or formerly incarcerated, academic researchers, persons with expertise analyzing data on legal financial obligations, the Washington state minority and justice commission, and the administrative office of the courts.

(iv) An initial report is due to the legislature by December 1, 2021, with a supplemental and final report due to the legislature by December 1, 2022.

(g) $7,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $68,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the institute to review available research literature to investigate and describe any relationship between early substance abuse of cannabis, opioids, or cocaine and mental health disorders in young adults; and any relationship between nutrition and mental health disorders in young adults. The institute shall report its findings to the legislature no later than December 1, 2022.

(h)(i) $102,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2022 and $73,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the Washington state institute for public policy to partner with a context expert to conduct a wilderness therapy research review. The University of Washington evidence-based practice institute and Washington State University impact center must assist the institute in identifying a content expert. For the review, the institute must:

(A) Identify wilderness therapy program models related to behavioral health which have a treatment approach which is well defined or definable and have a strong evidence base to be added to reporting guides for being identified as an evidence-based practice for mental health, including identification of target populations for these programs;

(B) Identify wilderness/adventure program models available for prevention services which are cost beneficial; and

(C) Assess the interest and likelihood of support for programs of this nature among relevant interest groups, such as state prevention coalitions and tribes, if such programs were listed as approved cost beneficial prevention programs by the division of behavioral health and recovery and the Washington state health care authority.

(ii) The institute must submit to the appropriate committees of the legislature a report on (h)(i)(A) and (B) of this subsection by June 30, 2022, and a report on (h)(i)(C) of this subsection by December 1, 2022.

(i) $15,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2022 and $286,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5304 (reentry services/state and local institutions).

(j) $48,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2022 and $89,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5194 (equity and access in higher education).

(k)(i) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the Washington state institute for public policy to conduct a cost-benefit analysis for an exclusive or partial American steel requirement for future contracts and subcontracts authorized in the capital budget. The cost-benefit analysis must, to the extent feasible:

(A) Compare existing types and uses of steel to America made steel alternatives, including evaluation of quality;

(B) Examine benefits to Washington workers and the Washington economy;

(C) Examine lifecycle and embodied carbon greenhouse gas emissions;

(D) Identify requirements for purchasing American steel that minimize costs and maximize benefits; and

(E) Evaluate American steel requirements or preferences in other states.

(ii) The institute may solicit input for the analysis from representatives of interested parties to include, but not be limited to, the construction and manufacturing sectors, organized labor in the construction and manufacturing sectors, cities, counties, American steel manufacturing companies, environmental advocacy organizations, and appropriate state agencies.

(iii) The institute must submit a final report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2022.

(l) $47,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1044 (prison to postsecondary ed.).

(m) $71,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2022 and $91,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 314, Laws of 2021 (Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5141) (env. justice task force recs).

(n) $125,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for an evaluation of student participation in transitional kindergarten programs across the state. By December 31, 2023, the institute shall report the results of its evaluation to the appropriate legislative committees; the governor; the office of the superintendent of public instruction; and the department of children, youth, and families. It is the intent of the legislature to provide funding in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium budget for the institute to complete the report by December 31, 2023. For the evaluation, to the extent data is available, the institute shall collect data regarding:

(i) The number of districts providing transitional kindergarten programs, including the number of classrooms and students in the program per district;

(ii) The number of children participating in transitional kindergarten programs across the state, disaggregated by demographic information such as race, gender, and income level;

(iii) The number of children participating in transitional kindergarten programs that attended prekindergarten previous to transitional kindergarten;

(iv) The number of children participating in transitional kindergarten who received early learning services through the early childhood education and assistance program;

(v) The number of children participating in transitional kindergarten with an individualized education plan;

(vi) An analysis of how school districts select and prioritize children for enrollment in transitional kindergarten;

(vii) The differences in teacher preparation, certification, and classroom instruction for transitional kindergarten compared to the early childhood education and assistance program;

(viii) The identification of why school districts offer transitional kindergarten, the early childhood education and assistance program, and other early learning programs such as traditional or developmental prekindergarten, and the funding sources used; and

(ix) The use of transitional kindergarten in other states in comparison to Washington state, and any outcome data available.

(o)(i) $62,000 of the amounts for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for a comprehensive study to assess specific needs of farmworkers in the state in order to help policymakers determine whether those needs are being met by state administered programs, policies, and statutes. The institute must consult with farmworker advocacy organizations, state agencies administering programs and policies impacting farmworkers, and nonprofit organizations that work directly with farmworkers.

(ii) As part of its information gathering, the institute must hear from farmworkers, either directly or through the nonprofit organizations, regarding farmworkers' experiences and working conditions. These personal, real-life experiences from farmworkers must be based on informal interviews or surveys conducted by Latino nonprofit organizations that have well-established connections and relationships with farmworkers.

(iii) The study must focus on needs related to health and safety in the workplace, payment of wages, and preventing harassment and discrimination of, and retaliation against, farmworkers for asserting their rights regarding health and safety standards, wage and hour laws, and access to services.

(iv) The study must include:

(A) An examination of how the relevant state agencies coordinate with each other and federal agencies in administrating and enforcing the various laws, policies, and programs, and of the agencies' education and outreach to farmworkers regarding farmworkers' rights and protections;

(B) A review of available data from, and research of, programs that are intended to increase health and safety outcomes for farmworkers and that are intended to provide farmworkers access to services and benefits; and

(C) Options on ways to improve agency coordination and the effectiveness of reviewed programs.

(v) It is the intent of the legislature to provide funding in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium budget for the institute to complete the report by June 30, 2025, with a preliminary report submitted by December 1, 2023.

(p) (($116,000))$76,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the Washington state institute for public policy to undertake a study on the nature and scope of the underground economy and to recommend what policy changes, if any, are needed to address the underground economy in the construction industry, including whether greater cohesion and transparency among state agencies is needed. The report must address the extent of and projected costs to the state and workers of the underground economy. The legislature expects the institute ((must))to submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by ((December 1, 2022))September 30, 2023.

(q) Notwithstanding other provisions in this subsection, the board of directors for the Washington state institute for public policy may adjust due dates for projects included on the institute's 2021-23 work plan as necessary to efficiently manage workload.

(5) $2,636,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for institution operating costs, including compensation and central services, in recognition that these costs exceed estimated increases in undergraduate operating fee revenue as a result of RCW 28B.15.067.

(6) $670,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to maintain enrollment capacity in psychology programs.

(7) $600,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to increase student success by maintaining support for a student precollege immersion program and The Evergreen first-year experience.

(8) $213,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $213,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for additional faculty to support Native American and indigenous programs.

(9) $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to the native pathways program for an assistant director.

(10) $110,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $110,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to establish a new tribal liaison position.

(11) $39,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $39,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for one full-time mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW who has experience and training specifically related to working with active members of the military or military veterans.

(12) $7,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1273 (menstrual products/schools).

(13) $236,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $220,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5227 (diversity, etc./higher education).

(14) $158,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for institution compensation costs in recognition that these costs exceed estimated increases in undergraduate operating fee revenue.

(15) $142,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for student mental health and wellness. The amount provided in this subsection must be used to supplement, not supplant, other funding sources for the program.

(16) $196,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for additional laboratory, art, and media lab sections.

(17) $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to develop and expand current corrections education programs offered in department of corrections facilities. The college shall appoint a project implementation team, collaborate with stakeholders to plan student success programs and curriculum which lead to transferable credit, associate and bachelor's degrees, and other workforce credentials, and train faculty and staff on working with incarcerated populations.

(18) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of chapter 329, Laws of 2021 (Substitute House Bill No. 1223) (custodial interrogations).

(19) $27,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1751 (hazing prevention). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1607. 2022 c 297 s 608 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$84,528,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($91,203,000))

$92,139,000

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,424,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$13,831,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$8,727,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($199,713,000))

$200,649,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in computer science and engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in computer science and engineering programs above the prior academic year.

(2) Western Washington University shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

(3) $17,667,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and (($18,073,000))$19,009,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.

(4) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to recruit and retain high quality and diverse graduate students.

(5) $494,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $548,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for critical support services to ensure traditionally underrepresented students receive the same opportunities for academic success as their peers.

(6) $700,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $700,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the creation and implementation of an early childhood education degree program at the western on the peninsulas campus. The university must collaborate with Olympic college. At full implementation, the university is expected to grant approximately 75 bachelor's degrees in early childhood education per year at the western on the peninsulas campus.

(7) $1,306,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,306,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the university to develop a new program in marine, coastal, and watershed sciences.

(8) $886,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $886,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the university to reduce tuition rates for four-year degree programs offered in partnership with Olympic college—Bremerton, Olympic college—Poulsbo, and Peninsula college—Port Angeles that are currently above state-funded resident undergraduate tuition rates.

(9) $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the university to assess the feasibility and benefits of expanding outdoor residential school programs to equitably serve either all fifth and sixth grade students, or only fifth or only sixth grade students statewide. The study shall explore the equity concerns exacerbated by the COVID-19 pandemic in the areas of outdoor recreation and outdoor learning experiences, with a focus on using physical activity and exposure to natural settings as a strategy for improving health disparities and accelerating learning for historically underserved populations. The study must also consider programs and facilities at outdoor residential schools, youth camps, and state parks and assess the impact of COVID-19 on these institutions, and recommend strategies to preserve and expand capacity for outdoor school. The university shall submit a report to the office of the governor, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, and the education committees of the legislature summarizing the assessment and making recommendations no later than September 30, 2021.

(10) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the university is encouraged to increase the number of tenure-track positions created and hired.

(11) $2,256,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for institution operating costs, including compensation and central services, in recognition that these costs exceed estimated increases in undergraduate operating fee revenue as a result of RCW 28B.15.067.

(12) $3,426,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to maintain access to science, technology, engineering, and mathematics degrees.

(13) $1,016,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to establish an academic curriculum in ethnic studies.

(14) $48,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $48,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for one full-time mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW who has experience and training specifically related to working with active members of the military or military veterans.

(15) $530,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $530,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the creation and implementation of two bilingual educator programs in the south King county region, including a bilingual elementary education degree program and a secondary education degree program. At full implementation, each cohort shall support up to 25 students per year.

(16) $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1273 (menstrual products/schools).

(17) $353,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $153,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5227 (diversity, etc./higher education).

(18) $5,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $2,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5259 (law enforcement data).

(19) $769,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for upgrading Cyber Range equipment and software.

(20) $1,260,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for student support services that include resources for outreach and financial aid support, retention initiatives including targeted support for underserved student populations, mental health support, and initiatives aimed at addressing learning disruption due to the global pandemic. The amount provided in this subsection must be used to supplement, not supplant, other funding sources for student support services.

(21) $461,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for establishing a new master of science program in nursing.

(22) $433,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the registered nurse to bachelors in nursing program.

(23) $767,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for institution compensation costs in recognition that these costs exceed estimated increases in undergraduate operating fee revenue.

(24) $30,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for a review of how existing homeowners' associations, condominium associations, associations of apartment owners, and common interest communities in Washington can incorporate accessory dwelling units. The review shall include an examination of the governing documents of these associations and communities to determine how accessory dwelling units are explicitly or implicitly restricted and what the overall impact is on the state's housing supply from such restrictions. By June 30, 2023, in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the institution must submit a report detailing its findings to the appropriate committees of the legislature.

(25) $66,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1751 (hazing prevention). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1608. 2022 c 297 s 609 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT COUNCIL—POLICY COORDINATION AND ADMINISTRATION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$7,777,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$12,583,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$4,941,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$150,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$6,427,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($31,728,000))

$31,878,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $126,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $126,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the consumer protection unit.

(2) $500,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to implement a marketing and communications agenda as required in RCW 28C.30.040(1)(c).

(3) $115,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Washington student loan refinancing program as provided in chapter 28B.94 RCW.

(4) $575,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $575,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided to increase the number of high school seniors and college bound scholars that complete the free application for federal student aid and the Washington application for state financial aid through digital engagement tools, expanded training, and increased events for high school students.

(5) The student achievement council must ensure that all institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.92.030 and eligible for state financial aid programs under chapters 28B.92 and 28B.118 RCW provide the data needed to analyze and evaluate the effectiveness of state financial aid programs. This data must be promptly transmitted to the education data center so that it is available and easily accessible.

(6) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the Washington student achievement council to convene and coordinate a task force to propose strategies to eliminate financial and nonfinancial barriers to low-income students participating in running start, college in the high school, advanced placement, international baccalaureate, Cambridge, and career and technical education dual credit programs. The task force shall submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2021. The report must include:

(a) Strategies to address the following financial and nonfinancial barriers to students:

(i) Per credit tuition fees and any other fees charged for college in the high school and career and technical education dual credit courses;

(ii) Books, fees, and any other direct costs charged to running start students when enrolling in college courses; and

(iii) Exam fees and other charges to students enrolling in exam-based dual credit courses;

(b) Recommendations on student supports to close equity gaps in dual credit access, participation, and success;

(c) Recommendations to improve and increase communication with students and families regarding the awareness, access, and completion of dual credit;

(d) Expanding access to dual credit opportunities for students in career and technical education pathways; and

(e) Running start data for fiscal year 2019, fiscal year 2020, and fiscal year 2021 for each community and technical college as described in section 602(29) of this act.

(7) $29,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $29,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1044 (prison to postsecondary ed.).

(8) $16,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $16,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5249 (mastery-based learning).

(9) $1,000,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the career launch grant pool for the public four-year institutions.

(10) $3,600,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for a grant pool dedicated to nursing programs to purchase or upgrade simulation laboratory equipment.

(11) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the student achievement council to convene and coordinate the development of education and training programs for employees, focusing on correctional officers and medical staff, of the department of corrections to be provided through a contract with The Evergreen State College. Education and training programs must be designed collaboratively to best meet the needs of the department of corrections.

(12) $850,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for administrative support services to carry out duties and responsibilities necessary for recipients of the Washington college grant who are enrolled in a state registered apprenticeship program.

(13) $246,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to expand the homeless student assistance pilot program by two additional public four-year institutions of higher education. The institutions participating in the pilot program are subject to the same requirements as in RCW 28B.50.916. Of the amounts in this subsection, $30,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for administration.

(14) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a Pierce county school district to expand a current program assisting high school seniors to identify a postsecondary pathway through a data driven approach.

(15)(a) $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for a pilot program to help students, including those enrolled in state registered apprenticeship programs, connect with health care coverage. The student achievement council, in cooperation with the council of presidents, must provide resources for up to two four-year colleges or universities, one on the east side and one on the west side of the Cascade mountains, to hire or train an employee to:

(i) Provide information to students and college and university staff about available health insurance options;

(ii) Develop culturally relevant materials and conduct outreach for historically marginalized and underserved student populations to assist these populations in their knowledge of access to low cost or free health insurance plans;

(iii) Provide ongoing technical assistance to students about health insurance options or health insurance application process; and

(iv) Provide technical assistance to students as a health benefit exchange certified assister, to help students understand, shop, apply, and enroll in health insurance through Washington health planfinder.

(b) Participation in the exchange assister program is contingent on fulfilling applicable contracting, security, and other program requirements.

(c) The legislature expects the council, in collaboration with the council of presidents and the health benefit exchange, to report to the appropriate committees of the legislature information about barriers students, including those enrolled in state registered apprenticeship programs, encountered to accessing health insurance coverage; and to provide recommendations on how to improve student and staff access to health coverage based on data gathered from the pilot program.

(16) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the Washington student achievement council to convene stakeholders from institutions of higher education, students, and community-based organizations to develop recommendations regarding residency statutes with the goal of ensuring consistent application of residency statutes and clarifying pathways to being a Washington resident student with a focus on ensuring equity to accessing student residency. By December 1, 2022, the council must submit a report with recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature pursuant to RCW 43.01.036.

(17) $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the council to submit a progress report on the new or expanded cybersecurity and nursing academic programs that receive funding in sections 602 through 608 of this act, including the number of students enrolled. The council must coordinate with the institutions of higher education and the state board for community and technical colleges as provided in sections 601(4), 602(37), and 602(45) of this act. The progress report must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature, pursuant to RCW 43.01.036, by June 30, 2023, and a final report is expected by December 1, 2024.

(18) $2,800,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely to a nonprofit organization located in King county to expand college services to support underserved students impacted by the pandemic and improve college retention and completion rates.

(19) $275,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5764 (apprenticeships and higher ed). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(20) $137,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5847 (public employee PLSF info). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(21) $1,200,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1835 (postsecondary enrollment). No more than $200,000 of the amounts provided in this subsection may be used for administration. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(22) (($150,000,000 of the Washington student loan account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1736 (state student loan program). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(23))) If Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5789 (innovation challenge program) is enacted by June 30, 2022, community-based organizations that receive state funding under subsection (18) of this section and section 602(41) of this act are not eligible for Washington career and college pathways innovation challenge program grant funding for the same purpose.

(23) $150,000 of the general fund—private/local appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the skills-driven states demonstration project grant awarded by the national governor's association.

Sec. 1609. 2022 c 297 s 610 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT COUNCIL—OFFICE OF STUDENT FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$274,216,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($224,541,000))

$234,093,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($14,096,000))

$14,096,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$300,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$85,488,000

Washington Opportunity Pathways Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($223,786,000))

$221,033,000

Aerospace Training Student Loan Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$217,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($248,456,000))

$220,847,000

Health Professionals Loan Repayment and Scholarship

Program Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,720,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,072,820,000))

$1,052,010,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $7,834,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $7,835,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for student financial aid payments under the state work study program, including up to four percent administrative allowance for the state work study program.

(2) $236,416,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $176,416,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, (($218,824,000))$191,215,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation, $69,639,000 of the education legacy trust fund—state appropriation, and $207,654,000 of the Washington opportunity pathways account—state appropriation are provided solely for the Washington college grant program as provided in RCW 28B.92.200.

(3) Changes made to the state work study program in the 2009-2011 and 2011-2013 fiscal biennia are continued in the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium including maintaining the increased required employer share of wages; adjusted employer match rates; discontinuation of nonresident student eligibility for the program; and revising distribution methods to institutions by taking into consideration other factors such as off-campus job development, historical utilization trends, and student need.

(4) $1,165,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $1,165,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, $15,849,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation, and (($16,132,000))$13,379,000 of the Washington opportunity pathways account—state appropriation are provided solely for the college bound scholarship program and may support scholarships for summer session. The office of student financial assistance and the institutions of higher education shall not consider awards made by the opportunity scholarship program to be state-funded for the purpose of determining the value of an award amount under RCW 28B.118.010.

(5) $6,999,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $6,999,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the passport to college program. The maximum scholarship award is up to $5,000. The council shall contract with a nonprofit organization to provide support services to increase student completion in their postsecondary program and shall, under this contract, provide a minimum of $500,000 in fiscal years 2022 and 2023 for this purpose.

(6) $2,981,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and (($8,551,000))$17,904,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to meet state match requirements associated with the opportunity scholarship program. The legislature will evaluate subsequent appropriations to the opportunity scholarship program based on the extent that additional private contributions are made, program spending patterns, and fund balance.

(7) $3,800,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $3,800,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for expenditure into the health professionals loan repayment and scholarship program account. These amounts must be used to increase the number of licensed primary care health professionals to serve in licensed primary care health professional critical shortage areas. Contracts between the office and program recipients must guarantee at least three years of conditional loan repayments. The office of student financial assistance and the department of health shall prioritize a portion of any nonfederal balances in the health professional loan repayment and scholarship fund for conditional loan repayment contracts with psychiatrists and with advanced registered nurse practitioners for work at one of the state-operated psychiatric hospitals. The office and department shall designate the state hospitals as health professional shortage areas if necessary for this purpose. The office shall coordinate with the department of social and health services to effectively incorporate three conditional loan repayments into the department's advanced psychiatric professional recruitment and retention strategies. The office may use these targeted amounts for other program participants should there be any remaining amounts after eligible psychiatrists and advanced registered nurse practitioners have been served. The office shall also work to prioritize loan repayments to professionals working at health care delivery sites that demonstrate a commitment to serving uninsured clients. It is the intent of the legislature to provide funding to maintain the current number and amount of awards for the program in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium on the basis of these contractual obligations.

(8) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for behavioral health loan repayment program grants, pursuant to chapter 302, Laws of 2019 (2SHB 1668) (Washington health corps).

(9) $4,125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $6,125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for expenditure into the health professionals loan repayment and scholarship program account. The amount provided in this subsection is provided solely to increase loans within the behavioral health program.

(10) $2,000,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the future teachers conditional scholarship and loan repayment program established in chapter 28B.102 RCW.

(11) $2,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) is provided solely for ARPA anticipated state grants for the national health service corps.

(12) $1,279,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,313,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the Washington award for vocational excellence. $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 shall be used for administration.

(13) $258,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $258,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1166 (college students pilot).

(14) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and (($206,000))$405,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a state match associated with the rural jobs program.

(15) $27,627,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for an annual bridge grant of $500 to eligible students. A student is eligible for a grant if the student receives a maximum college grant award and does not receive the college bound scholarship program under chapter 28B.118 RCW. Bridge grant funding provides supplementary financial support to low-income students to cover higher education expenses.

(16) $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 2007 (nurse educator loans). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1610. 2022 c 297 s 612 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$9,278,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($9,939,000))

$10,130,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$34,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($19,251,000))

$19,442,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Funding provided in this section is sufficient for the school to offer to students enrolled in grades six through twelve for full-time instructional services at the Vancouver campus or online with the opportunity to participate in a minimum of one thousand eighty hours of instruction and the opportunity to earn twenty-four high school credits.

(2) $24,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1153 (language access in schools). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1611. 2022 c 297 s 613 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CENTER FOR CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING LOSS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$15,108,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($16,104,000))

$16,404,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($31,212,000))

$31,512,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Funding provided in this section is sufficient for the center to offer students ages three through twenty-one enrolled at Washington School for the Deaf the opportunity to participate in a minimum of one thousand eighty hours of instruction and the opportunity to earn twenty-four high school credits.

(2) $225,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2022 and $225,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the center for deaf and hard of hearing youth to develop or expand a mentoring program for persons employed as educational interpreters in public schools. Funding provided under this section is provided solely for recruiting, hiring, and training persons to be employed by Washington sensory disability services who must provide mentoring services in different geographic regions of the state, with the dual goals of providing services, beginning with the 2021-22 school year, to any requesting school district; and assisting persons in the timely and successful achievement of performance standards for educational interpreters.

(3) $5,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1153 (language access in schools). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2022, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1612. 2022 c 297 s 614 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE ARTS COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$2,760,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($4,788,000))

$4,872,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,169,000))

$2,169,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$143,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($12,860,000))

$11,944,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $79,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the creative districts program.

(2) $1,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) is provided solely for grants to arts organizations for programing and general operating expenses pursuant to section 2021 of the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2.

(3) (($1,000,000))$2,000,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation ((for fiscal year 2022 and $1,000,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are))is provided solely for the Washington state arts commission to stabilize, recover, and preserve the state's arts and cultural organizations in light of pandemic conditions. From these amounts, the commission may distribute relief, response, and recovery grants to arts and cultural organizations statewide, subject to appropriate agreements.

(4) $71,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for a grant to a business network in the Goldendale area to continue an arts-based revitalization and transformation project in downtown Goldendale.

Sec. 1613. 2022 c 297 s 615 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$4,270,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($4,878,000))

$4,957,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($9,148,000))

$9,227,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $210,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the Washington state historical society to partner with a statewide organization specializing in the preservation of Washington state Jewish history to establish a new archive that captures the narratives and primary source materials of Jewish Washingtonians. This new archive must create the capacity to capture a 15-year backlog of hundreds of narratives and materials of Jewish Washingtonians, as well as unlimited new submissions, with the future goal of making these materials available to the public and linking to existing Jewish archival collections at the University of Washington.

(2) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to contract with an organization that works with and connects museums in Washington state to create an inventory of heritage organizations across the state as the first phase of a Washington museums connect initiative.

Sec. 1614. 2022 c 297 s 616 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$3,481,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$4,095,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$250,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($7,576,000))

$7,826,000

(End of part)

PART XVII

SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS

SUPPLEMENTAL

Sec. 1701. 2022 c 297 s 702 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR DEBT SUBJECT TO THE DEBT LIMIT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$1,265,240,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($1,342,278,000))

$1,344,276,000

State Building Construction Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($19,323,000))

$12,323,000

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($13,000))

$25,000

Watershed Restoration and Enhancement Bond Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$181,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$467,000

Debt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$511,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($2,628,013,000))

$2,623,023,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriations are for expenditure into the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account.

Sec. 1702. 2022 c 297 s 703 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$1,400,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$1,400,000

State Building Construction Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,249,000

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,000))

$6,000

Watershed Restoration and Enhancement Bond Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$39,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($94,000))

$112,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($7,185,000))

$7,206,000

Sec. 1703. 2022 c 297 s 704 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—EMERGENCY FUND

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$1,100,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($1,000,000))

$1,500,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($2,100,000))

$2,600,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are for the governor's emergency fund for the critically necessary work of any agency.

Sec. 1704. 2022 c 297 s 713 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—CORONAVIRUS RELIEF FUNDS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$500,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$5,711,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($5,711,000))

$6,211,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The entire general fund—federal appropriation (CRF) is provided solely to the office of financial management for allocation to state agencies for costs eligible to be paid from the coronavirus relief fund created by section 5001, the coronavirus aid, relief, and economic security act, P.L. 116-136, division A and where funding is provided elsewhere in this act for those costs using a funding source other than the coronavirus relief fund. For any agency receiving an allocation under this section, the office must place an equal amount of the agency's state or other federal source appropriation authority in unallotted reserve status, and those amounts may not be expended. In determining the use of amounts appropriated in this section, the office of financial management shall prioritize the preservation of state general fund moneys and federal state fiscal recovery fund moneys. The office must report on the use of the amounts appropriated in this section to the fiscal committees of the legislature monthly until all coronavirus relief fund moneys are expended or the unexpended moneys returned to the federal government, whichever is earlier.

Sec. 1705. 2022 c 297 s 714 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR SUNDRY CLAIMS

The following sums, or so much thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated from the general fund for fiscal year 2022 or fiscal year 2023, unless otherwise indicated, for relief of various individuals, firms, and corporations for sundry claims.

These appropriations are to be disbursed on vouchers approved by the director of the department of enterprise services, except as otherwise provided, for reimbursement of criminal defendants acquitted on the basis of self-defense, pursuant to RCW 9A.16.110, as follows:

(1) William J. Damson, claim number 9991006839. . . .$14,880

(2) David Ziller, claim number 9991006721. . . .$13,257

(3) Caleb B. Cline, claim number 9991006671. . . .$23,367

(4) Julaine D. Pettis, claim number 9991005948. . . .$20,000

(5) Jaydra Erchul Johnson, claim number 9991005804. . . .$8,270

(6) Christopher Lundvall, claim number 9991007205. . . .$45,022

(7) Carlos Cervantes, claim number 9991007388. . . .$6,298

(8) Jarel Jones-White, claim number 9991007721. . . .$3,665

(9) Terry G. Enger, claim number 9991010634. . . .$6,575

(10) James B. Copenhaver, claim number 9991010466. . . .$47,755

(11) Jason Koester, claim number 9991010340. . . .$25,128

(12) Michael Chambers, claim number 9991010113. . . .$13,230

(13) Gerhardt Reiss, claim number 9991010024. . . .$12,157

(14) Samuel Swanberg, claim number 9991010013. . . .$44,269

(15) Darnell Jones, claim number 9991009681. . . .$25,000

(16) Heath Wolfe, claim number 9991009301. . . .$4,380

(17) Derwin R. Honeycutt, claim number 9991008512. . . .$19,557

(18) Heegap Lee, claim number 9991008437. . . .$21,584

(19) Ryan A. Leenders, claim number 9991008439. . . .$52,328

Sec. 1706. 2022 c 297 s 723 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—FAMILY AND MEDICAL LEAVE INSURANCE ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($350,000,000))

$225,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($350,000,000))

$225,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the family and medical leave insurance account created in RCW 50A.05.070 ((on June 30, 2023. The office of financial management may only expend the amount necessary to keep the family and medical leave insurance account from being in a deficit at the close of the fiscal biennium, after certification from the employment security department)).

Sec. 1707. 2022 c 297 s 731 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—SALMON RECOVERY ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($100,000,000))

$125,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($100,000,000))

$125,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for expenditure into the salmon recovery account created in RCW 77.85.170.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1708. A new section is added to 2022 c 297 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—OFFICE SPACE USE REDUCTIONS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
($3,031,000)

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
($3,031,000)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) In response to the COVID-19 pandemic, Washington state agencies rapidly implemented telework for employees whose job duties did not require on-site presence. This shift in state government operations has led to agencies' reevaluation of the amount of physical office space they will require as they implement hybrid work environments and adopt expanded telework opportunities. The appropriations in this section reflect adjustments in agency appropriations related to office space reductions to be achieved from hybrid work, telework, and the strategy provided in this section. The office of financial management shall adjust allotments in the amounts specified, and to the state agencies specified, in LEAP omnibus document LSSV-2023, dated March 23, 2023, and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly.

(2) To meet the goal of efficient use of state funds and office space, state agencies, institutions of higher education, and separately elected officials must adhere to the office of financial management's statewide space use policy, data integrity and system access policy, inventory policy, and the human resource management system data validation guide to ensure space use data is complete, accurate, and consistent for reporting and analysis.

(3) State agencies, institutions of higher education, and separately elected officials with leases expiring in fiscal years 2024 and 2025 must work toward reducing leased office space a minimum of 20 percent upon lease renewal or when requesting office relocation. Reductions in lease costs will be reflected in subsequent budgets.

(4) It is the intent of the legislature that state agencies, institutions of higher education, and separately elected officials with leases expiring in fiscal years 2026 and 2027 work to reduce their office space portfolio a minimum of 30 percent upon lease renewal or when requesting office relocation. The reductions in costs will be reflected in subsequent budgets.

(5) State agencies must:

(a) Work with the office of financial management's facilities oversight and planning program and the department of enterprise services to backfill office space and reduce full leases;

(b) Update monthly the office of financial management's facilities portfolio management tool to maximize collocation opportunities and better inform decision making;

(c) Update telework and employee location data monthly in the human resource management system to reflect office space use and needs; and

(d) Maintain a telework policy in accordance with executive order 16-07, building a modern work environment.

(End of part)

PART XVIII

OTHER TRANSFERS AND APPROPRIATIONS

SUPPLEMENTAL

Sec. 1801. 2022 c 297 s 801 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION

General Fund Appropriation for fire insurance

premium distributions
. . . .
(($12,107,000))

$12,486,000

General Fund Appropriation for prosecuting attorney

distributions
. . . .
$7,975,000

General Fund Appropriation for boating safety and

education distributions
. . . .
(($6,395,000))

$5,014,000

General Fund Appropriation for public utility

district excise tax distributions
. . . .
(($67,206,000))

$99,351,000

Death Investigations Account Appropriation for

distribution to counties for publicly funded

autopsies
. . . .
(($3,303,000))

$5,927,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account Appropriation for

harbor improvement revenue distributions
. . . .
(($140,000))

$158,000

Timber Tax Distribution Account Appropriation for

distribution to "timber" counties
. . . .
$77,324,000

County Criminal Justice Assistance Appropriation
. . . .
(($115,238,000))

$115,845,000

Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Appropriation
. . . .
(($45,587,000))

$45,904,000

City-County Assistance Appropriation
. . . .
$56,205,000

Liquor Excise Tax Account Appropriation for liquor

excise tax distribution
. . . .
(($87,317,000))

$89,098,000

Columbia River Water Delivery Account Appropriation

for the Confederated Tribes of the Colville

Reservation
. . . .
$8,690,000

Columbia River Water Delivery Account Appropriation

for the Spokane Tribe of Indians
. . . .
$6,036,000

Liquor Revolving Account Appropriation for liquor

profits distribution
. . . .
$98,876,000

General Fund Appropriation for other tax

distributions
. . . .
(($102,000))

$104,000

General Fund Appropriation for Cannabis Excise Tax

distributions
. . . .
$20,000,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account Appropriation for

Cannabis Excise Tax distributions pursuant to

Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No.

5796 (cannabis revenue)
. . . .
$25,243,000

General Fund Appropriation for Habitat Conservation

Program distributions
. . . .
(($5,754,000))

$4,754,000

General Fund Appropriation for payment in lieu of

taxes to counties under Department of Fish and

Wildlife Program
. . . .
(($4,040,000))

$4,078,000

Puget Sound Taxpayer Accountability Account

Appropriation for distribution to counties in

amounts not to exceed actual deposits into the

account and attributable to those counties'

share pursuant to RCW 43.79.520.
. . . .
$51,983,000

Manufacturing and Warehousing Job Centers Account

Appropriation for distribution to local taxing

jurisdictions to mitigate the unintended

revenue redistributions effect of sourcing law

changes pursuant to Engrossed Substitute House

Bill No. 1521 (warehousing & manufacturing

jobs).
. . . .
$12,150,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($711,671,000))

$747,201,000

The total expenditures from the state treasury under the appropriations in this section shall not exceed the funds available under statutory distributions for the stated purposes.

Sec. 1802. 2022 c 297 s 802 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—FOR THE COUNTY CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT

Impaired Driving Safety Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,015,000))

$1,530,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($2,015,000))

$1,530,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The amount appropriated in this section shall be distributed quarterly during the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium in accordance with RCW 82.14.310. This funding is provided to counties for the costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including, but not limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving penalties); chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 208, Laws of 1998 (deferred prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998 (DUI/license suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock violations); chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication levels lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); and chapter 215, Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions).

Sec. 1803. 2022 c 297 s 803 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—MUNICIPAL CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT

Impaired Driving Safety Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,343,000))

$1,020,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,343,000))

$1,020,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The amount appropriated in this section shall be distributed quarterly during the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium to all cities ratably based on population as last determined by the office of financial management. The distributions to any city that substantially decriminalizes or repeals its criminal code after July 1, 1990, and that does not reimburse the county for costs associated with criminal cases under RCW 3.50.800 or 3.50.805(2), shall be made to the county in which the city is located. This funding is provided to cities for the costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including, but not limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving penalties); chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 208, Laws of 1998 (deferred prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998 (DUI/license suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock violations); chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication levels lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); and chapter 215, Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions).

Sec. 1804. 2022 c 297 s 804 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—TRANSFERS

Dedicated ((Marijuana))Cannabis Account: For

transfer to the basic health plan trust

account, the lesser of the amount determined

pursuant to RCW 69.50.540 or this amount for

fiscal year 2022, $265,000,000 and this amount

for fiscal year 2023, $268,000,000
. . . .
$533,000,000

Dedicated ((Marijuana))Cannabis Account: For

transfer to the state general fund, the lesser

of the amount determined pursuant to RCW

69.50.540 or this amount for fiscal year 2022,

$202,000,000 and this amount for fiscal year

2023, $200,000,000
. . . .
$402,000,000

Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the

state general fund, in an amount not to exceed

the actual amount of the annual base payment to

the tobacco settlement account for fiscal year

2022
. . . .
$90,000,000

Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the

state general fund, in an amount not to exceed

the actual amount of the annual base payment to

the tobacco settlement account for fiscal year

2023
. . . .
$90,000,000

((Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the

state general fund, in an amount not to exceed

the actual amount of the tobacco arbitration

payment to the tobacco settlement account, for

fiscal year 2023
. . . .
$8,000,000))

State Treasurer's Service Account: For transfer to

the state general fund, $5,000,000 for fiscal

year 2022 and $5,000,000 for fiscal year 2023
. . . .
$10,000,000

General Fund: For transfer to the fair fund under

RCW 15.76.115, $2,750,000 for fiscal year 2022

and $2,750,000 for fiscal year 2023
. . . .
$5,500,000

Financial Services Regulation Account: For transfer

to the state general fund, $3,500,000 for

fiscal year 2022 and $3,500,000 for fiscal year

2023
. . . .
$7,000,000

Marine Resources Stewardship Trust Account: For

transfer to the aquatic lands enhancement

account, up to $40,000 for fiscal year 2022
. . . .
$40,000

Water Pollution Control Revolving Administration

Account: For transfer to the water pollution

control revolving account, $6,000,000 for

fiscal year 2022
. . . .
$6,000,000

General Fund: For transfer to the home security

fund, $4,500,000 for fiscal year 2022 and

$4,500,000 for fiscal year 2023
. . . .
$9,000,000

Gambling Revolving Account: For transfer to the

state general fund as repayment of the loan

pursuant to chapter 127, Laws of 2020 (sports

wagering/compacts), $3,000,000 for fiscal year

2022 and the lesser of the remaining amount

determined by the treasurer for full repayment

of the $6,000,000 transferred from the general

fund in the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium with any

related interest, or this amount for fiscal

year 2023 $3,500,000
. . . .
$6,500,000

School Employees' Insurance Account: For transfer to

the general fund as repayment of the remainder

of the loans for start costs for the school

employees benefit program, $15,615,000 for

fiscal year 2022
. . . .
$15,615,000

General Fund: For transfer to the manufacturing and

warehousing jobs centers account $6,750,000 for

fiscal year 2022 and $5,400,000 for fiscal

year 2023 pursuant to Engrossed Substitute

House Bill No. 1521 (warehousing &

manufacturing jobs).
. . . .
$12,150,000

General Fund: For transfer to the Washington housing

trust fund, $10,000,000 for fiscal year 2022
. . . .
$10,000,000

General Fund: For transfer to the forest resiliency

account trust fund, $6,000,000 for fiscal year

2022
. . . .
$6,000,000

Streamlined Sales and Use Tax Mitigation Account:

For transfer to the general fund, $3,186,000 or

as much thereof that represents the balance in

the account for fiscal year 2022
. . . .
$3,186,000

General Fund: For transfer to the municipal criminal

justice assistance account for fiscal year

2022
. . . .
$761,000

General Fund: For transfer to the wildfire response,

forest restoration, and community resilience

account, solely for the implementation of

chapter 298, Laws of 2021 (2SHB 1168)

(long-term forest health), $12,475,000 for

fiscal year 2022 and $74,632,000 for fiscal

year 2023
. . . .
$87,107,000

General Fund: For transfer to the state drought

preparedness and response account, $4,500,000

for fiscal year 2022 and $4,500,000 for fiscal

year 2023
. . . .
$9,000,000

General Fund: For transfer to the Washington rescue

plan transition account, $1,100,000,000 for

fiscal year 2023
. . . .
$1,100,000,000

General Fund: For transfer to the disaster response

account, $82,200,000 for fiscal year 2023
. . . .
$82,200,000

General Fund: For transfer to the judicial

information systems account, $9,700,000 for

fiscal year 2023
. . . .
$9,700,000

(End of part)

PART XIX

MISCELLANEOUS

SUPPLEMENTAL

Sec. 1901. RCW 28B.76.526 and 2020 c 357 s 911 are each amended to read as follows:

The Washington opportunity pathways account is created in the state treasury. Expenditures from the account may be used only for programs in chapter 28A.710 RCW (charter schools), chapter 28B.12 RCW (state work-study), chapter 28B.50 RCW (opportunity grant), RCW 28B.76.660 (Washington scholars award), RCW 28B.76.670 (Washington award for vocational excellence), chapter 28B.92 RCW (Washington college grant program), chapter 28B.105 RCW (GET ready for math and science scholarship), chapter 28B.117 RCW (passport to careers), chapter 28B.118 RCW (college bound scholarship), and chapter 43.216 RCW (early childhood education and assistance program). During the 2019-2021 and 2021-2023 fiscal ((biennium))biennia, the account may also be appropriated for public schools funded under chapters 28A.150 and 28A.715 RCW.

Sec. 1902. RCW 70A.65.030 and 2022 c 182 s 104 and 2022 c 181 s 13 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Each year or biennium, as appropriate, when allocating funds from the carbon emissions reduction account created in RCW 70A.65.240, the climate commitment account created in RCW 70A.65.260, the natural climate solutions account created in RCW 70A.65.270, the climate investment account created in RCW 70A.65.250, the air quality and health disparities improvement account created in RCW 70A.65.280, the climate transit programs account created in RCW 46.68.500, or the climate active transportation account created in RCW 46.68.490, or administering grants or programs funded by the accounts, agencies shall conduct an environmental justice assessment consistent with the requirements of RCW 70A.02.060 and establish a minimum of not less than 35 percent and a goal of 40 percent of total investments that provide direct and meaningful benefits to vulnerable populations within the boundaries of overburdened communities through: (a) The direct reduction of environmental burdens in overburdened communities; (b) the reduction of disproportionate, cumulative risk from environmental burdens, including those associated with climate change; (c) the support of community led project development, planning, and participation costs; or (d) meeting a community need identified by the community that is consistent with the intent of this chapter or RCW 70A.02.010.

(2) The allocation of funding under subsection (1) of this section must adhere to the following principles, additional to the requirements of RCW 70A.02.080: (a) Benefits and programs should be directed to areas and targeted to vulnerable populations and overburdened communities to reduce statewide disparities; (b) investments and benefits should be made roughly proportional to the health disparities that a specific community experiences, with a goal of eliminating the disparities; (c) investments and programs should focus on creating environmental benefits, including eliminating health burdens, creating community and population resilience, and raising the quality of life of those in the community; and (d) efforts should be made to balance investments and benefits across the state and within counties, local jurisdictions, and unincorporated areas as appropriate to reduce disparities by location and to ensure efforts contribute to a reduction in disparities that exist based on race or ethnicity, socioeconomic status, or other factors.

(3) State agencies allocating funds or administering grants or programs from the carbon emissions reduction account created in RCW 70A.65.240, the climate commitment account created in RCW 70A.65.260, the natural climate solutions account created in RCW 70A.65.270, the climate investment account created in RCW 70A.65.250, the air quality and health disparities improvement account created in RCW 70A.65.280, the climate transit programs account created in RCW 46.68.500, or the climate active transportation account created in RCW 46.68.490, must:

(a) Report annually to the environmental justice council created in RCW 70A.02.110 regarding progress toward meeting environmental justice and environmental health goals;

(b) Consider recommendations by the environmental justice council; and

(c)(i) If the agency is not a covered agency subject to the requirements of chapter 70A.02 RCW, create and adopt a community engagement plan to describe how it will engage with overburdened communities and vulnerable populations in allocating funds or administering grants or programs from the climate investment account. During the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the office of financial management and the environmental and land use hearings office are exempted from the requirement to create and adopt a community engagement plan.

(ii) The plan must include methods for outreach and communication with those who face barriers, language or otherwise, to participation.

Sec. 1903. RCW 74.46.561 and 2022 c 297 s 966 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature adopts a new system for establishing nursing home payment rates beginning July 1, 2016. Any payments to nursing homes for services provided after June 30, 2016, must be based on the new system. The new system must be designed in such a manner as to decrease administrative complexity associated with the payment methodology, reward nursing homes providing care for high acuity residents, incentivize quality care for residents of nursing homes, and establish minimum staffing standards for direct care.

(2) The new system must be based primarily on industry-wide costs, and have three main components: Direct care, indirect care, and capital.

(3)(a) The direct care component must include the direct care and therapy care components of the previous system, along with food, laundry, and dietary services. ((Direct))Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, direct care must be paid at a fixed rate, based on one hundred percent or greater of statewide case mix neutral median costs, but ((for fiscal year 2023)) shall be capped so that a nursing home provider's direct care rate does not exceed ((165))118 percent of its base year's direct care allowable costs except if the provider is below the minimum staffing standard established in RCW 74.42.360(2). The legislature intends to remove the cap on direct care rates by June 30, 2027. Direct care must be performance-adjusted for acuity every six months, using case mix principles. Direct care must be regionally adjusted using countywide wage index information available through the United States department of labor's bureau of labor statistics. There is no minimum occupancy for direct care. The direct care component rate allocations calculated in accordance with this section must be adjusted to the extent necessary to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

(b) Unless a nursing home provider is below the minimum staffing standard established in RCW 74.42.360(2), a provider's direct care rate relative to its base year's direct care allowable costs must be capped as follows: For fiscal year 2023, the cap must not exceed 165 percent.

(4)(a) The indirect care component must include the elements of administrative expenses, maintenance costs, and housekeeping services from the previous system. ((A))Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, a minimum occupancy assumption of ninety percent must be applied to indirect care((, except during fiscal year 2023 when the minimum occupancy assumption must be 75 percent)). Indirect care must be paid at a fixed rate, based on ninety percent or greater of statewide median costs. The indirect care component rate allocations calculated in accordance with this section must be adjusted to the extent necessary to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

(b) A minimum occupancy assumption must be applied to indirect care as follows: For fiscal year 2023, the assumption must be 75 percent.

(5) The capital component must use a fair market rental system to set a price per bed. The capital component must be adjusted for the age of the facility, and must use a minimum occupancy assumption of ninety percent.

(a) Beginning July 1, 2016, the fair rental rate allocation for each facility must be determined by multiplying the allowable nursing home square footage in (c) of this subsection by the RSMeans rental rate in (d) of this subsection and by the number of licensed beds yielding the gross unadjusted building value. An equipment allowance of ten percent must be added to the unadjusted building value. The sum of the unadjusted building value and equipment allowance must then be reduced by the average age of the facility as determined by (e) of this subsection using a depreciation rate of one and one-half percent. The depreciated building and equipment plus land valued at ten percent of the gross unadjusted building value before depreciation must then be multiplied by the rental rate at seven and one-half percent to yield an allowable fair rental value for the land, building, and equipment.

(b) The fair rental value determined in (a) of this subsection must be divided by the greater of the actual total facility census from the prior full calendar year or imputed census based on the number of licensed beds at ninety percent occupancy.

(c) For the rate year beginning July 1, 2016, all facilities must be reimbursed using four hundred square feet. For the rate year beginning July 1, 2017, allowable nursing facility square footage must be determined using the total nursing facility square footage as reported on the medicaid cost reports submitted to the department in compliance with this chapter. The maximum allowable square feet per bed may not exceed four hundred fifty.

(d) Each facility must be paid at eighty-three percent or greater of the median nursing facility RSMeans construction index value per square foot. The department may use updated RSMeans construction index information when more recent square footage data becomes available. The statewide value per square foot must be indexed based on facility zip code by multiplying the statewide value per square foot times the appropriate zip code based index. For the purpose of implementing this section, the value per square foot effective July 1, 2016, must be set so that the weighted average fair rental value rate is not less than ten dollars and eighty cents per patient day. The capital component rate allocations calculated in accordance with this section must be adjusted to the extent necessary to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

(e) The average age is the actual facility age reduced for significant renovations. Significant renovations are defined as those renovations that exceed two thousand dollars per bed in a calendar year as reported on the annual cost report submitted in accordance with this chapter. For the rate beginning July 1, 2016, the department shall use renovation data back to 1994 as submitted on facility cost reports. Beginning July 1, 2016, facility ages must be reduced in future years if the value of the renovation completed in any year exceeds two thousand dollars times the number of licensed beds. The cost of the renovation must be divided by the accumulated depreciation per bed in the year of the renovation to determine the equivalent number of new replacement beds. The new age for the facility is a weighted average with the replacement bed equivalents reflecting an age of zero and the existing licensed beds, minus the new bed equivalents, reflecting their age in the year of the renovation. At no time may the depreciated age be less than zero or greater than forty-four years.

(f) A nursing facility's capital component rate allocation must be rebased annually, effective July 1, 2016, in accordance with this section and this chapter.

(g) For the purposes of this subsection (5), "RSMeans" means building construction costs data as published by Gordian.

(6) A quality incentive must be offered as a rate enhancement beginning July 1, 2016.

(a) An enhancement no larger than five percent and no less than one percent of the statewide average daily rate must be paid to facilities that meet or exceed the standard established for the quality incentive. All providers must have the opportunity to earn the full quality incentive payment.

(b) The quality incentive component must be determined by calculating an overall facility quality score composed of four to six quality measures. For fiscal year 2017 there shall be four quality measures, and for fiscal year 2018 there shall be six quality measures. Initially, the quality incentive component must be based on minimum data set quality measures for the percentage of long-stay residents who self-report moderate to severe pain, the percentage of high-risk long-stay residents with pressure ulcers, the percentage of long-stay residents experiencing one or more falls with major injury, and the percentage of long-stay residents with a urinary tract infection. Quality measures must be reviewed on an annual basis by a stakeholder work group established by the department. Upon review, quality measures may be added or changed. The department may risk adjust individual quality measures as it deems appropriate.

(c) The facility quality score must be point based, using at a minimum the facility's most recent available three-quarter average centers for medicare and medicaid services quality data. Point thresholds for each quality measure must be established using the corresponding statistical values for the quality measure point determinants of eighty quality measure points, sixty quality measure points, forty quality measure points, and twenty quality measure points, identified in the most recent available five-star quality rating system technical user's guide published by the centers for medicare and medicaid services.

(d) Facilities meeting or exceeding the highest performance threshold (top level) for a quality measure receive twenty-five points. Facilities meeting the second highest performance threshold receive twenty points. Facilities meeting the third level of performance threshold receive fifteen points. Facilities in the bottom performance threshold level receive no points. Points from all quality measures must then be summed into a single aggregate quality score for each facility.

(e) Facilities receiving an aggregate quality score of eighty percent of the overall available total score or higher must be placed in the highest tier (tier V), facilities receiving an aggregate score of between seventy and seventy-nine percent of the overall available total score must be placed in the second highest tier (tier IV), facilities receiving an aggregate score of between sixty and sixty-nine percent of the overall available total score must be placed in the third highest tier (tier III), facilities receiving an aggregate score of between fifty and fifty-nine percent of the overall available total score must be placed in the fourth highest tier (tier II), and facilities receiving less than fifty percent of the overall available total score must be placed in the lowest tier (tier I).

(f) The tier system must be used to determine the amount of each facility's per patient day quality incentive component. The per patient day quality incentive component for tier IV is seventy-five percent of the per patient day quality incentive component for tier V, the per patient day quality incentive component for tier III is fifty percent of the per patient day quality incentive component for tier V, and the per patient day quality incentive component for tier II is twenty-five percent of the per patient day quality incentive component for tier V. Facilities in tier I receive no quality incentive component.

(g) Tier system payments must be set in a manner that ensures that the entire biennial appropriation for the quality incentive program is allocated.

(h) Facilities with insufficient three-quarter average centers for medicare and medicaid services quality data must be assigned to the tier corresponding to their five-star quality rating. Facilities with a five-star quality rating must be assigned to the highest tier (tier V) and facilities with a one-star quality rating must be assigned to the lowest tier (tier I). The use of a facility's five-star quality rating shall only occur in the case of insufficient centers for medicare and medicaid services minimum data set information.

(i) The quality incentive rates must be adjusted semiannually on July 1 and January 1 of each year using, at a minimum, the most recent available three-quarter average centers for medicare and medicaid services quality data.

(j) Beginning July 1, 2017, the percentage of short-stay residents who newly received an antipsychotic medication must be added as a quality measure. The department must determine the quality incentive thresholds for this quality measure in a manner consistent with those outlined in (b) through (h) of this subsection using the centers for medicare and medicaid services quality data.

(k) Beginning July 1, 2017, the percentage of direct care staff turnover must be added as a quality measure using the centers for medicare and medicaid services' payroll-based journal and nursing home facility payroll data. Turnover is defined as an employee departure. The department must determine the quality incentive thresholds for this quality measure using data from the centers for medicare and medicaid services' payroll-based journal, unless such data is not available, in which case the department shall use direct care staffing turnover data from the most recent medicaid cost report.

(7) Reimbursement of the safety net assessment imposed by chapter 74.48 RCW and paid in relation to medicaid residents must be continued.

(8)(a) The direct care and indirect care components must be rebased in even-numbered years, beginning with rates paid on July 1, 2016. Rates paid on July 1, 2016, must be based on the 2014 calendar year cost report. On a percentage basis, after rebasing, the department must confirm that the statewide average daily rate has increased at least as much as the average rate of inflation, as determined by the skilled nursing facility market basket index published by the centers for medicare and medicaid services, or a comparable index. If after rebasing, the percentage increase to the statewide average daily rate is less than the average rate of inflation for the same time period, the department is authorized to increase rates by the difference between the percentage increase after rebasing and the average rate of inflation.

(b) It is the intention of the legislature that direct and indirect care rates paid in fiscal year 2022 will be rebased using the calendar year 2019 cost reports. For fiscal year 2021, in addition to the rates generated by (a) of this subsection, an additional adjustment is provided as established in this subsection (8)(b). Beginning May 1, 2020, and through June 30, 2021, the calendar year costs must be adjusted for inflation by a twenty-four month consumer price index, based on the most recently available monthly index for all urban consumers, as published by the bureau of labor statistics. It is also the intent of the legislature that, starting in fiscal year 2022, a facility-specific rate add-on equal to the inflation adjustment that facilities received solely in fiscal year 2021, must be added to the rate.

(c) To determine the necessity of regular inflationary adjustments to the nursing facility rates, by December 1, 2020, the department shall provide the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature with a report that provides a review of rates paid in 2017, 2018, and 2019 in comparison to costs incurred by nursing facilities.

(9) The direct care component provided in subsection (3) of this section is subject to the reconciliation and settlement process provided in RCW 74.46.022(6). Beginning July 1, 2016, pursuant to rules established by the department, funds that are received through the reconciliation and settlement process provided in RCW 74.46.022(6) must be used for technical assistance, specialized training, or an increase to the quality enhancement established in subsection (6) of this section. The legislature intends to review the utility of maintaining the reconciliation and settlement process under a price-based payment methodology, and may discontinue the reconciliation and settlement process after the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium.

(10) Compared to the rate in effect June 30, 2016, including all cost components and rate add-ons, no facility may receive a rate reduction of more than one percent on July 1, 2016, more than two percent on July 1, 2017, or more than five percent on July 1, 2018. To ensure that the appropriation for nursing homes remains cost neutral, the department is authorized to cap the rate increase for facilities in fiscal years 2017, 2018, and 2019.

Sec. 1904. 2021 c 334 s 747 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—TEACHERS' RETIREMENT SYSTEM PLAN 1 FUND

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
(($800,000,000))

$250,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($800,000,000))

$250,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The entire general fund—state appropriation is provided solely for expenditure on June 30, 2023, into the teachers' retirement system plan 1 fund, to be applied to the unfunded actuarial accrued liability.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1905. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1906. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---