BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 59.18 RCW to read as follows:

In any forcible or unlawful detainer proceeding before the court:

(1) Any party, including an attorney or witness, upon written notice to the court, must be permitted to appear and participate in the proceeding remotely by video conference, or by telephone if authorized by the judge, at no cost to either party.

(2) Any party must be permitted to make an emergency application by phone or video conference and file such documents by email, fax, or other means that can be performed remotely.

Sec. 2. RCW 59.18.410 and 2021 c 115 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If at trial the verdict of the jury or, if the case is tried without a jury, the finding of the court is in favor of the landlord and against the tenant, judgment shall be entered for the restitution of the premises; and if the proceeding is for unlawful detainer after neglect or failure to perform any condition or covenant of a lease or agreement under which the property is held, or after default in the payment of rent, the judgment shall also declare the forfeiture of the lease, agreement, or tenancy. The jury, or the court, if the proceedings are tried without a jury, shall also assess the damages arising out of the tenancy occasioned to the landlord by any forcible entry, or by any forcible or unlawful detainer, alleged in the complaint and proved at trial, and, if the alleged unlawful detainer is based on default in the payment of rent, find the amount of any rent due, and the judgment shall be rendered against the tenant liable for the forcible entry, forcible detainer, or unlawful detainer for the amount of damages thus assessed, for the rent, if any, found due, and late fees if such fees are due under the lease and do not exceed ((seventy-five dollars))$75 in total. The court may award statutory costs. The court may also award reasonable attorneys' fees as provided in RCW 59.18.290.

(2) When the tenant is liable for unlawful detainer after a default in the payment of rent, execution upon the judgment shall not occur until the expiration of five court days after the entry of the judgment. Before entry of a judgment or until five court days have expired after entry of the judgment, unless the tenant provides a pledge of financial assistance letter from a government or nonprofit entity, in which case the tenant has until the date of eviction, the tenant or any subtenant, or any mortgagee of the term, or other party interested in the continuance of the tenancy, may pay into court or to the landlord the amount of the rent due, any court costs incurred at the time of payment, late fees if such fees are due under the lease and do not exceed ((seventy-five dollars))$75 in total, and attorneys' fees if awarded, in which event any judgment entered shall be satisfied and the tenant restored to his or her tenancy. If the tenant seeks to restore his or her tenancy after entry of a judgment, the tenant may tender the amount stated within the judgment as long as that amount does not exceed the amount authorized under subsection (1) of this section. If a tenant seeks to restore his or her tenancy and pay the amount set forth in this subsection with funds acquired through an emergency rental assistance program provided by a governmental or nonprofit entity, the tenant shall provide a copy of the pledge of emergency rental assistance provided from the appropriate governmental or nonprofit entity and have an opportunity to exercise such rights under this subsection, which may include a stay of judgment and provision by the landlord of documentation necessary for processing the assistance. The landlord shall accept any pledge of emergency rental assistance funds provided to the tenant from a governmental or nonprofit entity before the expiration of any pay or vacate notice for nonpayment of rent for the full amount of the rent owing under the rental agreement. The landlord shall accept any written pledge of emergency rental assistance funds provided to the tenant from a governmental or nonprofit entity after the expiration of the pay or vacate notice if the pledge will contribute to the total payment of both the amount of rent due, including any current rent, and other amounts if required under this subsection. The landlord shall suspend any court action for ((seven))14 court days after providing necessary payment information to the nonprofit or governmental entity to allow for payment of the emergency rental assistance funds. By accepting such pledge of emergency rental assistance, the landlord is not required to enter into any additional conditions not related to the provision of necessary payment information and documentation. If a judgment has been satisfied, the landlord shall file a satisfaction of judgment with the court. A tenant seeking to exercise rights under this subsection shall pay an additional ((fifty dollars))$50 for each time the tenant was reinstated after judgment pursuant to this subsection within the previous ((twelve))12 months prior to payment. If payment of the amount specified in this subsection is not made within five court days after the entry of the judgment, the judgment may be enforced for its full amount and for the possession of the premises.

(3)(a) Following the entry of a judgment in favor of the landlord and against the tenant for the restitution of the premises and forfeiture of the tenancy due to nonpayment of rent, the court, at the time of the show cause hearing or trial, or upon subsequent motion of the tenant but before the execution of the writ of restitution, may stay the writ of restitution upon good cause and on such terms that the court deems fair and just for both parties. In making this decision, the court shall consider evidence of the following factors:

(i) The tenant's willful or intentional default or intentional failure to pay rent;

(ii) Whether nonpayment of the rent was caused by exigent circumstances that were beyond the tenant's control and that are not likely to recur;

(iii) The tenant's ability to timely pay the judgment;

(iv) The tenant's payment history;

(v) Whether the tenant is otherwise in substantial compliance with the rental agreement;

(vi) Hardship on the tenant if evicted; and

(vii) Conduct related to other notices served within the last six months.

(b) The burden of proof for such relief under this subsection (3) shall be on the tenant. If the tenant seeks relief pursuant to this subsection (3) at the time of the show cause hearing, the court shall hear the matter at the time of the show cause hearing or as expeditiously as possible so as to avoid unnecessary delay or hardship on the parties.

(c) In any order issued pursuant to this subsection (3):

(i) The court shall not stay the writ of restitution more than ((ninety))90 days from the date of order, but may order repayment of the judgment balance within such time. If the payment plan is to exceed ((thirty))30 days, the total cumulative payments for each ((thirty-day))30-day period following the order shall be no less than one month of the tenant's share of the rent, and the total amount of the judgment and all additional rent that is due shall be paid within ((ninety))90 days.

(ii) Within any payment plan ordered by the court, the court shall require the tenant to pay to the landlord or to the court one month's rent within five court days of issuance of the order. If the date of the order is on or before the ((fifteenth))15th of the month, the tenant shall remain current with ongoing rental payments as they become due for the duration of the payment plan; if the date of the order is after the ((fifteenth))15th of the month, the tenant shall have the option to apportion the following month's rental payment within the payment plan, but monthly rental payments thereafter shall be paid according to the rental agreement.

(iii) The sheriff may serve the writ of restitution upon the tenant before the expiration of the five court days of issuance of the order; however, the sheriff shall not execute the writ of restitution until after expiration of the five court days in order for payment to be made of one month's rent as required by (c)(ii) of this subsection. In the event payment is made as provided in (c)(ii) of this subsection for one month's rent, the court shall stay the writ of restitution ex parte without prior notice to the landlord upon the tenant filing and presenting a motion to stay with a declaration of proof of payment demonstrating full compliance with the required payment of one month's rent. Any order staying the writ of restitution under this subsection (3)(c)(iii) shall require the tenant to serve a copy of the order on the landlord by personal delivery, first-class mail, facsimile, or email if agreed to by the parties.

(A) If the tenant has satisfied (c)(ii) of this subsection by paying one month's rent within five court days, but defaults on a subsequent payment required by the court pursuant to this subsection (3)(c), the landlord may enforce the writ of restitution after serving a notice of default in accordance with RCW 59.12.040 informing the tenant that he or she has defaulted on rent due under the lease agreement or payment plan entered by the court. Upon service of the notice of default, the tenant shall have three calendar days from the date of service to vacate the premises before the sheriff may execute the writ of restitution.

(B) If the landlord serves the notice of default described under this subsection (3)(c)(iii), an additional day is not included in calculating the time before the sheriff may execute the writ of restitution. The notice of default must be in substantially the following form:

NOTICE OF DEFAULT FOR RENT AND/OR PAYMENT PLAN ORDERED BY COURT

NAME(S)

ADDRESS

CITY, STATE, ZIP

THIS IS NOTICE THAT YOU ARE IN DEFAULT OF YOUR RENT AND/OR PAYMENT PLAN ORDERED BY THE COURT. YOUR LANDLORD HAS RECEIVED THE FOLLOWING PAYMENTS:

DATE

AMOUNT

DATE

AMOUNT

DATE

AMOUNT

THE LANDLORD MAY SCHEDULE YOUR PHYSICAL EVICTION WITHIN THREE CALENDAR DAYS OF SERVICE OF THIS NOTICE. TO STOP A PHYSICAL EVICTION, YOU ARE REQUIRED TO PAY THE BALANCE OF YOUR RENT AND/OR PAYMENT PLAN IN THE AMOUNT OF $. . . . ..

PAYMENT MAY BE MADE TO THE COURT OR TO THE LANDLORD. IF YOU FAIL TO PAY THE BALANCE WITHIN THREE CALENDAR DAYS, THE LANDLORD MAY PROCEED WITH A PHYSICAL EVICTION FOR POSSESSION OF THE UNIT THAT YOU ARE RENTING.

DATE

SIGNATURE

LANDLORD/AGENT

NAME

ADDRESS

PHONE

(iv) If a tenant seeks to satisfy a condition of this subsection (3)(c) by relying on an emergency rental assistance program provided by a government or nonprofit entity and provides an offer of proof, the court shall stay the writ of restitution as necessary to afford the tenant an equal opportunity to comply.

(v) The court shall extend the writ of restitution as necessary to enforce the order issued pursuant to this subsection (3)(c) in the event of default.

(d) A tenant who has been served with three or more notices to pay or vacate for failure to pay rent as set forth in RCW 59.12.040 within twelve months prior to the notice to pay or vacate upon which the proceeding is based may not seek relief under this subsection (3), unless the court determines any of the notices served were invalid or did not otherwise comply with the requirements of this chapter.

(e)(i) In any application seeking relief pursuant to this subsection (3) by either the tenant or landlord, the court shall issue a finding as to whether the tenant is low-income, limited resourced, or experiencing hardship to determine if the parties would be eligible for disbursement through the landlord mitigation program account established within RCW 43.31.605(1)(((c)))(b). In making this finding, the court may include an inquiry regarding the tenant's income relative to area median income, household composition, any extenuating circumstances, or other factors, and may rely on written declarations or oral testimony by the parties at the hearing.

(ii) After a finding that the tenant is low-income, limited resourced, or experiencing hardship, the court may issue an order: (A) Finding that the landlord is eligible to receive on behalf of the tenant and may apply for reimbursement from the landlord mitigation program; and (B) directing the clerk to remit, without further order of the court, any future payments made by the tenant in order to reimburse the department of commerce pursuant to RCW 43.31.605(1)(((c)))(b)(iii). In accordance with RCW 43.31.605(1)(((c)))(b), such an order must be accompanied by a copy of the order staying the writ of restitution. Nothing in this subsection (3)(e) shall be deemed to obligate the department of commerce to provide assistance in claim reimbursement through the landlord mitigation program if there are not sufficient funds.

(iii) If the department of commerce fails to disburse payment to the landlord for the judgment pursuant to this subsection (3)(e) within ((thirty))30 days from submission of the application, the landlord may renew an application for a writ of restitution pursuant to RCW 59.18.370 and for other rent owed by the tenant since the time of entry of the prior judgment. In such event, the tenant may exercise rights afforded under this section.

(iv) Upon payment by the department of commerce to the landlord for the remaining or total amount of the judgment, as applicable, the judgment is satisfied and the landlord shall file a satisfaction of judgment with the court.

(v) Nothing in this subsection (3)(e) prohibits the landlord from otherwise applying for reimbursement for an unpaid judgment pursuant to RCW 43.31.605(1)(((c)))(b) after the tenant defaults on a payment plan ordered pursuant to (c) of this subsection.

(vi) ((For the period extending one year beyond the expiration of the eviction moratorium, if))If a tenant demonstrates an ability to pay in order to reinstate the tenancy by means of disbursement through the landlord mitigation program account established within RCW 43.31.605(1)(((c)))(b):

(A) Any restrictions imposed under (d) of this subsection do not apply in determining if a tenant is eligible for reinstatement under this subsection (3); and

(B) Reimbursement on behalf of the tenant to the landlord under RCW 43.31.605(1)(((c)))(b) may include up to three months of prospective rent to stabilize the tenancy as determined by the court.

(4) If a tenant seeks to stay a writ of restitution issued pursuant to this chapter, the court may issue an ex parte stay of the writ of restitution provided the tenant or tenant's attorney submits a declaration indicating good faith efforts were made to notify the other party or, if no efforts were made, why notice could not be provided prior to the application for an ex parte stay, and describing the immediate or irreparable harm that may result if an immediate stay is not granted. The court shall require service of the order and motion to stay the writ of restitution by personal delivery, mail, facsimile, or other means most likely to afford all parties notice of the court date.

(5) In all other cases the judgment may be enforced immediately. If a writ of restitution shall have been executed prior to judgment no further writ or execution for the premises shall be required.

(6) This section also applies if the writ of restitution is issued pursuant to a final judgment entered after a show cause hearing conducted in accordance with RCW 59.18.380.

Sec. 3. RCW 59.18.057 and 2021 c 115 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every 14-day notice served pursuant to RCW 59.12.030(3) must be in substantially the following form:

"TO:

AND TO:

ADDRESS:

FOURTEEN-DAY NOTICE TO PAY RENT OR VACATE THE PREMISES

You are receiving this notice because the landlord alleges you are not in compliance with the terms of the lease agreement by failing to pay rent and/or utilities and/or recurring or periodic charges that are past due.

(1) Monthly rent due for (list month(s)): $ (dollar amount)

AND/OR

(2) Utilities due for (list month(s)): $ (dollar amount)

AND/OR

(3) Other recurring or periodic charges identified in the lease for (list month(s)): $ (dollar amount)

TOTAL AMOUNT DUE: $ (dollar amount)

Note - payment must be made pursuant to the terms of the rental agreement or by nonelectronic means including, but not limited to, cashier's check, money order, or other certified funds.

You must pay the total amount due to your landlord within fourteen (14) days after service of this notice or you must vacate the premises. Any payment you make to the landlord must first be applied to the total amount due as shown on this notice. Any failure to comply with this notice within fourteen (14) days after service of this notice may result in a judicial proceeding that leads to your eviction from the premises.

The Washington state Office of the Attorney General has this notice in multiple languages as well as information on available resources to help you pay your rent, including state and local rental assistance programs, on its website at www.atg.wa.gov/landlord-tenant.

State law provides you the right to legal representation and the court may be able to appoint a lawyer to represent you without cost to you if you are a qualifying low-income renter. If you believe you are a qualifying low-income renter and would like an attorney appointed to represent you, please contact the Eviction Defense Screening Line at 855-657-8387 or apply online at https://nwjustice.org/apply-online. For additional resources, call 2-1-1 or the Northwest Justice Project CLEAR Hotline outside King County (888) 201-1014 weekdays between 9:15 a.m. – 12:15 p.m., or (888) 387-7111 for seniors (age 60 and over). You may find additional information to help you at http://www.washingtonlawhelp.org. Free or low-cost mediation services to assist in nonpayment of rent disputes before any judicial proceedings occur are also available at dispute resolution centers throughout the state. You can find your nearest dispute resolution center at https://www.resolutionwa.org.

State law also provides you the right to receive interpreter services at court.

OWNER/LANDLORD:___________DATE:______________

WHERE TOTAL AMOUNT DUE IS TO BE PAID: ___(owner/landlord name)___

___________(address)________"

(2) ((Upon expiration of the eviction resolution pilot program established under RCW 59.18.660:

(a) The landlord must also provide the notice required in this section to the dispute resolution center located within or serving the county in which the dwelling unit is located. It is a defense to an eviction under RCW 59.12.030 that a landlord did not provide additional notice under this subsection.

(b) Dispute resolution centers are encouraged to notify the housing justice project or northwest justice project located within or serving the county in which the dispute resolution center is located, as appropriate, once notice is received from the landlord under this subsection.

(3))) The form required in this section does not abrogate any additional notice requirements to tenants as required by federal, state, or local law.

--- END ---