BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 10.99.040 and 2021 c 215 s 122 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Because of the serious nature of domestic violence, the court in domestic violence actions:

(a) Shall not dismiss any charge or delay disposition because of concurrent dissolution or other civil proceedings;

(b) Shall not require proof that either party is seeking a dissolution of marriage prior to instigation of criminal proceedings;

(c) Shall waive any requirement that the victim's location be disclosed to any person, other than the attorney of a criminal defendant, upon a showing that there is a possibility of further violence: PROVIDED, That the court may order a criminal defense attorney not to disclose to his or her client the victim's location; and

(d) Shall identify by any reasonable means on docket sheets those criminal actions arising from acts of domestic violence.

(2)(a) Because of the likelihood of repeated violence directed at those who have been victims of domestic violence in the past, when any person charged with or arrested for a crime involving domestic violence is released from custody before arraignment or trial on bail or personal recognizance, the court authorizing the release may prohibit that person from having any contact with the victim and others. The jurisdiction authorizing the release shall determine whether that person should be prohibited from having any contact with the victim. If there is no ((outstanding)) restraining or ((protective))protection order already prohibiting that person from having contact with the victim, the court authorizing release may issue((, by telephone,)) a no-contact order prohibiting the person charged or arrested from ((having))making any attempt to contact ((with the victim)), including nonphysical contact, the victim or the victim's family or household members, either directly, indirectly, or through a third party, excluding the defendant from a residence shared with the victim, a workplace, school, or childcare, or from knowingly coming within, or knowingly remaining within, a specified distance of a location or vehicle, and other related prohibitions to reduce risk of harm.

(b) ((In issuing the order, the court shall consider the provisions of))The court shall verify that the requirements of RCW 10.99.030(3) have been satisfied, including that a sworn statement of a peace officer has been submitted to the court, documenting that the responding peace officers separated the parties and asked the victim or victims at the scene about firearms, other dangerous weapons, and ammunition which the defendant owns or has access to, and whether the defendant has a concealed pistol license. If the sworn statement of a peace officer or other information provided to the court indicates there may be a risk of harm if the defendant has access to firearms, dangerous weapons, or an active concealed pistol license, the court shall verify that peace officers have temporarily removed and secured all the firearms, dangerous weapons, and any concealed pistol license. The court shall then determine whether an order to surrender and prohibit weapons or an extreme risk protection order should be issued pursuant to RCW 9.41.800 or chapter 7.105 RCW, ((and shall order the defendant to surrender, and prohibit))prohibiting the ((person))defendant from possessing, ((all))purchasing, receiving, having in the defendant's control or custody, accessing, or attempting to purchase or receive, any firearms, dangerous weapons, and any concealed pistol license and shall order the defendant to surrender, and prohibit the defendant from possessing, any firearms, dangerous weapons, and any concealed pistol license as required in RCW 9.41.800, or shall issue an extreme risk protection order as required by chapter 7.105 RCW.

(((c) The no-contact order shall also be issued in writing as soon as possible, and shall state that it may be extended as provided in subsection (3) of this section. By January 1, 2011, the administrative office of the courts shall develop a pattern form for all no-contact orders issued under this chapter. A no-contact order issued under this chapter must substantially comply with the pattern form developed by the administrative office of the courts.))

(3)(a) At the time of arraignment, the court shall attempt to determine whether there are any other active no-contact orders, protection orders, or restraining orders involving the defendant to assist the court in ensuring that any such order it may impose does not lessen protections imposed by other courts through other such orders, review the defendant's firearms purchase history provided by the prosecutor pursuant to RCW 10.99.045, and any other firearms information provided by law enforcement or court or jail staff, and shall determine whether a no-contact order, an order to surrender and prohibit weapons, or an extreme risk protection order shall be issued or, if previously issued on an emergency basis, extended.

(b) So long as the court finds probable cause, the court may issue or extend a no-contact order, an order to surrender and prohibit weapons, or an extreme risk protection order, even if the defendant fails to appear at arraignment. The no-contact order shall terminate if the defendant is acquitted or the charges are dismissed. To the extent the court is aware, the court shall advise the defendant of the ongoing requirements of any other no-contact, restraining, or protection order that remains in effect.

(((b) In issuing the order, the court shall consider all information documented in the incident report concerning the person's possession of and access to firearms and whether law enforcement took temporary custody of firearms at the time of the arrest. The court may as a condition of release prohibit the defendant from possessing or accessing firearms and order the defendant to immediately surrender all firearms and any concealed pistol license to a law enforcement agency upon release.))

(c) If a no-contact order is issued or extended, the court may also include in the conditions of release a requirement that the defendant submit to electronic monitoring as defined in RCW 9.94A.030. If electronic monitoring is ordered, the court shall specify who shall provide the monitoring services, and the terms under which the monitoring shall be performed. Upon conviction, the court may require as a condition of the sentence that the defendant reimburse the providing agency for the costs of the electronic monitoring.

(4)(a) Willful violation of a court order issued under ((subsection (2), (3), or (7) of)) this section is punishable under RCW 7.105.450, 7.105.455, 7.105.460, or 9.41.800.

(b) The written order releasing the person charged or arrested shall contain the court's directives and shall bear the legend: "Violation of this order is a criminal offense under chapter 7.105 RCW and will subject a violator to arrest; any assault, drive-by shooting, or reckless endangerment that is a violation of this order is a felony. You can be arrested even if any person protected by the order invites or allows you to violate the order's prohibitions. You have the sole responsibility to avoid or refrain from violating the order's provisions. Only the court can change the order."

(c) A certified copy of the order shall be provided to the victim.

(5)(a) A peace officer may request an emergency no-contact order, order to surrender and prohibit weapons, or extreme risk protection order from a judicial officer on behalf of and with the consent of the victim of an alleged act involving domestic violence if the victim is able to provide such consent. If the victim is incapacitated as a result of the alleged act of domestic violence, a peace officer may request an emergency no-contact order, order to surrender and prohibit weapons, or extreme risk protection order on his or her behalf. The request shall be made based upon the sworn statement of a peace officer and may be made in person, by telephone, or by electronic means. If the court finds probable cause to believe that the victim is in imminent danger of domestic violence based on an allegation of the recent commission of an act involving domestic violence, the court shall issue an emergency no-contact order and an order to surrender and prohibit weapons or an extreme risk protection order as required by RCW 9.41.800 or chapter 7.105 RCW.

(b) If the court issues an order to surrender and prohibit weapons or an extreme risk protection order, and has not verified that peace officers have temporarily removed and secured all firearms and dangerous weapons, and any concealed pistol license, all orders issued by the court must be personally served by a peace officer and the peace officer shall take possession of all firearms, dangerous weapons, and any concealed pistol license belonging to the respondent that are surrendered, in plain sight, or discovered pursuant to a lawful search, as required by RCW 9.41.801.

(c) If the court does not issue an order to surrender and prohibit weapons or an extreme risk protection order, or has verified that all firearms, dangerous weapons, and any concealed pistol license have been temporarily removed by law enforcement, service of the court's orders may be effected electronically. Electronic service must be effected by a law enforcement agency transmitting copies of the petition and any supporting materials filed with the petition, any notice of hearing, and any orders, or relevant materials for motions, to the defendant at the defendant's electronic address or the defendant's electronic account associated with email, text messaging, social media applications, or other technologies. Verification of notice is required and may be accomplished through read-receipt mechanisms, a response, a sworn statement from the person who effected service verifying transmission and any follow-up communications such as email or telephone contact used to further verify, or an appearance by the defendant at a hearing. Sworn proof of service must be filed with the court by the person who effected service.

(d) A no-contact order, order to surrender and prohibit weapons, or extreme risk protection order authorized by telephonic or electronic means shall also be issued in writing as soon as possible and shall state that it may be extended as provided in subsection (3) of this section.

(6) If a no-contact order has been issued prior to charging, that order shall expire at arraignment or within seventy-two hours if charges are not filed.

(((6)))(7) Whenever ((a no-contact))an order is issued, modified, or terminated under ((subsection (2) or (3) of)) this section, the clerk of the court shall forward a copy of the order on or before the next judicial day to the appropriate law enforcement agency specified in the order. Upon receipt of the copy of the order the law enforcement agency shall enter the order for one year or until the expiration date specified on the order into any computer-based criminal intelligence information system available in this state used by law enforcement agencies to list outstanding warrants. Entry into the computer-based criminal intelligence information system constitutes notice to all law enforcement agencies of the existence of the order. The order is fully enforceable in any jurisdiction in the state. Upon receipt of notice that an order has been terminated under subsection (3) of this section, the law enforcement agency shall remove the order from the computer-based criminal intelligence information system.

(((7) All courts shall develop policies and procedures by January 1, 2011, to grant victims a process to modify or rescind a no-contact order issued under this chapter. The administrative office of the courts shall develop a model policy to assist the courts in implementing the requirements of this subsection.))

--- END ---