BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. As originally conceived and adopted in both the Untied States Constitution's second amendment and Article I, section 24 of the Washington state Constitution, the people of both our nation and state recognized the right to keep and bear arms to protect not just themselves, but also the state and federal governments from attack. The people enshrined this right in our constitutions not just for the purpose of self-defense, but also for the purpose of military readiness of the citizens in order to form militias, should they become necessary to defend our free state. As a result, the legislature finds that it is of the utmost importance that each state legislator demonstrate knowledge and familiarity with the safety, operation, and handling of firearms used for hunting, self-protection, and, should the need arise, defense of a free state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 44.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) By January 31st of each odd-numbered year, each legislator who is eligible to possess a firearm must provide proof of completion of two recognized firearm safety training programs of at least three hours each, one specific to pistols and one specific to rifles, that comply with the requirements in RCW 9.41.090(2)(a), within the last two years. Proof of completion must be provided to the secretary of the senate or the chief clerk of the house of representatives.

(2) Nothing in this section prohibits a legislator from completing training in addition to the requirements in this section.

(3) Any legislator appointed to fill a vacancy who takes office after January 31st of the first year of a legislative biennium must comply with the requirements of subsection (1) of this section within 30 days of taking office.

(4) By February 1st of each odd-numbered year, the secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of representatives must cause to be published on the official legislative website of each chamber a full list of members of each chamber who have, as of that date, not complied with the requirements of subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act may be known and cited as the second amendment firearm education and training (SAFE-T) act.

--- END ---