BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 79.13.010 and 2007 c 504 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((Subject))Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, and subject to other provisions of this chapter and subject to rules adopted by the board, the department may lease state lands for purposes it deems advisable, including, but not limited to, commercial, industrial, residential, agricultural, and recreational purposes in order to obtain a fair market rental return to the state or the appropriate constitutional or statutory trust, and if the lease is in the best interest of the state or affected trust.

(2) Notwithstanding any provision in this chapter to the contrary, in leases for residential purposes, the board may waive or modify any conditions of the lease if the waiver or modification is necessary to enable any federal agency or lending institution authorized to do business in this state or elsewhere in the United States to participate in any loan secured by a security interest in a leasehold interest.

(3) Any land granted to the state by the United States may be leased for any lawful purpose in such minimum acreage as may be fixed by the department.

(4) The department shall exercise general supervision and control over the lease of state lands for any lawful purpose.

(5) State lands leased or for which permits are issued or contracts are entered into for the prospecting and extraction of valuable materials, coal, oil, gas, or other hydrocarbons are subject to the provisions of chapter 79.14 RCW.

(6) The department may also lease or lease development rights on state lands held for the benefit of the common schools to public agencies, as defined in RCW 79.17.200.

(7) Except for agricultural, grazing, or communication site leases or commercial leases with an annual value of less than $50,000, any new lease or existing lease subject to renewal after the effective date of this section is subject to approval by the board. The department must implement this subsection within existing resources.

(8)(a) The department must make general summary lease information, including lease terms and amounts paid, for state public lands available to the public on a per parcel basis. The information must be readily available and easy to access for the public on an electronic platform, similar to the department's fire dashboard.

(b) The department shall not disclose sensitive or confidential information regarding federal leases. Nothing in this section authorizes the disclosure of information that is otherwise confidential.

--- END ---