BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 68.05.215 and 2005 c 365 s 60 are each amended to read as follows:

The regulatory charges for cemetery certificates at all periods of the year are the same as provided in this chapter. All regulatory charges are payable at the time of the filing of the application and in advance of the issuance of the certificates. All certificates shall be issued for the year and shall expire at midnight, the ((thirty-first))31st day of ((January))March of each year, or at whatever time during any year that ownership or control of any cemetery authority is transferred or sold. Cemetery certificates shall not be transferable.

Sec. 2. RCW 68.05.225 and 2005 c 365 s 61 are each amended to read as follows:

All prearrangement sales licenses issued under this chapter shall be issued for the year and shall expire at midnight, the ((thirty-first))31st day of ((January))March of each year, or at whatever time during any year that ownership or control of any cemetery authority is transferred or sold.

The director, in accordance with RCW 43.24.086, shall set and the department shall collect in advance the fees required for licensing.

Sec. 3. RCW 68.05.245 and 2019 c 432 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All permits, licenses, or endorsements issued under this chapter ((or chapter 18.39 RCW)) must be issued for the year and expire at midnight, the ((thirty-first))31st day of ((January))March of each year, or at whatever time during any year that ownership or control of any cemetery authority that operates such facility is transferred or sold.

(2) The director must set and the department must collect in advance the fees required for licensing.

Sec. 4. RCW 18.39.020 and 2005 c 365 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is unlawful for any person to act or hold himself or herself out as a funeral director or embalmer or discharge any of the duties of a funeral director or embalmer as defined in this chapter unless the person has a valid license under this chapter. It is unlawful for any person to establish, maintain, or operate a funeral establishment without a valid establishment license.

(2) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, all permits, licenses, or endorsements issued under this chapter must be issued for the year and expire at midnight, the 31st day of January of each year, or at whatever time during any year that ownership or control of any funeral establishment that operates such facility is transferred or sold.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. This act takes effect October 31, 2023.

--- END ---