BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.413.040 and 2018 c 153 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) A person working as a paraeducator for a school district before or during the 2017-18 school year must meet the requirements of subsection (2) of this section by the date of hire for the 2019-20 school year or any subsequent school year.

(b) A person who has not previously worked as a paraeducator for a school district must meet the requirements of subsection (2) of this section by the date of hire for the 2018-19 school year or any subsequent school year.

(2) The minimum employment requirements for paraeducators are as provided in this subsection. A paraeducator must:

(a) Be at least ((eighteen))18 years of age and hold a high school diploma or its equivalent; and

(b)(i) Have received a passing grade on ((the education testing service paraeducator assessment))an assessment approved by the board; ((or))

(ii) Hold an associate of arts degree; ((or))

(iii) Have earned ((seventy-two))72 quarter credits or ((forty-eight))48 semester credits at an institution of higher education; or

(iv) Have completed a registered apprenticeship program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---