BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 41.56 RCW to read as follows:

(1) If the employer has the information in the employer's records, the employer shall provide to the exclusive bargaining representative the following information for each employee in an appropriate bargaining unit:

(a) The employee's name and date of hire;

(b) The employee's contact information, including: (i) Cellular, home, and work telephone numbers; (ii) any means of electronic communication, including work and personal email addresses; and (iii) home address or personal mailing address; and

(c) Employment information, including the employee's job title, salary, and work site location.

(2) The employer must provide the information to the exclusive bargaining representative in an editable digital file format agreed to by the exclusive bargaining representative:

(a) Within 10 calendar days from the date of hire for a newly hired employee in an appropriate bargaining unit; and

(b) Every 90 calendar days for all employees in an appropriate bargaining unit.

(3) When there is a state-level representative of the exclusive bargaining representative for a bargaining unit, the employer may provide the information to the state-level representative.

(4) The exclusive bargaining representative may use the information provided under this section only for representation purposes.

(5) If an employer fails to comply with this section, the exclusive bargaining representative may bring a court action to enforce compliance. The court may order the employer to pay costs and reasonable attorneys' fees incurred by the exclusive bargaining representative.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 41.59 RCW to read as follows:

Section 1 of this act applies to this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 28B.52 RCW to read as follows:

Section 1 of this act applies to this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 41.80 RCW to read as follows:

Section 1 of this act applies to the following employers subject to this chapter:

(1) Western Washington University;

(2) Central Washington University;

(3) Eastern Washington University; and

(4) The Evergreen State College.

--- END ---