BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 42.17A.345 and 2019 c 428 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each commercial advertiser who has accepted or provided political advertising or electioneering communications during the election campaign shall maintain current books of account and related materials as provided by rule that shall be open for public inspection during normal business hours during the campaign and for a period of no less than five years after the date of the applicable election. The documents and books of account shall specify:

(a) The names and addresses of persons from whom it accepted political advertising or electioneering communications;

(b) The exact nature and extent of the services rendered; and

(c) The total cost and the manner of payment for the services.

(2) At the request of the commission, each commercial advertiser required to comply with subsection (1) of this section shall provide to the commission copies of the information that must be maintained and be open for public inspection pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

(3) Any person who purchases political advertising or electioneering communications from a commercial advertiser must disclose upon request from the commercial advertiser:

(a) That the purchase includes political advertising or electioneering communications;

(b) The name of the sponsor, if different than the person making the purchase; and

(c) Any other information the commercial advertiser is required to maintain, as provided by this section or rule.

(4) Any failure to provide the required information in subsection (3) of this section upon request is a violation under this chapter, but such failure shall not relieve a commercial advertiser of any of the requirements under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---