BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) Subject to amounts appropriated for this specific purpose in the omnibus operating appropriations act, the Washington State University extension energy program must conduct a study on the feasibility of recycling wind turbine blades installed at facilities in Washington that generate electricity for distribution to customers in Washington, including information and recommendations on:

(a) The cost, feasibility, and environmental impact of various disposal methods for wind turbine blades;

(b) The availability of wind turbine blade recycling and processing facilities in Washington and other states;

(c) Potential incentives for the creation of wind turbine blade recycling facilities within Washington;

(d) Various mechanisms for establishing recycling requirements, or recycled content standards, for wind turbine blades;

(e) Considerations and options for the design of a state-managed product stewardship program for wind turbine blades; and

(f) The feasibility of including all wind turbine blades installed in facilities in Washington in a recycling program, including blades that are currently installed.

(2) By December 1, 2023, the Washington State University extension energy program must submit a report of its findings under this section to the appropriate committees of the legislature.

(3) This section expires December 1, 2024.

--- END ---