BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 36.57A RCW to read as follows:

(1) A public transportation benefit area may obtain an easement for ferry terminal or docking facilities on, over, or across the beds of navigable waters that are under the jurisdiction of the department of natural resources. However, no easement payments are required for the easement.

(2) A public transportation benefit area may obtain an easement for ferry terminal or docking facilities on, over, or across harbor areas only when the areas are approved by the harbor line commission as a public place for public landings, wharves, or other public conveniences of commerce or navigation. No easement payments are required for the easement.

--- END ---