BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The office of career connect Washington is created within the student achievement council.

(2) The purpose of the office is to:

(a) Advance, promote, and coordinate the career connect Washington vision to create and sustain a statewide system for career connected learning that is demand-driven and leads Washington's residents towards a career pathway, and ensures residents obtain a postsecondary credential, economic self-sufficiency, and fulfillment;

(b) Lead and staff the career connected learning cross-agency work group established in RCW 28C.30.030 (as recodified by this act);

(c) In coordination with key stakeholders, measure performance of career connected activities including student enrollment, retention, completion, successful postcompletion outcomes, including employment status, wage levels, ongoing education enrollment, and degree completion, and closing equity gaps.

Sec. 2. RCW 28C.30.020 and 2019 c 406 s 57 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Career ((awareness and exploration" means programs,))explore" aligns with the requirements of the high school and beyond plan articulated in RCW 28A.230.090 including programs, activities, and events that provide early exposure to jobs and industries. (("Career awareness and exploration" are))Examples of "career explore" include structured programs that include job fairs, guest speakers, job shadows, jobsite tours, and other similar activities.

(2) "Career connected learning" ((means))is a learning experience that is integrated with work-related content and skills in the following three categories: (a) Career ((awareness and exploration))explore; (b) career ((preparation))prep; and (c) career launch. "Career connected learning" includes work-integrated learning and work-integrated experiences.

(3) "Career connected learning coordinators" are the full-time equivalent employees in each of the nine educational service districts working in coordination with the office of the superintendent of public instruction to support the expansion of career connected learning opportunities.

(4)(a) "Career launch ((programs" means))" are state registered apprenticeships and programs that combine the following three elements:

(i) Supervised paid work experience;

(ii) Aligned classroom learning to academic and employer standards. For career launch ((programs)) involving the K-12 system, aligned classroom learning must meet educational requirements and standards of the office of the superintendent of public instruction; and

(iii) Culmination in a ((valuable)) credential ((beyond a high school diploma or forty-five))with demonstrated value to industry as established through the career launch endorsement process established in RCW 28C.30.040 (as recodified by this act) or 45 college credits towards a two-year or four-year postsecondary credential and preparation for employment.

(b) "Career launch ((programs))" includes the elements in (a) of this subsection and may be achieved through, but are not limited to, one or more of the following:

(i) State registered apprenticeships as approved by the Washington state apprenticeship and training council at the department of labor and industries;

(ii) A state-approved career and technical education sequence of courses or program of study that include requirements in alignment with RCW 28A.700.030;

(((ii)))(iii) A qualifying degree or credential earned through a community or technical college or university.

(c) "Career launch ((programs))" may be initiated in a secondary education system and completed in a postsecondary education system, or first year of paid employment, as long as all parties jointly plan the program.

(d) "Career launch ((programs))" must be endorsed through the process created under RCW 28C.30.040(1)(a) (as recodified by this act).

(((4)))(5) "Career ((preparation programs" means programs that give students hands-on skills and knowledge experience within a particular business, career track, or industry, and help prepare students to work in a professional setting. "Career preparation programs" include career and technical education courses, on-site internships, preapprenticeship programs, and other similar opportunities))prep" are programs that provide students with introductory knowledge, skills, and/or abilities specific to high-demand industry sectors or career pathways; educate students on the necessary training or process required to enter entry-level positions or complete further training or education within the industry sector or pathway; and ensure students can make an informed decision about whether to continue training within the industry sector or pathway. "Career prep" includes any sequences of career and technical education courses that meet the requirements outlined in RCW 28A.655.250, or may include other career and technical education courses, on-site internships, state recognized apprenticeship preparation programs, and other similar opportunities. "Career prep" does not include apprenticeship preparation programs in apprenticeable occupations that are not state recognized pursuant to RCW 28B.117.020(11).

(((5)))(6) "Complete Washington" means the program established in the 2018 omnibus operating appropriations act, section 117, chapter 299, Laws of 2018, for the purpose of connecting prior learning with postsecondary degree completion.

(((6)))(7) "Industry sector leaders" may include industry associations, centers of excellence, workforce development organizations, community-based organizations, and other entities that demonstrate the ability to implement career connected activities within a targeted industry sector.

(8) "Office" means the office of career connect Washington created in section 1 of this act.

(9) "Work group" means the career connected learning cross-agency work group established in RCW 28C.30.030 (as recodified by this act).

(((7)))(10) "Work-integrated learning" has the meaning provided in RCW 28A.630.135.

Sec. 3. RCW 28C.30.030 and 2019 c 406 s 54 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((Within existing resources, a))A career connected learning cross-agency work group is established ((to scale up and expand high quality career connected learning opportunities in communities across the state.

(2) The purpose of the work group is to coordinate agency functions and external partnerships and carry out the duties and responsibilities set forth in RCW 28C.30.040.

(3) The governor shall select the chair of the work group.

(4) The governor's office may consult or contract with entities with expertise in industry and education partnerships to provide staffing support and guidance on industry talent needs. The governor's office may convene additional ad hoc committees that include industry sector advisory groups and leaders including, but not limited to, high-level representatives from education, industry, philanthropy, as well as students, parents, and community partners.

(5))). The purpose of the work group is to:

(a) Advance and promote the career connect Washington vision to create a statewide system for career connected learning;

(b) Coordinate agency collaboration and participation in career connected learning activities;

(c) In coordination with institutions of higher education, the state board for community and technical colleges, and the K-12 sector, develop strategies to scale up and expand high quality career connected learning opportunities in communities across the state; and

(d) Jointly develop strategies to ensure career connected pathways are accessible and equitable.

(2) The office shall staff the work group.

(3) The work group must consist of, but is not limited to, representatives from the following offices and agencies:

(a) The department of labor and industries in consultation with the regulatory apprenticeship council under RCW 49.04.010;

(b) The department of social and health services, including the division of vocational rehabilitation;

(c) The work-integrated learning advisory committee established in RCW 28A.300.196 or its successor;

(d) The education research and data center at the office of financial management;

(e) The employment security department;

(f) The office of the superintendent of public instruction;

(g) The state board of education;

(h) The state board for community and technical colleges;

(i) ((The student achievement council;

(j))) The workforce training and education coordinating board;

(((k) One representative of the public baccalaureate institutions;

(l)))(j) An organization representing the presidents of the public, four-year institutions of higher education;

(k) One representative of the independent four-year institutions of higher education;

(((m)))(l) The department of children, youth, and families;

(((n)))(m) The office of Native education at the office of the superintendent of public instruction;

(n) The department of commerce;

(o) The department of corrections;

(p) The department of services for the blind;

(q) The department of transportation;

(r) The department of natural resources;

(s) The governor's office of equity;

(t) The governor's office of Indian affairs;

(u) The Washington state labor council and the Washington state building and construction trades council;

(v) The office of the lieutenant governor; and

(((o)))(w) The office of the governor.

(((6)))(4) The ((office of the governor))designated chair may establish subcommittees of the work group to plan and execute the duties and responsibilities under RCW 28C.30.040 (as recodified by this act).

(((7)))(5) The work group shall:

(a) Coordinate its strategies and actions related to the common schools with the recommendations of the work-integrated learning advisory committee;

(b) Support and promote the work of the career connected learning coordinators, regional networks, and industry sector leaders;

(c) Coordinate the joint development of an annual work plan of each office or state agency in the work group that includes intended goals and indicators to measure progress as it relates to administering career connected learning access and completion. Each office or state agency shall share relevant data and work plans, and report on progress to the office and the work group;

(d) Meet at least ((six))four times during the calendar year; and

(((c)))(e) Report progress to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by ((September 1st)) November 1st annually.

Sec. 4. RCW 28C.30.040 and 2019 c 406 s 55 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((career connected learning cross-agency work group established in RCW 28C.30.030 shall have))office shall consult with the work group to carry out the following duties and responsibilities:

(1) Advance and promote the career connect Washington vision to create a statewide system for career connected learning and the need for joint action as follows:

(a) Create, and periodically update, clear guidance for endorsing career launch ((programs)) to guide quality assurance for the purpose of expanding enrollments ((by August 1, 2019. Registered apprenticeships as approved by the Washington apprenticeship and training council at the department of labor and industries are considered endorsed career launch programs));

(b) Prioritize activities including coordinating cross-agency and industry sector leadership to advance strategic priorities;

(c) Implement a marketing and communications agenda;

(d) ((Mobilize))Support and mobilize private sector and philanthropic leadership and resources to support system building;

(e) Build systemic functions in key agencies and existing systems;

(f) Create and consistently update a statewide inventory ((that identifies existing support programs to promote equitable participation in career connected learning, including resources for populations to reengage with educational opportunities;

(g)))of career connected learning programs that identifies student support programs;

(g) Make available resources and information to populations to reengage with educational opportunities to ensure equitable access to and participation in career connected learning programs in coordination with the agencies and organizations listed in RCW 28C.30.030(3) (as recodified by this act) to avoid duplicative efforts;

(h) Develop websites and other resources, and coordinate current resources managed by the workforce training and education coordinating board, the student achievement council, the department of labor and industries, and the employment security department, to inform students, employers, and the public about career connected learning opportunities;

(((h)))(i) Develop financial and other support services to increase access and success in career connected learning for students facing barriers or living in underserved communities;

(((i)))(j) Address transfer and articulation issues to ensure career launch ((program)) participants receive high school and college credit in programs initiated in K-12 or dropout reengagement programs, or college credit in postsecondary programs and state registered apprenticeships, and work to expand the portability of credits to the maximum extent possible;

(((j)))(k) With respect to the portability of credit for the purposes of postsecondary degree attainment, the career connected learning (([cross-agency]))cross-agency work group shall coordinate when appropriate with the complete Washington program;

(((k)))(l) Establish clear targets for equity to guide state data development and action by regional partners related to program design and expansion, including specific equity-focused criteria within grant funding processes and strategies; and

(((l)))(m) Develop data systems and protocols for career connected learning planning and evaluation purposes;

(2) By September 1, 2019, and by each September 1st thereafter, make budget recommendations to the office of financial management, to direct resources to education programs for career connected learning as follows:

(a) Support the K-12 system and the office of the superintendent of public instruction to increase student participation in career connected learning and work-integrated learning programs that include career ((awareness and exploration))explore, career ((preparation))prep, and career launch;

(b) Support expansion of innovative program design in state registered apprenticeships, year-round and summer programs, and equitable access to dual credit;

(c) Support two-year and four-year institutions of higher education to expand career connected learning enrollments, and specifically:

(i) Build capacity at community and technical colleges to support innovative design in career launch ((and registered apprenticeship programs)), as well as program participation by high school graduates or out-of-school youth;

(ii) Align the use of work-study to support career launch ((and registered apprenticeship programs)); and

(iii) Clarify financial aid eligibility and exclusions from financial aid caps for career launch ((and registered apprenticeship programs));

(d) Promote innovation in equivalency and credentialing within endorsed career launch ((and registered apprenticeship programs));

(e) Expand the number of portable credits and credit for prior learning to ensure that career launch ((programs)) transfer for high school or college credit to the maximum extent possible; and

(f) Support the state registered apprenticeship system and the department of labor and industries to build capacity to expand state registered apprenticeship and ((preapprenticeship))state recognized apprenticeship preparation programs;

(3) Support regional leadership, ((program intermediaries))industry sector leaders, and career connected learning and work-integrated learning navigation and coordination to expand participation in career connected learning and work-integrated learning opportunities and the implementation of the career connected learning grant program established in RCW 28C.30.050 (as recodified by this act);

(4) Support the formation and operation of regional networks in both rural and urban areas to guide career connected learning and work-integrated learning opportunities that are both tailored to the local needs of students and employers, and designed for portable credentials across education settings and across an industry; and

(5) Develop and maintain a data enclave for career connected learning and work-integrated learning to measure progress and ensure equity of opportunity for career connected learning and work-integrated learning, ((led))hosted and maintained by the education research and data center at the office of financial management, as follows:

(a) Develop ((program codes for career connected learning and work-integrated learning opportunities in K-12 and postsecondary education in order to track those programs that are designated as career connected learning programs for each of the three categories set forth in the definition of "career connected learning" in RCW 28C.30.020; and

(b) Collect and disaggregate program participation and outcomes data by race, gender, income, rurality, ability, foster youth, homeless youth, English language learner, and other relevant categories))and maintain program identification codes for K-12 and postsecondary career explore, career prep, and career launch in order to track and evaluate each program, region, sector, and to analyze individual student enrollments, persistence, and completions;

(b) Collect student identification information, that includes student access, enrollment, persistence, and completion metrics, and demographic data that includes, but is not limited to, race, gender, income, rurality, disability, foster youth, homeless youth, and English language learner;

(6) Develop and maintain a public facing dashboard updated each year by January 10th to ensure transparency and access regarding program outcomes, regional impact, and progress towards statewide enrollment and completion goals;

(7) Oversee and administer or develop an interagency agreement with any state agency to administer any work stream associated with implementation of career connect Washington including the career connected learning grant program established in RCW 28C.30.050 (as recodified by this act); and

(8) Lead and staff the career connected learning cross-agency work group established in RCW 28C.30.030 (as recodified by this act).

The office may consult or contract with entities with expertise in business, labor, and education partnerships to provide strategic guidance and staffing support necessary to carry out these duties. The office may convene additional ad hoc committees that include industry sector advisory groups and leaders including, but not limited to, high-level representatives from education, industry, philanthropy, as well as students, parents, and community partners.

Sec. 5. RCW 28C.30.050 and 2019 c 411 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the career connected learning grant program is established as a competitive grant program to advance the career connect Washington vision under RCW 28C.30.040 (as recodified by this act). ((The employment security department shall administer the program. The governor's office shall work with the employment security department to establish grant criteria and guide the process for selection with consultation from the career connected learning cross-agency work group.))

(2) The purpose of the career connected learning grant program is to create career connected learning opportunities, including career ((awareness and exploration))explore, career ((preparation))prep, and career launch ((programs)), that are ((both)) tailored to the local needs of students and employers and designed so that students may receive high school or ((college))postsecondary credit across industries and regions of the state to the maximum extent possible.

(3) The program funds shall be used for ((two))three overarching purposes:

(a) Support regional career connected learning and work-integrated learning networks in both rural and urban areas under subsection (5) of this section; ((and))

(b) Support career connected learning program ((intermediaries))builders working within and across regions who partner with multiple employers, labor partners, and educational institutions, work with K-12 and postsecondary career representatives to develop curricula for new and innovative programs, and scale existing career ((awareness and exploration))explore, career ((preparation))prep, and endorsed career launch ((programs)); and

(c) Support industry sector leaders that will identify employers' workforce needs and in collaboration with career connected learning partners, implement sector strategies.

(4) The program administrator shall ((consult with the governor's office and the career connected learning cross-agency work group established in RCW 28C.30.030 to develop a formal request for proposal for both the regional career connected learning and work-integrated learning networks and the program intermediaries))make competitive awards for career connected learning programs and other activities.

(5)(a) Proposals for regional career connected learning and work-integrated learning networks ((and intermediaries)) may be sought from applicants within the geographic areas of the nine educational service districts. Successful applicants shall convene and manage regional, cross-industry networks that will lead to the expansion of career connected learning opportunities.

(b) Regional career connected learning and work-integrated learning network applicants must demonstrate regional knowledge and status as a trusted partner of industry and education stakeholders, a track record of success with career connected learning and aligned initiatives, and a commitment to equity. Regional career connected learning networks may include, but are not limited to, regional education networks, school districts, educational service districts, higher education institutions, workforce development councils, chambers of commerce, industry associations, joint labor management councils, multiemployer training partnerships, economic development councils, and nonprofit organizations.

(6)(a) Eligible program ((intermediary))builder applicants may include, but are not limited to, new or existing industry associations, joint labor management councils, regional networks, career technical student organizations, postsecondary education and training institutions working with multiple employer partners, state agencies, and other community-based organizations and expanded learning partners.

(((7)))(b) Program ((intermediaries))builders must work with appropriate faculty and staff at the state universities, the regional universities, ((and)) the state college, other postsecondary representatives, and K-12 education representatives, to expand the number of career launch ((program)) credits that may be articulated and transferred to postsecondary degree programs.

(((8)))(7) Eligible industry sector leaders must demonstrate strong employer relationships and engagement and show knowledge of industry sector needs as it relates to career connected learning pathways including, but not limited to:

(a) Identification of specific occupations in demand and anticipated to be in demand in the future;

(b) Identification of specific skills, education, training, or credentials needed for occupations; and

(c) Identification of or development of specific programs needed to provide the necessary skills, education, training, or credentials.

(8) Eligible industry sector leader applicants may include, but are not limited to, industry associations, joint labor management councils, multiemployer training partnerships, higher education institutions, and centers of excellence established pursuant to RCW 28B.50.902.

(9) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the employment security department, as the administrator of the program, has the authority to utilize funds deposited in the career connected learning account for the purposes of the program.

(((9) During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the employment security department must provide sufficient funding from amounts appropriated for the program to the office of the superintendent of public instruction to provide a grant to each of the nine educational service districts for costs of employing one full-time equivalent employee to support the expansion of career connected learning opportunities.))

Sec. 6. RCW 28C.30.060 and 2019 c 406 s 59 are each amended to read as follows:

The career connected learning account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from ((public or)) private sources provided for the purpose of funding grants under RCW 28C.30.050 (as recodified by this act) must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for career connected learning grants.

Sec. 7. RCW 28C.30.070 and 2019 c 406 s 58 are each amended to read as follows:

Where applicable, career ((awareness and exploration))explore, career connected learning, career launch ((programs)), and career ((preparation programs))prep are subject to RCW 49.12.121 and 49.12.123 regarding employing minors.

Sec. 8. RCW 28B.77.005 and 2021 c 134 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The student achievement council is created.

(2) The council is composed of ((10))12 voting members as provided in this subsection.

(a) ((Six))Eight citizen members shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate. One of the citizen members shall be an undergraduate student and one shall be a graduate student. The citizen members shall also include a representative from each of the following groups: A worker representative, a representative of the business community, a representative of a local community or region dedicated to career connected learning pathways, and a tribal representative. The citizen members shall be selected based on their knowledge of or experience in higher education. At least two of the citizen members shall have direct experience with career connected learning programs and/or pathways, including state registered apprenticeship. In making appointments to the council, the governor shall give consideration to citizens representing ((labor, business,)) women((,)) and racial and ethnic minorities, as well as geographic representation, to ensure that the council's membership reflects the state's diverse ((population))communities. The citizen members shall serve for four-year terms except for each of the student members, who shall serve for two years; however, the terms of the initial members and the undergraduate and graduate student members shall be staggered.

(b) A representative of an independent nonprofit higher education institution as defined in RCW 28B.07.020, selected by an association of independent nonprofit baccalaureate degree-granting institutions. The representative appointed under this subsection (2)(b) shall excuse himself or herself from voting on matters relating primarily to public institutions of higher education.

(c) Chosen for their recognized ability and innovative leadership experience in broad education policy and system design, a representative of each of the following shall be selected by the respective organizations, who shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing organizations:

(i) A representative of the four-year institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, selected by the presidents of those institutions;

(ii) A representative of the state's community and technical college system, selected by the state board for community and technical colleges; and

(iii) A representative of the state's K-12 education system, selected by the superintendent of public instruction in consultation with the department of children, youth, and families and the state board of education. The representative appointed under this subsection (2)(c)(iii) shall excuse himself or herself from voting on matters relating primarily to institutions of higher education.

(3) The chair shall be selected by the council from among the citizen members appointed to the council. The chair shall serve a one-year term but may serve more than one term if selected to do so by the membership.

(4) The council may create advisory committees on an ad hoc basis for the purpose of obtaining input from students, faculty, and higher education experts and practitioners, citizens, business and industry, and labor, and for the purpose of informing their research, policy, and programmatic functions. Ad hoc advisory committees addressing secondary to postsecondary transitions and university and college admissions requirements must include K-12 sector representatives including teachers, school directors, principals, administrators, and others as the council may direct, in addition to higher education representatives. The council shall maintain a contact list of K-12 and higher education stakeholder organizations to provide notices to stakeholders regarding the purposes of ad hoc advisory committees, timelines for planned work, means for participation, and a statement of desired outcomes.

(5) Any vacancies on the council shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments. Appointments to fill vacancies shall be only for such terms as remain unexpired. Any vacancies among council members appointed by the governor shall be filled by the governor subject to confirmation by the senate and shall have full authority to act before the time the senate acts on their confirmation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. RCW 28C.30.020, 28C.30.030, 28C.30.040, 28C.30.050, 28C.30.060, and 28C.30.070 are recodified as sections in chapter 28B.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 10 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. Section 1 of this act constitutes a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

--- END ---