BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.61.710 and 2019 c 214 s 19 and 2019 c 170 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) No person shall operate a moped upon the highways of this state unless the moped has been assigned a moped registration number and displays a moped permit in accordance with RCW 46.16A.405(2).

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a moped may not be operated on a bicycle path or trail, bikeway, equestrian trail, or hiking or recreational trail.

(3) Operation of a moped, electric personal assistive mobility device, or motorized foot scooter on a fully controlled limited access highway is unlawful. Operation of a personal delivery device on any part of a highway other than a sidewalk or crosswalk is unlawful, except as provided in RCW 46.61.240(2) and 46.61.250(2). Operation of a moped on a sidewalk is unlawful. Operation of a motorized foot scooter or class 3 electric-assisted bicycle on a sidewalk is unlawful, unless there is no alternative for a motorized foot scooter or a class 3 electric-assisted bicycle to travel over a sidewalk as part of a bicycle or pedestrian path, or if authorized by local ordinance, as provided in RCW 46.61.715.

(4) Removal of any muffling device or pollution control device from a moped is unlawful.

(5) Subsections (1), (2), and (4) of this section do not apply to electric-assisted bicycles.

(6) Electric-assisted bicycles and motorized foot scooters may have access to highways of the state and may be parked to the same extent as bicycles, subject to RCW 46.61.160.

(7) Subject to subsection (10) of this section, class 1 and class 2 electric-assisted bicycles and motorized foot scooters may be operated on a shared-use path or any part of a highway designated for the use of bicycles, but local jurisdictions or state agencies may restrict or otherwise limit the access of electric-assisted bicycles and motorized foot scooters, and local jurisdictions or state agencies may regulate the use of class 1 and class 2 electric-assisted bicycles and motorized foot scooters on facilities, properties, and rights-of-way under their jurisdiction and control. Local regulation of the operation of class 1 or class 2 electric-assisted bicycles, upon a shared use path designated for the use of bicycles that crosses jurisdictional boundaries of two or more local jurisdictions, must be consistent for the entire shared use path in order for the local regulation to be enforceable; however, this does not apply to local regulations of a shared use path in effect as of January 1, 2018.

(8) Class 3 electric-assisted bicycles may be operated on facilities that are within or adjacent to a highway. Class 3 electric-assisted bicycles may not be operated on a shared-use path, except where local jurisdictions may allow the use of class 3 electric-assisted bicycles. ((State))Subject to subsection (9) of this section, state agencies or local jurisdictions may regulate the use of class 3 electric-assisted bicycles on facilities and properties under their jurisdiction and control. Local regulation of the operation of class 3 electric-assisted bicycles, upon a shared use path designated for the use of bicycles that crosses jurisdictional boundaries of two or more local jurisdictions, must be consistent for the entire shared use path in order for the local regulation to be enforceable; however, this does not apply to local regulations of a shared use path in effect as of January 1, 2018.

(9)(a)(i)(A) An agency having jurisdiction over a trail that is specifically designated as nonmotorized, has a natural surface tread that is made by clearing and grading the native soil with no added surfacing materials, and is open to bicycles must allow the operation of electric-assisted bicycles as defined in RCW 46.04.169, and consider an electric-assisted bicycle as a nonmotorized vehicle, on the trail to the same extent a bicycle is allowed to be operated upon the trail.

(B) Such agency having jurisdiction over the trail may close the trail to bicycles, including electric-assisted bicycles, to protect wildlife or natural resources or, if necessary, preserve public safety. Such a closure must be made through an open public process by the agency having jurisdiction.

(ii) An agency having jurisdiction over a road closed to motorized vehicles but where nonmotorized access to such roads for bicycles is allowed must also allow the operation of electric-assisted bicycles as defined in RCW 46.04.169 and treat them as a nonmotorized vehicle.

(iii) A person operating an electric-assisted bicycle on a trail or closed road where bicycle use is permitted as authorized under this subsection (9)(a) shall obey all speed limits, yield the right-of-way to pedestrians, and carry on their person an electric-assisted bicycle pass as required under section 2 of this act.

(iv) For purposes of this subsection, "agency" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 79A.80.010.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in this section, an individual shall not operate ((an electric-assisted bicycle or))a motorized foot scooter on a trail that is specifically designated as nonmotorized and that has a natural surface tread that is made by clearing and grading the native soil with no added surfacing materials. A local authority or agency of this state having jurisdiction over a trail described in this subsection may allow the operation of ((an electric-assisted bicycle or))a motorized foot scooter on that trail.

(10) Subsections (1) and (4) of this section do not apply to motorized foot scooters. Subsection (2) of this section applies to motorized foot scooters when the bicycle path, trail, bikeway, equestrian trail, or hiking or recreational trail was built or is maintained with federal highway transportation funds. Additionally, any new trail or bicycle path or readily identifiable existing trail or bicycle path not built or maintained with federal highway transportation funds may be used by persons operating motorized foot scooters only when signed to allow motorized foot scooter use.

(11) A person operating an electric personal assistive mobility device (EPAMD) shall obey all speed limits and shall yield the right-of-way to pedestrians and human-powered devices at all times. An operator must also give an audible signal before overtaking and passing a pedestrian. Except for the limitations of this subsection, persons operating an EPAMD have all the rights and duties of a pedestrian.

(12) The use of an EPAMD may be regulated in the following circumstances:

(a) A municipality and the department of transportation may prohibit the operation of an EPAMD on public highways within their respective jurisdictions where the speed limit is greater than ((twenty-five))25 miles per hour;

(b) A municipality may restrict the speed of an EPAMD in locations with congested pedestrian or nonmotorized traffic and where there is significant speed differential between pedestrians or nonmotorized traffic and EPAMD operators. The areas in this subsection must be designated by the city engineer or designee of the municipality. Municipalities shall not restrict the speed of an EPAMD in the entire community or in areas in which there is infrequent pedestrian traffic;

(c) A state agency or local government may regulate the operation of an EPAMD within the boundaries of any area used for recreation, open space, habitat, trails, or conservation purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 79A.80 RCW to read as follows:

(1) An electric-assisted bicycle pass is required for any person to operate an electric-assisted bicycle on agency facilities as authorized in RCW 46.61.710(9)(a). An electric-assisted bicycle pass may be made available for purchase:

(a) Through vendors under contract with one or more of the agencies. The agencies may provide vendors with electric-assisted bicycle passes at the sales price established under subsection (2) of this section; or

(b) From the department of licensing as provided in RCW 46.01.370.

(2) The cost of an electric-assisted bicycle pass is $5. All revenue from the purchase of an electric-assisted bicycle pass must be deposited in the electric-assisted bicycle account created in section 3 of this act.

(3)(a) An electric-assisted bicycle pass is valid for one year beginning from the date that the pass is marked for activation.

(b) A pass is valid only for use with one electric-assisted bicycle at a time and must be carried on the person operating the electric-assisted bicycle.

(c)(i) Failure to comply with (a) or (b) of this subsection is a natural resource infraction under chapter 7.84 RCW. An agency is authorized to issue a notice of infraction to any person who fails to comply with (a) or (b) of this subsection.

(ii) The penalty for failure to comply with the requirements of (a) or (b) of this subsection is $99. This penalty may be reduced to $59 if an individual provides proof of purchase of an electric-assisted bicycle pass to the court within 15 days after the issuance of the notice of violation. The county treasurer shall remit 75 percent of the money received under this subsection to the state treasurer for deposit into the electric-assisted bicycle account created in section 3 of this act. The balance of noninterest money received by the county treasurer must be deposited in the county current expense fund.

(iii) Penalty amounts received must be deposited into the electric-assisted bicycle account created in section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 79A.80 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The electric-assisted bicycle account is created in the state treasury. All moneys received from the sale of the electronic-assisted bicycle pass and penalty amounts under section 2 of this act must be deposited into the account. Each fiscal biennium, all revenues to the account must be distributed equally among the agencies for the purposes described under subsection (2) of this section.

(2) Expenditures from the electric-assisted bicycle account may only be used for:

(a) Maintenance of facilities described in RCW 46.61.710(9)(a) (i) and (iii);

(b) Signage that describes speed limits and other rules for operating an electric-assisted bicycle on the facilities described in RCW 46.61.710(9)(a) (i) and (iii); and

(c) Educational materials on the use of electric-assisted bicycles on the facilities described in RCW 46.61.710(9)(a) (i) and (iii).

Sec. 4. RCW 46.01.370 and 2012 c 261 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The department may, in coordination with the state parks and recreation commission, offer for sale and distribute discover passes ((and)), day-use permits, and electric-assisted bicycle passes, as provided in chapter 79A.80 RCW, at the department's drivers' licenses offices. Any amounts collected by the department through the sales of discover passes and day-use permits must be deposited in the recreation access pass account created in RCW 79A.80.090. Any amounts collected by the department through the sales of electric-assisted bicycle passes must be deposited in the electric-assisted bicycle account created in section 3 of this act.

Sec. 5. RCW 43.84.092 and 2022 c 182 s 403 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state treasury.

(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The abandoned recreational vehicle disposal account, the aeronautics account, the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account, the ambulance transport fund, the brownfield redevelopment trust fund account, the budget stabilization account, the capital vessel replacement account, the capitol building construction account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the Chehalis basin account, the Chehalis basin taxable account, the cleanup settlement account, the climate active transportation account, the climate transit programs account, the Columbia river basin water supply development account, the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia river basin water supply revenue recovery account, the common school construction fund, the community forest trust account, the connecting Washington account, the county arterial preservation account, the county criminal justice assistance account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of licensing services account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the developmental disabilities community services account, the diesel idle reduction account, the drinking water assistance account, the administrative subaccount of the drinking water assistance account, the early learning facilities development account, the early learning facilities revolving account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the education construction fund, the education legacy trust account, the election account, the electric-assisted bicycle account, the electric vehicle account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the fair start for kids account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the fish, wildlife, and conservation account, the freight mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective fund, the public health services account, the state higher education construction account, the higher education construction account, the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the highway safety fund, the hospital safety net assessment fund, the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the limited fish and wildlife account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the marine resources stewardship trust account, the medical aid account, the money-purchase retirement savings administrative account, the money-purchase retirement savings principal account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the move ahead WA account, the move ahead WA flexible account, the multimodal transportation account, the multiuse roadway safety account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the pilotage account, the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan revolving account, the public health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the Puget Sound Gateway facility account, the Puget Sound taxpayer accountability account, the real estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional mobility grant program account, the resource management cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural mobility grant program account, the rural Washington loan fund, the sexual assault prevention and response account, the site closure account, the skilled nursing facility safety net trust fund, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol highway account, the state reclamation revolving account, the state route number 520 civil penalties account, the state route number 520 corridor account, the statewide broadband account, the statewide tourism marketing account, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the toll facility bond retirement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the transportation future funding program account, the transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the voluntary cleanup account, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the vulnerable roadway user education account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving administration account, the water pollution control revolving fund, the Western Washington University capital projects account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation revenue recovery account, and the Yakima integrated plan implementation taxable bond account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.

(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.

(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 6. RCW 43.84.092 and 2022 c 182 s 404 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state treasury.

(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The abandoned recreational vehicle disposal account, the aeronautics account, the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account, the brownfield redevelopment trust fund account, the budget stabilization account, the capital vessel replacement account, the capitol building construction account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the Chehalis basin account, the Chehalis basin taxable account, the cleanup settlement account, the climate active transportation account, the climate transit programs account, the Columbia river basin water supply development account, the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia river basin water supply revenue recovery account, the common school construction fund, the community forest trust account, the connecting Washington account, the county arterial preservation account, the county criminal justice assistance account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of licensing services account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the developmental disabilities community services account, the diesel idle reduction account, the drinking water assistance account, the administrative subaccount of the drinking water assistance account, the early learning facilities development account, the early learning facilities revolving account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the education construction fund, the education legacy trust account, the election account, the electric-assisted bicycle account, the electric vehicle account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the fair start for kids account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the fish, wildlife, and conservation account, the freight mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective fund, the public health services account, the state higher education construction account, the higher education construction account, the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the highway safety fund, the hospital safety net assessment fund, the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the limited fish and wildlife account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the marine resources stewardship trust account, the medical aid account, the money-purchase retirement savings administrative account, the money-purchase retirement savings principal account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the move ahead WA account, the move ahead WA flexible account, the multimodal transportation account, the multiuse roadway safety account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the pilotage account, the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan revolving account, the public health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the Puget Sound Gateway facility account, the Puget Sound taxpayer accountability account, the real estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional mobility grant program account, the resource management cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural mobility grant program account, the rural Washington loan fund, the sexual assault prevention and response account, the site closure account, the skilled nursing facility safety net trust fund, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol highway account, the state reclamation revolving account, the state route number 520 civil penalties account, the state route number 520 corridor account, the statewide broadband account, the statewide tourism marketing account, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the toll facility bond retirement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the transportation future funding program account, the transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the voluntary cleanup account, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the vulnerable roadway user education account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving administration account, the water pollution control revolving fund, the Western Washington University capital projects account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation revenue recovery account, and the Yakima integrated plan implementation taxable bond account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.

(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.

(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. Section 5 of this act expires July 1, 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. Section 6 of this act takes effect July 1, 2024.

--- END ---