BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.43.837 and 2022 c 297 s 954 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, in order to determine the character, competence, and suitability of any applicant or service provider to have unsupervised access, the secretary of the department of social and health services and the secretary of the department of children, youth, and families may require a fingerprint-based background check through both the Washington state patrol and the federal bureau of investigation at any time, but shall require a fingerprint-based background check when the applicant or service provider has resided in the state less than three consecutive years before application, and:

(a) Is an applicant or service provider providing services to children or people with developmental disabilities under RCW 74.15.030;

(b) Is an individual sixteen years of age or older who: (i) Is not under the placement and care authority of the department of children, youth, and families; and (ii) resides in an applicant or service provider's home, facility, entity, agency, or business or who is authorized by the department of children, youth, and families to provide services to children under RCW 74.15.030;

(c) Is an individual who is authorized by the department of social and health services to provide services to people with developmental disabilities under RCW 74.15.030; or

(d) Is an applicant or service provider providing in-home services funded by:

(i) Medicaid personal care under RCW 74.09.520;

(ii) Community options program entry system waiver services under RCW 74.39A.030;

(iii) Chore services under RCW 74.39A.110; or

(iv) Other home and community long-term care programs, established pursuant to chapters 74.39 and 74.39A RCW, administered by the department of social and health services.

(2) Long-term care workers, as defined in RCW 74.39A.009, who are hired after January 7, 2012, are subject to background checks under RCW 74.39A.056.

(3) To satisfy the shared background check requirements provided for in RCW 43.216.270 and 43.20A.710, the department of children, youth, and families and the department of social and health services shall share federal fingerprint-based background check results as permitted under the law. The purpose of this provision is to allow both departments to fulfill their joint background check responsibility of checking any individual who may have unsupervised access to vulnerable adults, children, or juveniles. Neither department may share the federal background check results with any other state agency or person.

(4) The secretary of the department of children, youth, and families shall require a fingerprint-based background check through the Washington state patrol identification and criminal history section and the federal bureau of investigation when the department seeks to approve an applicant or service provider for a foster or adoptive placement of children in accordance with federal and state law. Fees charged by the Washington state patrol and the federal bureau of investigation for fingerprint-based background checks shall be paid by the department of children, youth, and families for ((applicant))foster care and child care applicants and service providers ((providing foster care as required in RCW 74.15.030)).

(5) Any secure facility operated by the department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families under chapter 71.09 RCW shall require applicants and service providers to undergo a fingerprint-based background check through the Washington state patrol identification and criminal history section and the federal bureau of investigation.

(6) Service providers and service provider applicants, except for those long-term care workers exempted in subsection (2) of this section, who are required to complete a fingerprint-based background check may be hired for a one hundred twenty-day provisional period as allowed under law or program rules when:

(a) A fingerprint-based background check is pending; and

(b) The applicant or service provider is not disqualified based on the immediate result of the background check.

(7) Fees charged by the Washington state patrol and the federal bureau of investigation for fingerprint-based background checks shall be paid by the applicable department for applicants or service providers providing:

(a) Services to people with a developmental disability under RCW 74.15.030;

(b) In-home services funded by medicaid personal care under RCW 74.09.520;

(c) Community options program entry system waiver services under RCW 74.39A.030;

(d) Chore services under RCW 74.39A.110;

(e) Services under other home and community long-term care programs, established pursuant to chapters 74.39 and 74.39A RCW, administered by the department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families;

(f) Services in, or to residents of, a secure facility under RCW 71.09.115; and

(g) For fiscal year 2023, applicants for child care and early learning services to children under RCW 43.216.270.

(8) ((Service providers licensed under RCW 74.15.030 must pay fees charged by the Washington state patrol and the federal bureau of investigation for conducting fingerprint-based background checks.

(9) Department of children, youth, and families service providers licensed under RCW 74.15.030 may not pass on the cost of the background check fees to their applicants unless the individual is determined to be disqualified due to the background information.

(10))) The department of social and health services and the department of children, youth, and families shall develop rules identifying the financial responsibility of service providers, applicants, and the department for paying the fees charged by law enforcement to roll, print, or scan fingerprints-based for the purpose of a Washington state patrol or federal bureau of investigation fingerprint-based background check.

(((11)))(9) For purposes of this section, unless the context plainly indicates otherwise:

(a) "Applicant" means a current or prospective department of social and health services, department of children, youth, and families, or service provider employee, volunteer, student, intern, researcher, contractor, or any other individual who will or may have unsupervised access because of the nature of the work or services he or she provides. "Applicant" includes but is not limited to any individual who will or may have unsupervised access and is:

(i) Applying for a license or certification from the department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families;

(ii) Seeking a contract with the department of social and health services, the department of children, youth, and families, or a service provider;

(iii) Applying for employment, promotion, reallocation, or transfer;

(iv) An individual that a department of social and health services or department of children, youth, and families client or guardian of a department of social and health services or department of children, youth, and families client chooses to hire or engage to provide services to himself or herself or another vulnerable adult, juvenile, or child and who might be eligible to receive payment from the department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families for services rendered; or

(v) A department of social and health services or department of children, youth, and families applicant who will or may work in a department-covered position.

(b) "Authorized" means the department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families grants an applicant, home, or facility permission to:

(i) Conduct licensing, certification, or contracting activities;

(ii) Have unsupervised access to vulnerable adults, juveniles, and children;

(iii) Receive payments from a department of social and health services or department of children, youth, and families program; or

(iv) Work or serve in a department of social and health services or department of children, youth, and families-covered position.

(c) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of social and health services.

(d) "Secure facility" has the meaning provided in RCW 71.09.020.

(e) "Service provider" means entities, facilities, agencies, businesses, or individuals who are licensed, certified, authorized, or regulated by, receive payment from, or have contracts or agreements with the department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families to provide services to vulnerable adults, juveniles, or children. "Service provider" includes individuals whom a department of social and health services or department of children, youth, and families client or guardian of a department of social and health services or department of children, youth, and families client may choose to hire or engage to provide services to himself or herself or another vulnerable adult, juvenile, or child and who might be eligible to receive payment from the department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families for services rendered.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.216.270 and 2022 c 297 s 960 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) In determining whether an individual is of appropriate character, suitability, and competence to provide child care and early learning services to children, the department may consider the history of past involvement of child protective services or law enforcement agencies with the individual for the purpose of establishing a pattern of conduct, behavior, or inaction with regard to the health, safety, or welfare of a child. No report of child abuse or neglect that has been destroyed or expunged under RCW 26.44.031 may be used for such purposes. No unfounded or inconclusive allegation of child abuse or neglect as defined in RCW 26.44.020 may be disclosed to a provider licensed under this chapter.

(b) The department may not deny or delay a license to provide child care and early learning services under this chapter to an individual solely because of a founded finding of physical abuse or negligent treatment or maltreatment involving the individual revealed in the background check process or solely because the individual's child was found by a court to be dependent as a result of a finding that the individual abused or neglected their child pursuant to RCW 13.34.030(6)(b) when that founded finding or court finding is accompanied by a certificate of parental improvement as defined in chapter 74.13 RCW related to the same incident.

(2) In order to determine the suitability of individuals newly applying for an agency license, new licensees, their new employees, and other persons who newly have unsupervised access to children in child care, shall be fingerprinted.

(a) The fingerprints shall be forwarded to the Washington state patrol and federal bureau of investigation for a criminal history record check.

(b)(((i))) All individuals applying for first-time agency licenses, all new employees, and other persons who have not been previously qualified by the department to have unsupervised access to children in child care must be fingerprinted and obtain a criminal history record check pursuant to this section.

(((ii) Except during fiscal year 2023, persons required to be fingerprinted and obtain a criminal history record check pursuant to this section must pay for the cost of this check as follows: The fee established by the Washington state patrol for the criminal background history check, including the cost of obtaining the fingerprints; and a fee paid to the department for the cost of administering the individual-based/portable background check clearance registry. The fee paid to the department must be deposited into the individual-based/portable background check clearance account established in RCW 43.216.273. The licensee may, but need not, pay these costs on behalf of a prospective employee or reimburse the prospective employee for these costs. The licensee and the prospective employee may share these costs.))

(c) The secretary shall use the fingerprint criminal history record check information solely for the purpose of determining eligibility for a license and for determining the character, suitability, and competence of those persons or agencies, excluding parents, not required to be licensed who are authorized to care for children.

(d) Criminal justice agencies shall provide the secretary such information as they may have and that the secretary may require for such purpose.

(e) No later than July 1, 2013, all agency licensees holding licenses prior to July 1, 2012, persons who were employees before July 1, 2012, and persons who have been qualified by the department before July 1, 2012, to have unsupervised access to children in child care, must submit a new background application to the department. ((The department must require persons submitting a new background application pursuant to this subsection (2)(e) to pay a fee to the department for the cost of administering the individual-based/portable background check clearance registry. This fee must be paid into the individual-based/portable background check clearance account established in RCW 43.216.273. The licensee may, but need not, pay these costs on behalf of a prospective employee or reimburse the prospective employee for these costs. The licensee and the prospective employee may share these costs.))

(f) The department shall issue a background check clearance card or certificate to the applicant if after the completion of a background check the department concludes the applicant is qualified for unsupervised access to children in child care. The background check clearance card or certificate is valid for ((three))five years from the date of issuance. A valid card or certificate must be accepted by a potential employer as proof that the applicant has successfully completed a background check as required under this chapter. For purposes of renewal of the background clearance card or certificate, all agency licensees holding a license, persons who are employees, and persons who have been previously qualified by the department, must submit a new background application to the department on a date to be determined by the department. ((Except during fiscal year 2023, fee requirements applicable to this section also apply to background clearance renewal applications.))

(g) The original applicant for an agency license, licensees, their employees, and other persons who have unsupervised access to children in child care shall submit a new background check application to the department, on a form and by a date as determined by the department.

(h) ((The payment requirements applicable to (a) through (g) of this subsection do not apply to persons who:

(i) Provide regularly scheduled care for a child or children in the home of the provider or in the home of the child or children for periods of less than twenty-four hours or, if necessary due to the nature of the parent's work, for periods equal to or greater than twenty-four hours;

(ii) Receive child care subsidies; and

(iii) Are exempt from licensing under this chapter.

(i))) The applicant and agency shall maintain on-site for inspection a copy of the background check clearance card or certificate.

(((j)))(i) Individuals who have been issued a background check clearance card or certificate shall report nonconviction and conviction information to the department within twenty-four hours of the event constituting the nonconviction or conviction information.

(((k)))(j) The department shall investigate and conduct a redetermination of an applicant's or licensee's background clearance if the department receives a complaint or information from individuals, a law enforcement agency, or other federal, state, or local government agency. Subject to the requirements contained in RCW 43.216.325 and 43.216.327 and based on a determination that an individual lacks the appropriate character, suitability, or competence to provide child care or early learning services to children, the department may: (i) Invalidate the background card or certificate; or (ii) suspend, modify, or revoke any license authorized by this chapter.

(3) To satisfy the shared background check requirements of the department of children, youth, and families, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, and the department of social and health services, each department shall share federal fingerprint-based background check results as permitted under the law. The purpose of this provision is to allow these departments to fulfill their joint background check responsibility of checking any individual who may have unsupervised access to vulnerable adults, children, or juveniles. These departments may not share the federal background check results with any other state agency or person.

(4) Individuals who have completed a fingerprint background check as required by the office of the superintendent of public instruction, consistent with RCW 28A.400.303, and have been continuously employed by the same school district or educational service district, can meet the requirements in subsection (2) of this section by providing a true and accurate copy of their Washington state patrol and federal bureau of investigation background check report results to the department or if the school district or the educational service district provides an affidavit to the department that the individual has been authorized to work by the school district or educational service district after completing a record check consistent with RCW 28A.400.303. The department may require that additional background checks be completed that do not require additional fingerprinting ((and, except during fiscal year 2023, may charge a fee for these additional background checks)).

Sec. 3. RCW 43.216.271 and 2021 c 304 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

((Subject to appropriation, the))The department shall maintain an individual-based or portable background check clearance registry. Any individual seeking a child care license or employment in any child care facility or outdoor nature-based child care program licensed or regulated under current law shall submit a background application on a form prescribed by the department in rule.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 43.216.272 (Fee for developing and administering individual-based/portable background check clearance registry) and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 208 & 2011 c 295 s 4; and

(2) RCW 43.216.273 (Individual-based/portable background check clearance account) and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 209 & 2011 c 295 s 5.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. 2021 c 304 s 34 (uncodified) is repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. Section 5 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---