BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28B.15.031 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 36 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) As used in this chapter:

(a) The term "operating fees" ((as used in this chapter)) shall include the fees, other than building fees, charged all students registering at the state's colleges and universities but shall not include special or mandatory fees ((for short courses, self-supporting degree credit programs and courses, marine station work, experimental station work, correspondence or extension courses, and individual instruction and student deposits or rentals, disciplinary and library fines, which colleges and universities shall have the right to impose, laboratory, gymnasium, health, technology and student activity fees, or fees, charges, rentals, and other income derived from any or all revenue producing lands, buildings and facilities of the colleges or universities heretofore or hereafter acquired, constructed or installed, including but not limited to income from rooms, dormitories, dining rooms, hospitals, infirmaries, housing or student activity buildings, vehicular parking facilities, land, or the appurtenances thereon, or such other special fees as may be established by any college or university board of trustees or regents from time to time)). All moneys received as operating fees at any institution of higher education shall be deposited in a local account containing only operating fees revenue and related interest: PROVIDED, That a minimum of four percent of operating fees shall be retained by four-year institutions of higher education and a minimum of three and one-half percent of operating fees shall be retained by the community and technical colleges for the purposes of RCW 28B.15.820. At least ((thirty))30 percent of operating fees required to be retained by the four-year institutions for purposes of RCW 28B.15.820 shall be used only for the purposes of RCW 28B.15.820(10).

(b) The term "special fees" shall mean fees for short courses, self-supporting degree credit programs and courses, marine station work, experimental station work, correspondence or extension courses, and individual instruction and student deposits or rentals, disciplinary and library fines, which colleges and universities shall have the right to impose, laboratory, gymnasium, health, technology, and student activity fees, or fees, charges, rentals, and other income derived from any or all revenue producing lands, buildings, and facilities of the colleges or universities heretofore or hereafter acquired, constructed, or installed including, but not limited to, income from rooms, dormitories, dining rooms, hospitals, infirmaries, housing, vehicular parking facilities, land, or the appurtenances thereon, or such other special fees as may be established by any college or university board of trustees or regents from time to time. Special fees are limited to charges for specific goods or services and are not charged to all students.

(c) The term "mandatory fees" shall mean fees applied to all students. These fees may support student activities buildings, campus health services, student activities or facilities, or other uses as established by any college or university board of trustees or regents. Mandatory student fees do not include the technology fees as provided for under RCW 28B.15.051.

(2) In addition to the three and one-half percent of operating fees retained by the institutions under subsection (1)(a) of this section, up to three percent of operating fees charged to students at community and technical colleges shall be transferred to the community and technical college innovation account for the implementation of the college board's strategic technology plan in RCW 28B.50.515. The percentage to be transferred to the community and technical college innovation account shall be determined by the college board each year but shall not exceed three percent of the operating fees collected each year.

(3) Local operating fee accounts shall not be subject to appropriation by the legislature but shall be subject to allotment procedures by budget program and fiscal year under chapter 43.88 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28B.15 RCW to read as follows:

The governing boards of the state universities, regional universities, and The Evergreen State College and the state board for community and technical colleges may establish mandatory and special fees as provided for in RCW 28B.15.031. Such fees may only be charged to students at campuses other than the main campus if:

(1) The fee for the service provided is specific to the student or the campus the student is enrolled at; or

(2) The same or a comparable level of service is reasonably available to the student responsible for the fee.

Part-time students shall be charged mandatory fees proportionate to full-time student rates.

--- END ---