BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 19.27A.200 and 2022 c 177 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 19.27A.210, 19.27A.220, 19.27A.230, 19.27A.240, 19.27A.250, and ((19.27A.220))section 2 of this act unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Agricultural structure" means a structure designed and constructed to house farm implements, hay, grain, poultry, livestock, or other horticultural products, and that is not a place used by the public or a place of human habitation or employment where agricultural products are processed, treated, or packaged.

(2) "Baseline energy use intensity" means a building's energy use intensity that is representative of energy use in a normal weather year.

(3)(a) "Building owner" means an individual or entity possessing title to a building.

(b) In the event of a land lease, "building owner" means the entity possessing title to the building on leased land.

(4) "Building tenant" means a person or entity occupying or holding possession of a building or premises pursuant to a rental agreement.

(5) "Conditional compliance" means a temporary compliance method used by covered building owners that demonstrate the owner has implemented energy use reduction strategies required by the standard, but has not demonstrated full compliance with the energy use intensity target.

(6) "Consumer-owned utility" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 19.27A.140.

(7) "Covered building" includes a tier 1 covered building and a tier 2 covered building.

(8) "Department" means the department of commerce.

(9) "Director" means the director of the department of commerce or the director's designee.

(10) "Electric utility" means a consumer-owned electric utility or an investor-owned electric utility.

(11) "Eligible building owner" means: (a) The owner of a covered building required to comply with the standard established in RCW 19.27A.210; or (b) all eligible tier 2 covered building owners.

(12) "Energy" includes: Electricity, including electricity delivered through the electric grid and electricity generated at the building premises using solar or wind energy resources; natural gas, including natural gas derived from renewable sources, synthetic sources, and fossil fuel sources; district steam; district hot water; district chilled water; propane; fuel oil; wood; coal; or other fuels used to meet the energy loads of a building.

(13) "Energy use intensity" means a measurement that normalizes a building's site energy use relative to its size. A building's energy use intensity is calculated by dividing the total net energy consumed in one year by the gross floor area of the building, excluding the parking garage. "Energy use intensity" is reported as a value of thousand British thermal units per square foot per year.

(14) "Energy use intensity target" means the target for net energy use intensity of a covered building.

(15) "Gas company" includes every corporation, company, association, joint stock association, partnership, and person, their lessees, trustees, or receiver appointed by any court whatsoever, and every city or town owning, controlling, operating, or managing any gas plant within this state.

(16) "Greenhouse gas" includes carbon dioxide, methane, nitrous oxide, hydrofluorocarbons, perfluorocarbons, and sulfur hexafluoride.

(17)(a) "Gross floor area" means the total number of square feet measured between the exterior surfaces of the enclosing fixed walls of a building, including all supporting functions such as offices, lobbies, restrooms, equipment storage areas, mechanical rooms, break rooms, and elevator shafts.

(b) "Gross floor area" does not include outside bays or docks.

(18) "Investor-owned utility" means a corporation owned by investors that meets the definition of "corporation" as defined in RCW 80.04.010 and is engaged in distributing either electricity or natural gas, or both, to more than one retail electric customer in the state.

(19) "Multifamily residential building" means a covered multifamily building containing sleeping units or more than five dwelling units where occupants are primarily permanent in nature.

(20) "Net energy use" means the sum of metered and bulk fuel energy entering the building, minus the sum of metered energy leaving the building or campus. Renewable energy produced on a campus that is not attached to a covered building may be included.

(21) "Qualifying utility" means a consumer-owned or investor-owned gas or electric utility that serves more than 25,000 customers in the state of Washington.

(22) "Savings-to-investment ratio" means the ratio of the total present value savings to the total present value costs of a bundle of an energy or water conservation measure estimated over the projected useful life of each measure. The numerator of the ratio is the present value of net savings in energy or water and nonfuel or nonwater operation and maintenance costs attributable to the proposed energy or water conservation measure. The denominator of the ratio is the present value of the net increase in investment and replacement costs less salvage value attributable to the proposed energy or water conservation measure.

(23) "Standard" means the state energy performance standard for covered buildings established under RCW 19.27A.210.

(24) "Thermal energy company" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 80.04.550.

(25) (("Tier))Except as provided in section 2 of this act, "tier 1 covered building" means a building where the sum of nonresidential, hotel, motel, and dormitory floor areas exceed 50,000 gross square feet, excluding the parking garage area.

(26) (("Tier))Except as provided in section 2 of this act, "tier 2 covered building" means a building where the sum of multifamily residential, nonresidential, hotel, motel, and dormitory floor areas exceeds 20,000 gross square feet, but does not exceed 50,000 gross square feet, excluding the parking garage area. Tier 2 covered buildings also include multifamily residential buildings where floor areas are equal to or exceed 50,000 gross square feet, excluding the parking garage area.

(27) "Weather normalized" means a method for modifying the measured building energy use in a specific weather year to energy use under normal weather conditions.

(28) "Public school" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 28A.150.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 19.27A RCW to read as follows:

(1) Public school buildings are not covered buildings under this chapter and are exempt from the state energy performance standard if the public school building meets one of the following conditions:

(a) Any building in a public school district in which 50 percent or more of the children enrolled in the public school district qualify for free or reduced-price lunch as defined in RCW 28A.235.160 in any of the previous five years;

(b) Any building in a public school district that has a state funding assistance percentage, as defined in RCW 28A.525.166, of 50 percent or more in any of the previous five years; or

(c) Any building in a public school district where the public school district uses or purchases electricity generated from renewable resources or nonemitting electric generation electricity.

(2) Nothing in this section prohibits a school district from meeting the state energy performance standard in RCW 19.27A.210 if the school district chooses to comply.

--- END ---