BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 69.50 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A licensed cannabis producer and a licensed cannabis processor may sell cannabis waste to a person not licensed under this chapter if:

(a) The cannabis waste would not be designated as dangerous or hazardous waste under:

(i) Chapter 70A.300 RCW and rules adopted under that chapter; and

(ii) Cannabis waste disposal rules adopted by the board; and

(b) The licensee notifies the board and the Washington state department of agriculture before the sale.

(2) Cannabis waste not sold in accordance with subsection (1) of this section and not designated as dangerous or hazardous waste under chapter 70A.300 RCW, rules adopted pursuant to that chapter, or cannabis waste disposal rules adopted by the board must be rendered unusable before leaving a licensed producer, processor, or laboratory.

(3) For the purposes of this section, "cannabis waste" means solid waste generated during cannabis production or processing that has a THC concentration of 0.3 percent or less. "Cannabis waste" does not include "hemp" or "industrial hemp" as those terms are defined in RCW 15.140.020.

(4) The board may adopt rules necessary to implement this section.

--- END ---