BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 42.52 RCW to read as follows:

It is not a violation of this chapter for a legislator to send by mail or email:

(1) A letter of recommendation on behalf of an individual constituent if the constituent has requested the letter;

(2) A congratulatory letter to an individual constituent who has received an award or honor of extraordinary distinction of a type that is sufficiently infrequent to be noteworthy to a reasonable person including, but not limited to: (a) An international or national award such as the Nobel prize or the Pulitzer prize; (b) a state award such as Washington scholar; (c) an Eagle Scout award; or (d) a Medal of Honor; or

(3) Except when under a mailing restriction as provided in RCW 42.52.185, a congratulatory letter to an individual constituent who has received an honor or award if the individual or a third party on the individual's behalf has requested the letter.

--- END ---