BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The domestic violence services program within the department of social and health services shall convene a work group to review and update the formula used to determine the allocation of funding for domestic violence victim services agencies.

(2) The work group shall include, but is not limited to, representatives of the following:

(i) The department of social and health services;

(ii) The office of crime victims advocacy;

(iii) The Washington state coalition against domestic violence;

(iv) A minimum of nine department contracted domestic violence victim services agencies, three each from the department of social and health services' regions 1, 2, and 3 representing both small and large capacity shelters; and

(v) Three at-large community-based or tribal domestic violence victim services providers.

(3) The department of social and health services may hire external consultants, as needed, to assist with the goals of the work group.

(4) By December 1, 2023, the work group shall develop formulation allocation recommendations and, in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, provide a copy of the recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature.

(5) While the final decision regarding to implement the formula allocation recommendations of the work group rests with the department, implementation of any of the funding allocation recommendations shall be effective starting July 1, 2024.

(6) This section expires August 1, 2024.

--- END ---