BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 66.08.145 and 2019 c 445 s 201 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The liquor and cannabis board may issue subpoenas in connection with any investigation, hearing, or proceeding for the production of books, records, and documents held under this chapter or chapters 69.50, 69.51A, 70.155, 70.158, 70.345, 82.24, 82.26, and 82.25 RCW, and books and records of common carriers as defined in RCW 81.80.010, or vehicle rental agencies, relating to the transportation or possession of cannabis, cigarettes, vapor products, or other tobacco products.

(2) The liquor and cannabis board may designate individuals authorized to sign subpoenas.

(3) If any person is served a subpoena from the board for the production of records, documents, and books, and fails or refuses to obey the subpoena for the production of records, documents, and books when required to do so, the person is subject to proceedings for contempt, and the board may institute contempt of court proceedings in the superior court of Thurston county or in the county in which the person resides.

--- END ---