BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. Current residential building code classifies residential treatment facilities under the institutional building code, significantly increasing building costs. It is the intent of the legislature to expand the residential building code in an effort to reduce costs associated with building residential treatment facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 19.27 RCW to read as follows:

The state building code council must immediately adopt the R-4 classification code as detailed under chapter 3, section 310.5 of the 2021 international building code.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---