BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 39.26.010 and 2022 c 71 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Agency" means any state office or activity of the executive and judicial branches of state government, including state agencies, departments, offices, divisions, boards, commissions, institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, and correctional and other types of institutions. "Agency" does not include a comprehensive cancer center participating in a collaborative arrangement as defined in RCW 28B.10.930 that is operated in conformance with RCW 28B.10.930.

(2) "Bid" means an offer, proposal, or quote for goods or services in response to a solicitation issued for such goods or services by the department or an agency of Washington state government.

(3) "Bidder" means an individual or entity who submits a bid, quotation, or proposal in response to a solicitation issued for such goods or services by the department or an agency of Washington state government.

(4) "Client services" means services provided directly to agency clients including, but not limited to, medical and dental services, employment and training programs, residential care, and subsidized housing.

(5) "Community rehabilitation program of the department of social and health services" means any entity that:

(a) Is registered as a nonprofit corporation with the secretary of state; and

(b) Is recognized by the department of social and health services, division of vocational rehabilitation as eligible to do business as a community rehabilitation program.

(6) "Competitive solicitation" means a documented formal process providing an equal and open opportunity to bidders and culminating in a selection based on predetermined criteria.

(7) "Contractor" means an individual or entity awarded a contract with an agency to perform a service or provide goods.

(8) "Debar" means to prohibit a contractor, individual, or other entity from submitting a bid, having a bid considered, or entering into a state contract during a specified period of time as set forth in a debarment order.

(9) "Department" means the department of enterprise services.

(10) "Director" means the director of the department of enterprise services.

(11) "Estimated useful life" of an item means the estimated time from the date of acquisition to the date of replacement or disposal, determined in any reasonable manner.

(12) "Goods" means products, materials, supplies, or equipment provided by a contractor.

(13) "In-state business" means a business that has its principal office located in Washington.

(14) "Life-cycle cost" means the total cost of an item to the state over its estimated useful life, including costs of selection, acquisition, operation, maintenance, and where applicable, disposal, as far as these costs can reasonably be determined, minus the salvage value at the end of its estimated useful life.

(15) "Master contracts" means a contract for specific goods or services, or both, that is solicited and established by the department in accordance with procurement laws and rules on behalf of and for general use by agencies as specified by the department.

(16) "Microbusiness" means any business entity, including a sole proprietorship, corporation, partnership, or other legal entity, that: (a) Is owned and operated independently from all other businesses; and (b) has a gross revenue of less than ((one million dollars))$1,000,000 annually as reported on its federal tax return or on its return filed with the department of revenue.

(17) "Minibusiness" means any business entity, including a sole proprietorship, corporation, partnership, or other legal entity, that: (a) Is owned and operated independently from all other businesses; and (b) has a gross revenue of less than ((three million dollars))$3,000,000, but ((one million dollars))$1,000,000 or more annually as reported on its federal tax return or on its return filed with the department of revenue.

(18) "Polychlorinated biphenyls" means any polychlorinated biphenyl congeners and homologs.

(19) "Practical quantification limit" means the lowest concentration that can be reliably measured within specified limits of precision, accuracy, representativeness, completeness, and comparability during routine laboratory operating conditions.

(20) "Purchase" means the acquisition of goods or services, including the leasing or renting of goods.

(21) "Services" means labor, work, analysis, or similar activities provided by a contractor to accomplish a specific scope of work.

(22) "Small business" means an in-state business, including a sole proprietorship, corporation, partnership, or other legal entity, that:

(a) Certifies, under penalty of perjury, that it is owned and operated independently from all other businesses and has either:

(i) Fifty or fewer employees; or

(ii) A gross revenue of less than ((seven million dollars))$7,000,000 annually as reported on its federal income tax return or its return filed with the department of revenue over the previous three consecutive years; or

(b) Is certified with the office of women and minority business enterprises under chapter 39.19 RCW.

(23) "Sole source" means a contractor providing goods or services of such a unique nature or sole availability ((at the location required)) that the contractor is clearly and justifiably the only practicable source to provide the goods or services.

(24) "Washington grown" has the definition in RCW 15.64.060.

Sec. 2. RCW 39.26.070 and 2015 c 79 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

A convenience contract is a contract for specific goods or services, or both, that is solicited and established in accordance with procurement laws and rules for use by ((a specific agency or)) a specified group of agencies ((as needed from time to time)). A convenience contract is not available for general use and ((may only))must be ((used as specified))approved by the department. Convenience contracts are not intended to replace or supersede master contracts as defined in this chapter.

Sec. 3. RCW 39.26.130 and 2012 c 224 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An agency may make emergency purchases as defined in subsection (((3)))(4) of this section. When an emergency purchase is made, the agency head shall submit written notification of the purchase within ((three))10 business days of the purchase to the director. This notification must contain a description of the purchase, a description of the emergency and the circumstances leading up to the emergency, and an explanation of why the circumstances required an emergency purchase.

(2) Emergency contracts must be submitted to the department and made available for public inspection within ((three working))10 business days following the commencement of work or execution of the contract, whichever occurs first.

(3) The department may authorize exceptions to this section due to exigent circumstances.

(4) As used in this section, "emergency" means a set of unforeseen circumstances beyond the control of the agency that either:

(a) Present a real, immediate, and extreme threat to the proper performance of essential functions; or

(b) May reasonably be expected to result in material loss or damage to property, bodily injury, or loss of life, if immediate action is not taken.

Sec. 4. RCW 39.26.140 and 2012 c 224 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Agencies must submit sole source contracts to the department and make the contracts available for public inspection not ((less))fewer than ((ten))15 working days before the proposed starting date of the contract. Agencies must provide documented justification for sole source contracts to the department when the contract is submitted, and must include evidence that the agency posted the contract opportunity at a minimum on the state's enterprise vendor registration and bid notification system.

(2) The department must approve sole source contracts before any such contract becomes binding and before any services may be performed or goods provided under the contract. These requirements shall also apply to all sole source contracts except as otherwise exempted by the director.

(3) The director may provide an agency an exemption from the requirements of this section for a contract or contracts. Requests for exemptions must be submitted to the director in writing.

(4) Contracts awarded by institutions of higher education from nonstate funds are exempt from the requirements of this section.

Sec. 5. RCW 39.26.200 and 2020 c 269 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The director shall provide notice to the contractor of the director's intent to either fine or debar with the specific reason for either the fine or debarment. The department must establish the debarment and fining processes by rule.

(b) After reasonable notice to the contractor and reasonable opportunity for that contractor to be heard, the director has the authority to debar a contractor for cause from consideration for award of contracts. The debarment must be for a period of not more than three years.

(2) The director may either fine or debar a contractor based on a finding of one or more of the following causes:

(a) Conviction for commission of a criminal offense as an incident to obtaining or attempting to obtain a public or private contract or subcontract, or in the performance of such contract or subcontract;

(b) Conviction or a final determination in a civil action under state or federal statutes of fraud, embezzlement, theft, forgery, bribery, falsification or destruction of records, receiving stolen property, violation of the federal false claims act, 31 U.S.C. Sec. 3729 et seq., or the state medicaid fraud false claims act, chapter 74.66 RCW, or any other offense indicating a lack of business integrity or business honesty that currently, seriously, and directly affects responsibility as a state contractor;

(c) Conviction under state or federal antitrust statutes arising out of the submission of bids or proposals;

(d) Two or more violations within the previous five years of the national labor relations act as determined by the national labor relations board or court of competent jurisdiction;

(e) Violation of contract provisions, as set forth in this subsection, of a character that is regarded by the director to be so serious as to justify debarment action:

(i) Deliberate failure without good cause to perform in accordance with the specifications or within the time limit provided in the contract; or

(ii) A recent record of failure to perform or of unsatisfactory performance in accordance with the terms of one or more contracts, however the failure to perform or unsatisfactory performance caused by acts beyond the control of the contractor may not be considered to be a basis for debarment;

(f) Violation of ethical standards set forth in RCW 39.26.020; and

(g) Any other cause the director determines to be so serious and compelling as to affect responsibility as a state contractor, including debarment by another governmental entity for any cause listed in regulations((; and

(h) During the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, the failure to comply with a provision in a state master contract or other agreement with a state agency that requires equality among its workers by ensuring similarly employed individuals are compensated as equals)).

(3) The director must issue a written decision to debar. The decision must:

(a) State the reasons for the action taken; and

(b) Inform the debarred contractor of the contractor's rights to judicial or administrative review.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 39.26.260 (Preferences—In-state procurement) and 1983 c 183 s 1;

(2) RCW 39.26.270 (List of statutes and regulations of each state that grants preference to in-state vendors) and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 240 & 1983 c 183 s 2; and

(3) RCW 39.26.271 (Rules for reciprocity in bidding) and 2015 c 79 s 9, 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 241, & 1983 c 183 s 3.

--- END ---