BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. Washington is developing a multimodal transportation system using a complete streets approach. The safety of people who drive, bike, walk, roll, and access transit on public roadways is paramount. When the legislature enacted RCW 46.20.075 in 2000, it recognized the need to develop a graduated licensing system in light of the disproportionately high incidence of motor vehicle crashes involving youthful motorists. The intent was to improve highway safety by progressively developing and improving the skills of younger drivers in the safest possible environment, thereby reducing the number of vehicle crashes. Under the safe system approach, the legislature finds that drivers who understand and follow the rules of the road are a protective factor to avoid collisions that cause property damage, bodily injury, and death, benefiting all Washington road users. Novice drivers, including those ages 16 to 25 years, account for a disproportionate number of crashes. Data compiled by the department of licensing show, however, that young drivers who are licensed during the intermediate licensing phase and complete a driver safety course before licensure have lower crash rates compared to their counterparts. Completing an accredited driver safety course and obtaining a license under intermediate licensing requirements may help mitigate the risks of crashes involving novice drivers. Most public schools no longer offer driver education programs, and the cost of driver education from private companies can pose a barrier to obtaining a driver's license for young people in low-income households and those from historically marginalized communities. Many of these communities are also disproportionately represented among victims of serious and fatal crashes. Whereas driving provides opportunities related to education, vocational training, and employment to young people, and whereas safe roads depend upon drivers who know how to use public transportation facilities as they are intended, the legislature finds there is a public interest to support driver education for low-income novice drivers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 46.82 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the availability of funds appropriated for this specific purpose, the department must provide vouchers to cover the average cost of driver's education courses for novice drivers with financial need.

(2) In consultation with the Washington traffic safety commission, the department shall establish application and award procedures for implementing this section. The procedures must require the provision of driver training vouchers to individuals residing in low-income households.

(3) An applicant who has previously received financial support to complete a driver training program under RCW 74.13.338(2)(b) or 49.04.290 is deemed ineligible for a voucher under this section.

(4) On a biennial basis beginning June 30, 2026, the department shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature the following:

(a) The income criteria used to determine voucher awards for driver education courses;

(b) The number of applicants for driver education vouchers annually by county;

(c) The number of vouchers awarded annually by county;

(d) The number of vouchers redeemed annually by county;

(e) The dollar amount of vouchers redeemed annually by county; and

(f) The average household income of voucher recipients during the report period.

(5) For the purposes of this section, "novice driver" means a person who has not previously obtained a license to drive a motor vehicle.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2024.

--- END ---