BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 42.12.070 and 2013 c 11 s 89 are each amended to read as follows:

A vacancy on an elected nonpartisan governing body of a qualifying special purpose district ((where property ownership is not a qualification to vote)), a town, or a city other than a first-class city or a charter code city, shall be filled as follows unless the provisions of law relating to the qualifying special purpose district, town, or city provide otherwise:

(1) Where one position is vacant, the remaining members of the governing body shall appoint a qualified person to fill the vacant position.

(2) Where two or more positions are vacant and two or more members of the governing body remain in office, the remaining members of the governing body shall appoint a qualified person to fill one of the vacant positions, the remaining members of the governing body and the newly appointed person shall appoint another qualified person to fill another vacant position, and so on until each of the vacant positions is filled with each of the new appointees participating in each appointment that is made after his or her appointment.

(3) If less than two members of a governing body remain in office, the county legislative authority of the county in which all or the largest geographic portion of the city, town, or qualifying special purpose district is located shall appoint a qualified person or persons to the governing body until the governing body has two members.

(4) If a governing body fails to appoint a qualified person to fill a vacancy within ninety days of the occurrence of the vacancy, the authority of the governing body to fill the vacancy shall cease and the county legislative authority of the county in which all or the largest geographic portion of the city, town, or qualifying special purpose district is located shall appoint a qualified person to fill the vacancy.

(5) If the county legislative authority of the county fails to appoint a qualified person within one hundred eighty days of the occurrence of the vacancy, the county legislative authority or the remaining members of the governing body of the city, town, or qualifying special purpose district may petition the governor to appoint a qualified person to fill the vacancy. The governor may appoint a qualified person to fill the vacancy after being petitioned if at the time the governor fills the vacancy the county legislative authority has not appointed a qualified person to fill the vacancy.

(6) As provided in chapter 29A.24 RCW, each person who is appointed shall serve until a qualified person is elected at the next election at which a member of the governing body normally would be elected. The person elected shall take office immediately and serve the remainder of the unexpired term.

(7) For purposes of this section, "qualifying special purpose district" means a fire protection district created under chapter 52.14 RCW with assessed values under $5,000,000,000, and a water-sewer district created under chapter 57.12 RCW with assessed values under $5,000,000,000.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 42.12 RCW to read as follows:

A vacancy on an elected nonpartisan governing body of a special purpose district where property ownership is not a qualification to vote or that is not a qualifying special purpose district defined in RCW 42.12.070, shall be filled as follows unless the provisions of law relating to the special purpose district provide otherwise:

(1) After a vacancy occurs, the remaining members of the governing body must nominate at least one candidate at a meeting of the governing body. The governing body must then cause notice of the vacancy and the name of the nominated candidate or candidates to be posted in three public places in the special purpose district, including on the district's website if the district has a website, for a minimum of 15 days. During the notice period, registered voters who reside in the special purpose district may submit nominations to the remaining members of the governing body.

(2) After the notice period described in subsection (1) of this section, the remaining members of the governing body shall appoint a qualified person to fill the vacant position from the candidates nominated by either the governing body or the public at a meeting of the governing body.

(3) Where two or more positions are vacant and two or more members of the governing body remain in office, the remaining members of the governing body shall appoint a qualified person to fill one of the vacant positions under the nomination process described in subsection (1) of this section, the remaining members of the governing body and the newly appointed person shall appoint another qualified person to fill another vacant position under the nomination process described in subsection (1) of this section, and so on until each of the vacant positions is filled with each of the new appointees participating in each appointment that is made after his or her appointment.

(4) If less than two members of a governing body remain in office, the county legislative authority of the county in which all or the largest geographic portion of the special purpose district is located shall appoint a qualified person or persons to the governing body until the governing body has two members.

(5) If a governing body fails to appoint a qualified person to fill a vacancy within 90 days of the occurrence of the vacancy, the authority of the governing body to fill the vacancy shall cease and the county legislative authority of the county in which all or the largest geographic portion of the special purpose district is located shall appoint a qualified person to fill the vacancy.

(6) If the county legislative authority of the county fails to appoint a qualified person within 180 days of the occurrence of the vacancy, the county legislative authority or the remaining members of the governing body of the special purpose district may petition the governor to appoint a qualified person to fill the vacancy. The governor may appoint a qualified person to fill the vacancy after being petitioned if at the time the governor fills the vacancy the county legislative authority has not appointed a qualified person to fill the vacancy.

(7) As provided in chapter 29A.24 RCW, each person who is appointed shall serve until a qualified person is elected at the next election at which a member of the governing body normally would be elected. The person elected shall take office immediately and serve the remainder of the unexpired term.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.06.010 and 2014 c 202 s 305 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to those prescribed by the Constitution, the governor may exercise the powers and perform the duties prescribed in this and the following sections:

(1) The governor shall supervise the conduct of all executive and ministerial offices;

(2) The governor shall see that all offices are filled, including as provided in RCW 42.12.070 and section 2 of this act, and the duties thereof performed, or in default thereof, apply such remedy as the law allows; and if the remedy is imperfect, acquaint the legislature therewith at its next session;

(3) The governor shall make the appointments and supply the vacancies mentioned in this title;

(4) The governor is the sole official organ of communication between the government of this state and the government of any other state or territory, or of the United States;

(5) Whenever any suit or legal proceeding is pending against this state, or which may affect the title of this state to any property, or which may result in any claim against the state, the governor may direct the attorney general to appear on behalf of the state, and report the same to the governor, or to any grand jury designated by the governor, or to the legislature when next in session;

(6) The governor may require the attorney general or any prosecuting attorney to inquire into the affairs or management of any corporation existing under the laws of this state, or doing business in this state, and report the same to the governor, or to any grand jury designated by the governor, or to the legislature when next in session;

(7) The governor may require the attorney general to aid any prosecuting attorney in the discharge of the prosecutor's duties;

(8) The governor may offer rewards, not exceeding one thousand dollars in each case, payable out of the state treasury, for information leading to the apprehension of any person convicted of a felony who has escaped from a state correctional institution or for information leading to the arrest of any person who has committed or is charged with the commission of a felony;

(9) The governor shall perform such duties respecting fugitives from justice as are prescribed by law;

(10) The governor shall issue and transmit election proclamations as prescribed by law;

(11) The governor may require any officer or board to make, upon demand, special reports to the governor, in writing;

(12) The governor may, after finding that a public disorder, disaster, energy emergency, or riot exists within this state or any part thereof which affects life, health, property, or the public peace, proclaim a state of emergency in the area affected, and the powers granted the governor during a state of emergency shall be effective only within the area described in the proclamation;

(13) The governor may, after finding that there exists within this state an imminent danger of infestation of plant pests as defined in RCW 17.24.007 or plant diseases which seriously endangers the agricultural or horticultural industries of the state of Washington, or which seriously threatens life, health, or economic well-being, order emergency measures to prevent or abate the infestation or disease situation, which measures, after thorough evaluation of all other alternatives, may include the aerial application of pesticides;

(14) The governor, after finding that a prohibited level 1 or level 2 species as defined in chapter 77.135 RCW has been detected and after finding that the detected species seriously endangers or threatens the environment, economy, human health, or well-being of the state of Washington, may order emergency measures to prevent or abate the prohibited species, which measures, after thorough evaluation of all other alternatives, may include the surface or aerial application of pesticides;

(15) On all compacts forwarded to the governor pursuant to RCW 9.46.360(6), the governor is authorized and empowered to execute on behalf of the state compacts with federally recognized Indian tribes in the state of Washington pursuant to the federal Indian Gaming Regulatory Act, 25 U.S.C. Sec. 2701 et seq., for conducting class III gaming, as defined in the Act, on Indian lands.

Sec. 4. RCW 70.44.056 and 2015 c 53 s 94 are each amended to read as follows:

In all existing public hospital districts in which an increase in the number of district commissioners is proposed, the additional commissioner positions shall be deemed to be vacant and the board of commissioners of the public hospital district shall appoint qualified persons to fill those vacancies in accordance with ((RCW 42.12.070))section 2 of this act.

Each person who is appointed shall serve until a qualified person is elected at the next general election of the district occurring one hundred twenty days or more after the date of the election at which the voters of the district approved the ballot proposition authorizing the increase in the number of commissioners. If needed, special filing periods shall be authorized as provided in RCW 29A.24.171 and 29A.24.181 for qualified persons to file for the vacant office. A primary shall be held to nominate candidates if sufficient time exists to hold a primary and more than two candidates file for the vacant office. Otherwise, no primary shall be held and the candidate receiving the greatest number of votes for each position shall be elected. Except for the initial terms of office, persons elected to each of these additional commissioner positions shall be elected to a six-year term. The newly elected commissioners shall assume office as provided in RCW 29A.60.280.

The initial terms of the new commissioners shall be staggered as follows: (1) When the number of commissioners is increased from three to five, the person elected receiving the greatest number of votes shall be elected to a six-year term of office, and the other person shall be elected to a four-year term; (2) when the number of commissioners is increased from three or five to seven, the terms of the new commissioners shall be staggered over the next three district general elections so that two commissioners will be elected at the first district general election following the election where the additional commissioners are elected, two commissioners will be at the second district general election after the election of the additional commissioners, and three commissioners will be elected at the third district general election following the election of the additional commissioners, with the persons elected receiving the greatest number of votes elected to serve the longest terms.

--- END ---