BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A retired or disabled employee who: (a) Is receiving a retirement allowance under chapters 41.32, 41.35, 41.37, or 41.40 RCW; (b) was previously denied coverage solely for failure to timely notify the authority of their plan to defer coverage; and (c) appealed the denial of benefits to the authority on or before December 31, 2022, may enroll in medical and dental plans under the authority, provided they apply no later than the end of the open enrollment period for the plan year beginning January 1, 2024.

(2) A retired or disabled employee enrolling in benefits under this section may only enroll in a fully-insured medicare advantage or medicare supplement plan.

(3) Retired or disabled employees and their dependents are responsible for payment of rates developed by the authority, and must include any amounts necessary for administration in accordance with this chapter. Premium rates charged to retired or disabled employees and their dependents shall be based on the experience of the community-rated risk pools established under RCW 41.05.022 and 41.05.080 and must be reduced by the amount of the subsidy provided under RCW 41.05.085.

(4) The authority may establish rules to implement the enrollment opportunity under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---