BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9.94A.733 and 2021 c 266 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, an offender may not participate in the graduated reentry program under this subsection unless he or she has served at least six months in total confinement in a state correctional facility.

(i) An offender subject to (a) of this subsection may serve no more than the final five months of the offender's term of confinement in partial confinement as home detention as part of the graduated reentry program developed by the department.

(ii) Home detention under (a) of this subsection may not be imposed for individuals subject to a deportation order, civil commitment, or the interstate compact for adult offender supervision under RCW 9.94A.745.

(b) For offenders who meet the requirements of (b)(iii) of this subsection, an offender may not participate in the graduated reentry program unless he or she has served at least four months in total confinement in a state correctional facility.

(i) An offender under this subsection (1)(b) may serve no more than the final 18 months of the offender's term of confinement in partial confinement as home detention as part of the graduated reentry program developed by the department.

(ii) Home detention under this subsection (1)(b) may not be imposed for individuals subject to a deportation order or subject to the jurisdiction of the indeterminate sentence review board.

(iii) Home detention under this subsection (1)(b) may not be imposed for offenders currently serving a term of confinement for the following offenses:

(A) Any sex offense;

(B) Any violent offense; or

(C) Any crime against a person offense in accordance with the categorization of crimes against persons outlined in RCW 9.94A.411(2).

(2) The secretary of the department may transfer an offender from a department correctional facility to home detention in the community if it is determined that the graduated reentry program is an appropriate placement and must assist the offender's transition from confinement to the community.

(3) The department and its officers, agents, and employees are not liable for the acts of offenders participating in the graduated reentry program unless the department or its officers, agents, and employees acted with willful and wanton disregard.

(4)(a) All offenders placed on home detention as part of the graduated reentry program must provide an approved residence and living arrangement prior to transfer to home detention.

(b) The department may not transfer an offender to participate in the graduated reentry program until the department has conducted a comprehensive assessment for substance use disorder. If the offender is assessed to have a substance use disorder, the department shall assist the offender in enrolling in substance use disorder treatment services at the level deemed appropriate by the assessment. Offenders transferred to participate in the graduated reentry program must begin receiving substance use disorder treatment services as soon as practicable after transfer to avoid any delays in treatment. Substance use disorder treatment services shall include, as deemed necessary by the assessment, access to medication-assisted treatment and counseling programs. While awaiting placement into substance use disorder treatment in the community, the department must regularly monitor the offender for substance use and make changes to the treatment plan accordingly.

(5) While in the community on home detention as part of the graduated reentry program, the department must:

(a) Require the offender to be placed on electronic home monitoring;

(b) Require the offender to participate in programming and treatment that the department shall assign based on an offender's assessed need; and

(c) Assign a community corrections officer who will monitor the offender's compliance with conditions of partial confinement and programming requirements.

(6) The department retains the authority to return any offender serving partial confinement in the graduated reentry program to total confinement for any reason including, but not limited to, the offender's noncompliance with any sentence requirement.

(7) The department may issue rental vouchers for a period not to exceed six months for those transferring to partial confinement under this section if an approved address cannot be obtained without the assistance of a voucher.

(8) In the selection of offenders to participate in the graduated reentry program, and in setting, modifying, and enforcing the requirements of the graduated reentry program, the department is deemed to be performing a quasi-judicial function.

(9) The department shall publish a monthly report on its website with the number of offenders who were transferred during the month to home detention as part of the graduated reentry program. The department shall submit an annual report by December 1st to the appropriate committees of the legislature with the number of offenders who were transferred to home detention as part of the graduated reentry program during the prior year.

(10)(a) Beginning July 1, 2023, the following data must be collected and posted to the department's website on a monthly basis:

(i) The number of offenders who were transferred to the graduated reentry program who were assessed to have a substance use disorder during the prior calendar month; and

(ii) The number of offenders in the graduated reentry program during the prior calendar month who received:

(A) Outpatient substance use disorder treatment;

(B) Inpatient substance use disorder treatment; and

(C) Both outpatient and inpatient substance use disorder treatment.

(b) Beginning July 1, 2023, the health care authority must report monthly to the department on the number of offenders in the graduated reentry program who received substance use disorder outpatient treatment, while in the community, during the prior calendar month.

--- END ---