BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The legislature recognizes that extensive research has shown that student outcomes and success, especially for first generation, underserved students, significantly improve by increasing the number of tenure-track faculty at public four-year universities.

(a) The legislature's goal is that the state universities and regional universities add 200 new full-time tenure-track positions in the 2023-24 academic year. These positions shall be divided among the five institutions with the most positions allocated to the institutions with the highest student to faculty ratios:

(i) 30 at the University of Washington;

(ii) 30 at Washington State University;

(iii) 50 at Central Washington University;

(iv) 50 at Eastern Washington University; and

(v) 40 at Western Washington University.

(b) This goal is best accomplished through converting part-time faculty positions to full-time tenure-track positions and by hiring new full-time faculty through institutional search processes, with special attention to diversity, equity, and inclusion. If specific funding for the purpose of conversion assignments proposed in this section is not provided in the omnibus operating appropriations act, the conversion assignments proposed must be delayed until such time as specific funding is provided.

(c) The state universities and regional universities shall develop a model faculty diversity program designed to provide for the retention and recruitment of faculty from all racial, ethnic, and cultural backgrounds. The faculty diversity program must be based on proven practices in diversity hiring processes. If the state university or regional university have already developed a plan that meets these requirements, then they are considered in compliance. Any hires made under this section must be conducted in alignment with the faculty diversity program.

(d) The state universities and regional universities shall report on all hires made under this section including demographics of hires, the department or program the hire was made in, and the numbers of positions that were part-time conversions. The state universities and regional universities shall submit the report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature in accordance with RCW 43.01.036 by December 15, 2025.

(e) The Washington student achievement council must collect data and, with the assistance of experts in the field, assess the impact of the 200 additional full-time tenure-track faculty on student experiences and student success. The Washington student achievement council must convene representatives of faculty, staff, and administration to report on outcomes as a result of increasing full-time tenure-track faculty. In consultation with representatives of faculty, staff, and administration, the Washington student achievement council must make recommendations about future steps to increase full-time tenure-track faculty that incorporate faculty diversity and historically underserved communities. The Washington student achievement council must report the results of its assessment, along with next step recommendations, to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature in accordance with RCW 43.01.036 by December 15, 2030. The Washington student achievement council shall conspicuously post on its website and include in the report definitions for key terms including: Diversity, equity, inclusion, culturally competent, culturally appropriate, historically marginalized communities, communities of color, low-income communities, and community organizations.

(2) This section expires July 1, 2031.

--- END ---