BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. SHORT TITLE.This act may be known and cited as the education equity in every zip code act or EEEZ act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. INTENT.(1) The legislature finds that too many children in our state remain trapped in a system where the quality of, and access to, their education is determined by their zip code. The onset of the COVID-19 pandemic, and the nearly year long school closures that resulted, have only exacerbated this unfairness. While the legislature, in addressing the McCleary decision, made inroads by increasing state funding for basic education and decreasing reliance on local levies, this progress was significantly undermined in 2019 when the legislature raised local levy authority by 67 percent, thus returning to greater reliance on local levies to fund education and the inherent inequities in such a funding system.

(2) The legislature finds that it is appropriate and necessary to reduce the reliance on local levies in our school system and accordingly to significantly increase the state's basic education funding in ways that will address these funding and educational inequities. Eliminating a system where a child's quality of, and access to, education is tied to their zip code is the equity issue of our time and critical to our state's future and the future of our children.

(3) This act makes permanent enhancements to the basic education funding formula that will increase equity including: Increasing special education funding; lowering class sizes for vocational education classes and skills centers; and enhancing access to and funding for gifted education programs. Schools serving a high percentage of low-income students are aided with greater funding for the learning assistance program, and property-poor districts receive increased state funding for local effort assistance to alleviate inequities with their wealthier counterparts. These funding increases will lead to more level access across the state to critical and fundamental services for students.

(4) The legislature further takes notice that the COVID-19 pandemic, and the nearly year long absence from in-person learning that occurred, has taken a significant toll on the academic progress of our children. The most recent state assessment found that only one in three students are at grade level in both reading and math. The figures are significantly worse for lower-income, special education, and Native American, black, and Hispanic students. Under this act, schools are incentivized to choose innovative methods, including a balanced school calendar or increased instructional hours, to improve student performance.

(5) The legislature intends with the education equity in every zip code act to remedy the infirmities in the present system and assist students, regardless of their zip code, to achieve their highest potential.

PART I

ENRICHMENT LEVY REDUCTION

Sec. 3. RCW 84.52.0531 and 2022 c 108 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning with taxes levied for collection in ((2020))2024, the maximum dollar amount which may be levied by or for any school district for enrichment levies under RCW 84.52.053 is equal to the lesser of ((two dollars and fifty cents))$1.50 per ((thousand dollars))$1,000 of the assessed value of property in the school district or the maximum per-pupil limit. This maximum dollar amount shall be reduced accordingly as provided under RCW 43.09.2856(2).

(2) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) For the purpose of this section, "inflation" means the percentage change in the seasonally adjusted consumer price index for all urban consumers, Seattle area, for the most recent 12-month period as of September 25th of the year before the taxes are payable, using the official current base compiled by the United States bureau of labor statistics.

(b) "Maximum per-pupil limit" means:

(i) ((Two thousand five hundred dollars))$2,500, as increased by inflation beginning with property taxes levied for collection in 2020, multiplied by the number of average annual full-time equivalent students enrolled in the school district in the prior school year, for school districts with fewer than ((forty thousand))40,000 annual full-time equivalent students enrolled in the school district in the prior school year; or

(ii) ((Three thousand dollars))$3,000, as increased by inflation beginning with property taxes levied for collection in 2020, multiplied by the number of average annual full-time equivalent students enrolled in the school district in the prior school year, for school districts with ((forty thousand))40,000 or more annual full-time equivalent students enrolled in the school district in the prior school year.

(c) "Open for in-person instruction to all students" means that all students in all grades have the option to participate in at least 40 hours of planned in-person instruction per month and the school follows state department of health guidance and recommendations for resuming in-person instruction to the greatest extent practicable.

(d) "Prior school year" means the most recent school year completed prior to the year in which the levies are to be collected, except as follows:

(i) In the 2022 calendar year, if 2019-20 school year average annual full-time equivalent enrollment is greater than the school district's 2020-21 school year average annual full-time equivalent enrollment and the school district is open for in-person instruction to all students by the beginning of the 2021-22 school year, "prior school year" means the 2019-20 school year.

(ii) In the 2023 calendar year, if 2019-20 school year average annual full-time equivalent enrollment is greater than the school district's 2021-22 school year average annual full-time equivalent enrollment and the school district was open for in-person instruction to all students by the beginning of the 2021-22 school year, "prior school year" means the 2019-20 school year.

(3) For districts in a high/nonhigh relationship, the enrollments of the nonhigh students attending the high school shall only be counted by the nonhigh school districts for purposes of funding under this section.

(4) For school districts participating in an innovation academy cooperative established under RCW 28A.340.080, enrollments of students attending the academy shall be adjusted so that each participant district receives its proportional share of student enrollments for purposes of funding under this section.

(5) Beginning with propositions for enrichment levies for collection in calendar year 2020 and thereafter, a district must receive approval of an enrichment levy expenditure plan under RCW 28A.505.240 before submission of the proposition to the voters.

(6) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop rules and regulations and inform school districts of the pertinent data necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

(7) Beginning with taxes levied for collection in 2018, enrichment levy revenues must be deposited in a separate subfund of the school district's general fund pursuant to RCW 28A.320.330, and for the 2018-19 school year are subject to the restrictions of RCW 28A.150.276 and the audit requirements of RCW 43.09.2856.

(8) Funds collected from levies for transportation vehicles, construction, modernization, or remodeling of school facilities as established in RCW 84.52.053 are not subject to the levy limitations in subsections (1) through (5) of this section.

PART II

LOCAL EFFORT ASSISTANCE ENHANCEMENT

Sec. 4. RCW 28A.500.015 and 2022 c 108 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning in calendar year 2020 and each calendar year thereafter, the state must provide state local effort assistance funding to supplement school district enrichment levies as provided in this section.

(2)(a) For an eligible school district with an actual enrichment levy rate that is less than ((one dollar and fifty cents))$1.50 per ((thousand dollars))$1,000 of assessed value in the school district, the annual local effort assistance funding is equal to the school district's maximum local effort assistance multiplied by a fraction equal to the school district's actual enrichment levy rate divided by ((one dollar and fifty cents))$1.50 per ((thousand dollars))$1,000 of assessed value in the school district.

(b) For an eligible school district with an actual enrichment levy rate that is equal to ((or greater than one dollar and fifty cents))$1.50 per ((thousand dollars))$1,000 of assessed value in the school district, the annual local effort assistance funding is equal to the school district's maximum local effort assistance.

(c) Beginning in calendar year 2022, for state-tribal education compact schools established under chapter 28A.715 RCW, the annual local effort assistance funding is equal to the actual enrichment levy per student as calculated by the superintendent of public instruction for the previous year for the school district in which the state-tribal education compact school is located, up to a maximum per student amount of ((one thousand five hundred fifty dollars))$2,000 as increased by inflation from the 2019 calendar year, multiplied by the student enrollment of the state-tribal education compact school in the prior school year.

(d)(i) Beginning in calendar year 2024, for charter schools established under chapter 28A.710 RCW, the annual local effort assistance funding is equal to the actual enrichment levy per student as calculated by the superintendent of public instruction for the previous year for the school district in which the charter school is located, up to a maximum per student amount of $2,000 as increased by inflation from the 2019 calendar year, multiplied by the student enrollment of the charter school in the prior school year.

(ii) The legislature must appropriate annual local effort assistance funds for charter schools from the Washington opportunity pathways account in accordance with RCW 28A.710.270.

(3) The state local effort assistance funding provided under this section is not part of the state's program of basic education deemed by the legislature to comply with the requirements of Article IX, section 1 of the state Constitution.

(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Eligible school district" means a school district where the amount generated by a levy of ((one dollar and fifty cents))$1.50 per ((thousand dollars))$1,000 of assessed value in the school district, divided by the school district's total student enrollment in the prior school year, is less than the state local effort assistance threshold.

(b) For the purpose of this section, "inflation" means, for any school year, the rate of the yearly increase of the previous calendar year's annual average consumer price index for all urban consumers, Seattle area, using the official current base compiled by the bureau of labor statistics, United States department of labor.

(c) "Maximum local effort assistance" means the difference between the following:

(i) The school district's actual prior school year enrollment multiplied by the state local effort assistance threshold; and

(ii) The amount generated by a levy of ((one dollar and fifty cents))$1.50 per ((thousand dollars))$1,000 of assessed value in the school district.

(d) "Prior school year" means the most recent school year completed prior to the year in which the state local effort assistance funding is to be distributed, except as follows:

(i) In the 2022 calendar year, if 2019-20 school year average annual full-time equivalent enrollment is greater than the school district's 2020-21 school year average annual full-time equivalent enrollment, "prior school year" means the 2019-20 school year.

(ii) In the 2023 calendar year, if 2019-20 school year average annual full-time equivalent enrollment is greater than the school district's 2021-22 school year average annual full-time equivalent enrollment, "prior school year" means the 2019-20 school year.

(e) "State local effort assistance threshold" means ((one thousand five hundred fifty dollars))$2,000 per student, increased for inflation beginning in calendar year 2020.

(f) "Student enrollment" means the average annual full-time equivalent student enrollment.

(5) For districts in a high/nonhigh relationship, the enrollments of the nonhigh students attending the high school shall only be counted by the nonhigh school districts for purposes of funding under this section.

(6) For school districts participating in an innovation academy cooperative established under RCW 28A.340.080, enrollments of students attending the academy shall be adjusted so that each participant district receives its proportional share of student enrollments for purposes of funding under this section.

PART III

YEAR-ROUND SCHOOL CALENDAR

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 28A.150 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide supplemental allocations to each school district, charter school, or state-tribal education compact school that implements a year-round school calendar in an amount equal to the school district's or school's base allocation per full-time equivalent student, multiplied by the school district's or school's annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment, multiplied by 0.05.

(2) For purposes of this section, a year-round school calendar is a calendar that provides instructional days over the course of a 12-month period.

PART IV

LEARNING RECOVERY AND ACCELERATION

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. (1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must administer grants for the purposes of learning recovery and acceleration.

(2) Allowable uses of the funds are limited to targeted high quality tutoring and rigorous extended learning programs.

(3) The sum of $46,570,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2025, from the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III federal account to the office of the superintendent of public instruction for the purposes of this section.

(4) This section expires December 31, 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. (1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must establish the state matching grant program for learning recovery and acceleration.

(2) The purpose of the grant program is to provide state matching funds to schools and school districts that choose to use the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III federal account subgrant allocations attributable to section 2001(e)(2) of the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2 on targeted high quality tutoring and rigorous extended learning programs.

(3) The amount of state matching funds shall be 50 percent of the amount schools and school districts use from the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III federal account on targeted high quality tutoring and rigorous extended learning programs.

(4)(a) School districts, charter schools, and state-tribal education compact schools may apply for the state matching funds.

(b) Applicants are eligible for these state matching funds if they only use the funding they receive from the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III federal account on either targeted high quality tutoring or rigorous extended learning programs, or both, in the 2023-24 school year.

(c) Funding priority shall be given to school districts, charter schools, and state-tribal education compact schools that have the lowest percentage of students meeting grade level standards as measured by the English language arts and mathematics results of the smarter balanced assessments or any other statewide student assessment.

(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction may adopt rules for the grant program established under this section.

(6) This section expires December 31, 2024.

PART V

EQUITY

Sec. 8. RCW 28A.150.390 and 2020 c 90 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall submit to each regular session of the legislature during an odd-numbered year a programmed budget request for special education programs for students with disabilities. Funding for programs operated by local school districts shall be on an excess cost basis from appropriations provided by the legislature for special education programs for students with disabilities and shall take account of state funds accruing through RCW 28A.150.260 (4)(a), (5), (6), and (8) and 28A.150.415.

(2) The excess cost allocation to school districts shall be based on the following:

(a) A school district's annual average headcount enrollment of students ages three and four and those five year olds not yet enrolled in kindergarten who are eligible for and receiving special education, multiplied by the school district's base allocation per full-time equivalent student, multiplied by 1.15;

(b)(i) Subject to the limitation in (b)(ii) of this subsection (2), a school district's annual average enrollment of resident students who are eligible for and receiving special education, excluding students ages three and four and those five year olds not yet enrolled in kindergarten, multiplied by the school district's base allocation per full-time equivalent student, multiplied by the special education cost multiplier rate of:

(A) In the 2019-20 school year, 0.995 for students eligible for and receiving special education.

(B) Beginning in the 2020-21 school year, either:

(I) 1.0075 for students eligible for and receiving special education and reported to be in the general education setting for eighty percent or more of the school day; or

(II) 0.995 for students eligible for and receiving special education and reported to be in the general education setting for less than eighty percent of the school day.

(ii) If ((the))a school district has an average annual full-time equivalent basic education enrollment of 500 or more students and its enrollment percent exceeds ((thirteen and five-tenths))15 percent, the excess cost allocation calculated under (b)(i) of this subsection must be adjusted by multiplying the allocation by ((thirteen and five-tenths))15 percent divided by the enrollment percent.

(3) As used in this section:

(a) "Base allocation" means the total state allocation to all schools in the school district generated by the distribution formula under RCW 28A.150.260 (4)(a), (5), (6), and (8) and the allocation under RCW 28A.150.415, to be divided by the school district's full-time equivalent enrollment.

(b) "Basic education enrollment" means enrollment of resident students including nonresident students enrolled under RCW 28A.225.225 and students from nonhigh districts enrolled under RCW 28A.225.210 and excluding students residing in another school district enrolled as part of an interdistrict cooperative program under RCW 28A.225.250.

(c) "Enrollment percent" means the school district's resident annual average enrollment of students who are eligible for and receiving special education, excluding students ages three and four and those five year olds not yet enrolled in kindergarten and students enrolled in institutional education programs, as a percent of the school district's annual average full-time equivalent basic education enrollment.

Sec. 9. RCW 28A.185.020 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 412 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature finds that, for highly capable students, access to accelerated learning and enhanced instruction is access to a basic education. There are multiple definitions of highly capable, from intellectual to academic to artistic. The research literature strongly supports using multiple criteria to identify highly capable students, and therefore, the legislature does not intend to prescribe a single method. Instead, the legislature intends to allocate funding based on ((5.0))7.0 percent of each school district's population and authorize school districts to identify through the use of multiple, objective criteria those students most highly capable and eligible to receive accelerated learning and enhanced instruction in the program offered by the school district. District practices for identifying the most highly capable students must prioritize equitable identification of low-income students. Access to accelerated learning and enhanced instruction through the program for highly capable students does not constitute an individual entitlement for any particular student.

(2) Supplementary funds provided by the state for the program for highly capable students under RCW 28A.150.260 shall be categorical funding to provide services to highly capable students as determined by a school district under RCW 28A.185.030.

Sec. 10. RCW 28A.150.260 and 2022 c 109 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The purpose of this section is to provide for the allocation of state funding that the legislature deems necessary to support school districts in offering the minimum instructional program of basic education under RCW 28A.150.220. The allocation shall be determined as follows:

(1) The governor shall and the superintendent of public instruction may recommend to the legislature a formula for the distribution of a basic education instructional allocation for each common school district.

(2)(a) The distribution formula under this section shall be for allocation purposes only. Except as may be required under subsections (4)(b) and (c), (5)(b), and (9) of this section, chapter 28A.155, 28A.165, 28A.180, or 28A.185 RCW, or federal laws and regulations, nothing in this section requires school districts to use basic education instructional funds to implement a particular instructional approach or service. Nothing in this section requires school districts to maintain a particular classroom teacher-to-student ratio or other staff-to-student ratio or to use allocated funds to pay for particular types or classifications of staff. Nothing in this section entitles an individual teacher to a particular teacher planning period.

(b) To promote transparency in state funding allocations, the superintendent of public instruction must report state per-pupil allocations for each school district for the general apportionment, special education, learning assistance, transitional bilingual, highly capable, and career and technical education programs. The superintendent must report this information in a user-friendly format on the main page of the office's website. School districts must include a link to the superintendent's per-pupil allocations report on the main page of the school district's website. In addition, the budget documents published by the legislature for the enacted omnibus operating appropriations act must report statewide average per-pupil allocations for general apportionment and the categorical programs listed in this subsection.

(3)(a) To the extent the technical details of the formula have been adopted by the legislature and except when specifically provided as a school district allocation, the distribution formula for the basic education instructional allocation shall be based on minimum staffing and nonstaff costs the legislature deems necessary to support instruction and operations in prototypical schools serving high, middle, and elementary school students as provided in this section. The use of prototypical schools for the distribution formula does not constitute legislative intent that schools should be operated or structured in a similar fashion as the prototypes. Prototypical schools illustrate the level of resources needed to operate a school of a particular size with particular types and grade levels of students using commonly understood terms and inputs, such as class size, hours of instruction, and various categories of school staff. It is the intent that the funding allocations to school districts be adjusted from the school prototypes based on the actual number of annual average full-time equivalent students in each grade level at each school in the district and not based on the grade-level configuration of the school to the extent that data is available. The allocations shall be further adjusted from the school prototypes with minimum allocations for small schools and to reflect other factors identified in the omnibus appropriations act.

(b) For the purposes of this section, prototypical schools are defined as follows:

(i) A prototypical high school has ((six hundred))600 average annual full-time equivalent students in grades nine through ((twelve))12;

(ii) A prototypical middle school has ((four hundred thirty-two))432 average annual full-time equivalent students in grades seven and eight; and

(iii) A prototypical elementary school has ((four hundred))400 average annual full-time equivalent students in grades kindergarten through six.

(4)(a)(i) The minimum allocation for each level of prototypical school shall be based on the number of full-time equivalent classroom teachers needed to provide instruction over the minimum required annual instructional hours under RCW 28A.150.220 and provide at least one teacher planning period per school day, and based on the following general education average class size of full-time equivalent students per teacher:

General education

average class size

Grades K-3. . . . 17.00

Grade 4. . . .27.00

Grades 5-6. . . .27.00

Grades 7-8. . . .28.53

Grades 9-12. . . .28.74

(ii) The minimum class size allocation for each prototypical high school shall also provide for enhanced funding for class size reduction for two laboratory science classes within grades nine through ((twelve))12 per full-time equivalent high school student multiplied by a laboratory science course factor of 0.0833, based on the number of full-time equivalent classroom teachers needed to provide instruction over the minimum required annual instructional hours in RCW 28A.150.220, and providing at least one teacher planning period per school day:

Laboratory science

average class size

Grades 9-12. . . .19.98

(b)(i) Beginning September 1, 2019, funding for average K-3 class sizes in this subsection (4) may be provided only to the extent of, and proportionate to, the school district's demonstrated actual class size in grades K-3, up to the funded class sizes.

(ii) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop rules to implement this subsection (4)(b).

(c)(i) The minimum allocation for each prototypical middle and high school shall also provide for full-time equivalent classroom teachers based on the following number of full-time equivalent students per teacher in career and technical education:

Career and technical

education average

class size

Approved career and technical education offered at

the middle school and high school level. . . .((23.00))19.00

Skill center programs meeting the standards established

by the office of the superintendent of public

instruction. . . .((19.00))16.00

(ii) Funding allocated under this subsection (4)(c) is subject to RCW 28A.150.265.

(d) In addition, the omnibus appropriations act shall at a minimum specify:

(i) A high-poverty average class size in schools where more than ((fifty))50 percent of the students are eligible for free and reduced-price meals; and

(ii) A specialty average class size for advanced placement and international baccalaureate courses.

(5)(a) The minimum allocation for each level of prototypical school shall include allocations for the following types of staff in addition to classroom teachers:

Elementary School

Middle School

High School

Principals, assistant principals, and other certificated building-level administrators. . . .

1.253

1.353

1.880

Teacher-librarians, a function that includes information literacy, technology, and media to support school library media programs. . . .

0.663

0.519

0.523

Teaching assistance, including any aspect of educational instructional services provided by classified employees. . . .

0.936

0.700

0.652

Office support and other noninstructional aides. . . .

2.012

2.325

3.269

Custodians. . . .

1.657

1.942

2.965

Nurses. . . .

0.246

0.336

0.339

Social workers. . . .

0.132

0.033

0.052

Psychologists. . . .

0.046

0.009

0.021

Counselors. . . .

0.660

1.383

2.706

Classified staff providing student and staff safety. . . .

0.079

0.092

0.141

Parent involvement coordinators. . . .

0.0825

0.00

0.00

(b)(i) The superintendent may only allocate funding, up to the combined minimum allocations, for nurses, social workers, psychologists, counselors, classified staff providing student and staff safety, and parent involvement coordinators under (a) and (c) of this subsection to the extent of and proportionate to a school district's demonstrated actual ratios of: Full-time equivalent physical, social, and emotional support staff to full-time equivalent students.

(ii) The superintendent must adopt rules to implement this subsection (5)(b) and the rules must require school districts to prioritize funding allocated as required by (b)(i) of this subsection for physical, social, and emotional support staff who hold a valid educational staff associate certificate appropriate for the staff's role.

(iii) For the purposes of this subsection (5)(b), "physical, social, and emotional support staff" include nurses, social workers, psychologists, counselors, classified staff providing student and staff safety, parent involvement coordinators, and other school district employees and contractors who provide physical, social, and emotional support to students as defined by the superintendent.

(c) For the 2023-24 school year, in addition to the minimum allocation under (a) of this subsection, the following additional staffing units for each level of prototypical school will be provided:

Elementary School

Middle School

High School

Nurses. . . .

0.170

0.276

0.243

Social workers. . . .

0.090

0.027

0.037

Psychologists. . . .

0.029

0.007

0.014

Counselors. . . .

0.167

0.167

0.176

(6)(a) The minimum staffing allocation for each school district to provide district-wide support services shall be allocated per ((one thousand))1,000 annual average full-time equivalent students in grades K-12 as follows:

Staff per 1,000

K-12 students

Technology. . . .0.628

Facilities, maintenance, and grounds. . . .1.813

Warehouse, laborers, and mechanics. . . .0.332

(b) The minimum allocation of staff units for each school district to support certificated and classified staffing of central administration shall be 5.30 percent of the staff units generated under subsections (4)(a) and (5) of this section and (a) of this subsection.

(7) The distribution formula shall include staffing allocations to school districts for career and technical education and skill center administrative and other school-level certificated staff, as specified in the omnibus appropriations act.

(8)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the minimum allocation for each school district shall include allocations per annual average full-time equivalent student for the following materials, supplies, and operating costs as provided in the 2017-18 school year, after which the allocations shall be adjusted annually for inflation as specified in the omnibus appropriations act:

Per annual average

full-time equivalent student

in grades K-12

Technology. . . . $130.76

Utilities and insurance. . . . $355.30

Curriculum and textbooks. . . . $140.39

Other supplies . . . . $278.05

Library materials. . . .$20.00

Instructional professional development for certificated and

classified staff. . . . $21.71

Facilities maintenance. . . . $176.01

Security and central office administration. . . . $121.94

(b) In addition to the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection, beginning in the 2014-15 school year, the omnibus appropriations act shall provide the following minimum allocation for each annual average full-time equivalent student in grades nine through ((twelve))12 for the following materials, supplies, and operating costs, to be adjusted annually for inflation:

Per annual average

full-time equivalent student

in grades 9-12

Technology. . . .$36.35

Curriculum and textbooks. . . .$39.02

Other supplies . . . . $77.28

Library materials. . . .$5.56

Instructional professional development for certificated and

classified staff. . . .$6.04

(9) In addition to the amounts provided in subsection (8) of this section and subject to RCW 28A.150.265, the omnibus appropriations act shall provide an amount based on full-time equivalent student enrollment in each of the following:

(a) Exploratory career and technical education courses for students in grades seven through ((twelve))12;

(b) Preparatory career and technical education courses for students in grades nine through ((twelve))12 offered in a high school; and

(c) Preparatory career and technical education courses for students in grades ((eleven))11 and ((twelve))12 offered through a skill center.

(10) In addition to the allocations otherwise provided under this section, amounts shall be provided to support the following programs and services:

(a)(i) To provide supplemental instruction and services for students who are not meeting academic standards through the learning assistance program under RCW 28A.165.005 through 28A.165.065, allocations shall be based on the greater of either: The district percentage of students in kindergarten through grade ((twelve))12 who were eligible for free or reduced-price meals for the school year immediately preceding the district's participation, in whole or part, in the United States department of agriculture's community eligibility provision, or the district percentage of students in grades K-12 who were eligible for free or reduced-price meals in the prior school year. The minimum allocation for the program shall provide for each level of prototypical school resources to provide, on a statewide average, 2.3975 hours per week in extra instruction with a class size of ((fifteen))12 learning assistance program students per teacher.

(ii) In addition to funding allocated under (a)(i) of this subsection, to provide supplemental instruction and services for students who are not meeting academic standards in qualifying schools. A qualifying school means a school in which the three-year rolling average of the prior year total annual average enrollment that qualifies for free or reduced-price meals equals or exceeds ((fifty))50 percent or more of its total annual average enrollment. A school continues to meet the definition of a qualifying school if the school: Participates in the United States department of agriculture's community eligibility provision; and met the definition of a qualifying school in the year immediately preceding their participation. The minimum allocation for this additional high poverty-based allocation must provide for each level of prototypical school resources to provide, on a statewide average, ((1.1))1.15 hours per week in extra instruction with a class size of ((fifteen))12 learning assistance program students per teacher, under RCW 28A.165.055, school districts must distribute the high poverty-based allocation to the schools that generated the funding allocation.

(b)(i) To provide supplemental instruction and services for students whose primary language is other than English, allocations shall be based on the head count number of students in each school who are eligible for and enrolled in the transitional bilingual instruction program under RCW 28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080. The minimum allocation for each level of prototypical school shall provide resources to provide, on a statewide average, 4.7780 hours per week in extra instruction for students in grades kindergarten through six and 6.7780 hours per week in extra instruction for students in grades seven through ((twelve))12, with ((fifteen))15 transitional bilingual instruction program students per teacher. Notwithstanding other provisions of this subsection (10), the actual per-student allocation may be scaled to provide a larger allocation for students needing more intensive intervention and a commensurate reduced allocation for students needing less intensive intervention, as detailed in the omnibus appropriations act.

(ii) To provide supplemental instruction and services for students who have exited the transitional bilingual program, allocations shall be based on the head count number of students in each school who have exited the transitional bilingual program within the previous two years based on their performance on the English proficiency assessment and are eligible for and enrolled in the transitional bilingual instruction program under RCW 28A.180.040(1)(g). The minimum allocation for each prototypical school shall provide resources to provide, on a statewide average, 3.0 hours per week in extra instruction with ((fifteen))15 exited students per teacher.

(c) To provide additional allocations to support programs for highly capable students under RCW 28A.185.010 through 28A.185.030, allocations shall be based on ((5.0))7.0 percent of each school district's full-time equivalent basic education enrollment. The minimum allocation for the programs shall provide resources to provide, on a statewide average, 2.1590 hours per week in extra instruction with ((fifteen))15 highly capable program students per teacher.

(11) The allocations under subsections (4)(a), (5), (6), and (8) of this section shall be enhanced as provided under RCW 28A.150.390 on an excess cost basis to provide supplemental instructional resources for students with disabilities.

(12)(a) For the purposes of allocations for prototypical high schools and middle schools under subsections (4) and (10) of this section that are based on the percent of students in the school who are eligible for free and reduced-price meals, the actual percent of such students in a school shall be adjusted by a factor identified in the omnibus appropriations act to reflect underreporting of free and reduced-price meal eligibility among middle and high school students.

(b) Allocations or enhancements provided under subsections (4), (7), and (9) of this section for exploratory and preparatory career and technical education courses shall be provided only for courses approved by the office of the superintendent of public instruction under chapter 28A.700 RCW.

(13)(a) This formula for distribution of basic education funds shall be reviewed biennially by the superintendent and governor. The recommended formula shall be subject to approval, amendment or rejection by the legislature.

(b) In the event the legislature rejects the distribution formula recommended by the governor, without adopting a new distribution formula, the distribution formula for the previous school year shall remain in effect.

(c) The enrollment of any district shall be the annual average number of full-time equivalent students and part-time students as provided in RCW 28A.150.350, enrolled on the first school day of each month, including students who are in attendance pursuant to RCW 28A.335.160 and 28A.225.250 who do not reside within the servicing school district. The definition of full-time equivalent student shall be determined by rules of the superintendent of public instruction and shall be included as part of the superintendent's biennial budget request. The definition shall be based on the minimum instructional hour offerings required under RCW 28A.150.220. Any revision of the present definition shall not take effect until approved by the house ways and means committee and the senate ways and means committee.

(d) The office of financial management shall make a monthly review of the superintendent's reported full-time equivalent students in the common schools in conjunction with RCW 43.62.050.

Sec. 11. RCW 28A.150.260 and 2022 c 109 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The purpose of this section is to provide for the allocation of state funding that the legislature deems necessary to support school districts in offering the minimum instructional program of basic education under RCW 28A.150.220. The allocation shall be determined as follows:

(1) The governor shall and the superintendent of public instruction may recommend to the legislature a formula for the distribution of a basic education instructional allocation for each common school district.

(2)(a) The distribution formula under this section shall be for allocation purposes only. Except as may be required under subsections (4)(b) and (c), (5)(b), and (9) of this section, chapter 28A.155, 28A.165, 28A.180, or 28A.185 RCW, or federal laws and regulations, nothing in this section requires school districts to use basic education instructional funds to implement a particular instructional approach or service. Nothing in this section requires school districts to maintain a particular classroom teacher-to-student ratio or other staff-to-student ratio or to use allocated funds to pay for particular types or classifications of staff. Nothing in this section entitles an individual teacher to a particular teacher planning period.

(b) To promote transparency in state funding allocations, the superintendent of public instruction must report state per-pupil allocations for each school district for the general apportionment, special education, learning assistance, transitional bilingual, highly capable, and career and technical education programs. The superintendent must report this information in a user-friendly format on the main page of the office's website. School districts must include a link to the superintendent's per-pupil allocations report on the main page of the school district's website. In addition, the budget documents published by the legislature for the enacted omnibus operating appropriations act must report statewide average per-pupil allocations for general apportionment and the categorical programs listed in this subsection.

(3)(a) To the extent the technical details of the formula have been adopted by the legislature and except when specifically provided as a school district allocation, the distribution formula for the basic education instructional allocation shall be based on minimum staffing and nonstaff costs the legislature deems necessary to support instruction and operations in prototypical schools serving high, middle, and elementary school students as provided in this section. The use of prototypical schools for the distribution formula does not constitute legislative intent that schools should be operated or structured in a similar fashion as the prototypes. Prototypical schools illustrate the level of resources needed to operate a school of a particular size with particular types and grade levels of students using commonly understood terms and inputs, such as class size, hours of instruction, and various categories of school staff. It is the intent that the funding allocations to school districts be adjusted from the school prototypes based on the actual number of annual average full-time equivalent students in each grade level at each school in the district and not based on the grade-level configuration of the school to the extent that data is available. The allocations shall be further adjusted from the school prototypes with minimum allocations for small schools and to reflect other factors identified in the omnibus appropriations act.

(b) For the purposes of this section, prototypical schools are defined as follows:

(i) A prototypical high school has ((six hundred))600 average annual full-time equivalent students in grades nine through ((twelve))12;

(ii) A prototypical middle school has ((four hundred thirty-two))432 average annual full-time equivalent students in grades seven and eight; and

(iii) A prototypical elementary school has ((four hundred))400 average annual full-time equivalent students in grades kindergarten through six.

(4)(a)(i) The minimum allocation for each level of prototypical school shall be based on the number of full-time equivalent classroom teachers needed to provide instruction over the minimum required annual instructional hours under RCW 28A.150.220 and provide at least one teacher planning period per school day, and based on the following general education average class size of full-time equivalent students per teacher:

General education

average class size

Grades K-3. . . . 17.00

Grade 4. . . .27.00

Grades 5-6. . . .27.00

Grades 7-8. . . .28.53

Grades 9-12. . . .28.74

(ii) The minimum class size allocation for each prototypical high school shall also provide for enhanced funding for class size reduction for two laboratory science classes within grades nine through twelve per full-time equivalent high school student multiplied by a laboratory science course factor of 0.0833, based on the number of full-time equivalent classroom teachers needed to provide instruction over the minimum required annual instructional hours in RCW 28A.150.220, and providing at least one teacher planning period per school day:

Laboratory science

average class size

Grades 9-12. . . .19.98

(b)(i) Beginning September 1, 2019, funding for average K-3 class sizes in this subsection (4) may be provided only to the extent of, and proportionate to, the school district's demonstrated actual class size in grades K-3, up to the funded class sizes.

(ii) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop rules to implement this subsection (4)(b).

(c)(i) The minimum allocation for each prototypical middle and high school shall also provide for full-time equivalent classroom teachers based on the following number of full-time equivalent students per teacher in career and technical education:

Career and technical

education average

class size

Approved career and technical education offered at

the middle school and high school level. . . .((23.00))19.00

Skill center programs meeting the standards established

by the office of the superintendent of public

instruction. . . .((19.00))16.00

(ii) Funding allocated under this subsection (4)(c) is subject to RCW 28A.150.265.

(d) In addition, the omnibus appropriations act shall at a minimum specify:

(i) A high-poverty average class size in schools where more than ((fifty))50 percent of the students are eligible for free and reduced-price meals; and

(ii) A specialty average class size for advanced placement and international baccalaureate courses.

(5)(a) The minimum allocation for each level of prototypical school shall include allocations for the following types of staff in addition to classroom teachers:

Elementary School

Middle School

High School

Principals, assistant principals, and other certificated building-level administrators. . . .

1.253

1.353

1.880

Teacher-librarians, a function that includes information literacy, technology, and media to support school library media programs. . . .

0.663

0.519

0.523

Teaching assistance, including any aspect of educational instructional services provided by classified employees. . . .

0.936

0.700

0.652

Office support and other noninstructional aides. . . .

2.012

2.325

3.269

Custodians. . . .

1.657

1.942

2.965

Nurses. . . .

0.585

0.888

0.824

Social workers. . . .

0.311

0.088

0.127

Psychologists. . . .

0.104

0.024

0.049

Counselors. . . .

0.993

1.716

3.039

Classified staff providing student and staff safety. . . .

0.079

0.092

0.141

Parent involvement coordinators. . . .

0.0825

0.00

0.00

(b)(i) The superintendent may only allocate funding, up to the combined minimum allocations, for nurses, social workers, psychologists, counselors, classified staff providing student and staff safety, and parent involvement coordinators under (a) of this subsection to the extent of and proportionate to a school district's demonstrated actual ratios of: Full-time equivalent physical, social, and emotional support staff to full-time equivalent students.

(ii) The superintendent must adopt rules to implement this subsection (5)(b) and the rules must require school districts to prioritize funding allocated as required by (b)(i) of this subsection for physical, social, and emotional support staff who hold a valid educational staff associate certificate appropriate for the staff's role.

(iii) For the purposes of this subsection (5)(b), "physical, social, and emotional support staff" include nurses, social workers, psychologists, counselors, classified staff providing student and staff safety, parent involvement coordinators, and other school district employees and contractors who provide physical, social, and emotional support to students as defined by the superintendent.

(6)(a) The minimum staffing allocation for each school district to provide district-wide support services shall be allocated per ((one thousand))1,000 annual average full-time equivalent students in grades K-12 as follows:

Staff per 1,000

K-12 students

Technology. . . .0.628

Facilities, maintenance, and grounds. . . .1.813

Warehouse, laborers, and mechanics. . . .0.332

(b) The minimum allocation of staff units for each school district to support certificated and classified staffing of central administration shall be 5.30 percent of the staff units generated under subsections (4)(a) and (5) of this section and (a) of this subsection.

(7) The distribution formula shall include staffing allocations to school districts for career and technical education and skill center administrative and other school-level certificated staff, as specified in the omnibus appropriations act.

(8)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the minimum allocation for each school district shall include allocations per annual average full-time equivalent student for the following materials, supplies, and operating costs as provided in the 2017-18 school year, after which the allocations shall be adjusted annually for inflation as specified in the omnibus appropriations act:

Per annual average

full-time equivalent student

in grades K-12

Technology. . . . $130.76

Utilities and insurance. . . . $355.30

Curriculum and textbooks. . . . $140.39

Other supplies . . . . $278.05

Library materials. . . .$20.00

Instructional professional development for certificated and

classified staff. . . . $21.71

Facilities maintenance. . . . $176.01

Security and central office administration. . . . $121.94

(b) In addition to the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection, beginning in the 2014-15 school year, the omnibus appropriations act shall provide the following minimum allocation for each annual average full-time equivalent student in grades nine through ((twelve))12 for the following materials, supplies, and operating costs, to be adjusted annually for inflation:

Per annual average

full-time equivalent student

in grades 9-12

Technology. . . .$36.35

Curriculum and textbooks. . . .$39.02

Other supplies . . . . $77.28

Library materials. . . .$5.56

Instructional professional development for certificated and

classified staff. . . .$6.04

(9) In addition to the amounts provided in subsection (8) of this section and subject to RCW 28A.150.265, the omnibus appropriations act shall provide an amount based on full-time equivalent student enrollment in each of the following:

(a) Exploratory career and technical education courses for students in grades seven through ((twelve))12;

(b) Preparatory career and technical education courses for students in grades nine through twelve offered in a high school; and

(c) Preparatory career and technical education courses for students in grades eleven and twelve offered through a skill center.

(10) In addition to the allocations otherwise provided under this section, amounts shall be provided to support the following programs and services:

(a)(i) To provide supplemental instruction and services for students who are not meeting academic standards through the learning assistance program under RCW 28A.165.005 through 28A.165.065, allocations shall be based on the greater of either: The district percentage of students in kindergarten through grade ((twelve))12 who were eligible for free or reduced-price meals for the school year immediately preceding the district's participation, in whole or part, in the United States department of agriculture's community eligibility provision, or the district percentage of students in grades K-12 who were eligible for free or reduced-price meals in the prior school year. The minimum allocation for the program shall provide for each level of prototypical school resources to provide, on a statewide average, 2.3975 hours per week in extra instruction with a class size of ((fifteen))12 learning assistance program students per teacher.

(ii) In addition to funding allocated under (a)(i) of this subsection, to provide supplemental instruction and services for students who are not meeting academic standards in qualifying schools. A qualifying school means a school in which the three-year rolling average of the prior year total annual average enrollment that qualifies for free or reduced-price meals equals or exceeds ((fifty))50 percent or more of its total annual average enrollment. A school continues to meet the definition of a qualifying school if the school: Participates in the United States department of agriculture's community eligibility provision; and met the definition of a qualifying school in the year immediately preceding their participation. The minimum allocation for this additional high poverty-based allocation must provide for each level of prototypical school resources to provide, on a statewide average, ((1.1))1.15 hours per week in extra instruction with a class size of ((fifteen))12 learning assistance program students per teacher, under RCW 28A.165.055, school districts must distribute the high poverty-based allocation to the schools that generated the funding allocation.

(b)(i) To provide supplemental instruction and services for students whose primary language is other than English, allocations shall be based on the head count number of students in each school who are eligible for and enrolled in the transitional bilingual instruction program under RCW 28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080. The minimum allocation for each level of prototypical school shall provide resources to provide, on a statewide average, 4.7780 hours per week in extra instruction for students in grades kindergarten through six and 6.7780 hours per week in extra instruction for students in grades seven through ((twelve))12, with ((fifteen))15 transitional bilingual instruction program students per teacher. Notwithstanding other provisions of this subsection (10), the actual per-student allocation may be scaled to provide a larger allocation for students needing more intensive intervention and a commensurate reduced allocation for students needing less intensive intervention, as detailed in the omnibus appropriations act.

(ii) To provide supplemental instruction and services for students who have exited the transitional bilingual program, allocations shall be based on the head count number of students in each school who have exited the transitional bilingual program within the previous two years based on their performance on the English proficiency assessment and are eligible for and enrolled in the transitional bilingual instruction program under RCW 28A.180.040(1)(g). The minimum allocation for each prototypical school shall provide resources to provide, on a statewide average, 3.0 hours per week in extra instruction with ((fifteen))15 exited students per teacher.

(c) To provide additional allocations to support programs for highly capable students under RCW 28A.185.010 through 28A.185.030, allocations shall be based on ((5.0))7.0 percent of each school district's full-time equivalent basic education enrollment. The minimum allocation for the programs shall provide resources to provide, on a statewide average, 2.1590 hours per week in extra instruction with ((fifteen))15 highly capable program students per teacher.

(11) The allocations under subsections (4)(a), (5), (6), and (8) of this section shall be enhanced as provided under RCW 28A.150.390 on an excess cost basis to provide supplemental instructional resources for students with disabilities.

(12)(a) For the purposes of allocations for prototypical high schools and middle schools under subsections (4) and (10) of this section that are based on the percent of students in the school who are eligible for free and reduced-price meals, the actual percent of such students in a school shall be adjusted by a factor identified in the omnibus appropriations act to reflect underreporting of free and reduced-price meal eligibility among middle and high school students.

(b) Allocations or enhancements provided under subsections (4), (7), and (9) of this section for exploratory and preparatory career and technical education courses shall be provided only for courses approved by the office of the superintendent of public instruction under chapter 28A.700 RCW.

(13)(a) This formula for distribution of basic education funds shall be reviewed biennially by the superintendent and governor. The recommended formula shall be subject to approval, amendment or rejection by the legislature.

(b) In the event the legislature rejects the distribution formula recommended by the governor, without adopting a new distribution formula, the distribution formula for the previous school year shall remain in effect.

(c) The enrollment of any district shall be the annual average number of full-time equivalent students and part-time students as provided in RCW 28A.150.350, enrolled on the first school day of each month, including students who are in attendance pursuant to RCW 28A.335.160 and 28A.225.250 who do not reside within the servicing school district. The definition of full-time equivalent student shall be determined by rules of the superintendent of public instruction and shall be included as part of the superintendent's biennial budget request. The definition shall be based on the minimum instructional hour offerings required under RCW 28A.150.220. Any revision of the present definition shall not take effect until approved by the house ways and means committee and the senate ways and means committee.

(d) The office of financial management shall make a monthly review of the superintendent's reported full-time equivalent students in the common schools in conjunction with RCW 43.62.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12. Section 10 of this act expires September 1, 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13. Section 11 of this act takes effect September 1, 2024.

--- END ---