BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of clay targets purchased by a nonprofit gun club for use in providing the activity of clay target shooting for a fee.

(2) The exemption is available only when the buyer provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for the seller's files. For sellers who electronically file their taxes, the department must provide a separate tax reporting line for exemption amounts claimed under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the use by a nonprofit gun club of clay targets that are provided while conducting the activity of clay target shooting for a fee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. RCW 82.32.805 and 82.32.808 do not apply to this act.

--- END ---