BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that Washington residents would benefit from having a quick and seamless digital way to connect to public and private services. The legislature further finds that the work group created in this act will have the expertise and experience to bring together ideas for developing a "Whole WA" mobile application that may assist Washington residents in gaining access to a variety of existing services, such as social, behavioral health, and housing services. While many providers, both public and private, offer these types of services in Washington, the residents of our state do not always have an easy way to learn more about, and use, those services. It is the intent of the legislature that the work group created in this act will produce a plan for developing a "Whole WA" mobile application that will easily connect Washingtonians to the services they may need.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the consolidated technology services agency, in partnership with the office of financial management, shall convene a work group to develop a "Whole WA" digital experience mobile application.

(2) The purpose of the work group created in this section is to develop a plan and framework for launching a centralized technology platform and mobile application in order to transform Washington residents' digital experience with government and service providers by making public and private services and programs more accessible. The mobile application must be called "Whole WA." In developing the framework, the work group must:

(a) Recommend specific services or programs for inclusion in the technology platform and mobile application including, but not limited to, services related to children and families, financial assistance, driver services, behavioral health, recreation, public safety, housing, and substance use disorders;

(b) Discuss the technical requirements for providing Washington residents access to public and private services and programs through a centralized technology platform and mobile application and determine any requirements or limitations for consideration when integrating existing applications into a centralized technology platform or mobile application;

(c) Provide recommendations on how to effectively engage with state agencies and private service providers that may want to be included, such as nonprofit organizations, to launch services or programs on the technology platform and mobile application;

(d) Explore the features and specifications needed in order to make the technology platform and mobile application user-friendly;

(e) Reach out to other states that have launched or are working on similar centralized technology platforms or mobile applications in order to determine, learn, and share best practices;

(f) Identify best practices and requirements for ensuring the security and privacy of the technology platform and mobile application; and

(g) Provide suggestions for other factors to consider when developing a centralized technology platform and mobile application including, but not limited to, potential adjustments to work group membership.

(3) The work group is composed of the following members:

(a) The director of Washington technology solutions, the consolidated technology services agency, or the director's designee;

(b) The secretary of the department of social and health services or the secretary's designee;

(c) The secretary of the department of children, youth, and families or the secretary's designee;

(d) The director of the health care authority or the director's designee;

(e) The director of the department of veterans affairs or the director's designee;

(f) The commissioner of the employment security department or the commissioner's designee;

(g) The director of the department of licensing or the director's designee;

(h) The director of the Washington state parks and recreation commission or the director's designee;

(i) The secretary of the Washington state department of transportation or the secretary's designee; and

(j) The secretary of state or the secretary's designee.

(4) The work group created in this section must also include as members:

(a) One senator from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate, appointed by the president of the senate; and

(b) One representative from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives.

(5) In addition to the members of the work group under subsections (3) and (4) of this section, individuals representing relevant sectors may be invited by the chair of the work group, in consultation with the other members of the work group, to participate in an advisory capacity in meetings of the work group. Individuals participating in an advisory capacity under this subsection are not members of the work group and may not vote. There is no limit to the number of individuals who may participate in work group meetings in an advisory capacity under this subsection.

(6) A majority of the work group members constitutes a quorum. If a member has not been designated for a position set forth in this section, that position may not be counted for the purpose of determining a quorum.

(7) The chair of the work group is the director of Washington technology solutions, the consolidated technology services agency, or the director's designee. The chair of the work group is responsible for arranging meetings and developing meeting agendas.

(8) The work group may create subcommittees to perform duties under this section.

(9) Staff support for the work group must be provided by the consolidated technology services agency.

(10) Legislative members of the work group may be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members of the work group are not entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses if they are elected officials or are participating on behalf of an employer, governmental entity, or other organization. Any reimbursement for other nonlegislative members is subject to chapter 43.03 RCW.

(11) The inaugural meeting of the work group must occur by August 31, 2023.

(12) The work group must submit a report on the framework specified in subsection (2) of this section to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2023.

(13) This section expires January 1, 2024. The work group created in this section is dissolved upon the expiration of this section.

--- END ---