BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.44.0941 and 2010 c 161 s 1117 are each amended to read as follows:

The following fees, in addition to the regular license and tonnage fees, shall be paid for all movements under special permit made upon state highways. All funds collected, except the amount retained by authorized agents of the department as provided in RCW 46.44.096, shall be forwarded to the state treasury and shall be deposited in the motor vehicle fund:

All overlegal loads, except overweight, single

trip. . . .$ 10.00

Continuous operation of overlegal loads

having either overwidth or overheight

features only, for a period not to exceed

((thirty))30 days. . . .$ 20.00

Continuous operations of overlegal loads

having overlength features only, for a

period not to exceed ((thirty))30 days. . . .$ 10.00

Continuous operation of a combination of

vehicles having one trailing unit that

exceeds ((fifty-three))53 feet and is not

more than ((fifty-six))56 feet in length, for

a period of one year. . . .$ 100.00

Continuous operation of a combination of

vehicles having two trailing units

which together exceed ((sixty-one))61 feet and

are not more than ((sixty-eight))68 feet in

length, for a period of one year. . . .$ 100.00

Continuous operation of a combination of

vehicles having two trailing units

hauling fluid/liquid nondivisible milk,

which together exceed 61 feet and

are not more than 85 feet in length, for

a period of one year. . . .$ 300.00

Continuous operation of a three-axle fixed

load vehicle having less than 65,000

pounds gross weight, for a period not

to exceed ((thirty))30 days. . . .$ 70.00

Continuous operation of a four-axle fixed load

vehicle meeting the requirements of

RCW 46.44.091(1) and weighing less than

86,000 pounds gross weight, not to exceed

((thirty))30 days. . . .$ 90.00

Continuous movement of a mobile home or manufactured

home having nonreducible features not to

exceed ((eighty-five))85 feet in total length and

((fourteen))14 feet in width, for a period of

one year. . . .$ 150.00

Continuous operation of a class C tow truck or a

class E tow truck with a class C rating while

performing emergency and nonemergency tows of

oversize or overweight, or both, vehicles and

vehicle combinations, under rules adopted by the

transportation commission, for a period of

one year. . . .$ 150.00

Continuous operation of a class B tow truck or a

class E tow truck with a class B rating while

performing emergency and nonemergency tows of

oversize or overweight, or both, vehicles and

vehicle combinations, under rules adopted by the

transportation commission, for a period of

one year. . . .$ 75.00

Continuous operation of a two or three-axle

collection truck, actually engaged in the

collection of solid waste or recyclables,

or both, under chapter 81.77 or 35.21 RCW

or by contract under RCW 36.58.090, for

one year with an additional ((six thousand))6,000

pounds more than the weight authorized in

RCW 46.16A.455 on the rear axle of a two-axle

truck or ((eight thousand))8,000 pounds for the tandem

axles of a three-axle truck. RCW 46.44.041

and 46.44.091 notwithstanding, the tire limits

specified in RCW 46.44.042 apply, but none of

the excess weight is valid or may be permitted

on any part of the federal interstate highway

system. . . .$ 42.00

per thousand pounds

The department may issue any of the above-listed permits that involve height, length, or width for an expanded period of consecutive months, not to exceed one year.

Continuous operation of farm implements under a permit issued as authorized by RCW 46.44.140 by:

(1) Farmers in the course of farming activities,

for any three-month period. . . .$ 10.00

(2) Farmers in the course of farming activities,

for a period not to exceed one year. . . .$ 25.00

(3) Persons engaged in the business of the

sale, repair, or maintenance of such

farm implements, for any three-month period. . . .$ 25.00

(4) Persons engaged in the business of the

sale, repair, or maintenance of such

farm implements, for a period not to

exceed one year. . . .$ 100.00

Overweight Fee Schedule

Excess weight over legal capacity,

as provided in RCW 46.44.041.

Cost per mile.

0- 9,999 pounds

. . . .

$

.07

10,000-14,999 pounds

. . . .

$

.14

15,000-19,999 pounds

. . . .

$

.21

20,000-24,999 pounds

. . . .

$

.28

25,000-29,999 pounds

. . . .

$

.35

30,000-34,999 pounds

. . . .

$

.49

35,000-39,999 pounds

. . . .

$

.63

40,000-44,999 pounds

. . . .

$

.79

45,000-49,999 pounds

. . . .

$

.93

50,000-54,999 pounds

. . . .

$

1.14

55,000-59,999 pounds

. . . .

$

1.35

60,000-64,999 pounds

. . . .

$

1.56

65,000-69,999 pounds

. . . .

$

1.77

70,000-74,999 pounds

. . . .

$

2.12

75,000-79,999 pounds

. . . .

$

2.47

80,000-84,999 pounds

. . . .

$

2.82

85,000-89,999 pounds

. . . .

$

3.17

90,000-94,999 pounds

. . . .

$

3.52

95,000-99,999 pounds

. . . .

$

3.87

100,000 pounds

. . . .

$

4.25

The fee for weights in excess of 100,000 pounds is $4.25 plus ((fifty))50 cents for each 5,000 pound increment or portion thereof exceeding 100,000 pounds.

PROVIDED: (a) The minimum fee for any overweight permit shall be $14.00, (b) the fee for issuance of a duplicate permit shall be $14.00, (c) when computing overweight fees prescribed in this section or in RCW 46.44.095 that result in an amount less than even dollars the fee shall be carried to the next full dollar if ((fifty))50 cents or over and shall be reduced to the next full dollar if ((forty-nine))49 cents or under.

The fees levied in this section and RCW 46.44.095 do not apply to vehicles owned and operated by the state of Washington, a county within the state, a city or town or metropolitan municipal corporation within the state, or the federal government.

--- END ---