BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 19.27.042 and 1991 c 139 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Effective January 1, 1992, the legislative authorities of cities and counties may adopt an ordinance or resolution to exempt from state building code requirements buildings whose character of use or occupancy has been changed in order to provide housing for indigent persons. The ordinance or resolution allowing the exemption shall include the following conditions:

(a) The exemption is limited to existing buildings located in this state;

(b) Any code deficiencies to be exempted pose no threat to human life, health, or safety;

(c) The building or buildings exempted under this section are owned or administered by a public agency or nonprofit corporation; and

(d) The exemption is authorized for no more than five years on any given building. An exemption for a building may be renewed if the requirements of this section are met for each renewal.

(2) By January 1, 1992, the state building code council shall adopt, by rule, guidelines for cities and counties exempting buildings under subsection (1) of this section.

(3) By July 1, 2026, the state building code council shall adopt, by rule, standards for temporary emergency shelters and make them available for local adoption.

--- END ---