BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The office of the insurance commissioner shall, in collaboration with health carriers in this state, develop strategies to reduce deductibles and other forms of cost sharing for maternity care services, including prenatal care, delivery, and postpartum care, or make these services available to enrollees without a deductible or other cost sharing.

(2) The office of the insurance commissioner shall contract with outside entities as necessary to conduct research or actuarial analysis needed to complete the work required under subsection (1) of this section.

(3) By July 1, 2024, the office of the insurance commissioner shall submit a report to the relevant committees of the legislature outlining strategies to reduce or eliminate deductibles and other forms of cost sharing for maternity care services, including prenatal care, delivery, and postpartum care.

(4) This section expires December 31, 2024.

--- END ---