BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 67.16 RCW to read as follows:

The commission may impose fees, as the commission deems reasonable and appropriate, in compliance with the horseracing integrity and safety act of 2020, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 3051 et seq., as amended. The commission may adopt rules to implement this section.

Sec. 2. RCW 67.16.050 and 1997 c 87 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Every person making application for license to hold a race meet, under the provisions of this chapter shall file an application with the commission which shall set forth the time, the place, the number of days such meet will continue, and such other information as the commission may require. The commission shall be the sole judge of whether or not the race meet shall be licensed and the number of days the meet shall continue. No person who has been convicted of any crime involving moral turpitude shall be issued a license, nor shall any license be issued to any person who has violated the terms or provisions of this chapter, or any of the rules and regulations of the commission made pursuant thereto, or who has failed to pay to the commission any or all sums required under the provisions of this chapter. The license shall specify the number of days the race meet shall continue and the number of races per day, which shall include not less than six nor more than ((eleven))11 live races per day, and for which a fee shall be paid daily in advance of ((five hundred dollars for each live race day for those licensees which had gross receipts from parimutuel machines in excess of fifty million dollars in the previous year and two hundred dollars for each day for meets which had gross receipts from parimutuel machines at or below fifty million dollars in the previous year))$200; in addition any newly authorized live race meets shall pay ((two hundred dollars))$200 per day for the first year: PROVIDED, That if unforeseen obstacles arise, which prevent the holding, or completion of any race meet, the license fee for the meet, or for a portion which cannot be held may be refunded the licensee, if the commission deems the reasons for failure to hold or complete the race meet sufficient. Any unexpired license held by any person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter, or any of the rules or regulations of the commission made pursuant thereto, or who fails to pay to the commission any and all sums required under the provisions of this chapter, shall be subject to cancellation and revocation by the commission. Such cancellation shall be made only after a summary hearing before the commission, of which three days' notice, in writing, shall be given the licensee, specifying the grounds for the proposed cancellation, and at which hearing the licensee shall be given an opportunity to be heard in opposition to the proposed cancellation.

Sec. 3. RCW 67.16.280 and 2016 c 160 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(((a))) The Washington horse racing commission operating account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts collected by the commission under RCW 67.16.105(2) must be deposited into the account. During the 2024 state fiscal year, $1,350,000 must be transferred from the general fund into this account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the operating expenses of the commission and for purposes set forth in subsection (3) of this section. Only the commission or the commission's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

(((b)))(2) The commission has the authority to receive such gifts, grants, and endowments from public or private sources as may be made from time to time in trust or otherwise for the use and purpose of regulating or supporting nonprofit race meets as set forth in RCW 67.16.130 and 67.16.105(1); such gifts, grants, and endowments must also be deposited into the horse racing commission operating account and expended according to the terms of such gift, grant, or endowment.

(((2) In order to provide funding in support of the legislative findings in RCW 67.16.101 (1) through (3), and to provide additional necessary support to the nonprofit race meets beyond the funding provided by RCW 67.16.101(4) and 67.16.102(2), the commission is authorized to spend up to three hundred thousand dollars per fiscal year from its operating account for the purpose of developing the equine industry, maintaining and upgrading racing facilities, and assisting equine health research. When determining how to allocate the funds available for these purposes, the commission must give first consideration to uses that regulate and assist the nonprofit race meets and equine health research. These expenditures may occur only when sufficient funds remain for the continued operations of the horse racing commission.))

(3) Expenditures from the account must be used for the operating expenses of the commission, with the remaining amount distributed annually as follows:

(a) 10 percent for grants to nonprofit entities involved with equine rescue and rehoming organizations;

(b) 90 percent to:

(i) Class 1 racing associations allocated by grant by the Washington horse racing commission only for payment of the annual horseracing integrity and safety authority gross assessment for Washington state. The gross assessment may include required expenses for veterinarians, advanced life support ambulances, advanced life support ambulance staff, and emergency medical technicians.

(ii) Support the legislative findings in RCW 67.16.101 (1) through (3) and provide additional necessary support to the nonprofit race meets beyond the funding provided by RCW 67.16.101(4) and 67.16.102(2), for the purpose of developing the equine industry, maintaining and upgrading racing facilities, and assisting equine health research. When determining how to allocate the funds available for these purposes, the Washington horse racing commission must give first consideration to uses that regulate and assist the nonprofit race meets and equine health research. These expenditures may occur only when sufficient funds remain for the continued operations of the horse racing commission after the payment of the horseracing integrity and safety authority gross assessment costs.

(4) By December 1, 2024, and annually thereafter, the commission must report to the appropriate committees of the legislature on the use of grant funds and criteria used to determine grant awards established in subsection (3) of this section and uses of funds distributed to the commission for operating expenses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. If specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2024, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and void.

--- END ---