BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that more and more Washingtonians are driving vehicles powered by electricity and that it is vital that the electric vehicle charging infrastructure keep pace with this accelerating trend. Many businesses desire to install electric vehicle charging stations, which nearly always requires working closely with electric utilities to install infrastructure from the utility's distribution system to the business. In many cases, electrical companies have not adopted tariffs that address these line extensions, resulting in delays and uncertainty regarding the allocation of the costs of such infrastructure between the utility and the facility installing the charging equipment.

Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature that the utilities and transportation commission adopt a policy providing guidance to electrical companies regulated by the commission for the incorporation into company rates the recovery of the costs of these line extensions on the utility's side of the customer's meter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 80.28 RCW to read as follows:

(1) By January 1, 2024, the commission shall adopt by rule a policy to provide guidance to electrical companies in the recovery through rates of the costs of installation, maintenance, and operation of electrical distribution infrastructure on the utility's side of the meter to commercial customers installing electric vehicle supply equipment. The policy must require treatment of this infrastructure and associated design, engineering, and construction work the same as other distribution infrastructure authorized for recovery in the company's rates. The commission may revise the policy from time to time when necessary to ensure the rates are just, sufficient, and reasonable.

(2) By July 1, 2024, each electrical company shall file with the commission its proposed tariff for the recovery of the costs eligible under the policy in subsection (1) of this section. The commission shall consider the filing under the procedures and standards under this chapter and rules adopted by the commission for rate case proceedings.

(3) For the purposes of this section, "electrical distribution infrastructure" includes poles, vaults, service drops, transformers, mounting pads, trenching, conduit, wire, cable, meters, other equipment as necessary, and associated engineering and civil construction work.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. Section 2 of this act must be codified immediately following RCW 80.28.365.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---