BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.17 RCW to read as follows:

Each state agency must clearly identify on the agency's website all programs or services administered by the agency for which applicants are not ineligible solely due to deferred action for childhood arrival status.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. Nothing in this act creates a requirement for any entity to update or revise existing materials, documents, or publications.

--- END ---