BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 9.91 RCW to read as follows:

A person who has the care and custody, whether temporary or permanent, of a minor child under the age of nine years, and knowingly leaves the child unattended by an adult in a parked automobile, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The sum of $100,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2025, from the general fund to the department of health, for the purposes of promoting awareness of this act and the dangers inherent in leaving young children unattended in a vehicle.

--- END ---