BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.300.750 and 2018 c 177 s 502 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) In accordance with the criteria adopted by the state board of education under subsection (2) of this section, the superintendent of public instruction may grant waivers to school districts, state-tribal education compact schools established under chapter 28A.715 RCW, and charter public schools established under chapter 28A.710 RCW from the provisions of RCW 28A.150.200 through 28A.150.220, except as provided in (b) of this subsection, on the basis that such waiver or waivers are necessary to implement successfully a local plan to provide for all students in the district, state-tribal education compact school, or charter public school an effective education system that is designed to enhance the educational program for each student. The local plan may include alternative ways to provide effective educational programs for students who experience difficulty with the regular education program.

(b) The state board of education shall have authority to grant waivers to school districts, state-tribal education compact schools established under chapter 28A.715 RCW, and charter public schools established under chapter 28A.710 RCW from the provisions of RCW 28A.150.220(3)(b) and to grant the waivers set forth in RCW 28A.230.090(1)(e)(ii) and 28A.655.180.

(2) The state board of education shall adopt rules establishing the criteria to evaluate the need for a waiver or waivers under this section.

--- END ---