BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that eliminating the sale of fur products in the state of Washington will decrease demand for cruel products, reduce public health risks, promote community awareness of animal welfare, foster a more humane environment, and enhance the reputation of the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Fur" means any animal skin or part thereof with hair, fleece, or fur fibers attached, either in its raw or processed state.

(2)(a) "Fur product" means any article of clothing or covering for any part of the body, or any fashion accessory including, but not limited to, handbags, shoes, slippers, hats, earmuffs, scarves, shawls, gloves, jewelry, keychains, toys or trinkets, and home accessories and decor, that is made in whole or in part of fur.

(b) "Fur product" does not include any of the following:

(i) An animal skin or part thereof that is to be converted into leather, which in processing will have the hair, fleece, or fur fiber completely removed;

(ii) Cowhide with hair attached;

(iii) Deerskin, sheepskin, lambskin, or goatskin with hair attached; or

(iv) The pelt or skin of an animal that is preserved through taxidermy or for the purpose of taxidermy.

(3) "Nonprofit organization" means any corporation that is organized under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) that is created for charitable, religious, philanthropic, educational, or similar purposes.

(4) "Taxidermy" means the practice of preparing, stuffing, and mounting the skin, in lifelike form, of any deceased fish, reptile, amphibian, bird, or mammal.

(5) "Ultimate consumer" means an individual who buys a fur product for their own use or for the use of another, but not for resale or trade.

(6) "Used fur product" means a fur product that has been worn or used by an ultimate consumer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. (1) It is unlawful to sell, offer for sale, display for sale, trade, or otherwise distribute for monetary or nonmonetary consideration a fur product in the state. For the purposes of this section, the sale of a fur product is deemed to occur in Washington if the seller is located in Washington or the buyer takes physical possession of the fur product in Washington.

(2) The prohibition set forth in subsection (1) of this section does not apply to the following:

(a) A used fur product offered for sale by an individual but excluding a retail transaction; a nonprofit organization; or a second hand store, including a pawn shop;

(b) A federally recognized Indian tribe; or

(c) Any activity expressly authorized by federal law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This act takes effect January 1, 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---