BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.335 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The school security and preparedness infrastructure grant program is created in the office of the superintendent of public instruction. Subject to the availability of funds appropriated for this purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must establish a competitive grant program to increase the physical security of K-12 public school facilities and campuses.

(2) Public school districts are eligible to apply for the grants. Eligible projects include:

(a) Entrance and door security;

(b) Fencing;

(c) Perimeter security infrastructure;

(d) Construction or infrastructure projects designed to direct the public entering school grounds through as few entrances as possible, such as through the main entrance of a school administrative office;

(e) Repair or upgrades of existing physical security infrastructure;

(f) Infrastructure designed to assist with or expedite law enforcement response to a threat or emergency within the school grounds; and

(g) Planning grants for improved security on campuses.

(3) No more than three percent of each grant may be expended by the grant recipients for management and administration of the grant.

(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must develop an application process and project evaluation criteria to evaluate applications. Priority for awards must be based on physical security needs and resulting improved safety. No award per district may exceed $2,000,000 in a biennium.

(5) Beginning December 1, 2024, and annually thereafter, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must provide a progress report to the fiscal committees of the legislature. The report must include:

(a) The total amount of applications and amount of funding requested; and

(b) A list and description of projects approved for funding.

--- END ---