BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that the state of Washington is in a housing crisis. The best way to combat this crisis is to simplify and streamline the ability to build inexpensive affordable homes.

Sec. 2. RCW 19.27.015 and 2018 c 207 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this chapter:

(1) "Agricultural structure" means a structure designed and constructed to house farm implements, hay, grain, poultry, livestock, or other horticultural products. This structure may not be a place of human habitation or a place of employment where agricultural products are processed, treated, or packaged, nor may it be a place used by the public.

(2) "City" means a city or town.

(3) "Commercial building permit" means a building permit issued by a city or a county to construct, enlarge, alter, repair, move, demolish, or change the occupancy of any building not covered by a residential building permit.

(4) "Kit homes" mean structures:

(a) Designed and constructed in a factory to sufficient life, health, and safety standards as outlined in the United States department of housing and urban development code; and

(b) Inspected at the factory by the department of labor and industries for in-state factories, or inspected by the functional equivalent of the department of labor and industries for out-of-state factories.

(5) "Multifamily residential building" means common wall residential buildings that consist of four or fewer units, that do not exceed two stories in height, that are less than five thousand square feet in area, and that have a one-hour fire-resistive occupancy separation between units.

(((5)))(6) "Residential building permit" means a building permit issued by a city or a county to construct, enlarge, alter, repair, move, demolish, or change the occupancy of any building containing only dwelling units used for independent living of one or more persons including permanent provisions for living, sleeping, eating, cooking, and sanitation, and structures accessory to dwelling units, such as detached garages and storage buildings.

(((6)))(7) "Temporary growing structure" means a structure that has the sides and roof covered with polyethylene, polyvinyl, or similar flexible synthetic material and is used to provide plants with either frost protection or increased heat retention.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 19.27 RCW to read as follows:

Kit homes under 800 square feet on private property or on public property within a planned unit development are exempt from this chapter subject to permitting by incorporated cities or towns and local fire safety regulations.

--- END ---