BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that both the Second Amendment to the United States Constitution, and Article 1, section 24 of the Washington state Constitution, protect the right of individuals to bear arms in defense of themselves and shall not be impaired. As such, any law adopted by the state that creates firearms industry members' liability, or that bans a particular type of firearm is deemed unconstitutional. Such laws are held ineffective, void, and unenforceable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) 2023 c . . . (Senate Bill No. 5193) s 1 (uncodified);

(2) 2023 c . . . (Senate Bill No. 5193) s 2;

(3) RCW 9.41.--- and 2023 c . . . (Senate Bill No. 5193) s 3; and

(4) RCW 9.41.--- and 2023 c . . . (Senate Bill No. 5193) s 4.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) 2023 c . . . (House Bill No. 1180) s 1 (uncodified);

(2) 2023 c . . . (House Bill No. 1180) s 2;

(3) RCW 9.41.--- and 2023 c . . . (House Bill No. 1180) s 3; and

(4) RCW 9.41.--- and 2023 c . . . (House Bill No. 1180) s 4.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) 2023 c . . . (Senate Bill No. 5265) s 1 (uncodified);

(2) 2023 c . . . (Senate Bill No. 5265) s 2;

(3) RCW 9.41.--- and 2023 c . . . (Senate Bill No. 5265) s 3; and

(4) RCW 9.41.--- and 2023 c . . . (Senate Bill No. 5265) s 4.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) 2023 c . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 1240) s 1 (uncodified);

(2) 2023 c . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 1240) s 2;

(3) RCW 9.41.--- and 2023 c . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 1240) s 3; and

(4) RCW 9.41.--- and 2023 c . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 1240) s 4.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) 2023 c . . . (Senate Bill No. 5078) s 1 (uncodified); and

(2) RCW 7.48.--- and 2023 c . . . (Senate Bill No. 5078) s 2.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) 2023 c . . . (House Bill No. 1130) s 1 (uncodified); and

(2) RCW 7.48.--- and 2023 c . . . (House Bill No. 1130) s 2.

--- END ---