BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 74.15.311 and 2013 c 105 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The secretary is authorized to license resource and assessment centers if the agency meets the following requirements:

(a) There is a demonstrated need in the local community for a resource and assessment center; and

(b) The resource and assessment center will be primarily staffed by trained volunteers((; and

(c) The resource and assessment center demonstrates it is not financially dependent on reimbursement from the state to operate)).

(2) The department may adopt rules to specify licensing requirements for resource and assessment centers. Rules adopted by the department shall allow:

(a) A sufficient number of trained volunteers to meet staffing requirements;

(b) Flexibility in hours of operation and not require the resource and assessment center to be open if there are no children in its care; and

(c) The ability to operate in a residential area.

(3) Resource and assessment centers licensed under this section may:

(a) Provide care for children ages birth through ((twelve, or for children ages thirteen through seventeen who have a sibling or siblings under thirteen years of age who are being admitted to the resource and assessment center))17 at the discretion of the resource and assessment center; ((and))

(b) Operate up to ((twenty-four))24 hours per day, and for up to seven days per week((.

(4) Resource and assessment centers may not be));

(c) Provide care for children for up to three business days, or up to seven business days with department approval;

(d) Be used to ((address))provide emergency initial care for children as they enter foster care; and

(e) Address placement disruptions for children who have not been removed from a foster home because of the child's behavior or safety concerns.

--- END ---