BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 77.04.060 and 2013 c 23 s 238 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The commission shall hold at least one regular meeting during the first two months of each calendar quarter, and special meetings when called by the chair and by five members. Five members constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

(2) The commission at a meeting in each odd-numbered year shall elect one of its members as chair and another member as vice chair, each of whom shall serve for a term of two years or until a successor is elected and qualified.

(3) Members of the commission shall be ((compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.250. In addition, members are allowed their travel expenses incurred while absent from their usual places of residence in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060))eligible to receive compensation in an amount not to exceed $200 for each day during which the member attends an official meeting of the commission or performs statutorily prescribed duties approved by the chair of the commission. A person may not receive compensation for a day of service under this section if the person: (a) Occupies a position, normally regarded as full time in nature, in any agency of the federal government, Washington state government, or Washington state local government; and (b) receives any compensation from such a government for working that day.

(4) In addition, members are eligible for reasonable allowances for child and adult care reimbursement for time spent attending official meetings or performing statutorily prescribed duties approved by the chair of the commission and travel expenses incurred while absent from their usual places of residence in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(5) As allowable by federal and state law, the department will minimize, to the greatest extent possible, the impact of stipends and reimbursements on public assistance and pension eligibility and benefit amounts.

(6) Nothing in this section creates an employment relationship, or any membership or qualification in any state or other publicly supported retirement system, for this or any other title due to the payment of a stipend, lodging, and travel expenses, or child care expenses provided under this section where such a relationship, membership, or qualification did not already exist.

--- END ---