BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 84.33.035 and 2014 c 137 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Agricultural methods" means the cultivation of trees that are grown on land prepared by intensive cultivation and tilling, such as irrigating, plowing, or turning over the soil, and on which all unwanted plant growth is controlled continuously for the exclusive purpose of raising trees such as Christmas trees and short-rotation hardwoods.

(2) "Average rate of inflation" means the annual rate of inflation as determined by the department averaged over the period of time as provided in RCW 84.33.220 (1) and (2). This rate must be published in the state register by the department not later than January 1st of each year for use in that assessment year.

(3) "Composite property tax rate" for a county means the total amount of property taxes levied upon forestlands by all taxing districts in the county other than the state, divided by the total assessed value of all forestland in the county.

(4) "Contiguous" means land adjoining and touching other property held by the same ownership. Land divided by a public road, but otherwise an integral part of a timber growing and harvesting operation or devoted primarily to preserving forest health, or providing wildfire resiliency, is considered contiguous. Solely for the purposes of this subsection (4), "same ownership" has the same meaning as in RCW 84.34.020(6).

(5) "Forestland" is synonymous with "designated forestland" and means any parcel of land that is five or more acres or multiple parcels of land that are contiguous and total five or more acres that is or are devoted primarily to growing and harvesting timber, preserving forest health, or providing wildfire resiliency. Designated forestland means the land only and does not include a residential homesite. The term includes land used for incidental uses that are compatible with the growing and harvesting of timber, preserving forest health, or providing wildfire resiliency, but no more than ((ten))10 percent of the land may be used for such incidental uses. It also includes the land on which appurtenances necessary for the production, preparation, or sale of the timber products exist in conjunction with land producing these products.

(6) "Harvested" means the time when in the ordinary course of business the quantity of timber by species is first definitely determined. The amount harvested must be determined by the Scribner Decimal C Scale or other prevalent measuring practice adjusted to arrive at substantially equivalent measurements, as approved by the department.

(7) "Harvester" means every person who from the person's own land or from the land of another under a right or license granted by lease or contract, either directly or by contracting with others for the necessary labor or mechanical services, fells, cuts, or takes timber for sale or for commercial or industrial use. When the United States or any instrumentality thereof, the state, including its departments and institutions and political subdivisions, or any municipal corporation therein so fells, cuts, or takes timber for sale or for commercial or industrial use, the harvester is the first person other than the United States or any instrumentality thereof, the state, including its departments and institutions and political subdivisions, or any municipal corporation therein, who acquires title to or a possessory interest in the timber. The term "harvester" does not include persons performing under contract the necessary labor or mechanical services for a harvester.

(8) "Harvesting and marketing costs" means only those costs directly associated with harvesting the timber from the land and delivering it to the buyer and may include the costs of disposing of logging residues. Any other costs that are not directly and exclusively related to harvesting and marketing of the timber, such as costs of permanent roads or costs of reforesting the land following harvest, are not harvesting and marketing costs.

(9) "Incidental use" means a use of designated forestland that is compatible with its purpose for growing and harvesting timber, preserving forest health, or providing wildfire resiliency. An incidental use may include a gravel pit, a shed or land used to store machinery or equipment used in conjunction with the timber enterprise, and any other use that does not interfere with or indicate that the forestland is no longer primarily being used to grow and harvest timber.

(10) "Local government" means any city, town, county, water-sewer district, public utility district, port district, irrigation district, flood control district, or any other municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or other political subdivision authorized to levy special benefit assessments for sanitary or storm sewerage systems, domestic water supply or distribution systems, or road construction or improvement purposes.

(11) "Local improvement district" means any local improvement district, utility local improvement district, local utility district, road improvement district, or any similar unit created by a local government for the purpose of levying special benefit assessments against property specially benefited by improvements relating to the districts.

(12) "Owner" means the party or parties having the fee interest in land, except where land is subject to a real estate contract "owner" means the contract vendee.

(13) "Primarily" or "primary use" means the existing use of the land is so prevalent that when the characteristic use of the land is evaluated any other use appears to be conflicting or nonrelated.

(14) "Short-rotation hardwoods" means hardwood trees, such as but not limited to hybrid cottonwoods, cultivated by agricultural methods in growing cycles shorter than ((fifteen))15 years.

(15) "Small harvester" means every person who from his or her own land or from the land of another under a right or license granted by lease or contract, either directly or by contracting with others for the necessary labor or mechanical services, fells, cuts, or takes timber for sale or for commercial or industrial use in an amount not exceeding two million board feet in a calendar year. When the United States or any instrumentality thereof, the state, including its departments and institutions and political subdivisions, or any municipal corporation therein so fells, cuts, or takes timber for sale or for commercial or industrial use, not exceeding these amounts, the small harvester is the first person other than the United States or any instrumentality thereof, the state, including its departments and institutions and political subdivisions, or any municipal corporation therein, who acquires title to or a possessory interest in the timber. Small harvester does not include persons performing under contract the necessary labor or mechanical services for a harvester, and it does not include the harvesters of Christmas trees or short-rotation hardwoods.

(16) "Special benefit assessments" means special assessments levied or capable of being levied in any local improvement district or otherwise levied or capable of being levied by a local government to pay for all or part of the costs of a local improvement and which may be levied only for the special benefits to be realized by property by reason of that local improvement.

(17) "Stumpage value of timber" means the appropriate stumpage value shown on tables prepared by the department under RCW 84.33.091. However, for timber harvested from public land and sold under a competitive bidding process, stumpage value means the actual amount paid to the seller in cash or other consideration. The stumpage value of timber from public land does not include harvesting and marketing costs if the timber from public land is harvested by, or under contract for, the United States or any instrumentality of the United States, the state, including its departments and institutions and political subdivisions, or any municipal corporation therein. Whenever payment for the stumpage includes considerations other than cash, the value is the fair market value of the other consideration. If the other consideration is permanent roads, the value of the roads must be the appraised value as appraised by the seller.

(18) "Timber" means forest trees, standing or down, on privately or publicly owned land, and except as provided in RCW 84.33.170 includes Christmas trees and short-rotation hardwoods.

(19) "Timber assessed value" for a county means the sum of: (a) The total stumpage value of timber harvested from publicly owned land in the county multiplied by the public timber ratio, plus; (b) the total stumpage value of timber harvested from privately owned land in the county multiplied by the private timber ratio. The numerator of the public timber ratio is the rate of tax imposed by the county under RCW 84.33.051 on public timber harvests for the year of the calculation. The numerator of the private timber ratio is the rate of tax imposed by the county under RCW 84.33.051 on private timber harvests for the year of the calculation. The denominator of the private timber ratio and the public timber ratio is the composite property tax rate for the county for taxes due in the year of the calculation, expressed as a percentage of assessed value. The department must use the stumpage value of timber harvested during the most recent four calendar quarters for which the information is available. The department must calculate the timber assessed value for each county before October 1st of each year.

(20) "Timber assessed value" for a taxing district means the timber assessed value for the county multiplied by a ratio. The numerator of the ratio is the total assessed value of forestland in the taxing district. The denominator is the total assessed value of forestland in the county. As used in this section, "assessed value of forestland" means the assessed value of forestland for taxes due in the year the timber assessed value for the county is calculated plus an additional value for public forestland. The additional value for public forestland is the product of the number of acres of public forestland that are available for timber harvesting determined under RCW 84.33.089 and the average assessed value per acre of private forestland in the county.

(21) "Timber management plan" means a plan prepared by a trained forester, or any other person with adequate knowledge of timber management practices, concerning the use of the land to grow and harvest timber. Such a plan may include:

(a) A legal description of the forestland;

(b) A statement that the forestland is held in contiguous ownership of five or more acres and is primarily devoted to and used to grow and harvest timber;

(c) A brief description of the timber on the forestland or, if the timber on the land has been harvested, the owner's plan to restock the land with timber;

(d) A statement about whether the forestland is also used to graze livestock;

(e) A statement about whether the land has been used in compliance with the restocking, forest management, fire protection, insect and disease control, and forest debris provisions of Title 76 RCW; and

(f) If the land has been recently harvested or supports a growth of brush and noncommercial type timber, a description of the owner's plan to restock the forestland within three years.

Sec. 2. RCW 84.33.130 and 2014 c 137 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)(i) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, lands that were assessed as classified forestland before July 22, 2001, or as timberland under chapter 84.34 RCW before the merger date adopted by the county under RCW 84.34.400, are designated forestland for the purposes of this chapter.

(ii) The owners of land subject to the requirements of (a)(i) of this subsection are not required to apply for designation under this chapter. The land and timber on such land must be assessed and taxed in accordance with the provisions of this chapter as of the date the land is designated forestland under (a)(i) of this subsection.

(b) If a county legislative authority opts under RCW 84.34.400 to merge its timberland classification with the designated forestland program of the county, the following provisions apply beginning on the adopted merger date:

(i) The date the property was classified as timberland is considered to be the date the property was designated as forestland under this chapter;

(ii) The county assessor must notify each owner of timberland of the merger by certified mail; and

(iii) For any forestland subject to the provisions of (b)(i) of this subsection that is then removed from designation, only compensating tax will be collected as a result of the removal in accordance with RCW 84.33.140(12), unless otherwise provided by law.

(2) An owner of land desiring that it be designated as forestland and valued under RCW 84.33.140 as of January 1st of any year must submit an application to the assessor of the county in which the land is located before January 1st of that year. The application must be accompanied by a reasonable processing fee when the county legislative authority has established the requirement for such a fee.

(3) No application of designation is required when publicly owned forestland is exchanged for privately owned forestland designated under this chapter. The land exchanged and received by an owner subject to ad valorem taxation is automatically granted designation under this chapter if the following conditions are met:

(a) The land will be used to grow and harvest timber; and

(b) The owner of the land submits a document to the assessor's office that explains the details of the forestland exchange within ((sixty))60 days of the closing date of the exchange. However, if the owner fails to submit information regarding the exchange by the end of this ((sixty))60-day period, the owner must file an application for designation as forestland under this chapter and the regular application process will be followed.

(4) The application must be made upon forms prepared by the department and supplied by the assessor, and must include the following:

(a) A legal description of, or assessor's parcel numbers for, all land the applicant desires to be designated as forestland;

(b) The date or dates of acquisition of the land;

(c) A brief description of the timber on the land, or if the timber has been harvested, the owner's plan for restocking;

(d) A copy of the timber management plan, if one exists, for the land prepared by a trained forester or any other person with adequate knowledge of timber management practices;

(e) If a timber management plan exists, an explanation of the nature and extent to which the management plan has been implemented;

(f) Whether the land is used for grazing;

(g) Whether the land has been subdivided or a plat has been filed with respect to the land;

(h) Whether the land and the applicant are in compliance with the restocking, forest management, fire protection, insect and disease control, and forest debris provisions of Title 76 RCW or any applicable rules under Title 76 RCW;

(i) Whether the land is subject to forest fire protection assessments under RCW 76.04.610;

(j) Whether the land is subject to a lease, option, or other right that permits it to be used for any purpose other than growing and harvesting timber, preserving forest health, or providing wildfire resiliency;

(k) A summary of the past experience and activity of the applicant in growing and harvesting timber, preserving forest health, or providing wildfire resiliency;

(l) A summary of current and continuing activity of the applicant in growing and harvesting timber, preserving forest health, or providing wildfire resiliency;

(m) A statement that the applicant is aware of the potential tax liability involved when the land ceases to be designated as forestland;

(n) An affirmation that the statements contained in the application are true and that the land described in the application meets the definition of forestland in RCW 84.33.035; and

(o) A description and/or drawing showing what areas of land for which designation is sought are used for incidental uses compatible with the definition of forestland in RCW 84.33.035.

(5) The assessor must afford the applicant an opportunity to be heard if the applicant so requests.

(6) The assessor must act upon the application with due regard to all relevant evidence and without any one or more items of evidence necessarily being determinative, except that the application may be denied for one of the following reasons, without regard to other items:

(a) The land does not contain a "merchantable stand of timber" as defined in chapter 76.09 RCW and applicable rules. This reason alone is not sufficient to deny the application (i) if the land has been recently harvested or supports a growth of brush or noncommercial type timber, and the application includes a plan for restocking within three years or a longer period necessitated by unavailability of seed or seedlings, or (ii) if only isolated areas within the land do not meet the minimum standards due to rock outcroppings, swamps, unproductive soil or other natural conditions;

(b) The applicant, with respect to the land, has failed to comply with a final administrative or judicial order with respect to a violation of the restocking, forest management, fire protection, insect and disease control, and forest debris provisions of Title 76 RCW or any applicable rules under Title 76 RCW; or

(c) The land abuts a body of salt water and lies between the line of ordinary high tide and a line paralleling the ordinary high tide line and two hundred feet horizontally landward from the high tide line. However, if the assessor determines that a higher and better use exists for the land but this use would not be permitted or economically feasible by virtue of any federal, state, or local law or regulation, the land must be assessed and valued under RCW 84.33.140 without being designated as forestland.

(7) The application is deemed to have been approved unless, prior to July 1st of the year after the application was mailed or delivered to the assessor, the assessor notifies the applicant in writing of the extent to which the application is denied.

(8) An owner who receives notice that his or her application has been denied, in whole or in part, may appeal the denial to the county board of equalization in accordance with the provisions of RCW 84.40.038.

Sec. 3. RCW 84.33.140 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 37 s 1002 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When land has been designated as forestland under RCW 84.33.130, a notation of the designation must be made each year upon the assessment and tax rolls. A copy of the notice of approval together with the legal description or assessor's parcel numbers for the land must, at the expense of the applicant, be filed by the assessor in the same manner as deeds are recorded.

(2) In preparing the assessment roll as of January 1, 2002, for taxes payable in 2003 and each January 1st thereafter, the assessor must list each parcel of designated forestland at a value with respect to the grade and class provided in this subsection and adjusted as provided in subsection (3) of this section. The assessor must compute the assessed value of the land using the same assessment ratio applied generally in computing the assessed value of other property in the county. Values for the several grades of bare forestland are as follows:

LAND

GRADE

OPERABILITY

CLASS

VALUES

PER ACRE

1

$234

1

2

229

3

217

4

157

1

198

2

2

190

3

183

4

132

1

154

3

2

149

3

148

4

113

1

117

4

2

114

3

113

4

86

1

85

5

2

78

3

77

4

52

1

43

6

2

39

3

39

4

37

1

21

7

2

21

3

20

4

20

8

1

(3) On or before December 31, 2001, the department must adjust by rule under chapter 34.05 RCW, the forestland values contained in subsection (2) of this section in accordance with this subsection, and must certify the adjusted values to the assessor who will use these values in preparing the assessment roll as of January 1, 2002. For the adjustment to be made on or before December 31, 2001, for use in the 2002 assessment year, the department must:

(a) Divide the aggregate value of all timber harvested within the state between July 1, 1996, and June 30, 2001, by the aggregate harvest volume for the same period, as determined from the harvester excise tax returns filed with the department under RCW 84.33.074; and

(b) Divide the aggregate value of all timber harvested within the state between July 1, 1995, and June 30, 2000, by the aggregate harvest volume for the same period, as determined from the harvester excise tax returns filed with the department under RCW 84.33.074; and

(c) Adjust the forestland values contained in subsection (2) of this section by a percentage equal to one-half of the percentage change in the average values of harvested timber reflected by comparing the resultant values calculated under (a) and (b) of this subsection.

(4) For the adjustments to be made on or before December 31, 2002, and each succeeding year thereafter, the same procedure described in subsection (3) of this section must be followed using harvester excise tax returns filed under RCW 84.33.074. However, this adjustment must be made to the prior year's adjusted value, and the five-year periods for calculating average harvested timber values must be successively one year more recent.

(5) Land graded, assessed, and valued as forestland must continue to be so graded, assessed, and valued until removal of designation by the assessor upon the occurrence of any of the following:

(a) Receipt of notice of request to withdraw land classified under RCW 84.34.020(3) within two years before the date of the merger under RCW 84.34.400. Land previously classified under chapter 84.34 RCW will be removed under the provisions of this chapter when two assessment years have passed following receipt of the notice as described in RCW 84.34.070(1);

(b) Receipt of notice from the owner to remove the designation;

(c) Sale or transfer to an ownership making the land exempt from ad valorem taxation;

(d) Sale or transfer of all or a portion of the land to a new owner, unless the new owner has signed a notice of forestland designation continuance, except transfer to an owner who is an heir or devisee of a deceased owner or transfer by a transfer on death deed, does not, by itself, result in removal of designation. The signed notice of continuance must be attached to the real estate excise tax affidavit provided for in RCW 82.45.150. The notice of continuance must be on a form prepared by the department. If the notice of continuance is not signed by the new owner and attached to the real estate excise tax affidavit, all compensating taxes calculated under subsection (11) of this section are due and payable by the seller or transferor at time of sale. The auditor may not accept an instrument of conveyance regarding designated forestland for filing or recording unless the new owner has signed the notice of continuance or the compensating tax has been paid, as evidenced by the real estate excise tax stamp affixed thereto by the treasurer. The seller, transferor, or new owner may appeal the new assessed valuation calculated under subsection (11) of this section to the county board of equalization in accordance with the provisions of RCW 84.40.038. Jurisdiction is hereby conferred on the county board of equalization to hear these appeals;

(e) Determination by the assessor, after giving the owner written notice and an opportunity to be heard, that:

(i) The land is no longer primarily devoted to and used for growing and harvesting timber, preserving forest health, or providing wildfire resiliency. However, land may not be removed from designation if a governmental agency, organization, or other recipient identified in subsection (13) or (14) of this section as exempt from the payment of compensating tax has manifested its intent in writing or by other official action to acquire a property interest in the designated forestland by means of a transaction that qualifies for an exemption under subsection (13) or (14) of this section. The governmental agency, organization, or recipient must annually provide the assessor of the county in which the land is located reasonable evidence in writing of the intent to acquire the designated land as long as the intent continues or within sixty days of a request by the assessor. The assessor may not request this evidence more than once in a calendar year;

(ii) The owner has failed to comply with a final administrative or judicial order with respect to a violation of the restocking, forest management, fire protection, insect and disease control, and forest debris provisions of Title 76 RCW or any applicable rules under Title 76 RCW; or

(iii) Restocking has not occurred to the extent or within the time specified in the application for designation of such land.

(6) Land may not be removed from designation if there is a governmental restriction that prohibits, in whole or in part, the owner from harvesting timber from the owner's designated forestland. If only a portion of the parcel is impacted by governmental restrictions of this nature, the restrictions cannot be used as a basis to remove the remainder of the forestland from designation under this chapter. For the purposes of this section, "governmental restrictions" includes: (a) Any law, regulation, rule, ordinance, program, or other action adopted or taken by a federal, state, county, city, or other governmental entity; or (b) the land's zoning or its presence within an urban growth area designated under RCW 36.70A.110.

(7) The assessor has the option of requiring an owner of forestland to file a timber management plan with the assessor upon the occurrence of one of the following:

(a) An application for designation as forestland is submitted;

(b) Designated forestland is sold or transferred and a notice of continuance, described in subsection (5)(d) of this section, is signed; or

(c) The assessor has reason to believe that forestland sized less than ((twenty))20 acres is no longer primarily devoted to and used for growing and harvesting timber, preserving forest health, or providing wildfire resiliency. The assessor may require a timber management plan to assist with determining continuing eligibility as designated forestland.

(8) If land is removed from designation because of any of the circumstances listed in subsection (5)(a) through (d) of this section, the removal applies only to the land affected. If land is removed from designation because of subsection (5)(e) of this section, the removal applies only to the actual area of land that is no longer primarily devoted to the growing and harvesting of timber, preserving forest health, or providing wildfire resiliency, without regard to any other land that may have been included in the application and approved for designation, as long as the remaining designated forestland meets the definition of forestland contained in RCW 84.33.035.

(9) Within ((thirty))30 days after the removal of designation as forestland, the assessor must notify the owner in writing, setting forth the reasons for the removal. The seller, transferor, or owner may appeal the removal to the county board of equalization in accordance with the provisions of RCW 84.40.038.

(10) Unless the removal is reversed on appeal a copy of the notice of removal with a notation of the action, if any, upon appeal, together with the legal description or assessor's parcel numbers for the land removed from designation must, at the expense of the applicant, be filed by the assessor in the same manner as deeds are recorded and a notation of removal from designation must immediately be made upon the assessment and tax rolls. The assessor must revalue the land to be removed with reference to its true and fair value as of January 1st of the year of removal from designation. Both the assessed value before and after the removal of designation must be listed. Taxes based on the value of the land as forestland are assessed and payable up until the date of removal and taxes based on the true and fair value of the land are assessed and payable from the date of removal from designation.

(11) Except as provided otherwise in this section, a compensating tax is imposed on land removed from designation as forestland. The compensating tax is due and payable to the treasurer thirty days after the owner is notified of the amount of this tax. As soon as possible after the land is removed from designation, the assessor must compute the amount of compensating tax, and the treasurer must mail a notice to the owner of the amount of compensating tax owed and the date on which payment of this tax is due. The amount of compensating tax is equal to the difference between the amount of tax last levied on the land as designated forestland and an amount equal to the new assessed value of the land multiplied by the dollar rate of the last levy extended against the land, multiplied by a number, in no event greater than nine, equal to the number of years for which the land was designated as forestland, plus compensating taxes on the land at forestland values up until the date of removal and the prorated taxes on the land at true and fair value from the date of removal to the end of the current tax year.

(12) Compensating tax, together with applicable interest thereon, becomes a lien on the land, which attaches at the time the land is removed from designation as forestland and has priority and must be fully paid and satisfied before any recognizance, mortgage, judgment, debt, obligation, or responsibility to or with which the land may become charged or liable. The lien may be foreclosed upon expiration of the same period after delinquency and in the same manner provided by law for foreclosure of liens for delinquent real property taxes as provided in RCW 84.64.050. Any compensating tax unpaid on its due date will thereupon become delinquent. From the date of delinquency until paid, interest is charged at the same rate applied by law to delinquent ad valorem property taxes.

(13) The compensating tax specified in subsection (11) of this section may not be imposed if the removal of designation under subsection (5) of this section resulted solely from:

(a) Transfer to a government entity in exchange for other forestland located within the state of Washington;

(b)(i) A taking through the exercise of the power of eminent domain, or (ii) a sale or transfer to an entity having the power of eminent domain in anticipation of the exercise of such power based on official action taken by the entity and confirmed in writing;

(c) A donation of fee title, development rights, or the right to harvest timber, to a government agency or organization qualified under RCW 84.34.210 and 64.04.130 for the purposes enumerated in those sections, or the sale or transfer of fee title to a governmental entity or a nonprofit nature conservancy corporation, as defined in RCW 64.04.130, exclusively for the protection and conservation of lands recommended for state natural area preserve purposes by the natural heritage council and natural heritage plan as defined in chapter 79.70 RCW or approved for state natural resources conservation area purposes as defined in chapter 79.71 RCW, or for acquisition and management as a community forest trust as defined in chapter 79.155 RCW. At such time as the land is not used for the purposes enumerated, the compensating tax specified in subsection (11) of this section is imposed upon the current owner;

(d) The sale or transfer of fee title to the parks and recreation commission for park and recreation purposes;

(e) Official action by an agency of the state of Washington or by the county or city within which the land is located that disallows the present use of the land;

(f) The creation, sale, or transfer of forestry riparian easements under RCW 76.13.120;

(g) The creation, sale, or transfer of a conservation easement of private forestlands within unconfined channel migration zones or containing critical habitat for threatened or endangered species under RCW 76.09.040;

(h) The sale or transfer of land within two years after the death of the owner of at least a ((fifty))50 percent interest in the land if the land has been assessed and valued as classified forestland, designated as forestland under this chapter, or classified under chapter 84.34 RCW continuously since 1993. The date of death shown on a death certificate is the date used for the purposes of this subsection (13)(h); or

(i)(i) The discovery that the land was designated under this chapter in error through no fault of the owner. For purposes of this subsection (13)(i), "fault" means a knowingly false or misleading statement, or other act or omission not in good faith, that contributed to the approval of designation under this chapter or the failure of the assessor to remove the land from designation under this chapter.

(ii) For purposes of this subsection (13), the discovery that land was designated under this chapter in error through no fault of the owner is not the sole reason for removal of designation under subsection (5) of this section if an independent basis for removal exists. An example of an independent basis for removal includes the land no longer being devoted to and used for growing and harvesting timber, preserving forest health, or providing wildfire resiliency.

(14) In a county with a population of more than ((six hundred thousand))600,000 inhabitants or in a county with a population of at least ((two hundred forty-five thousand))245,000 inhabitants that borders Puget Sound as defined in RCW 90.71.010, the compensating tax specified in subsection (11) of this section may not be imposed if the removal of designation as forestland under subsection (5) of this section resulted solely from:

(a) An action described in subsection (13) of this section; or

(b) A transfer of a property interest to a government entity, or to a nonprofit historic preservation corporation or nonprofit nature conservancy corporation, as defined in RCW 64.04.130, to protect or enhance public resources, or to preserve, maintain, improve, restore, limit the future use of, or otherwise to conserve for public use or enjoyment, the property interest being transferred. At such time as the property interest is not used for the purposes enumerated, the compensating tax is imposed upon the current owner.

(15) Compensating tax authorized in this section may not be imposed on land removed from designation as forestland solely as a result of a natural disaster such as a flood, windstorm, earthquake, wildfire, or other such calamity rather than by virtue of the act of the landowner changing the use of the property.

--- END ---