BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28B.92.205 and 2022 c 297 s 949 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to other eligibility requirements outlined in this chapter, students who demonstrate financial need are eligible to receive the Washington college grant. ((Financial need is as follows:

(1) Until academic year 2020-21, students with family incomes between zero and fifty percent of the state median family income, adjusted for family size, shall receive the maximum Washington college grant as defined in RCW 28B.92.030. Grants for students with incomes between fifty-one and seventy percent of the state median family income, adjusted for family size, shall be prorated at the following percentages of the maximum Washington college grant amount:

(a) Seventy percent for students with family incomes between fifty-one and fifty-five percent of the state median family income;

(b) Sixty-five percent for students with family incomes between fifty-six and sixty percent of the state median family income;

(c) Sixty percent for students with family incomes between sixty-one and sixty-five percent of the state median family income; and

(d) Fifty percent for students with family incomes between sixty-six and seventy percent of the state median family income.))

(2) Beginning with academic year ((2020-21, except during the 2022-23 academic year))2023-24, students with family incomes between zero and ((fifty-five))70 percent of the state median family income, adjusted for family size, shall receive the maximum Washington college grant as defined in RCW 28B.92.030. ((During the 2022-23 academic year, students with family incomes between zero and 60 percent of the state median family income, adjusted for family size, shall receive the maximum Washington college grant.)) Grants for students with incomes between ((fifty-six))71 and ((one hundred))100 percent of the state median family income, adjusted for family size, shall be prorated at the following percentages of the maximum Washington college grant amount:

(a) ((Seventy))50 percent for students with family incomes between ((fifty-six))71 and ((sixty))80 percent of the state median family income((, except during the 2022-23 academic year));

(b) ((Sixty))25 percent for students with family incomes between ((sixty-one))81 and ((sixty-five))90 percent of the state median family income; and

(c) ((Fifty))10 percent for students with family incomes between ((sixty-six))91 and ((seventy))100 percent of the state median family income((;

(d) Twenty-four and one-half percent for students with family incomes between seventy-one and seventy-five percent of the state median family income; and

(e) Ten percent for students with family incomes between seventy-six and one hundred percent of the state median family income)).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28B.92 RCW to read as follows:

(1) As part of the Washington college grant program, all Washington college grant recipients who qualify for the maximum Washington college grant are entitled to also receive an annual bridge grant.

(2) The office shall award bridge grants to eligible students beginning with the 2023-24 academic year.

(a) For Washington college grant recipients who receive a maximum award, but who are not recipients of the college bound scholarship program under chapter 28B.118 RCW, the bridge grant shall be $1,000.

(b) For Washington college grant recipients who receive a maximum award, but who are also recipients of the college bound scholarship program under chapter 28B.118 RCW, the bridge grant shall be $500.

(3) To receive the full bridge grant for which the student qualifies, the student needs to be enrolled in an institution of higher education on at least a half-time basis. Students enrolled less than half-time shall receive a prorated bridge grant.

(4) The bridge grant shall be applied to a student's financial aid package after all other gift aid has been awarded to the student.

(5) As used in this section, "bridge grant" means an annual stipend provided in addition to the Washington college grant to provide supplementary financial support to low-income students to cover higher education expenses beyond tuition and fees, such as books, lab fees, supplies, technology, transportation, housing, and child care.

--- END ---