BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.15.050 and 2003 c 265 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislative international trade account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All moneys received by the president of the senate and the secretary of state from gifts, grants, and endowments for international trade hosting, international relations, and international missions activities must be deposited in the account. Only private, nonpublic gifts, grants, and endowments may be deposited in the account. A person, as defined in RCW 42.52.010, may not donate, gift, grant, or endow more than five thousand dollars per calendar year to the legislative international trade account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes of international trade hosting, international relations, and international trade mission activities, ((excluding travel and lodging,)) in which the president and members of the senate, members of the house of representatives, and the secretary of state participate in an official capacity. An appropriation is not required for expenditures. All requests by individual legislators for use of funds from this account must be first approved by the secretary of the senate for members of the senate or the chief clerk of the house of representatives for members of the house of representatives. All expenditures from the account shall be authorized by the final signed approval of the chief clerk of the house of representatives, the secretary of the senate, and the president of the senate.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.15.060 and 2020 c 114 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Economic development and in particular international trade, tourism, and investment have become increasingly important to Washington, affecting the state's employment, revenues, and general economic well-being. Additionally, economic trends are rapidly changing and the international marketplace has become increasingly competitive as states and countries seek to improve and safeguard their own economic well-being. The purpose of the legislative committee on economic development and international relations is to provide responsive and consistent involvement by the legislature in economic development to maintain a healthy state economy and to provide employment opportunities to Washington residents.

(2) There is created a legislative committee on economic development and international relations which shall consist of ((six))eight senators and ((six))eight representatives from the legislature and the lieutenant governor who shall serve as chairperson. The senate members of the committee shall be appointed by the president of the senate and the house members of the committee shall be appointed by the speaker of the house. Not more than ((three))four members from each house shall be from the same political party. Vacancies occurring shall be filled by the appointing authority.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.15.090 and 1985 c 467 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

The committee shall cooperate, act, and function with legislative committees, executive agencies, and with the councils or committees of other states and of provinces and territories of Canada similar to this committee ((and)), with other interstate research organizations, and with foreign consuls.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. RCW 43.15.085 (Legislative committee on economic development and international relations—Expenses) and 1985 c 467 s 22 are each repealed.

--- END ---