BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) By October 1, 2024, the joint legislative audit and review committee in consultation with the department of health, the department of social and health services, and other appropriate stakeholders, shall conduct a performance audit analyzing the on-site monitoring, state licensure, and validation surveys performed on in-home services agencies as referenced in chapter 70.127 RCW. The analysis must include, at a minimum, the following components:

(a) An evaluation of:

(i) The current process that the department of health, the department of social and health services, and area agencies on aging use to perform oversight and surveys on in-home services agencies including, but not limited to: The in-home services agencies subject to surveys, the frequency of the surveys, and who is performing the surveys; and

(ii) Auditing and monitoring assessment tools utilized during the on-site monitoring, state licensure, and validation surveys with a focus on analyzing how surveys are performed, the length of the surveys, and the differences between the tools;

(b) A determination of whether the current auditing and monitoring assessment tools are ensuring that in-home services agencies are complying with state and federal laws and regulations;

(c) A determination if the current process and compliance models are the most efficient available and accurately measured, do not duplicate survey efforts, and ensure in-home services agencies are complying with state and federal laws and regulations; and

(d) A review of any duplication of surveys conducted while ensuring that the in-home services agencies are meeting the standards outlined in state and federal law.

(2) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall submit a final report on their findings to the appropriate committees of the legislature by October 1, 2024, and shall submit a progress report by December 1, 2023.

(3) This section expires December 31, 2025.

--- END ---