BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 48.18.558 and 2018 c 239 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) With the prior approval of the commissioner, a property insurer may include the following either goods or services, or both, intended to reduce either the probability of loss, or the extent of loss, or both, from a covered event as part of a policy of property insurance((, except commercial property insurance)):

(a) Goods, including a water monitor;

(b) Foundation strapping to mitigate losses due to earthquake;

(c) Ongoing services, including home safety monitoring or brush clearing to mitigate losses due to wildfire; and

(d) Other either goods or services, or both, as the commissioner may identify by rule.

(2) Any goods provided are owned by the insured, even if the insurance is subsequently canceled.

(3) The value of goods and services to be provided is limited to ((one thousand five hundred dollars))$7,500 in value in the aggregate in any ((twelve-month))12-month period.

(4) In order to receive prior approval of the commissioner, and except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, the property insurer must include the following in its rate filing:

(a) A description of either the specific goods or services, or both, to be offered;

(b) A description of the method of delivering either the specific goods or services, or both, being offered; and

(c) The selection criteria for insureds receiving either the specific goods or services, or both, being offered.

(5) This section does not require the commissioner to approve any particular proposed benefit. The commissioner may disapprove any proposed noninsurance benefit that the commissioner determines may tend to promote or facilitate the violation of any other section of this title. However, if the commissioner approves the inclusion of either the goods or services, or both, in a policy of property insurance((, except commercial property insurance,)) it does not constitute a violation of RCW 48.30.140 or 48.30.150.

(6)(a) A property insurer may conduct a pilot program as either a risk mitigation or prevention, or both, strategy through which the insurer offers or provides risk mitigation and/or prevention goods and/or services identified in subsection (1) of this section in connection with an insurance policy covering property risks((, except commercial property insurance,)) in accordance with rules adopted by the commissioner.

(b) A property insurer offering or providing risk mitigation and/or prevention goods and/or services through a pilot program under this subsection is exempt from including information about the risk mitigation and/or prevention goods and/or services in its rate filing as is otherwise required under subsection (4) of this section and RCW 48.19.530.

(c) A property insurer's pilot program may last no longer than two years.

(7) This section does not apply to disaster or emergency response activities of a property insurer.

Sec. 2. RCW 48.19.530 and 2018 c 239 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, in addition to other information required by this chapter, a rate filing by a property insurer for a policy((, except commercial property insurance,)) that includes risk mitigation and/or prevention goods and/or services under RCW 48.18.558, must demonstrate that its rates account for the expected costs of the goods and services and the reduction in expected claims costs resulting from either the goods or services, or both.

(2) This section does not apply to:

(a) A property insurer offering or providing risk mitigation and/or prevention goods and/or services through a pilot program established in RCW 48.18.558(6); or

(b) Disaster or emergency response activities of a property insurer.

--- END ---