BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 71.09.140 and 2021 c 236 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) At the earliest possible date, and in no event later than 30 days before conditional release, change of address for a person on conditional release, or unconditional discharge, except in the event of escape, the department of social and health services shall send written notice of conditional release, unconditional discharge, or escape, to the following:

(i) The chief of police of the city, if any, in which the person will reside or in which placement will be made under a less restrictive alternative;

(ii) The sheriff of the county in which the person will reside or in which placement will be made under a less restrictive alternative; ((and))

(iii) The sheriff of the county where the person was last convicted of a sexually violent offense, if the department does not know where the person will reside;

(iv) The members of the community in which the person being released will reside. For purposes of this section "member of the community" means any person with a primary residence located in the same local jurisdiction that the person being released will reside; and

(v) The members of the legislature of any district where the person being released will reside.

The department shall notify the state patrol of the release of all sexually violent predators and that information shall be placed in the Washington crime information center for dissemination to all law enforcement.

(b) A return to total confinement or to a secure community transition facility pending revocation or modification proceedings is not considered a change of address for purposes of (a) of this subsection, and an additional community notification process is not required, unless conditional release is revoked under RCW 71.09.098 or the return lasts longer than 90 days.

(2) The same notice as required by subsection (1) of this section shall be sent to the following if such notice has been requested in writing about a specific person found to be a sexually violent predator under this chapter:

(a) The victim or victims of any sexually violent offenses for which the person was convicted in the past or the victim's next of kin if the crime was a homicide. "Next of kin" as used in this section means a person's spouse, parents, siblings, and children;

(b) Any witnesses who testified against the person in his or her commitment trial under RCW 71.09.060; and

(c) Any person specified in writing by the prosecuting agency.

Information regarding victims, next of kin, or witnesses requesting the notice, information regarding any other person specified in writing by the prosecuting agency to receive the notice, and the notice are confidential and shall not be available to the committed person.

(3) If a person committed as a sexually violent predator under this chapter escapes from a department of social and health services facility, the department shall immediately notify, by the most reasonable and expedient means available, the chief of police of the city and the sheriff of the county in which the committed person resided immediately before his or her commitment as a sexually violent predator, or immediately before his or her incarceration for his or her most recent offense. If previously requested, the department shall also notify the witnesses and the victims of the sexually violent offenses for which the person was convicted in the past or the victim's next of kin if the crime was a homicide. If the person is recaptured, the department shall send notice to the persons designated in this subsection as soon as possible but in no event later than two working days after the department learns of such recapture.

(4) If the victim or victims of any sexually violent offenses for which the person was convicted in the past or the victim's next of kin, or any witness is under the age of 16, the notice required by this section shall be sent to the parents or legal guardian of the child.

(5) The department of social and health services shall send the notices required by this chapter to the last address provided to the department by the requesting party. The requesting party shall furnish the department with a current address.

(6) Nothing in this section shall impose any liability upon a chief of police of a city or sheriff of a county for failing to request in writing a notice as provided in subsection (1) of this section.

(7) The notice required by subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall include the address where the person will reside. If the department does not know where the person will reside, the required notice will clearly state that there is no known address for where the person will reside.

Sec. 2. RCW 71.09.096 and 2021 c 236 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If the court or jury determines that conditional release to a less restrictive alternative is in the best interest of the person and includes conditions that would adequately protect the community, and the court determines that the minimum conditions set forth in RCW 71.09.092 and in this section are met, the court shall enter judgment and direct a conditional release.

(2) The court shall impose any additional conditions necessary to ensure compliance with treatment and to protect the community. If the court finds that conditions do not exist that will both ensure the person's compliance with treatment and protect the community, then the person shall be remanded to the custody of the department of social and health services for control, care, and treatment in a secure facility as designated in RCW 71.09.060(1).

(3) If the service provider designated by the court to provide inpatient or outpatient treatment or to monitor or supervise any other terms and conditions of a person's placement in a less restrictive alternative is other than the department of social and health services or the department of corrections, then the service provider so designated must agree in writing to provide such treatment, monitoring, or supervision in accord with this section. Any person providing or agreeing to provide treatment, monitoring, or supervision services pursuant to this chapter may be compelled to testify and any privilege with regard to such person's testimony is deemed waived.

(4)(a) Prior to authorizing any release to a less restrictive alternative, the court shall impose such conditions upon the person as are necessary to ensure the safety of the community. In imposing conditions, the court must impose a restriction on the proximity of the person's residence to public or private schools providing instruction to kindergarten or any grades one through 12 in accordance with RCW 72.09.340. Courts shall require a minimum distance restriction of ((500 feet))two miles on the proximity of the person's residence to child care facilities and public or private schools providing instruction to kindergarten or any grades one through 12. The court shall order the department of corrections to investigate the less restrictive alternative and, within 60 days of the order to investigate, recommend any additional conditions to the court. These conditions shall be individualized to address the person's specific risk factors and criminogenic needs and may include, but are not limited to(([,])), the following: Specification of residence or restrictions on residence including distance restrictions, specification of contact with a reasonable number of individuals upon the person's request who are verified by the department of corrections to be appropriate social contacts, prohibition of contact with potential or past victims, prohibition of alcohol and other drug use, participation in a specific course of inpatient or outpatient treatment that may include monitoring by the use of polygraph and plethysmograph, monitoring through the use of global positioning system technology, supervision by a department of corrections community corrections officer, a requirement that the person remain within the state unless the person receives prior authorization by the court, and any other conditions that the court determines are in the best interest of the person or others. A copy of the conditions of release shall be given to the person and to any designated service providers.

(b) To the greatest extent possible, the person, person's counsel, prosecuting agency responsible for the initial commitment, treatment provider, supervising community corrections officer, and appropriate clinical staff of the special commitment center shall meet and collaborate to craft individualized, narrowly tailored, and empirically based conditions to present to the court to help facilitate the person's successful transition to the community.

(5)(a) Prior to authorizing release to a less restrictive alternative proposed by the department, the court shall consider whether the person's less restrictive alternative placement is in accordance with fair share principles. To ensure equitable distribution of releases, and prevent the disproportionate grouping of persons subject to less restrictive orders in any one county, or in any one jurisdiction or community within a county, the legislature finds it is appropriate for releases to a less restrictive alternative to occur in a manner that adheres to fair share principles. The legislature recognizes that there may be reasons why the department may not recommend that a person be released to his or her county of commitment, including availability of individualized resources, the person's support needs, or when the court determines that the person's return to his or her county of commitment would be inappropriate considering any court-issued protection orders, victim safety concerns that cannot be addressed through use of global positioning system technology, the unavailability of appropriate treatment or facilities that would adequately protect the community, negative influences on the person, and the location of family or other persons or organizations offering support to the person. If the court authorizes conditional release based on the department's proposal to a county other than the county of commitment, the court shall enter specific findings regarding its decision and identify whether the release remains in line with fair share principles.

(b)(i) When the department develops a less restrictive alternative placement under this section, it shall attempt to identify a placement satisfying the requirements of RCW 71.09.092 that is aligned with fair share principles. The department shall document its rationale for the recommended placement.

(ii) If the department does not support or recommend conditional release to a less restrictive alternative due to a clinical determination, the department shall document its objection and certify that the department is developing the less restrictive alternative pursuant to a court order and not because of a clinical determination.

(iii) When the department develops or proposes a less restrictive alternative placement under this chapter, it shall be considered a predisposition recommendation.

(iv) In developing, modifying, and enforcing less restrictive alternatives, the department shall be deemed to be performing a quasi-judicial function.

(c) If the committed person is not conditionally released to his or her county of commitment, the department shall provide the law and justice council of the county in which the person is conditionally released with notice and a written explanation, including whether the department remains in compliance with fair share principles regarding releases under this chapter.

(d) For purposes of this section, the person's county of commitment means the county of the court which ordered the person's commitment.

(e) This subsection (5) does not apply to releases to a secure community transition facility under RCW 71.09.250.

(6)(a) When ordered by the court, the department must provide less restrictive alternative treatment that includes, at a minimum:

(i) The services identified in the person's discharge plan as outlined in RCW 71.09.080(4);

(ii) The assignment of a community care coordinator;

(iii) Regular contacts with providers of court-ordered treatment services;

(iv) Community escorts, if needed;

(v) A transition plan that addresses the person's access to continued services upon unconditional discharge;

(vi) Financial support for necessary housing;

(vii) Life skills training and disability accommodations, if needed; and

(viii) Assistance in pursuing benefits, education, and employment.

(b) At the time the department of corrections is ordered to investigate a proposed less restrictive alternative placement, subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department shall assign a social worker to assist the person with discharge planning, pursuing benefits, and coordination of care prior to release.

(i) The social worker shall assist the person with completing applications for benefits prior to the person's release from total confinement.

(ii) To promote continuity of care and the individual's success in the community, the department social worker shall be responsible for initiating a clinical transition of care between the last treating clinician at the special commitment center and the person's designated community treatment provider. This transition between one clinical setting to another shall occur no later than 15 days before an individual's release from the special commitment center.

(iii) If applicable, the social worker shall assist the person with locating any needed disability accommodations in the community and with obtaining resources to help address the person's identified life skills needs prior to release from total confinement.

(7) Any service provider designated to provide inpatient or outpatient treatment shall monthly, or as otherwise directed by the court, submit to the court, to the department of social and health services facility from which the person was released, to the prosecuting agency, and to the supervising community corrections officer, a report stating whether the person is complying with the terms and conditions of the conditional release to a less restrictive alternative.

(8) Each person released to a less restrictive alternative shall have his or her case reviewed by the court that released him or her no later than one year after such release and annually thereafter until the person is unconditionally discharged. Review may occur in a shorter time or more frequently, if the court, in its discretion on its own motion, or on motion of the person, the secretary, or the prosecuting agency so determines. The questions to be determined by the court are whether the person shall continue to be conditionally released to a less restrictive alternative, and if so, whether a modification to the person's less restrictive alternative order is appropriate to ensure the conditional release remains in the best interest of the person and adequate to protect the victim and the community. The court in making its determination shall be aided by the periodic reports filed pursuant to subsection (7) of this section and the opinions of the secretary and other experts or professional persons.

--- END ---