BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that rates of catalytic converter theft have rapidly increased statewide and nationwide, due in part to existing challenges with accurately identifying stolen catalytic converters and tracking them through the stream of commerce after they have been removed from their originating vehicles. The legislature also finds that recent evidence suggests most purchases of stolen catalytic converters are conducted by unlicensed, unregulated purchasers.

Therefore, the legislature intends to require all purchasers to be licensed and subject to regulation and inspection. The legislature also intends to create a related structure for enforcing these provisions and imposing penalties commensurate with the enforcement and penalty structures found in comparable areas of law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 19.290 RCW to read as follows:

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to authorize licensed scrap metal businesses to purchase or sell junk vehicles or major component parts as defined in RCW 46.79.010.

Sec. 3. RCW 19.290.010 and 2013 c 322 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Commercial account" means a relationship between a scrap metal business and a commercial enterprise that is ongoing and properly documented under RCW 19.290.030.

(2) "Commercial enterprise" means a corporation, partnership, limited liability company, association, state agency, political subdivision of the state, public corporation, or any other legal or commercial entity.

(3) "Commercial metal property" means: Utility access covers; street light poles and fixtures; road and bridge guardrails; highway or street signs; water meter covers; traffic directional and control signs; traffic light signals; any metal property marked with the name of a commercial enterprise, including but not limited to a telephone, commercial mobile radio services, cable, electric, water, natural gas, or other utility, or railroad; unused or undamaged building construction materials consisting of copper pipe, tubing, or wiring, or aluminum wire, siding, downspouts, or gutters; aluminum or stainless steel fence panels made from one inch tubing, forty-two inches high with four-inch gaps; aluminum decking, bleachers, or risers; historical markers; statue plaques; grave markers and funeral vases; or agricultural irrigation wheels, sprinkler heads, and pipes.

(4) "Engage in business" means conducting more than twelve transactions in a twelve-month period.

(5) "Nonferrous metal property" means metal property for which the value of the metal property is derived from the property's content of copper, brass, aluminum, bronze, lead, zinc, nickel, and their alloys. "Nonferrous metal property" does not include precious metals.

(6) "Person" means an individual, domestic or foreign corporation, limited liability corporation, partnership, trust, unincorporated association, or other entity; an affiliate or associate of any such person; or any two or more persons acting as a partnership, syndicate, or other group for the purpose of acquiring, holding, or dispersing of securities of a domestic or foreign corporation.

(7) "Precious metals" means gold, silver, and platinum.

(8) (("Private metal property" means catalytic converters, either singly or in bundles, bales, or bulk, that have been removed from vehicles for sale as a specific commodity.

(9))) "Record" means a paper, electronic, or other method of storing information.

(((10)))(9) "Scrap metal business" means a scrap metal supplier, scrap metal recycler, and scrap metal processor.

(((11)))(10) "Scrap metal processor" means a person with a current business license that conducts business from a permanent location, that is engaged in the business of purchasing or receiving ((private metal property,)) nonferrous metal property((,)) and commercial metal property for the purpose of altering the metal in preparation for its use as feedstock in the manufacture of new products, and that maintains a hydraulic bailer, shearing device, or shredding device for recycling.

(((12)))(11) "Scrap metal recycler" means a person with a current business license that is engaged in the business of purchasing or receiving ((private metal property,)) nonferrous metal property((,)) and commercial metal property for the purpose of aggregation and sale to another scrap metal business and that maintains a fixed place of business within the state.

(((13)))(12) "Scrap metal supplier" means a person with a current business license that is engaged in the business of purchasing or receiving ((private metal property or)) nonferrous metal property for the purpose of aggregation and sale to a scrap metal recycler or scrap metal processor and that does not maintain a fixed business location in the state.

(((14)))(13) "Transaction" means a pledge, or the purchase of, or the trade of any item of ((private metal property or)) nonferrous metal property by a scrap metal business from a member of the general public. "Transaction" does not include donations or the purchase or receipt of ((private metal property or)) nonferrous metal property by a scrap metal business from a commercial enterprise, from another scrap metal business, or from a duly authorized employee or agent of the commercial enterprise or scrap metal business.

Sec. 4. RCW 19.290.020 and 2022 c 221 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) At the time of a transaction, every scrap metal business doing business in this state shall produce wherever that business is conducted an accurate and legible record of each transaction involving ((private metal property or)) nonferrous metal property. This record must be written in the English language, documented on a standardized form or in electronic form, and contain the following information:

(a) The signature of the person with whom the transaction is made;

(b) The time, date, location, and value of the transaction;

(c) The name of the employee representing the scrap metal business in the transaction;

(d) The name, street address, and telephone number of the person with whom the transaction is made;

(e) The license plate number and state of issuance of the license plate on the motor vehicle used to deliver the ((private metal property or)) nonferrous metal property subject to the transaction;

(f) A description of the motor vehicle used to deliver the ((private metal property or)) nonferrous metal property subject to the transaction;

(g) The current driver's license number or other government-issued picture identification card number of the seller or a copy of the seller's government-issued picture identification card; and

(h) A description of the predominant types of ((private metal property or)) nonferrous metal property subject to the transaction, utilizing the institute of scrap recycling industries' generally accepted terminology, and including weight, quantity, or volume((; and

(i) For every transaction specifically involving a catalytic converter that has been removed from a vehicle, documentation indicating that the private metal property in the seller's possession is the result of the seller replacing private metal property from a vehicle registered in the seller's name)).

(2) For every transaction that involves ((private metal property or)) nonferrous metal property, every scrap metal business doing business in the state shall require the person with whom a transaction is being made to sign a declaration. The declaration may be included as part of the transactional record required under subsection (1) of this section, or on a receipt for the transaction. The declaration must state substantially the following:

"I, the undersigned, affirm under penalty of law that the property that is subject to this transaction is not to the best of my knowledge stolen property."

The declaration must be signed and dated by the person with whom the transaction is being made. An employee of the scrap metal business must witness the signing and dating of the declaration and sign the declaration accordingly before any transaction may be consummated.

(3) The record and declaration required under this section must be open to the inspection of any commissioned law enforcement officer of the state or any of its political subdivisions at all times during the ordinary hours of business, or at reasonable times if ordinary hours of business are not kept, and must be maintained wherever that business is conducted for five years following the date of the transaction.

Sec. 5. RCW 19.290.030 and 2022 c 221 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No scrap metal business may enter into a transaction to purchase or receive ((private metal property or)) nonferrous metal property from any person who cannot produce at least one piece of current government-issued picture identification, including a valid driver's license or identification card issued by any state.

(2) No scrap metal business may purchase or receive ((private metal property or)) commercial metal property unless the seller: (a) Has a commercial account with the scrap metal business; (b) can prove ownership of the property by producing written documentation that the seller is the owner of the property; or (c) can produce written documentation that the seller is an employee or agent authorized to sell the property on behalf of a commercial enterprise.

(3) No scrap metal business may enter into a transaction to purchase or receive metallic wire that was burned in whole or in part to remove insulation unless the seller can produce written proof to the scrap metal business that the wire was lawfully burned.

(4)(a) No transaction involving ((private metal property or)) nonferrous metal property may be made in cash or with any person who does not provide a street address and photographic identification and sign a declaration under the requirements of RCW 19.290.020(((1) (d) and (g))) except as described in (b) ((and (c))) of this subsection. The person with whom the transaction is being made may only be paid by a nontransferable check, mailed by the scrap metal business to a street address provided under RCW 19.290.020, no earlier than three days after the transaction was made. A transaction occurs on the date provided in the record required under RCW 19.290.020.

(b) A scrap metal business that is in compliance with this chapter may pay up to a maximum of $30 in cash, stored value device, or electronic funds transfer for nonferrous metal property. The balance of the value of the transaction may be made by nontransferable check, stored value device, or electronic funds transfer at the time the transaction is made if the scrap metal business digitally captures:

(i) A copy of one piece of current government-issued picture identification, including a current driver's license or identification card issued by any state; and

(ii) Either a picture or video of either the material subject to the transaction in the form received or the material subject to the transaction within the vehicle which the material was transported to the scrap metal business.

(((c) Payment to individual sellers of private metal property as defined in this chapter may not be made at the time of the transaction and shall not be paid earlier than three business days after the transaction was made. Records of payment for private metal property as defined in this chapter must be kept in the same file or record as all records collected under this subsection and retained and be available for review for two years from the date of the transaction.))

(5)(a) A scrap metal business's usage of video surveillance shall be sufficient to comply with subsection (4)(b)(ii) of this section so long as the video captures the material subject to the transaction.

(b) A digital image or picture taken under this section must be available for two years from the date of transaction, while a video recording must be available for 30 days.

(6) No scrap metal business may purchase or receive beer kegs from anyone except a manufacturer of beer kegs or licensed brewery.

Sec. 6. RCW 19.290.040 and 2013 c 322 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every scrap metal business must create and maintain a permanent record with a commercial enterprise, including another scrap metal business, in order to establish a commercial account. That record, at a minimum, must include the following information:

(a) The full name of the commercial enterprise or commercial account;

(b) The business address and telephone number of the commercial enterprise or commercial account; and

(c) The full name of the person employed by the commercial enterprise who is authorized to deliver ((private metal property,)) nonferrous metal property((,)) and commercial metal property to the scrap metal business.

(2) The record maintained by a scrap metal business for a commercial account must document every purchase or receipt of ((private metal property,)) nonferrous metal property((,)) and commercial metal property from the commercial enterprise. The record must be maintained for three years following the date of the transfer or receipt. The documentation must include, at a minimum, the following information:

(a) The time, date, and value of the property being purchased or received;

(b) A description of the predominant types of property being purchased or received; and

(c) The signature of the person delivering the property to the scrap metal business.

Sec. 7. RCW 19.290.050 and 2013 c 322 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((Upon))In addition to all other requirements of this chapter, upon request by any commissioned law enforcement officer of the state or any of its political subdivisions, every scrap metal business shall furnish a full, true, and correct transcript of the records from the purchase or receipt of ((private metal property,)) nonferrous metal property((,)) and commercial metal property involving only a specified individual, vehicle, or item of ((private metal property,)) nonferrous metal property((,)) or commercial metal property. This information may be transmitted within a specified time of not less than two business days to the applicable law enforcement agency electronically, by facsimile transmission, or by modem or similar device, or by delivery of computer disk subject to the requirements of, and approval by, the chief of police or the county's chief law enforcement officer.

(2) Any records created or produced under this section are exempt from disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW.

(3) If the scrap metal business has good cause to believe that any ((private metal property,)) nonferrous metal property((,)) or commercial metal property in ((his or her))their possession has been previously lost or stolen, the scrap metal business shall promptly report that fact to the applicable commissioned law enforcement officer of the state, the chief of police, or the county's chief law enforcement officer, together with the name of the owner, if known, and the date when and the name of the person from whom it was received.

(4) Compliance with this section shall not give rise to or form the basis of private civil liability on the part of a scrap metal business or scrap metal recycler.

Sec. 8. RCW 19.290.060 and 2013 c 322 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Following notification in writing from a commissioned law enforcement officer of the state or any of its political subdivisions that an item of ((private metal property,)) nonferrous metal property((,)) or commercial metal property has been reported as stolen, a scrap metal business shall hold that property intact and safe from alteration, damage, or commingling, and shall place an identifying tag or other suitable identification upon the property. The scrap metal business shall hold the property for a period of time as directed by the applicable law enforcement agency up to a maximum of ten business days.

(2) A commissioned law enforcement officer of the state or any of its political subdivisions shall not place on hold any item of ((private metal property,)) nonferrous metal property((,)) or commercial metal property unless that law enforcement agency reasonably suspects that the property is a lost or stolen item. Any hold that is placed on the property must be removed within ten business days after the property on hold is determined not to be stolen or lost and the property must be returned to the owner or released.

Sec. 9. RCW 19.290.080 and 2007 c 377 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each violation of the requirements of this chapter that are not subject to the criminal penalties under RCW ((19.290.070))9A.56.410 shall be punishable((, upon conviction,)) by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars. Each catalytic converter possessed or trafficked in violation of this chapter is a separate violation.

(2) Within two years ((of being convicted)) of a violation of any of the requirements of this chapter that ((are not subject to the criminal penalties under RCW 19.290.070))results in a civil penalty under this section, each subsequent violation shall be punishable((, upon conviction,)) by a fine of not more than two thousand dollars.

Sec. 10. RCW 19.290.220 and 2013 c 322 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Law enforcement agencies may register with the scrap theft alert system that is maintained and provided at no charge to users by the institute of scrap recycling industries, incorporated, or its successor organization, to receive alerts regarding thefts of ((private,)) nonferrous((,)) or commercial metal property in the relevant geographic area.

(2) Any business licensed under this chapter shall:

(a) Sign up with the scrap theft alert system that is maintained and provided at no charge to users by the institute of scrap recycling industries, incorporated, or its successor organization, to receive alerts regarding thefts of ((private,)) nonferrous((,)) or commercial metal property in the relevant geographic area;

(b) Download the scrap metal theft alerts generated by the scrap theft alert system on a daily basis;

(c) Use the alerts to identify potentially stolen commercial metal property((,))and nonferrous metal property((, and private metal property)); and

(d) Maintain for ninety days copies of any theft alerts received and downloaded pursuant to this section.

Sec. 11. RCW 19.290.240 and 2013 c 322 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

The provisions of this chapter shall be liberally construed to the end that traffic in stolen ((private))commercial metal property ((or))and nonferrous metal property may be prevented, and irresponsible, unreliable, or dishonest persons may be prevented from engaging in the business of processing, recycling, or supplying scrap metal in this state and reliable persons may be encouraged to engage in businesses of processing, recycling, or supplying scrap metal in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12. A new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW to read as follows:

Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the Washington state patrol shall:

(1) Conduct periodic inspections at least once a year of all licensed purchasers of catalytic converters that have been removed from vehicles that are licensed under chapters 46.79 and 46.80 RCW;

(2) Develop a standardized inspection form and train local law enforcement agencies, civilian employees, and limited authority law enforcement personnel on inspection procedures of licensed purchasers;

(3) Specify which specific law enforcement agencies have a duty to inspect the different business types that are licensed to purchase catalytic converters; and

(4) Allow inspections to be conducted by civilian employees or limited authority law enforcement agencies to increase the availability of potential inspectors.

Sec. 13. RCW 46.79.010 and 2001 c 64 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions set forth in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context indicates otherwise.

(1) "Junk vehicle" means a motor vehicle certified under RCW 46.55.230 as meeting all the following requirements:

(a) Is three years old or older;

(b) Is extensively damaged, such damage including but not limited to any of the following: A broken window or windshield or missing wheels, tires, motor, or transmission;

(c) Is apparently inoperable;

(d) Is without a valid, current registration plate;

(e) Has a fair market value equal only to the value of the scrap in it.

(2) "Scrap processor" means a licensed establishment that maintains a hydraulic baler and shears, or a shredder for recycling salvage.

(3) "Demolish" means to destroy completely by use of a hydraulic baler and shears, or a shredder.

(4) "Hulk hauler" means any person who deals in vehicles for the sole purpose of transporting and/or selling them to a licensed vehicle wrecker or scrap processor in substantially the same form in which they are obtained. A hulk hauler may not sell secondhand motor vehicle parts to anyone other than a licensed vehicle wrecker or scrap processor, except for those parts specifically enumerated in RCW 46.79.020(2), as now or hereafter amended, which may be sold to a licensed vehicle wrecker or disposed of at a public facility for waste disposal.

(5) "Director" means the director of licensing.

(6) "Major component parts" include engines and short blocks, frames, transmissions or transfer cases, cabs, doors, front or rear differentials, front or rear clips, quarter panels or fenders, bumpers, truck beds or boxes, seats, ((and)) hoods, and catalytic converters.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14. A new section is added to chapter 46.79 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The director or the director's designee may, pursuant to the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW, by order deny, suspend, or revoke the license of a hulk hauler or scrap processor, or assess a civil fine of up to $500 for each violation, if the director finds that the applicant or licensee has:

(a) Acquired a vehicle or major component part other than by first obtaining title or other documentation as provided by this chapter;

(b) Willfully misrepresented the physical condition of any motor or integral part of a vehicle;

(c) Sold, had in the hulk hauler's or scrap processor's possession, or disposed of a vehicle or any part thereof when he or she knows that the vehicle or part has been stolen or appropriated with the consent of the owner;

(d) Sold, bought, received, concealed, had in the hulk hauler's or scrap processor's possession, or disposed of a vehicle or any part thereof having a missing, defaced, altered, or covered manufacturer's identification number, unless approved by a law enforcement officer;

(e) Committed forgery or misstated a material fact on any title, registration, or other document covering a vehicle that has been reassembled from parts obtained from the disassembling of other vehicles;

(f) Committed any dishonest act or omission that the director has reason to believe has caused loss or serious inconvenience as a result of a sale of a vehicle or part thereof;

(g) Failed to comply with any of the provisions of this chapter or with any of the rules adopted under it, or with the provisions of this title relating to registration and certification of title of vehicles;

(h) Procured a license fraudulently or dishonestly; or

(i) Been convicted of a crime that directly relates to the business of a hulk hauler or scrap processor and the time elapsed since conviction is less than 10 years, or suffered any judgment within the preceding five years in any civil action involving fraud, misrepresentation, or conversion. For the purpose of this subsection, conviction means in addition to a final conviction in either a federal, state, or municipal court, an unvacated forfeiture of bail or collateral deposited to secure a defendant's appearance in court, the payment of a fine, a plea of guilty, or a finding of guilt regardless of whether the sentence is deferred or the penalty is suspended.

(2) In addition to actions by the department of licensing under this section, it is a gross misdemeanor to violate subsection (1)(a), (b), or (h) of this section.

Sec. 15. RCW 46.80.010 and 2010 c 161 s 1138 and 2010 c 8 s 9097 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The definitions set forth in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Core" means a major component part received by a vehicle wrecker in exchange for a like part sold by the vehicle wrecker, is not resold as a major component part except for scrap metal value or for remanufacture, and the vehicle wrecker maintains records for three years from the date of acquisition to identify the name of the person from whom the core was received.

(2) "Established place of business" means a building or enclosure which the vehicle wrecker occupies either continuously or at regular periods and where his or her books and records are kept and business is transacted and which must conform with zoning regulations.

(3) "Interim owner" means the owner of a vehicle who has the original certificate of title for the vehicle, which certificate has been released by the person named on the certificate and assigned to the person offering to sell the vehicle to the wrecker.

(4) "Major component part" includes at least each of the following vehicle parts: (a) Engines and short blocks; (b) frame; (c) transmission and/or transfer case; (d) cab; (e) door; (f) front or rear differential; (g) front or rear clip; (h) quarter panel; (i) truck bed or box; (j) seat; (k) hood; (l) bumper; (m) fender; ((and)) (n) airbag; and (o) catalytic converters. The director may supplement this list by rule.

(5) "Vehicle wrecker" means every person, firm, partnership, association, or corporation engaged in the business of buying, selling, or dealing in vehicles of a type required to be registered under the laws of this state, for the purpose of wrecking, dismantling, disassembling, or substantially changing the form of a vehicle, or who buys or sells integral secondhand parts of component material thereof, in whole or in part, or who deals in secondhand vehicle parts.

(6) "Wrecked vehicle" means a vehicle which is disassembled or dismantled or a vehicle which is acquired with the intent to dismantle or disassemble and never again to operate as a vehicle, or a vehicle which has sustained such damage that its cost to repair exceeds the fair market value of a like vehicle which has not sustained such damage, or a damaged vehicle whose salvage value plus cost to repair equals or exceeds its fair market value, if repaired, or a vehicle which has sustained such damage or deterioration that it may not lawfully operate upon the highways of this state for which the salvage value plus cost to repair exceeds its fair market value, if repaired; further, it is presumed that a vehicle is a wreck if it has sustained such damage or deterioration that it may not lawfully operate upon the highways of this state.

Sec. 16. RCW 46.80.210 and 2022 c 221 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Payment to individual sellers of ((private metal property as defined in RCW 19.290.010))catalytic converters may not be made at the time of the transaction and shall not be paid earlier than three business days after the transaction was made.

No transaction involving catalytic converters may be made in cash or with any person who does not provide a street address and photographic identification. The person with whom the transaction is being made may only be paid by a nontransferable check, mailed by the licensed auto wrecker to a street address recorded according to RCW 46.80.080, no earlier than three days after the transaction was made. A transaction occurs on the date provided in the record required under RCW 46.80.080.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17. A new section is added to chapter 9A.82 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty of trafficking in catalytic converters in the second degree if he or she knowingly traffics catalytic converters that have been removed from a motor vehicle and the person purchases four or fewer catalytic converters, and they do not fulfill the requirements of chapter 46.79 or 46.80 RCW for a lawful transfer.

(2) Trafficking in catalytic converters in the second degree is a class C felony.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18. A new section is added to chapter 46.80 RCW to read as follows:

The license fees required under RCW 46.80.040 and 46.80.050 must also include a $500 catalytic converter inspection fee, to be deposited in the state patrol highway account, in order to support the activities of the Washington state patrol under section 12 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19. A new section is added to chapter 9A.82 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty of trafficking in catalytic converters in the first degree if he or she knowingly traffics catalytic converters that have been removed from a motor vehicle and:

(a) The person purchases five or more catalytic converters, and they do not fulfill the requirements of chapter 19.290 RCW for a lawful transfer; or

(b) The person acts as a purchaser and is not licensed as required under chapter 46.79 or 46.80 RCW.

(2) Trafficking in catalytic converters in the first degree is a class B felony.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20. A new section is added to chapter 9A.82 RCW to read as follows:

It is a gross misdemeanor for any person who is not a vehicle wrecker licensed under chapter 46.80 RCW or scrap processor licensed under chapter 46.79 RCW to knowingly sell or offer for sale one or more catalytic converters that have been removed from a motor vehicle without first etching, engraving, or otherwise permanently marking each catalytic converter involved in the transaction with the last eight digits of the vehicle identification number of the motor vehicle from which the catalytic converter was removed.

Sec. 21. RCW 9.94A.515 and 2022 c 231 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

TABLE 2

CRIMES INCLUDED WITHIN EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVI

Aggravated Murder 1 (RCW 10.95.020)

XV

Homicide by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious explosion 1 (RCW 70.74.280(1))

Murder 1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

XIV

Murder 2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

Trafficking 1 (RCW 9A.40.100(1))

XIII

Malicious explosion 2 (RCW 70.74.280(2))

Malicious placement of an explosive 1 (RCW 70.74.270(1))

XII

Assault 1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious placement of an imitation device 1 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(a))

Promoting Commercial Sexual Abuse of a Minor (RCW 9.68A.101)

Rape 1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

Trafficking 2 (RCW 9A.40.100(3))

XI

Manslaughter 1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

Rape 2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

Vehicular Homicide, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.520)

Vehicular Homicide, by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.520)

X

Child Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Criminal Mistreatment 1 (RCW 9A.42.020)

Indecent Liberties (with forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping 1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading Organized Crime (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious explosion 3 (RCW 70.74.280(3))

Sexually Violent Predator Escape (RCW 9A.76.115)

IX

Abandonment of Dependent Person 1 (RCW 9A.42.060)

Assault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Explosive devices prohibited (RCW 70.74.180)

Hit and Run—Death (RCW 46.52.020(4)(a))

Homicide by Watercraft, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 79A.60.050)

Inciting Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious placement of an explosive 2 (RCW 70.74.270(2))

Robbery 1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)

VIII

Arson 1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Commercial Sexual Abuse of a Minor (RCW 9.68A.100)

Homicide by Watercraft, by the operation of any vessel in a reckless manner (RCW 79A.60.050)

Manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Promoting Prostitution 1 (RCW 9A.88.070)

Theft of Ammonia (RCW 69.55.010)

VII

Air bag diagnostic systems (causing bodily injury or death) (RCW 46.37.660(2)(b))

Air bag replacement requirements (causing bodily injury or death) (RCW 46.37.660(1)(b))

Burglary 1 (RCW 9A.52.020)

Child Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Civil Disorder Training (RCW 9A.48.120)

Dealing in depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct 1 (RCW 9.68A.050(1))

Drive-by Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

False Reporting 1 (RCW 9A.84.040(2)(a))

Homicide by Watercraft, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 79A.60.050)

Indecent Liberties (without forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1) (b) and (c))

Introducing Contraband 1 (RCW 9A.76.140)

Malicious placement of an explosive 3 (RCW 70.74.270(3))

Manufacture or import counterfeit, nonfunctional, damaged, or previously deployed air bag (causing bodily injury or death) (RCW 46.37.650(1)(b))

Negligently Causing Death By Use of a Signal Preemption Device (RCW 46.37.675)

Sell, install, or reinstall counterfeit, nonfunctional, damaged, or previously deployed airbag (RCW 46.37.650(2)(b))

Sending, bringing into state depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct 1 (RCW 9.68A.060(1))

Unlawful Possession of a Firearm in the first degree (RCW 9.41.040(1))

Use of a Machine Gun or Bump-fire Stock in Commission of a Felony (RCW 9.41.225)

Vehicular Homicide, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 46.61.520)

VI

Bail Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(a))

Bribery (RCW 9A.68.010)

Incest 1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating a Judge (RCW 9A.72.160)

Intimidating a Juror/Witness (RCW 9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)

Malicious placement of an imitation device 2 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(b))

Possession of Depictions of a Minor Engaged in Sexually Explicit Conduct 1 (RCW 9.68A.070(1))

Rape of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

Theft from a Vulnerable Adult 1 (RCW 9A.56.400(1))

Unlawful Storage of Ammonia (RCW 69.55.020)

V

Abandonment of Dependent Person 2 (RCW 9A.42.070)

Advancing money or property for extortionate extension of credit (RCW 9A.82.030)

Air bag diagnostic systems (RCW 46.37.660(2)(c))

Air bag replacement requirements (RCW 46.37.660(1)(c))

Bail Jumping with class A Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(b))

Child Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Criminal Mistreatment 2 (RCW 9A.42.030)

Custodial Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW 9A.44.160)

Dealing in Depictions of Minor Engaged in Sexually Explicit Conduct 2 (RCW 9.68A.050(2))

Domestic Violence Court Order Violation (RCW 7.105.450, 10.99.040, 10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220, 26.26B.050, 26.50.110, 26.52.070, or 74.34.145)

Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate Extension of Credit (RCW 9A.82.020)

Extortionate Means to Collect Extensions of Credit (RCW 9A.82.040)

Incest 2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping 2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Manufacture or import counterfeit, nonfunctional, damaged, or previously deployed air bag (RCW 46.37.650(1)(c))

Perjury 1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent prison misbehavior (RCW 9.94.070)

Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310)

Rape 3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering Criminal Assistance 1 (RCW 9A.76.070)

Sell, install, or reinstall counterfeit, nonfunctional, damaged, or previously deployed airbag (RCW 46.37.650(2)(c))

Sending, Bringing into State Depictions of Minor Engaged in Sexually Explicit Conduct 2 (RCW 9.68A.060(2))

Sexual Misconduct with a Minor 1 (RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually Violating Human Remains (RCW 9A.44.105)

Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without Permission 1 (RCW 9A.56.070)

IV

Arson 2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault 2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault 3 (of a Peace Officer with a Projectile Stun Gun) (RCW 9A.36.031(1)(h))

Assault 4 (third domestic violence offense) (RCW 9A.36.041(3))

Assault by Watercraft (RCW 79A.60.060)

Bribing a Witness/Bribe Received by Witness (RCW 9A.72.090, 9A.72.100)

Cheating 1 (RCW 9.46.1961)

Commercial Bribery (RCW 9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(4))

Driving While Under the Influence (RCW 46.61.502(6))

Endangerment with a Controlled Substance (RCW 9A.42.100)

Escape 1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hate Crime (RCW 9A.36.080)

Hit and Run—Injury (RCW 46.52.020(4)(b))

Hit and Run with Vessel—Injury Accident (RCW 79A.60.200(3))

Identity Theft 1 (RCW 9.35.020(2))

Indecent Exposure to Person Under Age 14 (subsequent sex offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing Outcome of Sporting Event (RCW 9A.82.070)

Physical Control of a Vehicle While Under the Influence (RCW 46.61.504(6))

Possession of Depictions of a Minor Engaged in Sexually Explicit Conduct 2 (RCW 9.68A.070(2))

Residential Burglary (RCW 9A.52.025)

Robbery 2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Trafficking in Catalytic Converters 1 (section 19 of this act)

Trafficking in Stolen Property 1 (RCW 9A.82.050)

Unlawful factoring of a credit card or payment card transaction (RCW 9A.56.290(4)(b))

Unlawful transaction of health coverage as a health care service contractor (RCW 48.44.016(3))

Unlawful transaction of health coverage as a health maintenance organization (RCW 48.46.033(3))

Unlawful transaction of insurance business (RCW 48.15.023(3))

Unlicensed practice as an insurance professional (RCW 48.17.063(2))

Use of Proceeds of Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1) and (2))

Vehicle Prowling 2 (third or subsequent offense) (RCW 9A.52.100(3))

Vehicular Assault, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.522)

Viewing of Depictions of a Minor Engaged in Sexually Explicit Conduct 1 (RCW 9.68A.075(1))

Willful Failure to Return from Furlough (RCW 72.66.060)

III

Animal Cruelty 1 (Sexual Conduct or Contact) (RCW 16.52.205(3))

Assault 3 (Except Assault 3 of a Peace Officer With a Projectile Stun Gun) (RCW 9A.36.031 except subsection (1)(h))

Assault of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail Jumping with class B or C Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(c))

Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Communication with a Minor for Immoral Purposes (RCW 9.68A.090)

Criminal Gang Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120)

Custodial Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Cyber Harassment (RCW 9A.90.120(2)(b))

Escape 2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion 2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

False Reporting 2 (RCW 9A.84.040(2)(b))

Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating a Public Servant (RCW 9A.76.180)

Introducing Contraband 2 (RCW 9A.76.150)

Malicious Injury to Railroad Property (RCW 81.60.070)

Manufacture of Untraceable Firearm with Intent to Sell (RCW 9.41.190)

Manufacture or Assembly of an Undetectable Firearm or Untraceable Firearm (RCW 9.41.325)

Mortgage Fraud (RCW 19.144.080)

Negligently Causing Substantial Bodily Harm By Use of a Signal Preemption Device (RCW 46.37.674)

Organized Retail Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.350(2))

Perjury 2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession of Incendiary Device (RCW 9.40.120)

Possession of Machine Gun, Bump-Fire Stock, Undetectable Firearm, or Short-Barreled Shotgun or Rifle (RCW 9.41.190)

Promoting Prostitution 2 (RCW 9A.88.080)

Retail Theft with Special Circumstances 1 (RCW 9A.56.360(2))

Securities Act violation (RCW 21.20.400)

Tampering with a Witness (RCW 9A.72.120)

Telephone Harassment (subsequent conviction or threat of death) (RCW 9.61.230(2))

Theft of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.083)

Theft with the Intent to Resell 1 (RCW 9A.56.340(2))

Trafficking in Catalytic Converters 2 (section 17 of this act)

Trafficking in Stolen Property 2 (RCW 9A.82.055)

Unlawful Hunting of Big Game 1 (RCW 77.15.410(3)(b))

Unlawful Imprisonment (RCW 9A.40.040)

Unlawful Misbranding of Fish or Shellfish 1 (RCW 77.140.060(3))

Unlawful possession of firearm in the second degree (RCW 9.41.040(2))

Unlawful Taking of Endangered Fish or Wildlife 1 (RCW 77.15.120(3)(b))

Unlawful Trafficking in Fish, Shellfish, or Wildlife 1 (RCW 77.15.260(3)(b))

Unlawful Use of a Nondesignated Vessel (RCW 77.15.530(4))

Vehicular Assault, by the operation or driving of a vehicle with disregard for the safety of others (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from Work Release (RCW 72.65.070)

II

Commercial Fishing Without a License 1 (RCW 77.15.500(3)(b))

Computer Trespass 1 (RCW 9A.90.040)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(3))

Electronic Data Service Interference (RCW 9A.90.060)

Electronic Data Tampering 1 (RCW 9A.90.080)

Electronic Data Theft (RCW 9A.90.100)

Engaging in Fish Dealing Activity Unlicensed 1 (RCW 77.15.620(3))

Escape from Community Custody (RCW 72.09.310)

Failure to Register as a Sex Offender (second or subsequent offense) (RCW 9A.44.130 prior to June 10, 2010, and RCW 9A.44.132)

Health Care False Claims (RCW 48.80.030)

Identity Theft 2 (RCW 9.35.020(3))

Improperly Obtaining Financial Information (RCW 9.35.010)

Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070)

Organized Retail Theft 2 (RCW 9A.56.350(3))

Possession of Stolen Property 1 (RCW 9A.56.150)

Possession of a Stolen Vehicle (RCW 9A.56.068)

Retail Theft with Special Circumstances 2 (RCW 9A.56.360(3))

Scrap Processing, Recycling, or Supplying Without a License (second or subsequent offense) (RCW 19.290.100)

Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft of a Motor Vehicle (RCW 9A.56.065)

Theft of Rental, Leased, Lease-purchased, or Loaned Property (valued at $5,000 or more) (RCW 9A.56.096(5)(a))

Theft with the Intent to Resell 2 (RCW 9A.56.340(3))

Trafficking in Insurance Claims (RCW 48.30A.015)

Unlawful factoring of a credit card or payment card transaction (RCW 9A.56.290(4)(a))

Unlawful Participation of Non-Indians in Indian Fishery (RCW 77.15.570(2))

Unlawful Practice of Law (RCW 2.48.180)

Unlawful Purchase or Use of a License (RCW 77.15.650(3)(b))

Unlawful Trafficking in Fish, Shellfish, or Wildlife 2 (RCW 77.15.260(3)(a))

Unlicensed Practice of a Profession or Business (RCW 18.130.190(7))

Voyeurism 1 (RCW 9A.44.115)

I

Attempting to Elude a Pursuing Police Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

False Verification for Welfare (RCW 74.08.055)

Forgery (RCW 9A.60.020)

Fraudulent Creation or Revocation of a Mental Health Advance Directive (RCW 9A.60.060)

Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080)

Mineral Trespass (RCW 78.44.330)

Possession of Stolen Property 2 (RCW 9A.56.160)

Reckless Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Spotlighting Big Game 1 (RCW 77.15.450(3)(b))

Suspension of Department Privileges 1 (RCW 77.15.670(3)(b))

Taking Motor Vehicle Without Permission 2 (RCW 9A.56.075)

Theft 2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft from a Vulnerable Adult 2 (RCW 9A.56.400(2))

Theft of Rental, Leased, Lease-purchased, or Loaned Property (valued at $750 or more but less than $5,000) (RCW 9A.56.096(5)(b))

Transaction of insurance business beyond the scope of licensure (RCW 48.17.063)

Unlawful Fish and Shellfish Catch Accounting (RCW 77.15.630(3)(b))

Unlawful Issuance of Checks or Drafts (RCW 9A.56.060)

Unlawful Possession of Fictitious Identification (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of Instruments of Financial Fraud (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of Payment Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of a Personal Identification Device (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Production of Payment Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Releasing, Planting, Possessing, or Placing Deleterious Exotic Wildlife (RCW 77.15.250(2)(b))

Unlawful Trafficking in Food Stamps (RCW 9.91.142)

Unlawful Use of Food Stamps (RCW 9.91.144)

Unlawful Use of Net to Take Fish 1 (RCW 77.15.580(3)(b))

Unlawful Use of Prohibited Aquatic Animal Species (RCW 77.15.253(3))

Vehicle Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

Violating Commercial Fishing Area or Time 1 (RCW 77.15.550(3)(b))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22. Section 18 of this act takes effect January 1, 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23. Except for section 18 of this act, this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect May 1, 2023.

--- END ---