BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.17 RCW to read as follows:

(1) No state or local agency, including any law enforcement agency, shall purchase, acquire, or otherwise use an unmanned aircraft or unmanned aircraft system produced by a manufacturer of covered equipment, systems, or services pursuant to section 889 of the John S. McCain national defense authorization act for fiscal year 2019 (P.L. 115–232).

(2) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Local agency" includes every county, city, town, municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or special purpose district, or any office, department, division, bureau, board, commission, or agency thereof, or other local public agency.

(b) "State agency" includes every state office, department, division, bureau, board, commission, or other state agency.

(c) "Unmanned aircraft" means an aircraft that is operated without the possibility of direct human intervention from within or on the aircraft, a remote piloted aircraft, or drone.

(d) "Unmanned aircraft system" means an unmanned aircraft and associated elements including, but not limited to, communication links and the components that control the unmanned aircraft that are required for the pilot in command to operate safely and efficiently in the national airspace system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect January 1, 2025.

--- END ---