BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. It is the intent of the legislature, despite inflationary conditions and workforce challenges, to complete the majority of the 2015 connecting Washington projects and improvements within the original 16-year time frame. To provide future legislatures additional tools to complete this task, the legislature intends to increase existing bond authority relative to those projects and improvements. However, bonds may only be sold when pledged revenues are deemed sufficient to pay the associated debt service.

Sec. 2. RCW 47.10.889 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 45 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

In order to provide funds necessary for the location, design, right-of-way, and construction of selected projects or improvements that are identified as connecting Washington projects or improvements in an omnibus transportation appropriations act, there shall be issued and sold upon the request of the department of transportation a total of ((five billion three hundred million dollars))$9,600,000,000 of general obligation bonds of the state of Washington.

--- END ---