BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Part 1

Stabilizing Cap and Invest Allowance Prices

Sec. 101. RCW 70A.65.010 and 2022 c 181 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Allowance" means an authorization to emit up to one metric ton of carbon dioxide equivalent.

(2) "Allowance price containment reserve" means an account maintained by the department with allowances available for sale through separate reserve auctions at predefined prices to assist in containing compliance costs for covered and opt-in entities in the event of unanticipated high costs for compliance instruments.

(3) "Annual allowance budget" means the total number of greenhouse gas allowances allocated for auction and distribution for one calendar year by the department.

(4) "Asset controlling supplier" means any entity that owns or operates interconnected electricity generating facilities or serves as an exclusive marketer for these facilities even though it does not own them, and has been designated by the department and received a department-published emissions factor for the wholesale electricity procured from its system. The department shall use a methodology consistent with the methodology used by an external greenhouse gas emissions trading program that shares the regional electricity transmission system. Electricity from an asset controlling supplier is considered a specified source of electricity.

(5) "Auction" means the process of selling greenhouse gas allowances by offering them up for bid, taking bids, and then distributing the allowances to winning bidders.

(6) "Auction floor price" means a price for allowances below which bids at auction are not eligible to be accepted.

(7) "Auction purchase limit" means the limit on the number of allowances one registered entity or a group of affiliated registered entities may purchase from the share of allowances sold at an auction.

(8) "Balancing authority" means the responsible entity that integrates resource plans ahead of time, maintains load-interchange-generation balance within a balancing authority area, and supports interconnection frequency in real time.

(9) "Balancing authority area" means the collection of generation, transmission, and load within the metered boundaries of a balancing authority. A balancing authority maintains load-resource balance within this area.

(10) "Best available technology" means a technology or technologies that will achieve the greatest reduction in greenhouse gas emissions, taking into account the fuels, processes, and equipment used by facilities to produce goods of comparable type, quantity, and quality. Best available technology must be technically feasible, commercially available, economically viable, not create excessive environmental impacts, and be compliant with all applicable laws while not changing the characteristics of the good being manufactured.

(11) "Biomass" means nonfossilized and biodegradable organic material originating from plants, animals, and microorganisms, including products, by-products, residues, and waste from agriculture, forestry, and related industries as well as the nonfossilized and biodegradable organic fractions of municipal wastewater and industrial waste, including gases and liquids recovered from the decomposition of nonfossilized and biodegradable organic material.

(12) "Biomass-derived fuels," "biomass fuels," or "biofuels" means fuels derived from biomass that ((have at least 40 percent lower greenhouse gas emissions based on a full life-cycle analysis when compared to petroleum fuels for which biofuels)) are capable as serving as a substitute for petroleum fuels.

(13) "Carbon dioxide equivalents" means a measure used to compare the emissions from various greenhouse gases based on their global warming potential.

(14) "Carbon dioxide removal" means deliberate human activities removing carbon dioxide from the atmosphere and durably storing it in geological, terrestrial, or ocean reservoirs, or in products. "Carbon dioxide removal" includes existing and potential anthropogenic enhancement of biological or geochemical sinks and including, but not limited to, carbon mineralization and direct air capture and storage.

(15) "Climate commitment" means the process and mechanisms to ensure a coordinated and strategic approach to advancing climate resilience and environmental justice and achieving an equitable and inclusive transition to a carbon neutral economy.

(16) "Climate resilience" is the ongoing process of anticipating, preparing for, and adapting to changes in climate and minimizing negative impacts to our natural systems, infrastructure, and communities. For natural systems, increasing climate resilience involves restoring and increasing the health, function, and integrity of our ecosystems and improving their ability to absorb and recover from climate-affected disturbances. For communities, increasing climate resilience means enhancing their ability to understand, prevent, adapt, and recover from climate impacts to people and infrastructure.

(17) "Closed facility" means a facility at which the current owner or operator has elected to permanently stop production and will no longer be an emissions source.

(18) "Compliance instrument" means an allowance or offset credit issued by the department or by an external greenhouse gas emissions trading program to which Washington has linked its greenhouse gas emissions cap and invest program. One compliance instrument is equal to one metric ton of carbon dioxide equivalent.

(19) "Compliance obligation" means the requirement to submit to the department the number of compliance instruments equivalent to a covered or opt-in entity's covered emissions during the compliance period.

(20) "Compliance period" means the four-year period for which the compliance obligation is calculated for covered entities.

(21) "Cost burden" means the impact on rates or charges to customers of electric utilities in Washington state for the incremental cost of electricity service to serve load due to the compliance cost for greenhouse gas emissions caused by the program. Cost burden includes administrative costs from the utility's participation in the program.

(22) "Covered emissions" means the emissions for which a covered entity has a compliance obligation under RCW 70A.65.080.

(23) "Covered entity" means a person that is designated by the department as subject to RCW 70A.65.060 through 70A.65.210.

(24) "Cumulative environmental health impact" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 70A.02.010.

(25) "Curtailed facility" means a facility at which the owner or operator has temporarily suspended production but for which the owner or operator maintains operating permits and retains the option to resume production if conditions become amenable.

(26) "Department" means the department of ecology.

(27) "Electricity importer" means:

(a) For electricity that is scheduled with a NERC e-tag to a final point of delivery into a balancing authority area located entirely within the state of Washington, the electricity importer is identified on the NERC e-tag as the purchasing-selling entity on the last segment of the tag's physical path with the point of receipt located outside the state of Washington and the point of delivery located inside the state of Washington;

(b) For facilities physically located outside the state of Washington with the first point of interconnection to a balancing authority area located entirely within the state of Washington when the electricity is not scheduled on a NERC e-tag, the electricity importer is the facility operator or owner;

(c) For electricity imported through a centralized market, the electricity importer will be defined by rule consistent with the rules required under RCW 70A.65.080(1)(c);

(d) For electricity from facilities allocated to serve retail electricity customers of a multijurisdictional electric company, the electricity importer is the multijurisdictional electric company;

(e) If the importer identified under (a) of this subsection is a federal power marketing administration over which the state of Washington does not have jurisdiction, and the federal power marketing administration has not voluntarily elected to comply with the program, then the electricity importer is the next purchasing-selling entity in the physical path on the NERC e-tag, or if no additional purchasing-selling entity over which the state of Washington has jurisdiction, then the electricity importer is the electric utility that operates the Washington transmission or distribution system, or the generation balancing authority;

(f) For electricity that is imported into the state by a federal power marketing administration and sold to a public body or cooperative customer or direct service industrial customer located in Washington pursuant to section 5(b) or (d) of the Pacific Northwest electric power planning and conservation act of 1980, P.L. 96-501, the electricity importer is the federal marketing administration;

(g) If the importer identified under (f) of this subsection has not voluntarily elected to comply with the program, then the electricity importer is the public body or cooperative customer or direct service industrial customer; or

(h) For electricity from facilities allocated to a consumer-owned utility inside the state of Washington from a multijurisdictional consumer-owned utility, the electricity importer is the consumer-owned utility inside the state of Washington.

(28) "Emissions containment reserve allowance" means a conditional allowance that is withheld from sale at an auction by the department or its agent to secure additional emissions reductions in the event prices fall below the emissions containment reserve trigger price.

(29) "Emissions containment reserve trigger price" means the price below which allowances will be withheld from sale by the department or its agent at an auction, as determined by the department by rule.

(30) "Emissions threshold" means the greenhouse gas emission level at or above which a person has a compliance obligation.

(31) "Environmental benefits" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 70A.02.010.

(32) "Environmental harm" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 70A.02.010.

(33) "Environmental impacts" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 70A.02.010.

(34) "Environmental justice" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 70A.02.010.

(35) "Environmental justice assessment" has the same meaning as identified in RCW 70A.02.060.

(36) "External greenhouse gas emissions trading program" means a government program, other than Washington's program created in this chapter, that restricts greenhouse gas emissions from sources outside of Washington and that allows emissions trading.

(37) "Facility" means any physical property, plant, building, structure, source, or stationary equipment located on one or more contiguous or adjacent properties in actual physical contact or separated solely by a public roadway or other public right-of-way and under common ownership or common control, that emits or may emit any greenhouse gas.

(38) "First jurisdictional deliverer" means the owner or operator of an electric generating facility in Washington or an electricity importer.

(39) "General market participant" means a registered entity that is not identified as a covered entity or an opt-in entity that is registered in the program registry and intends to purchase, hold, sell, or voluntarily retire compliance instruments.

(40) "Greenhouse gas" has the same meaning as in RCW 70A.45.010.

(41) "Holding limit" means the maximum number of allowances that may be held for use or trade by a registered entity at any one time.

(42) "Imported electricity" means electricity generated outside the state of Washington with a final point of delivery within the state.

(a) "Imported electricity" includes electricity from an organized market, such as the energy imbalance market.

(b) "Imported electricity" includes imports from linked jurisdictions, but such imports shall be construed as having no emissions.

(c) Electricity from a system that is marketed by a federal power marketing administration shall be construed as "imported electricity," not electricity generated in the state of Washington.

(d) "Imported electricity" does not include electricity imports of unspecified electricity that are netted by exports of unspecified electricity to any jurisdiction not covered by a linked program by the same entity within the same hour.

(e) For a multijurisdictional electric company, "imported electricity" means electricity, other than from in-state facilities, that contributes to a common system power pool. Where a multijurisdictional electric company has a cost allocation methodology approved by the utilities and transportation commission, the allocation of specific facilities to Washington's retail load will be in accordance with that methodology.

(f) For a multijurisdictional consumer-owned utility, "imported electricity" includes electricity from facilities that contribute to a common system power pool that are allocated to a consumer-owned utility inside the state of Washington pursuant to a methodology approved by the governing board of the consumer-owned utility.

(43) "Leakage" means a reduction in emissions of greenhouse gases within the state that is offset by a directly attributable increase in greenhouse gas emissions outside the state and outside the geography of another jurisdiction with a linkage agreement with Washington.

(44) "Limits" means the greenhouse gas emissions reductions required by RCW 70A.45.020.

(45) "Linkage" means a bilateral or multilateral decision under a linkage agreement between greenhouse gas market programs to accept compliance instruments issued by a participating jurisdiction to meet the obligations of regulated entities in a partner jurisdiction and to otherwise coordinate activities to facilitate operation of a joint market.

(46) "Linkage agreement" means a nonbinding agreement that connects two or more greenhouse gas market programs and articulates a mutual understanding of how the participating jurisdictions will work together to facilitate a connected greenhouse gas market.

(47) "Linked jurisdiction" means a jurisdiction with which Washington has entered into a linkage agreement.

(48) "Multijurisdictional consumer-owned utility" means a consumer-owned utility that provides electricity to member owners in Washington and in one or more other states in a contiguous service territory or from a common power system.

(49) "Multijurisdictional electric company" means an investor-owned utility that provides electricity to customers in Washington and in one or more other states in a contiguous service territory or from a common power system.

(50) "NERC e-tag" means North American electric reliability corporation (NERC) energy tag representing transactions on the North American bulk electricity market scheduled to flow between or across balancing authority areas.

(51) "Offset credit" means a tradable compliance instrument that represents an emissions reduction or emissions removal of one metric ton of carbon dioxide equivalent.

(52) "Offset project" means a project that reduces or removes greenhouse gases that are not covered emissions under this chapter.

(53) "Offset protocols" means a set of procedures and standards to quantify greenhouse gas reductions or greenhouse gas removals achieved by an offset project.

(54) "Overburdened community" means a geographic area where vulnerable populations face combined, multiple environmental harms and health impacts or risks due to exposure to environmental pollutants or contaminants through multiple pathways, which may result in significant disparate adverse health outcomes or effects.

(a) "Overburdened community" includes, but is not limited to:

(i) Highly impacted communities as defined in RCW 19.405.020;

(ii) Communities located in census tracts that are fully or partially on "Indian country" as defined in 18 U.S.C. Sec. 1151; and

(iii) Populations, including Native Americans or immigrant populations, who may be exposed to environmental contaminants and pollutants outside of the geographic area in which they reside based on the populations' use of traditional or cultural foods and practices, such as the use of resources, access to which is protected under treaty rights in ceded areas, when those exposures in conjunction with other exposures may result in disproportionately greater risks, including risks of certain cancers or other adverse health effects and outcomes.

(b) Overburdened communities identified by the department may include the same communities as those identified by the department through its process for identifying overburdened communities under RCW 70A.02.010.

(55) "Person" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 70A.15.2200(5)(h)(iii).

(56) "Point of delivery" means a point on the electricity transmission or distribution system where a deliverer makes electricity available to a receiver, or available to serve load. This point may be an interconnection with another system or a substation where the transmission provider's transmission and distribution systems are connected to another system, or a distribution substation where electricity is imported into the state over a multijurisdictional retail provider's distribution system.

(57) "Price ceiling unit" means the units issued at a fixed price by the department for the purpose of limiting price increases and funding further investments in greenhouse gas reductions.

(58) "Program" means the greenhouse gas emissions cap and invest program created by and implemented pursuant to this chapter.

(59) "Program registry" means the data system in which covered entities, opt-in entities, and general market participants are registered and in which compliance instruments are recorded and tracked.

(60) "Registered entity" means a covered entity, opt-in entity, or general market participant that has completed the process for registration in the program registry.

(61) "Resilience" means the ability to prepare, mitigate and plan for, withstand, recover from, and more successfully adapt to adverse events and changing conditions, and reorganize in an equitable manner that results in a new and better condition.

(62) "Retire" means to permanently remove a compliance instrument such that the compliance instrument may never be sold, traded, or otherwise used again.

(63) "Specified source of electricity" or "specified source" means a facility, unit, or asset controlling supplier that is permitted to be claimed as the source of electricity delivered. The reporting entity must have either full or partial ownership in the facility or a written power contract to procure electricity generated by that facility or unit or from an asset controlling supplier at the time of entry into the transaction to procure electricity.

(64) "Supplier" means a supplier of fuel in Washington state as defined in RCW 70A.15.2200(5)(h)(ii).

(65) "Tribal lands" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 70A.02.010.

(66) "Unspecified source of electricity" or "unspecified source" means a source of electricity that is not a specified source at the time of entry into the transaction to procure electricity.

(67) "Voluntary renewable reserve account" means a holding account maintained by the department from which allowances may be retired for voluntary renewable electricity generation, which is directly delivered to the state and has not and will not be sold or used to meet any other mandatory requirements in the state or any other jurisdiction, on behalf of voluntary renewable energy purchasers or end users.

(68) "Vulnerable populations" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 70A.02.010.

Sec. 102. RCW 70A.65.070 and 2022 c 181 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The department shall commence the program by January 1, 2023, by determining an emissions baseline establishing the proportionate share that the total greenhouse gas emissions of covered entities for the first compliance period bears to the total anthropogenic greenhouse gas emissions in the state during 2015 through 2019, based on data reported to the department under RCW 70A.15.2200 or provided as required by this chapter, as well as other relevant data. By October 1, 2022, the department shall adopt annual allowance budgets for the first compliance period of the program, calendar years 2023 through 2026, to be distributed from January 1, 2023, through December 31, 2026.

(b) By October 1, 2026, the department shall add to its emissions baseline by incorporating the proportionate share that the total greenhouse gas emissions of new covered entities in the second compliance period bear to the total anthropogenic greenhouse gas emissions in the state during 2015 through 2019. In determining the addition to the baseline, the department may exclude a year from the determination if the department identifies that year to have been an outlier due to a state of emergency. The department shall adopt annual allowance budgets for the second compliance period of the program, calendar years 2027 through 2030, that will be distributed from January 1, 2027, through December 31, 2030.

(c) By October 1, 2028, the department shall adopt by rule the annual allowance budgets for calendar years 2031 through 2040.

(d)(i) By July 1, 2024, the department must amend its rules, including WAC 173-446-200 and 173-446-210, to align with the table and requirements in (d)(ii) of this subsection specifying annual allowance budgets for calendar years 2023 through 2049.

(ii)(A) Table 001 displays the total program annual allowance budgets for calendar years 2023 through 2026 required by this subsection (1)(d)(ii).

Table 001: Total program allowance budget for calendar year 2023 through 2026 established in this subsection (1)(d)(ii).

Emissions Year

Total Covered Emissions

Change from Previous Year

(MT CO2e)

2023

63,288,565

N/A

2024

61,010,177

-3.6 percent

2025

58,813,810

-3.6 percent

2026

56,696,513

-3.6 percent

(B) The total program annual allowance budgets for each calendar year from 2027 through 2040 must decrease annually relative to the previous year by an additional 3.6 percent.

(C) The total program annual allowance budgets for each calendar year from 2041 through 2049 must decrease annually relative to the previous year by an additional 3.1 percent.

(2) ((The))Except as otherwise provided in subsection (1)(d) of this section, the annual allowance budgets must be set to achieve the share of reductions by covered entities necessary to achieve the 2030, 2040, and 2050 statewide emissions limits established in RCW 70A.45.020, based on data reported to the department under chapter 70A.15 RCW or provided as required by this chapter. Annual allowance budgets must be set such that the use of offsets as compliance instruments, consistent with RCW 70A.65.170, does not prevent the achievement of the emissions limits established in RCW 70A.45.020. In so setting annual allowance budgets, the department must reduce the annual allowance budget relative to the limits in an amount equivalent to offset use, or in accordance with a similar methodology adopted by the department. The department must adopt annual allowance budgets for the program on a calendar year basis that provide for progressively equivalent reductions year over year. An allowance distributed under the program, either directly by the department under RCW 70A.65.110 through 70A.65.130 or through auctions under RCW 70A.65.100, does not expire and may be held or banked consistent with RCW 70A.65.100(6) and 70A.65.150(1).

(3) The department must complete evaluations by December 31, 2027, and by December 31, 2035, of the performance of the program, including its performance in reducing greenhouse gases. If the evaluation shows that adjustments to the annual allowance budgets are necessary for covered entities to achieve their proportionate share of the 2030 and 2040 emission reduction limits identified in RCW 70A.45.020, as applicable, the department shall adjust the annual allowance budgets accordingly. The department must complete additional evaluations of the performance of the program by December 31, 2040, and by December 31, 2045, and make any necessary adjustments in the annual allowance budgets to ensure that covered entities achieve their proportionate share of the 2050 emission reduction limit identified in RCW 70A.45.020. Nothing in this subsection precludes the department from making additional adjustments to annual allowance budgets as necessary to ensure successful achievement of the proportionate emission reduction limits by covered entities. The department shall determine and make public the circumstances, metrics, and processes that would initiate the public consideration of additional allowance budget adjustments to ensure successful achievement of the proportionate emission reduction limits.

(4) Data reported to the department under RCW 70A.15.2200 or provided as required by this chapter for 2015 through 2019 is deemed sufficient for the purpose of adopting annual allowance budgets and serving as the baseline by which covered entities demonstrate compliance under the first compliance period of the program. Data reported to the department under RCW 70A.15.2200 or provided as required by this chapter for 2023 through 2025 is deemed sufficient for adopting annual allowance budgets and serving as the baseline by which covered entities demonstrate compliance under the second compliance period of the program.

(5) The legislature intends to promote a growing and sustainable economy and to avoid leakage of emissions from manufacturing to other jurisdictions. Therefore, the legislature finds that implementation of this section is contingent upon the enactment of RCW 70A.65.110.

Sec. 103. RCW 70A.65.150 and 2022 c 181 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) To help minimize allowance price volatility in the auction, the department shall adopt by rule an auction floor price and a schedule for the floor price to increase by a predetermined amount every year. The department may not sell allowances at bids lower than the auction floor price. The department's rules must specify holding limits that determine the maximum number of allowances that may be held for use or trade by a registered entity at any one time. The department shall also establish a reserve auction floor price to limit extraordinary prices and to determine when to offer allowances through the allowance price containment reserve auctions authorized under this section.

(2) For calendar years 2023 through 2026, the department must place no less than two percent of the total number of allowances available from the allowance budgets for those years in an allowance price containment reserve. The reserve must be designed as a mechanism to assist in containing compliance costs for covered and opt-in entities in the event of unanticipated high costs for compliance instruments.

(3)(a) The department shall adopt rules for holding auctions of allowances from the price containment reserve when the settlement prices in the preceding auction exceed the adopted reserve auction floor price. The auction must be separate from auctions of other allowances.

(b) Allowances must also be distributed from the allowance price containment reserve by auction when new covered and opt-in entities enter the program and allowances in the emissions containment reserve under RCW 70A.65.140(5) are exhausted.

(4) Only covered and opt-in entities may participate in the auction of allowances from the allowance price containment reserve.

(5) The process for reserve auctions is the same as the process provided in RCW 70A.65.100 and the proceeds from reserve auctions must be treated the same.

(6) The department shall by rule:

(a) Set the reserve auction floor price in advance of the reserve auction. The department may choose to establish multiple price tiers for the allowances from the reserve;

(b) Establish the requirements and schedule for the allowance price containment reserve auctions; and

(c) Establish the amount of allowances to be placed in the allowance price containment reserve after the first compliance period ending in 2026 in conformance with subsection (7) of this section.

(7)(a) In addition to amounts the department placed into the allowance price containment reserve account pursuant to WAC 173-446-370, as it existed on January 1, 2023, the department must place an additional five percent of the annual allowance budgets for calendar years 2031 through 2042 into the allowance price containment reserve account by July 1, 2024.

(b) All of the additional allowances placed in the allowance price containment reserve account pursuant to (a) of this subsection must be made available in separate auctions held during calendar year 2024 and must be in addition to any normally scheduled allowance price containment reserve auctions. Any remaining unsold allowances may be made available in separate allowance price containment reserve auctions in subsequent years.

(c) By March 1, 2024, the department must adopt rules implementing the requirements of this subsection.

Part 2

Fuel Price Transparency and Review

NEW SECTION. Sec. 201. (1) By April 1, 2024, the joint transportation committee must convene a work group to examine consumer motor vehicle fuel pricing in Washington state.

(2) The membership of the work group established under subsection (1) of this section must include, but is not limited to:

(a) The chair and ranking member of the transportation committees of the legislature;

(b) Representatives of the department of licensing, the department of commerce, the department of ecology, the office of financial management, and the antitrust division of the attorney general's office;

(c) Fuel refineries, distributors, suppliers, and retail establishments; and

(d) Academic experts and consumer advocacy organizations with knowledge and expertise in fuel pricing.

(3) The work group established under subsection (1) of this section must review issues including, but not limited to:

(a) Previous studies and evaluations of fuel pricing in Washington state, including an update of the 2007-2008 gas price study through 2022 as deemed appropriate by the work group;

(b) Trends in fuel pricing in Washington state;

(c) Factors causing fuel prices in Washington state to be higher than the national average and how these factors have changed over time;

(d)(i) Margins and profits at the fuel production, distribution, and retail levels;

(ii) Information provided pursuant to (d)(i) of this subsection must be kept confidential and is exempt from disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW. Such information must be aggregated to ensure confidentiality, but may be utilized in summarized form as part of the work group process and in the final report under subsection (4) of this section;

(e) State tax policies, environmental protections, and regulatory factors that may impact fuel pricing and make the state's fuel marketplace more or less competitive;

(f) Supply dynamics affecting the fuel markets in Washington state; and

(g) Potential reporting and audit requirements that would make fuel pricing more transparent to Washington state consumers.

(4) The joint transportation committee must report its findings and recommendations to the governor's office and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024.

(5) This section expires January 1, 2025.

Part 3

Implementing the Emission Exemptions Under the Climate Commitment Act

NEW SECTION. Sec. 301. A new section is added to chapter 70A.65 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) By January 1, 2025, the department must establish a remittance program for entities consuming fuels, on or after January 1, 2023, whose emissions are exempted from coverage in the program under RCW 70A.65.080(7)(e). The remittance program must include a climate commitment act remittance portal that allows farm fuel users and freight haulers of agricultural products to electronically submit, on a quarterly basis, an application for remittance and supporting documentation.

(b) Supporting documentation for farm fuel users must include receipts showing fuel purchases for fuel used exclusively for agricultural purposes and the farm fuel user's department of revenue farmer's certificate for wholesale purchases and sales tax exemptions.

(c) Supporting documentation for entities transporting agricultural products on public highways must include fuel tax reports submitted to the department of licensing and documentation indicating the approximate time, date, and location of each agricultural product haul and a general description of the agricultural products transported.

(2)(a) An approved application for remittance under subsection (1) of this section is eligible for a remittance equal to the auction settlement price in effect for the calendar quarter in which the fuel was purchased multiplied by eight-tenths of one percent and the number of gallons in the remittance application.

(b) An entity consuming fuels whose emissions are exempted from coverage in the program under RCW 70A.65.080(7)(e) with an approved remittance application may, at their discretion, have their remittance amount held as credits based on the auction settlement price in effect for that calendar quarter in which the fuel was purchased. These credits may be held for future trading rather than returned based on cash value. The department must establish a mechanism for tracking and administering these tradable credits for each entity exempted from coverage in the program under RCW 70A.65.080(7)(e) with an approved remittance application. The department is not responsible for any gain or loss in value associated with the change in subsequent auction prices. The department must adjust the volume of allowances available at subsequent auctions to account for these held remittance credits.

(3) The remittance program authorized under this section applies both prospectively as well as retroactively to entities consuming fuels, on or after January 1, 2023, whose emissions are exempted from coverage in the program under RCW 70A.65.080(7)(e).

Sec. 302. RCW 70A.65.080 and 2022 c 179 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is a covered entity as of the beginning of the first compliance period and all subsequent compliance periods if the person reported emissions under RCW 70A.15.2200 for any calendar year from 2015 through 2019, or if additional data provided as required by this chapter indicates that emissions for any calendar year from 2015 through 2019 equaled or exceeded any of the following thresholds, or if the person is a first jurisdictional deliverer and imports electricity into the state during the compliance period:

(a) Where the person owns or operates a facility and the facility's emissions equal or exceed 25,000 metric tons of carbon dioxide equivalent;

(b) Where the person is a first jurisdictional deliverer and generates electricity in the state and emissions associated with this generation equals or exceeds 25,000 metric tons of carbon dioxide equivalent;

(c) Where the person is a first jurisdictional deliverer importing electricity into the state and the cumulative annual total of emissions associated with the imported electricity, whether from specified or unspecified sources, exceeds 25,000 metric tons of carbon dioxide equivalent. In consultation with any linked jurisdiction to the program created by this chapter, by October 1, 2026, the department, in consultation with the department of commerce and the utilities and transportation commission, shall adopt by rule a methodology for addressing imported electricity associated with a centralized electricity market;

(d) Where the person is a supplier of fossil fuel other than natural gas and from that fuel 25,000 metric tons or more of carbon dioxide equivalent emissions would result from the full combustion or oxidation, excluding the amounts for fuel products that are produced or imported with a documented final point of delivery outside of Washington and combusted outside of Washington; and

(e)(i) Where the person supplies natural gas in amounts that would result in exceeding 25,000 metric tons of carbon dioxide equivalent emissions if fully combusted or oxidized, excluding the amounts for fuel products that are produced or imported with a documented final point of delivery outside of Washington and combusted outside of Washington, and excluding the amounts: (A) Supplied to covered entities under (a) through (d) of this subsection; and (B) delivered to opt-in entities;

(ii) Where the person who is not a natural gas company and has a tariff with a natural gas company to deliver to an end-use customer in the state in amounts that would result in exceeding 25,000 metric tons of carbon dioxide equivalent emissions if fully combusted or oxidized, excluding the amounts: (A) Supplied to covered entities under (a) through (d) of this subsection; and (B) the amounts delivered to opt-in entities;

(iii) Where the person is an end-use customer in the state who directly purchases natural gas from a person that is not a natural gas company and has the natural gas delivered through an interstate pipeline to a distribution system owned by the purchaser in amounts that would result in exceeding 25,000 metric tons of carbon dioxide equivalent emissions if fully combusted or oxidized, excluding the amounts: (A) Supplied to covered entities under (a) through (d) of this subsection; and (B) delivered to opt-in entities.

(2) A person is a covered entity as of the beginning of the second compliance period and all subsequent compliance periods if the person reported emissions under RCW 70A.15.2200 or provided emissions data as required by this chapter for any calendar year from 2023 through 2025, where the person owns or operates a waste to energy facility utilized by a county and city solid waste management program and the facility's emissions equal or exceed 25,000 metric tons of carbon dioxide equivalent.

(3) A person is a covered entity beginning January 1, 2031, and all subsequent compliance periods if the person reported emissions under RCW 70A.15.2200 or provided emissions data as required by this chapter for any calendar year from 2027 through 2029, where the person owns or operates a railroad company, as that term is defined in RCW 81.04.010, and the railroad company's emissions equal or exceed 25,000 metric tons of carbon dioxide equivalent.

(4) When a covered entity reports, during a compliance period, emissions from a facility under RCW 70A.15.2200 that are below the thresholds specified in subsection (1) or (2) of this section, the covered entity continues to have a compliance obligation through the current compliance period. When a covered entity reports emissions below the threshold for each year during an entire compliance period, or has ceased all processes at the facility requiring reporting under RCW 70A.15.2200, the entity is no longer a covered entity as of the beginning of the subsequent compliance period unless the department provides notice at least 12 months before the end of the compliance period that the facility's emissions were within 10 percent of the threshold and that the person will continue to be designated as a covered entity in order to ensure equity among all covered entities. Whenever a covered entity ceases to be a covered entity, the department shall notify the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature of the name of the entity and the reason the entity is no longer a covered entity.

(5) For types of emission sources described in subsection (1) of this section that begin or modify operation after January 1, 2023, and types of emission sources described in subsection (2) of this section that begin or modify operation after 2027, coverage under the program starts in the calendar year in which emissions from the source exceed the applicable thresholds in subsection (1) or (2) of this section, or upon formal notice from the department that the source is expected to exceed the applicable emissions threshold, whichever happens first. Sources meeting these conditions are required to transfer their first allowances on the first transfer deadline of the year following the year in which their emissions were equal to or exceeded the emissions threshold.

(6) For emission sources described in subsection (1) of this section that are in operation or otherwise active between 2015 and 2019 but were not required to report emissions for those years under RCW 70A.15.2200 for the reporting periods between 2015 and 2019, coverage under the program starts in the calendar year following the year in which emissions from the source exceed the applicable thresholds in subsection (1) of this section as reported pursuant to RCW 70A.15.2200 or provided as required by this chapter, or upon formal notice from the department that the source is expected to exceed the applicable emissions threshold for the first year that source is required to report emissions, whichever happens first. Sources meeting these criteria are required to transfer their first allowances on the first transfer deadline of the year following the year in which their emissions, as reported under RCW 70A.15.2200 or provided as required by this chapter, were equal to or exceeded the emissions threshold.

(7) The following emissions are exempt from coverage in the program, regardless of the emissions reported under RCW 70A.15.2200 or provided as required by this chapter:

(a) Emissions from the combustion of aviation fuels;

(b) Emissions from watercraft fuels supplied in Washington that are combusted outside of Washington;

(c) Emissions from a coal-fired electric generation facility exempted from additional greenhouse gas limitations, requirements, or performance standards under RCW 80.80.110;

(d) Carbon dioxide emissions from the combustion of biomass or biofuels;

(e)(i) Motor vehicle fuel or special fuel that is used exclusively for agricultural purposes by a farm fuel user. ((This exemption is available only if a buyer of motor vehicle fuel or special fuel provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department.)) For the purposes of this subsection, "agricultural purposes" and "farm fuel user" have the same meanings as provided in RCW 82.08.865.

(ii) The department must determine a method for expanding the exemption provided under (e)(i) of this subsection to include fuels used for the purpose of transporting agricultural products, as defined in RCW 82.04.213, on public highways. The department must maintain this expanded exemption for a period of five years, in order to provide the agricultural sector with a feasible transition period.

(iii) The exemptions under this subsection (7)(e) must be provided through at least two methods in a form and manner required by the department:

(A) A remittance program established in section 301 of this act, including a tradable credit mechanism as provided under section 301(2)(b) of this act; or

(B) An exemption certificate method if a buyer of motor vehicle fuel or special fuel provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department.

(iv) In addition to the methods described in (e)(iii) of this subsection, the department may prescribe by rule additional methods for implementing the exemptions under this subsection (7)(e);

(f) Emissions from facilities with North American industry classification system code 92811 (national security); and

(g) Emissions from municipal solid waste landfills that are subject to, and in compliance with, chapter 70A.540 RCW.

(8) The department shall not require multiple covered entities to have a compliance obligation for the same emissions. The department may by rule authorize refineries, fuel suppliers, facilities using natural gas, and natural gas utilities to provide by agreement for the assumption of the compliance obligation for fuel or natural gas supplied and combusted in the state. The department must be notified of such an agreement at least 12 months prior to the compliance obligation period for which the agreement is applicable.

(9)(a) The legislature intends to promote a growing and sustainable economy and to avoid leakage of emissions from manufacturing to other locations. The legislature further intends to see innovative new businesses locate and grow in Washington that contribute to Washington's prosperity and environmental objectives.

(b) Consistent with the intent of the legislature to avoid the leakage of emissions to other jurisdictions, in achieving the state's greenhouse gas limits in RCW 70A.45.020, the state, including lead agencies under chapter 43.21C RCW, shall pursue the limits in a manner that recognizes that the siting and placement of new or expanded best-in-class facilities with lower carbon emitting processes is in the economic and environmental interests of the state of Washington.

(c) In conducting a life-cycle analysis, if required, for new or expanded facilities that require review under chapter 43.21C RCW, a lead agency must evaluate and attribute any potential net cumulative greenhouse gas emissions resulting from the project as compared to other existing facilities or best available technology including best-in-class facilities and emerging lower carbon processes that supply the same product or end use. The department may adopt rules to determine the appropriate threshold for applying this analysis.

(d) Covered emissions from an entity that is or will be a covered entity under this chapter may not be the basis for denial of a permit for a new or expanded facility. Covered emissions must be included in the analysis undertaken pursuant to (c) of this subsection. Nothing in this subsection requires a lead agency or a permitting agency to approve or issue a permit to a permit applicant, including to a new or expanded fossil fuel project.

(e) A lead agency under chapter 43.21C RCW or a permitting agency shall allow a new or expanded facility that is a covered entity or opt-in entity to satisfy a mitigation requirement for its covered emissions under chapter 316, Laws of 2021 and under any greenhouse gas emission mitigation requirements for covered emissions under chapter 43.21C RCW by submitting to the department the number of compliance instruments equivalent to its covered emissions during a compliance period.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303. (1) The department of ecology must convene a work group to review rules and processes that are developed to exempt the emissions in RCW 70A.65.080 from coverage under chapter 70A.65 RCW and to develop recommendations for changes to laws, rules, policies, and practices to ensure the full use and benefit of the exemptions.

(2) The work group must be comprised of the following members:

(a) A representative from the department of revenue;

(b) A representative from the department of licensing;

(c) A representative from the department of transportation;

(d) Representatives from statewide organizations advocating for the aviation industry and aviation enthusiasts;

(e) Representatives from statewide organizations advocating for the watercraft industry and watercraft users;

(f) Representatives from statewide organizations advocating for the agricultural industry and farmers;

(g) Representatives from statewide organizations advocating for the fuel refineries, manufacturers, distributors, and retailers; and

(h) Representatives from statewide organizations that advocate for the other products and activities that fall within the exemption provided in RCW 70A.65.080.

(3) The work group shall review and make recommendations on the following topics:

(a) Whether exemption processes have been responsive to how markets have reacted to the greenhouse gas emissions cap and invest program;

(b) Whether exemption processes can be improved or alternatives developed to reduce the burdens on those seeking an exemption;

(c) The adequacy of current guidance and tools to report exemptions;

(d) Whether changes are necessary related to the remittance program created in section 301 of this act; and

(e) Other issues and topics the work group determines are necessary to review the full use and enjoyment of the exemptions provided in RCW 70A.65.080.

(4) Any statewide organizations advocating for an industry or activity described in RCW 70A.65.080 may submit in writing its recommendations to the work group for its review and consideration.

(5) Committee members are not entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses if they are elected officials or are participating on behalf of an employer, governmental entity, or other organization. Any reimbursement for members is subject to chapter 43.03 RCW.

(6) The department of ecology must submit a report containing its review and recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature by September 1, 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304. A new section is added to chapter 70A.65 RCW to read as follows:

The climate commitment act remittance account is created in the state treasury. The account may receive deposits from auction proceeds pursuant to RCW 70A.65.100. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may only be used for the purpose of the remittance program established in section 301 of this act for entities consuming fuels whose emissions are exempted from coverage in the program under RCW 70A.65.080(7)(e). The department may not expend more than 10 percent per year on administrative costs associated with the remittance program.

Part 4

Vehicle Fee Reductions

NEW SECTION. Sec. 401. A new section is added to chapter 70A.65 RCW to read as follows:

(1) By March 1, 2024, and January 1, 2025, the office of financial management and the department of ecology must jointly calculate the amount of revenue collected from auctions under this chapter for the immediately preceding fiscal year in excess of the revenue estimate prepared in October 2022, reduced by any amount appropriated in the omnibus operating appropriations act from the climate commitment act remittance account created in section 304 of this act for the fiscal year. This information must be transmitted to the department of licensing and to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature.

(2) Using the amount determined under subsection (1) of this section, for fiscal year 2025 and fiscal year 2026, the department must reduce vehicle license fees and the license fees based on declared gross weight under RCW 46.17.350 and 46.17.355. The fee reduction per vehicle is the lesser of: The amount determined under subsection (1) of this section divided by the anticipated number of vehicles eligible for the fee reduction; or the license fee for the vehicle.

Sec. 402. RCW 46.17.350 and 2019 c 44 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Before accepting an application for a vehicle registration, the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director shall require the applicant, unless specifically exempt, to pay the following vehicle license fee by vehicle type:

VEHICLE TYPE

INITIAL FEE

RENEWAL FEE

DISTRIBUTED UNDER

(a) Auto stage, six seats or less

$ 30.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.030

(b) Camper

$ 4.90

$ 3.50

RCW 46.68.030

(c) Commercial trailer

$ 34.00

$ 34.00

RCW 46.68.035

(d) For hire vehicle, six seats or less

$ 30.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.030

(e) Mobile home (if registered)

$ 30.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.030

(f) Moped

$ 30.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.030

(g) Motor home

$ 30.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.030

(h) Motorcycle

$ 30.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.030

(i) Off-road vehicle

$ 18.00

$ 18.00

RCW 46.68.045

(j) Passenger car

$ 30.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.030

(k) Private use single-axle trailer

$ 15.00

$ 15.00

RCW 46.68.035

(l) Snowmobile

$ 50.00

$ 50.00

RCW 46.68.350

(m) Snowmobile, vintage

$ 12.00

$ 12.00

RCW 46.68.350

(n) Sport utility vehicle

$ 30.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.030

(o) Tow truck

$ 30.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.030

(p) Trailer, over 2000 pounds

$ 30.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.030

(q) Travel trailer

$ 30.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.030

(r) Wheeled all-terrain vehicle, on-road use

$ 12.00

$ 12.00

RCW 46.09.540

(s) Wheeled all-terrain vehicle, off-road use

$ 18.00

$ 18.00

RCW 46.09.510

(2) The vehicle license fee required in subsection (1) of this section is in addition to the filing fee required under RCW 46.17.005, and any other fee or tax required by law.

(3) For the following vehicle types, vehicle license fees under this section for vehicle registrations that are due or become due on or after July 1, 2024, through June 30, 2026, must be lowered by the amounts as determined under section 401 of this act.

(a) For hire vehicle, six seats or less;

(b) Moped;

(c) Motor home;

(d) Motorcycle;

(e) Passenger car;

(f) Sport utility vehicle; and

(g) Tow truck.

Sec. 403. RCW 46.17.355 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 44 s 201 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) For vehicle registrations that are due or become due before July 1, 2016, in lieu of the vehicle license fee required under RCW 46.17.350 and before accepting an application for a vehicle registration for motor vehicles described in RCW 46.16A.455, the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director shall require the applicant, unless specifically exempt, to pay the following license fee by weight:

WEIGHT

SCHEDULE A

SCHEDULE B

4,000 pounds

$ 38.00

$ 38.00

6,000 pounds

$ 48.00

$ 48.00

8,000 pounds

$ 58.00

$ 58.00

10,000 pounds

$ 60.00

$ 60.00

12,000 pounds

$ 77.00

$ 77.00

14,000 pounds

$ 88.00

$ 88.00

16,000 pounds

$ 100.00

$ 100.00

18,000 pounds

$ 152.00

$ 152.00

20,000 pounds

$ 169.00

$ 169.00

22,000 pounds

$ 183.00

$ 183.00

24,000 pounds

$ 198.00

$ 198.00

26,000 pounds

$ 209.00

$ 209.00

28,000 pounds

$ 247.00

$ 247.00

30,000 pounds

$ 285.00

$ 285.00

32,000 pounds

$ 344.00

$ 344.00

34,000 pounds

$ 366.00

$ 366.00

36,000 pounds

$ 397.00

$ 397.00

38,000 pounds

$ 436.00

$ 436.00

40,000 pounds

$ 499.00

$ 499.00

42,000 pounds

$ 519.00

$ 609.00

44,000 pounds

$ 530.00

$ 620.00

46,000 pounds

$ 570.00

$ 660.00

48,000 pounds

$ 594.00

$ 684.00

50,000 pounds

$ 645.00

$ 735.00

52,000 pounds

$ 678.00

$ 768.00

54,000 pounds

$ 732.00

$ 822.00

56,000 pounds

$ 773.00

$ 863.00

58,000 pounds

$ 804.00

$ 894.00

60,000 pounds

$ 857.00

$ 947.00

62,000 pounds

$ 919.00

$ 1,009.00

64,000 pounds

$ 939.00

$ 1,029.00

66,000 pounds

$ 1,046.00

$ 1,136.00

68,000 pounds

$ 1,091.00

$ 1,181.00

70,000 pounds

$ 1,175.00

$ 1,265.00

72,000 pounds

$ 1,257.00

$ 1,347.00

74,000 pounds

$ 1,366.00

$ 1,456.00

76,000 pounds

$ 1,476.00

$ 1,566.00

78,000 pounds

$ 1,612.00

$ 1,702.00

80,000 pounds

$ 1,740.00

$ 1,830.00

82,000 pounds

$ 1,861.00

$ 1,951.00

84,000 pounds

$ 1,981.00

$ 2,071.00

86,000 pounds

$ 2,102.00

$ 2,192.00

88,000 pounds

$ 2,223.00

$ 2,313.00

90,000 pounds

$ 2,344.00

$ 2,434.00

92,000 pounds

$ 2,464.00

$ 2,554.00

94,000 pounds

$ 2,585.00

$ 2,675.00

96,000 pounds

$ 2,706.00

$ 2,796.00

98,000 pounds

$ 2,827.00

$ 2,917.00

100,000 pounds

$ 2,947.00

$ 3,037.00

102,000 pounds

$ 3,068.00

$ 3,158.00

104,000 pounds

$ 3,189.00

$ 3,279.00

105,500 pounds

$ 3,310.00

$ 3,400.00

(b) For vehicle registrations that are due or become due on or after July 1, 2016, in lieu of the vehicle license fee required under RCW 46.17.350 and before accepting an application for a vehicle registration for motor vehicles described in RCW 46.16A.455, the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director shall require the applicant, unless specifically exempt, to pay the following license fee by weight:

WEIGHT

SCHEDULE A

SCHEDULE B

4,000 pounds

$ 53.00

$ 53.00

6,000 pounds

$ 73.00

$ 73.00

8,000 pounds

$ 93.00

$ 93.00

10,000 pounds

$ 93.00

$ 93.00

12,000 pounds

$ 81.00

$ 81.00

14,000 pounds

$ 88.00

$ 88.00

16,000 pounds

$ 100.00

$ 100.00

18,000 pounds

$ 152.00

$ 152.00

20,000 pounds

$ 169.00

$ 169.00

22,000 pounds

$ 183.00

$ 183.00

24,000 pounds

$ 198.00

$ 198.00

26,000 pounds

$ 209.00

$ 209.00

28,000 pounds

$ 247.00

$ 247.00

30,000 pounds

$ 285.00

$ 285.00

32,000 pounds

$ 344.00

$ 344.00

34,000 pounds

$ 366.00

$ 366.00

36,000 pounds

$ 397.00

$ 397.00

38,000 pounds

$ 436.00

$ 436.00

40,000 pounds

$ 499.00

$ 499.00

42,000 pounds

$ 519.00

$ 609.00

44,000 pounds

$ 530.00

$ 620.00

46,000 pounds

$ 570.00

$ 660.00

48,000 pounds

$ 594.00

$ 684.00

50,000 pounds

$ 645.00

$ 735.00

52,000 pounds

$ 678.00

$ 768.00

54,000 pounds

$ 732.00

$ 822.00

56,000 pounds

$ 773.00

$ 863.00

58,000 pounds

$ 804.00

$ 894.00

60,000 pounds

$ 857.00

$ 947.00

62,000 pounds

$ 919.00

$ 1,009.00

64,000 pounds

$ 939.00

$ 1,029.00

66,000 pounds

$ 1,046.00

$ 1,136.00

68,000 pounds

$ 1,091.00

$ 1,181.00

70,000 pounds

$ 1,175.00

$ 1,265.00

72,000 pounds

$ 1,257.00

$ 1,347.00

74,000 pounds

$ 1,366.00

$ 1,456.00

76,000 pounds

$ 1,476.00

$ 1,566.00

78,000 pounds

$ 1,612.00

$ 1,702.00

80,000 pounds

$ 1,740.00

$ 1,830.00

82,000 pounds

$ 1,861.00

$ 1,951.00

84,000 pounds

$ 1,981.00

$ 2,071.00

86,000 pounds

$ 2,102.00

$ 2,192.00

88,000 pounds

$ 2,223.00

$ 2,313.00

90,000 pounds

$ 2,344.00

$ 2,434.00

92,000 pounds

$ 2,464.00

$ 2,554.00

94,000 pounds

$ 2,585.00

$ 2,675.00

96,000 pounds

$ 2,706.00

$ 2,796.00

98,000 pounds

$ 2,827.00

$ 2,917.00

100,000 pounds

$ 2,947.00

$ 3,037.00

102,000 pounds

$ 3,068.00

$ 3,158.00

104,000 pounds

$ 3,189.00

$ 3,279.00

105,500 pounds

$ 3,310.00

$ 3,400.00

(2) Schedule A applies to vehicles either used exclusively for hauling logs or that do not tow trailers. Schedule B applies to vehicles that tow trailers and are not covered under Schedule A.

(3) If the resultant gross weight is not listed in the table provided in subsection (1) of this section, it must be increased to the next higher weight.

(4) The license fees provided in subsection (1) of this section and the freight project fee provided in subsection (6) of this section are in addition to the filing fee required under RCW 46.17.005 and any other fee or tax required by law.

(5) The license fee based on declared gross weight as provided in subsection (1) of this section must be distributed under RCW 46.68.035.

(6) For vehicle registrations that are due or become due on or after July 1, 2016, in addition to the license fee based on declared gross weight as provided in subsection (1) of this section, the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director must require an applicant with a vehicle with a declared gross weight of more than 10,000 pounds, unless specifically exempt, to pay a freight project fee equal to ((fifteen))15 percent of the license fee provided in subsection (1) of this section, rounded to the nearest whole dollar, which must be distributed under RCW 46.68.035.

(7) For vehicle registrations that are due or become due on or after July 1, 2022, in addition to the license fee based on declared gross weight as provided in subsection (1) of this section, the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director must require an applicant with a vehicle with a declared gross weight of less than or equal to 12,000 pounds, unless specifically exempt, to pay an additional weight fee of ((ten dollars))$10, which must be distributed under RCW 46.68.035.

(8) For vehicle registrations that are due or become due on or after July 1, 2024, through June 30, 2026, the license fee based on declared gross weight as provided in subsection (1) of this section must be lowered by the amounts as determined under section 401 of this act.

Sec. 404. RCW 70A.65.100 and 2023 c 475 s 937 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in RCW 70A.65.110, 70A.65.120, and 70A.65.130, the department shall distribute allowances through auctions as provided in this section and in rules adopted by the department to implement these sections. An allowance is not a property right.

(2)(a) The department shall hold a maximum of four auctions annually, plus any necessary reserve auctions. An auction may include allowances from the annual allowance budget of the current year and allowances from the annual allowance budgets from prior years that remain to be distributed. The department must transmit to the environmental justice council an auction notice at least 60 days prior to each auction, as well as a summary results report and a postauction public proceeds report within 60 days after each auction. The department must communicate the results of the previous calendar year's auctions to the environmental justice council on an annual basis beginning in 2024.

(b) The department must make future vintage allowances available through parallel auctions at least twice annually in addition to the auctions through which current vintage allowances are exclusively offered under (a) of this subsection.

(3) The department shall engage a qualified, independent contractor to run the auctions. The department shall also engage a qualified financial services administrator to hold the bid guarantees, evaluate bid guarantees, and inform the department of the value of bid guarantees once the bids are accepted.

(4) Auctions are open to covered entities, opt-in entities, and general market participants that are registered entities in good standing. The department shall adopt by rule the requirements for a registered entity to register and participate in a given auction.

(a) Registered entities intending to participate in an auction must submit an application to participate at least 30 days prior to the auction. The application must include the documentation required for review and approval by the department. A registered entity is eligible to participate only after receiving a notice of approval by the department.

(b) Each registered entity that elects to participate in the auction must have a different representative. Only a representative with an approved auction account is authorized to access the auction platform to submit an application or confirm the intent to bid for the registered entity, submit bids on behalf of the registered entity during the bidding window, or to download reports specific to the auction.

(5) The department may require a bid guarantee, payable to the financial services administrator, in an amount greater than or equal to the sum of the maximum value of the bids to be submitted by the registered entity.

(6) To protect the integrity of the auctions, a registered entity or group of registered entities with a direct corporate association are subject to auction purchase and holding limits. The department may impose additional limits if it deems necessary to protect the integrity and functioning of the auctions:

(a) A covered entity or an opt-in entity may not buy more than 10 percent of the allowances offered during a single auction;

(b) A general market participant may not buy more than four percent of the allowances offered during a single auction and may not in aggregate own more than 10 percent of total allowances to be issued in a calendar year;

(c) No registered entity may buy more than the entity's bid guarantee; and

(d) No registered entity may buy allowances that would exceed the entity's holding limit at the time of the auction.

(7)(a) For fiscal year 2023, upon completion and verification of the auction results, the financial services administrator shall notify winning bidders and transfer the auction proceeds to the state treasurer for deposit as follows: (i) $127,341,000 must first be deposited into the carbon emissions reduction account created in RCW 70A.65.240; and (ii) the remaining auction proceeds to the climate investment account created in RCW 70A.65.250 and the air quality and health disparities improvement account created in RCW 70A.65.280.

(b) For fiscal year 2024, upon completion and verification of the auction results, the financial services administrator shall notify winning bidders and transfer the auction proceeds to the state treasurer for deposit as follows: (i) $356,697,000 must first be deposited into the carbon emissions reduction account created in RCW 70A.65.240, except during fiscal year 2024, the deposit as provided in this subsection (7)(b)(i) may be prorated equally across each of the auctions occurring in fiscal year 2024; ((and)) (ii) $25,000,000 must then be deposited into the climate commitment act remittance account created in section 304 of this act; and (iii) the remaining auction proceeds to the climate investment account created in RCW 70A.65.250 and the air quality and health disparities improvement account created in RCW 70A.65.280, which may be prorated equally across each of the auctions occurring in fiscal year 2024.

(c) For fiscal year 2025, upon completion and verification of the auction results, the financial services administrator shall notify winning bidders and transfer the auction proceeds to the state treasurer for deposit as follows: (i) $366,558,000 must first be deposited into the carbon emissions reduction account created in RCW 70A.65.240, except that during fiscal year 2025, the deposit as provided in this subsection (7)(c)(i) may be prorated equally across each of the auctions occurring in fiscal year 2025; ((and)) (ii) the amount appropriated in the omnibus operating appropriations act to the climate commitment act remittance account created in section 304 of this act must then be deposited into the account; (iii) a sum equal to the dollar amount that would otherwise have been deposited into the motor vehicle fund but for the lowering of vehicle license fees and the license fees based on declared gross weight pursuant to RCW 46.17.350 and 46.17.355 must then be deposited into the motor vehicle fund; and (iv) the remaining auction proceeds to the climate investment account created in RCW 70A.65.250 and the air quality and health disparities improvement account created in RCW 70A.65.280, which may be prorated equally across each of the auctions occurring in fiscal year 2025. The amounts deposited into the climate investment account created in RCW 70A.65.250 and the air quality and health disparities improvement account created in RCW 70A.65.280 must be equal to or greater than the amount that would have been deposited to those accounts based on revenue estimate prepared in October 2022 by the department.

(d) For fiscal year 2026, upon completion and verification of the auction results, the financial services administrator shall notify winning bidders and transfer the auction proceeds to the state treasurer for deposit as follows: (i) $359,117,000 must first be deposited into the carbon emissions reduction account created in RCW 70A.65.240, except that during fiscal year 2026, the deposit as provided in this subsection (7)(d)(i) may be prorated equally across each of the auctions occurring in fiscal year 2026; (ii) the amount appropriated in the omnibus operating appropriations act to the climate commitment act remittance account created in section 304 of this act must then be deposited into the account; (iii) a sum equal to the dollar amount that would otherwise have been deposited into the motor vehicle fund but for the lowering of vehicle license fees and the license fees based on declared gross weight pursuant to RCW 46.17.350 and 46.17.355 must then be deposited into the motor vehicle fund; and (iv) the remaining auction proceeds to the climate investment account created in RCW 70A.65.250 and the air quality and health disparities improvement account created in RCW 70A.65.280, which may be prorated equally across each of the auctions occurring in fiscal year 2026. The amounts deposited into the climate investment account created in RCW 70A.65.250 and the air quality and health disparities improvement account created in RCW 70A.65.280 must be equal to or greater than the amount that would have been deposited to those accounts based on the revenue estimate prepared in October 2022 by the department.

(e) For fiscal years ((2026))2027 through 2037, upon completion and verification of the auction results, the financial services administrator shall notify winning bidders and transfer the auction proceeds to the state treasurer for deposit as follows: (i) $359,117,000 per year must first be deposited into the carbon emissions reduction account created in RCW 70A.65.240; ((and)) (ii) the amount appropriated in the omnibus operating appropriations act to the climate commitment act remittance account created in section 304 of this act must then be deposited into the account; and (iii) the remaining auction proceeds to the climate investment account created in RCW 70A.65.250 and the air quality and health disparities improvement account created in RCW 70A.65.280.

(((e)))(f) The deposits into the carbon emissions reduction account pursuant to (a) through (((d)))(e) of this subsection must not exceed $5,200,000,000 over the first 16 fiscal years and any remaining auction proceeds must be deposited into the climate investment account created in RCW 70A.65.250 and the air quality and health disparities improvement account created in RCW 70A.65.280.

(((f)))(g) For fiscal year 2038 and each year thereafter, upon completion and verification of the auction results, the financial services administrator shall notify winning bidders and transfer the auction proceeds to the state treasurer for deposit as follows: (i) 50 percent of the auction proceeds to the carbon emissions reduction account created in RCW 70A.65.240; and (ii) the remaining auction proceeds to the climate investment account created in RCW 70A.65.250 and the air quality and health disparities improvement account created in RCW 70A.65.280.

(8) The department shall adopt by rule provisions to guard against bidder collusion and minimize the potential for market manipulation. A registered entity may not release or disclose any bidding information including: Intent to participate or refrain from participation; auction approval status; intent to bid; bidding strategy; bid price or bid quantity; or information on the bid guarantee provided to the financial services administrator. The department may cancel or restrict a previously approved auction participation application or reject a new application if the department determines that a registered entity has:

(a) Provided false or misleading facts;

(b) Withheld material information that could influence a decision by the department;

(c) Violated any part of the auction rules;

(d) Violated registration requirements; or

(e) Violated any of the rules regarding the conduct of the auction.

(9) Records containing the following information are confidential and are exempt from public disclosure in their entirety:

(a) Bidding information as identified in subsection (8) of this section;

(b) Information contained in the secure, online electronic tracking system established by the department pursuant to RCW 70A.65.090(6);

(c) Financial, proprietary, and other market sensitive information as determined by the department that is submitted to the department pursuant to this chapter;

(d) Financial, proprietary, and other market sensitive information as determined by the department that is submitted to the independent contractor or the financial services administrator engaged by the department pursuant to subsection (3) of this section; and

(e) Financial, proprietary, and other market sensitive information as determined by the department that is submitted to a jurisdiction with which the department has entered into a linkage agreement pursuant to RCW 70A.65.210, and which is shared with the department, the independent contractor, or the financial services administrator pursuant to a linkage agreement.

(10) Any cancellation or restriction approved by the department under subsection (8) of this section may be permanent or for a specified number of auctions and the cancellation or restriction imposed is not exclusive and is in addition to the remedies that may be available pursuant to chapter 19.86 RCW or other state or federal laws, if applicable.

(11) The department shall design allowance auctions so as to allow, to the maximum extent practicable, linking with external greenhouse gas emissions trading programs in other jurisdictions and to facilitate the transfer of allowances when the state's program has entered into a linkage agreement with other external greenhouse gas emissions trading programs. The department may conduct auctions jointly with linked jurisdictions.

(12) In setting the number of allowances offered at each auction, the department shall consider the allowances in the marketplace due to the marketing of allowances issued as required under RCW 70A.65.110, 70A.65.120, and 70A.65.130 in the department's determination of the number of allowances to be offered at auction. The department shall offer only such number of allowances at each auction as will enhance the likelihood of achieving the goals of RCW 70A.45.020.

--- END ---