BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 48.05.185 and 1980 c 102 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

After hearing or with the consent of the insurer and in addition to or in lieu of the suspension, revocation, or refusal to renew any certificate of authority the commissioner may levy a fine upon the insurer in an amount ((not less than two hundred fifty dollars and)) not more than ((ten thousand dollars))$25,000 for each violation. The order levying such fine shall specify the period within which the fine shall be fully paid and which period shall not be less than ((fifteen))15 nor more than ((thirty))30 days from the date of such order. Upon failure to pay any such fine when due the commissioner shall revoke the certificate of authority of the insurer if not already revoked, and the fine shall be recovered in a civil action brought ((in))on behalf of the commissioner by the attorney general. Any fine so collected shall be paid by the commissioner to the state treasurer for the account of the general fund.

--- END ---