BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The Washington state patrol, in consultation with the department of ecology, local fire protection districts, a representative of the towing and recovery industry, and other entities, must study the following elements of electric vehicle fires:

(a) Impacts to the environment and proximate residential areas, and health impacts to responding firefighters;

(b) Best practices for fire response; and

(c) Best practices regarding clean-up and disposal efforts.

(2) By January 1, 2025, the Washington state patrol must report to the appropriate committees of the legislature study findings and any resulting policy or legislative recommendations.

--- END ---