BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) Agriculture is the oldest, largest, and most essential industry in the world and in the state of Washington. Within the last 100 years, the population has moved from approximately 30 percent living on farms to less than two percent living on farms. With that change in circumstances, the knowledge of agriculture has waned in the general population.

(2) The legislature finds that a basic knowledge of growing things and of the importance of agriculture as well as the opportunities available for young people in the field of agriculture is essential to perpetuate the industry into the future. Agricultural producers, farmers, and ranchers feed the state, the country, and the world.

(3) In Washington state, and in the United States, agricultural exports outnumber agricultural imports. The United States exports soybeans, beef, veal, pork, poultry, and numerous fresh fruits and vegetables. Washington exports fish and seafood, frozen French fries, wheat, dairy, and hay among many others. There are over 300 different crops grown in Washington and the exports alone are worth $8 billion.

(4) Agriscience, agribusiness, and production agriculture provide over 164,000 jobs in Washington. Basic agricultural literacy can inform students on environmental issues such as land use, water quality, air quality, and wildlife protection. The legislature finds that agricultural literacy is essential for building the future leaders of our state and our country.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28A.230 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Beginning no later than the 2025-26 school year, school districts must offer instruction in agricultural literacy. The instruction may be offered beginning in grade seven, but each student must be offered the instruction at least once before completing grade 12. The instruction, at the discretion of the school or school district, may be integrated into a relevant course or a course may be repurposed to include the instruction.

(2) To the extent practicable, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must make available in the library of openly licensed courseware under RCW 28A.300.803, curricular resources related to agricultural literacy.

(3) For the purposes of this section, "agricultural literacy" means an understanding of how the agricultural industry works including where food comes from, who grows it, agriculture's effect on the economy, the environment, technology, and lifestyle, and its relationship to livestock.

--- END ---