BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 66.20.310 and 2023 c 279 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) There is an alcohol server permit, known as a class 12 permit, for:

(i) A manager;

(ii) A bartender selling or mixing alcohol, spirits, wines, or beer for consumption at an on-premises licensed facility; or

(iii) An employee conducting alcohol deliveries for a licensee that delivers alcohol under RCW 66.24.710.

(b) There is an alcohol server permit, known as a class 13 permit, for a person who only serves alcohol, spirits, wines, or beer for consumption at an on-premises licensed facility.

(c) As provided by rule by the board, a class 13 permit holder may be allowed to act as a bartender without holding a class 12 permit.

(2)(a) Effective January 1, 1997, except as provided in (d) of this subsection, every alcohol server employed, under contract or otherwise, at a retail licensed premise must be issued a class 12 or class 13 permit.

(b) Every class 12 and class 13 permit issued must be issued in the name of the applicant and no other person may use the permit of another permit holder. The holder must present the permit upon request to inspection by a representative of the board or a peace officer. The class 12 or class 13 permit is valid for employment at any retail licensed premises described in (a) of this subsection.

(c) Except as provided in (d) of this subsection, no licensee holding a license as authorized by this section and RCW 66.20.300, 66.24.320, 66.24.330, 66.24.350, 66.24.400, 66.24.425, 66.24.690, 66.24.450, 66.24.570, 66.24.600, 66.24.610, 66.24.650, 66.24.655, and 66.24.680 may employ or accept the services of any person without the person first having a valid class 12 or class 13 permit.

(d) Within sixty days of initial employment, every person whose duties include the compounding, sale, service, or handling of liquor must have a class 12 or class 13 permit.

(e) No person may perform duties that include the sale or service of alcoholic beverages on a retail licensed premises without possessing a valid alcohol server permit.

(f) Every person whose duties include the delivery of alcohol authorized under RCW 66.24.710 must have a class 12 permit before engaging in alcohol delivery. A delivery employee whose duties include the delivery of alcohol authorized under RCW 66.24.710 must complete an approved class 12 permit course that includes a curriculum component that covers best practices for delivery of alcohol.

(3) A permit issued by a training entity under this section is valid for employment at any retail licensed premises described in subsection (2)(a) of this section for a period of five years unless suspended by the board.

(4) The board may suspend or revoke an existing permit if any of the following occur:

(a) The applicant or permittee has been convicted of violating any of the state or local intoxicating liquor laws of this state ((or)), has been convicted at any time of a felony under chapter 9A.40, 9A.44, 9A.46, 9A.86, or 9A.88 RCW, or a felony that is directly related to alcohol service; or

(b) The permittee has performed or permitted any act that constitutes a violation of this title or of any rule of the board.

(5) The suspension or revocation of a permit under this section does not relieve a licensee from responsibility for any act of the employee or agent while employed upon the retail licensed premises. The board may, as appropriate, revoke or suspend either the permit of the employee who committed the violation or the license of the licensee upon whose premises the violation occurred, or both the permit and the license.

(6)(a) After January 1, 1997, it is a violation of this title for any retail licensee or agent of a retail licensee as described in subsection (2)(a) of this section to employ in the sale or service of alcoholic beverages, any person who does not have a valid alcohol server permit or whose permit has been revoked, suspended, or denied.

(b) It is a violation of this title for a person whose alcohol server permit has been denied, suspended, or revoked to accept employment in the sale or service of alcoholic beverages.

(7) Grocery stores licensed under RCW 66.24.360, the primary commercial activity of which is the sale of grocery products and for which the sale and service of beer and wine for on-premises consumption with food is incidental to the primary business, and employees of such establishments, are exempt from RCW 66.20.300 through 66.20.350, except for employees whose duties include serving during tasting activities under RCW 66.24.363.

--- END ---