BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department must collect the following information in the possession of the department of revenue, the department of labor and industries, the employment security department, and the department of licensing about each business in Washington state:

(a) The business's annual revenue;

(b) The number of employees that the business employs, and their occupations;

(c) The business's aggregated payroll; and

(d) The North American industry classification system (NAICS) code assigned to that business.

(2) The information obtained by the department under this section and in the department's possession is exempt from public inspection and copying pursuant to chapter 42.56 RCW. This section does not affect whether another agency may be required or prohibited by law to disclose any of this information that is in its possession.

(3) The department must permit contracting associate development organizations to have access to the data collected under this section from the county for which they are designated. The organizations must keep confidential any data received under this section, except that they may provide organizations applying for grant funding with aggregated data. Prior to receiving any data, associate development organizations must meet data security standards established by the department, and complete training developed by the department concerning access, use, and confidentiality of data.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 49.04 RCW to read as follows:

Beginning January 1, 2025, the department of labor and industries shall compile aggregate data on the number of apprentices residing in each county categorized by occupation and publish the aggregate data on its website. The department shall update the aggregate data on its website every quarter.

--- END ---