BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 46.16A RCW to read as follows:

(1) A vintage snowmobile in good working order that is used only for participation in club activities, exhibitions, tours, and parades, and for occasional pleasure use, may be issued a permanent vintage registration. To be eligible to receive a permanent vintage registration, the registered owner of the vintage snowmobile must:

(a) Apply for a permanent vintage registration with the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director; and

(b) Pay the permanent vintage snowmobile fee required under RCW 46.17.350.

(2) A vintage snowmobile with a permanent vintage registration under this section is exempt from annual registration renewal under RCW 46.10.400.

(3) The permanent vintage registration under this section expires when the vintage snowmobile changes ownership, is permanently removed from the state, or is otherwise disposed of.

(4) A person in violation of this section is subject to a traffic infraction with a maximum fine of $150 including all other applicable assessments and fees.

(5) A vintage snowmobile with a permanent vintage registration under this section must display vintage snowmobile decals, assigned by the department, as provided in RCW 46.10.440.

(6) For purposes of this section, "occasional pleasure use" means use that is not general or daily, but seasonal or sporadic and not more than once per week on average. "Occasional pleasure use" does not mean: (a) Being held for rent to the public; or (b) use for commercial or business purposes.

(7) The department may adopt rules to implement this section.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.17.350 and 2019 c 44 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Before accepting an application for a vehicle registration, the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director shall require the applicant, unless specifically exempt, to pay the following vehicle license fee by vehicle type:

VEHICLE TYPE

INITIAL FEE

RENEWAL FEE

DISTRIBUTED UNDER

(a) Auto stage, six seats or less

$ 30.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.030

(b) Camper

$ 4.90

$ 3.50

RCW 46.68.030

(c) Commercial trailer

$ 34.00

$ 34.00

RCW 46.68.035

(d) For hire vehicle, six seats or less

$ 30.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.030

(e) Mobile home (if registered)

$ 30.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.030

(f) Moped

$ 30.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.030

(g) Motor home

$ 30.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.030

(h) Motorcycle

$ 30.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.030

(i) Off-road vehicle

$ 18.00

$ 18.00

RCW 46.68.045

(j) Passenger car

$ 30.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.030

(k) Private use single-axle trailer

$ 15.00

$ 15.00

RCW 46.68.035

(l) Snowmobile

$ 50.00

$ 50.00

RCW 46.68.350

(m) Snowmobile, permanent vintage

$ 70.00

Section 4 of this act

(n) Snowmobile, vintage

$ 12.00

$ 12.00

RCW 46.68.350

(((n)))(o) Sport utility vehicle

$ 30.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.030

(((o)))(p) Tow truck

$ 30.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.030

(((p)))(q) Trailer, over 2000 pounds

$ 30.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.030

(((q)))(r) Travel trailer

$ 30.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.030

(((r)))(s) Wheeled all-terrain vehicle, on-road use

$ 12.00

$ 12.00

RCW 46.09.540

(((s)))(t) Wheeled all-terrain vehicle, off-road use

$ 18.00

$ 18.00

RCW 46.09.510

(2) The vehicle license fee required in subsection (1) of this section is in addition to the filing fee required under RCW 46.17.005, and any other fee or tax required by law.

Sec. 3. RCW 46.10.400 and 2010 c 161 s 228 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The application for an original snowmobile registration has the same requirements as described for original vehicle registrations in RCW 46.16A.040 and must be accompanied by the annual snowmobile registration fee required under RCW 46.17.350, in addition to any other fees and taxes due at the time of application.

(2) The application for renewal of a snowmobile registration has the same requirements as described for the renewal of vehicle registrations in RCW 46.16A.110 and must be accompanied by the annual snowmobile registration fee required under RCW 46.17.350, in addition to any other fees or taxes due at the time of application.

(3) ((The))Except as provided in section 1 of this act, the snowmobile registration is valid for one year and must be renewed each year thereafter as determined by the department.

(4) A person who acquires a snowmobile that has a valid snowmobile registration must:

(a) Apply to the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director for a transfer of the snowmobile registration within ten days of taking possession of the snowmobile; and

(b) Pay the snowmobile registration transfer fee required under RCW 46.17.420, in addition to any other fees or taxes due at the time of application.

(5) The department shall issue a snowmobile registration and snowmobile decals upon receipt of:

(a) A properly completed application for an original snowmobile registration; and

(b) The payment of all fees and taxes due at the time of application.

(6) The snowmobile registration must be carried on the vehicle for which it was issued at all times during its operation in this state.

(7) Snowmobile decals must be affixed to the snowmobile as provided in RCW 46.10.440.

(8) Snowmobile registration fees provided in this section and in RCW 46.17.350 are in lieu of any personal property or excise tax imposed on snowmobiles by this state or any political subdivision. A state agency, city, county, or other municipality may not impose other registration fees on a snowmobile in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 46.68 RCW to read as follows:

The permanent vintage snowmobile fee imposed under RCW 46.17.350 must be distributed as follows:

(1) $35.76 of each fee must be deposited in the snowmobile account under RCW 46.68.350;

(2) $8.91 of each fee must be distributed as provided in RCW 46.68.400;

(3) $23.84 of each fee must be deposited in the capital vessel replacement account under RCW 47.60.322, unless the fee was collected by a subagent in which case the fee must be retained by the subagent;

(4) $0.99 of each fee must be deposited in the department of licensing services account under RCW 46.68.220; and

(5) $0.50 of each fee must be deposited in the license plate technology account under RCW 46.68.370.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. This act takes effect October 1, 2024.

--- END ---