BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 34.05.270 and 2009 c 93 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Within existing resources, each state agency shall maintain a website that contains the agency's rule-making information. A direct link to the agency's rule-making page must be displayed on the agency's homepage.

(2) The rule-making website shall include ((the)):

(a) The complete text of all proposed rules, emergency rules, and permanent rules proposed or adopted within the past ((twelve))12 months, or include a direct link to the index page on the Washington State Register website that contains links to the complete text of all proposed rules, emergency rules, and permanent rules proposed or adopted within the past ((twelve))12 months by that state agency((.));

(b) A summary of no more than 100 words in plain language of each proposed rule, emergency rule, and permanent rule proposed or adopted within the past 12 months; and

(c) For proposed rules, the time, date, and place for the rule-making hearing and the procedures and timelines for submitting written comments and supporting data must be posted on the website.

--- END ---