BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 2.08.062 and 2020 c 53 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

There shall be in the county of Chelan four judges of the superior court; in the county of Douglas one judge of the superior court; in the county of Clark ((eleven))12 judges of the superior court; in the county of Grays Harbor three judges of the superior court; in the county of Kitsap eight judges of the superior court; in the county of Kittitas two judges of the superior court; in the county of Lewis three judges of the superior court.

--- END ---