BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The administrative office of the courts shall study the judicial impacts of requiring, in every marriage dissolution case, separate judges to determine parenting plans and the distribution of property and liabilities. Studied impacts must include facility, personnel, procedural, and training costs. The study shall be delivered to the relevant standing committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025.

--- END ---