BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 77.32.480 and 2016 c 78 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon written application, a combination fishing license shall be issued at the reduced rate of ((five dollars))$5 and all hunting licenses shall be issued at the reduced rate of a youth hunting license fee for the following individuals:

(a) A resident ((sixty-five))65 years old or older who is an honorably discharged veteran of the United States armed forces having a service-connected disability;

(b) A resident who is an honorably discharged veteran of the United States armed forces with a ((thirty))30 percent or more service-connected disability;

(c) A resident with a disability who permanently uses a wheelchair;

(d) A resident who is blind or visually impaired; and

(e) A resident with a developmental disability as defined in RCW 71A.10.020 with documentation of the disability certified by a physician licensed to practice in this state.

(2)(a) Upon department verification of eligibility, a nonstate resident veteran with a disability who otherwise satisfies the criteria of subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this section must be issued a combination fishing license or any hunting license at the same cost charged to a nondisabled Washington resident for the same license.

(b)(i) Upon department verification of eligibility, a student who satisfies the criteria of (b)(ii) of this subsection must be issued a combination fishing license or any hunting license at the same cost charged to a nondisabled Washington resident for the same license.

(ii) To qualify under this subsection (2)(b), a student must be a full-time student who is enrolled in and attending an accredited institution of higher education, as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, in Washington for at least six months immediately prior to the date of application for any license. A student is deemed full time under the rules of the educational institution the student is attending.

(3) Upon written application and department verification, the following recreational hunting licenses must be issued at no cost to a resident member of the state guard or national guard, as defined in RCW 38.04.010, as long as the state guard or national guard member is: An active full-time state guard or national guard employee; or a state guard or national guard member whose status requires the state guard or national guard member to participate in drill training on a part-time basis:

(a) A small game hunting license under RCW 77.32.460(1);

(b) A supplemental migratory bird permit under RCW 77.32.350; and

(c) A big game hunting license under RCW 77.32.450 (1) and (2).

--- END ---