BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 19.182.040 and 2011 c 333 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as authorized under subsection (2) of this section, no consumer reporting agency may make a consumer report containing any of the following items of information:

(a) Bankruptcies that, from date of adjudication of the most recent bankruptcy, antedate the report by more than ((ten))10 years;

(b) Suits and judgments that, from date of entry, antedate the report by more than seven years or until the governing statute of limitations has expired, whichever is the longer period;

(c) Paid tax liens that, from date of payment, antedate the report by more than seven years;

(d) Accounts placed for collection or charged to profit and loss that antedate the report by more than seven years;

(e) Records of arrest, indictment, or conviction of an adult for a crime that, from date of disposition, release, or parole, antedate the report by more than seven years;

(f) Juvenile records, as defined in RCW 13.50.010(1)(((c)))(d), when the subject of the records is ((twenty-one))21 years of age or older at the time of the report; ((and))

(g) Any other adverse item of information that antedates the report by more than seven years; and

(h) Individual or joint accounts that are in the name of a person and the financial responsibility of a different person as determined by a dissolution proceeding authorized under chapter 26.09 RCW and the account is in collections or has recorded late installment payments subsequent to the dissolution proceeding.

(2) Subsection (1)(a) through (e) ((and)), (g), and (h) of this section is not applicable in the case of a consumer report to be used in connection with:

(a) A credit transaction involving, or that may reasonably be expected to involve, a principal amount of ((fifty thousand dollars))$50,000 or more;

(b) The underwriting of life insurance involving, or that may reasonably be expected to involve, a face amount of ((fifty thousand dollars))$50,000 or more; or

(c) The employment of an individual at an annual salary that equals, or that may reasonably be expected to equal, ((twenty thousand dollars))$20,000 or more.

--- END ---