BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 26.16.125 and 2008 c 6 s 640 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Henceforth the rights and responsibilities of the parents in the absence of misconduct (a) shall be equal, and one parent shall be as fully entitled to the custody, control, and earnings of the children as the other parent, and (b) in case of one parent's death, the other parent shall come into full and complete control of the children and their estate.

(2) Misconduct includes having a history of domestic violence, as defined in RCW 10.99.020, with the child's deceased parent.

--- END ---