BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 71.24 RCW to read as follows:

A software vendor that provides practice management software to support teletherapy services shall provide six months' notice before stopping services to a client therapist or therapy practice if a dispute arises between the vendor and therapist or therapy practice over a proposed change in the terms of the software user agreement.

--- END ---