BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 19.27A.045 and 1990 c 2 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The state building code council shall maintain the state energy code for residential structures in a status which is consistent with the state's interest as set forth in section 1, chapter 2, Laws of 1990. In maintaining the Washington state energy code for residential structures, beginning in 1996 the council shall review the Washington state energy code every three years. After January 1, 1996, by rule adopted pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, the council may amend any provisions of the Washington state energy code to increase the energy efficiency of newly constructed residential buildings as long as the benefits of increasing energy efficiency are not outweighed by considerations of housing affordability, development costs, feasibility, or other similar factors apart from energy efficiency. Decisions to amend the Washington state energy code for residential structures shall be made prior to December 1st of any year and shall not take effect before the end of the regular legislative session in the next year.

--- END ---