BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.84.020 and 2010 c 92 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Approved cardiovascular invasive specialist program" or "approved radiologist assistant program" means a school approved by the secretary. The secretary may recognize other organizations that establish standards for radiologist assistant programs or cardiovascular invasive specialist programs and designate schools that meet the organization's standards as approved.

(2) "Approved school of radiologic technology" means a school of radiologic technology, cardiovascular invasive specialist program, or radiologist assistant program approved by the secretary or a school found to maintain the equivalent of such a course of study as determined by the department. Such school may be operated by a medical or educational institution, and for the purpose of providing any requisite clinical experience, shall be affiliated with one or more general hospitals.

(3) "Cardiac or vascular catheterization" means all anatomic or physiological studies of intervention in which the heart, coronary arteries, or vascular system are entered via a systemic vein or artery using a catheter that is manipulated under fluoroscopic visualization.

(4) "Department" means the department of health.

(5) "Licensed practitioner" means any licensed health care practitioner performing services within the person's authorized scope of practice.

(6) "Nonionizing radiation" includes radiation such as radiofrequency or microwaves, visible, infrared, or ultraviolet light or ultrasound.

(7) "Radiologic technologist" means an individual certified under this chapter, other than a licensed practitioner, who practices radiologic technology as a:

(a) Diagnostic radiologic technologist, who is a person who actually handles X-ray equipment in the process of applying radiation on a human being for diagnostic purposes at the direction of a licensed practitioner, this includes parenteral procedures related to radiologic technology when performed under the direct supervision of a physician licensed under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW;

(b) Therapeutic radiologic technologist, who is a person who uses radiation-generating equipment for therapeutic purposes on human subjects at the direction of a licensed practitioner, this includes parenteral procedures related to radiologic technology when performed under the direct supervision of a physician licensed under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW;

(c) Magnetic resonance imaging technologist, who is a person who uses a nonionizing radiation process on a human being by which certain nuclei, when placed in a magnetic field, absorb and release energy in the form of radio waves that are analyzed by a computer thereby producing an image of human anatomy and physiological information, at the direction of a licensed practitioner, this includes parenteral procedures related to radiologic technology when performed under the direct supervision of a physician licensed under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW.

(d) Nuclear medicine technologist, who is a person who prepares radiopharmaceuticals and administers them to human beings for diagnostic and therapeutic purposes and who performs in vivo and in vitro detection and measurement of radioactivity for medical purposes at the direction of a licensed practitioner;

(((d)))(e) Radiologist assistant, who is an advanced-level certified diagnostic radiologic technologist who assists radiologists by performing advanced diagnostic imaging procedures as determined by rule under levels of supervision defined by the secretary, this includes but is not limited to enteral and parenteral procedures when performed under the direction of the supervising radiologist, and that these procedures may include injecting diagnostic agents to sites other than intravenous, performing diagnostic aspirations and localizations, and assisting radiologists with other invasive procedures; or

(((e)))(f) Cardiovascular invasive specialist, who is a person who assists in cardiac or vascular catheterization procedures under the personal supervision of a physician licensed under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW. This includes parenteral procedures related to cardiac or vascular catheterization including, but not limited to, parenteral procedures involving arteries and veins.

(((7)))(8) "Radiologic technology" means the use of ionizing or nonionizing radiation upon a human being for diagnostic or therapeutic purposes.

(((8)))(9) "Radiologist" means a physician certified by the American board of radiology or the American osteopathic board of radiology.

(((9)))(10) "Registered X-ray technician" means a person who is registered with the department, and who applies ionizing radiation at the direction of a licensed practitioner and who does not perform parenteral procedures.

(((10)))(11) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.84.080 and 2010 c 92 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The secretary shall issue a certificate to any applicant who demonstrates to the secretary's satisfaction, that the following requirements have been met to practice as:

(a) A diagnostic radiologic technologist, therapeutic radiologic technologist, magnetic resonance imaging technologist, or nuclear medicine technologist:

(i) Graduation from an approved school or successful completion of alternate training that meets the criteria established by the secretary;

(ii) Satisfactory completion of a radiologic ((technologist))technology examination approved by the secretary; and

(iii) Good moral character;

(b) A radiologist assistant:

(i) Satisfactory completion of an approved radiologist assistant program;

(ii) Satisfactory completion of a radiologist assistant examination approved by the secretary; and

(iii) Good moral character; or

(c) A cardiovascular invasive specialist:

(i) Satisfactory completion of a cardiovascular invasive specialist program or alternate training approved by the secretary. The secretary may only approve a cardiovascular invasive specialist program that includes training in the following subjects: Cardiovascular anatomy and physiology, pharmacology, radiation physics and safety, radiation imaging and positioning, medical recordkeeping, and multicultural health as required by RCW 43.70.615(3);

(ii) Satisfactory completion of a cardiovascular invasive specialist examination approved by the secretary. For purposes of this subsection (1)(c)(ii), the secretary may approve an examination administered by a national credentialing organization for cardiovascular invasive specialists; and

(iii) Good moral character.

(2) Applicants shall be subject to the grounds for denial or issuance of a conditional license under chapter 18.130 RCW.

(3) The secretary shall establish by rule what constitutes adequate proof of meeting the requirements for certification and for designation of certification in a particular field of radiologic technology.

Sec. 3. RCW 18.84.030 and 2008 c 246 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

No person may practice radiologic technology without being registered or certified under this chapter, unless that person is a licensed practitioner as defined in RCW 18.84.020(((3)))(5). A person represents himself or herself to the public as a certified radiologic technologist when that person adopts or uses a title or description of services that incorporates one or more of the following items or designations:

(1) Certified radiologic technologist or CRT, for persons so certified under this chapter;

(2) Certified radiologic therapy technologist, CRTT, or CRT, for persons certified in the therapeutic field;

(3) Certified radiologic diagnostic technologist, CRDT, or CRT, for persons certified in the diagnostic field;

(4) Certified nuclear medicine technologist, CNMT, or CRT, for persons certified as nuclear medicine technologists; ((or))

(5) Certified magnetic resonance imaging technologist, CMRIT, or CRT, for persons certified as magnetic resonance imaging technologists; or

(6) Certified radiologist assistant or CRA for persons certified as radiologist assistants.

Sec. 4. RCW 18.84.130 and 1991 c 222 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary may provide educational materials and training to registered X-ray technicians, certified radiologic technologists, licensed practitioners and the public concerning, but not limited to, health risks associated with ionizing and nonionizing radiation, proper radiographic techniques, and X-ray and other imaging equipment maintenance. The secretary may charge fees to recover the cost of providing educational materials and training.

--- END ---