BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW to read as follows:

In determining restitution following a criminal conviction under this chapter or chapter 90.56 RCW, the court is authorized to order restitution for harm to natural resources or the environment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 70A.15 RCW to read as follows:

In determining restitution following a criminal conviction under this chapter, the court is authorized to order restitution for harm to natural resources or the environment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 70A.300 RCW to read as follows:

In determining restitution following a criminal conviction under this chapter, the court is authorized to order restitution for harm to natural resources or the environment.

--- END ---