BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 51.04.175 and 2019 c 76 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director is authorized to provide funding of up to two percent of the premiums paid in the prior year from the risk classes for firefighters as defined in RCW 41.26.030(17) (a) through (c) for the purposes of providing funding to employers of firefighters who have limited resources to ((purchase)):

(a) Purchase additional equipment and other gear that may be needed to follow best practices under RCW 51.04.170; and

(b) Participate in assessments or training related to safety culture or other safety intervention activities.

(2) The department may require matching funds from employers. An appropriation is not required for expenditures. Only employers who pay premiums to the state fund as defined in RCW 51.08.175 are eligible for funding under this section.

(((2)))(3) The department may adopt rules if necessary to implement this section.

--- END ---