BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 72.02.100 and 2023 c 467 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any person serving a sentence for a term of confinement in a state correctional facility for convicted felons, pursuant to court commitment, who is thereafter released upon an order of parole of the indeterminate sentence review board, or who is discharged from custody upon expiration of sentence, or who is ordered discharged from custody by a court of appropriate jurisdiction, shall be entitled to retain his or her earnings from labor or employment while in confinement and shall be supplied by the superintendent of the state correctional facility with suitable and presentable clothing, the sum of no less than $40 for subsistence, and transportation by the least expensive method of public transportation not to exceed the cost of $100 to his or her place of residence or the place designated in his or her parole plan, or to the place from which committed if such person is being discharged on expiration of sentence, or discharged from custody by a court of appropriate jurisdiction: PROVIDED, That up to an additional $60 may be made available to the parolee for necessary personal and living expenses upon application to and approval by such person's community corrections officer. If in the opinion of the superintendent suitable arrangements have been made to provide the person to be released with suitable clothing and/or the expenses of transportation, the superintendent may consent to such arrangement. If the superintendent has reasonable cause to believe that the person to be released has ample funds, with the exception of earnings from labor or employment while in confinement, to assume the expenses of clothing, transportation, or the expenses for which payments made pursuant to this section or RCW 72.02.110 or any one or more of such expenses, the person released shall be required to assume such expenses.

(2)(a) The same requirements of subsection (1) of this section shall apply to any person who is serving a sentence for a term of confinement in a state correctional facility and is:

(i) Transferred to community custody under the supervision of the department of corrections pursuant to RCW 9.94A.501, or in lieu of earned release time under RCW 9.94A.729;

(ii) Transferred from a department correctional facility to partial confinement as home detention in the community as part of the graduated reentry program under RCW 9.94A.733 or the parenting program under RCW 9.94A.6551;

(iii) Transferred from a department correctional facility to partial confinement in lieu of earned early release under RCW 9.94A.729, or as part of the work release program under chapter 72.65 RCW; or

(iv) Conditionally released by the indeterminate sentence review board with conditions of community custody under the supervision of the department pursuant to RCW 9.95.011, 9.95.420, 9.94A.730, or 10.95.030.

(b) The items and arrangements to be supplied by the superintendent of the state correctional facility under this subsection must be provided at the moment of the person's transfer from total confinement to partial confinement, or transfer from total confinement to community custody.

(3)(a) The department of corrections may only provide the funds for subsistence required by subsection (1) or (2) of this section one time to any person serving a sentence for a term of confinement in a state correctional facility.

(b) Any funds for subsistence provided to a person under this section shall not be subject to any deductions required under RCW 72.09.480 or chapter 72.11 RCW.

(4)(a) The department of corrections may provide temporary housing assistance for a person being released from any state correctional facility through the use of rental vouchers, for a period not to exceed six months, if the department finds that such assistance will support the person's release into the community by preventing housing instability or homelessness. The department's authority to provide vouchers under this section is independent of its authority under RCW 9.94A.729; however, a person may not receive a combined total of rental vouchers in excess of six months for each release from a state correctional facility.

(b) The department shall establish policies for prioritizing funds available for housing vouchers under this section for persons at risk of releasing homeless or becoming homeless without assistance while taking into account risk to reoffend.

Sec. 2. RCW 72.66.070 and 1971 ex.s. c 58 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

The department ((may))shall provide or arrange for transportation for furloughed prisoners to the designated place of residence within the state and ((may))shall, in addition, supply funds ((not to exceed forty dollars))in the sum of no less than $40 and suitable clothing, such clothing to be returned to the institution on the expiration of furlough.

Sec. 3. RCW 72.09.480 and 2023 c 111 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply to this section.

(a) "Cost of incarceration" means the cost of providing an inmate with shelter, food, clothing, transportation, supervision, and other services and supplies as may be necessary for the maintenance and support of the inmate while in the custody of the department, based on the average per inmate costs established by the department and the office of financial management.

(b) "Minimum term of confinement" means the minimum amount of time an inmate will be confined in the custody of the department, considering the sentence imposed and adjusted for the total potential earned early release time available to the inmate.

(c) "Program" means any series of courses or classes necessary to achieve a proficiency standard, certificate, or postsecondary degree.

(2) When an inmate, except as provided in subsections (4) through (((10)))(11) of this section, receives any funds in addition to his or her wages or gratuities, except settlements or awards resulting from legal action, the additional funds shall be subject to the following deductions and the priorities established in chapter 72.11 RCW:

(a) Five percent to the crime victims' compensation account provided in RCW 7.68.045;

(b) Ten percent to a department personal inmate savings account;

(c) Twenty percent for payment of legal financial obligations for all inmates who have legal financial obligations owing in any Washington state superior court;

(d) Twenty percent for any child support owed under a support order;

(e) Twenty percent to the department to contribute to the cost of incarceration; and

(f) Twenty percent for payment of any civil judgment for assault for all inmates who are subject to a civil judgment for assault in any Washington state court or federal court.

(3) When an inmate, except as provided in subsection (10) of this section, receives any funds from a settlement or award resulting from a legal action, the additional funds shall be subject to the deductions in RCW 72.09.111(1)(a) and the priorities established in chapter 72.11 RCW.

(4) When an inmate who is subject to a child support order receives funds from an inheritance, the deduction required under subsection (2)(e) and (f) of this section shall only apply after the child support obligation has been paid in full.

(5) The amount deducted from an inmate's funds under subsection (2) of this section shall not exceed the department's total cost of incarceration for the inmate incurred during the inmate's minimum or actual term of confinement, whichever is longer.

(6)(a) The deductions required under subsection (2) of this section shall not apply to funds received by the department from an offender or from a third party on behalf of an offender for payment of education or vocational programs or postsecondary education degree programs as provided in RCW 72.09.460 and 72.09.465.

(b) The deductions required under subsection (2) of this section shall not apply to funds received by the department from a third party, including but not limited to a nonprofit entity on behalf of the department's education, vocation, or postsecondary education degree programs.

(7) The deductions required under subsection (2) of this section shall not apply to any money received by the department, on behalf of an inmate, from family or other outside sources for the payment of postage expenses. Money received under this subsection may only be used for the payment of postage expenses and may not be transferred to any other account or purpose. Money that remains unused in the inmate's postage fund at the time of release shall be subject to the deductions outlined in subsection (2) of this section.

(8) The deductions required under subsection (2) of this section do not apply to any money received by the department on behalf of an inmate from family or other outside sources for the payment of certain medical expenses. Money received under this subsection may only be used for the payment of medical expenses associated with the purchase of eyeglasses, over-the-counter medications, and offender copayments. Funds received specifically for these purposes may not be transferred to any other account or purpose. Money that remains unused in the inmate's medical fund at the time of release is subject to deductions under subsection (2) of this section.

(9) The deductions required under subsection (2) of this section do not apply to any money received by the department on behalf of an inmate from family or other outside sources for the purchase of commissary items. Money received under this subsection may only be used for the purchase of items on the facility commissary list. The amount received by each inmate under this subsection may not exceed the monthly allowance for commissary purchases as allowed by the department. Funds received specifically for these purposes may not be transferred to any other fund, account, or purpose. Money that remains unused in the inmate's commissary fund at the time of release is subject to deductions under subsection (2) of this section.

(10) Inmates sentenced to life imprisonment without possibility of release or sentenced to death under chapter 10.95 RCW receives funds, deductions are required under subsection (2) of this section, with the exception of a personal inmate savings account under subsection (2)(b) of this section.

(11) The deductions required under subsection (2) of this section do not apply to funds for subsistence issued by the department to an inmate:

(a) Upon the person's transfer from total confinement to partial confinement, or transfer from total confinement to community custody, pursuant to RCW 72.02.100; or

(b) For a furlough pursuant to RCW 72.66.070.

(12) The secretary of the department of corrections, or his or her designee, may exempt an inmate from a personal inmate savings account under subsection (2)(b) of this section if the inmate's earliest release date is beyond the inmate's life expectancy.

(((12)))(13) The interest earned on an inmate savings account created as a result of the plan in section 4, chapter 325, Laws of 1999 shall be exempt from the mandatory deductions under this section and RCW 72.09.111.

(((13)))(14) Nothing in this section shall limit the authority of the department of social and health services division of child support, the county clerk, or a restitution recipient from taking collection action against an inmate's moneys, assets, or property pursuant to chapter 9.94A, 26.23, 74.20, or 74.20A RCW including, but not limited to, the collection of moneys received by the inmate from settlements or awards resulting from legal action.

--- END ---