BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that drug overdose deaths have increased significantly and rose to over 2,700 deaths in the year 2022. Of those deaths, 74 percent involved opioids and 68 percent involved synthetic opioids such as fentanyl. Furthermore, 50 percent involved psychostimulants such as methamphetamine. The legislature intends to save lives by increasing the public awareness of the dangers caused by drug addiction and the harms caused by drug use through the creation of a statewide drug overdose prevention and education campaign.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department shall develop, implement, and maintain an ongoing statewide drug overdose prevention and education campaign to address the drug overdose epidemic.

(2) The drug overdose prevention and education campaign shall provide information to the general public about the dangers of methamphetamines and opioids, including fentanyl, and the harms caused by drug use. The campaign may also include messaging focused on drug addiction and overdose death prevention, resources for addiction treatment and services, and information on immunity for people who seek medical assistance in a drug overdose situation pursuant to RCW 69.50.315. The campaign must include outreach to both youth and adults aimed at preventing addiction and overdose deaths.

(3) Beginning June 30, 2025, and each year thereafter, the department must submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature on the content and distribution of the statewide drug overdose prevention and education campaign. The report must include a summary of the messages distributed during the campaign, the mediums through which the campaign was operated, and data on how many individuals received information through the campaign.

(4) The department shall conduct a feasibility study regarding the creation of a drug overdose prevention hotline. By December 31, 2025, the department shall provide a report detailing the results of the feasibility study and recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature.

(5) This section expires July 1, 2029.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2024.

--- END ---