BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that as Washington's growing population accesses limited natural resources, there is a need to increase compliance, and provide education, on appropriate gear, seasons, and species take limits.

(2) The legislature further finds that previously unregulated species are under increased recreational harvest. Recreational licensing is an appropriate mechanism to educate the public and preserve opportunity in the future.

(3) The legislature further finds that eulachon, also known as Pacific smelt and Columbia river smelt, are listed as a threatened species under the endangered species act and licensing requirements are needed to provide angler education and allow for better regulation and monitoring to prevent them from becoming endangered.

(4) The legislature also finds that licensing for carp will aid in enforcement of illegal fishing where people fishing for regulated species without a required license have claimed to be fishing for carp, thereby negatively affecting the fisheries of other regulated species.

(5) The legislature further finds that licensing for crawfish will provide the public with education that enables them to distinguish between native and invasive crawfish species, facilitating the removal of invasive crawfish.

Sec. 2. RCW 77.32.010 and 2019 c 290 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter or department rule, a recreational license issued by the director is required to hunt, fish, or take wildlife or seaweed. A ((recreational fishing or shellfish license is not required for carp, freshwater smelt, and crawfish, and a)) hunting license is not required for bullfrogs.

(2) A pass or permit issued under RCW 79A.80.020, 79A.80.030, or 79A.80.040 is required to park or operate a motor vehicle on a recreation site or lands, as defined in RCW 79A.80.010.

(3) The commission may, by rule, indicate that a fishing permit issued to a nontribal member by the Colville Tribes shall satisfy the license requirements in subsection (1) of this section on the waters of Lake Rufus Woods and on the north shore of Lake Rufus Woods, and that a Colville Tribes tribal member identification card shall satisfy the license requirements in subsection (1) of this section on all waters of Lake Rufus Woods.

--- END ---