BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 42.52 RCW to read as follows:

This chapter does not prohibit the use of public resources, including but not limited to the use of personnel, money, and property, by an employee of a state institution of higher education to benefit any student athlete in the advising, facilitation, acknowledgment, or education related to a matter involving the name image and likeness of such a student athlete or group of student athletes, or in relation to student athlete name image and likeness matters generally, so long as such resources are under the control or direction of such an employee. Any use of public resources must adhere to the rules established by the national, nonprofit member organization responsible for oversight of college sports at state institutions of higher education.

--- END ---