BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that 6PPD is a chemical commonly used in motor vehicle tires to keep them flexible and prevent them from degrading quickly. 6PPD works by moving to the surface of the tire and forming a film that protects the tire. As the film breaks down, it produces 6PPD-quinone. When it rains, tire particles containing 6PPD-quinone are washed into streams, rivers, and other water bodies through stormwater runoff.

(2) The legislature also finds that 6PPD-quinone is directly linked to urban runoff mortality syndrome, a condition where Coho salmon die prior to spawning. 6PPD-quinone is known to be toxic to aquatic species and is the primary causal toxicant for Coho salmon. In June 2023, the department of ecology identified 6PPD as a draft priority chemical under safer products for Washington, cycle 2. Additionally, 6PPD has been identified as a hazardous substance under the model toxics control act and as a chemical of concern for sensitive populations and sensitive species.

(3) The legislature finds it important to reduce sources and uses of 6PPD in Washington to protect aquatic life, particularly salmon. Since 6PPD is ubiquitous in motorized vehicle tires, the legislature intends to identify 6PPD as a priority chemical and certain motorized vehicle tires containing 6PPD as priority consumer products under safer products for Washington.

Sec. 2. RCW 70A.350.010 and 2020 c 20 s 1451 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "6PPD" means the chemical compound N-(1,3-dimethylbutyl)-N'-phenyl-p-phenylenediamine.

(2) "Consumer product" means any item, including any component parts and packaging, sold for residential or commercial use.

(((2)))(3) "Department" means the department of ecology.

(((3)))(4) "Director" means the director of the department.

(((4)))(5) "Electronic product" includes personal computers, audio and video equipment, calculators, wireless phones, game consoles, and handheld devices incorporating a video screen that are used to access interactive software, and the peripherals associated with such products.

(((5)))(6) "Inaccessible electronic component" means a part or component of an electronic product that is located inside and entirely enclosed within another material and is not capable of coming out of the product or being accessed during any reasonably foreseeable use or abuse of the product.

(((6)))(7) "Manufacturer" means any person, firm, association, partnership, corporation, governmental entity, organization, or joint venture that produces a product or is an importer or domestic distributor of a product sold or offered for sale in or into the state.

(((7)))(8)(a) "Motorized vehicle" means a vehicle intended for on-highway or off-highway use.

(b) "Motorized vehicle" does not include the tires equipped on the vehicle nor tires sold separately for replacement purposes.

(9) "Organohalogen" means a class of chemicals that includes any chemical containing one or more halogen elements bonded to carbon.

(((8)))(10) "Perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances" or "PFAS chemicals" means a class of fluorinated organic chemicals containing at least one fully fluorinated carbon atom.

(((9)))(11) "Phenolic compounds" means alkylphenol ethoxylates and bisphenols.

(((10)))(12) "Phthalates" means synthetic chemical esters of phthalic acid.

(((11)))(13) "Polychlorinated biphenyls" or "PCBs" means chemical forms that consist of two benzene rings joined together and containing one to ten chlorine atoms attached to the benzene rings.

(((12)))(14) "Priority chemical" means a chemical or chemical class used as, used in, or put in a consumer product including:

(a) Perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances;

(b) Phthalates;

(c) Organohalogen flame retardants;

(d) Flame retardants, as identified by the department under chapter 70A.430 RCW;

(e) Phenolic compounds;

(f) Polychlorinated biphenyls; ((or))

(g) 6PPD; or

(h) A chemical identified by the department as a priority chemical under RCW 70A.350.020.

(((13)))(15) "Safer alternative" means an alternative that is less hazardous to humans or the environment than the existing chemical or chemical process. A safer alternative to a particular chemical may include a chemical substitute or a change in materials or design that eliminates the need for a chemical alternative.

(((14)))(16) "Sensitive population" means a category of people that is identified by the department that may be or is disproportionately or more severely affected by priority chemicals, such as:

(a) Men and women of childbearing age;

(b) Infants and children;

(c) Pregnant women;

(d) Communities that are highly impacted by toxic chemicals;

(e) Persons with occupational exposure; and

(f) The elderly.

(((15)))(17) "Sensitive species" means a species or grouping of animals that is identified by the department that may be or is disproportionately or more severely affected by priority chemicals, such as:

(a) Southern resident killer whales;

(b) Salmon; and

(c) Forage fish.

Sec. 3. RCW 70A.350.050 and 2022 c 264 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) By June 1, 2020, and consistent with RCW 70A.350.030, the department shall identify priority consumer products that are a significant source of or use of priority chemicals specified in RCW 70A.350.010(((12)))(14) (a) through (f).

(b) By June 1, 2022, and consistent with RCW 70A.350.040, the department must determine regulatory actions regarding the priority chemicals and priority consumer products identified in (a) of this subsection. The deadline of June 1, 2022, does not apply to the priority consumer products identified in RCW 70A.350.090.

(c) By June 1, 2023, the department must adopt rules to implement regulatory actions determined under (b) of this subsection.

(2)(a) By June 1, 2024, and every five years thereafter, the department shall select at least five priority chemicals specified in RCW 70A.350.010(((12)))(14) (a) through (((g)))(h) that are identified consistent with RCW 70A.350.020.

(b) By June 1, 2025, and every five years thereafter, the department must identify priority consumer products that contain any new priority chemicals after notifying the appropriate committees of the legislature, consistent with RCW 70A.350.030.

(c) By June 1, 2027, and every five years thereafter, the department must determine regulatory actions for any priority chemicals in priority consumer products identified under (b) of this subsection, consistent with RCW 70A.350.040.

(d) By June 1, 2028, and every five years thereafter, the department must adopt rules to implement regulatory actions identified under (c) of this subsection.

(3)(a) The designation of priority chemicals by the department does not take effect until the adjournment of the regular legislative session immediately following the identification of chemicals, in order to allow an opportunity for the legislature to add to, limit, or otherwise amend the list of priority chemicals to be considered by the department.

(b) The designation of priority consumer products by the department does not take effect until the adjournment of the regular legislative session immediately following the identification of priority consumer products, in order to allow an opportunity for the legislature to add to, limit, or otherwise amend the list of priority consumer products to be considered by the department.

(c) The determination of regulatory actions by the department does not take effect until the adjournment of the regular legislative session immediately following the determination by the department, in order to allow an opportunity for the legislature to add to, limit, or otherwise amend the regulatory determinations by the department.

(d) Nothing in this subsection (3) limits the authority of the department to:

(i) Begin to identify priority consumer products for a priority chemical prior to the effective date of the designation of a priority chemical;

(ii) Begin to consider possible regulatory actions prior to the effective date of the designation of a priority consumer product; or

(iii) Initiate a rule-making process prior to the effective date of a determination of a regulatory action.

(4)(a) When identifying priority chemicals and priority consumer products under this chapter, the department must notify the public of the selection, including the identification of the peer-reviewed science and other sources of information that the department relied upon, the basis for the selection, and a draft schedule for making determinations. The notice must be published in the Washington State Register. The department shall provide the public with an opportunity for review and comment on the regulatory determinations.

(b)(i) By June 1, 2020, the department must create a stakeholder advisory process to provide expertise, input, and a review of the department's rationale for identifying priority chemicals and priority consumer products and proposed regulatory determinations. The input received from a stakeholder process must be considered and addressed when adopting rules.

(ii) The stakeholder process must include, but is not limited to, representatives from: Large and small business sectors; community, environmental, and public health advocacy groups; local governments; affected and interested businesses; an expert in scientific data analysis; and public health agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 70A.350 RCW to read as follows:

For the purposes of the regulatory process established in this chapter, a motorized vehicle tire containing 6PPD that is equipped on or intended to be installed as a replacement tire on a motorized vehicle for on-highway use is a priority consumer product. For these priority products, the department must determine regulatory actions and adopt rules to implement those regulatory determinations consistent with the process established in RCW 70A.350.040 and 70A.350.050. In determining regulatory actions under this section, the department must specifically consider the effect of the regulatory actions on driver and passenger safety.

--- END ---