BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 35.63 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A city may encourage an applicant of a project permit or commercial building permit to include pollinator friendly plants in any landscaped area to the extent practicable by:

(a) Providing the list of native forage plants as developed by the department of agriculture in compliance with RCW 39.04.410 to applicants for project permits;

(b) Providing information regarding the benefits of pollinators and pollinator habitat; and

(c) Offering incentives, including expedited processing or reduced application fees, for permit applicants that include pollinator habitat as part of the permit application.

(2) A city may set restrictions related to beehives, but may not adopt an ordinance banning beehives.

(3) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Commercial building permit" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 19.27.015.

(b) "Pollinator habitat" means an area of land that is or may be developed as habitat beneficial for the feeding, nesting, and reproduction of all pollinators.

(c) "Project permit" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 36.70B.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 35A.63 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A code city may encourage an applicant of a project permit or commercial building permit to include pollinator friendly plants in any landscaped area to the extent practicable by:

(a) Providing the list of native forage plants as developed by the department of agriculture in compliance with RCW 39.04.410 to applicants for project permits;

(b) Providing information regarding the benefits of pollinators and pollinator habitat; and

(c) Offering incentives, including expedited processing or reduced application fees, for permit applicants that include pollinator habitat as part of the permit application.

(2) A code city may set restrictions related to beehives, but may not adopt an ordinance banning beehives.

(3) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Commercial building permit" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 19.27.015.

(b) "Pollinator habitat" means an area of land that is or may be developed as habitat beneficial for the feeding, nesting, and reproduction of all pollinators.

(c) "Project permit" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 36.70B.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 36.70 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A county may encourage an applicant of a project permit or commercial building permit to include pollinator friendly plants in any landscaped area to the extent practicable by:

(a) Providing the list of native forage plants as developed by the department of agriculture in compliance with RCW 39.04.410 to applicants for project permits;

(b) Providing information regarding the benefits of pollinators and pollinator habitat; and

(c) Offering incentives, including expedited processing or reduced application fees, for permit applicants that include pollinator habitat as part of the permit application.

(2) A county may set restrictions related to beehives, but may not adopt an ordinance banning beehives.

(3) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Commercial building permit" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 19.27.015.

(b) "Pollinator habitat" means an area of land that is or may be developed as habitat beneficial for the feeding, nesting, and reproduction of all pollinators.

(c) "Project permit" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 36.70B.020.

Sec. 4. RCW 64.38.057 and 2020 c 9 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The governing documents may not prohibit the installation of drought resistant landscaping, pollinator habitat, including beehives compliant with local regulation, or wildfire ignition resistant landscaping. However, the governing documents may include reasonable rules regarding the placement and aesthetic appearance of drought resistant landscaping, pollinator habitat, or wildfire ignition resistant landscaping, as long as the rules do not render the use of drought resistant landscaping, pollinator habitat, or wildfire ignition resistant landscaping unreasonably costly or otherwise effectively infeasible.

(2) If a property is located within the geographic designation of an order of a drought condition issued by the department of ecology under RCW 43.83B.405, an association may not sanction or impose a fine or assessment against an owner, or resident on the owner's property, for reducing or eliminating the watering of vegetation or lawns for the duration of the drought condition order.

(3) Nothing in this section may be construed to prohibit or restrict the establishment and maintenance of a fire buffer within the building ignition zone.

(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Building ignition zone" means a building and surrounding area up to two hundred feet from the foundation.

(b) "Drought resistant landscaping" means the use of any noninvasive vegetation adapted to arid or dry conditions, stone, or landscaping rock.

(c) "Firewise" means the firewise communities program developed by the national fire protection association, which encourages local solutions for wildfire safety by involving homeowners, community leaders, planners, developers, firefighters, and others in the effort to protect people and property from wildfire risks.

(d) "Pollinator habitat" means an area of land that is or may be developed as habitat beneficial for the feeding, nesting, and reproduction of all pollinators.

(e) "Wildfire ignition resistant landscaping" includes:

(i) Any landscaping tools or techniques, or noninvasive vegetation, that do not readily ignite from a flame or other ignition source; or

(ii) The use of firewise methods to reduce ignition risk in a building ignition zone.

Sec. 5. RCW 64.90.512 and 2020 c 9 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The declaration of a common interest ownership and any governing documents adopted by an association may not prohibit the installation of drought resistant landscaping, pollinator habitat, including beehives compliant with local regulation, or wildfire ignition resistant landscaping. However, the declaration or governing documents may include reasonable rules regarding the placement and aesthetic appearance of drought resistant landscaping, pollinator habitat, or wildfire ignition resistant landscaping, as long as the rules do not render the use of drought resistant landscaping, pollinator habitat, or wildfire ignition resistant landscaping unreasonably costly or otherwise effectively infeasible.

(2) If a property is located within the geographic designation of an order of a drought condition issued by the department of ecology under RCW 43.83B.405, an association may not impose a fine or assessment against an owner, or resident on the owner's property, for reducing or eliminating the watering of vegetation or lawns for the duration of the drought condition order.

(3) Nothing in this section may be construed to prohibit or restrict the establishment and maintenance of a fire buffer within the building ignition zone.

(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Building ignition zone" means a building and surrounding area up to two hundred feet from the foundation.

(b) "Drought resistant landscaping" means the use of any noninvasive vegetation adapted to arid or dry conditions, stone, or landscaping rock.

(c) "Firewise" means the firewise communities program developed by the national fire protection association, which encourages local solutions for wildfire safety by involving homeowners, community leaders, planners, developers, firefighters, and others in the effort to protect people and property from wildfire risks.

(d) "Pollinator habitat" means an area of land that is or may be developed as habitat beneficial for the feeding, nesting, and reproduction of all pollinators.

(e) "Wildfire ignition resistant landscaping" includes:

(i) Any landscaping tools or techniques, or noninvasive vegetation, that do not readily ignite from a flame or other ignition source; or

(ii) The use of firewise methods to reduce ignition risk in a building ignition zone.

--- END ---