BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that Washington residents could benefit from having a quick and seamless digital way to connect to services and that state agencies should explore opportunities to provide such services in a way that builds off of the work of their peers by maximizing the state's investments and reducing the duplication of staff efforts in the provision of services. The legislature finds that the advisory group created in this act will have the expertise and experience to bring together ideas for developing a resource data tool, which includes a mobile application and web portal, that may assist Washington residents in gaining access to a variety of existing services, such as social, behavioral health, and housing services. While many providers, both public and private, currently offer these types of services in Washington, the residents of our state do not always have an easy way to learn more about, and use, those services. It is the intent of the legislature to conduct a feasibility study for developing a resource data tool that will easily connect Washingtonians to the services they may need and that will ensure the services are provided in an efficient, cost-effective manner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department shall conduct a feasibility study regarding a resource data tool for the purpose of digitally connecting members of the public to state services. The feasibility study must be conducted in collaboration with the advisory group created in section 3 of this act.

(2) The feasibility study shall include recommendations for a mobile application for the purpose of assisting users in accessing state and private resources and services.

(3) Among other relevant topics, the feasibility study shall examine what other digital public resources exist to prevent potential redundancy of programs and to promote administrative efficiency. The feasibility study shall also consider language access, alternative communications options, and equitable access for individuals living with disabilities or limited access to internet services.

(4) The feasibility study shall be submitted, in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. (1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department shall convene an advisory group to participate in the decision-making process regarding the feasibility study established by this act. The advisory group shall be composed of representatives from state agencies and the community in the area of system referral and resource navigation, and individuals with lived experience receiving public benefits. At a minimum, the following organizations shall be invited to participate:

(a) Washington information network 211;

(b) The state 911 coordination office established in the emergency management division of the state military department;

(c) Representatives from the department of health and the health care authority involved in the statewide 988 behavioral health crisis response and suicide prevention line;

(d) WithinReach;

(e) Community living connections;

(f) First five fundamentals;

(g) Washington communities for children;

(h) Washington resource data collaborative;

(i) Help me grow; and

(j) Accountable communities of health.

The purpose of the advisory group created in this section is to inform and, upon a majority vote of the advisory group, approve and submit the feasibility study to the department, which shall include a plan and framework for launching the resource data tool, a web portal, and a mobile application. The advisory group created in this section is dissolved upon the expiration of this section.

(2) This section expires December 1, 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. Sections 1 through 3 of this act are each added to chapter 43.20A RCW.

--- END ---