BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

PART 1

GENERAL GOVERNMENT

Sec. 1001. 2023 c 474 s 1007 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2023-25 Energy Retrofits and Solar Power for Public Buildings (40000283)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($22,500,000))$14,500,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to local governments, public higher education institutions, school districts, tribal governments, and state agencies for improvements to facilities and related projects that result in energy and operational cost savings.

(a) At least 20 percent of each competitive grant round is designated for award to eligible projects in small cities or towns with a population of 5,000 or fewer residents.

(b) In each competitive round, a higher energy savings to investment ratio must result in a higher project ranking. Priority consideration must be given to applicants that have not received grant awards for this purpose in prior biennia.

(c) The department must determine a minimum match ratio to maximize the leverage of nonstate funds.

(2) $22,500,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to be awarded in competitive rounds to local governments, public higher education institutions, school districts, tribal governments, and state agencies for projects that involve the purchase and installation of solar energy systems, including solar modules and inverters, with a preference for products manufactured in Washington.

(a) At least 20 percent of each competitive grant round is designated for award to eligible projects in small cities or towns with a population of 5,000 or fewer residents.

(b) In each competitive round, a higher energy savings to investment ratio must result in a higher project ranking. Priority consideration must be given to applicants that have not received grant awards for this purpose in prior biennia.

(c) The department must determine a minimum match ratio to maximize the leverage of nonstate funds.

(3) $5,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the energy efficiency and environmental performance improvements to minor works, stand-alone, and emergency projects at facilities owned by agencies that repair or replace existing building systems and reduce greenhouse gas emissions from state operations, including, but not limited to, HVAC, lighting, insulation, windows, and other mechanical systems. Eligibility for this funding is dependent on an analysis using the office of financial management's life-cycle cost tool that compares project design alternatives for initial and long-term cost-effectiveness. Assuming a reasonable return on investment, the department shall provide grants in the amount required to improve the project's energy efficiency compared to the original project request.

(4) $4,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Washington state association of counties to provide funding for energy audits on county-owned tier 1 and tier 2 covered buildings and collect and manage data on the costs for counties to comply with the requirements of RCW 19.27A.210 and 19.27A.250.

(a) The Washington state association of counties may award grants to counties with qualifying buildings to assess current energy performance and determine the approximate costs of facility and system upgrades to meet state energy performance standards in chapter 19.27A RCW.

(b) The Washington state association of counties shall submit to the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than December 31, 2025, a report detailing the current energy performance of each county-owned tier 1 and tier 2 building for which an energy audit was completed with the funding provided in this subsection (4), and an estimate of the costs for bringing each building into compliance with the state energy performance standards in chapter 19.27 RCW.

(c) Up to 12 percent of the amount of the grants awarded in (a) of this subsection may be retained by the Washington state association of counties for administrative costs.

(5) $4,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the association of Washington cities to provide funding for energy audits on city-owned tier 1 and tier 2 covered buildings and collect and manage data on the costs for cities to comply with the requirements of RCW 19.27A.210 and 19.27A.250.

(a) The association of Washington cities may award grants to cities with qualifying buildings to assess current energy performance and determine the approximate costs of facility and system upgrades to meet state energy performance standards in chapter 19.27A RCW.

(b) The association of Washington cities shall submit to the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than December 31, 2025, a report detailing the current energy performance of each city-owned tier 1 and tier 2 building for which an energy audit was completed with the funding provided in this subsection (5), and an estimate of the costs for bringing each building into compliance with the state energy performance standards in chapter 19.27 RCW.

(c) Up to 12 percent of the amount of the grants awarded in (a) of this subsection may be retained by the association of Washington cities for administrative costs.

(6) The department shall develop metrics that indicate the performance of energy efficiency efforts.

(((5)))(7) If a grant is provided in subsection (1) or (3) of this section to purchase heating devices or systems, the agency must, whenever possible and most cost effective, select devices and systems that do not use fossil fuels.

(((6)))(8) Grants provided in subsections (1)((, (2), and (3)))through (5) of this section to state agencies are exempt from the match requirements in this section.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$50,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$200,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$250,000,000

Sec. 1002. 2023 c 474 s 1011 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Pacific Tower Capital Improvements (40000287)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($6,464,000))

$6,587,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$6,061,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($12,525,000))

$12,648,000

Sec. 1003. 2023 c 474 s 1013 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2023-25 Broadband Infrastructure Federal Match Projects (40000290)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) $50,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely as match for federal authority allocated under this section and section 7017 of this act for the statewide broadband office to administer the broadband equity, access, and deployment state grants program in section 60102 of P.L. 117-58 (infrastructure investment and jobs act). Expenditure of the amount in this subsection is contingent on the receipt of this grant funding.

(b) To the extent permitted by federal law, the office shall provide state match only for projects where the lead applicant is a public entity.

(c) The legislature intends to provide sufficient funds to match federal funds available during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium.

(2) In addition to scoring and weighting criteria established pursuant to the federal broadband equity, access, and deployment program, the state broadband office must establish additional secondary selection criteria, including, but not limited to, criteria that give weight to projects that:

(a) Provide open-access wholesale last-mile broadband service for the useful life of the subsidized networks on fair, equal, and neutral terms to all potential retail providers; and

(b) Demonstrate support from the local government or any tribal government with oversight over the location or locations to be served.

(3) The statewide broadband office must include, in the five-year action plan developed using initial planning funds from the broadband equity, access, and deployment program funded under P.L. 117-58 (infrastructure investment and jobs act):

(a) Consideration of broadband infrastructure projects that use wireless technology in order to expand access at the lowest cost to the most unserved or underserved residents; and

(b) Steps the office will take to promote: The use of existing infrastructure; dig-once policies; streamlined permitting processes; and cost-effective access to poles, conduits, easements, and rights-of-way. To the extent permitted under federal law, the office must consider creating a pool of grant funds dedicated to pole costs.

(4) $300,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation provided in this section is for a staff position dedicated to advising the statewide broadband office on the availability and feasibility of deploying new and emerging technologies in broadband internet service.
Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
(($150,000,000))

$245,560,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$50,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($200,000,000))

$295,560,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($150,000,000))

$1,132,194,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($350,000,000))

$1,427,754,000

Sec. 1004. 2023 c 474 s 1017 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2023-25 Clean Energy Fund Program (40000294)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) $500,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to convene a work group to:

(i) Analyze the financial investments required for owners of tier 1 covered buildings to comply with the state energy performance standard under RCW 19.27A.210; and

(ii) Make recommendations to the legislature to assist building owners in attaining compliance, which must include, but are not limited to:

(A) Identifying energy efficiency investments or other strategies and related timelines for increasing energy efficiency in the buildings sector;

(B) Providing a cost-benefit analysis of options, including energy efficiency, to meet the goal of reducing greenhouse gas emissions from the buildings sector; and

(C) Recommendations to balance financial investments while maximizing clean energy benefits for the state, including statutory changes that may be necessary for this purpose.

(b) The work group membership convened under this section must include, but is not limited to: One representative of the office of the superintendent of public instruction; one representative of a K-12 maintenance and operation administrators association; one representative of each of the state's public four-year institutions of higher education; one representative of the state board for community and technical colleges; one representative of the department of social and health services; one representative of the department of corrections; one representative of the department of enterprise services; one representative of a health care organization; one representative from a local government; one representative from an organization representing privately owned tier 1 covered buildings; one representative from a business specializing in performance contracting for energy services; one representative from a nonprofit specializing in clean energy; and two representatives of a national association for industrial and office parks.

(c) The department must submit to the appropriate committees of the legislature:

(i) Analysis of financial investments as required by this section by December 15, 2023; and

(ii) A final report with recommendations as required by this section by September 1, 2024.

(2) Except as provided in subsections (1) and (13) of this section, the appropriation in this section is provided solely for competitive grants to eligible entities for predevelopment, design, and construction of projects that provide a public benefit through research, development, demonstration, or deployment of clean energy technologies that save energy and reduce energy costs, reduce harmful air emissions, or increase energy independence for the state. Priority must be given to projects that benefit vulnerable populations and overburdened communities, including tribes.

(3) Entities eligible for grant funding under this section include local governments, federally recognized tribal governments and tribes' contracted service providers, public and private utilities that serve retail customers in the state, for-profit entities, research institutions, nonprofit organizations, and state agencies.

(4) To be eligible, a project must be consistent with the state energy strategy adopted under chapter 43.21F RCW and policies under chapter 19.405 RCW. To the extent practicable, the department must prioritize projects that build upon Washington's strengths in aerospace, maritime, information and communications technology, grid modernization, advanced materials, and decarbonizing the built environment.

(5) The department must invite stakeholders to participate in the design and implementation of grant programs funded under this section. The department must consider equity and environmental justice when developing the program structure and opportunities for applicant participation.

(6) When soliciting and evaluating proposals, awarding contracts, and monitoring projects under this section, the department must:

(a) Ensure that competitive processes, rather than sole source contracting processes, are used to select all projects, except as otherwise noted in this section;

(b) Ensure that a public benefit results from the use of public funds through due diligence and monitoring of contracted projects, including ensuring compliance with all applicable laws related to the project selection process, project monitoring, and contracting; and

(c) Prioritize projects for funding that leverage the greatest amount of matching funds, such as local levy funding.

(7)(a) The department must require project applicants to:

(i) Disclose all sources of public funding invested in a project; and

(ii) Identify by name any former or current state of Washington employees employed by the applicant or its governing body in the 24 months preceding the application submittal. The identification must include the person's separation date and job title or position held. If the department determines that a conflict of interest or other violation of chapter 42.52 RCW exists, the application must be disqualified from further consideration.

(b) If, after a grant has been awarded, the department finds that a grantee has violated chapter 42.52 RCW, either in procuring or performing under the grant, the department in its sole discretion may terminate the grant funding by written notice. If the grant is terminated, the department must reserve its right to pursue all available remedies under law to address the violation.

(8) The department must specify the requirements in subsections (6) and (7) of this section in funding contracts entered into by the department under this section.

(9) $10,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to tribes for clean energy development projects. Eligible uses of grant funding include planning, predesign, design, construction, project predevelopment, and deployment of clean energy projects that contribute to achieving the state's greenhouse gas emissions reduction goals and related policies. The department must collaborate with tribes in the design and development of this grant program.

(10) $10,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for state match for federal funding that aligns with subsection (2) of this section and accelerates meeting state clean energy and climate goals. Funding may be used to match federal grants to the state or nonstate entities for clean energy research, development, and demonstration projects.

(11) (($12,000,000))(a) $10,500,000 of the appropriation in the section is provided solely for grants for strategic research, development, and demonstration of new and emerging clean energy generation and storage technologies and climate change mitigation technologies, including greenhouse gas removal. Grants awarded under this subsection must reduce reliance on fossil fuels, reduce risk of irregularities in power supply, offer opportunities for economic and job growth, and strengthen technology supply chains. Grant funds are intended to catalyze diverse new technologies that change production, use, storage, and transportation of energy. The department may provide funding to projects at various stages of readiness, including early-stage research, pilot and demonstration projects, and dual use projects that produce clean energy and additional benefits.

(b) $1,500,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely to support proof-of-concept development of biogenic carbon dioxide electrolysis, a chemical technology process that utilizes water, electricity, and biogenic CO2 as inputs, and produces carbon monoxide as an output to be utilized for the production or manufacture of sustainable aviation fuel.

(12) $20,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants for electrical grid integration and innovation projects. To be eligible, a project must develop and demonstrate distributed energy resources, as defined in RCW 19.405.020, and nonwire alternatives that advance community resilience, support implementation of demand response and sustainable microgrids, improve integration of renewable energy and energy storage, and accelerate beneficial load integration and demand management for building electrification, equipment electrification, and electric vehicle charging.

(13) $7,500,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely to support regional energy analytics capability at Pacific Northwest national laboratory.

(14) The department must strive to allocate all of the amounts appropriated in this section within the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium in the manner prescribed in each subsection. However, no sooner than January 1, 2024, if upon review of applications the department determines there are not adequate suitable projects in a category, the department may reallocate funding among the purposes of subsections (9) through (12) of this section. Beginning January 1, 2024, the department must provide quarterly notice of any funding reallocations to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$60,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$240,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$300,000,000

Sec. 1005. 2023 c 474 s 1020 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2023-25 Housing Trust Fund (40000295)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($163,663,000))$188,816,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation ((is))and $364,000 of the capital community assistance account—state appropriation are provided solely for the new construction, acquisition, or rehabilitation of affordable housing projects that serve and benefit low-income and special needs populations including, but not limited to, people with chronic mental illness or behavioral health conditions, farmworkers, people who are homeless, and people in need of permanent supportive housing. The department shall strive to invest at least 20 percent of the appropriation provided under this subsection with by and for organizations, as defined by the office of equity.

(2) (($25,000,000))$36,500,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation ((is))and $8,500,000 of the Washington housing trust account—state appropriation are provided solely for affordable housing projects that serve and benefit low-income people with developmental or intellectual disabilities. The department must use a separate application form and evaluation criteria for applications under this subsection. The department must coordinate with the department of social and health services regarding any needed supportive services and make efforts to enact the recommendations of the housing needs study for individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities, as provided in section 1068(6), chapter 332, Laws of 2021.

(3) $100,000,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the apple health and homes rapid permanent supportive housing program created in chapter 216, Laws of 2022. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $5,000,000 is provided solely for the St. Agnes Haven project in Spokane.

(4) (($40,000,000))$60,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for awards to organizations eligible under RCW 43.185A.040 for the development of homeownership projects affordable to first-time low-income households throughout the state. Projects serving homebuyers whose income is up to 80 percent of the area median income, adjusted for household size, for the county where the property is located are eligible to apply, except that projects located in rural areas of the state, as defined by the department, serving homebuyers whose income is up to 100 percent of the area median income, adjusted for household size, for the county where the property is located are eligible to apply. Eligible activities include, but are not limited to, down payment assistance, closing costs, acquisition, rehabilitation costs, and new construction. Eligible organizations may include those that plan to provide housing to socially disadvantaged communities as defined in 13 C.F.R. Sec. 124.103. The department shall strive to invest at least 50 percent of these funds with by and for organizations, as defined by the office of equity, and make efforts to enact the recommendations of the homeownership disparities work group created in section 128(100), chapter 297, Laws of 2022.

(5) $25,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for affordable housing preservation projects, which may include, but are not limited to:

(a) Projects preserving and extending the affordability commitment period for projects in the housing trust fund portfolio. The funds may be provided for major building improvements, preservation, and system replacements, necessary for the existing housing trust fund portfolio to maintain long-term viability. The department must require a capital needs assessment be provided prior to contract execution. Funds may not be used to add or expand the capacity of the property. When allocating funds, the department must prioritize buildings that are older than 15 years and that serve very low-income and extremely low-income populations.

(b) Projects preserving affordable multifamily housing at risk of losing its affordability due to expiration of use restrictions that otherwise require affordability including, but not limited to, United States department of agriculture funded multifamily housing. The department must prioritize projects that satisfy the goal of long-term preservation of Washington's affordable multifamily housing stock, particularly in rural areas of the state. Funds may be used for acquisition or for acquisition and rehabilitation of properties to preserve the affordable housing units beyond their existing use restrictions and keep them in Washington's housing portfolio for a minimum of 40 years. If a capital needs assessment is required, the department must work with the applicant to ensure that this does not create an unnecessary impediment to rapidly accessing these funds.

(c) The funding provided under this subsection (5) is not subject to the 90-day application periods in RCW 43.185.070 or 43.185A.050.

(d) The amount awarded under this subsection (5) may not be calculated in award limitations for other housing trust fund awards.

(6) (($4,000,000))$16,000,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for a grant to the northwest cooperative development center to provide subgrants for the acquisition and preservation of mobile or manufactured home communities. Funding provided under this subsection may be used to acquire mobile or manufactured home communities for the purpose of avoiding household displacement due to sale or other transactions and ensuring preservation of housing affordability for low-income households for a minimum of 40 years.

(7) (($2,000,000))$5,000,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for a grant to the northwest cooperative development center to provide subgrants to organizations that are "mobile home park cooperatives" or "manufactured housing cooperatives" under RCW 59.20.030 for completing capital improvement processes. Subgrants provided under this subsection may be used solely for critical improvements, repairs, and infrastructure upgrades to promote the preservation of mobile or manufactured home communities as affordable housing. The grantee must award subgrants based on needs relating to health, safety, and cost.

(8) (($40,337,000))$57,937,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation ((is))and $3,536,000 of the capital community assistance account—state appropriation are provided solely for the following list of projects:

African Diaspora Cultural Anchor Village (SeaTac). . . .$4,000,000

Cedar House. . . .$112,000

Generations Place Workforce Housing. . . .$1,600,000

Gravelly Lake Commons at LASA (Lakewood). . . .$500,000

Habitat for Humanity. . . .$6,000,000

KCR Mills Crossing Affordable Housing. . . .$2,000,000

((Kenmore Supportive Housing (Kenmore). . . .$1,000,000))

Leavenworth Affordable Workforce Rental Housing

(Leavenworth). . . .(($1,000,000))$2,300,000

Lewis County Homeless Shelter (Chehalis). . . .$2,500,000

Lincoln District Family Housing (Tacoma). . . .$5,050,000

Mary's Place Shelter Replacement (Burien). . . .$6,000,000

Mount Zion Housing (Seattle). . . .$1,000,000

Multicultural Village Design (Kent). . . .$550,000

New Hope Family Housing (Seattle). . . .$325,000

Open Doors for Multicultural Families. . . .$5,000,000

Peninsula Community Health Housing (Bremerton). . . .$412,000

Raymond Manor Low-Income Senior Housing. . . .$1,500,000

Redmond Supportive Housing. . . .$3,200,000

Saint Vincent de Paul Phase 1. . . .$1,000,000

Shiloh Baptist Church New Life Housing (Tacoma). . . .$1,000,000

Skyway Affordable Housing (Skyway). . . .$3,000,000

Tacoma/Pierce County Habitat Affordable Housing

(Pierce County). . . .$14,000,000

The House of Bethlehem. . . .$424,000

(9) $10,000,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for site improvements, acquisition, construction, and installation of transitional tiny homes or similar housing. Awards may be made for noncode compliant structures and may be exempted from the 40-year affordability requirement under RCW 43.185A.060.

(10) In evaluating projects in this section, the department must give preference for applications based on some or all of the criteria in RCW 43.185.070(5).

(((10)))(11) The department shall strive to allocate at least 30 percent of the funds provided in this section to projects located in rural areas of the state, as defined by the department.

(((11)))(12) The department must strive to allocate all of the amounts appropriated in this section within the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium in the manner prescribed in each subsection. However, if upon review of applications the department determines there are not adequate suitable projects in a category, the department may allocate funds to other affordable housing projects serving other low-income and special needs populations, provided those projects are located in an area with an identified need for the type of housing proposed.

(13)(a) During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, any unallocated funds provided in subsection (1) of this section may be used for rapid capital housing acquisition projects that provide an affordable housing and encampment resolution, serving and benefiting low-income and special needs populations.

(b) Rapid capital proposals must be from eligible organizations, as defined in RCW 43.185A.040, to acquire, renovate, and prepare real property for rapid conversion into enhanced emergency shelters, permanent supportive housing, transitional housing, permanent housing, or shelter for extremely low-income people, as well as individuals, families, unaccompanied youth, and young people experiencing sheltered and unsheltered homelessness. Acquisitions completed with temporary financing are eligible for funding provided in this section. The department may only approve funding for projects that result in increased shelter or housing capacity. The funding provided under this subsection is not subject to the 60-day application period in RCW 43.185A.150.
Appropriation:

Capital Community Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$3,900,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($65,000,000))

$85,000,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
(($335,000,000))

$414,253,000

Washington Housing Trust Account—State
. . . .
$8,500,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($400,000,000))

$511,653,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($1,600,000,000))

$1,960,612,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($2,000,000,000))

$2,472,265,000

Sec. 1006. 2023 c 474 s 1021 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2023-25 Connecting Housing to Infrastructure (CHIP) (40000296)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants or deferred loans to local governments, affordable housing project sponsors, and public utility districts or their contracted service providers for system development charges and utility improvements for mobile home park cooperatives and new affordable housing projects that serve and benefit low-income households. Local governments and public utility districts or their contracted service providers may also use funds to reimburse waived system development charges and impact fees for mobile home park cooperatives and new affordable housing projects that serve and benefit low-income households. Where applicable, the extension must be consistent with the approved comprehensive plans under the growth management act and must be within the established boundaries of the urban growth area.

(2) $37,202,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants or deferred loans to ((local governments or public utilities))applicants located within a jurisdiction that impose a sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.530(1) (a)(ii) or (b)(i)(B), 82.14.540, or 84.52.105.

(3) $20,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to ((local governments or public utilities))applicants located within:

(a) A city or county with a population of 150,000 or less; and

(b) A jurisdiction that imposed a sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.530(1) (a)(ii) or (b)(i)(B).

(4) $798,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Habitat for Humanity Infrastructure Project in Kennewick and Walla Walla.

(5) $2,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Aviva Crossing Sanitary Sewer Upgrades Project (Tacoma).

(6) To be eligible for funding under this section, an applicant must demonstrate, at minimum:

(a) That ((affordable housing development))construction will begin ((construction)) within 24 months of the grant or loan award; and

(b) A strong probability of serving the original target group or income level for a period of at least 25 years.

(7) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply.

(a) "Affordable housing" has the same meaning as in RCW 43.185A.010.

(b) "Low-income household" has the same meaning as in RCW 43.185A.010.

(c) "Mobile home park cooperative" has the same meaning as in RCW 59.20.030.

(d) "System development charges" means charges for new drinking water, wastewater, or stormwater connections when a local government or public utility has waived standard fees normally applied to developers for connection charges on affordable housing projects.

(((d)))(e) "Utility improvements" means drinking water, wastewater, or stormwater utility improvements.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$60,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$240,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$300,000,000

Sec. 1007. 2023 c 474 s 1022 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Transit Oriented Housing Development Partnership Match (40000298)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are provided solely as match to private investment for grants or loans to for-profit and nonprofit housing developers and public entities to carry out projects designed to increase the supply and affordability of transit-oriented housing development. ((Grants))Awards from this appropriation may only be used for the construction of units affordable at 80 percent of area median income or lower, if a project includes a range of affordability levels. The department shall work with the department of transportation to develop and administer a competitive grant or loan program to assist in the financing of housing projects within rapid transit corridors. The department shall implement the program pursuant to the following eligibility criteria and definitions:

(1) Entities eligible to receive ((grant)) awards are state agencies, local governments, and nonprofit or for-profit housing developers. Eligible uses of ((grant)) awards include project capital costs and infrastructure costs and addressing gaps in project financing that would prevent ongoing or complete project construction.

(2) Eligible housing projects must meet the following requirements:

(a) Be within a rapid transit corridor. For purposes of this subsection (2), "rapid transit corridor" includes either one-half mile from light rail or commuter rail, or one-quarter mile from bus rapid transit or other high-capacity bus service area.

(b) Produce at least ((100))80 units of housing; and

(c) Include a covenant on the property requiring at least 10 percent of total housing units in the project remain affordable for households with incomes at or below 60 percent of area median income and at least 10 percent of total housing units in the project remain affordable for households with incomes at or below 80 percent of area median income for at least 99 years.

(3) The department must prioritize eligible projects by occupancy date, with a target occupancy date of December 31, 2025, or sooner.

(4) To source project requests, the department may first review the list of housing trust fund applications from the prior two years to determine if any projects not fully funded would meet the criteria listed in subsection (2) of this section and would be able to proceed to construction. If so, the department must conduct outreach to those project owners to discuss the ((grant)) program before soliciting new projects.

(5) The department must also consider the following criteria when prioritizing all projects:

(a) Are comprised of the largest number of affordable units;

(b) Have the largest total number of units affordable to households with incomes at or below 60 percent area median income;

(c) Include land acquired at a reduced price or without cost;

(d) Abide by any applicable antidisplacement measures;

(e) Include units with additional bedrooms or intended for occupancy by families with multiple dependents; or

(f) Have acquired all necessary permits.

(6) The department may adopt any necessary guidance or rules to implement the competitive grant or loan program under this section, including any additional project eligibility criteria and prioritization criteria.

(7) The department must report a program update and any projects awarded on their website by June 30, 2024. The report must include project award data at the time of award, such as, but not limited to, the awardee, total project cost, amount of the award, number of households being served by household income, project location, and any other relevant information.

(8) The department must strive to allocate the amounts appropriated in this section by September 30, 2024, in the manner prescribed in this section. However, if upon review of applications the department determines there are not adequate suitable projects to receive awards, the department may allocate state funding to other affordable housing projects serving other low-income and special needs populations.

(9) Of the amounts appropriated in this section, $2,100,000 from the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation and $2,100,000 from the general fund—private/local appropriation are provided solely for the Redmond Supportive Housing project.
Appropriation:

General Fund—Private/Local
. . . .
$25,000,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$25,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$50,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$200,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$250,000,000

Sec. 1008. 2023 c 474 s 1023 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2023-25 Behavioral Health Community Capacity Grants (40000299)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to issue grants to community hospitals or other community providers to expand and establish new capacity for behavioral health services in communities. The department must consult an advisory group consisting of representatives from the department of social and health services, the health care authority, one representative from a managed care organization, one representative from an accountable care organization, and one representative from the association of county human services. Amounts provided in this section may be used for construction and equipment costs associated with establishment or preservation of the facilities. The department may approve funding for the acquisition of a facility if the project will result in increased behavioral health capacity. Amounts provided in this section may not be used for operating costs associated with the treatment of patients using these services.

(2) In awarding funding for projects in subsection (5) of this section, the department must establish criteria for the issuance of the grants, which must include:

(a) Evidence that the application was developed in collaboration with one or more regional behavioral health entities that administer the purchasing of services;

(b) Evidence that the applicant has assessed and would meet gaps in geographical availability of behavioral health services in their region;

(c) Evidence that the applicant is able to meet applicable licensing and certification requirements in the facility that will be used to provide services;

(d) A commitment by applicants to serve persons who are publicly funded and persons detained for involuntary commitment under chapter 71.05 RCW;

(e) A commitment by the applicant to maintain and operate the beds or facility for a time period commensurate to the state investment, but for at least a 10-year period;

(f) The date upon which structural modifications or construction would begin and the anticipated date of completion of the project;

(g) A detailed estimate of the costs associated with opening the beds;

(h) A financial plan demonstrating the applicant's ability to maintain and operate the facility; and

(i) The applicant's commitment to work with local courts and prosecutors to ensure that prosecutors and courts in the area served by the hospital or facility will be available to conduct involuntary commitment hearings and proceedings under chapter 71.05 RCW.

(3) In awarding funding for projects in subsection (5) of this section, the department, in consultation with the advisory group established in subsection (1) of this section, must strive for geographic distribution and to allocate funding based on population and service needs of an area. The department must consider current services available, anticipated services available based on projects underway, and the service delivery needs of an area.

(4) The department must prioritize projects that increase capacity in unserved and underserved areas of the state.

(5)(a) (($28,443,000))$29,443,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for competitive community behavioral health grants to address regional needs. Applicants must provide confirmation that the health care authority, department of social and health services, or a managed care organization plans to contract with the facility sufficient to cover the facility's operating costs. The department must give priority to facilities that:

(i) Serve individuals on 90-day or 180-day civil commitments as an alternative to treatment in the state hospitals;

(ii) Serve individuals who will be transitioned from or diverted from the state hospitals;

(iii) Provide secure withdrawal management and stabilization treatment beds; or

(iv) Provide substance use disorder treatment.

(b) In awarding this funding to projects under (a)(i) of this subsection (5), the department must coordinate with the department of social and health services, the health care authority, and the department of health and must only select facilities that meet the following conditions:

(i) The funding must be used to increase capacity related to serving individuals who will be transitioned from or diverted from the state hospitals;

(ii) The facility is not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(iii) The provider has submitted a proposal for operating the facility to the health care authority;

(iv) The provider has demonstrated to the department of health and the health care authority that it is able to meet the applicable licensing and certification requirements for the facility that will be used to provide services; and

(v) The health care authority has confirmed that it intends to contract with the facility for operating costs within funds provided in the operating budget for these purposes.

(c) $24,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to intensive behavioral health treatment facilities for long-term placement of behavioral health patients with complex needs and that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases.

(d) $18,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to community providers to increase behavioral health services and capacity for children and minor youth including, but not limited to, services for youth crisis walk-in intervention, substance use disorder treatment, sexual assault and traumatic stress, anxiety, or depression, children with behavioral health and intellectual or developmental disability needs, and interventions for children exhibiting aggressive or depressive behaviors in facilities that are not subject to federal funding restrictions. Consideration must be given to programs that incorporate outreach and treatment for youth dealing with behavioral health or social isolation issues.

(e) $4,250,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to community providers to increase opioid treatment program services and access.

(6) The amounts provided in this subsection are subject to the criteria in subsection (1) of this section, except the projects are not required to establish new capacity:

(a) $7,500,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to community providers to prevent the closure of existing behavioral health facilities. For purposes of this subsection (6)(a), the department must implement necessary procedures to enable rapid commitment of funds on a first-come, first-served basis to qualifying project proposals that satisfy the goal of long-term preservation of behavioral health facilities.

(b) (($133,057,000))$136,047,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Aristo Healthcare Services (Renton). . . .$2,000,000

Center for Alcohol & Drug Treatment New Facility

(Wenatchee). . . .$19,600,000

Columbia River Mental Health Services Clinic. . . .$600,000

Compass Health Broadway Behavioral Health

Services (Everett). . . .$18,700,000

CRMHS Satellite Building Project (Vancouver). . . .$2,500,000

Evergreen Treatment Services (Seattle). . . .$6,000,000

Ituha Stabilization Facility Bed Increase. . . .$90,000

Jamestown S'Klallam Behavior Health Center

(Sequim). . . .$13,000,000

Lummi Nation Substance Abuse Treatment

(Bellingham). . . .$8,147,000

Lynnwood Community Recovery Center (Lynnwood). . . .$2,750,000

Nisqually Tribe Healing Village (Olympia). . . .$12,000,000

Recovery Innovations Crisis Stabilization (Federal

Way). . . .$1,900,000

SeaMar Youth Crisis Center (Seattle). . . .$480,000

SHC Medical Center - Astria/Toppenish Hospital

(Toppenish). . . .$2,500,000

SIHB Thunderbird Treatment Center (Vashon). . . .$1,030,000

Skagit County Crisis Stabilization Center (SCCSC)

(Sedro-Woolley). . . .$12,700,000

Spokane Treatment and Recovery Service (Spokane). . . .$4,000,000

Substance Use Disorder & Mental Health Inpatient

Treatment (Yakima). . . .$11,750,000

Three Rivers Behavioral Health Center (Kennewick). . . .(($5,000,000))

$6,500,000

Whatcom 23-Hour Crisis Relief Center (Bellingham). . . .$9,000,000

Yakima Drop-in Center. . . .$800,000

(7) The department shall notify all applicants that they may be required to have a construction review performed by the department of health.

(8) To accommodate the emergent need for behavioral health services, the department and the department of health, in collaboration with the health care authority and the department of social and health services, must establish a concurrent and expedited process to assist grant applicants in meeting any applicable regulatory requirements necessary to operate inpatient psychiatric beds, freestanding evaluation and treatment facilities, enhanced services facilities, triage facilities, crisis stabilization facilities, or secure detoxification/secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities.

(9) The department must strive to allocate all of the amounts provided in this section in the manner prescribed in each subsection. However, if upon review of applications, the department determines, in consultation with the advisory group established in subsection (1) of this section, that there are not adequate suitable projects in a category, the department may allocate funding to other project categories listed in this section, prioritizing projects that support serving individuals who will be transitioned from or diverted from the state hospitals. Underserved areas of the state may also be considered.

(10) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department must include provisions that require that the grantee or successor hold the capital improvements for at least a 10-year period. The provisions must require the facility to be used for behavioral health services, but may allow the facility to change ownership or facility type during the commitment period. The department shall monitor the activities of recipients of grants under this program to determine compliance with the terms and conditions set forth in its contract.

(11) The department must provide a progress report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by September 1, 2024. The report must include:

(a) The total number of applications and amount of funding requested;

(b) A list and description of the projects approved for funding including state funding, total project cost, services anticipated to be provided, bed capacity, and anticipated completion date;

(c) A statewide map of new capacity since 2018, including projected bed capacity and opening dates;

(d) A status report of projects that received funding in prior funding rounds, including details about the project completion and the date the facility began providing services; and

(e) Recommendations for statutory language that would codify the grant program on an ongoing basis including:

(i) Evaluation and prioritization criteria;

(ii) Monitoring and compliance requirements;

(iii) Preconstruction and technical assistance services; and

(iv) Data needed to determine the service needs by area of the state.

(12) The department must coordinate with the health care authority to submit capital budget requests to fund behavioral health community capacity grants for the 2025-2027 biennial budget by the due date established by the office of financial management. Associated state budget operating costs must also be identified and requested.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($211,000,000))

$219,240,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($844,000,000))

$865,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($1,055,000,000))

$1,084,240,000

Sec. 1009. 2023 c 474 s 1024 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2023-25 Early Learning Facilities Fund Grant Program (40000300)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($5,000,000))$7,350,000 of the Ruth Lecocq Kagi early learning facilities development account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for minor renovation grants.

(2) (($42,050,000))$46,550,000 of the Ruth Lecocq Kagi early learning facilities development account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for the early learning facility grant and loan program, subject to the provisions of RCW 43.31.573 through 43.31.583 and 43.84.092, to provide state assistance for designing, constructing, purchasing, expanding, or modernizing public or private early learning education facilities for eligible organizations. Up to four percent of the funding in this subsection may be used by the department of children, youth, and families to provide technical assistance to early learning providers interested in applying for the early learning facility grant or loan program.

(3) The department of children, youth, and families must develop methodology to identify, at the school district boundary level, the geographic locations of where early childhood education and assistance program slots are needed to meet the entitlement specified in RCW 43.216.556. This methodology must be linked to the caseload forecast produced by the caseload forecast council and must include estimates of the number of slots needed at each school district. This methodology must inform any early learning facilities needs assessment conducted by the department and the department of children, youth, and families. This methodology must be included as part of the budget submittal documentation required by RCW 43.88.030.

(4) When prioritizing areas with the highest unmet need for early childhood education and assistance program slots, the committee of early learning experts convened by the department pursuant to RCW 43.31.581 must first consider those areas at risk of not meeting the entitlement specified in RCW 43.216.556.

(5) The department must track the number of slots being renovated separately from the number of slots being constructed and, within these categories, must track the number of slots separately by program for the working connections child care program and the early childhood education and assistance program.

(6) When prioritizing applications for projects pursuant to RCW 43.31.581, the department must award priority points to applications from a rural county or from extreme child care deserts, as defined by the department of children, youth, and families, and to applications submitted under subsection (1) of this section for facilities at risk of closure due to compliance with state licensure requirements.

(7) For early learning facilities collocated with affordable or supportive housing developments, the department may remit state funding on a reimbursement basis for 100 percent of eligible project costs, regardless of the project's match amount, once the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed in an amount sufficient to complete the entire project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public as an early learning facility. These projects are not subject to section 8015 of this act or RCW 43.88.150.

(8) It is the intent of the legislature to reappropriate funding in the 2023-2025 omnibus capital appropriations act for early learning facilities appropriated in this section.

(9) (($17,600,000))$18,250,000 of the Ruth Lecocq Kagi early learning facilities development account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of early learning facility projects:

Cora Whitley Family Center (Tacoma). . . .(($2,500,000))$3,000,000

Eastside Early Childhood Center (Bellevue). . . .$1,100,000

Marysville Early Learning Center. . . .$150,000

New Tomorrow's Hope Child Development Center

(Everett). . . .$1,000,000

Northgate Jose Marti Early Learning Center

(Seattle). . . .$1,000,000

Rainier Valley Early Learning Center (Seattle). . . .$6,000,000

Skyway Affordable Housing and Early Learning

Center (Seattle). . . .$3,000,000

YMCA Early Learning Center (Port Angeles). . . .$2,000,000

Young Child & Family Center, North Thurston PS

(Olympia). . . .$1,000,000

(10) $350,000 of the Ruth Lecocq Kagi early learning facilities development account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for the early learning facilities capital readiness pilot program. The department, in partnership with the department of children, youth, and families, shall administer the program as part of the early learning facilities program. The early learning facilities capital readiness pilot program must support no more than 10 licensed early learning providers that will serve children through working connections child care or through the early childhood education and assistance program to study the feasibility of expanding, remodeling, purchasing, or constructing early learning facilities and classrooms. Participants must receive small grants and project support to conduct capital feasibility studies that cover financing, architectural design, construction, business operations, and other relevant topics. Participants must also have access to professional consultation related to financing, architectural design, construction, and business operations.
Appropriation:

Ruth Lecocq Kagi Early Learning Facilities

Development Account—State
. . . .
(($65,000,000))

$72,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($260,000,000))

$287,400,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($325,000,000))

$359,900,000

Sec. 1010. 2023 c 474 s 1025 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2024 Local and Community Projects (40000301)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department shall not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of 10 years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high performance building standards under chapter 39.35D RCW.

(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only and may not be advanced under any circumstances.

(5) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department shall include provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.

(7) The department must comply with the requirements set forth in executive order 21-02 and must consult with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes on the potential effects of these projects on cultural resources and historic properties. Consultation with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes must be initiated before project funds are made available.

(8) The state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:

57th Ave Sewer Project (University Place). . . .$200,000

ACT Historic Landmark Roof Restoration (Seattle). . . .$539,000

ADA For Northwest Center Janitorial (Spokane

Valley). . . .$20,000

Admiral Theatre Facility Improvements (Bremerton). . . .$165,000

Affordable Housing Land Acquisition (Tacoma). . . .$1,500,000

Afterschool Program Expansion (Walla Walla). . . .$45,000

Agricultural Innovation Center (Pasco). . . .$200,000

Airlift Northwest Hangar (East Wenatchee). . . .$500,000

Airway Heights Public Safety (Airway Heights). . . .$1,340,000

Algona Wetland Preserve Interpretive Trail

(Algona). . . .$600,000

American Indian Community Center (Spokane). . . .$1,000,000

American Legion Post 79 Roof Replacement

(Snoqualmie). . . .$49,000

Anderson Island Multipurpose Building (Anderson

Island). . . .$258,000

Angleside Reservoir Capacity Upgrades (Shelton). . . .$1,850,000

Arlington Commercial Kitchen (Arlington). . . .$581,000

ARTE NOIR Capital Construction Completion

(Seattle). . . .$381,000

Asbestos Abatement Old City Hall (Benton City). . . .$309,000

Ashley House (Spokane). . . .$515,000

Ashley House (Tacoma). . . .$500,000

Asia Pacific Cultural Center (Tacoma). . . .$2,000,000

ASUW Shell House (Seattle). . . .$3,000,000

Athletic Field Lights For Ridgefield Outdoor

(Ridgefield). . . .$250,000

Auburn Avenue Theater Rebuild (Auburn). . . .$1,545,000

Avista Stadium Improvements (((Spokane Valley))). . . .$543,000

B5 Community Learning Center (Kennewick). . . .$773,000

Ball Field at Historic Petes (Enumclaw). . . .$439,000

Ballard Boys & Girls Clubs Flooring Replacement

(Seattle). . . .$49,000

Behavioral Health Wellbeing Clinic (Spokane). . . .$1,571,000

Bonney Lake Senior Center Rehab Project (Bonney

Lake). . . .$650,000

Boys & Girls Club Parking Lot Renovation (Federal

Way). . . .$168,000

Boys & Girls Club Seismic Upgrade & Roof

Replacement (Vancouver). . . .$412,000

Brewster Boys and Girls Club Facility (Brewster). . . .$300,000

Bridge Meadows Pre-Development (Tacoma). . . .$515,000

Bringing It Home II 24-Hour Domestic Violence

Shelter (Yakima). . . .$125,000

Browse Infrastructure (Seattle). . . .$144,000

Camp Thunderbird Wastewater Treatment Facility

(Olympia). . . .$618,000

Cannery Parking Lot & Sidewalk Rehab (Anacortes). . . .$110,000

Capitol Land Trust Public Access Preconstruction

(Olympia). . . .$77,000

Cathlamet Waterfront Park (Cathlamet). . . .$86,000

Cedarwood Community Recreation Ctr Redevelopment

(Lake Stevens). . . .$1,123,000

Celebration Park Synthetic Turf Upgrade (Federal

Way). . . .$822,000

Center Senior Living Housing Development (Grand

Coulee). . . .$361,000

Central Colville Apartments (Colville). . . .$52,000

Central Whidbey Fire & Rescue Station 53

(Coupeville). . . .$2,750,000

Centralia Quad Infield Turf Project (Centralia). . . .$2,480,000

Chehalis River Raw Water (Chehalis). . . .$250,000

Chelan Butte Acquisition Feasibility Study

(Chelan). . . .$125,000

Children's Therapy Center (University Place). . . .$500,000

Chinese Reconciliation Project Design (Tacoma). . . .$1,000,000

City Hall Structural Assessment (Toledo). . . .$53,000

City of Longview Mint Valley Golf Course

Irrigation Replacement (Longview). . . .$2,000,000

City of Othello Lions Park (Othello). . . .$600,000

City of Selah Wastewater Treatment Plant

Improvements (Selah). . . .$1,442,000

City of Sequim Park Acquisition (Sequim). . . .$375,000

Clallam Joint Public Safety Facility (Port

Angeles). . . .$5,750,000

Cloney Inclusive Playground (Longview). . . .$1,000,000

Colfax Community Center (Colfax). . . .$72,000

Colfax Pool (Colfax). . . .$1,030,000

Columbia Grove Community Playground (East

Wenatchee). . . .$72,000

Columbia Play Project Children's Museum

(Vancouver). . . .$515,000

Commercial Pumpouts to Save Puget Sound

(Anacortes). . . .$800,000

Communications Devices for Officials (Olympia). . . .$15,000

Community Center at Lake Chelan (Chelan). . . .$1,723,000

Community Center Roof Replacement (Aberdeen). . . .$165,000

Community Homes Renovations 41st LD (Bellevue). . . .$106,000

Community Homes Renovations 45th LD (Woodinville). . . .$77,000

Community Homes Renovations 48th LD (Bellevue). . . .$243,000

Community Homes Upgrades 1st LD (Bothell). . . .$104,000

Conconully Service Complex/Fire Hall (Conconully). . . .$2,050,000

Coupeville Food Bank & Workforce Housing

Apartments (Coupeville). . . .$230,000

Cross Kirkland Corridor 132nd Avenue NE

Improvements (Kirkland). . . .$515,000

Day Island Bridge Design Project (University

Place). . . .$200,000

Des Moines Marina Steps (Des Moines). . . .$1,000,000

deWilde Rugby Fields (Ferndale). . . .$150,000

Diking District 7 Fish Passage and Levee

(Stanwood). . . .$1,900,000

Dishman Hills Conservancy Education Ctr Site

Planning (Spokane). . . .$46,000

Double Culvert Replacement (Castle Rock). . . .$2,000,000

Downtown Pasco North Plaza (Pasco). . . .$155,000

Eagle Track Raceway Stadium Light Project

(Republic). . . .$117,000

East Hill North Community Park Phase 1 (Kent). . . .$1,000,000

Eaton Urban Pathway Project (Battle Ground). . . .$1,000,000

Ebey Waterfront Trail Phase 4 (Marysville). . . .$1,030,000

Edmonds Boys & Girls Clubs Capital Project

(Edmonds). . . .$1,385,000

Edmonds Center for the Arts Design (Edmonds). . . .$200,000

Ejidos Community Farm (Everson). . . .$824,000

El Centro de la Raza Federal Way Campus (Federal

Way). . . .$1,545,000

Electron Way & Contra Costa Ave Intersection

Improvemt (Fircrest). . . .$153,000

Ellensburg Rodeo Grandstands (Ellensburg). . . .$1,030,000

Emergency Operation Generator (Coupeville). . . .$386,000

Emergency Shelter Capital Improvements (Shelton). . . .$103,000

Enumclaw Community Center (Enumclaw). . . .$500,000

Evans Creek Relocation Project (Redmond). . . .$1,030,000

EWAM Handicap Parking Improvement Project

(Pomeroy). . . .$98,000

Fair Building Improvements (Graham). . . .$77,000

Fall City Business District Septic Project (Fall

City). . . .$1,550,000

Family Resource Center at Cedar Crossing (Seattle). . . .$360,000

Felts Field Gateway Improvement (Spokane). . . .$515,000

Ferndale Civic and Community Organization Campus

(Ferndale). . . .$3,050,000

Ferry County Fairgrounds (Republic). . . .$50,000

Fife Aquatic & Community Center Improvements

(Fife). . . .$1,500,000

Fire Panel Replacement & Integration (Seattle). . . .$294,000

FISH Food Bank Expansion (Ellensburg). . . .$573,000

Foothills Trail Crossing at Main Street (Buckley). . . .$128,000

Forest Park Pickleball Court Installation

(Everett). . . .$345,000

Free Clinic & Central Construction Project (Walla

Walla). . . .$515,000

Frontier Park Horse Cover (Graham). . . .$1,388,000

Ft Steilacoom Park Nisqually Indian Tribe

Improvements (Lakewood). . . .$309,000

Gibson Hall Improvement Project (Issaquah). . . .$206,000

Glen Tana (Spokane). . . .$3,000,000

Golden Tiger Multi-Use Trail Phase 2 (Republic). . . .$168,000

Goldendale Municipal Airport - Land Acquisition

(Goldendale). . . .$361,000

Greater Wenatchee Irrigation Dist Infrastructure

(East Wenatchee). . . .$2,000,000

Greenwood Early Learning Playground (Seattle). . . .$69,000

Greg Cuoio Park Accessibility Improvements (Lacey). . . .$515,000

Harbour Point Boulevard Pathway (Mukilteo). . . .$258,000

Harlequin Theater Renovation (Olympia). . . .$700,000

Heritage Center at Meeker Mansion (Puyallup). . . .$496,000

Heritage Heights Remodel and Conversion to Medical

Care (Chelan). . . .$824,000

High Prairie Fire District 14 Emergency

Preparedness (Lyle). . . .$248,000

Highland Park Improvement Club Rebuild (Seattle). . . .$500,000

Historic Lamar Cabin Preservation (Prescott). . . .$267,000

HUB Sports Fields (Liberty Lake). . . .$1,030,000

ICOM 911 Microwave Radio Broadband System (Oak

Harbor). . . .$500,000

Indian American Community Services Community

Center (Kent). . . .$794,000

Interurban Trail War Memorials (Pacific). . . .$400,000

Issaquah Senior Ctr Veterans Memorial Consolidated

Prk (Issaquah). . . .$721,000

Japanese American Exclusion Memorial Vis Ctr

(Bainbridge Island). . . .$350,000

Jarstad Aquatic Center Assessment & Roof Repair

(Bremerton). . . .$309,000

Jenkins Creek Recreation Trail (Covington). . . .$250,000

Kalama Creek Hatchery Renovation (Olympia). . . .$3,350,000

KCFD #50 Generator (Baring). . . .$20,000

Kelso School District-Construction & Renovation

Projects (Kelso). . . .$165,000

Kelso Train Station Roof Replacement (Kelso). . . .$575,000

Kennewick Kiwanis Playground (Kennewick). . . .$258,000

King County Sheriff's Office Air Support Unit

(Seattle). . . .$1,000,000

King Street Station Creative Youth Empowerment Hub

(Seattle). . . .$500,000

Kirkland Boys & Girls Clubs Community Playfield

(Kirkland). . . .$150,000

Kirkland Performance Center Safety Improvements

(Kirkland). . . .$1,288,000

Kitsap Humane Society Veterinary Lifesaving Center

(Silverdale). . . .$412,000

Klineline Bridge and ADA Improvements (Vancouver). . . .$1,365,000

Kulshan View (Mount Vernon). . . .$309,000

Lacamas Lake Water Improvements (Camas). . . .$515,000

Lake Boren CrossTown Recreational Trail

(Newcastle). . . .$824,000

Lake Chelan Food Bank Building Remodel & Addition

(Chelan). . . .$2,000,000

Lake Hills Clubhouse Renovation (Bellevue). . . .$583,000

Lake Wilderness Arboretum Improvements (Maple

Valley). . . .$450,000

Lakebay Marina (Lakebay). . . .$300,000

Lambert House Flood Abatement & Foundation

Replacement (Seattle). . . .$1,030,000

Larson Playfield Irrigation Conversion (Moses

Lake). . . .$258,000

Latah Water System Rehabilitation Project (Latah). . . .$180,000

Latino Community Service Center (Lynnwood ). . . .$515,000

Lester Creek Personnel to Water Intake (Pe Ell). . . .$640,000

Lewis County Senior Centers (Chehalis). . . .$500,000

Lincoln County Fair and Livestock (Davenport). . . .$1,000,000

Local Grain Conveyance & Storage System (Tumwater). . . .$255,000

Logistics Facility (Vancouver). . . .$874,000

Lynden Senior and Community Center (Lynden). . . .$309,000

Lynnwood Neighborhood Center (Lynnwood). . . .$2,050,000

Lyon Creek Culvert at SR 104 (Lake Forest Park). . . .$1,820,000

Madison Street School Sidewalk Project (South

Bend). . . .$175,000

Manson Fire Station - Training Room and Living

Quarters (Manson). . . .$206,000

Marine Spills Operations Base (Friday Harbor). . . .$210,000

Marshall Park Inclusive Community Playground

(Vancouver). . . .$685,000

Mason County Jail Expansion (Shelton). . . .$1,030,000

Mason PUD 1 Vuecrest Water System Storage Project

(Union). . . .$618,000

Mason PUD Water Infrastructure (Matlock). . . .$1,000,000

Masonic Building Roof Renovation (Centralia). . . .$170,000

Mays Pond Playground (Bothell). . . .$650,000

Medical Lake Storm Water Mitigation (Medical Lake). . . .$1,000,000

Medically-Tailored Meals & Groceries Expansion

(Seattle). . . .$1,175,000

Memorial Stadium (Seattle). . . .$4,000,000

Menastash Grange Revitalization and Expansion

(Ellensburg). . . .$85,000

Mental Health Quiet Room (Moses Lake). . . .$31,000

Mill Creek City Hall North Renovation (Mill Creek). . . .$515,000

Mill Creek Multiuse Recreational Property (Mill

Creek). . . .$1,030,000

MLK Jr. Resource & Technology Center (Pasco). . . .$250,000

MLK Jr.Park & Swimming Pool (Yakima). . . .$1,160,000

Modernization of Pacific County Jail Facility

(South Bend). . . .$464,000

Monroe Therapeutic Facility (Monroe). . . .$1,100,000

Montesano Economic Development (Montesano). . . .$700,000

Mt. Spokane Ski & Snowboard Park (Mead). . . .$100,000

Mukilteo First Responder Wellness Center

(Mukilteo). . . .$258,000

Muslim American Youth Foundation Center (Burien). . . .$500,000

National Nordic Museum East Garden Capital Project

(Seattle). . . .$258,000

Nespelem Community Longhouse (Nespelem). . . .$1,850,000

New Beginnings Homes (Puyallup). . . .$440,000

No. County Rec. Association Youth Sports (Castle

Rock). . . .$256,000

Nooksack Community Housing (Deming). . . .$470,000

North Fork Skykomish River 911 Extension Project

(Index). . . .$420,000

North Seattle Boys & Girls Clubs Flooring

Replacement (Seattle). . . .$134,000

NW Stream Center Sustainable Infrastructure

(Everett). . . .$273,000

Oak Harbor Boys & Girls Club Sports Court (Oak

Harbor). . . .$250,000

Oak Harbor Economic Development (Oak Harbor). . . .$621,000

ODT Land Purchase (Port Townsend). . . .$750,000

Old Fort Lake Subarea Remediation & Public Access

Proj (DuPont). . . .$215,000

Othello's Regional Water Plan (Othello). . . .$412,000

Parkland School (Parkland). . . .$500,000

Pasado's Safe Haven Water and Safety Upgrades

(Monroe). . . .$485,000

Pasco Boulevard Soccer Field (Pasco). . . .$750,000

Pasco Clubhouse Safety Modernization (Pasco). . . .$840,000

Peninsula Medical Respite & Housing Center

(Bremerton). . . .$1,000,000

Peninsula Senior Activity (Ocean Park). . . .$272,000

PenMet Parks Community Recreation Center (Gig

Harbor). . . .$1,030,000

Perfect Passage (Tonasket). . . .$730,000

Pierce County Food Hub (Bonney Lake). . . .$300,000

Pike Place Market Elevator & Stair Replacement

(Seattle). . . .$515,000

Plaza Retreat Space (Vashon). . . .$544,000

Pond to Pines Infrastructure (Ellensburg). . . .$518,000

Port Gamble Shoreline Restoration (Port Gamble). . . .$2,400,000

Port of Allyn Public Pier Replacement (Allyn). . . .$515,000

Port of Anacortes T-Dock Reconfiguration

(Anacortes). . . .$1,000,000

Port of Mattawa Event Center Phase 3 Upgrade

Project (Mattawa). . . .$361,000

Port of Skamania Cascades Business Park (North

Bonneville). . . .$1,000,000

Port of Willapa Harbor (South Bend). . . .$800,000

Port Orchard Breakwater Replacement (Port Orchard). . . .$1,000,000

Port Remediation (Olympia). . . .$2,200,000

Portland Avenue Park Sprayground (Tacoma). . . .$500,000

Poulsbo Historical Society - Nilsen-Sonju House

(Poulsbo). . . .$300,000

Prosser City Entrance Sign (Prosser). . . .$110,000

Public Works Facility & Vehicle Storage (Sedro

Woolley). . . .$500,000

Puyallup Elks Roof Replacement (Puyallup). . . .$370,000

Rainier Court Phase V (Seattle). . . .$750,000

Raze Development Capital Project (Spokane). . . .$500,000

Redondo Fishing Pier Replacement Phase 1 (Des

Moines). . . .$1,000,000

Refugee Welcoming & Healing Center (SeaTac). . . .$515,000

Regional Athletic Complex Transformer Upgrade

(Olympia). . . .$103,000

Regional Water & Sewer Upgrades (((Rochester)))

Mason County. . . .$250,000

Rejuvenation Community Day Center (Bremerton). . . .$200,000

Remembrance Gallery (Puyallup). . . .$257,000

Renovation and Addition to RP Theater Building

(Richland). . . .$350,000

Renton Public Square (Renton). . . .$1,485,000

Republic Community Library (Republic). . . .$183,000

Reservoir Capacity & Seismic (Battle Ground). . . .$1,288,000

Ritzville Legion Hall Renovation (Ritzville). . . .$165,000

Ritzville Rodeo Bleachers Replacement (Ritzville). . . .$194,000

Ritzville Theater (Ritzville). . . .$75,000

Rock Creek Horse Park (Ravensdale). . . .$206,000

Roslyn Old City Hall Community Center (Roslyn). . . .$77,000

Rotary Boys & Girls Clubs HVAC Replacement

(Seattle). . . .$309,000

Rotary Morrow Community Park (Poulsbo). . . .$100,000

Roy Water Preliminary Design (Roy). . . .$250,000

Sail Sand Point (Seattle). . . .$258,000

Sam Chastain Trail (Renton). . . .$500,000

School Based Health Care Facility (Tacoma). . . .$515,000

Scott Hill Park & Sports Complex of Woodland

(Woodland). . . .$350,000

Scriber Place Housing for Homeless Students

(Lynnwood). . . .$2,050,000

Search & Rescue Headquarters Feasibility Study

(Snoqualmie). . . .$103,000

Seattle Aquarium (Seattle). . . .$3,000,000

Seattle Public Library Holds Pick-Up Locker

(Seattle). . . .$93,000

Seattle Public Theater Accessibility Upgrades

(Seattle). . . .$77,000

Security & Access Improvements (Shelton). . . .$250,000

Sentinel Gap Community Park (Mattawa). . . .$1,000,000

Sewer Pump Station 12 & Force Main (Bellevue). . . .$1,030,000

Shelton Day Care & Building Project (Shelton). . . .$215,000

Short's Farm Purchase (Chimacum). . . .$1,000,000

Skagit PUD 10th District Waterlines (Skagit). . . .$650,000

Skagit PUD 39th District Waterline Relocations

(Mt. Vernon). . . .$600,000

Skagit PUD Headquarters Public Meeting Room (Mt.

Vernon). . . .$206,000

Slavonian Hall (Tacoma). . . .$472,000

Snohomish Boys & Girls Club Teen Center

(Snohomish). . . .$412,000

Snohomish Public Safety & City Services Campus

(Snohomish). . . .$700,000

Snoqualmie Indian Tribe Consultation

(Snoqualmie). . . .$150,000

Snoqualmie Valley Youth Center Barn with Storage

(North Bend). . . .$232,000

South Seattle Community Food Hub (Seattle). . . .$499,000

South Thurston Fire & EMS New Fire Station

(Tenino). . . .$3,050,000

South UGA Water and Sewer Extensions (Kennewick). . . .$1,122,000

South Whidbey Aquatic Wellness Center (Langley). . . .$360,000

Southwest Boys & Girls Clubs Safety & Security

Improve (Seattle). . . .$3,000

SPARC Capital Campaign (Mount Vernon). . . .$750,000

Spokane Civic Theatre Facility (Spokane). . . .$1,500,000

Spokane International Airport (Spokane). . . .$1,000,000

Spokane Scale House Market (Spokane Valley). . . .$750,000

Spring Box Replacement/Water (Concrete). . . .$450,000

St. Mary Medical Center (Walla Walla). . . .$75,000

Stanwood Art Center Design (Stanwood). . . .$327,000

Stonerose Fossil Center (Republic). . . .$721,000

Storm Upgrades Downtown Phase N2 (Puyallup). . . .$696,000

Sue Bird and Lenny Wilkens Statues (Seattle). . . .$412,000

Sultan Basin Park (Sultan). . . .$500,000

Sumas Ave Water Pipe Replacement (Sumas). . . .$150,000

SW WA Agricultural Business (Tenino). . . .$1,250,000

Swede Hall Renovation Project (Rochester). . . .$198,000

Take-A-Break Park Playground (Maple Valley). . . .$412,000

Tam O'Shanter Multi-Purpose Court Fencing and

Lighting (Kelso). . . .$46,000

Taproot Theatre Jewell Mainstage Renovation

(Seattle). . . .$515,000

Tasveer Art Center (Bellevue). . . .$258,000

Tenino Stone Carvers Guild Workshop and Classroom

(Tenino). . . .$160,000

Terminal 4 Expansion & Redevelopment Project

(Aberdeen). . . .$3,500,000

Thun Field - Emergency Response and Meeting Space

(Puyallup). . . .$1,000,000

Town of Elmer City Fire Station Improvements

(Elmer City). . . .$537,000

Town of Index Water Line Repair and Replacement

(Index). . . .$628,000

Township Hall North & West (Spokane). . . .$100,000

Tribal Cultural Center & Museum Restoration

(Steilacoom). . . .$200,000

Tugboat Parthia Pavilion Construction (Olympia). . . .$148,000

Tukwila Community Center HVAC Replacement

(Tukwila). . . .$515,000

Tukwila Immigrant & Refugee Wadajir Land

Acquisition (Tukwila). . . .$2,250,000

Tulalip Creek Hatchery (Marysville). . . .$1,000,000

United Way Elevator and Disability Access (Tacoma). . . .$129,000

Van Zandt Community Hall Renovation (Deming). . . .$502,000

Veterans Memorial Balfour Park (Spokane Valley). . . .$207,000

VFW Post 2224 Critical Renovations (Puyallup). . . .$206,000

Village Theatre's Francis J Gaudette HVAC

Replacement (Issaquah). . . .$489,000

Wallace Heights Septic Elimination Program

(Vancouver). . . .$500,000

Washougal Civic Campus Project (Washougal). . . .$2,000,000

Washtucna Town Hall (Washtucna). . . .$20,000

Wastewater Lift Stations (Concrete). . . .$450,000

Wastewater Treatment Facility & Loss Project

(Carbonado). . . .$500,000

Wastewater Treatment System Upgrades (Long Beach). . . .$340,000

Waterfront Organic Soil Removal (Washougal). . . .$2,000,000

Weld Seattle Reentry Resource Center (Seattle). . . .$5,000,000

Wenatchee Valley Museum Expansion and Redesign

(Wenatchee). . . .$1,000,000

Wenatchee Valley YMCA (Wenatchee). . . .$1,030,000

West Biddle Lake Dam Restoration (Vancouver). . . .$412,000

Whatcom Ag Research Station (Lynden). . . .$764,000

What-Comm Dispatch Center (Bellingham). . . .$1,000,000

White Bluffs Rail/Rail Replacement (Richland). . . .$1,250,000

White Center Community Hub (Seattle). . . .$1,000,000

White Center Food Bank Renovation (Seattle). . . .$275,000

Wilkeson Infrastructure (Wilkeson). . . .$824,000

Windermere Park Playground (Longview). . . .$155,000

WRF Upgrades Solid Side (Yelm). . . .$442,000

Yakama Nation "Creator Law Sculpture" (Roslyn). . . .$99,000

Yakima Co Fire Emergency Responder Radio System

(Yakima). . . .$139,000

Yakima County Fire District 12 Wildfire Response

(Yakima). . . .$38,000

Yakima County Meals on Wheels (Union Gap). . . .$1,000,000

Yakima Trolley Museum (Yakima). . . .$25,000

Youth Assist Program Skills Training Center

(Tacoma). . . .$500,000

Youth Emergency Shelter (Longview). . . .$250,000

Zillah Park Renovation (Zillah). . . .$300,000

(9) The model toxics control capital account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Port of Vancouver Dock Demo and Removal of Creosote project in Vancouver.
Appropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$3,500,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$228,343,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$231,843,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$912,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,143,843,000

Sec. 1011. 2023 c 474 s 1028 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2023-25 Community Relief (40000556)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: (($1,000,000))$200,000 of the state taxable building construction account—appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to contract with the communities of concern commission for development of a list of community-led capital projects that serve underserved communities. Eligible expenses include costs incurred by the communities of concern commission in conducting outreach, developing an application process, providing technical assistance, assisting project proponents with project readiness, and assisting the department with identifying barriers faced in accessing capital grant programs. The communities of concern commission must provide a report to the house capital budget committee and the senate ways and means committee that describes the transparency of their process to develop the list and how the (($1,000,000))$200,000 was spent by December 1, 2023. The department may submit a list of identified projects prepared by the communities of concern commission to the governor and fiscal committees of the legislature for consideration for funding in the 2024 supplemental capital budget.
Appropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
(($1,000,000))

$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$4,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($5,000,000))

$4,200,000

Sec. 1012. 2023 c 474 s 1032 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2023-25 Defense Community Compatibility Projects (40000572)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:

City of Lakewood, McChord North Clear Zone

(Lakewood). . . .$900,000

Compatible Lands Foundation, Fairchild REPI

Easement Acquisition (Spokane). . . .$2,500,000

Crescent Elementary (Oak Harbor). . . .$13,600,000

Lakewood Water District, Water Well (K-3, G-4)

(Lakewood). . . .(($1,860,000))$3,720,000

Oak Harbor Early Learning Center (Oak Harbor). . . .$13,900,000

Quincy Square Civic Improvements (Bremerton). . . .$1,750,000

Whidbey Camano Land Trust, Keystone Preserve

(Greenbank). . . .$1,300,000
Appropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$1,860,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$35,810,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$37,670,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($48,800,000))

$56,240,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($84,610,000))

$93,910,000

Sec. 1013. 2023 c 474 s 1034 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Reducing Emissions in Hard-to-Decarbonize Sectors Program (40000577)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) ((The))Except as otherwise provided in this section, the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to administer a grant program for greenhouse gas emissions reduction strategies for hard to decarbonize sectors, including industry, aviation, and maritime.

(2) Grant awards may be used only to achieve near-term greenhouse gas emissions reductions in eligible sectors beyond what would have been achieved under business as usual. The grant program must prioritize projects that improve compliance with state greenhouse gas reduction policies including, but not limited to, the cap and invest program, the clean fuel standard, and the hydrofluorocarbon phasedown. Projects may include efficiency and process improvements. Awards per applicant may not exceed 15 percent of available funding. The department may require that applicants provide nonstate matching funds.

(3) Up to $250,000 of the appropriation in this section is for the department to provide facilitation and consultation to eligible facilities to help them identify, plan, and implement near-term strategies to achieve reductions in the facility's greenhouse gas emissions. The department may also consult with eligible facilities to develop a long-term strategy for industrial decarbonization and emissions reduction.

(4) Up to $324,000 of the appropriation provided in this section is for the department to develop a process, in consultation with Washington department of transportation, to select projects to advance the research, development, or manufacturing of sustainable aviation.

(5) $4,800,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the kaiser aluminum boiler replacement project, which replaces two existing 1943 vintage steam boilers with two new boilers. When fully deployed, the project will reduce approximately 13,000 metric tons per year in carbon dioxide equivalent emissions. The kaiser aluminum boiler replacement project must provide a one-to-one match with state funds. It is the intent of the legislature that if the appropriation in this subsection is not spent by June 30, 2027, the funding provided in this subsection will lapse and will not be reappropriated.

(6) Up to 5 percent of the appropriation in this section is for the department to administer the reducing emissions in hard-to-decarbonize sectors program, including, but not limited to, providing technical assistance, managing contracts, reporting, and providing assistance in the planning and implementation process.

(((6)))(7) A minimum of 40 percent of the appropriation must be spent for projects that benefit vulnerable populations in overburdened communities as defined in RCW 70A.65.010.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
(($20,000,000))

$49,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($80,000,000))

$178,400,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($100,000,000))

$227,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1014. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Crisis Stabilization Facility-Trueblood Phase 3 (40000601)
Appropriation:

Capital Community Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1015. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Communities of Concern (40000603)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department shall not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design or land acquisition costs.

(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of 10 years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high performance building standards under chapter 39.35D RCW.

(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only and may not be advanced under any circumstances.

(5) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department shall include provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.

(7) The department must comply with the requirements set forth in executive order 21-02 and must consult with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes on the potential effects of these projects on cultural resources and historic properties. Consultation with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes must be initiated before project funds are made available.

(8) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Addis Village. . . .$795,000

FHPM Childcare Project. . . .$200,000

FHPM Kitsap Way Village. . . .$200,000

Monterey Lofts Renovation - Phase 2. . . .$987,000

Nuwe Reis Village at Barker Creek. . . .$2,953,000

Rainier Valley Homeownership Initiative. . . .$500,000

Seattle Indian Services Commission. . . .$300,000

Seattle Tibetan Community Center. . . .$432,000
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,367,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$25,468,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$31,835,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1016. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Green Jobs and Infrastructure Grants (40000604)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section takes effect January 1, 2025, and is provided solely for grants to eligible entities that help mitigate and reverse the effects of climate change, help communities meet their energy and climate change regulatory requirements, bring increased federal and private investment to the state, help develop the advanced workforce of the future, and ensure Washington state maintains or grows its position as a world leader in developing the projects and processes that are used to fight climate change globally. Eligible activities under this section include, but are not limited to, planning predevelopment, design, engineering, and construction of clean technology projects.

(2) Entities eligible for grants under this section include, but are not limited to, local governments, federally recognized tribal governments and tribes' contracted service providers, public and private utilities, ports, associate development organizations, for-profit entities, academic and research institutions, nonprofit organizations, and state agencies.

(3) Projects eligible for funding must be physically located in Washington state. Eligible projects must be consistent with the state energy strategy adopted under chapter 43.21F RCW and clean energy policies under chapter 19.405 RCW. Projects must further the goals of the climate commitment act as described in RCW 70A.65.260(1)(j).

(4) The department must consider equity and environmental justice when developing the program structures and opportunities for applicant participation and must follow principles established in its community engagement plan adopted under RCW 70A.02.050.

(5) Except for match funds allocated in subsection (7) of this section, when soliciting and evaluating grant application proposals, awarding contracts, and monitoring projects under this section, the department must:

(a) Use competitive processes to select all projects, except as otherwise noted in this section. The department must design a competitive process to allow provision of grant award to projects in a timely manner and consistent with the project timeline. Applications must be accepted on a rolling basis, and final determination must be made by the department;

(b) Ensure compliance with all applicable laws related to the project selection process, project monitoring, and contracting; and

(c) Prioritize projects that leverage the greatest amount of matching funds, such as local levy funding or private investment in advanced manufacturing capability.

(6) Project applicants must disclose all sources of public funding invested in a project. Grant contracts must provide that if, after a grant has been awarded, the department finds that a grantee has violated chapter 42.52 RCW, either in procuring or performing under the grant, the department in its sole discretion may terminate the grant funding by written notice, and that, if the grant is terminated, the department will reserve its right to pursue all available remedies under law to address the violation.

(7) $20,000,000 of the appropriation in this section takes effect January 1, 2025, and is provided solely for grants to projects that demonstrate high-wage, clean job creation in Washington, provide risk reduction for investments in public and private infrastructure to enhance industrial lands in order to increase a community's capacity for clean manufacturing, or provide investments in workforce development to attract and train the workforce required to grow the clean energy economy.

(8) $4,000,000 of the appropriation in this section takes effect January 1, 2025, and is provided solely for the department to support access to and to flexibly administer the program. The department may use these funds to hire full-time equivalent positions within the department, as well as contract for additional capacity and subject matter expertise.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$24,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$96,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$120,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1017. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Clean Energy Community Grants (40000606)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $42,388,000 of the appropriation in this section takes effect January 1, 2025, and is provided solely for the department to administer noncompetitive grants to nonprofit organizations, local governments, federally recognized tribal governments and tribal entities, state agencies, housing authorities, ports, transit agencies, research organizations, and eligible third-party administrators for planning, design, and implementation of capital projects and clean energy technologies that reduce greenhouse gas emissions in vulnerable, overburdened, and tribal communities identified by the department. The department must prioritize grants providing meaningful benefit to vulnerable populations in overburdened communities as defined under RCW 70A.02.010.

(2) Eligible uses of grant funds include, but are not limited to, planning for sustainable communities and predesign work, energy efficiency improvements, renewable energy generation, increasing the supply of affordable, energy efficient housing, developing resilient and sustainable infrastructure systems, zero-emission, active mobility, and micromobility transportation infrastructure, education and engagement, and workforce development.

(3) Up to five percent of the appropriation in subsection (1) of this section is for the department to administer the grant program. Administration includes, but is not limited to, identifying eligible communities and third-party administrators, providing technical assistance, managing contracts, reporting, and providing planning and implementation assistance.

(4) $7,612,000 of the appropriation in this section takes effect January 1, 2025, and is provided solely as state match for the Lummi Indian business council energy projects.

(5) For the purposes of this section, "eligible third-party administrators" means entities that have sufficient expertise and relationships within the identified community to help plan for, design, or implement capital projects that reduce greenhouse gases or develop clean energy resources for the community.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$50,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$200,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$250,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1018. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

BEAD Broadband Equity and Affordability Grants (40000613)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the statewide broadband office to administer the broadband equity, access, and deployment state grants program in section 60304 of P.L. 117-58 (infrastructure investment and jobs act). Expenditure of the amount in this subsection is contingent on the receipt of this grant funding.
Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1019. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2025 Local and Community Projects (40000614)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department shall not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of 10 years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high performance building standards under chapter 39.35D RCW.

(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only and may not be advanced under any circumstances.

(5) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department shall include provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.

(7) The department must comply with the requirements set forth in executive order 21-02 and must consult with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes on the potential effects of these projects on cultural resources and historic properties. Consultation with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes must be initiated before project funds are made available.

(8) $31,517,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:

192nd & Hemlock Public Engagement and Design Program. . . .$129,000

Adams County Evidence Processing & Public Safety

Improvements. . . .$1,000,000

African Business Innovation Center. . . .$25,000

Aquatic Center At Martin Luther King Jr. Park. . . .$75,000

Auburn Downtown Plaza Design/Development. . . .$258,000

Battle Ground Health Care Clinic. . . .$400,000

Benaroya Hall Street Front Poster Boxes. . . .$200,000

Buddhist Temple Arson Restoration. . . .$225,000

Chamber of Commerce Historical Archive. . . .$38,000

Chimacum Grange Hall Roofing Replacement. . . .$26,000

Chinese American Legacy Artwork Project. . . .$25,000

City of Arlington Jenson Park Improvements. . . .$150,000

City of Lacey Regional Public Safety Training Center. . . .$50,000

City of Mill Creek Veteran's Monument Expansion &

Memorial. . . .$258,000

City of Sequim Park Acquisition. . . .$171,000

Columbia Grange #87 Safety Improvements. . . .$25,000

Commercial Platform Lift. . . .$17,000

Cougar Mountain Zoo Indoor Educational Exhibit Space. . . .$206,000

Crescent Grange Hall Urgent Roof Repairs. . . .$103,000

Davenport Senior Center Capital Improvement. . . .$120,000

Des Moines Marina Electrification & Shoreside Passeng. . . .$100,000

DV Shelter and Advocacy Center HVAC Upgrade. . . .$100,000

Eatonville Community Track & Field Restrooms. . . .$300,000

Edmonds BGC Capital Project. . . .$300,000

Elevator Purchase and Installation. . . .$274,000

Ellensburg Community Fieldhouse. . . .$72,000

Emergency Communications Radio Microwave. . . .$60,000

Energy Efficiency Upgrades Robert Morris Lodge. . . .$39,000

Engineering and Surveying of Essential Fire Recovery. . . .$300,000

Eritrean Community Center Expansion. . . .$100,000

Everest Park Facilities Update. . . .$300,000

FareStart Job Training & Social Enterprise Capital

Improvements. . . .$300,000

Fire Station 41 Headquarters. . . .$300,000

Firefighting PPE Decontamination CO2 Demonstration

Project. . . .$100,000

Foss Waterway Seaport Esplanade Connector. . . .$100,000

Gage Academy of Art South Lake Union Building. . . .$100,000

Garfield Super Block. . . .$1,500,000

Goldsborough Switching Station 1st Phase. . . .$50,000

Goodwill Land Acquisition for Redevelopment. . . .$3,000,000

Green Waste Recycling at Point Roberts. . . .$94,000

Idylwood Beach Park Accessibility Improvements. . . .$215,000

Inclusive Playground at Cirque Park. . . .$150,000

Intergenerational Community and Expanded Aquatic

Center. . . .$206,000

Japanese American Exclusion Visitor Center - I. . . .$300,000

Kenmore Public Works Operations Center Geothermal

System. . . .$300,000

La Center Wheel Club Community Center Remodel. . . .$250,000

Lake Sacajawea Irrigation Pump. . . .$200,000

Lakebay Marina Renovation and Historic Preservation. . . .$25,000

Lincoln Creek Grange #407. . . .$79,000

Little Saigon Landmark. . . .$100,000

Lopez Food Center. . . .$197,000

Main Street Phase II-A. . . .$42,000

Maple Valley Permanent Message Boards. . . .$200,000

Matlock Grange Safety & Structure Improvements. . . .$90,000

Medical Equipment Bank - Building. . . .$250,000

Mercer Island Boys & Girls Club Play Structure

Replacement. . . .$189,000

Municipal Services Campus Design & Infrastructure. . . .$100,000

New Facility for South Kitsap Helpline. . . .$125,000

NEYFS Creativity Project. . . .$93,000

Northaven Green Space Restoration. . . .$300,000

Northside Flood Reduction and Open Spaces. . . .$223,000

Olalla Recovery Centers Facility Improvements. . . .$125,000

Operation GROW - A Regional Processing Facility for WA. . . .$42,000

Oroville Grange Drainage Remediation. . . .$60,000

Othello Water Supply. . . .$400,000

Parkwood Community Club Repairs. . . .$25,000

Perry Tech for Clean Energy Jobs. . . .$5,000,000

Phase I - Downtown Redmond Childcare Expansion. . . .$85,000

Port of Benton Inland. . . .$240,000

Prosser Clubhouse. . . .$105,000

Providence Academy Elevator & Rehabilitation. . . .$103,000

Public Dock Emergency Repair. . . .$40,000

Rainier Beach Family Empowerment Center. . . .$100,000

Regional Sports Complex-Site Evaluation and

Pre-Design. . . .$300,000

Resurface and Revitalize Prescott Public Pool. . . .$95,000

Riverwalk Sports and Entertainment Facility. . . .$309,000

Rose Valley Grange Capital Improvement. . . .$40,000

Roza Drought Funding. . . .$200,000

Ruston Community Center Repairs & ADA Improvements. . . .$360,000

Seattle Storm Center. . . .$100,000

Sheffield Trail - Phase 2. . . .$100,000

Skagit PUD Olsen Creek Waterline Relocation. . . .$200,000

South Camano Grange #930. . . .$132,000

South End Community Center. . . .$200,000

South King Cultural Public Market. . . .$77,000

South Seattle Community Food Hub. . . .$135,000

Spokane CD Gray and Oregon Road Forest Fire Recovery. . . .$975,000

Spokane Scale House Market & Kitchen Phase 2. . . .$118,000

Spokane Valley Cross Country Course. . . .$150,000

Stanwood Police Station. . . .$100,000

Step by Step's Early Learning Center. . . .$150,000

Summit Park Sewer Upgrade Project. . . .$103,000

Sunnyside Beach Park Beach Nourishment Project. . . .$103,000

Sunnyside Safe Haven Baby Box. . . .$16,000

SVE Expansion Equipment & Furnishing. . . .$108,000

SW Youth & Family Services HVAC Replacement. . . .$165,000

Tekoa Parks and Recreation. . . .$200,000

Terrain Cultural Hub. . . .$207,000

Tristate Health Hospital. . . .$1,000,000

Tukwila Health & Wellness Center. . . .$25,000

Tumwater Mazama Pocket Gopher Habitat Acquisition and

Restoration. . . .$2,000,000

Underwood Drinking Water Tank. . . .$515,000

Vancouver Waterfront Gateway Event Plaza. . . .$197,000

W. Valley Centennial Middle School Field Fences &

Dugout. . . .$32,000

Waitsburg Childcare Center. . . .$100,000

Wallace Heights Septic Elimination. . . .$515,000

Washington Masonic Services Library & Museum Remodel. . . .$47,000

Water Treatment Facility Project. . . .$920,000

Water Valve-Pipeline, Intersection Replacement. . . .$103,000

West Echo Lake Public Engagement and Design Program. . . .$129,000

Western Ranchettes Water Distribution System. . . .$150,000

Yakima Trolley Carbarn Fire Suppression System. . . .$192,000

(9) $1,250,000 of the model toxics control stormwater account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following project:

Silver Bay Logging Property Acquisition (Seattle). . . .$1,250,000

(10) $3,786,000 of the model toxics control capital account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:

APCC Asbestos Abatement. . . .$286,000

Spokane County Gray and Oregon Road Fire Cleanup. . . .$3,500,000

(11)(a) $10,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects for capital improvements required to host the 2026 World Cup in Seattle:

University of Washington Practice Field. . . .$2,577,000

Seattle University Practice Field. . . .$1,017,000

Washington State Public Stadium Authority. . . .$6,406,000

(b) As a condition of receiving moneys, Seattle University must provide 1:1 matching funds for improvement of the practice field and make the practice field available as needed for the 2026 World Cup.

(12) $10,000,000 of the stadium and exhibition center capital improvement account—state appropriation is provided solely for the purpose of advancing funds, to the extent needed, to the Washington state public stadium authority for capital improvements required to host the 2026 FIFA World Cup. Loan and repayment terms must be in accordance with the provisions of section 8007 of this act.
Appropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$3,786,000

Model Toxics Control Stormwater Account—State
. . . .
$1,250,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$41,517,000

Stadium/Exhibition Ctr Cap Improve—State
. . . .
$10,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$56,553,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$186,212,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$242,765,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1020. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2023-25 Community Solar Resilience Hubs (40000620)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided in subsection (3), the appropriation in this section takes effect January 1, 2025, and is provided solely for grants to increase solar deployment and installation of battery storage in community buildings to enhance grid resiliency and provide backup power for critical needs, such as plug load and refrigeration for medication, during outages, or to provide incentives to support electric utility demand response programs that include customer-sited solar and battery storage systems. Eligible uses of the amounts provided in this section include, but are not limited to, planning and predevelopment work with vulnerable, highly impacted, and rural communities.

(2) For the purposes of this section "community buildings" means K-12 schools, community colleges, community centers, recreation centers, libraries, tribal buildings, state and local government buildings, and other publicly owned infrastructure.

(3) To the extent funding in this section is not allocated, and after January 1, 2025, the appropriation in this section may be used to leverage federal match dollars for other projects consistent with the state energy strategy and clean energy policies as provided in section 8008 of this act.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$38,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$152,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$190,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1021. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2023-25 Community Solar (40000621)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided in subsection (3), the appropriation in this section takes effect January 1, 2025, and is provided solely for a grant program to provide solar and battery storage community solar projects for public assistance organizations serving low-income communities. Eligible uses of the amounts provided in this section include, but are not limited to, planning and predevelopment work with vulnerable, highly impacted, and rural communities.

(a) Grants are not to exceed 100 percent of the cost of the project, taking into account any federal tax credits or other federal or nonfederal grants or incentives that the project is benefiting from.

(b) Priority must be given to projects sited on "preferred sites" such as rooftops, structures, existing impervious surfaces, landfills, brownfields, previously developed sites, irrigation canals and ponds, storm water collection ponds, industrial areas, dual-use solar projects that ensure ongoing agricultural operations, and other sites that do not displace critical habitat or productive farmland.

(2) For the purposes of this section "low-income" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 19.405.020 and "community solar project" means a solar energy system that: Has a direct current nameplate capacity that is greater than 12 kilowatts but no greater than 1,000 kilowatts; and has, at minimum, either two subscribers or one low-income service provider subscriber.

(3) To the extent funding in this section is not allocated, and after January 1, 2025, the appropriation in this section may be used to leverage federal match dollars for other projects consistent with the state energy strategy and clean energy policies as provided in section 8008 of this act.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$24,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$30,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1022. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2023-25 Community EV Charging (40000622)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, the appropriation in this section takes effect January 1, 2025, and is provided solely for the development of community electric vehicle charging infrastructure.

(2) Funding provided in this section must be used for projects that provide a benefit to the public through development, demonstration, and deployment of clean energy technologies that save energy and reduce energy costs, reduce harmful air emissions, or increase energy independence for the state.

(3) Projects that receive funding under this section must be implemented by, or include partners from, one or more of the following: Local governments, federally recognized tribal governments, or public and private electrical utilities that serve retail customers in the state.

(4) Grant funding must be used for level two or higher charging infrastructure and related costs including, but not limited to, construction and site improvements. Projects may include a robust public and private outreach plan that includes engaging with affected parties in conjunction with the new electric vehicle infrastructure.

(5) The department must prioritize funding for projects in the following order:

(a) Multifamily housing;

(b) Publicly available charging at any location;

(c) Schools and school districts;

(d) State and local government buildings and office buildings;

(e) All other eligible projects.

(6) The department must coordinate with other electrification programs, including projects developed by the department of transportation, to determine the most effective distribution of the systems. The department must also collaborate with the interagency electric vehicle coordinating council established in RCW 43.392.030 to implement this section and must work to meet benchmarks established in chapter 182, Laws of 2022.

(7) To the extent funding in this section is not allocated, and after January 1, 2025, the appropriation in this section may be used to leverage federal match dollars for other projects consistent with the state energy strategy and clean energy policies as provided in section 8008 of this act.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$105,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$420,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$525,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1023. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

BEAD Technical Assistance (40000628)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$2,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1024. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Energy Efficiency Revolving Loan Fund Capitalization Program (40000629)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely as expenditure authority for grant funding received by the department for the energy efficiency revolving loan fund capitalization program in section 40502 of P.L. 117-58 (infrastructure investment and jobs act). The department's expenditures under this section may not exceed the actual amount of grant funding awarded.
Appropriation:

Energy Efficiency Revolving Loan Capitalization

Account—State
. . . .
$1,869,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,869,000

Sec. 1025. 2023 c 474 s 1041 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Public Utilities Relocation (91002418)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the public works board to enter into a professional services contract for the purpose of estimating the cost to local governments and special purpose districts for relocating publicly owned utility infrastructure due to state-funded fish barrier removal projects associated with roads and highways. The public works board shall consult with the department of transportation, the Brian Abbott fish barrier removal board, the transportation improvement board, the county road administration board, the department of fish and wildlife, the interagency, multijurisdictional system improvement team established in RCW 43.155.150, the municipal research and services center, the department of commerce, and other agencies as necessary, to evaluate the financial impact to local governments and special purpose districts.

(2) The public works board shall report to the governor and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature by ((November))December 1, 2024, the results of the evaluation, including the estimated:

(a) Number of state and locally owned fish barriers remaining to be corrected;

(b) Number of fish barriers that may require relocation of publicly owned utilities; and

(c) Costs for relocation of publicly owned utilities due to removal of fish barriers along local or state roads and highways.
Appropriation:

Public Works Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$300,000

Sec. 1026. 2023 c 474 s 1035 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Local Emission Reduction Projects (91002184)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) ((The))Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the appropriations in this section are provided solely for the following list of projects:

C6 Forest to Farm Biochar Pilot Plant

(Leavenworth). . . .$1,425,000

Great Northern School District HVAC

Installation (Spokane). . . .$1,613,000

Hydrogen Storage & Fuel Cell for Peak Shaving

(Okanogan). . . .$1,648,000

Meydenbauer Center Energy Efficiency (Bellevue). . . .$6,000,000

Outdoor Fields LED Retrofit and Solar Installation

(Tukwila). . . .$500,000

Process Water Reuse Facility (Pasco). . . .$5,050,000

Small Faces Preschool HVAC Upgrades (Seattle). . . .$435,000

Waterfront Low Carbon District Energy System

(Bellingham). . . .$100,000

(2) $14,100,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation in this section takes effect January 1, 2025, and is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Nisqually Indian Tribe Microgrid System. . . .$8,600,000

Algae Carbon Sequestration and Regenerative Soils. . . .$2,500,000

HAPO Community Center. . . .$3,000,000

(3) The department may not expend funding for a project in this section unless and until the nonstate share of that project's costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(((3)))(4) Prior to receiving funding, grant recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of 10 years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to grants for preconstruction activities or grants in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(((4)))(5) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department must include provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the department finds the grantee to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
(($15,346,000))

$29,446,000

Natural Climate Solutions Account—State
. . . .
$1,425,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($16,771,000))

$30,871,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($0))

$123,484,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($16,771,000))

$154,355,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1027. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

HB 2131 - Thermal Energy Networks (91002447)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section takes effect January 1, 2025, and is provided solely for the implementation of House Bill No. 2131. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this section shall lapse.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$5,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1028. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Multifamily Bldg Efficiency Grants (91002449)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $55,000,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation in this section takes effect January 1, 2025, and is provided solely for the department to issue grants to affordable multifamily projects within the housing trust fund portfolio to decarbonize and transition from the direct use of fossil fuels.

(2) Grants may include, but are not limited to: Conducting benchmarking, technical assistance, energy management, operations and maintenance planning, deep retrofits, energy efficiency upgrades and greenhouse gas emission reductions, renewable energy generation, installation of high-efficiency electric appliances and equipment, including high-efficiency heat pumps, and other decarbonization investments.

(3) Individual grant awards may not exceed $10,000,000. The department must award funding at a sufficient level to complete the financing package necessary for an applicant to accomplish the requested scope of work. The department must prioritize providing meaningful benefits to vulnerable populations in overburdened communities as defined in RCW 70A.02.010.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$55,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$220,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$275,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1029. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Clean Building Performance Grants (91002451)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $25,000,000 of the appropriation in this section takes effect January 1, 2025, and is provided solely for clean building performance grants for tier 1 covered buildings as defined in RCW 19.27A.200.

(2) $20,000,000 of the appropriation in this section takes effect January 1, 2025, and is provided solely for clean building performance grants for public buildings.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$45,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$180,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$225,000,000

Sec. 1030. 2023 c 474 s 6076 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Broadband Office (92000953)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 7016 of this act, except that the $225,000 provided for the Point Roberts rural broadband project is appropriated from the state building construction account—state, and not the coronavirus capital projects account—federal.
Reappropriation:

Coronavirus Capital Projects Account—Federal
. . . .
$124,726,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal
. . . .
$150,522,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$26,878,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$302,126,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$225,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,468,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($303,594,000))

$303,819,000

Sec. 1031. 2023 c 474 s 1038 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Public Facility Improvement Fund (92001367)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $24,000,000 of the youth athletic facility account—state appropriation in this section ((is))and $1,162,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section are provided solely for the following list of projects:

Bellingham: Joe Martin Stadium. . . .$700,000

City of Everett ((School District: Everett

Memorial)): New Stadium. . . .$7,400,000

Lower Columbia College: David Story Field. . . .$1,300,000

Lower Columbia College: Softball Facilities. . . .$700,000

Pasco: Gesa Stadium. . . .$3,000,000

Port Angeles: Civic Field. . . .$600,000

Ridgefield: Ridgefield Outdoor Recreational Complex. . . .$450,000

Spokane County: Avista Stadium. . . .$5,800,000

Tacoma: Cheney Stadium. . . .$3,000,000

Walla Walla: Borleske Stadium. . . .$525,000

Wenatchee Valley College: Paul Thomas Sr. Field. . . .$700,000

Wenatchee Valley College: Softball Facilities. . . .$462,000

Yakima County: Yakima County Stadium. . . .$525,000

(2) The funding appropriated under this section must be combined with local funds.

(3) The department may not expend funding for a project in this section unless and until the nonstate share of that project's costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(4) Prior to receiving funding, grant recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of 10 years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to grants for preconstruction activities or grants in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(5) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department must include provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the department finds the grantee to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

(6) $360,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for administrative costs.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($360,000))

$1,522,000

Youth Athletic Facility Account—State
. . . .
$24,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($24,360,000))

$25,522,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($24,360,000))

$25,522,000

Sec. 1032. 2023 c 474 s 1026 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2023-25 Dental Capacity Grants (92001393)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Funding provided in this section must be used for the construction and equipment directly associated with dental facilities. The funding provided in this section is for projects that are maintained for at least a 10-year period and provide capacity to address unmet patient need and increase efficiency in dental access.

(2) The amount provided in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Columbia Basin Health Association. . . .$300,000

Community Health Association of Spokane. . . .$80,000

Community Health Center of Snohomish County. . . .$300,000

CVCH East Wenatchee Dental Clinic (East Wenatchee). . . .$1,850,000

HealthPoint (Seattle). . . .$490,000

Lake Roosevelt Community Health Center (Inchelium). . . .$160,000

Lake Roosevelt Community Health Center (Keller). . . .$80,000

Moses Lake Community Health Center. . . .$72,000

Neighborcare Health (Seattle). . . .$1,800,000

Peninsula Community Health Services (Bremerton). . . .$495,000

PNWU Dental School (Yakima). . . .$5,000,000

Sea Mar Community Health Center (Tacoma). . . .$3,500,000

Seattle Indian Health Board (Seattle). . . .$305,000

Yakima Dental Clinic. . . .$4,400,000

Yakima Valley Farm Workers Clinic (Kennewick). . . .$4,000,000
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($17,680,000))

$22,832,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($70,720,000))

$91,328,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($88,400,000))

$114,160,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1033. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Opioid Treatment Facilities (92001718)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Kitsap Mental Health Services Bremerton Campus

Expansion. . . .$750,000

Opioid Recovery and Care Access. . . .$3,500,000
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$17,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$21,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1034. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Energy Northwest (92001720)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $25,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely as nonfederal support for energy northwest's participation in the United States department of energy's loan programs office part 2 application, including due diligence review and environmental impact review. The legislature intends to leverage federal funds whenever possible and is a committed partner with the United States department of energy in funding activities that increase carbon free clean energy.

(2) Consistent with the provisions of RCW 70A.65.305, the department must consult with any affected federally recognized tribe on the potential effect of this project on tribal resources. Consultation must be initiated before project funds are made available.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$25,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1035. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Tribal Behavioral Health Facilities (92001722)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Colville Tribes Detox Facility Feasibility Study. . . .$500,000

Jamestown S'Klallam Behavioral Health Center. . . .$15,000,000

Kalispel Tribe Camas Health Inpatient Treatment Center. . . .$5,000,000

Lummi Nation Secure Withdrawal Management Facility. . . .$12,000,000

Quinault Indian Nation Wellness Center Expansion. . . .$7,800,000

Suquamish On-Reservation Health Service Center. . . .$4,500,000
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$44,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$179,200,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$224,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1036. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

School-Based Health Centers (92001777)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Cascade High School. . . .$244,000

Everett High School. . . .$244,000

Evergreen High School. . . .$490,000

Meany Middle School. . . .$80,000

Nova High School. . . .$80,000
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,138,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$4,552,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,690,000

Sec. 1037. 2023 c 474 s 1045 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Capitol Campus Security & Safety Enhancements (40000226)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1110, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.

(2) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Capitol Campus Access Controls - Exterior Doors. . . .$1,000,000

Executive Residence Video Surveillance and Lighting

Improvements. . . .$540,000

Wedge Barriers - Syd Snyder & Water Street. . . .$1,570,000

Mansion – Exec Residence – Fencing, Gates, Bollards. . . .$1,621,000
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,135,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($3,110,000))

$4,731,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$922,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$11,682,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($20,849,000))

$22,470,000

Sec. 1038. 2023 c 474 s 1046 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Facility Professional Services Staffing (40000244)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for architectural and engineering services to manage public works contracting for all state facilities pursuant to RCW 43.19.450.

(2) At the end of each biennium, the department must report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature on performance, including the following:

(a) The number of projects managed by each project manager by fiscal year;

(b) The number of project predesigns completed on time, reported by project and fiscal year;

(c) The number of project designs completed, reported by project and fiscal year;

(d) The number of project constructions completed on time, reported by project and fiscal year and in total;

(e) Projects that were not completed on schedule, how many days they were delayed, and the reasons for the delays;

(f) The number and cost of the change orders and the reason for each change order; and

(g) A list of the interagency agreements executed with state agencies during the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium to provide staff support to state agencies that is over and above the allocation provided in this section. The list must include the agency, the amount of dollars by fiscal year, and the rationale for the additional service.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($23,951,000))

$24,951,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($95,804,000))

$99,804,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($119,755,000))

$124,755,000

Sec. 1039. 2023 c 474 s 1047 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Campus - Critical Fire System Upgrades (40000245)

((The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided to fund the first item on the department's prioritized list of critical fire system upgrades. The legislature intends to fund further priorities in the 2024 supplemental capital budget upon completion of the department's evaluation and final prioritization of fire system upgrades.))
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,020,000))

$3,405,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($8,000,000))

$14,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($9,020,000))

$17,405,000

Sec. 1040. 2023 c 474 s 1054 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Washington Building (40000331)

The appropriation((s)) in this section ((are))is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($2,200,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for replacement of the roof and for asbestos abatement.

(2) $2,801,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for replacement of the HVAC system.))$150,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the development of a plan and necessary steps to vacate and dispose of the Washington building and property. No later than September 15, 2025, the department must submit to the governor and the capital committees of the legislature a timeline and proposed budget for each item below that includes:

(a) A plan to relocate the current tenants of the building on or near the capitol campus. In identifying space, the department must also look to space that may be currently leased but is being underutilized. The plan must include a statement of the revenue for each of the current tenants;

(b) Improvements and maintenance necessary for the comfort and safety of the current tenants until the building can be vacated;

(c) Preservation of the building pending disposal of either the building or property, or both; and

(d) Recommendations for the most efficient use of the building and property that minimizes the cost to the state.

(2) The department must work with legislative support services to identify space that meets the long-term needs of the tenants.
Appropriation:

((Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$2,801,000))

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($2,200,000))

$1,001,000

((Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$5,001,000))

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($5,001,000))

$1,001,000

Sec. 1041. 2023 c 474 s 1055 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Old Cap - Roof Replacement (40000338)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,276,000

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State
. . . .
$1,474,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$6,750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($5,579,000))

$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($7,053,000))

$6,750,000

Sec. 1042. 2023 c 474 s 1061 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Legislative Campus Modernization (92000020)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1059, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.

(2) The department must consult with the senate facilities and operations committee or its designees and the house of representatives' executive rules committee or its designees at least every other month.

(3) All appropriations must be coded and tracked as separate discrete subprojects in the agency financial reporting system.

(4) If the department receives information, after value engineering has been performed, that projected costs for any of the subprojects in subsections (5), (6), or (7) of this section will exceed the amount provided in the respective subsections, including projected costs in future biennia, the department must timely notify and provide that information in writing to the project executive team. Prior to proceeding with design or construction, the department must:

(a) Provide at least three options that do not include square footage reduction to reduce the subproject costs to stay within the amount provided for that subproject and the project schedule;

(b) Consult with the project executive team on the options offered, prior to proceeding with a reduced cost option; and

(c) Receive majority consensus from the project executive team to either adopt and move forward with reduced cost options that bring the subproject costs within amounts appropriated or adopt a tentative modified budget for the subproject. If a tentative modified budget is adopted, the department must seek additional funding in the next agency budget submittal.

(5) (($20,751,000))$25,651,000 of the ((amount))state building construction account—state appropriation provided in this section is provided solely for the Irv Newhouse building replacement design and construction subproject on opportunity site six west. The department must:

(a) Start Newhouse building construction by July 1, 2023;

(b) Complete Newhouse building construction by October 31, 2024; and

(c) Consult with the leadership of the senate, or their designees, at least every month, beginning July 1, 2023.

(6) (($87,000,000 of the amount))$84,593,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation provided in this section is provided solely for the rehabilitation, design, and construction of the Pritchard building and the renovation of the John L. O'Brien building subproject. The legislature intends to provide funding in the amount of (($136,504,000))$134,097,000 over the course of the 2023-2025 and the 2025-2027 fiscal biennia for design and construction of this project. Pursuant to RCW 43.88.130, the department may enter into a multibiennium contract for the construction of the subproject. Nothing in this section authorizes the agency to make an expenditure without an appropriation.

(7) (($4,865,000 of the amount))$11,872,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation and $1,000,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation provided in this section ((is))are provided solely for the legislative campus modernization global subproject that includes, but is not limited to, the visitor lot (opportunity site six east), Columbia street site work, the legislative modular building, 15th avenue southwest, the John A. Cherberg parking lot on 15th avenue southwest, the John L. O'Brien parking lot on 15th avenue southwest, and Water street site work.

(8) $1,000,000 of the model toxics control capital account—state appropriation is provided solely for Newhouse parcel soil decontamination.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$72,346,000

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State
. . . .
$2,665,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$75,011,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($112,616,000))

$122,116,000

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$124,116,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$14,925,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$49,504,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($252,056,000))

$263,556,000

Sec. 1043. 2023 c 474 s 1065 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Tri-Cities Readiness Center (30000808)
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$1,421,000

((Military Department Capital Account—

State
. . . .
$204,000))

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$265,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
(($1,890,000))

$1,686,000

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$2,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$944,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,944,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$16,010,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($20,844,000))

$20,640,000

Sec. 1044. 2023 c 474 s 1070 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Camp Murray Bldg 34 Renovation (40000192)
Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
(($4,915,000))

$5,410,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($3,425,000))

$4,589,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($8,340,000))

$9,999,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($8,340,000))

$9,999,000

(End of part)

PART 2

HUMAN SERVICES

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2001. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Child Study & Treatment Center-Gymnasium: Floor Replacement (40000555)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,925,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,925,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2002. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Rainier School-Laundry: Commercial Washing Machines Replacement (40000971)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,430,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,430,000

Sec. 2003. 2023 c 474 s 2026 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital-Water System: Assessment and Improvements (40001089)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: As part of its assessment, the department must conduct a long-term cost-benefit analysis of transitioning the water system to the ((City of)) Lakewood Water District and any cost mitigation strategies available to the state.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,490,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,490,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2004. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Olympic Heritage Behavioral Health – Facility Modernization (40001145)
Appropriation:

Capital Community Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$13,700,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$855,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$14,555,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$10,350,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$24,905,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2005. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital-East Campus: Well Replacement (40001149)
Appropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$4,540,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,540,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2006. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Olympic Heritage Behavioral Health - Facility Purchase (40001153)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$30,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$30,000,000

Sec. 2007. 2023 c 474 s 2031 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Maple Lane - Rapid BH Bed Capacity (92000046)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$800,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$21,070,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$20,200,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($41,270,000))

$42,070,000

Sec. 2008. 2023 c 474 s 2035 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Drinking Water System Rehabilitations and Consolidations (40000065)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: (($2,214,000))$2,536,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to facilitate a water supply agreement between the City of North Bend and the Sallal Water System. Of that amount, (($1,507,000))$1,829,000 must be distributed to the Sallal Water System and $707,000 to the City of North Bend, conditional on a signed water supply agreement that ensures ((a minimum of))up to 100 acre feet per year of ((permanent)) mitigation water supply ((for))to the city for a minimum of 30 years.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($5,000,000))

$5,322,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$12,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($17,000,000))

$17,322,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2009. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Emergency Generator for Environmental Laboratory Wing (40000072)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,219,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,219,000

Sec. 2010. 2023 c 474 s 2044 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

WSVC - Burial and Columbarium Expansion Grant (40000092)
Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
(($3,000,000))

$4,868,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($300,000))

$541,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,300,000))

$5,409,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($3,300,000))

$5,409,000

Sec. 2011. 2023 c 474 s 2046 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

DVA ARPA Federal Funds & State Match (91000013)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are subject to the provisions of section 7064 of this act, except that the department may apply for federal funding other than that under section 8004 of the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117.2, and minor works projects funded under this section need not meet the requirements of section 8004 of the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117.2.
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
(($24,495,000))

$24,515,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($10,849,000))

$10,882,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
(($35,344,000))

$35,397,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,810,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($55,000))

$2,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$42,209,000

Sec. 2012. 2023 c 474 s 2049 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES

Echo Glen Secure Facility Improvements (40000546)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($8,050,000))

$11,054,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($8,050,000))

$11,054,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2013. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES

Green Hill School HVAC Upgrades (40000584)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section from the climate commitment account—state takes effect January 1, 2025.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$3,449,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,448,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$6,897,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$9,550,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$16,447,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2014. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES

Echo Glen Academic School Walkway Roofing & Lighting (40000586)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2015. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

SW: Electric Car Chargers (40000178)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section takes effect January 1, 2025.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$3,744,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,344,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2016. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

WCCW: MSC Living Unit Bathroom Renovations (40000263)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$8,290,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,790,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2017. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

SW: Security Electronics Renewal & Adaptation (40000523)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2018. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

SW: Fire Alarm Systems Stabilization Project (40000524)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2019. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

SW: Perimeter Fence Detection Stabilization Project (40000525)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2020. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

WSP: IMU South Fire Protection & Smoke Dampers (40000526)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,622,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,622,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2021. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

WCCW Women's Elder Care Unit (40000527)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2022. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

WCC: Medical Intake Modular Building (40000528)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,400,000

(End of part)

PART 3

NATURAL RESOURCES

Sec. 3001. 2023 c 474 s 3028 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2023-25 Columbia River Water Supply Development Program (40000583)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $32,800,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for planning, designing, engineering, development, coordination, and construction of the Odessa groundwater replacement project, sufficient to irrigate the acres located within the Odessa Subarea Special Study and facilities modifications necessary to accommodate capacity demands resulting from the individual public delivery systems within the Odessa groundwater replacement program.

(a) To be eligible for a grant under this subsection (1), a project must have at least 30 percent of its design work completed by July 1, 2023.

(b) The east Columbia basin irrigation district may only be allowed to make any administrative charges sufficient to administer the state grants, not to exceed one percent of amounts provided to them within this appropriation, with the requirement to report administrative expenditures to the office of Columbia river annually.

(2) $850,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to enter into an agreement with the United States bureau of reclamation to reimburse the bureau for costs related to the design and review activities necessary to complete the transfer of the groundwater replacement delivery system title to the United States by the east Columbia basin irrigation district and to secure project reserved power for public delivery systems.

(3) $5,500,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Odessa - OGWRP EL 22.1 pipeline turnouts project.
Appropriation:

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Revenue

Recovery Account—State
. . . .
$1,500,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($59,200,000))

$64,700,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($60,700,000))

$66,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$242,800,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($303,500,000))

$309,000,000

Sec. 3002. 2023 c 474 s 3032 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Landfill Methane Capture (40000611)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

((The))(1) $10,100,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to administer a grant program for landfills to comply with methane emission requirements established in chapter 70A.540 RCW.

(2) $4,900,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Cowlitz County PUD Landfill Methane Capture project.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$15,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$60,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$75,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3003. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Cleanup Settlement Account Projects (40000613)
Appropriation:

Cleanup Settlement Account—State
. . . .
$2,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3004. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Eastside Fire and Rescue Pilot PFAS Cleanup (40000618)
Appropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3005. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Hannah Heights PFAS Contaminated Well and Water Supply (92000210)
Appropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$2,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,200,000

Sec. 3006. 2023 c 474 s 3046 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Nisqually New Full Service Park (40000153)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,244,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($21,825,000))

$25,327,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,739,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($15,099,000))

$16,033,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($51,907,000))

$56,343,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3007. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Lake Sammamish Dock Design & Permitting (40000461)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$4,500,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3008. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Palouse to Cascades Trail Noxious Weed Inventory (92001130)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the commission to conduct a noxious weeds inventory on the Palouse to Cascades trail in Grant, Adams, and Whitman counties. The commission shall identify and document the species and geographic extent of noxious weeds, as selected pursuant to RCW 17.10.080 and 17.10.090, in the sections on either side of the trail within 25 feet of the center line of the trail. The commission must conduct the inventory along the full extent of the trail in Adams, Grant, and Whitman counties and in coordination with the associated county or regional noxious weed control board. The inventory must occur during the time of year when the noxious weeds are fully developed and can be readily identified. The commission shall submit a report to the capital committees of the legislature, including inventory results and treatment recommendations, no later than December 1, 2024.
Appropriation:

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—State
. . . .
$50,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$50,000

Sec. 3009. 2023 c 474 s 3056 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2023-25 Salmon Recovery Funding Board Grant Programs (40000054)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section from the natural climate solutions account—state takes effect January 1, 2025.

(2) $2,400,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely to maintain the lead entity program as described in chapter 77.85 RCW.

(((2)))(3) $640,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for regional fisheries enhancement groups created in RCW 77.95.060.
Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$75,000,000

Natural Climate Solutions Account—State
. . . .
$25,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$20,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($95,000,000))

$120,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($380,000,000))

$480,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($475,000,000))

$600,000,000

Sec. 3010. 2023 c 474 s 3062 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2023-25 Community Forest Grant Program (40000060)

The appropriations in this section ((is))are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The state building construction—account appropriation in this section is provided solely for projects approved by the legislature, as identified in LEAP capital document No. RCO-5-2023, developed April 10, 2023.

(2) The natural climate solutions account—state appropriation in this section takes effect January 1, 2025, and is provided solely for projects approved by the legislature, as identified in LEAP capital document No. RCO-1-2024, developed February 1, 2024. Projects on LEAP capital document No. RCO-1-2024 funded under this subsection are not also eligible to receive funding as alternate projects on LEAP capital document No. RCO-5-2023.
Appropriation:

Natural Climate Solutions Account—State
. . . .
$5,770,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$7,807,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$13,577,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($31,228,000))

$54,348,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($39,035,000))

$67,925,000

Sec. 3011. 2023 c 474 s 3065 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2023-25 Washington Coastal Restoration and Resiliency Initiative (40000063)

The appropriations in this section ((is))are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided under subsection (2) of this section, the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for projects approved by the legislature, as identified in LEAP capital document No. RCO-8-2023, developed April 10, 2023.

(2) The recreation and conservation funding board may retain a portion of the funds appropriated from the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section for the administration of the grants. The portion of the funding retained for administration from this account may not exceed 4.12 percent of the appropriation.

(3)(a) The natural climate solutions account—state appropriation in this section takes effect January 1, 2025, and is provided solely for projects approved by the legislature, as identified in LEAP capital document No. RCO-2-2024, developed February 1, 2024. Projects on LEAP capital document No. RCO-2-2024 funded under this subsection are not also eligible to receive funding as alternate projects on LEAP capital document No. RCO-8-2023.

(b) The board may retain up to $314,000 of the amounts appropriated in this subsection (3) for administration of the grants.
Appropriation:

Natural Climate Solutions Account—State
. . . .
$7,928,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,134,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$18,062,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($40,536,000))

$72,248,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($50,670,000))

$90,310,000

Sec. 3012. 2023 c 474 s 3066 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2023-25 Brian Abbott Fish Barrier Removal Board (40000064)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) ((Except as provided under subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the))(a) $21,092,000 of the natural climate solutions account—state appropriation and $27,315,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation((s)) in this section are provided solely for projects approved by the legislature, as identified in LEAP capital document No. RCO-6-2023, developed April 10, 2023.

(((2)))(b) The recreation and conservation funding board may retain a portion of the funding appropriated in (a) of this ((section))subsection for the administration of the grants. The portion of the funding retained for administration may not exceed $1,356,000 from the state building construction account—state appropriation ((in this section)).

(((3)))(c) The department of fish and wildlife may retain up to $1,862,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in (a) of this ((section))subsection for the Brian Abbott fish barrier removal board for technical assistance in developing projects for consideration.

(2)(a) $22,198,000 of the natural climate solutions account—state appropriation in this section takes effect January 1, 2025, and is provided solely for projects approved by the legislature, as identified in LEAP capital document No. RCO-3-2024, developed February 1, 2024. Projects on LEAP capital document No. RCO-3-2024 funded under this subsection are not also eligible to receive funding as alternate projects on LEAP capital document No. RCO-6-2023.

(b) The recreation and conservation funding board may retain a portion of the funding appropriated in (a) of this subsection for the administration of the grants. The portion of the funding retained for administration may not exceed $622,000 from the natural climate solutions account-state appropriation.

(c) The department of fish and wildlife may retain up to $854,000 of the natural climate solutions account—state appropriation in (a) of this subsection for the Brian Abbott fish barrier removal board for technical assistance in developing projects for consideration.
Appropriation:

Natural Climate Solutions Account—State
. . . .
(($21,092,000))

$43,290,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$27,315,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($48,407,000))

$70,605,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($193,628,000))

$282,420,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($242,035,000))

$353,025,000

Sec. 3013. 2023 c 474 s 3064 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2023-25 Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (40000062)

The appropriations in this section ((is))are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) ((Except as provided under subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the))(a) The state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for projects approved by the legislature, as identified in LEAP capital document No. RCO-7-2023, developed April 10, 2023.

(((2)))(b) The recreation and conservation funding board may retain a portion of the funding appropriated in (a) of this ((section))subsection for the administration of the grants. The portion of the funding retained for administration may not exceed $545,000.

(((3)))(c) The department of fish and wildlife may retain a portion of the funding appropriated in (a) of this ((section))subsection for costs related to technical assistance and program administration. The portion of the funding retained for costs related to technical assistance and program administration may not exceed $545,000.

(2)(a) The natural climate solutions account—state appropriation in this section takes effect January 1, 2025, and is provided solely for projects approved by the legislature, as identified in LEAP capital document No. RCO-4-2024, developed February 1, 2024. Projects on LEAP capital document No. RCO-4-2024 funded under this subsection are not also eligible to receive funding as alternate projects on LEAP capital document No. RCO-7-2023.

(b) The recreation and conservation funding board may retain up to $423,000 of the funding appropriated in (a) of this subsection for the administration of the grants.

(c) The department of fish and wildlife may retain up to $423,000 of the funding appropriated in (a) of this subsection for costs related to technical assistance and program administration.
Appropriation:

Natural Climate Solutions Account—State
. . . .
$11,110,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$14,309,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$25,419,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($57,236,000))

$101,676,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($71,545,000))

$127,095,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3014. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Quinault Legacy Forest Acquisition (92001586)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section takes effect January 1, 2025.
Appropriation:

Natural Climate Solutions Account—State
. . . .
$25,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,000,000

Sec. 3015. 2023 c 474 s 3080 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

2023-25 Conservation Reserve Enhancement Program (CREP) (40000023)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The state conservation commission may expend the state building construction account—state appropriation and natural climate solutions account—state appropriation in this section as grants to private land owners who were enrolled in the conservation reserve enhancement program, and whose acreage meets state program goals of providing riparian habitat or hydrologically connected wetland enhancements in salmon-bearing streams as determined by the Washington state department of fish and wildlife, but are now disenrolled due to a contract termination by the United States department of agriculture (USDA) farm service agency, or who voluntary terminated their enrollment as a result of the USDA farm service agency audit.
Appropriation:

Natural Climate Solutions Account—State
. . . .
$11,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$15,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$60,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$75,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3016. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Anaerobic Digester Development (91001830)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) $22,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to dairy farm owners for cost-share agreements regarding anaerobic digester development. Grants awarded for anaerobic digester development must have at least a 50 percent nonstate match and be awarded through a competitive process that considers:

(i) The amount of greenhouse gas reduction expected to be achieved by the proposal; and

(ii) The amount of untreated effluent expected to be reduced by the proposal.

(b) Recipients of grants under this section must provide a report to the commission within one year of receipt of the grant, detailing the success of the project in meeting the stated criteria in the competitive process.

(2) $2,900,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the commission to provide financial and technical assistance for project predevelopment.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$24,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$99,600,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$124,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3017. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Ringold Hatchery Replace Ponds (40000101)
Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$10,834,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,834,000

Sec. 3018. 2023 c 474 s 3102 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minor Works Preservation 23-25 (40000164)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($11,255,000))

$11,530,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($45,020,000))

$46,120,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($56,275,000))

$57,650,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3019. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Mitchell Act BiOp Implementation (92001251)
Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$536,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$536,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3020. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Washougal Intake Replacement (92001252)
Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$14,274,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$14,274,000

Sec. 3021. 2023 c 474 s 3115 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2023-25 State Trust Land Replacement (40000145)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: In the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the department of natural resources may not transfer funds from the resource management cost account to the land bank account. Any funds remaining in the resource management cost account related to land transactions must be expended for trust land management purposes and not for the purpose of trust land transfers or other acquisitions.
Appropriation:

Community and Technical College Forest Reserve

Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Natural Resources Real Property Replacement

Account—State
. . . .
$49,571,000

Resource Management Cost Account—State
. . . .
(($30,000,000))

$5,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($80,571,000))

$55,571,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($322,284,000))

$202,284,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($402,855,000))

$257,855,000

Sec. 3022. 2023 c 474 s 3120 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Revitalizing Trust Land Transfers (40000152)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

((The))(1) $9,325,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation and $8,000,000 of the natural climate solutions account—state appropriation((s)) in this section are provided solely for projects approved by the legislature, as identified in LEAP capital document No. DNR-1-2023, developed April 10, 2023.

(2) $8,000,000 of the natural climate solutions account—state appropriation in this section takes effect January 1, 2025, and is provided solely for projects approved by the legislature, as identified in LEAP capital document No. DNR-1-2024, developed February 1, 2024.
Appropriation:

Natural Climate Solutions Account—State
. . . .
(($8,000,000))

$16,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$9,325,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($17,325,000))

$25,325,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($69,300,000))

$101,300,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($86,625,000))

$126,625,000

Sec. 3023. 2023 c 474 s 3122 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2023-25 Minor Works Preservation (40000154)
Appropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$824,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($4,484,000))

$5,383,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($5,308,000))

$6,207,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($21,232,000))

$24,828,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($26,540,000))

$31,035,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3024. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Port Angeles Fire and Seasonal Employee Housing (40000409)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$488,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$3,332,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,820,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3025. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Land Bank Spending Authority (40000410)
Appropriation:

Land Bank Account—State
. . . .
$20,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$80,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$100,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3026. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Drought Resilience Infrastructure Investments (40000411)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section from the natural climate solutions account—state takes effect January 1, 2025.
Appropriation:

Natural Climate Solutions Account—State
. . . .
$250,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$250,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3027. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Recreational Target Shooting Pilot Sites (40000413)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,937,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,937,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3028. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

YMCA Camp Colman (40000424)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely to address erosion-related impacts to Camp Colman resulting from the removal of a tidal gate and restoration of fish passage at Whiteman Cove. The department shall contract with the YMCA of greater Seattle for (a) the design and construction of two cabins; and (b) design and construction of ADA-compliant trails, road improvements to allow for emergency service access, and an expanded septic system that serves the two cabins.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,670,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,670,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3029. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Wildfire Reforestation on DNR-Managed Lands (92000062)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for post-wildfire reforestation of the forestlands managed by the department of natural resources. The department must prioritize expenditures for the benefit of state trust lands.
Appropriation:

Natural Climate Solutions Account—State
. . . .
$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$40,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3030. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Wildfire Reforestation Grants (92000063)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section takes effect January 1, 2025, and is provided solely for the department to administer grants for post-wildfire reforestation on lands owned by tribes, nonprofit organizations, industrial and nonindustrial private forest landowners, local governments, and other state agencies. Lands owned by the federal government or lands managed by the department are not eligible for funds in this section.

(1) The department must establish criteria for the grant program funded in this section, allowing for land preparation, sourcing of seedlings, reforestation, and efforts to promote seedling survival.

(2) Criteria must include:

(a) A cost-share percentage not to exceed 50 percent of the grant award, including any in-kind contributions;

(b) Minimum and maximum potential grant awards;

(c) The prioritization of funds for direct reforestation efforts;

(d) Ensuring the applicant's projects are not required by law;

(e) Specific considerations for grant applicants proposing to include the reforestation of riparian buffers, potentially unstable slopes, or other areas where harvest is restricted due to state regulations that were affected by the underlying catastrophic event; and

(f) Consideration of any relevant environmental justice assessments under RCW 70A.02.060.
Appropriation:

Natural Climate Solutions Account—State
. . . .
$2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$10,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3031. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE

Agricultural Carbon Storage and Sequestration (40000001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section takes effect January 1, 2025, and is provided solely for grants to improve carbon storage and sequestration on agricultural lands.

(2) Only agricultural producers are eligible to receive grants.

(3) Eligible activities include:

(a) Agricultural management practices focused on soil health that will result in improved carbon outcomes, including carbon storage, sequestration, or reducing greenhouse gas emissions; and

(b) Research that creates tools intended to support farms in reducing greenhouse gas emissions or improving carbon storage and sequestration.

(c) Activities pursuant to (a) and (b) of this subsection by applying live, native algae produced and delivered on farms.
Appropriation:

Natural Climate Solutions Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$20,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,000,000

(End of part)

PART 4

TRANSPORTATION

Reserved.

(End of part)

PART 5

EDUCATION

Sec. 5001. 2023 c 474 s 5001 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

West Sound Technical Skills Center Modernization (40000015)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5003, chapter 269, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,990,000

Appropriation:

School Construction and Skill Centers Building

Account—State
. . . .
$755,000

((State Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$40,606,000))

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$40,606,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$41,361,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$410,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$44,343,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$97,104,000

Sec. 5002. 2023 c 474 s 5002 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2023-25 School Construction Assistance Program (40000063)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($412,044,000))$117,522,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation ((and $171,097,000)), $169,871,000 of the common school construction account—state appropriation, and $1,500,000 of the common school construction account—federal appropriation in this section are provided solely for school construction assistance grants for qualifying public school construction projects.

(2) (($5,031,000))$4,757,000 of the common school construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for study and survey grants and for completing inventory and building condition assessments for public school districts every six years, and for the acquisition of art pursuant to RCW 28A.335.210.
Appropriation:

Common School Construction Fund—State
. . . .
(($176,128,000))

$174,628,000

Common School Construction Fund—Federal
. . . .
$1,500,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($412,044,000))

$117,522,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($588,172,000))

$293,650,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($5,136,683,000))

$2,050,097,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($5,724,855,000))

$2,343,747,000

Sec. 5003. 2023 c 474 s 5003 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2023-25 Small District & Tribal Compact Schools Modernization (40000065)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($78,390,000))$180,646,000 of the common school construction account—state appropriation ((and $3,000,000 of the common school construction fund—federal appropriation)) in this section ((are))is provided solely for modernization grants for small school districts authorized under RCW 28A.525.159. Of this amount, $84,000,000 is provided solely for small district modernization grants, not to exceed $6,000,000 per grant, to school districts that were awarded a planning grant in 2023-2025 fiscal biennium pursuant to LEAP capital document No. OSPI-1-2023, developed April 10, 2023. Small districts awarded a planning grant pursuant to this list that do not receive a modernization grant in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium are eligible for a modernization grant up to the maximum state funding level established under subsection (5)(a) of this section. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall report the status and award amounts of all grants awarded pursuant to this section to the governor and appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature no later than September 15, 2024.

(2) (($1,496,000))$2,307,000 of the common school construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for planning grants for small school districts authorized under RCW 28A.525.159. Planning grants may not exceed $50,000 per district. Planning grants may only be awarded to school districts with an estimated total project cost of $6,000,000 or less.

(3) $12,145,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for planning grants and modernization grants to state-tribal compact schools. The superintendent of public instruction may prioritize planning grants for state-tribal compact schools with the most serious building deficiencies and the most limited financial capacity.

(4) (($5,000,000))$6,800,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for energy assessment grants for small school districts eligible under RCW 28A.525.159. Grant funding awarded may be used to perform facility energy assessments of instructional buildings.

(5)(a) The superintendent of public instruction shall submit a list of small school district modernization projects, as prioritized by the advisory committee under RCW 28A.525.159, to the legislature and the governor by September 15, 2024. The list must include: (((a)))(i) A description of the project; (((b)))(ii) the proposed state funding level, not to exceed (($6,000,000))$10,000,000 per project; (((c)))(iii) estimated total project costs; and (((d)))(iv) local funding resources.

(b) In addition to the list required in (a) of this subsection, the superintendent of public instruction shall submit an alternative list, prioritized by the advisory committee, that includes small school districts with 2,000 students or less. The list must include the following information: (i) A description of the project; (ii) the proposed state funding level, not to exceed $10,000,000; (iii) estimated total project costs; and (iv) local funding resources.

(6) ((The))(a) Subject to (b) of this subsection (6), the appropriations in this section may be awarded only to projects approved by the legislature, as identified in LEAP capital document No. OSPI-1-2023, developed April 10, 2023 and in LEAP capital document No. OSPI-1-2024, developed February 1, 2024.

(b) To the extent the amounts appropriated for small districts and state-tribal compact schools specified in the LEAP capital documents in (a) of this subsection exceeds the actual costs of funding these projects, the department may reallocate excess funding to eligible projects pursuant to RCW 28A.525.159. However, the total funding appropriated to eligible small district projects must remain allocated to eligible small district projects, and the total funding appropriated to eligible state-tribal compact school projects must remain allocated to eligible state-tribal compact school projects.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
(($5,000,000))

$6,800,000

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($79,886,000))

$191,953,000

((Common School Construction Fund—Federal
. . . .
$3,000,000))

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$12,145,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($100,031,000))

$210,898,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($400,124,000))

$807,592,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($500,155,000))

$1,018,490,000

Sec. 5004. 2023 c 474 s 5005 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2023-25 School District Health and Safety (40000067)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($5,000,000))$11,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for emergency repair grants to address unexpected and imminent health and safety hazards at K-12 public schools, including skill centers, that will impact the day-to-day operations of the school facility, and this is the maximum amount that may be spent for this purpose. For emergency repair grants only, an emergency declaration must be signed by the school district board of directors and submitted to the superintendent of public instruction for consideration. The emergency declaration must include a description of the imminent health and safety hazard, the possible cause, the proposed scope of emergency repair work and related cost estimate, and identification of local funding to be applied to the project. Grants of emergency repair moneys must be conditioned upon the written commitment and plan of the school district board of directors to repay the grant with any insurance payments or other judgments that may be awarded, if applicable.

(2) (($11,600,000))$12,700,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for urgent repair grants to address nonreccurring urgent small repair projects at K-12 public schools, excluding skill centers, that could impact the health and safety of students and staff if not completed, and this is the maximum amount that may be spent for this purpose. The office of the superintendent of public instruction, after consulting with maintenance and operations administrators of school districts, shall develop criteria and assurances for providing funding for specific projects through a competitive grant program. The criteria and assurances must include, but are not limited to, the following: (a) Limiting school districts to one grant, not to exceed $500,000, per three-year period; (b) prioritizing applications based on limited school district financial resources for the project; and (c) requiring any district receiving funding provided in this section to demonstrate a consistent commitment to addressing school facility needs. The grant applications must include a comprehensive description of the health and safety issues to be addressed, a detailed description of the remedy, including a detailed cost estimate of the repair or replacement work to be performed, and identification of local funding, if any, which will be applied to the project. Grants may be used for, but are not limited to: Repair or replacement of failing building systems, abatement of potentially hazardous materials, and safety-related structural improvements.

(3) (($3,600,000))$4,600,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for equal access grants for facility repairs and alterations at K-12 public schools, including skills centers, to improve compliance with the Americans with disabilities act and individuals with disabilities education act, and this is the maximum amount that may be spent for this purpose. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop criteria and assurances for providing funding for specific projects through a competitive grant program. The criteria and assurances must include, but are not limited to, the following: (a) Limiting districts to one grant, not to exceed $100,000, per three-year period; (b) prioritizing applications based on limited school district financial resources for the project; and (c) requiring recipient districts to demonstrate a consistent commitment to addressing school facility needs. The grant applications must include a description of the Americans with disabilities act or individuals with disabilities education act compliance deficiency, a comprehensive description of the facility accessibility issues to be addressed, a detailed description of the remedy including a detailed cost estimate of the repair or replacement work to be performed, and identification of local funding, if any, which will be applied to the project. Priority for grant funding must be given to school districts that demonstrate a lack of capital resources to address the compliance deficiencies outlined in the grant application.

(4) The superintendent of public instruction must notify the office of financial management, the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, the house capital budget committee, and the senate ways and means committee as projects described in subsection (1) of this section are approved for funding.
Appropriation:

((State Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$20,200,000))

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$28,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($80,800,000))

$113,200,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($101,000,000))

$141,500,000

Sec. 5005. 2023 c 474 s 5006 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2023-25 Healthy Kids-Healthy Schools (40000068)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) (($10,000,000))$11,500,000 of the common school construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for healthy kids and healthy schools grants for projects that are consistent with the healthiest next generation priorities.

(b) The appropriation in this subsection (1) is provided solely for grant funding to school districts for the purchase of equipment or to make repairs to existing equipment that is related to improving: (i) Children's physical health, and may include, but is not limited to, fitness playground equipment, covered play areas, and physical education equipment or related structures or renovation; and (ii) children's nutrition, and may include, but is not limited to, garden related structures and greenhouses to provide students access to fresh produce, and kitchen equipment or upgrades.

(c) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop criteria for grant funding under this subsection (1) that include, but are not limited to, the following requirements: (i) Districts may apply for grants, but no single district may receive more than $200,000 of the appropriation for grants awarded under this section; (ii) any district receiving funding provided in this section must demonstrate a consistent commitment to addressing school facilities' needs; and (iii) applicants with a high percentage of students who are eligible and enrolled in the free and reduced-price meals program may be prioritized.

(2) $1,500,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to school districts, charter schools, and state-tribal education compact schools for the replacement of lead-contaminated pipes, drinking water fixtures, and the purchase of water filters, including the labor costs of remediation design, installation, and construction.
Appropriation:

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($10,000,000))

$11,500,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,500,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($11,500,000))

$13,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($46,000,000))

$52,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($57,500,000))

$65,000,000

Sec. 5006. 2023 c 474 s 5008 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2023-25 Skills Centers Minor Works (40000070)
Appropriation:

((State Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$5,135,000))

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,135,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$20,540,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,675,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5007. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

School District Indoor Air Quality & Energy Efficiency (40000104)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $30,000,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation and $10,000,000 of the common school construction account—state appropriation in this section are provided solely for the following:

(1) Grants to school districts for heating, ventilation, and air conditioning (HVAC) systems, air filtration enhancement, and general air quality and energy efficiency improvements. Funding is provided to aid in the transition of school buildings away from fossil fuels and improving indoor air quality by installing high efficiency electric heat pumps, energy efficiency upgrades, and other high efficiency electric equipment and air filtration systems.

(2) Funding must be prioritized for school districts:

(a) In overburdened communities, as defined in RCW 70A.65.010;

(b) With limited financial capacity; and

(c) Relying on costly, energy inefficient equipment.

(3) Grantees may seek technical assistance from local health jurisdiction school safety programs or the department of health, as applicable.

(4) $500,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely to schools in communities located near and under Seattle-Tacoma international airport flight paths for air filtration systems with HEPA filters that can remove ultrafine pollution particles from the air caused by aircraft traffic, as identified in the mobile observations of ultrafine particles published by the University of Washington.

(5) The appropriation in this section from the climate commitment account—state takes effect January 1, 2025.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$30,000,000

Common School Construction Fund—State
. . . .
$10,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$40,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$160,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$200,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5008. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Energy Assessment Grants to School Districts (91000509)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $4,900,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation in this section takes effect January 1, 2025, and is provided solely for energy assessment grants to school districts for buildings that exceed 220,000 gross square feet pursuant to compliance with the state's energy-related building standards in chapter 19.27A RCW. Assessments funded under this subsection must include professional cost estimates for mitigating the energy use intensity deficiencies identified. The office of the superintendent of public instruction must collect the cost estimate data from school districts receiving a grant under this subsection and report a summary of the collected cost data, as well as a list of specific capital projects for school districts developed from this data, to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature by January 6, 2025.

(2) $50,000 of the common school construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to make modifications to its information and condition of schools system related to implementing this section.

(3) If applications for energy assessment grants under this section exceed funds available, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must prioritize grants for school buildings that are likely to require the most substantial improvements related to compliance with chapter 19.27A RCW and for school districts that have the most limited financial capacity. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall make such prioritizations using facilities data from the information and condition of schools database and through information provided by the school district at the time of application.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$4,900,000

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$50,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$4,950,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$19,600,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$24,550,000

Sec. 5009. 2023 c 474 s 5013 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2023-25 Distressed Schools (92000928)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Cascadia Technical Academy (Vancouver). . . .$250,000

Ingraham High School Construction Trades Skills

Center (Seattle). . . .$527,000

Maritime 253: South Puget Sound Maritime Skills

Center (Tacoma). . . .(($8,000,000))$12,000,000

Rainier Beach High School Campus Skills Center. . . .$9,915,000

Seattle Skills Center (Seattle). . . .$2,200,000

Stevenson-Carson High School (Stevenson). . . .$750,000

Washington Middle School (Seattle). . . .$98,000

Whittier Elementary School. . . .$5,625,000
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$21,740,000

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$9,625,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$31,365,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($86,960,000))

$125,460,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($108,700,000))

$156,825,000

Sec. 5010. 2023 c 474 s 5014 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2023-25 Agricultural Science in Schools Grant to FFA Foundation (92000931)
Appropriation:

((State Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$5,000,000))

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$20,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5011. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2024 School Construction Assistance Program Enhancement (92001066)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The construction cost allocation, which is used to determine the maximum cost per square foot of construction that the state will recognize in the school construction assistance program, is increased from $271.61 per square foot to $400.00 per square foot in fiscal year 2025. It is the intent of the legislature to increase the construction cost allocation by the same inflation rate used by the office of financial management's C-100 form in subsequent years. This inflation rate is the same rate used by all other state agencies for determining future costs.

(2)(a) Up to $59,328,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation and $59,000 of the common school construction fund—state appropriation in this section are provided for allocations to school districts for the sales and use taxes associated with school construction projects as follows:

(i) As provided in and for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5789 (school projects/sales tax); and

(ii) Any school district that enacts a school bond in the February 13, 2024, school bond election is eligible for the state sales and use taxes levied through the state of Washington and local option sales and use taxes levied by political subdivisions chargeable to the project for which the bond was levied.

(b) If Senate Bill No. 5789 (school projects/sales tax) is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the appropriation provided in this subsection (2) shall lapse.
Appropriation:

Common School Construction Fund—State
. . . .
$59,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$144,035,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$144,094,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$2,759,357,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,903,451,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5012. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Skills Center Construction Grants (92001071)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Tri-Tech Skills Center. . . .$45,496,000

Wenatchee Valley Technical Skills Center. . . .$14,463,000
Appropriation:

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$59,959,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$400,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$459,959,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5013. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

School Modernization Loan Program (92001073)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5344 (school modernization loan).

(2) Up to $1,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction, in coordination with the office of the state treasurer, to administer a modernization loan program for school districts and state-tribal education compact schools with significant building system deficiencies.

(3) $100,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for providing technical assistance and planning grants to school districts and state-tribal education compact schools with the most serious building deficiencies and the most limited financial capacity.

(4) If Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5344 (school modernization loan) is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this section shall lapse.
Appropriation:

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$35,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$65,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$100,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5014. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Capital Assistance to Small School Districts (92001074)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for preconstruction grants and administrative implementation pursuant to Substitute House Bill No. 1044 (capital assistance/schools). If Substitute House Bill No. 1044 (capital assistance/schools) is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this section shall lapse.
Appropriation:

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,982,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$752,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$753,982,000

Sec. 5015. 2023 c 474 s 5015 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND

2023-25 Campus Preservation (Minor Works) (40000021)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($2,100,000))

$2,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($8,400,000))

$10,400,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($10,500,000))

$13,000,000

Sec. 5016. 2023 c 474 s 5031 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW Seattle - Asset Preservation (Minor Works) 23-25 (40000103)
Appropriation:

University of Washington Building Account—State
. . . .
(($33,691,000))

$37,396,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($134,764,000))

$149,584,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($168,455,000))

$186,980,000

Sec. 5017. 2023 c 474 s 5032 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW Bothell - Asset Preservation (Minor Works) 23-25 (40000129)
Appropriation:

University of Washington Building Account—State
. . . .
(($5,919,000))

$3,895,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($23,676,000))

$15,580,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($29,595,000))

$19,475,000

Sec. 5018. 2023 c 474 s 5033 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW Tacoma - Asset Preservation (Minor Works) 23-25 (40000131)
Appropriation:

University of Washington Building Account—State
. . . .
(($4,915,000))

$3,234,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($19,660,000))

$12,936,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($24,575,000))

$16,170,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5019. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Chemical Sciences & Bagley Hall (40000146)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$125,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$130,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5020. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Energy Renewal Program (40000147)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section takes effect January 1, 2025.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$38,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$38,900,000

Sec. 5021. 2023 c 474 s 5038 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Minor Capital Preservation 2023-25 (MCR) (40000340)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Washington State University Building Account—

State
. . . .
$40,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$41,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$200,460,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($240,460,000))

$241,460,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5022. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Campus Energy Program (92001131)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section takes effect January 1, 2025.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5023. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Knott Dairy Center Digester (92001132)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section takes effect January 1, 2025.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5024. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

CBPS: Sports and Recreation Center Energy Improvements (40000112)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section takes effect January 1, 2025, and is provided solely for the air handler replacement and control upgrades at the physical education activities building and the HVAC and air handler unit replacements at the Jim Thorpe fieldhouse.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$9,998,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,998,000

Sec. 5025. 2023 c 474 s 5056 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Humanities & Social Science Complex (40000081)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

The legislature intends to provide funds in the amount of $103,758,000 over the course of the 2023-2025 and 2025-2027 fiscal biennia for construction of the humanities and social science complex at Central Washington University. Pursuant to RCW 43.88.130, the university may enter into a multibiennium contract for the construction of the complex. Nothing in this section authorizes the university to make an expenditure without an appropriation.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,844,000

Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$7,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$85,600,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$92,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,361,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$11,158,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$108,963,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5026. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Secondary Geothermal Module (40000161)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section takes effect January 1, 2025.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$12,464,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$4,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$16,464,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5027. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Science Building Carbon Reduction (40000162)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section takes effect January 1, 2025.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$4,509,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,509,000

Sec. 5028. 2023 c 474 s 5072 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works - Preservation 2023-25 (40000006)
Appropriation:

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
(($4,888,000))

$5,388,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($19,552,000))

$21,552,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($24,440,000))

$26,940,000

Sec. 5029. 2023 c 474 s 6236 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Garage & Emergency Exit Concrete Remediation (40000053)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$838,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,477,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$63,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($901,000))

$2,378,000

Sec. 5030. 2023 c 474 s 5082 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Minor Works - Facility Repairs (23-25) (40000595)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The minor works project list for this section may include multiple projects related to necessary emergency repairs at Bellingham technical college. The projects must each be for distinct purposes and shall not be considered phases of a larger project for purposes of section 8017, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.
Appropriation:

Community and Technical College Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$2,537,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$36,909,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$39,446,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$157,784,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$197,230,000

Sec. 5031. 2023 c 474 s 5085 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Minor Works - Site Repairs (23-25) (40000698)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The minor works project list for this section may include multiple projects related to necessary emergency repairs at Bellingham technical college. The projects must each be for distinct purposes and shall not be considered phases of a larger project for purposes of section 8017, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.
Appropriation:

Community and Technical College Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,171,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$6,171,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$24,684,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$30,855,000

Sec. 5032. 2023 c 474 s 5086 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Minor Works - Infrastructure Replacement (23-25) (40000721)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The minor works project list for this section may include multiple projects related to necessary emergency repairs at Bellingham technical college. The projects must each be for distinct purposes and shall not be considered phases of a larger project for purposes of section 8017, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.
Appropriation:

Community and Technical College Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$3,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$37,300,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$40,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$161,200,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$201,500,000

Sec. 5033. 2023 c 474 s 5087 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Minor Works - Program Improvements (23-25) (40000754)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The minor works project list for this section may include multiple projects related to necessary emergency repairs at Bellingham technical college. The projects must each be for distinct purposes and shall not be considered phases of a larger project for purposes of section 8017, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.
Appropriation:

Community and Technical College Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$48,200,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$53,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$212,800,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$266,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5034. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

CBPS SBCTC Statewide: Utility Submeters for Clean Buildings Act (40000878)
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$8,374,000

Community and Technical College Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$170,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$8,544,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,544,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5035. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

CTC Energy Efficiency Program (40000880)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section takes effect January 1, 2025.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$8,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5036. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Bellingham Technical College: Campus Center Building (40000916)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$19,384,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$19,384,000

Sec. 5037. 2023 c 474 s 5089 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

HB 1390 - District Energy Systems (91000443)
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
(($429,000))

$1,153,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($429,000))

$1,153,000

(End of part)

PART 6

REAPPROPRIATIONS

Sec. 6001. 2023 c 474 s 6002 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Community Economic Revitalization Board (30000097)
Reappropriation:

Public ((Facility))Facilities Construction

Loan Revolving Account—State
. . . .
$7,774,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$10,246,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$18,020,000

Sec. 6002. 2023 c 474 s 6029 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Washington Broadband Program (40000117)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1012, chapter 356, Laws of 2020, except that funds may be used as loans or grants to finance eligible broadband infrastructure projects.
Reappropriation:

Statewide Broadband Account—State
. . . .
$16,079,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$5,471,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$21,550,000

Sec. 6003. 2023 c 474 s 6043 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 PWB Broadband Infrastructure (40000152)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1067, chapter 332, Laws of 2021, except that funds may be used as loans or grants to finance eligible broadband infrastructure projects.
Reappropriation:

Coronavirus Capital Projects Account—Federal
. . . .
(($45,040,000))

$46,000,000

Statewide Broadband Account—State
. . . .
$14,000,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
(($59,040,000))

$60,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($59,040,000))

$60,000,000

Sec. 6004. 2023 c 474 s 6061 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Substance Use Disorder Recovery Housing (91001675)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1031, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
(($48,000))

$150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($102,000))

$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$150,000

Sec. 6005. 2023 c 474 s 6068 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Food Banks (91001690)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1034, chapter 296, Laws of 2022, except that the $1,030,000 appropriation is for the Chelan Douglas Food Distribution Center (Wenatchee), and not the Chelan Douglas Distribution Center (Malaga).
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$5,686,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,586,000

Sec. 6006. 2023 c 474 s 6045 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Behavioral Health Community Capacity Grants (40000219)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 7010 of this act, except that the $4,275,000 appropriation is for Skagit County Crisis Stabilization Center (Sedro-Wooley), and not the Evergreen Health Monroe (Monroe) project.
Reappropriation:

Capital Community Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$26,323,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$89,011,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$115,334,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,153,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$121,487,000

Sec. 6007. 2023 c 474 s 6084 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2022 Crisis Stabilization Facilities (92001286)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1025, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

Capital Community Assistance Account—State
. . . .
(($71,995,000))

$48,297,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$5,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($72,000,000))

$48,302,000

Sec. 6008. 2023 c 474 s 6051 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2022 Rapid Capital Housing Acquisition (40000260)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1024, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

Apple Health and Homes Account—State
. . . .
$59,952,000

Capital Community Assistance Account—State
. . . .
(($175,558,000))

$171,658,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal
. . . .
$15,065,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$22,935,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
(($273,510,000))

$269,610,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$26,490,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($300,000,000))

$296,100,000

Sec. 6009. 2023 c 474 s 6052 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2023 Local and Community Projects (40000266)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 7007 of this act, except that $1,200,000 of the appropriation is for the Camp Boucher Civil Air Patrol Building Refurbishment, and not the Civil Air Patrol Hanger (Ephrata) project.
Reappropriation:

Capital Community Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$309,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$48,301,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$48,610,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$5,017,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$53,627,000

Sec. 6010. 2023 c 474 s 6053 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Ports Infrastructure (40000278)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1027, chapter 296, Laws of 2022, except that $1,550,000 of the appropriation is for the In-Water Asset Improvements (Port of Clarkston) project, and not the Dredge River Access (Port of Clarkston) project.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$14,328,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,718,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$16,046,000

Sec. 6011. 2023 c 474 s 6066 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Infrastructure Projects (91001687)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1033, chapter 296, Laws of 2022, except that $618,000 of the appropriation is for the Port of Mattawa Water Infrastructure (Mattawa) project, and not the Port of Mattawa Wastewater Infrastructure (Mattawa) project.
Reappropriation:

Capital Community Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$25,714,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal
. . . .
$94,106,000

Public Works Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$485,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,087,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$130,392,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,908,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$137,300,000

Sec. 6012. 2023 c 474 s 6073 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Projects that Strengthen Communities & Quality of Life (92000230)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6006, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

(2) The reappropriation for any project for which the department has not executed a contract by December 31, 2023, shall lapse. The department shall provide a list of lapsed projects to the legislative fiscal committees no later than January 15, 2024.

(3) Pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, funding for the seabrook trail project has lapsed.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($982,000))

$559,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$31,102,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($32,084,000))

$31,661,000

Sec. 6013. 2023 c 474 s 6097 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Thurston County Readiness Center (30000594)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1027, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$3,301,000

Military Department Capital Account—State
. . . .
(($553,000))

$10,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
(($3,854,000))

$3,311,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$44,098,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($47,952,000))

$47,409,000

Sec. 6014. 2023 c 474 s 6104 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Camp Murray Bldg. 20 Roof Top Unit Upgrade (40000189)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($307,000))

$2,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($6,000))

$8,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($313,000))

$10,000

Sec. 6015. 2023 c 474 s 6105 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital New Kitchen and Commissary Building (20081319)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2003, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,263,000))

$477,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($28,927,000))

$29,113,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($30,190,000))

$29,590,000

Sec. 6016. 2023 c 474 s 6135 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Transitional Care Center-Main Building: Patient Rooms Cooling (40000574)
Reappropriation:

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal
. . . .
(($2,315,000))

$2,335,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($20,000))

$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,335,000

Sec. 6017. 2023 c 474 s 6164 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

WVH HVAC Retrofit (40000006)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($395,000))

$424,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($355,000))

$326,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$750,000

Sec. 6018. 2023 c 474 s 6165 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

WSH - Life Safety Grant (40000013)
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
(($315,000))

$325,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($164,000))

$174,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
(($479,000))

$499,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($21,000))

$1,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$500,000

Sec. 6019. 2023 c 474 s 6179 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

WCC: Interim Mental Health Building (40000260)
Reappropriation:

Capital Community Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$672,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,237,000))

$1,522,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
(($1,909,000))

$2,194,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($38,000))

$53,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($1,947,000))

$2,247,000

Sec. 6020. 2023 c 474 s 6228 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Heritage Capital Grants Projects (30000297)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5054, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,003,000))

$750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($7,376,000))

$7,552,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($8,379,000))

$8,302,000

Sec. 6021. 2023 c 474 s 6328 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 Water Banking (91000373)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: ((The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 7052 of this act.))

(1)(a) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for the department to administer a pilot grant program for water banking strategies to meet local water needs.

(b) $2,000,000 is provided solely for qualified applicants located within the Methow River Basin.

(2)(a) Grant awards may only be used for:

(i) Development of water banks in rural counties as defined in RCW 82.14.370;

(ii) Acquisition of water rights appropriate for use in a water bank including all costs necessary to evaluate the water right for eligibility for its intended use; and

(iii) Activities necessary to facilitate the creation of a water bank.

(b) For applicants located outside of the Methow River Basin, grant awards may only be used for water banking strategies within the county of origin.

(3) Grant awards may not exceed $4,000,000 per applicant.

(4) For the purposes of a grant pursuant to this section, a water bank must meet water needs, which include, but are not limited to, agricultural use and instream flow for fish and wildlife. The water bank must preserve water rights for use in the county of origin and for permanent instream flows for fish and wildlife through the primary and secondary reaches of the water right.

(5) To be eligible to receive a grant under this section, an applicant must:

(a) Be a public entity or a participant in a public-private partnership with a public entity;

(b) Exhibit sufficient expertise and capacity to develop and maintain a water bank consistent with the purposes of this appropriation;

(c) Secure a valid interest to purchase a water right;

(d) Show that the water rights appear to be adequate for the intended use; and

(e) Agree to have one-third of any water right purchased with the funds appropriated under this section to have its purpose of use changed permanently to instream flow benefiting fish and wildlife.

(6) In determining whether a grant request is eligible for funding under this section, the department may not disqualify proposals that purchase water rights from an existing water bank.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

State Drought Preparedness Account—

State
. . . .
$9,000,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$14,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$14,000,000

Sec. 6022. 2023 c 474 s 6336 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM

2021-23 Underground Storage Tank Capital Financial Assistance Pgm (30000705)
Reappropriation:

Pollution Liability Insurance Agency Underground

Storage Tank Revolving Account—State
. . . .
(($11,733,000))

$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$267,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($12,000,000))

$10,267,000

Sec. 6023. 2023 c 474 s 6337 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM

2021-23 Heating Oil Capital Financing Assistance Program (30000706)
Reappropriation:

Pollution Liability Insurance Agency Underground

Storage Tank Revolving Account—State
. . . .
(($7,815,000))

$150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$185,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($8,000,000))

$335,000

Sec. 6024. 2023 c 474 s 6366 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Boating Facilities Program (30000410)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3072, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.
Reappropriation:

Recreation Resources Account—State
. . . .
(($5,473,000))

$3,323,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$11,702,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($17,175,000))

$15,025,000

Sec. 6025. 2023 c 474 s 6376 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2019-21 - Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (40000004)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3201, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$17,126,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($2,174,000))

$5,840,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
(($19,300,000))

$22,966,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($55,700,000))

$52,034,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$75,000,000

Sec. 6026. 2023 c 474 s 6392 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2021-23 - Boating Facilities Program (40000023)
Reappropriation:

Recreation Resources Account—State
. . . .
(($12,283,000))

$12,950,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($2,667,000))

$2,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$14,950,000

Sec. 6027. 2023 c 474 s 6460 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Omak Consolidation, Expansion and Relocation (40000033)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($93,000))

$5,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($15,000))

$20,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($108,000))

$25,000

Sec. 6028. 2023 c 474 s 6496 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Bates: Medical Mile Health Science Center (30000989)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($7,000))

$108,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($44,059,000))

$43,958,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$44,066,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6029. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) 2023 c 474 s 6083 (uncodified);

(2) 2023 c 474 s 6343 (uncodified);

(3) 2023 c 474 s 6489 (uncodified); and

(4) 2023 c 474 s 6490 (uncodified).

(End of part)

PART 7

Reserved.

(End of part)

PART 8

MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

Sec. 8001. 2023 c 474 s 8001 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

RCW 43.88.031 requires the disclosure of the estimated debt service costs associated with new capital bond appropriations. The estimated debt service costs for the appropriations contained in this act are (($59,934,000))$35,897,928 for the 2023-2025 biennium, (($371,683,000))$342,236,404 for the 2025-2027 biennium, and (($519,454,000))$491,366,915 for the 2027-2029 biennium.

Sec. 8002. 2023 c 474 s 8002 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
ACQUISITION OF PROPERTIES AND FACILITIES THROUGH FINANCIAL CONTRACTS.
(1) The following agencies may enter into financial contracts, paid from any funds of an agency, appropriated or nonappropriated, for the purposes indicated and in not more than the principal amounts indicated, plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW. When securing properties under this section, agencies shall use the most economical financial contract option available, including long-term leases, lease-purchase agreements, lease-development with option to purchase agreements or financial contracts using certificates of participation. Expenditures made by an agency for one of the indicated purposes before the issue date of the authorized financial contract and any certificates of participation therein are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of the financial contract and any certificates of participation therein to the extent provided in the agency's financing plan approved by the state finance committee.

(2) Those noninstructional facilities of higher education institutions authorized in this section to enter into financial contracts are not eligible for state funded maintenance and operations. Instructional space that is available for regularly scheduled classes for academic transfer, basic skills, and workforce training programs may be eligible for state funded maintenance and operations.

(3) Secretary of state: Enter into a financing contract for up to $119,000,000 plus financing expenses, required reserves, and capitalized interest pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a new library-archives building.

(4) Department of social and health services: Enter into a financing contract for up to $175,888,000 plus costs and financing expenses, required reserves, and capitalized interest pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a nursing facility on the Fircrest residential habilitation center campus. The department may contract to lease develop or lease purchase the facility. Before entering into a contract, the department must consult with the office of financial management and the office of the state treasurer. Should the department of social and health services choose to use a financing contract that does not provide for the issuance of certificates of participation, the financing contract shall be subject to approval by the state finance committee as required by RCW 39.94.010. In approving a financing contract not providing for the use of certificates of participation, the state finance committee should be reasonably certain that the contract is excluded from the computation of indebtedness, particularly that the contract is not backed by the full faith and credit of the state and the legislature is expressly not obligated to appropriate funds to make payments. For purposes of this subsection, "financing contract" includes but is not limited to a certificate of participation and tax exempt financing similar to that authorized in RCW 47.79.140.

(5) Western Washington University: Enter into a financing contract for up to $4,900,000 plus costs and financing expenses, required reserves, and capitalized interest pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct an electrical engineering and computer science building.

(6) The state board for community and technical colleges: Enter into a financing contract for up to $2,000,000 plus costs and financing expenses, required reserves, and capitalized interest pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to renovate building J at the Renton technical college.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8003. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—TRANSFERS

(1) Climate Commitment Account—State: For transfer to the

general fund—state account, $8,000,000 for fiscal year 2025

for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6243 (technology

manuf./B&O tax). . . .$8,000,000

(2) General Fund—State: For transfer

to the stadium and exhibition center capital improvement

account for the purposes of the loan in section (...) of

this act. . . .$10,000,000

Sec. 8004. RCW 70A.65.305 and 2022 c 253 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Agencies that allocate funding or administer grant programs appropriated from the climate investment account created in RCW 70A.65.250, the climate commitment account created in RCW 70A.65.260, and the natural climate solutions account created in RCW 70A.65.270 must offer early, meaningful, and individual consultation with any affected federally recognized tribe on all funding decisions and funding programs that may impact tribal resources, including tribal cultural resources, archaeological sites, sacred sites, fisheries, or other rights and interests in tribal lands and lands within which a tribe or tribes possess rights reserved or protected by federal treaty, statute, or executive order. The consultation is independent of, and in addition to, any public participation process required by federal or state law, or by a federal or state agency, including the requirements of Executive Order 21-02 related to archaeological and cultural resources, and regardless of whether the agency receives a request for consultation from a federally recognized tribe. The goal of the consultation process is to identify tribal resources or rights potentially affected by the funding decisions and funding programs, assess their effects, and seek ways to avoid, minimize, or mitigate any adverse effects on tribal resources or rights.

(2) At the earliest possible date prior to submittal of an application, applicants for funding from the accounts created in RCW 70A.65.250, 70A.65.260, and 70A.65.270 shall engage in a preapplication process with all affected federally recognized tribes within the project area. During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, salmon habitat and climate resilience projects funded from the natural climate solutions account created in RCW 70A.65.270 that went through the application and prioritization process before July 1, 2023, are exempt from the preapplication requirements under this subsection.

(a) The preapplication process must include the applicant notifying the department of archaeology and historic preservation, the department of fish and wildlife, and all affected federally recognized tribes within the project area. The notification must include geographical location, detailed scope of the proposed project, preliminary application details available to federal, state, or local governmental jurisdictions, and all publicly available materials, including public funding sources.

(b) The applicant must also offer to discuss the project with the department of archaeology and historic preservation, the department of fish and wildlife, and all affected federally recognized tribes within the project area. Discussions may include the project's impact to tribal resources, including tribal cultural resources, archaeological sites, sacred sites, fisheries, or other rights and interests in tribal lands and lands within which a tribe or tribes possess rights reserved or protected by federal treaty, statute, or executive order.

(c) All affected federally recognized tribes may submit to the appropriate agency or agencies a summary of tribal issues, questions, concerns, or other statements regarding the project, which must become part of the official application file. The summary does not limit what issues affected federally recognized tribes may raise in the consultation process identified in subsections (1), (3) through (7), and (9) of this section.

(d) The notification and offer to initiate discussion must be documented with the application when it is filed, and a copy of the application must be delivered to the department of archaeology and historic preservation, the department of fish and wildlife, and to the affected federally recognized tribe or tribes. If the discussions pursuant to (b) of this subsection do not occur, the applicant must document the reason why the discussion or discussions did not occur.

(e) Nothing in this section may be interpreted to require the disclosure of information that is exempt from disclosure pursuant to RCW 42.56.300 or federal law, including section 304 of the national historic preservation act of 1966. Any information that is exempt from disclosure pursuant to RCW 42.56.300 or federal law, including section 304 of the national historic preservation act of 1966, shall not become part of the official application file.

(3) If any funding decision, program, project, or activity that may impact tribal resources, including tribal cultural resources, archaeological sites, sacred sites, fisheries, or other rights and interests in tribal lands and lands within which a tribe or tribes possess rights reserved by federal treaty, statute, or executive order is funded from the accounts created in RCW 70A.65.250, 70A.65.260, and 70A.65.270 without such a consultation with an affected federally recognized tribe, the affected federally recognized tribe may request that all further action on the decision, program, project, or activity cease until meaningful consultation is completed. Upon receipt of such a request by an agency or agencies with the authority to allocate funding or administer grant programs from the accounts listed in subsection (1) of this section in support of the proposed project, further action by the agency or agencies on any decision, program, project, or activity that would result in significant physical disturbance of the tribal resource or resources described in this subsection must cease until the consultation has been completed.

(4) Upon completion of agency and tribal consultation, an affected federally recognized tribe may request a formal review of the consultation by submitting a request to the governor's office of Indian affairs and notifying the appropriate agencies and the department of archaeology and historic preservation. The state agencies and tribe must meet to initiate discussion within no more than 20 days of the request. This consultation must be offered and conducted separately with each affected federally recognized tribe, unless the tribes agree to conduct a joint consultation with the state.

(5) After the state agencies and tribe or tribes have conducted a formal review under subsection (4) of this section, an affected federally recognized tribe or state agency may request that the governor and an elected tribal leader or leaders of a federally recognized tribal government meet to formally consider the recommendations from the parties. If requested, this meeting must occur within 30 days of the request, except that a federally recognized tribe may choose to opt out of the meeting. This timeline may be extended by mutual agreement between the governor and the tribal leaders.

(6) After the meeting identified in subsection (5) of this section has occurred, the governor or an elected tribal leader of a federally recognized tribe may call for the state and tribe or tribes to enter into formal mediation, except that a federally recognized tribe may choose to opt out of the mediation. If entered into, the mediation must be conducted as a government-to-government proceeding, with each sovereign government retaining their right to a final decision that meets their separate obligations and interests. Mediators must be jointly selected by the parties to the mediation. An agreement between the governor and a tribal leader or leaders resulting from the mediation is formally recognized and binding on the signatory parties. Absent an agreement, participation in mediation does not preclude any additional steps that any party can initiate, including legal review, to resolve a continuing disagreement.

(7) During the proceedings outlined in subsections (4) through (6) of this section, the agency or agencies with the authority to allocate funding or administer grant programs from the accounts listed in subsection (1) of this section in support of the proposed project may not approve or release funding, or make other formal decisions, including permitting, that advance the proposed project except where required by law.

(8) By June 30, 2023, the governor's office of Indian affairs, in coordination with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and federally recognized tribes, shall develop a state agency tribal consultation process, including best practices for early, meaningful, and effective consultation, early notification and engagement by applicants with federally recognized tribes as a part of the preapplication process in subsection (2) of this section, and protocols for communication and collaboration with federally recognized tribes. The consultation process developed under this section must be periodically reviewed and updated in coordination with federally recognized tribes. The governor's office of Indian affairs must provide training and other technical assistance to state agencies, as they implement the required consultation. Notwithstanding the governor's office of Indian affairs' ongoing work pursuant to this subsection, the provisions of subsections (1) through (7) and (9) of this section become effective as of June 9, 2022.

(9) The requirements of this section apply to local governments that receive funding from the accounts created in RCW 70A.65.250, 70A.65.260, and 70A.65.270, where that funding is disbursed to project and program applicants. Where requested, the governor's office of Indian affairs must provide training and other technical assistance to local government agencies as they implement the consultation requirements of this section.

(10) Any agency subject to or implementing this section may adopt rules in furtherance of its duties under this section.

(11) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department must establish a tribal capacity grant program to provide funding to federally recognized tribes for the costs of implementing this section.

Sec. 8005. RCW 70A.305.190 and 2022 c 102 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The model toxics control capital account is hereby created in the state treasury.

(2) In addition to the funds deposited into the model toxics control capital account required under RCW 82.21.030, the following moneys must be deposited into the model toxics control capital account:

(a) The costs of remedial actions recovered under this chapter, except as provided under RCW 70A.305.170(7);

(b) Penalties collected or recovered under this chapter; and

(c) Any other money appropriated or transferred to the account by the legislature.

(3) Moneys in the model toxics control capital account must be used for the improvement, rehabilitation, remediation, and cleanup of toxic sites and other capital-related expenditures for programs and activities identified in subsection (4) of this section.

(4) Moneys in the model toxics control capital account may be used only for capital projects and activities that carry out the purposes of this chapter and for financial assistance to local governments or other persons to carry out those projects or activities, including but not limited to the following, generally in descending order of priority:

(a) Remedial actions, including the following generally in descending order of priority:

(i) Extended grant agreements entered into under subsection (5)(a) of this section;

(ii) Grants or loans to local governments for remedial actions, including planning for adaptive reuse of properties as provided for under subsection (5)(d) of this section. The department must prioritize funding of remedial actions at:

(A) Facilities on the department's hazardous sites list with a high hazard ranking for which there is an approved remedial action work plan or an equivalent document under federal cleanup law;

(B) Brownfield properties within a redevelopment opportunity zone if the local government is a prospective purchaser of the property and there is a department-approved remedial action work plan or equivalent document under the federal cleanup law;

(iii) Department-conducted remedial actions;

(iv) Grants to persons intending to remediate contaminated real property for development of affordable housing;

(v) Public funding to assist potentially liable persons to pay for the costs of remedial action in compliance with clean-up standards under RCW 70A.305.030(2)(e) if:

(A) The amount and terms of the funding are established under a settlement agreement under RCW 70A.305.040(4); and

(B) The director has found that the funding will achieve both a substantially more expeditious or enhanced cleanup than would otherwise occur, and the prevention or mitigation of unfair economic hardship;

(vi) Public funding to assist prospective purchasers to pay for the costs of remedial action in compliance with clean-up standards under RCW 70A.305.030(2)(e) if:

(A) The facility is located within a redevelopment opportunity zone designated under RCW 70A.305.150;

(B) The amount and terms of the funding are established under a settlement agreement under RCW 70A.305.040(5); and

(C) The director has found the funding will achieve a substantially more expeditious or enhanced cleanup than would otherwise occur, provide a public benefit in addition to cleanup commensurate with the scope of the public funding; and meet any additional criteria established in rule by the department; and

(vii) To expedite multiparty clean-up efforts, purchase of remedial action cost-cap insurance;

(b) Grants, or loans, or contracts to local governments for solid waste plans and programs under chapters 70A.205, 70A.214, 70A.224, 70A.222, 70A.230, and 70A.300 RCW. Funds must be allocated consistent with priorities and matching requirements in the respective chapters;

(c) Toxic air pollutant reduction programs, including grants or loans to local governments for woodstoves and diesel;

(d) Grants, loans, or contracts to local governments for hazardous waste plans and programs under chapters 70A.405 and 70A.300 RCW, including chemical action plan implementation. Funds must be allocated consistent with priorities and matching requirements in the respective chapters; and

(e) Petroleum-based plastic or expanded polystyrene foam debris clean-up activities in fresh or marine waters.

(5) The department may establish and administer a program to provide grants and loans to local governments for remedial actions, including planning for adaptive reuse of contaminated properties. To expedite cleanups throughout the state, the department may use the following strategies when providing grants to local governments under this subsection:

(a) Enter into an extended grant agreement with a local government conducting remedial actions at a facility where those actions extend over multiple biennia and the total eligible cost of those actions exceeds $20,000,000. The agreement is subject to the following limitations:

(i) The initial duration of such an agreement may not exceed 10 years. The department may extend the duration of such an agreement upon finding substantial progress has been made on remedial actions at the facility;

(ii) Extended grant agreements may not exceed 50 percent of the total eligible remedial action costs at the facility; and

(iii) The department may not allocate future funding to an extended grant agreement unless the local government has demonstrated to the department that funds awarded under the agreement during the previous biennium have been substantially expended or contracts have been entered into to substantially expend the funds;

(b) Enter into a grant agreement with a local government conducting a remedial action that provides for periodic reimbursement of remedial action costs as they are incurred as established in the agreement;

(c) Enter into a grant agreement with a local government prior to it acquiring a property or obtaining necessary access to conduct remedial actions, provided the agreement is conditioned upon the local government acquiring the property or obtaining the access in accordance with a schedule specified in the agreement;

(d) Provide integrated planning grants to local governments to fund studies necessary to facilitate remedial actions at brownfield properties and adaptive reuse of properties following remediation. Eligible activities include, but are not limited to: Environmental site assessments; remedial investigations; health assessments; feasibility studies; site planning; community involvement; land use and regulatory analyses; building and infrastructure assessments; economic and fiscal analyses; and any environmental analyses under chapter 43.21C RCW;

(e) Provide grants to local governments for remedial actions related to area-wide groundwater contamination. To receive the funding, the local government does not need to be a potentially liable person or be required to seek reimbursement of grant funds from a potentially liable person;

(f) The director may alter grant matching requirements to create incentives for local governments to expedite cleanups when one of the following conditions exists:

(i) Funding would prevent or mitigate unfair economic hardship imposed by the clean-up liability;

(ii) Funding would create new substantial economic development, public recreational opportunities, or habitat restoration opportunities that would not otherwise occur; or

(iii) Funding would create an opportunity for acquisition and redevelopment of brownfield property under RCW 70A.305.040(5) that would not otherwise occur; and

(g) When pending grant applications under subsection (4)(d) and (e) of this section exceed the amount of funds available, designated redevelopment opportunity zones must receive priority for distribution of available funds.

(6) Except for unanticipated receipts under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, moneys in model toxics control capital account may be spent only after appropriation by statute.

(7) The legislature finds that, in 2023, wildfires in Spokane county resulted in a loss of approximately 366 homes as well as secondary buildings. The burning of these structures has resulted in a large toxic debris field containing asbestos, heavy metals, plastics, and fuel which are at risk of leaching into the soil and groundwater. During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, moneys in the model toxics control capital account may be used for financial assistance to local governments for the testing of hazardous materials, removal of debris, and remediation of soil necessary to support the rebuilding of communities impacted by these wildfires.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8006. By June 30, 2025, custody and control of the maple lane campus must be transferred from the department of corrections to the department of social and health services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8007. (1) The legislature recognizes the honor of Seattle being chosen as a host city for the 2026 FIFA World Cup soccer competition. The matches will attract hundreds of thousands of fans to our region and bring unprecedented attention to Seattle and the state of Washington as a whole. In recognition of the economic benefit to the state, the legislature intends to provide assistance in making the capital improvements necessary to host this event.

(2) The stadium and exhibition center capital improvement account is created in the state treasury for the purpose of advancing moneys to the Washington state public stadium authority for capital improvements required to host the 2026 world cup. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.

(3) The department of commerce must work with the state treasurer to record distributions from the account and calculate the repayment obligation for amounts expended. Moneys must be repaid no later than September 30, 2026, and accrue interest at a rate that is 0.5 percent higher than the interest rate that the account would have earned without the transfer. If not earlier paid, on September 30, 2026, the director of the office of financial management shall direct the state treasurer to transfer any amounts due from the stadium and exhibition center account created in RCW 43.99N.060 to the general fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8008. (1) The legislature intends to provide avenues and funding to allow entities within the state to leverage federal match funding to the greatest extent possible. During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the department of commerce may use unallocated amounts appropriated in sections 1020, 1021, and 1022 of this act for grants under this section with the written authorization of the director of the office of financial management.

(2) Grants under this section may be provided solely for matching funds to allow entities within the state to compete for and receive funding opportunities from federal agencies, including but not limited to, the United States department of energy, the United States environmental protection agency, the United States department of agriculture, the United States economic development administration, and the United States department of defense.

(3) Entities eligible for grants under this section include, but are not limited to, local governments, federally recognized tribal governments and tribes' contracted service providers, public and private utilities, ports, associate development organizations, for-profit entities, academic and research institutions, nonprofit organizations, and state agencies.

(4) Projects eligible for funding must be physically located in Washington state and may be spent only for activities eligible to match for competitive federal funding and formula grants. Eligible projects must be consistent with the state energy strategy adopted under chapter 43.21F RCW and clean energy policies under chapter 19.405 RCW. Projects must further the goals of the climate commitment act as described in RCW 70A.65.260(1)(j).

(5) The department must:

(a) Consider equity and environmental justice in developing opportunities for applicant participation and must follow principles established in its community engagement plan adopted under RCW 70A.02.050.

(b) Consider projects that will spur an additional investment or economic activity in the region.

(c) To the extent practicable, seek projects that provide benefits to vulnerable populations in overburdened communities, with a goal of directing at least 20 percent of grants for this purpose.

(6) The department may require the applicant to provide nonstate matching funds beyond the amount required to secure the federal funding opportunity.

(7) On a quarterly basis, the department of commerce and office of financial management must submit to the capital committees of the legislature a list of all grants authorized under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8009. A new section is added to chapter 70A.01 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The consolidated climate account is created in the state treasury. Revenues to the account consist of appropriations and transfers by the legislature and all other funding directed for deposit into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.

(2)(a) If chapter . . . (Initiative Measure No. 2117), Laws of 2025, is approved by the voters at the next general election and certified by the secretary of state, any residual balance remaining in the following accounts must be transferred by the state treasurer to the consolidated climate account:

(i) The climate investment account (RCW 70A.65.250);

(ii) The climate commitment account (RCW 70A.65.260);

(iii) The natural climate solutions account (RCW 70A.65.270); and

(iv) The air quality and health disparities improvement account (RCW 70A.65.280).

(b) The office of financial management and state treasurer may take the ministerial actions necessary to implement the provisions of this section, including payment of accruals on the books prior to closure of the repealed accounts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8010. (1) Agencies may not expend moneys from the: (a) Climate investment account; (b) climate commitment account; (c) natural climate solutions account; or (d) air quality and health disparities improvement account on or after the effective date of Initiative Measure No. 2117.

(2) Unspent appropriations in the 2023-2025 capital omnibus appropriations act, chapter 474, Laws of 2023 and chapter . . ., Laws of 2024 (this act), which are appropriated from the: (a) Climate investment account; (b) climate commitment account; (c) natural climate solutions account; or (d) air quality and health disparities improvement account and which take effect before January 1, 2025, must thereafter be paid from the consolidated climate account as if they were appropriated from that account.

(3) Appropriations in this act from the accounts listed in subsection (1)(a) through (1)(d) of this section which take effect on or after January 1, 2025, shall lapse.

(4) This section takes effect only if chapter . . . (Initiative Measure No. 2117), Laws of 2025, is approved by the voters at the next general election and certified by the secretary of state.

Sec. 8011. RCW 43.19.125 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 204 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director of enterprise services shall have custody and control of the capitol buildings and grounds, supervise and direct proper care, heating, lighting and repairing thereof, and designate rooms in the capitol buildings to be occupied by various state officials.

(2) ((During the 2007-2009 biennium, responsibility for development of the "Wheeler block" on the capitol campus as authorized in section 6013, chapter 520, Laws of 2007 shall be transferred from the department of general administration to the department of information services.))During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the director must give legislative members reasonable access to reserve and utilize the reception room in the state legislative building when not otherwise booked.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8012. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8013. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

(End of part)

--- END ---