BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

PART I

GENERAL GOVERNMENT

Sec. 101. 2023 c 475 s 101 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($59,938,000))

$60,117,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($62,150,000))

$62,295,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($122,088,000))

$122,412,000

Sec. 102. 2023 c 475 s 102 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SENATE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($44,398,000))

$44,427,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($47,773,000))

$47,805,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($92,171,000))

$92,232,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $260,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $270,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the payment of membership dues to the council of state governments, the national conference of state legislatures, the pacific northwest economic region, the pacific fisheries legislative task force, and the western legislative forestry task force.

Sec. 103. 2023 c 475 s 103 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEE

Performance Audits of Government Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($14,936,000))

$15,342,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($14,936,000))

$15,342,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the joint legislative audit and review committee may adjust the due dates for projects included on the committee's 2023-2025 work plan as necessary to efficiently manage workload.

(2) $250,000 of the performance audits of government account—state appropriation is for tax preference review costs from legislation enacted in the 2023 session.

(3) $1,503,000 of the performance audits of government account—state appropriation is for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1436 (special education funding). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(4) $626,000 of the performance audits of government account—state appropriation is for the audit required in Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5080 (cannabis social equity). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(5) Within the amount appropriated in this section, the joint legislative audit and review committee shall conduct a review of the state's recreational boating programs. The committee shall complete the review by December 1, 2024. This review shall include examination of the following:

(a) Revenue sources for state recreational boating programs;

(b) Expenditures for state boating programs;

(c) Methods of administrating state recreational boating programs, including the roles of both state and local government entities; and

(d) Approaches other states have taken to funding and administering their recreational boating programs.

(6)(a) $400,000 of the performance audits of government account—state appropriation is for the joint legislative audit and review committee to:

(i) Review the department of children, youth, and families-juvenile rehabilitation program's existing processes and staffing methodology used for determining adequate staffing ratios to meet the confinement and rehabilitative needs of the juveniles and ensure public safety;

(ii) Review procedures and protocols for professional development, hiring and recruitment, and training for staff serving youth in juvenile rehabilitation institutions, with a focus on how staff are trained to implement rehabilitative practices;

(iii) Review youth access to programming, treatment, and services including, but not limited to, educational programming, treatment and services for youth experiencing substance use disorder, behavioral health treatment, available reentry services such as housing, job training, and other supports, access to technology services, family and community connections, and other programming and services offered by the department to provide youth with rehabilitation and restorative interventions;

(iv) Review existing security and safety measures, including the use of disciplinary procedures for total isolation and room confinement, adopted by the department and their effectiveness in meeting the unique needs of the juvenile population in the custody of the department;

(v) Review how often and how many youth face new juvenile or adult criminal offense charges, convictions, or both while residing at juvenile rehabilitation institutions and potential future consequences that may occur as a result such as sentence extension, likelihood of recidivism, health impacts, and effects regarding criminal records;

(vi) Assess gender equity regarding education, employment, and career options for female youth;

(vii) Review how staffing impacts youth-on-youth conflict and safety;

(viii) Review best practices from other states regarding security and safety measures, programming opportunities, reentry supports, staff training and professional development, and staffing ratios, and identify options that may be feasible to adopt in Washington state to increase public safety and the security, programming options, treatment services, and rehabilitation mission of the department's juvenile rehabilitation institutions;

(ix) Review the department's existing processes for responding to critical incidents, including communication and cooperation with local law enforcement, and identify areas for improvement; and

(x) Review the impacts of changes in average daily population, longer lengths of stay, longer sentences, increases in maximum age of release, increases in more serious offense types and adult sentences, and related effects of chapter 322, Laws of 2019.

(b) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall report its findings and recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2026. The report shall include recommendations on supporting the juvenile rehabilitation program's efforts to gradually move young people from carceral settings to least restrictive environments to improve positive reentry outcomes.

Sec. 104. 2023 c 475 s 104 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE

Performance Audits of Government Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$5,326,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$5,326,000

Sec. 105. 2023 c 475 s 105 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE SYSTEMS COMMITTEE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($21,727,000))

$21,477,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($19,625,000))

$20,759,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($41,352,000))

$42,236,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: Within the amounts provided in this section, the joint legislative systems committee shall provide information technology support, including but not limited to internet service, for the district offices of members of the house of representatives and the senate.

Sec. 106. 2023 c 475 s 106 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF STATE LEGISLATIVE LABOR RELATIONS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$961,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($964,000))

$965,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,925,000))

$1,926,000

Sec. 107. 2023 c 475 s 107 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF THE STATE ACTUARY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$409,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$423,000

State Health Care Authority Administrative Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$291,000

Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
(($7,102,000))

$7,101,000

School Employees' Insurance Administrative Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$258,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($8,483,000))

$8,482,000

Sec. 108. 2023 c 475 s 108 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATUTE LAW COMMITTEE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$6,201,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($6,808,000))

$6,811,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($13,009,000))

$13,012,000

Sec. 109. 2023 c 475 s 109 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF LEGISLATIVE SUPPORT SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($5,852,000))

$5,893,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($6,465,000))

$6,653,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($12,317,000))

$12,546,000

Sec. 110. 2023 c 475 s 111 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPREME COURT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$14,883,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($15,196,000))

$16,269,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($30,079,000))

$31,152,000

Sec. 111. 2023 c 475 s 112 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMISSION ON JUDICIAL CONDUCT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($2,225,000))

$2,224,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($2,206,000))

$2,208,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($4,431,000))

$4,432,000

Sec. 112. 2023 c 475 s 113 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COURT OF APPEALS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($25,901,000))

$28,199,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($26,491,000))

$27,564,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($52,392,000))

$55,763,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $764,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $764,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5046 (postconviction counsel). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

Sec. 113. 2023 c 475 s 114 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($123,740,000))

$125,526,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($118,331,000))

$123,463,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,209,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$681,000

Judicial Stabilization Trust Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($112,345,000))

$119,616,000

Judicial Information Systems Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$79,530,000

Opioid Abatement Settlement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$479,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($436,836,000))

$451,504,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The distributions made under this section and distributions from the county criminal justice assistance account made pursuant to section 801 of this act constitute appropriate reimbursement for costs for any new programs or increased level of service for purposes of RCW 43.135.060.

(2)(a) $7,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $7,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for distribution to county juvenile court administrators for the costs associated with processing and case management of truancy, children in need of services, and at-risk youth referrals. The administrator for the courts, in conjunction with the juvenile court administrators, shall develop an equitable funding distribution formula. The formula must neither reward counties with higher than average per-petition/referral processing costs nor shall it penalize counties with lower than average per-petition/referral processing costs.

(b) Each fiscal year during the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, each county shall report the number of petitions processed and the total actual costs of processing truancy, children in need of services, and at-risk youth petitions. Counties shall submit the reports to the administrator for the courts no later than 45 days after the end of the fiscal year. The administrator for the courts shall electronically transmit this information to the chairs and ranking minority members of the house of representatives and senate fiscal committees no later than 60 days after a fiscal year ends. These reports are informational in nature and are not for the purpose of distributing funds.

(3) $1,094,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,094,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the statewide fiscal impact on Thurston county courts. It is the intent of the legislature that this policy will be continued in subsequent fiscal biennia.

(4) $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,000,000 of the ((general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025))judicial stabilization trust account—state appropriation are provided solely for distribution to local courts for costs associated with the court-appointed attorney and visitor requirements set forth in the uniform guardianship act, chapter 11.130 RCW. If the amount provided in this subsection is insufficient to fully fund the local court costs, distributions must be reduced on a proportional basis to ensure that expenditures remain within the available funds provided in this subsection. No later than December 31, 2023, the administrative office of the courts will provide a report on distributions to local courts including, but not limited to, the amount provided to each court, the number of guardianship cases funded at each court, costs segregated by attorney appointments and court visitor appointments, the amount of any pro rata reductions, and a recommendation on how to forecast distributions for potential future funding by the legislature.

(5) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the administrative office of the courts to use as matching funds to distribute to small municipal and county courts, located in a rural county as defined in RCW 43.160.020, for the purpose of increasing security for court facilities. Grants must be used solely for security equipment and services for municipal, district, and superior courts and may not be used for staffing or administrative costs.

(6) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the administrative office of the courts to provide grants to superior courts for the purpose of creating or expanding sanitary lactation spaces or pods that provide privacy for courthouse visitors needing to breastfeed or express breast milk.

(7) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the administrative office of the courts to contract with an equity and justice nonprofit organization to expand the capacity of the existing equity dashboard program. The contract must review and organize newly available criminal case data with the goal of consolidating and collecting adult felony case data to determine disparities in the legal justice system. The equity dashboard program must be expanded to include adult felony case data that is consolidated, interactable, transparent, and accessible to the public.

(8) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1766 (protection orders/hope cards). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(9) $1,090,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,090,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to address data quality issues across Washington state court management systems.

(10) $51,428,000 of the judicial stabilization trust account—state appropriation is provided solely to establish a direct refund process to individuals to refund legal financial obligations, collection costs, and document-verified costs paid to third parties previously paid by defendants whose convictions have been vacated by court order due to the State v. Blake ruling. Superior court clerks, district court administrators, and municipal court administrators must certify and send to the office the amount of any refund ordered by the court. The court order must either contain the amount of the refund or provide language for the clerk or court administrator to certify to the office the amount to be refunded to the individual.

(11) $1,627,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 ((is))and $1,812,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for activities of the office relating to the resentencing and/or vacating convictions of individuals and refund of legal financial obligations and costs associated with the State v. Blake ruling. In addition to contracting with cities and counties for the disbursement of funds appropriated for resentencing costs, the office must:

(a) Collaborate with superior court clerks, district court administrators, and municipal court administrators to prepare comprehensive reports, based on available court records, of all cause numbers impacted by State v. Blake going back to 1971. Such reports must include the refund amount related to each cause number;

(b) In collaboration with the office of public defense and the office of civil legal aid, establish a process that can be used by individuals seeking a refund, provide individuals information regarding the application process necessary to claim a refund, and issue payments from the refund bureau to individuals certified in subsection (10) of this section; and

(c) Collaborate with counties and municipalities to adopt standard coding for application to State v. Blake convictions and to develop a standardized practice regarding vacated convictions.

(12) $38,000,000 of the judicial stabilization trust account—state appropriation is provided solely to assist counties with costs of complying with the State v. Blake decision that arise from the county's role in operating the state's criminal justice system, including resentencing, vacating prior convictions for simple drug possession, and certifying refunds of legal financial obligations and collections costs. The office shall contract with counties for judicial, clerk, defense, and prosecution expenses for these purposes if requested by a county. A county may designate the office to use available funding to administer a vacate process, or a portion of the vacate process, on behalf of the county. The office must collaborate with counties to adopt standard coding for application to Blake convictions and to develop a standardized practice regarding vacated convictions.

(13) $11,500,000 of the judicial stabilization trust account—state appropriation is provided solely to assist cities with costs of complying with the State v. Blake decision that arise from the city's role in operating the city's criminal justice system, including vacating prior convictions for simple drug possession, to include cannabis and possession of paraphernalia, and certifying refunds of legal financial obligations and collections costs. The office shall contract with cities for judicial, clerk, defense, and prosecution expenses for these purposes if requested by a city. A city may designate the office to use available funding to administer a vacate process, or a portion of the vacate process, on behalf of the city. The office must collaborate with cities to adopt standard coding for application to Blake convictions and to develop a standardized practice regarding vacated convictions.

(14) $439,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $304,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5128 (jury diversity). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(15) (($1,560,000))$40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 ((is))and $1,520,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely the office to administer a jury pay pilot program in Pierce county. Funding must be used to increase jury pay up to (($50))$100 for each day served in Pierce county superior court. The funds provided in this subsection must supplement, and not supplant, existing local funding for juror pay. The office must compare juror demographics after the pay increase as compared to data collected from the 2022 jury demographic survey to measure the impact increasing juror pay has on jury diversity and juror response rates.

(16) $1,800,000 of the judicial stabilization trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for distribution to counties to help cover the cost of electronic monitoring with victim notification technology when an individual seeking a protection order requests electronic monitoring with victim notification technology from the court and the respondent is unable to pay. Of the amount provided in this subsection, up to five percent of the funding each fiscal year may be used by the office for education and outreach to the courts regarding this technology.

(17) $18,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $18,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1102 (judge pro tempore compensation). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(18) $20,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1562 (violence). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(19) $109,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed House Bill No. 1324 (prior juvenile offenses). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(20) $659,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $639,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the development and expansion of online and on-demand eLearning courses offered through the WACOURTS education portal for judicial officers, administrators, clerks, assistants, and other staff employed in state and local courts.

(21) $686,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $686,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the administrative office of the courts to fund public guardianship services provided by the office of public guardianship.

(22) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the administrative office of the courts to develop a sequential intercept model pilot program. The intercept model pilot program must include the establishment of a coordinated care and services network in courts of limited jurisdiction located in two counties, one county east of the crest of the Cascade mountains and one county west of the crest of the Cascade mountains.

(a) In developing the pilot program, the administrative office of the courts must consult local government, the district and municipal court judges' association, the health care authority, the department of social and health services, the department of health, law enforcement agencies, and other impacted stakeholders as identified by the administrative office of the courts.

(ii) The pilot project shall include any sequential intercept mapping that is necessary to determine the availability of willing stakeholders and to determine gaps in services and programs in the geographic area served by the proposed coordinated care and services network.

(iii) The pilot project may include the use of a common source of peer support services as the means to link affected persons to the coordinated care and services network from the various intercepts in the sequential intercept model.

(iv) No court may be required by the administrative office of the courts to participate in the pilot program.

(v) For the purposes of this pilot project, "stakeholder" may include any public or private entity or individual that provides services, funds, or goods related to housing, shelter, education, employment, substance use disorder treatment or other behavioral health treatment, medical treatment, dental treatment, peer support, self-help, crisis care, income assistance, nutritional assistance, clothing, assistance with public benefits, or financial management and other life skills education.

(vi) The pilot project ends June 1, 2025. The administrative office of the courts shall submit a report to the legislature detailing the work of the pilot program project, which must include recommendations, if any, for continuation, modification, or expansion of the pilot program to other regions of the state, no later than June 30, 2025.

(23) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the Washington state center for court research of the administrative office of the courts to conduct a study of legal financial obligations (LFO) charged by superior courts, juvenile courts, and courts of limited jurisdiction, including the reviews required in Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1169 (legal financial obligations). The administrative office of the courts must submit a report of the findings to the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 30, 2023. At a minimum, the study must include statewide and county-level data that shows, during the previous five state fiscal years that data is available:

(a) The total number of juvenile and criminal cases handled by court, the number of cases where legal financial obligations were imposed pursuant to chapter 13.40 RCW, the percentage of cases where legal financial obligations were not imposed, and the total amount of legal financial obligations that were collected;

(b) The total amount assessed to, collected from, and waived for all individuals, in fees, court costs, fines, and restitution, disaggregated by the defendants' age at the time of adjudication or conviction, the underlying charge, race, gender, LFO type, and charging court, for each of the last five years data is available;

(c) The average amount assessed, collected, and waived per case by fines, fees, and restitution, disaggregated by defendants' age at the time of adjudication or conviction, the underlying charge, race, gender, LFO type, and charging court for each of the last five years data is available;

(d) The average amount collected per case by fines, fees, and restitution, disaggregated by defendants' age at the time of adjudication or conviction, race, gender, LFO type, and charging court, for each of the last five years data is available;

(e) The estimated annual collection rate for restitution and nonrestitution LFOs for the last five years data is available;

(f) An estimate of the proportion of restitution assessed, disaggregated by victim type including natural persons, businesses, state agencies, and insurance companies, for each of the last five years data is available;

(g) The percentage, number of cases, and total amount of legal financial obligations that are uncollectible pursuant to RCW 13.40.190 or 13.40.192, or other statutory authority for the expiration of legal financial obligation debt including debt assessed in criminal cases; and

(h) The total amount of outstanding debt owed in fees, court costs, fines, and restitution, disaggregated by the defendants' age at the time of adjudication or conviction, race, gender, legal financial obligation type, charging court, and date of assessment.

(24) $653,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $264,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1715 (domestic violence). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(25)(a) $165,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the Washington state center for court research of the administrative office of the courts to continue the study on legal financial obligations (LFO) charged by superior courts and courts of limited jurisdiction. The administrative office of the courts must submit a preliminary report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 30, 2024, and a final report by June 30, 2025. At a minimum, the report must include statewide data that shows, disaggregated by court type, LFO type, charge type, court user demographics, and community characteristics, during the previous five state fiscal years that data is available:

(i) The total number of juvenile and criminal cases handled by court, the number of cases where legal financial obligations were imposed pursuant to chapter 13.40 RCW, the percentage of cases where LFOs were imposed, and the total amount of LFOs that were collected;

(ii) The total amount assessed to, collected from, and waived for all individuals, in fees, court costs, fines, and restitution disaggregated by the defendants' age at the time of adjudication or conviction, the underlying charge, race, gender, LFO type, and charging court;

(iii) An estimate of the proportion of restitution owed in all cases, disaggregated by victim type including natural persons, businesses, state agencies, and insurance companies; and

(iv) A description of community level impact of LFO imposition measured as a ratio of aggregate debt to household income.

(b) Superior courts and courts of limited jurisdiction that do not enter their LFO data into a statewide data management system must provide their LFO data to the administrative office of the courts at dates to be set by the office to be included in the statewide report.

(c) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the administrative office of the courts shall form a stakeholder group to review the report and make recommendations for data development and reporting topics.

(26) $2,094,000 of the judicial stabilization trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5825 (guardianship). During the fiscal biennium, in conformity with RCW 2.72.030, the administrative office of the courts shall collect uniform and consistent data on decision making assistance to include, but not limited to: The number of requests for decision making assistance received from hospitals, the number of guardianships and less restrictive alternatives to guardianships provided, the support and housing provided, and any other data related to case monitoring and management. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(27) $2,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5056 (habitual property offenders). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(28) $218,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5836 (Clark county superior court). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(29) $51,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5974 (unenforceable LFOs). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(30) $248,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6068 (dependency outcome reporting). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(31) $479,000 of the opioid abatement settlement account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6109 (children and families). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 114. 2023 c 475 s 115 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF PUBLIC DEFENSE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($66,616,000))

$66,724,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($70,129,000))

$70,329,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$385,000

Judicial Stabilization Trust Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($9,894,000))

$16,146,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($147,024,000))

$153,584,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $900,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $900,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the purpose of improving the quality of trial court public defense services as authorized by chapter 10.101 RCW. The office of public defense must allocate these amounts so that $450,000 per fiscal year is distributed to counties, and $450,000 per fiscal year is distributed to cities, for grants under chapter 10.101 RCW.

(2) (($6,000,000))$8,863,000 of the judicial stabilization trust account—state appropriation is provided solely to assist counties with public defense services related to vacating the convictions of defendants and/or resentencing for defendants whose convictions or sentences are affected by the State v. Blake decision. Of the amount provided in this subsection:

(a) (($900,000))$1,863,000 of the judicial stabilization trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for the office of public defense to provide statewide attorney training, technical assistance, data analysis and reporting, and quality oversight, to administer financial assistance for public defense costs related to State v. Blake impacts, and to maintain a triage team to provide statewide support to the management and flow of hearings for individuals impacted by the State v. Blake decision.

(b) (($5,100,000))$7,000,000 of the judicial stabilization trust account—state appropriation is provided solely to assist counties in providing counsel for defendants seeking to vacate a conviction and/or be resentenced under State v. Blake. Assistance shall be allocated to all counties based upon a formula established by the office of public defense. Counties may receive assistance by: (i) Applying for grant funding; and/or (ii) designating the office of public defense to contract directly with counsel.

(3) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to provide prefiling legal representation to pregnant parents and parents of newborns at risk of removal by the department of children, youth, and families.

(4) $623,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,165,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5046 (postconviction counsel). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(5) $6,863,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $6,602,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5415 (public defense/insanity). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(6) $1,434,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,434,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the parents for parents program.

(7) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of public defense to establish and operate a telephone consultation line to provide contracted legal counsel for parents, guardians, or legal custodians when the department of children, youth, and families proposes a voluntary placement agreement when there is no pending dependency proceeding under chapter 13.34 RCW pursuant to RCW 13.34.090(4).

(8) $442,000 of the judicial stabilization trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for the office of public defense to administer a public defense recruitment program to recruit and retain a sufficient pool of qualified attorneys and other public defense professionals. The recruitment program shall engage with students and faculty at colleges and law schools on topics relating to public defense and other public law practices; provide technical assistance and training to county and city public defense coordinators on recruitment strategies including establishment of law clerk programs; and administer the public defense internship program as provided in Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5780 (public defense & prosecution).

(9) $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of public defense to address emergency safety assistance and other urgent needs for clients served by the parents representation program. Temporary, limited assistance may be made available for short-term housing, utilities, transportation, food assistance, and other urgent needs that, if unaddressed, could adversely impact case outcomes and impede successful family reunification. The office of public defense shall establish eligibility criteria and an expedited process for reviewing financial assistance requests submitted by parents representation program contractors.

(10) $611,000 of the judicial stabilization trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5780 (public defense & prosecution). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(11) $1,108,000 of the judicial stabilization trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6109 (children and families). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 115. 2023 c 475 s 116 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF CIVIL LEGAL AID

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($53,283,000))

$54,373,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($59,838,000))

$61,997,000

((General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,468,000))

Judicial Stabilization Trust Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,851,000))

$6,698,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($118,440,000))

$123,068,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $3,917,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $7,711,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the appointed counsel program for children and youth in dependency cases under RCW 13.34.212(3) in accordance with revised practice, caseload, and training standards adopted by the supreme court commission on children in foster care and includes a vendor rate increase for contracted attorneys. By October 1, 2023, the office must develop a revised implementation schedule based on a caseload assumption of adding no more than 1,250 new dependency cases to the program each fiscal year for consideration by the governor and the legislature.

(2) $2,408,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,579,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the provision of civil legal information, advice, and representation for tenants at risk of eviction but not yet eligible for appointed counsel services under RCW 59.18.640.

(3) (($15,425,000))$16,542,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($16,030,000))$17,965,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the appointed counsel program for tenants in unlawful detainer cases established in RCW 59.18.640 and includes a vendor rate increase for contracted attorneys. The office of civil legal aid shall assign priority to providing legal representation to indigent tenants in those counties in which the most evictions occur and to indigent tenants who are disproportionately at risk of eviction, as provided in RCW 59.18.640.

(4) (($2,387,000))$5,234,000 of the judicial stabilization trust account—state appropriation is provided solely to continue legal information, advice, assistance, and representation for individuals eligible for civil relief under the supreme court's ruling in State v. Blake.

(5) An amount not to exceed $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and an amount not to exceed $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 may be used to provide telephonic legal advice and assistance to otherwise eligible persons who are 60 years of age or older on matters authorized by RCW 2.53.030(2) (a) through (k) regardless of household income or asset level.

(6) $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to the office of civil legal aid to establish a legal advice phone line to provide guidance and legal advice for kinship caregivers. The phone line must be staffed by two FTE contracted attorneys that have experience with kinship care, guardianship statutes, the child welfare system, and issues relating to legal custody.

(7) $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of civil legal aid to expand civil legal aid services for survivors of domestic violence, including legal services for protection order proceedings, family law cases, immigration assistance, and other civil legal issues arising from or related to the domestic violence they experienced.

(8) $1,009,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,022,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of civil legal aid to continue the statewide reentry legal aid project as established in section 115(12), chapter 357, Laws of 2020.

(9) $222,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6109 (children and families). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 116. 2023 c 475 s 117 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($24,543,000))

$25,169,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($24,253,000))

$28,331,000

Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,282,000))

$10,850,000

GOV Central Service Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$18,967,000

Performance Audits of Government Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($720,000))

$828,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$100,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($70,765,000))

$84,245,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($1,146,000))$1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($1,146,000))$1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of the education ombuds.

(2) (($18,667,000 of the GOV central service account—state appropriation is provided solely for the office of equity.

(3) $480,000))$554,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the governor to invite federally recognized tribes, local governments, agricultural producers, commercial and recreational fisher organizations, business organizations, salmon recovery organizations, forestry and agricultural organizations, and environmental organizations to participate in a process facilitated by an independent entity to develop recommendations on proposed changes in policy and spending priorities to improve riparian habitat to ensure salmon and steelhead recovery.

(a) The independent entity must develop recommendations on furthering riparian funding and policy, including but not limited to, strategies that can attract private investment in improving riparian habitat, and developing a regulatory or compensation strategy if voluntary programs do not achieve concrete targets.

(b) Preliminary recommendations shall be submitted to the legislature and governor by May 1, 2024, with a final report by June 30, 2024.

(c) The office of the governor may contract for an independent facilitator. The contract is exempt from the competitive procurement requirements in chapter 39.26 RCW.

(((4)))(3) $3,020,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,980,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1580 (children in crisis). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.)) Within the amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) $2,359,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,359,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for flexible funding to support children in crisis. Uses of the flexible funding include, but are not limited to:

(i) Residential, housing, or wraparound supports that facilitate the safe discharge of children in crisis from hospitals;

(ii) Support for families and caregivers to mitigate the risk of a child going into or returning to a state of crisis;

(iii) Respite and relief services for families and caregivers that would assist in the safe discharge of a child in crisis from a hospital, or prevent or mitigate a child's future hospitalization due to crisis; or

(iv) Any support or service that would expedite a safe discharge of a child in crisis from an acute care hospital or that would prevent or mitigate a child's future hospitalization due to crisis.

(b) Flexible funding expenditures may not be used for administrative expenses.

(c) The care coordinator created in Second Substitute House Bill No. 1580 (children in crisis) must approve any expenditures of flexible funding.

(((5)))(4) $300,000 of the GOV central service account—state appropriation is provided solely for the office of equity to conduct community engagement and develop an equity toolkit. Within the amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) The office of equity must consult with state boards and commissions that support the participation of people from underrepresented populations in policy-making processes, and may consult with other relevant state agencies, departments, and offices, to identify:

(i) Barriers to access and meaningful participation in stakeholder engagement by people from underrepresented populations who have lived experience;

(ii) Tools to support access and meaningful participation in stakeholder engagement;

(iii) Modifications to stakeholder engagement processes that promote an increase in access and opportunities for participation by people from underrepresented populations who have lived experience in policy-making processes. Any modifications identified may not restrict or otherwise prevent compliance with requirements under federal statute or regulations; and

(iv) Changes to law or agency rules that will promote increased access and participation in the policy-making process.

(b) The office of equity must submit a report, in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, to the appropriate committees of the legislature that details its findings under (a) of this subsection by July 1, 2024.

(c) By November 30, 2024, the office of equity must develop a toolkit on best practices for supporting meaningful engagement of underrepresented individuals with lived experience participating on statutory entities. The toolkit must be transmitted to all state agencies, including the office of the governor, members of the legislature, the secretary of the senate, and the chief clerk of the house of representatives. The toolkit must include:

(i) Best practices for identifying and recruiting underrepresented individuals with lived experience;

(ii) Best practices for appropriately and meaningfully engaging individuals from underrepresented populations with lived experience. Recommendations of these best practices may include suggestions from engagement conducted under (a) of this subsection;

(iii) Information on how to plan the work of a statutory entity using the principles of universal design, which may include suggestions from community engagement conducted under (a) of this subsection;

(iv) Best practices for onboarding all statutory entity members including how to support underrepresented individuals with lived experience in accessing compensation in accordance with chapter 43.03 RCW; and

(v) A list of state entities that appointing authorities may consult with when considering appointments to statutory entities for the purpose of increasing meaningful participation by people from underrepresented populations who have lived experience.

(d) For purposes of this subsection:

(i) "Lived experience" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 43.03.220.

(ii) "Statutory entity" means a multimember task force, work group, or advisory committee, that is temporary, established by legislation adopted after January 1, 2025, established for the specific purpose of examining a particular policy or issue which directly and tangibly affects one or more underrepresented populations, and is required to report to the legislature on the policy or issues it is tasked with examining. "Statutory entity" does not include legislative select committees or other statutorily created legislative entities composed of only legislative members.

(iii) "Underrepresented population" means a population group that is more likely to be at higher risk for disenfranchisement due to adverse socioeconomic factors such as unemployment, high housing and transportation costs relative to income, effects of environmental harms, limited access to nutritious food and adequate health care, linguistic isolation, and any other factors that may be barriers for participating in policy-making processes.

(((6)))(5) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the Washington state office of equity must cofacilitate the Washington digital equity forum with the statewide broadband office.

(((7)))(6)(a) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the office of the corrections ombuds to prepare a report on incarcerated persons who have been in solitary confinement or any other form of restrictive housing more than 120 days in total during their period of incarceration or have been in solitary confinement or any other form of restrictive housing more than 45 consecutive days in the prior fiscal year. The report must:

(i) Include the basis on which each person was placed in restrictive housing;

(ii) Define the types of restrictive housing used by the department of corrections including, but not limited to, solitary confinement, administrative segregation, disciplinary segregation, protective custody, and maximum custody;

(iii) Identify the specific type of restrictive housing each incarcerated person was placed in and the reason for such placement;

(iv) Provide information regarding each incarcerated person's underlying offenses;

(v) Identify any sanctions imposed during the incarceration of each person;

(vi) State the amount of time each person has remaining in total confinement;

(vii) Document any attempted suicides by each individual in restrictive housing over the past 10 years and the reason, if known;

(viii) Describe the programming offered to and accepted by each incarcerated person during the person's period of restrictive confinement; and

(ix) Identify any short-term policies identified, implemented, or improved by the department for the restrictive housing population including, but not limited to, lighting, ventilation, and access to personal property, communication, and visitation.

(b) The department shall provide a report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2024.

(7) Within existing resources, the governor's office of results Washington must conduct a review of the provisions in state law relating to statewide performance management in RCW 43.88.090 and 43.17.380 through 43.17.390 and other statutes as applicable. The office must produce a report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by October 31, 2024, including recommendations for legislative actions to provide meaningful performance information and oversight for decision makers in the governor's office and other agencies responsible for enterprise-wide initiatives. Results Washington should consult with the office of financial management and other agencies as applicable to ensure that recommendations minimize duplication of effort and support their statutory oversight roles.

Sec. 117. 2023 c 475 s 118 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($1,619,000))

$1,618,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($1,640,000))

$1,646,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$90,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($3,349,000))

$3,354,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the legislative committee on economic development and international relations to conduct an analysis of the statewide economic impact of the military and defense sector. The analysis shall be completed and submitted to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by September 1, 2024.

Sec. 118. 2023 c 475 s 119 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE PUBLIC DISCLOSURE COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($6,105,000))

$6,107,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($5,913,000))

$6,043,000

Public Disclosure Transparency Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,271,000))

$2,301,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($14,289,000))

$14,451,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) No moneys may be expended from the appropriations in this section to establish an electronic directory, archive, or other compilation of political advertising unless explicitly authorized by the legislature.

(2) (($2,171,000))$2,170,000 of the public disclosure transparency account—state appropriation is provided solely for the public disclosure commission for the purpose of improving the ability of the public to access information about political campaigns, lobbying, and elected officials, and facilitating accurate and timely reporting by the regulated community. The commission must report to the office of financial management and fiscal committees of the legislature by October 31st of each year detailing information on the public disclosure transparency account. The report shall include, but is not limited to:

(a) An investment plan of how funds would be used to improve the ability of the public to access information about political campaigns, lobbying, and elected officials, and facilitate accurate and timely reporting by the regulated community;

(b) A list of active projects as of July 1st of the fiscal year. This must include a breakdown of expenditures by project and expense type for all current and ongoing projects;

(c) A list of projects that are planned in the current and following fiscal year and projects the commission would recommend for future funding. The commission must identify priorities, and develop accountability measures to ensure the projects meet intended purposes; and

(d) Any other metric or measure the commission deems appropriate to track the outcome of the use of the funds.

(3) $100,000 of the public disclosure transparency account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5284 (campaign finance disclosure). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4) $93,047 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5857 (campaign disclosure reorg.). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 119. 2023 c 475 s 120 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($40,397,000))

$56,050,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($48,378,000))

$61,449,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$8,606,000

Public Records Efficiency, Preservation, and Access

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($11,621,000))

$11,625,000

Charitable Organization Education Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,161,000))

$1,233,000

Washington State Library Operations Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($14,652,000))

$14,659,000

Local Government Archives Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($11,997,000))

$12,001,000

Election Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$4,487,000

Personnel Service Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,262,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($143,561,000))

$172,372,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($2,498,000))$16,998,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($12,196,000))$21,450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to reimburse counties for the state's share of primary and general election costs, the state's share of presidential primary costs, and the costs of conducting mandatory recounts on state measures. Funds may also be used by the secretary of state for costs associated with the printing and distribution of the presidential primary voters pamphlet. Counties shall be reimbursed only for those costs that the secretary of state validates as eligible for reimbursement.

(2)(a) $4,052,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($4,052,000))$6,052,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for contracting with a nonprofit organization to produce gavel-to-gavel television coverage of state government deliberations and other events statewide. The funding level for each year of the contract shall be based on the amount provided in this subsection. The nonprofit organization shall be required to raise contributions or commitments to make contributions, in cash or in kind, in an amount equal to forty percent of the state contribution. The office of the secretary of state may make full or partial payment once all criteria in this subsection have been satisfactorily documented.

(b) The legislature finds that the commitment of on-going funding is necessary to ensure continuous, autonomous, and independent coverage of public affairs. For that purpose, the secretary of state shall enter into a contract with the nonprofit organization to provide public affairs coverage.

(c) The nonprofit organization shall prepare an annual independent audit, an annual financial statement, and an annual report, including benchmarks that measure the success of the nonprofit organization in meeting the intent of the program.

(d) No portion of any amounts disbursed pursuant to this subsection may be used, directly or indirectly, for any of the following purposes:

(i) Attempting to influence the passage or defeat of any legislation by the legislature of the state of Washington, by any county, city, town, or other political subdivision of the state of Washington, or by the congress, or the adoption or rejection of any rule, standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of any state agency;

(ii) Making contributions reportable under chapter 42.17 RCW; or

(iii) Providing any: (A) Gift; (B) honoraria; or (C) travel, lodging, meals, or entertainment to a public officer or employee.

(3) Any reductions to funding for the Washington talking book and Braille library may not exceed in proportion any reductions taken to the funding for the library as a whole.

(4) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for humanities Washington speaker's bureau community conversations.

(5) $114,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $114,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for election reconciliation reporting. Funding provides for one staff to compile county reconciliation reports, analyze the data, and to complete an annual statewide election reconciliation report for every state primary and general election. The report must be submitted annually on July 31, to legislative policy and fiscal committees. The annual report must include statewide analysis and by county analysis on the reasons for ballot rejection and an analysis of the ways ballots are received, counted, rejected and cure data that can be used by policymakers to better understand election administration.

(6) $896,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $870,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for staff dedicated to the maintenance and operations of the voter registration and election management system. These staff will manage database upgrades, database maintenance, system training and support to counties, and triage and customer service to system users.

(7) $8,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $8,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for:

(a) Funding the security operations center, including identified needs for expanded operations, systems, technology tools, training resources;

(b) Additional staff dedicated to the cyber and physical security of election operations at the office and county election offices;

(c) Expanding security assessments, threat monitoring, enhanced security training; and

(d) Providing grants to county partners to address identified threats and expand existing grants and contracts with other public and private organizations such as the Washington military department, national guard, private companies providing cyber security, and county election offices.

(8) $148,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5128 (jury diversity). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(9) $148,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5112 (voter registration). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(10) $148,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5182 (candidate filing). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(11) $148,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5208 (online voter registration). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(12) $616,000 of the personnel service account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5015 (productivity board). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(13) (($350,000))$400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($350,000))$600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a contract with humanities Washington to expand the prime time family reading program.

(14) The office of the secretary of state must conduct a feasibility study of replacing the combined fund drive donor management system. The office must report its findings and a plan for replacement to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2023.

(15) (($200,000))$850,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for legal services costs for Vet Voice Foundation et al. v. Hobbs.

(16) $3,724,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,674,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the agency to design and implement strategies and products to counter false narratives surrounding election security and integrity, including community engagement with underserved populations such as young voters, voters with disabilities, tribal communities, and non-English-speaking voters. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $500,000 per fiscal year are provided solely for grants to county auditors for the same purposes.

(17) The office of the secretary of state must work with the office of the chief information officer to evaluate the office of the secretary of state's information technology infrastructure and applications to determine the appropriate candidates for the location of data and the systems that could be exempt from consolidated technology services oversight. The office shall report its findings to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2023.

(18) $83,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $67,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely the office of the secretary of state to assist businesses and nonprofits providing therapeutic rehabilitation within Washington state's juvenile secure residential facilities. It is well established that providing outreach and therapeutic education among incarcerated youth remains critical to successful community reentry. The amounts provided under this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations: To be eligible for a grant under this subsection, a business must (a) apply for or have applied for the grant; (b) be registered as a Washington state business or non-profit; (c) reported annual gross receipts are no more than $1,000,000 in the most recent calendar year; (d) must have ability to conduct in-person business operations at one of Washington's juvenile correctional facilities; (e) of the total grant amount awarded, no more than 10 percent may be awarded for travel expenses; (f) agree to operate in-person, in accordance with the requirements of applicable federal, state, and local directives and guidance; and (g) at least one principal of entity must demonstrate the following educational credential, minimum masters degree in related field, and professional experience of conducting therapeutic gaming. The office of the secretary of state may use up to 10 percent of the amount provided in this subsection for administrative costs.

(19) $730,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $580,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office's migration of its applications and systems to Azure cloud environments, and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(20) $160,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for a contract with the University of Washington Evans school of public policy and governance to complete a study based on the preliminary report and research design submitted to the office on June 30, 2022. The preliminary report analyzed the 2022 state auditor's performance audit titled "evaluating Washington's ballot rejection rates." The study must be reported to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 1, 2023.

(21) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office to continue developing a statewide digital assessment tool and protocol for the tool's usage. The office must use the tool and protocol it developed to reach additional underserved audiences and make improvements to the tool and protocol. The office must develop and publish recommendations to improve implementation of the tool by June 30, 2025.

(22) $198,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $154,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to establish a Washington state library branch at Green Hill school.

(23) $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the office to contract with the University of Washington Evans school of public policy and governance to examine processes for providing voting registration, voting materials, and voting assistance for people held in Washington jails.

(a) The study must:

(i) Identify challenges and obstacles to voting in Washington jails;

(ii) Examine how election offices and jails can ensure that voter registration, materials, and assistance are provided to registered voters and eligible citizens who are in jail prior to each election;

(iii) Develop recommendations for facilitating voter registration for eligible citizens and voting for registered voters in Washington jails; and

(iv) Develop recommendations for identifying individuals who are registered to vote upon jail admission and for providing voter assistance upon release from jail.

(b) The study is due to the office, the governor, and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024.

(24) $81,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5843 (election security breaches). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(25) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5890 (ballot rejections). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(26) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6125 (Lakeland Village records). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 120. 2023 c 475 s 121 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE GOVERNOR'S OFFICE OF INDIAN AFFAIRS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($801,000))

$802,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($797,000))

$904,000

Climate Commitment Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$658,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($2,256,000))

$2,364,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The office shall assist the department of enterprise services on providing the government-to-government training sessions for federal, state, local, and tribal government employees. The training sessions shall cover tribal historical perspectives, legal issues, tribal sovereignty, and tribal governments. Costs of the training sessions shall be recouped through a fee charged to the participants of each session. The department of enterprise services shall be responsible for all of the administrative aspects of the training, including the billing and collection of the fees for the training.

(2)(a) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office to engage a contractor to:

(i) Conduct a detailed analysis of the opportunity gap for native American students;

(ii) Analyze the progress in developing effective government-to-government relations and identification and adoption of curriculum regarding tribal history, culture, and government as provided under RCW 28A.345.070;

(iii) Develop recommendations for continuing efforts to close the educational opportunity gap while meeting the state's academic achievement indicators as identified in the state's every student succeeds act consolidated plan; and

(iv) Identify performance measures to monitor adequate yearly progress.

(b) The contractor shall submit a study update by December 1, 2024, and submit a final report by June 30, 2025, to the educational opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee, the governor, the superintendent of public instruction, the state board of education, and the education committees of the legislature.

(3)(a) $404,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1216 (clean energy siting). Within amounts provided in this subsection, the governor's office of Indian affairs, in consultation with the department of ecology, the department of commerce, and the department of archaeology and historic preservation, must coordinate government-to-government engagement with federally recognized Indian tribes who have treaty rights in Washington. Topics of engagement may include:

(i) Implementation of environmental and energy laws, policy regulations, programs, and finances;

(ii) The climate commitment act, chapter 316, Laws of 2021;

(iii) Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1216 (clean energy siting); and

(iv) Other related policy.

(b) Funding provided within this subsection may support:

(i) Participation on the interagency clean energy siting coordinating council;

(ii) Creation and maintenance of a list of contacts of federally recognized tribes, and tribal preferences regarding outreach about clean energy siting and permitting; and

(iii) Development and delivery of training to clean energy project developers on consultation and engagement processes for federally recognized Indian tribes.

(4) The office must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and section 302(13) of this act.

Sec. 121. 2023 c 475 s 122 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMISSION ON ASIAN PACIFIC AMERICAN AFFAIRS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($913,000))

$945,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($897,000))

$901,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,810,000))

$1,846,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the commission to engage a contractor to:

(i) Conduct a detailed analysis of the opportunity gap for Asian American students;

(ii) Develop recommendations for continuing efforts to close the educational opportunity gap while meeting the state's academic achievement indicators as identified in the state's every student succeeds act consolidated plan; and

(iii) Identify performance measures to monitor adequate yearly progress.

(b) The contractor shall submit a study update by December 1, 2024, and submit a final report by June 30, 2025, to the educational opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee, the governor, the superintendent of public instruction, the state board of education, and the education committees of the legislature.

(2)(a) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the commission to engage a contractor to:

(i) Conduct a detailed analysis of the opportunity gap for Native Hawaiian and Pacific Islander students;

(ii) Develop recommendations for continuing efforts to close the educational opportunity gap while meeting the state's academic achievement indicators as identified in the state's every student succeeds act consolidated plan; and

(iii) Identify performance measures to monitor adequate yearly progress.

(b) The contractor shall submit a study update by December 1, 2024, and submit a final report by June 30, 2025, to the educational opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee, the governor, the superintendent of public instruction, the state board of education, and the education committees of the legislature.

Sec. 122. 2023 c 475 s 123 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER

State Treasurer's Service Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($23,658,000))

$24,432,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($23,658,000))

$24,432,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($500,000 of the state treasurer's service account—state appropriation is provided solely for the review of local government tax increment financing proposals as provided in RCW 39.114.020.

(2))) $500,000 of the state treasurer's service account—state appropriation is provided solely for the office to study existing and proposed laws in other jurisdictions that limit consideration of material factors in public financing and investments. The study must consider any investment risk and economic risk to Washington associated with identified laws. Authorized uses of the amount provided in this subsection include, but are not limited to, staffing, consulting fees, travel expenditures, or other goods and services. The office must submit the study to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024.

(((3)))(2) Pursuant to RCW 82.08.225, the legislature authorizes the state treasurer to deposit up to $3,000,000 of taxes collected pursuant to RCW 82.08.020(1) into the statewide tourism marketing account created in RCW 43.384.040 for the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium.

(3) $280,000 of the state treasurer's service account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6069 (retirement savings). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 123. 2023 c 475 s 124 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE AUDITOR

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$1,072,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$1,080,000

Auditing Services Revolving Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($18,519,000))

$18,533,000

Performance Audits of Government Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,871,000))

$1,873,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($22,542,000))

$22,558,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,585,000 of the performance audit of government account—state appropriation is provided solely for staff and related costs to verify the accuracy of reported school district data submitted for state funding purposes; conduct school district program audits of state-funded public school programs; establish the specific amount of state funding adjustments whenever audit exceptions occur and the amount is not firmly established in the course of regular public school audits; and to assist the state special education safety net committee when requested.

(2) ((Within existing resources of the performance audits of government account, the state auditor's office shall conduct a performance audit or accountability audit of Washington charter public schools to satisfy the requirement to contract for an independent performance audit pursuant to RCW 28A.710.030(2).

(3))) $825,000 of the auditing services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for accountability and risk based audits.

(((4)))(3) $1,030,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,030,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for law enforcement audits pursuant to RCW 43.101.460 and 43.101.465.

Sec. 124. 2023 c 475 s 125 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE CITIZENS' COMMISSION ON SALARIES FOR ELECTED OFFICIALS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($299,000))

$305,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($295,000))

$322,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($594,000))

$627,000

Sec. 125. 2023 c 475 s 126 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($39,778,000))

$48,730,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($36,313,000))

$41,861,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($23,595,000))

$25,263,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$1,307,000

Public Service Revolving Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,717,000))

$4,715,000

New Motor Vehicle Arbitration Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,889,000))

$1,888,000

Medicaid Fraud Penalty Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$6,584,000

Child Rescue Fund—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($80,000))

$200,000

Legal Services Revolving Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($401,733,000))

$406,196,000

Local Government Archives Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,117,000

Tobacco Prevention and Control Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$274,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($516,080,000))

$538,135,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The attorney general shall report each fiscal year on actual legal services expenditures and actual attorney staffing levels for each agency receiving legal services. The report shall be submitted to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives no later than ninety days after the end of each fiscal year. As part of its by agency report to the legislative fiscal committees and the office of financial management, the office of the attorney general shall include information detailing the agency's expenditures for its agency-wide overhead and a breakdown by division of division administration expenses.

(2) Prior to entering into any negotiated settlement of a claim against the state that exceeds five million dollars, the attorney general shall notify the director of the office of financial management and the chairs and ranking members of the senate committee on ways and means and the house of representatives committee on appropriations.

(3) The attorney general shall annually report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all new cy pres awards and settlements and all new accounts, disclosing their intended uses, balances, the nature of the claim or account, proposals, and intended timeframes for the expenditure of each amount. The report shall be distributed electronically and posted on the attorney general's web site. The report shall not be printed on paper or distributed physically.

(4) (($1,217,000))$1,806,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($1,217,000))$1,981,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for multi-year arbitrations of the state's diligent enforcement of its obligations to receive amounts withheld from tobacco master settlement agreement payments.

(5) $6,189,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $4,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 326, Laws of 2021 (law enforcement data).

(6) (($1,958,000))$1,458,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($958,000))$1,458,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of a program for receiving and responding to tips from the public regarding risks or potential risks to the safety or well-being of youth, called the YES tip line program. Risks to safety or well-being may include, but are not limited to, harm or threats of harm to self or others, sexual abuse, assault, rape, bullying or cyberbullying, substance use, and criminal acts. Any person contacting the YES tip line, whether for themselves or for another person, must receive timely assistance and not be turned away. The program must operate within the guidelines of this subsection.

(a) During the development and implementation of the YES tip line program the attorney general shall convene an advisory committee consisting of representatives from the Washington state patrol, the department of health, the health care authority, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the Washington student achievement council, the Washington association of educational service districts, and other participants the attorney general appoints.

(b) The attorney general shall develop and implement policies and processes for:

(i) Assessing tips based on the level of severity, urgency, and assistance needed using best triage practices including the YES tip line;

(ii) Risk assessment for referral of persons contacting the YES tip line to service providers;

(iii) Threat assessment that identifies circumstances requiring the YES tip line to alert law enforcement, mental health services, or other first responders immediately when immediate emergency response to a tip is warranted;

(iv) Referral and follow-up on tips to schools or postsecondary institution teams, local crisis services, law enforcement, and other entities;

(v) YES tip line information data retention and reporting requirements;

(vi) Ensuring the confidentiality of persons submitting a tip and to allow for disclosure when necessary to respond to a specific emergency threat to life; and

(vii) Systematic review, analysis, and reporting by the YES tip line program of YES tip line data including, but not limited to, reporting program utilization and evaluating whether the YES tip line is being implemented equitably across the state.

(c) The YES tip line shall be operated by a vendor selected by the attorney general through a competitive contracting process. The attorney general shall ensure that the YES tip line program vendor and its personnel are properly trained and resourced. The contract must require the vendor to be bound by confidentiality policies developed by the office. The contract must also provide that the state of Washington owns the data and information produced from the YES tip line and that vendor must comply with the state's data retention, use, and security requirements.

(d) The YES tip line program must develop and maintain a reference and best practices tool kit for law enforcement and mental health officials that identifies statewide and community mental health resources, services, and contacts, and provides best practices and strategies for investigators to use in investigating cases and assisting youths and their parents and guardians.

(e) The YES tip line program must promote and market the program and YES tip line to youth, families, community members, schools, and others statewide to build awareness of the program's resources and the YES tip line. Youth perspectives must be included and consulted in tip line development and implementation including creating marketing campaigns and materials required for the YES tip line program. The insights of youth representing marginalized and minority communities must be prioritized for their invaluable insight. Youths are eligible for stipends and reasonable allowances for reimbursement, lodging, and travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.220.

(7) $561,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $508,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of the attorney general to support the Washington state missing and murdered indigenous women and people task force in section 912 of this act.

(8) $9,188,000 of the legal services revolving fund—state appropriation is provided solely for additional legal services to address additional legal services necessary for dependency actions where the state and federal Indian child welfare act apply. The office must report to the fiscal committees of the legislature within 90 days of the close of the fiscal year the following information for new cases initiated in the previous fiscal year to measure quantity and use of this funding:

(a) The number and proportion of cases where the state and federal Indian child welfare act (ICWA) applies as compared to non-ICWA new cases;

(b) The amount of time spent advising on, preparing for court, and litigating issues and elements related to ICWA's requirements as compared to the amount of time advising on, preparing for court, and litigating issues and elements that are not related to ICWA's requirements;

(c) The length of state and federal Indian child welfare act cases as compared to non-ICWA cases measured by time or number of court hearings; and

(d) Any other information or metric the office determines is appropriate to measure the quantity and use of the funding in this subsection.

(9)(a) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the establishment of a truth and reconciliation tribal advisory committee to conduct research and outreach to understand the operations and impact of Indian boarding schools in Washington run by public and faith-based institutions, and to develop recommendations for the state to acknowledge and address the historical and intergenerational harms caused by Indian boarding schools and other cultural and linguistic termination practices.

(b) The advisory committee shall consist of five members nominated by the attorney general. The committee members must be citizens from federally recognized tribes in diverse geographic areas across the state that possess personal, policy, or specific expertise with Indian boarding school history and policies, or who have expertise in truth and healing endeavors that are traditionally and culturally appropriate.

(c) The advisory committee must hold its first meeting by September 30, 2023, and shall meet at least quarterly. The advisory committee may conduct meetings in person or virtually and must accept written testimony. The advisory committee may, when feasible, invite and consult with any entity, agency, or individual deemed necessary to further its work, or with experts or professionals involved, having expertise, or having lived experience regarding Indian boarding schools or tribal engagement.

(d) The office and the advisory committee must conduct at least six listening sessions in collaboration with tribes and Native-led organizations. The listening sessions must be held with consideration of the cultural, emotional, spiritual, and psychological well-being of survivors, family members, and community members. In planning and facilitating the listening sessions, the office must seek to avoid imposing undue burdens on survivors, family members, or community members.

(e) The office of the attorney general must administer and provide staff support for the advisory committee.

(f) By June 30, 2025, the office must submit a final report to the appropriate committees of the legislature that includes, but is not limited to:

(i) A summary of activities undertaken by the advisory committee;

(ii) Findings regarding the extent and types of support provided by the state to Indian boarding schools;

(iii) Findings regarding current state policies and practices that originate from Indian boarding schools or other assimilationist policies and practices and that cause disproportionate harm to American Indian and Alaska Native people and communities; and

(iv) Recommendations regarding how the state can address the harm done by Indian boarding schools and other cultural and linguistic termination practices through a truth and reconciliation model, including but not limited to:

(A) Resources and assistance that the state may provide to aid in the healing of trauma caused by Indian boarding school policies; and

(B) Actions to correct current state policies and practices with origins in assimilationist policies or that cause disproportionate harm to Native people and communities.

(10) $1,381,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for legal services and other costs related to voter rights and redistricting commission litigation.

(11) $566,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $436,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for legal services related to litigation challenging chapter 104, Laws of 2022 (ESSB 5078).

(12) $749,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $689,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for legal services related to the defense of the state and its agencies in a federal environmental cleanup action involving the Quendall terminals superfund site.

(13) $731,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,462,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for additional resources for the prosecution of sexually violent predator cases pursuant to chapter 71.09 RCW.

(14) $699,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $699,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for additional resources for the criminal litigation unit to address increased wrongfully convicted person claims under chapter 4.100 RCW and increased workload and complexity of cases referred to the unit.

(15) $755,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,510,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office to create a centralized statewide organized retail crime task force to coordinate, investigate, and prosecute multijurisdictional retail crime.

(16) $1,399,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,399,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5078 (firearms industry duties). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(17) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the office of the attorney general to update the introduction to Washington water law legal primer. The updated primer must cover subjects including, but not limited to, municipal water law, the trusts water rights program, instream flows, and significant appellate water law cases that have been decided since the previous introduction to Washington water law was prepared in 2000. The office must complete the updated primer by June 30, 2025.

(18) $39,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $39,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $30,000 of the legal services revolving fund—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5263 (psilocybin). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(19) $2,071,000 of the legal services revolving fund—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5080 (cannabis social equity). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(20) $204,000 of the legal services revolving fund—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5236 (hospital staffing standards). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(21) $2,316,000 of the legal services revolving fund—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5272 (speed safety cameras). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(22) $138,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for staff support to the joint legislative task force on jail standards authorized by RCW 70.48.801. The task force shall report finding and recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than December 1, 2023.

(23) $463,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $454,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, $398,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation, $91,000 of the public service revolving account—state appropriation, $133,000 of the medicaid fraud penalty account—state appropriation, and $6,740,000 of the legal services revolving fund—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of the legal matter management system and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(24) $50,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1181 (climate change/planning). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(25) $138,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $138,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1028 (crime victims and witnesses). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(26) $213,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $213,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1469 (health care services/access). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(27) $158,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $153,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1512 (missing persons). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(28) $1,005,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,005,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1177 (indigenous women). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(29) $26,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1470 (private detention facilities). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(30) $75,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1570 (TNC insurance programs). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(31) $106,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1762 (warehouse employees). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(32) $338,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1175 (petroleum storage tanks). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(33)(a) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the attorney general, in collaboration with the office of the insurance commissioner, to study approaches to improve health care affordability including, but not limited to:

(i) Health provider price or rate regulation policies or programs, other than traditional health plan rate review, in use or under consideration in other states to increase affordability for health insurance purchasers and enrollees. At a minimum, this shall include:

(A) Analysis of payment rate or payment rate increase caps and reference pricing strategies;

(B) Analysis of research or other findings related to the outcomes of the policy or program, including experience in other states;

(C) A preliminary analysis of the regulatory authority and administrative capacity necessary to implement each policy or program reviewed in Washington state;

(D) Analysis of such approaches used in Washington state including, but not limited to, the operation of the hospital commission, formerly established under chapter 70.39 RCW; and

(E) A feasibility analysis of implementing a global hospital budget strategy in one or more counties or regions in Washington state, including potential impacts on spending and access to health care services if such a strategy were adopted;

(ii) Regulatory approaches in use or under consideration by other states to address any anticompetitive impacts of horizontal consolidation and vertical integration in the health care marketplace to supplement federal antitrust law. At a minimum, this regulatory review shall include:

(A) Analysis of research, case law, or other findings related to the outcomes of the state's activities to encourage competition, including implementation experience;

(B) A preliminary analysis of regulatory authority and administrative capacity necessary to implement each policy or program reviewed in Washington state; and

(C) Analysis of recent health care consolidation and vertical consolidation activity in Washington state, to the extent information is available;

(iii) Recommended actions based on other state approaches and Washington data, if any; and

(iv) Additional related areas of data or study needed, if any.

(b) The office of the insurance commissioner or office of the attorney general may contract with third parties and consult with other state entities to conduct all or any portion of the study.

(c) The attorney general and office of the insurance commissioner shall submit a preliminary report to the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 2023, and a final report by August 1, 2024.

(34) $9,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1069 (mental health counselor compensation). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(35) $526,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1216 (clean energy siting). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(36) $801,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the office to create a permanent sexual assault kit initiative program.

(37) $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the office, in collaboration with the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, to support the Washington state indigenous demographic data collection work group of the Washington state missing and murdered indigenous women and people task force established in section 912, chapter 475, Laws of 2023.

(38) $743,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5427 (hate crimes & bias incidents). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(39) $34,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5640 (independent living residents). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(40) $11,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5995 (interpreters and translators). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(41) $131,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $528,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5838 (AI task force). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(42) $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the office to support the underground economy task force created in section 906 of this act.

(43) $3,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5271 (DOH/facilities enforcement). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(44) $1,307,000 of the general fund—private/local appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5241 (health care marketplace). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(45) $73,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6058 (carbon market linkage). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(46) $67,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 6072 (LTSS commission recs.). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(47) $30,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5793 (paid sick leave). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(48) $40,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6105 (adult entertainment workers). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(49) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the establishment of a vehicular pursuit data collection and analysis task force.

(a) The task force shall:

(i) Include representation from law enforcement leadership and rank and file, community organizations, and traffic safety organizations, and shall strive to do its work in a collaborative manner; and

(ii) Reflect, to the greatest extent possible, the diversity of people with direct lived experience with vehicular pursuits, including members who reside in urban and rural communities, and with differing cultural and economic circumstances.

(b) The task force shall consist of the following members:

(i) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate;

(ii) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives;

(iii) The office of the attorney general shall appoint members representing the following:

(A) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs;

(B) The Washington state patrol;

(C) The Washington council of police and sheriffs;

(D) The Washington fraternal order of police;

(E) The criminal justice training commission;

(F) The Washington traffic safety commission;

(G) The Washington counties risk pool;

(H) The Washington cities insurance association;

(I) The association of Washington cities;

(J) The Washington association of counties;

(K) Whose streets our streets;

(L) The faith action network;

(M) The peace justice and action league of Spokane;

(N) The Washington coalition for police accountability;

(O) Spokane community against racism;

(P) The Pacific Islander community association of Washington;

(Q) The American automobile association of Washington;

(R) The transportation choices coalition;

(S) A representative of a federally recognized tribe; and

(T) One person with civilian oversight or auditing experience regarding law enforcement agencies; and

(iv) The attorney general shall appoint a designee who has knowledge of the use of force data collection requirements under chapter 10.118 RCW.

(c) The task force is responsible for providing recommendations to the legislature on what data should be collected by law enforcement agencies throughout the state so that the legislature and other policymakers have consistent and uniform information necessary to evaluate policies on vehicular pursuits. The task force shall:

(i) Review available data on vehicular pursuits, including:

(A) The date, time, location, maximum speed, and duration of the incident;

(B) The reason for initiating a pursuit;

(C) Whether the pursuing officer sought authorization for the pursuit, or only gave notice of the pursuit and whether authorization for the pursuit was granted;

(D) Whether a supervisor denied authorization for the pursuit and the reason for the denial;

(E) The number of vehicles and officers involved in the pursuit;

(F) The number of law enforcement agencies involved in the pursuit;

(G) Whether pursuit intervention techniques are employed, and if so, which ones;

(H) Whether the pursuit was terminated at any point, and if so, the reason for termination;

(I) The officer's perception of the age, gender, race, ethnicity, or applicable tribal affiliation of the driver and any passengers of the motor vehicle being pursued;

(J) Whether the pursuit resulted in no action, termination, apprehension, warning, citation, arrest and grounds for the arrest, or other action; and

(K) Whether the pursuit resulted in any property damage, injury, or death, and to whom and what, including law enforcement, drivers, passengers, and bystanders;

(ii) Recommend data to be collected and why, in relation to (c)(i) of this subsection;

(iii) Develop a protocol for data collection and provide a statement regarding the use of such data and what its collection and analysis will establish;

(iv) Make the data readily available to the public using standard open data protocols;

(v) Recommend the entity responsible for collecting and managing this data on a statewide basis; and

(vi) Recommend any changes in state law to accomplish and facilitate the collection and analysis of the data, including whether to align or integrate the data collection with the use of force data under chapter 10.118 RCW.

(d) The legislative membership shall convene the initial meeting of the task force no later than May 1, 2024. The task force shall choose its cochairs from among its legislative membership, which must include one cochair from the house of representatives and one cochair from the senate.

(e) The task force shall submit a preliminary report of its findings and any recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025, with the goal of completing a final report by November 15, 2025.

(f) Staff support for the task force shall be provided by the office of the attorney general.

(g)(i) Legislative members of the task force are reimbursed for expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members are not entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses if they are elected officials or are participating on behalf of an employer, governmental entity, or other organization.

(ii) Nonlegislative members are entitled to stipends in accordance with the provisions of RCW 43.03.220.

Sec. 126. 2023 c 475 s 127 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE CASELOAD FORECAST COUNCIL

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($2,378,000))

$2,380,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($2,378,000))

$2,381,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$356,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($5,112,000))

$5,117,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $356,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to forecast the caseload for the Washington college grant program.

(2) Within existing resources, and beginning with the November 2021 forecast, the caseload forecast council shall produce an unofficial forecast of the long-term caseload for juvenile rehabilitation as a courtesy.

(3) $39,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $39,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1218 (caseload forecast/tax credit). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(4) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the council must forecast the number of people eligible for the apple health expansion for Washington residents with incomes at or below 138 percent of the federal poverty level, regardless of immigration status, beginning in July 2024.

Sec. 127. 2023 c 475 s 129 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE—COMMUNITY SERVICES AND HOUSING

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($334,486,000))

$414,862,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($391,233,000))

$434,180,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$281,789,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$5,252,000

Affordable Housing for All Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$109,227,000

Apple Health and Homes Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$28,452,000

Climate Commitment Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$35,000,000

Community Reinvestment Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$200,000,000

Community and Economic Development Fee Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,159,000

((Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—

Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$77,878,000))

Covenant Homeownership Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$150,000,000

Financial Fraud and Identity Theft Crimes

Investigation and Prosecution Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,631,000

Home Security Fund Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$290,410,000

Lead Paint Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$233,000

Prostitution Prevention and Intervention Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$26,000

Washington Housing Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$9,863,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,919,639,000))

$1,965,084,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $10,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $10,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to resolution Washington to build statewide capacity for alternative dispute resolution centers and dispute resolution programs that guarantee that citizens have access to low-cost resolution as an alternative to litigation.

(2) $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to the retired senior volunteer program.

(3) Within existing resources, the department shall provide administrative and other indirect support to the developmental disabilities council.

(4) $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Washington new Americans program. The department may require a cash match or in-kind contributions to be eligible for state funding.

(5) $768,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $797,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to contract with a private, nonprofit organization to provide developmental disability ombuds services.

(6) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, $1,000,000 of the home security fund—state appropriation, $2,000,000 of the Washington housing trust account—state appropriation, and $1,000,000 of the affordable housing for all account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department of commerce for services to homeless families and youth through the Washington youth and families fund.

(7) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $2,000,000 of the home security fund—state appropriation are provided solely for the administration of the grant program required in chapter 43.185C RCW, linking homeless students and their families with stable housing.

(8)(((a) $1,980,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,980,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for community beds for individuals with a history of mental illness. Currently, there is little to no housing specific to populations with these co-occurring disorders; therefore, the department must consider how best to develop new bed capacity in combination with individualized support services, such as intensive case management and care coordination, clinical supervision, mental health, substance abuse treatment, and vocational and employment services. Case-management and care coordination services must be provided. Increased case-managed housing will help to reduce the use of jails and emergency services and will help to reduce admissions to the state psychiatric hospitals. The department must coordinate with the health care authority and the department of social and health services in establishing conditions for the awarding of these funds. The department must contract with local entities to provide a mix of (i) shared permanent supportive housing; (ii) independent permanent supportive housing; and (iii) low and no-barrier housing beds for people with a criminal history, substance abuse disorder, and/or mental illness.

(b) Priority for permanent supportive housing must be given to individuals on the discharge list at the state psychiatric hospitals or in community psychiatric inpatient beds whose conditions present significant barriers to timely discharge.))[Reserved.]

(9) $557,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $557,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to design and administer the achieving a better life experience program.

(10) $8,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $8,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to contract with organizations and attorneys to provide either legal representation or referral services for legal representation, or both, to indigent persons who are in need of legal services for matters related to their immigration status. Persons eligible for assistance under any contract entered into pursuant to this subsection must be determined to be indigent under standards developed under chapter 10.101 RCW.

(11)(a) $12,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $12,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $37,000,000 of the affordable housing for all account—state appropriation are provided solely for grants to support the building operation, maintenance, and service costs of permanent supportive housing projects or units within housing projects that have or will receive funding from the housing trust fund—state account or other public capital funding that:

(i) Is dedicated as permanent supportive housing units;

(ii) Is occupied by low-income households with incomes at or below 30 percent of the area median income; and

(iii) Requires a supplement to rent income to cover ongoing property operating, maintenance, and service expenses.

(b) Permanent supportive housing projects receiving federal operating subsidies that do not fully cover the operation, maintenance, and service costs of the projects are eligible to receive grants as described in this subsection.

(c) The department may use a reasonable amount of funding provided in this subsection to administer the grants.

(12) $7,000,000 of the home security fund—state appropriation is provided solely for the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs to:

(a) Expand outreach, services, and housing for homeless youth and young adults including but not limited to secure crisis residential centers, crisis residential centers, and HOPE beds, so that resources are equitably distributed across the state;

(b) Contract with other public agency partners to test innovative program models that prevent youth from exiting public systems into homelessness; and

(c) Support the development of an integrated services model, increase performance outcomes, and enable providers to have the necessary skills and expertise to effectively operate youth programs.

(13) $4,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $4,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of homeless youth to build infrastructure and services to support a continuum of interventions, including but not limited to prevention, crisis response, and long-term housing, to reduce youth homelessness in communities identified as part of the anchor community initiative.

(14) $2,125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of homeless youth to contract with one or more nonprofit organizations to provide youth services and young adult housing on a multi-acre youth campus located in the city of Tacoma. Youth services include, but are not limited to, HOPE beds and crisis residential centers to provide temporary shelter and permanency planning for youth under the age of 18. Young adult housing includes, but is not limited to, rental assistance and case management for young adults ages 18 to 24. The department shall submit an annual report to the legislature on the use of the funds. The report is due annually on June 30th. The report shall include but is not limited to:

(a) A breakdown of expenditures by program and expense type, including the cost per bed;

(b) The number of youth and young adults helped by each program;

(c) The number of youth and young adults on the waiting list for programs, if any; and

(d) Any other metric or measure the department deems appropriate to evaluate the effectiveness of the use of the funds.

(15) $65,310,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $65,310,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the essential needs and housing support program and related services. The department may use a portion of the funds provided in this subsection to continue the pilot program established in section 127(106) of chapter 357, Laws of 2020 (addressing the immediate housing needs of low or extremely low-income elderly or disabled adults in certain counties who receive social security disability or retirement income). The department must ensure the timely redistribution of the funding provided in this subsection among entities or counties to reflect actual caseload changes as required under RCW 43.185C.220(5)(c).

(16) $198,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $198,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to retain a behavioral health facilities siting administrator within the department to coordinate development of effective behavioral health housing options and provide technical assistance in siting of behavioral health treatment facilities statewide to aide in the governor's plan to discharge individuals from the state psychiatric hospitals into community settings. This position must work closely with the local government legislative authorities, planning departments, behavioral health providers, health care authority, department of social and health services, and other entities to facilitate linkages among disparate behavioral health community bed capacity-building efforts. This position must work to integrate building behavioral health treatment and infrastructure capacity in addition to ongoing supportive housing benefits.

(17) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to contract with an entity located in the Beacon hill/Chinatown international district area of Seattle to provide low income housing, low income housing support services, or both. To the extent practicable, the chosen location must be colocated with other programs supporting the needs of children, the elderly, or persons with disabilities.

(18) $4,740,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $4,740,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $4,500,000 of the home security fund—state appropriation are provided solely for the consolidated homeless grant program.

(a) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $4,500,000 of the home security fund—state appropriation is provided solely for permanent supportive housing targeted at those families who are chronically homeless and where at least one member of the family has a disability. The department will also connect these families to medicaid supportive services.

(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for diversion services for those families and individuals who are at substantial risk of losing stable housing or who have recently become homeless and are determined to have a high probability of returning to stable housing.

(c) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $3,240,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,240,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for up to nine months of rental assistance for individuals enrolled in the foundational community supports initiative who are transitioning off of benefits under RCW 74.04.805 due to increased income or other changes in eligibility. The health care authority, department of social and health services, and department of commerce shall collaborate on this effort.

(19) $958,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,332,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the operations of the long-term care ombudsman program.

(20) $1,007,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,007,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to administer a transitional housing program for nondependent homeless youth.

(21) $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to establish an identification assistance and support program to assist homeless persons in collecting documentation and procuring an identicard issued by the department of licensing. This program may be operated through a contract for services. The program shall operate in one county west of the crest of the Cascade mountain range with a population of 1,000,000 or more and one county east of the crest of the Cascade mountain range with a population of 500,000 or more.

(22)(a) $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs to administer flexible funding to support the anchor community initiative and anchor communities through the homeless prevention and diversion fund and serve eligible youth and young adults. The flexible funding administered under this subsection may be used for the immediate needs of eligible youth or young adults. An eligible youth or young adult may receive support under this subsection more than once.

(b) Flexible funding provided under this subsection may be used for purposes including but not limited to:

(i) Car repair or other transportation assistance;

(ii) Rental application fees, a security deposit, or short-term rental assistance;

(iii) Offsetting costs for first and last month's rent and security deposits;

(iv) Transportation costs to go to work;

(v) Assistance in obtaining photo identification or birth certificates; and

(vi) Other uses that will support the eligible youth or young adult's housing stability, education, or employment, or meet immediate basic needs.

(c) The flexible funding provided under this subsection may be provided to:

(i) Eligible youth and young adults. For the purposes of this subsection, an eligible youth or young adult is a person under age 25 who is experiencing or at risk of experiencing homelessness, including but not limited to those who are unsheltered, doubled up or in unsafe living situations, exiting inpatient programs, or in school;

(ii) Community-based providers assisting eligible youth or young adults in attaining safe and stable housing; and

(iii) Individuals or entities, including landlords, providing safe housing or other support designed to lead to housing for eligible youth or young adults.

(23) $607,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($607,000))$3,607,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to assist homeowners at risk of foreclosure pursuant to chapter 61.24 RCW. Funding provided in this section may be used for activities to prevent mortgage or tax lien foreclosure, housing counselors, a foreclosure prevention hotline, legal services for low-income individuals, mediation, and other activities that promote homeownership. The department may contract with other foreclosure fairness program state partners to carry out this work.

(24) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to contract with a nonprofit entity located in Seattle that focuses on poverty reduction and racial equity to convene and staff a poverty reduction workgroup steering committee comprised of individuals that have lived experience with poverty. Funding provided in this section may be used to reimburse steering committee members for travel, child care, and other costs associated with participation in the steering committee.

(25) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for capacity-building grants through the Latino community fund for emergency response services, educational programs, and human services support for children and families in rural and underserved communities.

(26) $1,400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of homeless youth to administer a competitive grant process to award funding to licensed youth shelters, HOPE centers, and crisis residential centers to provide behavioral health support services for youth in crisis, and to increase funding for current grantees.

(27) (($9,864,000))$11,844,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($9,864,000))$11,844,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for long-term rental subsidies for individuals with mental health and/or substance use disorders. This funding may be used for individuals enrolled in the foundational community support program while waiting for a longer term resource for rental support or for individuals transitioning from behavioral health treatment facilities or local jails. Individuals who would otherwise be eligible for the foundational community support program but are not eligible because of their citizenship status may also be served.

(28) $9,575,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $9,575,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to continue the Washington state office of firearm safety and violence prevention, including the creation of a state and federal grant funding plan to direct resources to cities that are most impacted by community violence. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for community-based violence prevention and intervention services to individuals identified through the King county shots fired social network analysis. The department must complete an evaluation of the program and provide a report to the governor and the appropriate legislative committees by June 30, 2023.

(b) $5,318,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $5,318,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to support existing programs and capacity building for new programs providing evidence-based violence prevention and intervention services to youth who are at high risk to perpetrate or be victims of firearm violence and who reside in areas with high rates of firearm violence as provided in RCW 43.330A.050.

(i) Priority shall be given to programs that partner with the University of Washington, school of medicine, department of psychiatry and behavioral sciences for training and support to deliver culturally relevant family integrated transition services through use of credible messenger advocates.

(ii) The office may enter into agreement with the University of Washington or another independent entity with expertise in evaluating community-based grant-funded programs to evaluate the grant program's effectiveness.

(iii) The office shall enter into agreement to provide funding to the University of Washington, school of medicine, department of psychiatry and behavioral sciences to directly deliver trainings and support to programs providing culturally relevant family integrated transition services through use of credible messenger and to train a third-party organization to similarly support those programs.

(iv) Of the amounts provided under (b) of this subsection, $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a certified credible messenger program that does work in at least three regions of Washington state to train and certify credible messengers to implement a culturally responsive, evidence-based credible messenger violence prevention and intervention services program.

(c) $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided to further support firearm violence prevention and intervention programs and initiatives consistent with the duties of the office as set forth in RCW 43.330A.020.

(d) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided to support safe storage programs and suicide prevention outreach and education efforts across the state.

(29) $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to administer grants to diaper banks for the purchase of diapers, wipes, and other essential baby products, for distribution to families in need. The department must give priority to providers serving or located in marginalized, low-income communities or communities of color; and providers that help support racial equity.

(30) $4,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $4,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to counties to stabilize newly arriving refugees, including those from the 2021 Afghanistan conflict and the 2022 Ukraine-Russia conflict.

(31) $120,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $120,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit resource center in King county that provides sexual assault advocacy services, therapy services, and prevention and outreach to begin a three-year, multigrade sexual violence prevention program in the Renton school district.

(32) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs to colead a prevention work group with the department of children, youth, and families. The work group must focus on preventing youth and young adult homelessness and other related negative outcomes. The work group shall consist of members representing the department of social and health services, the employment security department, the health care authority, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the Washington student achievement council, the interagency work group on homelessness, community-based organizations, and young people and families with lived experience of housing instability, child welfare involvement, justice system involvement, or inpatient behavioral health involvement.

(a) The work group shall help guide implementation of:

(i) The state's strategic plan on prevention of youth homelessness;

(ii) Chapter 157, Laws of 2018 (SSB 6560);

(iii) Chapter 312, Laws of 2019 (E2SSB 5290);

(iv) Efforts to reform family reconciliation services; and

(v) Other state initiatives addressing the prevention of youth homelessness.

(b) The office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs must use the amounts provided in this subsection to contract with a community-based organization to support the involvement with the work group of young people and families with lived experience of housing instability, child welfare involvement, justice system involvement, or inpatient behavioral health involvement. The community-based organization must serve and be substantially governed by marginalized populations. The amounts provided in this subsection must supplement private funding to support the work group.

(33) $22,802,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $22,803,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to increase existing grantee contracts providing rental or housing subsidy and services for eligible tenants in housing and homeless programs. The department must distribute funding in a manner that will prioritize maintaining current levels of homeless subsidies and services and stabilizing the homeless service provider workforce.

(34)(a) $35,000,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to administer grant funding through the existing network of federal low-income home energy assistance program grantees to provide low-income households with energy utility bill assistance.

(b) To qualify for assistance, a household must be below 80 percent of the area median income and living in a community that experiences high environmental health disparities.

(c) Under the grant program, each household accessing energy bill assistance must be offered an energy assessment that includes determining the household's need for clean cooling and heating system upgrades that improve safety and efficiency while meeting Washington's climate goals. If beneficial, households may be offered grant funding to cover the replacement of inefficient, outdated, or unsafe home heating and cooling systems with more energy efficient electric heating and cooling technologies, such as heat pumps.

(d) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, no more than 60 percent of the funding may be utilized by the department to target services to multifamily residential buildings across the state that experience high energy use, where a majority of the residents within the building are below 80 percent of the area median income and the community experiences high environmental health disparities.

(e) In serving low-income households who rent or lease a residence, the department must establish processes to ensure that the rent for the residence is not increased and the tenant is not evicted as a result of receiving assistance under the grant program.

(f) The department must incorporate data collected while implementing this program into future energy assistance reports as required under RCW 19.405.120. The department may publish information on its website on the number of furnace or heating and cooling system replacements, including replacements within multifamily housing units.

(g) The department may utilize a portion of the funding provided within this subsection to create an electronic application system.

(35) $55,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $55,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 ((and $55,500,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery account—federal appropriation)) are provided solely for the department to continue grant funding for emergency housing and shelter capacity and associated supports such as street outreach, diversion services, short-term rental assistance, hotel and motel vouchers, housing search and placement, and housing stability case management. Entities eligible for grant funding include local governments and nonprofit entities. The department may use existing programs, such as the consolidated homelessness grant program, to award funding under this subsection. Grants provided under this subsection must be used to maintain or increase current emergency housing capacity, funded by the shelter program grant and other programs, as practicable due to increased costs of goods, services, and wages. Emergency housing includes transitional housing, congregate or noncongregate shelter, sanctioned encampments, or short-term hotel or motel stays. Of the amount provided in this subsection for fiscal year 2025, $1,500,000 must be granted to a housing readiness program serving individuals experiencing homelessness in the city of Longview. Funding may be used to operate severe weather shelters, housing navigation, case management, laundry and hygiene facilities, connection to other social services, and other programs serving unhoused individuals in Cowlitz county.

(36)(a) $75,050,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $75,050,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a targeted grant program to transition persons residing in encampments to safer housing opportunities, with an emphasis on ensuring individuals living unsheltered reach permanent housing solutions. Eligible grant recipients include local governments and nonprofit organizations operating to provide housing or services. The department may provide funding to state agencies to ensure individuals accessing housing services are also able to access other wrap-around services that enable them to obtain housing such as food, personal identification, and other related services. Local government and nonprofit grant recipients may use grant funding to provide outreach, housing, case management, transportation, site monitoring, and other services needed to assist individuals residing in encampments and on public rights-of-way with moving into housing.

(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(i) No less than $120,000,000 must be used for housing services for persons residing on state-owned rights-of-way; and

(ii) All remaining funds may be used for housing services for persons residing in encampments, including encampments located on public lands, as defined in RCW 79.02.010, or state parks and parkways.

(c) Grant criteria must include, but are not limited to:

(i) Whether a site where the grantee will conduct outreach and engagement has been identified as a location where individuals residing in encampments or on the public right-of-way are in specific circumstances or physical locations that expose them to especially or imminently unsafe conditions;

(ii) A commitment to resolve encampments through extensive outreach followed by matching individuals with temporary lodging or permanent housing that is reasonably likely to fit with their actual needs and situation, is noncongregate whenever possible, and takes into consideration individuals' immediate and long-term needs and abilities to achieve and maintain housing stability;

(iii) A commitment to transition individuals who are initially matched to temporary lodging into a permanent housing placement within six months except under unusual circumstances;

(iv) Local government readiness and capacity to enter into and fulfill the grant requirements as applicable; and

(v) Other criteria as identified by the department.

(d) When awarding grants under (a) of this subsection, the department must prioritize applicants that focus on ensuring an expeditious path to sustainable permanent housing solutions, and that demonstrate an understanding of working with individuals to identify their optimal housing type and level of ongoing services through the effective use of outreach, engagement, and temporary lodging and permanent housing placement.

(e) Grant recipients under (a) of this subsection must enter into a memorandum of understanding with the department, and other state agencies if applicable, as a condition of receiving funds. Memoranda of understanding must specify the responsibilities of the grant recipients and the state agencies, consistent with the requirements of (c) of this subsection, and must include specific measurable outcomes for each entity signing the memorandum. The department must publish all signed memoranda on the department's website and must publish updates on outcomes for each memorandum at least every 90 days, while taking steps to protect the privacy of individuals served by the program. At a minimum, outcomes must include:

(i) The number of people actually living in any encampment identified for intervention by the department or grantees;

(ii) The demographics of those living in any encampment identified for intervention by the department or grantees;

(iii) The duration of engagement with individuals living within encampments;

(iv) The types of housing options that were offered;

(v) The number of individuals who accepted offered housing;

(vi) Any reasons given for why individuals declined offered housing;

(vii) The types of assistance provided to move individuals into offered housing;

(viii) Any services and benefits in which an individual was successfully enrolled; and

(ix) The housing outcomes of individuals who were placed into housing six months and one year after placement.

(f) Grant recipients under (a) of this subsection may not transition individuals from encampments or close encampments unless they have provided extensive outreach and offered each individual temporary lodging or permanent housing that matches the actual situation and needs of each person, is noncongregate whenever possible, and takes into consideration individuals' immediate and long-term needs and abilities to achieve and maintain housing stability. Grant recipients who initially match an individual to temporary lodging must make efforts to transition the person to a permanent housing placement within six months except under unusual circumstances. The department must establish criteria regarding the safety, accessibility, and habitability of housing options to be offered by grant recipients to ensure that such options are private, sanitary, healthy, and dignified, and that grant recipients provide options that are well-matched to an individual's assessed needs.

(g) Funding granted to eligible recipients under (a) of this subsection may not be used to supplant or replace existing funding provided for housing or homeless services.

(37) $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to increase funding for the community services block grant program. Distribution of these funds to community action agencies shall prioritize racial equity and undoing inequity from historic underinvestment in Black, indigenous, and people of color, and rural communities.

(38) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to provide a grant to a nonprofit organization to identify opportunities for cities in Whatcom county to improve access to affordable housing through conducting market research, engaging stakeholders, and developing tools and implementation strategies for cities that will increase access to affordable housing. The grant recipient must be a nonprofit organization based in Bellingham that promotes affordable housing solutions and with a mission to create thriving communities.

(39) $225,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $225,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to provide a grant to a nonprofit organization located in the city of Redmond that serves Latino low-income, immigrant, and Spanish-speaking communities in King and Snohomish counties through arts and culture events and community services. The grant funding may be used to expand existing programs including, but not limited to, support for small businesses, rent assistance, vaccination and COVID-19 outreach, programs aimed at increasing postsecondary enrollments in college and trade schools, and other community services and programs.

(40) $4,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $4,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to administer grants to community-based organizations that serve historically disadvantaged populations to conduct outreach and to assist community members in applying for state and federal assistance programs including, but not limited to, those administered by the department of social and health services, department of commerce, and department of children, youth, and families.

(41) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department to provide a grant to a nonprofit organization located in the city of Issaquah to provide cultural programs and navigational supports for individuals and families who may face language or other cultural barriers when engaging with schools, public safety, health and human services, and local government agencies.

(42) $200,000,000 of the community reinvestment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to distribute grants for economic development, civil and criminal legal assistance, community-based violence intervention and prevention services, and reentry services programs. Grants must be distributed in accordance with the recommendations of the community reinvestment plan developed pursuant to section 128(134), chapter 297, Laws of 2022 (ESSB 5693).

(43) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000,000 of the covenant homeownership account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1474 (covenant homeownership prg.). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(44) $140,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $140,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for additional staffing for the developmental disabilities council.

(45) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization located in the city of Spokane to provide transitional housing, educational programs, and other resources for refugee and immigrant families.

(46) $1,169,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,169,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1715 (domestic violence). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(47) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to a dispute resolution center located in Snohomish county to provide mediation and resolution services for landlords and tenants, with the goal of avoiding evictions.

(48) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for grants to nonprofit organizations to operate hunger relief response programs serving individuals living in permanent supportive housing. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) $275,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization located in King county.

(b) $225,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization located in Spokane county.

(49) $180,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization operating a teen center in the city of Issaquah to provide case management and counseling services for youth ages 12 to 19.

(50)(a) $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit community-based organization for the coordination of a gang violence prevention consortium with entities including community-based organizations, law enforcement, and members of the faith community, and to continue and expand after-school activities and social services for students and young adults in the Yakima valley. Social services may include, but are not limited to, employment, mental health, counseling, tutoring, and mentoring services. The grant recipient must be a community-based organization located in Granger operating a Spanish language public radio station and with the mission of addressing the social, educational, and health needs of economically disadvantaged Spanish-speaking residents of central and eastern Washington.

(b) By June 30, 2025, the department must provide a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature. The report must include: (i) A description of the gang violence prevention programs conducted by the consortium and how they were implemented; and (ii) The number of individuals who participated in or received services through the programs conducted by the consortium, including any relevant demographic data for those individuals.

(51) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department to contract with a nonprofit organization to develop an affordable housing predevelopment plan. The affordable housing predevelopment plan must assess the feasibility of using surplus public land located at or near north Seattle Community College and Highline Community College for the development of affordable colocated housing that could serve low and moderate-income state workers. The contract recipient must be an organization that provides consultation services on affordable housing development. In creating the predevelopment plan, the contract recipient must solicit input from interested parties including, but not limited to, low-income and affordable housing experts, policy staff in the office of the governor, state public employee unions, and legislators.

(52) $781,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $781,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1406 (youth seeking housing assist). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(53)(a) $1,750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of firearm safety and violence prevention to continue a healthy youth and violence prevention initiative demonstration program serving south King county, with the goal of preventing violence, decreasing involvement with the juvenile justice system, and encouraging health and wellbeing for youth and young adults ages 12 to 24. As part of the demonstration program, the office must provide grant funding to and partner with a community-based organization to serve as a regional coordinator to:

(i) Connect youth and young adults ages 12 to 24 who are most vulnerable to violence with programs that provide services including, but not limited to, street outreach, youth employment and preapprenticeship programs, case management, behavioral health services, and other services as appropriate; and

(ii) Assist local governments, service providers, and nonprofit organizations in accessing and leveraging federal, state, and local funding for violence prevention and related services.

(b) The grant recipient under (a) of this subsection must be a nonprofit health system currently administering a violence prevention initiative in King and Pierce counties. The grant recipient may subgrant or subcontract funds to programs providing services as described in (a)(i) of this subsection.

(54) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit sexual assault resource center located in Renton. Grant funding may be used for information technology improvements focused on client data management that will improve client access to health services, cybersecurity, and data privacy.

(55)(a) $850,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $850,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the continuation of existing contracts with a nonprofit organization to increase housing supply and equitable housing outcomes by advancing affordable housing developments, including supportive housing, transitional housing, shelter, or housing funded through the apple health and homes program, that are colocated with community services such as education centers, health clinics, nonprofit organizations, social services, or community spaces or facilities, available to residents or the public, on underutilized or tax-exempt land.

(b) The contract recipient must use the funding provided under this subsection to:

(i) Implement strategies to accelerate development of affordable housing with space for education centers, health clinics, nonprofit organizations, social services, or community space or facilities, available to residents or the public, on underutilized or tax-exempt land;

(ii) Analyze the suitability of properties and sites for affordable housing as described under (b)(i) of this subsection, including existing buildings for supportive housing, through completing due diligence, conceptual design, and financial analysis activities, and applying and implementing an equity lens in site selection, program planning, development, and operations;

(iii) Work with elected officials, local governments, educational institutions, public agencies, local housing and community development partners, early learning partners, health care providers, and nonprofit service organizations to:

(A) Identify and catalyze surplus, underutilized, or tax-exempt properties for the development of affordable housing;

(B) Provide catalytic funding and technical assistance to advance the development of affordable housing, including by identifying funding sources to support the needs of specific projects; and

(C) Identify impediments to the development of affordable housing and develop recommendations and strategies to address those impediments, reduce costs, advance community vision and equitable outcomes, and accelerate predevelopment and development times associated with affordable housing;

(iv) Organize community partners and build capacity to develop affordable housing sites;

(v) Facilitate collaboration and codevelopment between affordable housing and education centers, health clinics, nonprofit organizations, social services, or community spaces and facilities available to residents or the public;

(vi) Provide technical assistance and predevelopment services to support future development of sites; and

(vii) Catalyze the redevelopment of at least 20 sites to create approximately 2,000 affordable homes.

(c) Funding may also be used to:

(i) Partner with state, regional, and local public entities, nonprofit housing developers, and service providers to develop a broad range of housing types for supportive housing for populations authorized to receive the housing benefit under the apple health and homes act;

(ii) Provide technical assistance on the constructive alignment of state or local capital funds and other services for the construction, acquisition, refurbishment, redevelopment, master leasing of properties for noncongregate housing, or conversion of units from nonresidential to residential, of dwelling units for supportive housing funded through the apple health and homes program;

(iii) Advise on local community engagement, especially with populations with lived experience of homelessness and housing insecurity, for supportive housing funded through the apple health and homes program;

(iv) Subcontract for specialized predevelopment services, as needed, and subgrant to reimburse for supportive housing funded through the apple health and homes program; and

(v) Hire staff necessary to implement activities under (b) and (c) of this subsection.

(56)(a) $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to continue a lifeline support system pilot project to assist individuals who have experienced or are at risk of entering into public systems of care. Public systems of care include office of homeless youth prevention and protection shelter and housing programs, the juvenile justice system, dependency under chapter 13.34 RCW, and inpatient behavioral health treatment.

(b)(i) The lifeline must function as a no-wrong-door access point for support and connections to services for qualifying individuals who require assistance to overcome a life challenge that could escalate into a crisis, or who are in need of general mentorship and counsel. The lifeline support system must facilitate and promote partnerships across state agencies, federally recognized tribes, counties, and community-based providers to coordinate trauma-informed and culturally responsive services for youth and young adults and their supports. The department is authorized to implement lifeline services through contracts with community partners and nonprofit organizations.

(ii) From amounts provided in this subsection, the department must allocate funding to establish a lifeline fund program. The department may use moneys allocated for the fund program to assist community partners and nonprofit organizations to implement lifeline services when those providers cannot identify an existing resource to resolve a recipient's need. The department must establish an application process and criteria for the fund program.

(c) By June 30, 2025, the department shall report to the legislature regarding the success and shortcomings of the lifeline support system, request-for-service outcomes, and the demographics of beneficiaries.

(57) $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization to provide legal aid in subjects including, but not limited to, criminal law and civil rights cases for underserved populations focusing on Black gender-diverse communities. The grant recipient must be a nonprofit organization with offices in Seattle and Tacoma and with a mission to provide intersectional legal and social services for Black intersex and gender-diverse communities in Washington.

(58) $213,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($213,000))$773,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization within the city of Tacoma that provides social services and educational programming to assist Latino and indigenous communities in honoring heritage and culture through the arts, and in overcoming barriers to social, political, economic, and cultural community development. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($175,000))$535,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for education and training programming in community health organizing, "promotora" health education, grassroots organizing, leadership development, college preparedness and financial aid outreach, small business technical support and education, and civic engagement focused on Latino and indigenous community members; and

(b) $38,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($38,000))$238,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for ((advocacy, translation services, emergency housing, and other services for victims of crime and domestic violence))family support services for bilingual, bicultural clients.

(59) (($500,000))$833,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 ((is))and $667,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided ((solely)) for the department to provide grants to nonprofit organizations including, but not limited to, religious nonprofits, "by and for" organizations, or cultural community centers, to fund the physical security or repair of such institutions. Grant recipients must ((have reasons to believe they have been subject to security threats and must demonstrate a need for enhanced security. Grant funding must be used and limited to the purchase of security hardware and equipment to enhance the security of the buildings and grounds of such organizations))substantiate that their site or sites have been subject to or at risk of physical attacks, threats, vandalism, or damages based on their mission, ideology, or beliefs and demonstrate a need for investments in physical security enhancements, construction or renovation, target hardening, preparedness planning, training, or exercises.

(60) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to provide grant funding to a nonprofit organization to provide supports, including behavioral health resources, housing services, and parenting education, to parents with substance use disorder. The grant recipient must be a nonprofit organization located in the south Puget Sound region that provides a parent child assistance program and focuses on building parenting skills and confidence to ensure children have safe and healthy childhoods.

(61) $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for costs to develop and operate community-based residential housing and services for youth wellness spanning a range of needs and circumstances at the Pacific hospital preservation and development authority quarters, buildings three through 10 in Seattle. The amounts provided in this subsection may be used for planning, lease payments, and other related expenses for the development and operation of comprehensive residential programs providing housing, on-site social services, and community-based resources for youth identified by the department of commerce, the department of children, youth, and families, or the health care authority. The funding may also be used for the preparation and issuance of a request for qualifications for a site operator, or lease management and related administrative functions. The department is authorized to enter into a lease, with an option to enter into multiyear extensions, for the Pacific hospital preservation and development authority quarters, buildings three through 10.

(62) $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization based in the city of Seattle that works to improve the quality of life for low-income families and members of the refugee and immigrant community, with a focus on the Somali and Oromos community. The grant funding may be used to expand current programs including, but not limited to, case management and referral services for immigrants and refugees, youth programs, and services for seniors.

(63) $270,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $270,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization headquartered in Mount Vernon for costs to operate and provide homeless services at a low-barrier emergency temporary homeless center located in Burlington.

(64) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization located in the city of Seattle that provides legal assistance and representation to survivors of sexual and gender-based violence to expand their current services including, but not limited to, legal assistance and representation; technical assistance for advocates, providers, and attorneys; community education and trainings; and other legal support services. In providing services, the grant recipient must protect the privacy, safety, and civil rights of survivors and utilize trauma-informed practices and equity principles.

(65) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to provide a grant to a nonprofit organization serving King and Snohomish counties for a program conducted in partnership with King county, which serves individuals who are involved in the criminal justice system and who have experienced domestic, sexual, or gender-based violence. The grant recipient may use the funding for costs including, but not limited to, legal advocacy, outreach, connecting clients to housing and other resources, data analytics, and staffing.

(66) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of crime victims advocacy to contract for a study of the impacts of the commercial sex industry on Black and African American communities in Washington, with a focus on Black and African American persons who identify as female. The office must contract with an organization that has expertise on the topic of the commercial sex industry and Black communities in Washington. The study must include a review of the impacts of the commercial sex industry on Black and African American residents of Washington, and culturally informed and survivor-informed policy recommendations for reducing sex trafficking and sexual exploitation of Black and African American Washingtonians. The department must submit a report of the study findings to the appropriate committees of the legislature by September 1, 2024.

(67) $20,656,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $20,655,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to crime victims service providers to ensure continuity of services impacted by reductions in federal victims of crime act funding and to help address increased demand for services attributable to the COVID-19 pandemic. The department must distribute the funding in a manner that is consistent with the office of crime victims advocacy's state plan. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to programs operated by and for historically marginalized populations to support "by and for" culturally specific services for victims of domestic violence, sexual assault, and other crimes in historically marginalized populations. Marginalized populations can include, but are not limited to, organizations or groups composed along racial, ethnic, religious, sexual orientation, and gender lines.

(b) $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to programs developed to support the enhancement and development of additional services for tribal members, including programs to address needs of crime victims, including strategies which integrate services or multiple crime types.

(68) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for a grant to the city of Seattle for start-up costs for the Seattle social housing developer and to meet the requirements of the city of Seattle initiative 135, which concerns developing and maintaining affordable social housing in Seattle. The funding provided under this subsection may only be used for costs associated with creating social housing developments, operating costs associated with maintaining social housing developments, and administrative costs of operating social housing.

(69) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely to contract with a nonprofit to provide wraparound services for homeless families with children, including prevention, shelter, and stabilization services. The nonprofit must be located in Pierce county and be an affiliate of a national organization dedicated to preventing and ending family homelessness by providing prevention, shelter, and stabilization services.

(70) Within existing resources, the department must submit an interim and a final report to the appropriate committees of the legislature on efforts taken by the department to stabilize rents for tenants of affordable housing units financed through the housing assistance program created under RCW 43.185.015 including, but not limited to, efforts to limit or mitigate the impacts of rent increases for tenants of qualifying units. The department must submit the interim report by December 1, 2023, and the final report by December 1, 2024.

(71) Before awarding or entering into grants or contracts for the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium for homeless housing and service programs that are funded from the home security fund account or the affordable housing for all account, the department must first consult with local governments and eligible grantees to ensure that funding from these accounts is used to maintain the quantity and types of homeless housing and services funded in local communities as of February 28, 2023. The department may take into consideration local document recording fee balances and individual county fluctuations in recording fee collections when allocating state funds. The department must redeploy funds to other nonprofit and county grantees if originally granted amounts are not expended or committed within a reasonable timeline. The department may then provide funding to eligible entities to undertake the activities described in RCW 36.22.176(1)(c)(i), such as funding for project-based vouchers and other assistance necessary to support permanent supportive housing as defined in RCW 36.70A.030 or as administered by the office of apple health and homes created in RCW 43.330.181.

(72) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for a grant to an Everett-based affiliate of a national nonprofit human services organization to stabilize newly arriving refugees from the 2021 Afghanistan conflict and the 2022 Ukraine conflict.

(73) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a contract with a nonprofit organization to expand private capacity to provide legal services for indigent foreign nationals in contested domestic relations and family law cases. The contract recipient must be a nonprofit organization headquartered in the city of Seattle that provides training to attorneys and judges on international family law issues and provides direct representation to qualified indigent clients. Amounts provided in this subsection may not be expended for direct private legal representation of clients in domestic relations and family law cases.

(74) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to a youth development organization providing civic engagement and education through a youth and government program. The grant is provided solely for support of the organization's mock trial and youth legislature programs.

(75) $252,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $229,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5198 (mobile home community sales). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(76) $1,694,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,694,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5561 (law enforcement community grants). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(77) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5599 (protected health care/youth). The entirety of this amount is provided for the office of homeless youth for prevention and protection programs to provide supportive care grants to organizations to address the needs of youth seeking protected health care services. ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(78) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to the city of Monroe to continue existing pilot projects that enable the city to dispatch human services and social services staff in conjunction with law enforcement staff to support unhoused residents and residents in crisis.

(79) $2,850,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,850,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5114 (sex trafficking). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(81)))(80) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to the city of Bellevue for one-time expenses required for the operation of an expanded community service center to help low-income individuals and immigrant and refugee community members. The center will join with community partners to provide utility rate and rent relief; health care access; energy assistance; food access; medical, legal and financial services; housing; childcare resources; employment assistance; and resources for starting a business.

(((82)))(81) $215,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $345,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to produce a report to the legislature detailing the scope of work, cost estimates, and implementation timeline to create or procure an online registry of rental units in Washington state subject to state information system planning and oversight requirements. The online rental unit registry must have the capacity to collect and report out timely information on each rental unit in the state. Information to collect includes, but is not limited to, the rental unit's physical address, identity of the property owner, monthly rent charged, and vacancy status. The scope of work must assume integration with existing rental registries operated by local governments. Cost and timeline estimates must provide two alternatives with one assuming statewide implementation and the other assuming implementation in the six largest counties of the state. The department shall consult with landlord representatives, tenant representatives, local governments operating existing rental registries, and other interested stakeholders as part of the process of developing the scope of work and timeline for the online rental unit registry. The department must submit the report to the legislature by December 1, 2024.

(((83)))(82) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for a Seattle based nonprofit to create a temporary space to allow youth and low-income populations to participate in ice rink related events during the 2024 national hockey league winter classic.

(((84)))(83) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization based in Kitsap county that partners with the Bremerton and central Kitsap school districts, first responders, and other organizations to expand implementation of the handle with care program.

(((85)))(84) $371,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $371,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for Pacific county to operate or participate in a drug task force to enhance coordination and intelligence while facilitating multijurisdictional criminal investigations.

(((86)))(85) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for distribution to statewide and community asset building coalitions across Washington to support capacity in organizations that coordinate financial health services and outreach efforts around poverty reduction resources such as the earned income tax credit and the working families tax credit.

(((87) $400,000))(86) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 ((is))and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a community based organization in Whatcom county to expand services to unhoused and low-income residents of Ferndale and north Whatcom county and to provide a safe parking program.

(((88)))(87) $155,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to an organization in Pierce county experienced in providing peer-to-peer training, to develop and implement a program aimed at reducing workplace sexual harassment in the agricultural sector. Funding will be used to continue peer-to-peer trainings for farmworkers in Yakima county and expand services into Grant and Benton counties. Funding may also be used to support an established network of farmworker peer trainers whose primary purpose is to prevent workplace sexual harassment and assault through leadership and education. The organization is expected to share best practices from their peer-to-peer model at a statewide conference.

(((89)))(88) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to a Seattle-based nonprofit that provides holistic services to help refugee and immigrant women. Funds must be used to expand an existing program that increases equity in ice skating and hockey by providing skate lessons to preschoolers from diverse and low-income families.

(((90)))(89)(a) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to administer grants to strengthen family resource center services and increase capacity statewide. Grant funding may be used: For an organization to provide new services in order to meet the statutory requirements of a family resource center, as defined in RCW 43.216.010; to increase capacity or enhance service provision at current family resource centers, including but not limited to direct staffing and administrative costs; and to conduct data collection, evaluation, and quality improvement activities. The department may award an amount from $30,000 up to $200,000 per grant recipient.

(b) Eligible applicants for a grant under (a) of this subsection include current family resource centers, as defined in RCW 43.330.010, or organizations in the process of becoming qualified as family resource centers. Applicants must affirm their ability and willingness to serve all families requesting services in order to receive a grant. Applicants must currently be or agree to become a member of a statewide family resource center network during the grant award period in order to receive a grant. Applicants must provide proof of certification in the standards of quality for family strengthening and support developed by the national family support network for one member of the applicant's organizational leadership in order to receive a grant.

(c) In distributing grant funding, the department must, to the extent it is practicable, award 75 percent of funding to organizations located west of the crest of the Cascade mountains, and 25 percent of funding to organizations located east of the crest of the Cascade mountains.

(d) By July 1, 2025, grant recipients must submit a report to the department on the use of grant funding, including, but not limited to, progress in attaining status as a family resource center, if applicable; the number and type of services offered to families; demographic and income data for families served; and family post-service outcomes. By September 1, 2025, the department must submit a report to the Legislature on topics including, but not limited to, the grant application process; needs identified by family resource centers; and use of funds by grant recipients.

(e) Of the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection, $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to provide a grant to the statewide nonprofit organization that serves as the registered Washington state network member of the national family support network. The grant recipient may use the grant funding for costs including, but not limited to, outreach and engagement, data and evaluation, and providing training and development opportunities in support of family resource centers statewide.

(((91)))(90) $9,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($9,000,000))$29,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department for grants to local governments for maintaining programs and investments which are primarily funded through document recording fees pursuant to RCW ((36.22.178, 36.22.179, and 36.22.1791))36.22.250. In allocating grant funding to local jurisdictions, awards must be based on a formula, determined by the department, to ensure that grants are distributed equitably among cities and counties.

(((93)))(91)(a) $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a law enforcement technology grant program for the purpose of providing law enforcement with modern vehicle pursuit management technology including, but not limited to, global positioning system tracking equipment, automated license plate reading technology, aircraft, and nonarmed and nonarmored drone technology.

(b) Grants must be awarded to local law enforcement agencies based on locally developed proposals. The department shall establish policies for applications under this subsection in addition to criteria for evaluating and selecting grant recipients. A proposal must include a request for specific technology and a specific plan for the implementation, use, and effectiveness reporting of that technology.

(c) Before grants are awarded, each local law enforcement agency seeking to acquire vehicle pursuit technology must:

(i) Establish data-sharing and management policies including policies related to sharing data between law enforcement agencies and other third parties; and

(ii) Establish policies ensuring all personnel who operate the vehicle pursuit technology, or access the vehicle pursuit technology data, are trained to use that technology and are able to comply with the data-sharing and management policies prior to the operational use of the vehicle pursuit technology.

(92) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the distribution of grants to cities, counties, or nonprofit organizations to support individuals in need of emergency housing assistance. Emergency housing assistance may include, but is not limited to, short-term rental assistance, moving costs, other one-time costs associated with identifying and obtaining housing, or temporary shelter in the event of a crisis or when people have been displaced. Funding provided under this subsection must be prioritized for entities that can demonstrate that the population served includes families with children, pregnant individuals, or other medically vulnerable individuals. The department may only distribute funding under this subsection upon coordination with the office of the governor.

(93) $4,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to continue to provide grant funding to local multijurisdictional task forces that previously received funding through the federal Edward Byrne memorial justice assistance grant program. Grants provided under this section must be used consistent with the requirements of Edward Byrne memorial justice assistance grants and with national best practices for law enforcement.

(94) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs to provide grants to nonprofit organizations implementing place-based health zone models to provide and strengthen youth development services and mental and behavioral health supports for youth and their families for clearly demarcated geographical health zones. The services and supports may range from primary prevention to crisis services. Grant funding may support health zone activities and evaluation activities. The office must distribute four grants, as follows:

(a) Two grants to nonprofits with established place-based health zone models, for costs to provide services and conduct evaluation activities; and

(b) Two grants to nonprofits who are currently developing and implementing place-based health zone models, for costs to establish and provide services and conduct evaluation activities.

(95) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for operating costs of licensed assisted living facilities located in Clark county that have at least 50 percent of residents who were experiencing homelessness or were unstably housed immediately prior to admission to the facility.

(96) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization to continue sexual assault prevention education programming to K-12 schools in Tacoma and expand services to the Franklin Pierce school district. The grant recipient must be a state-accredited community sexual assault program serving Pierce county that provides professional training, prevention education, intervention, and advocacy programs for victims of sexual assault, sexual abuse, and sex trafficking.

(97) $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization to provide community-based healing-centered arts engagement programming for populations including, but not limited to, survivors of gender-based violence and individuals working to reintegrate after incarceration. The grant recipient must be a nonprofit organization based in the city of Seattle with experience in providing arts engagement programming, including serving veteran and Latino cohorts.

(98) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to a food bank serving African American and other BIPOC communities located in south King county. Funding may be used for food bank operations, food delivery services, and food storage.

(99) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit based in King county that exclusively serves foreign-trained physicians to help foreign-trained physicians prepare to work in a United States clinical setting and obtain a medical doctor: clinical experience license in Washington state. The nonprofit may use the amount provided in this subsection to:

(a) Provide stipends of up to $2,000 per foreign-trained physician to:

(i) Take medical exams or English as a second language classes;

(ii) Obtain a professional resume review or interview skill development; or

(iii) Defray any other expenses that may limit their ability to become hire-ready physicians; and

(b) Operate an educational outreach program to help medical providers and institutions understand the medical doctor: clinical experience program including eligibility, licensure laws, and details of working with foreign-trained physicians in their facilities.

(100) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit in east King county, recognized as a by and for organization, to advance affordable housing. The grant recipient must be an organization that partners in equitable, affordable housing development. The grant recipient must use the funding as follows:

(a) To educate residents on the benefits of affordable housing in east King county;

(b) To facilitate partnerships to enable equitable transit-oriented development across the east King county region that builds housing at scale;

(c) For a project that will produce up to 33 affordable housing units on the Eastside; and

(d) To identify strategies for land acquisition and assembly around high-capacity transit stations that will result in a mix of housing.

(101) $625,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for Snohomish county human services to provide technical assistance and contract with a nonprofit to support youth, parents, and families with school-based collaboration, and social activities for youth.

(102) $477,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for Kitsap county to provide 70 continuous-stay, low-barrier/harm reduction model shelter beds.

(103) $15,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $20,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to contract with a nonprofit in Seattle to develop a list of BIPOC families, with an emphasis on African American households, that want to live in Seattle for the purpose of assisting those families with finding and keeping housing in Seattle.

(104) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $420,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to a Seattle-based community center that assists eastern European refugees and immigrants to provide short term housing assistance, immigration services, and support to individuals in Washington who fled the Ukraine-Russia conflict.

(105) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to a Bellingham-based nonprofit serving youth and young adults experiencing homelessness and housing insecurity to increase capacity and the ability for staff to support clients in attending appointments, providing navigating services, and assessing resources throughout Whatcom county.

(106) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for Whatcom county to study the potential to create an interjurisdictional coordinating body focused on improving the housing market for tenants, landlords, and those interested in becoming landlords. The study should examine the potential for an office of healthy housing to:

(a) Have a sustainable funding model and assist landlords and tenants in understanding leases and procedures;

(b) Increase housing supply by providing resources to small landlords; and

(c) Work with major local employers and local higher education institutions to ensure a thriving local housing market.

(107) $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to a Seattle-based nonprofit that teaches math using hands-on learning experiences and collaborates with community partners to create equity-based, culturally relevant math education opportunities.

(108) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to the city of Tacoma to support the continued operation of 307 emergency and temporary shelter beds.

(109) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to a Yakima-based center that works to raise and uphold standards in the workplace to expand access to education and legal aid for low-wage immigrant workers in order to curb workplace rights violations and foster economic stability.

(110) $317,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to three resource centers that are expecting a reduction in funding from the office of crime victims advocacy. Funding is intended to cover any deficit these organizations experience to continue service levels to sexual assault survivors. Of this amount:

(a) $200,000 is for a nonprofit sexual assault resource center in King county;

(b) $77,000 is for a Richland-based accredited community sexual assault program; and

(c) $40,000 is for a nonprofit organization that provides crime victim support in multiple locations across the region, including in Spokane and Vancouver.

(111) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization to assist fathers transitioning from incarceration to community and family reunification. The grant recipient must have experience contracting with the department of corrections to support incarcerated individual betterment projects and contracting with the department of social and health services to provide access and visitation services.

(112) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to evaluate alternative methods for calculating average median household income. The department must include in its evaluation the feasibility of using median household income data by state legislative district as published by the United States census bureau. The department must submit a report of recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025.

Sec. 128. 2023 c 475 s 130 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE—LOCAL GOVERNMENT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($50,775,000))

$48,133,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($46,258,000))

$54,626,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($39,374,000))

$44,574,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$1,050,000

Climate Commitment Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($43,353,000))

$54,403,000

Community Preservation and Development Authority

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,750,000

Growth Management Planning and Environmental Review

Fund—State Appropriation
. . . .
$5,681,000

Liquor Excise Tax Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$986,000

Liquor Revolving Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$6,827,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,000,000

Model Toxics Control Stormwater Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$100,000

Natural Climate Solutions Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,747,000

Public Facilities Construction Loan Revolving

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,026,000

Public Works Assistance Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$7,267,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($210,194,000))

$233,170,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department shall administer its growth management act technical assistance and pass-through grants so that smaller cities and counties receive proportionately more assistance than larger cities or counties.

(2) $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely as pass-through funding to Walla Walla Community College for its water and environmental center.

(3) $6,827,000 of the liquor revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with the municipal research and services center of Washington.

(4) The department must develop a model ordinance for cities and counties to utilize for siting community based behavioral health facilities.

(5) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to produce the biennial report identifying a list of projects to address incompatible developments near military installations as provided in RCW 43.330.520.

(6) $100,000 of the model toxics control stormwater account—state appropriation is provided solely for planning work related to stormwater runoff at the aurora bridge and I-5 ship canal bridge. Planning work may include, but is not limited to, coordination with project partners, community engagement, conducting engineering studies, and staff support.

(7) $2,000,000 of the community preservation and development authority account—state((/operating)) appropriation is provided solely for ((the operations of)) the Pioneer Square-International district community preservation and development authority established in RCW 43.167.060 to carry out the duties and responsibilities set forth in RCW 43.167.030.

(8) $1,160,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,159,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the statewide broadband office established in RCW 43.330.532.

(9) $10,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $10,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department for grants for updating and implementing comprehensive plans and development regulations in order to implement the requirements of the growth management act.

(a) In allocating grant funding to local jurisdictions, awards must be based on a formula, determined by the department, to ensure that grants are distributed equitably among cities and counties. Grants will be used primarily to fund the review and update requirements for counties and cities required by RCW 36.70A.130. Funding provided on this formula basis shall cover additional county and city costs, if applicable, to implement chapter 254, Laws of 2021 (Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1220) and to implement Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5412 (land use permitting/local).

(b) Within the amounts not utilized under (a) of this subsection, the department shall establish a competitive grant program to implement requirements of the growth management act.

(c) Up to $500,000 per biennium may be allocated toward growth management policy research and development or to assess the ongoing effectiveness of existing growth management policy.

(d) The department must develop a process for consulting with local governments, affected stakeholders, and the appropriate committees of the legislature to establish emphasis areas for competitive grant distribution and for research priorities.

(10) $1,100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to contract with the municipal research and services center, in coordination with the Washington procurement technical assistance center, to provide training and technical assistance to local governments and contractors on public works contracting. Training topics may include utilization of supplemental bidding criteria, utilization of alternate public works, contracting, cost estimating, obtaining performance and payment bonds, and increasing participation of women-owned and minority-owned businesses.

(11) $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to administer grants and provide technical assistance to cities or counties for actions relating to adopting ordinances that plan for and accommodate housing. Of this amount:

(a) $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to cities and counties. Grants may be used for the following activities:

(i) Analyzing comprehensive plan policies and development regulations to determine the extent of amendments required to meet the goal of authorizing middle housing types on at least 30 percent of lots currently zoned as single family residential within the city, or for counties inside the unincorporated urban growth area. For the purposes of this subsection, "middle housing types" means buildings that are compatible in scale, form, and character with single family houses, and contain two or more attached, stacked, or clustered homes. This includes duplexes, triplexes, fourplexes, fiveplexes, sixplexes, townhouses, courtyard apartments, and cottage housing;

(ii) Planning work to facilitate transit-oriented development, including costs associated with the preparation of state environmental policy act environmental impact statements, planned action ordinances, and subarea plans, costs associated with the use of other tools under the state environmental policy act, and the costs of local code adoption and implementation of such efforts; and

(iii) Planning for and accommodating housing that is affordable for individuals and families earning less than 50 percent of the area median income, including:

(A) Land use and regulatory solutions to address homelessness and low-income housing; and

(B) Bridging homeless service planning with land use planning.

(b) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for an affordable housing auditing program to monitor ongoing affordability of income-restricted units constructed with affordable housing incentives, including the multifamily tax exemption.

(12) Within the amounts provided in this section, the department must publish on its website housing data needed to complete housing needs assessments required by RCW 36.70A.070(2)(a). The data shall include:

(a) Housing profiles for each county and city in the state, including cost burden, vacancy, and income;

(b) Data to assess racially disparate impacts, exclusion, and displacement; and

(c) A dashboard to display data in an easily accessible format.

(13) $1,330,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $995,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1110 (middle housing). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(14) $15,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $15,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to provide grants to entities that provide digital navigator services, devices, and subscriptions. These services must include, but are not limited to, one-on-one assistance for people with limited access to services, including individuals seeking work, students seeking digital technical support, families supporting students, English language learners, medicaid clients, people experiencing poverty, and seniors.

(15) $2,750,000 of the community preservation and development authority account—state appropriation is provided solely for ((the operations of)) the Central district community preservation and development authority established in RCW 43.167.070 to carry out the duties and responsibilities set forth in RCW 43.167.030.

(16) (($375,000))$187,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 ((is))and $188,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to the city of Battle Ground to contract for a study to explore feasible options to redesign their downtown corridor to emphasize pedestrian accessibility, improve safety, and highlight community amenities.

(17) $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for a grant to the city of Cheney fire department for the purchase of a new type 6 fire truck to replace one destroyed in a mutual aid fire.

(18) $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for a grant to Ferry/Okanogan fire protection district number 14 for the purchase of a new ambulance and related costs for response to 911 calls, including those from local residents, recreators, and hunters.

(19) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for a grant to the Pierce county public transportation benefit area corporation (Pierce transit) to administer a public transit and behavioral health coresponder pilot program in partnership with a Pierce county behavioral health professional agency.

(20) $120,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $115,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the transportation demand management program at the canyon park subarea in the city of Bothell.

(21) (($40,953,000))$50,953,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1181 (climate change/planning). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(22) $490,000 of the public works assistance account—state appropriation is provided solely for the public works board to develop a data dashboard to map investments made by the public works board, the department of commerce, the department of health, the department of ecology, the department of transportation, the transportation improvement board, and by board partners to the system improvement team created in RCW 43.155.150.

(23) $96,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $423,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to conduct a study on the feasibility of implementing a Washington state zoning atlas project that will provide a publicly available mapping tool illustrating key features of zoning codes across jurisdictions.

(24) $733,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $734,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5268 (public works procurement). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(25) $37,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5536 (controlled substances). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(26) $134,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to the city of Tacoma for the operating costs of the hilltop community hub. The hilltop community fund shall support a distribution center to provide housing goods.

(27) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to the city of Ferndale for the purpose of implementing and improving a wayfinding system throughout the greater Ferndale market area.

(28) (($3,464,000))$464,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 ((is))and $3,510,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5290 (local permit review). Of the amount provided in this subsection, at least $3,000,000 is provided solely for grants to local governments. ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(29) $2,400,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Port Gamble S'Klallam Tribe for phase 3 of the Port Gamble shoreline restoration project.

(30) $1,000,000 of the model toxics control account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants to address emergency drinking water problems in overburdened communities. The department may utilize existing programs to distribute the funding provided under this section, including the emergency rapid response program.

(31) $16,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $46,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5834 (urban growth areas). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(32) $57,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6015 (residential parking). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(33) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit, professional association of state, county, city, and town officials engaged in development, enforcement, and administration of building construction codes and ordinances to collaborate with the Washington state board for community and technical colleges to design and implement training programs to accelerate the hiring of city and county permit technicians.

(34) $800,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation shall take effect January 1, 2025, and is provided for the Bellevue and Redmond electric fire engines and infrastructure project. Of this amount, $250,000 is provided to the city of Redmond and $550,000 is provided to the city of Bellevue for the purposes of reducing the costs to purchase hybrid-electric fire engines and install associated electric charging infrastructure for the fire stations that will house the new electric vehicles.

(35) $30,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the city of Elma to place automatic external defibrillators in city vehicles and public spaces in city buildings.

(36) $550,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the city of Battle Ground to purchase a citywide document management system and hire staff or contract with a company to assist with scanning and uploading documents into the system.

(37) $1,200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for Lewis county to purchase and implement new tax and assessment software.

(38) $225,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to the Chelan-Douglas regional port authority to fund public engagement efforts in Chelan and Douglas counties related to a future regional sports complex. Engagement efforts may include print and electronically mailed materials, media advertisements, social media, and other forms of communications related to study information, including but not limited to:

(a) Consultants' analyses;

(b) Steering committee recommendations;

(c) Design and location options;

(d) Artistic renderings;

(e) Economic impacts;

(f) Capital and operational costs;

(g) Financing options; and

(h) Other information.

(39) $250,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation shall take effect January 1, 2025, and is provided solely for Island county to contract for a comprehensive assessment of drinking water infrastructure.

(40) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the city of Enumclaw to design and build a community center that will serve the plateau area.

(41) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the Okanogan county sheriff's office for the Okanogan county public safety radio network improvement project.

(42) $67,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5955 (large port districts). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 129. 2023 c 475 s 131 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE—OFFICE OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($25,089,000))

$25,639,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($24,967,000))

$31,831,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$108,069,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$1,230,000

Dedicated Cannabis Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2024)
. . . .
$3,446,000

Dedicated Cannabis Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2025)
. . . .
(($3,587,000))

$3,591,000

Andy Hill Cancer Research Endowment Fund Match

Transfer Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($20,684,000))

$32,684,000

Climate Commitment Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($352,000))

$4,441,000

Community and Economic Development Fee Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$765,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$22,400,000

Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,786,000

Statewide Tourism Marketing Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$9,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($222,375,000))

$245,882,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $4,304,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $4,304,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for associate development organizations. During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the department shall consider an associate development organization's total resources when making contracting and fund allocation decisions, in addition to the schedule provided in RCW 43.330.086. The department must distribute the funding as follows:

(a) For associate development organizations serving urban counties, which are counties other than rural counties as defined in RCW 82.14.370, a locally matched allocation of up to $1.00 per capita, totaling no more than $300,000 per organization; and

(b) For associate development organizations in rural counties, as defined in RCW 82.14.370, a $1.00 per capita allocation with a base allocation of $75,000.

(2) $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the northwest agriculture business center.

(3) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the regulatory roadmap program for the construction industry and to identify and coordinate with businesses in key industry sectors to develop additional regulatory roadmap tools.

(4) $1,070,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,070,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the small business export assistance program. The department must ensure that at least one employee is located outside the city of Seattle for purposes of assisting rural businesses with export strategies.

(5) $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to submit the necessary Washington state membership dues for the Pacific Northwest economic region.

(6) $1,808,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($1,808,000))$2,438,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to identify and invest in strategic growth areas, support key sectors, and align existing economic development programs and priorities. The department must consider Washington's position as the most trade-dependent state when identifying priority investments. The department must engage states and provinces in the northwest as well as associate development organizations, small business development centers, chambers of commerce, ports, and other partners to leverage the funds provided. Sector leads established by the department must include the industries of: (a) Aerospace; (b) clean technology and renewable and nonrenewable energy; (c) wood products and other natural resource industries; (d) information and communication technology; (e) life sciences and global health; (f) maritime; (g) military and defense; and (h) creative industries. The department may establish these sector leads by hiring new staff, expanding the duties of current staff, or working with partner organizations and or other agencies to serve in the role of sector lead.

(7) (($20,684,000))$32,684,000 of the Andy Hill cancer research endowment fund match transfer account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Andy Hill cancer research endowment program. Amounts provided in this subsection may be used for grants and administration costs.

(8) $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to establish representation in key international markets that will provide the greatest opportunities for increased trade and investment for small businesses in the state of Washington. Prior to entering into any contract for representation, the department must consult with associate development organizations and other organizations and associations that represent small business, rural industries, and disadvantaged business enterprises.

(9) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to assist people with limited incomes in urban areas of the state start and sustain small businesses. The grant recipient must be a nonprofit organization involving a network of microenterprise organizations and professionals to support micro entrepreneurship and access to economic development resources.

(10) $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a nonprofit organization whose sole purpose is to provide grants, capacity building, and technical assistance support to a network of microenterprise development organizations. The microenterprise development organizations will support rural and urban Black, indigenous and people of color owned businesses, veteran owned businesses, and limited resourced and other hard to serve businesses with five or fewer employees throughout the state with business training, technical assistance, and microloans.

(11) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to a business center that provides confidential, no-cost, one-on-one, client-centered assistance to small businesses to expand outreach in underserved communities, especially Black, indigenous, and people of color-owned businesses, providing targeted assistance where needed. Funding may also be used to collaborate the department, the Washington economic development association, and others to develop a more effective and efficient service delivery system for Washington's women and minority-owned small businesses.

(12) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to strengthen capacity of the keep Washington working act work group established in RCW 43.330.510.

(13) $7,000,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the department to continue to administer the small business innovation and competitiveness fund program created in section 128(167), chapter 297, Laws of 2022 (ESSB 5693). The department may prioritize projects that received conditional awards in the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium but were not funded due to the project's inability to be substantially completed by June 30, 2023.

(14) $2,000,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the department to administer grants to businesses and nonprofits in the arts, heritage, and science sectors, including those that operate live entertainment venues, to provide bridge funding for continued recovery from the COVID-19 pandemic and related economic impacts. The department must develop criteria for successful grant applications in coordination with the Washington state arts commission.

(15) $352,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1176 (climate-ready communities). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(16) $225,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $225,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to contract with an associate development organization located in Thurston county to provide a training curriculum to assist small businesses in scaling up to reach their next tier of operations. The contract recipient may use the funding for costs including, but not limited to, curriculum materials, trainers, and follow up coaching and mentorship in multiple languages.

(17) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to contract for technical assistance programs focused on assisting small minority, women, and veteran-owned businesses in south King and Pierce counties. The contract recipient must be a nonprofit organization located in Tukwila that provides educational and business assistance for underserved and minority groups, with a focus on the African American community. The department must provide a preliminary report on program outcomes by June 30, 2024, and a final report by June 30, 2025, to the relevant committees of the legislature. The preliminary and final reports must include outcome data including, but not limited to, the number of events or workshops provided, the number of businesses served, and ownership and other demographics of businesses served.

(18) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to contract with a nonprofit organization to conduct workforce and economic development activities serving the south Puget Sound region. The contract recipient must be a nongovernmental nonprofit organization located in Federal Way that has been in operation for at least 10 years and whose mission is to develop resources to enhance the economy of the south sound region by facilitating innovation, job creation, and the growth and development of businesses.

(19) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department to provide grant funding to a nonprofit biotech incubator and science research center located in the city of Tacoma. The grant funding is to provide support for programs aimed at increasing workforce readiness and entrepreneurship in the life sciences, with a focus on promoting access to science, technology, engineering, and math careers for individuals from underserved communities.

(20) $700,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $700,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to associate development organizations pursuant to Substitute House Bill No. 1783 (grant writers). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(21) $9,000,000 of the statewide tourism marketing account—state appropriation is provided solely for the statewide tourism marketing program and operation of the statewide tourism marketing authority pursuant to chapter 43.384 RCW.

(22) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to renew licenses for cloud-based business engagement tools for state agencies and local workforce and economic development boards, and to procure additional licenses for state agency procurement professionals, to assist in complying with the department of enterprise services supplier diversity policy effective April 1, 2023.

(23) $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for activities related to securing federal funding from programs created by or funded through federal legislation including, but not limited to, the inflation reduction act, P.L. 117-169; the chips and science act, P.L. 117-167; and the infrastructure investment and jobs act, P.L. 117-58. Funding provided under this subsection may be used to support regional and locally led initiatives seeking federal funding, to provide technical support for application development and grant writing, to conduct economic analysis of various sectors, and other activities the department deems necessary for the state and partners with the state to compete for federal funds.

(24) $877,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $878,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5096 (employee ownership). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(25) $409,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $411,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5269 (manufacturing). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(26) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department, in consultation with other agencies as necessary, to support activities related to cooperation with governmental and public agencies of the Republic of Finland, the Kingdom of Sweden, and the Kingdom of Norway. Eligible activities include, but are not limited to, cooperation in clean energy, clean technology, clean transportation, telecommunications, agriculture and wood science technology, general economic development, and other areas of mutual interest with Nordic nations and institutions.

(27) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a Bellingham based nonprofit that assists entrepreneurs to create, build, and grow businesses in northwest Washington to help establish a network of innovation centers for entrepreneurs and innovative small businesses between Seattle and the Canadian border.

(28)(a) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department to develop strategies for cooperation with governmental agencies of Vietnam, including higher education institutions, and organizations around the following:

(i) Trade and investment, including, but not limited to, the agriculture, information technology, food processing, manufacturing, and textile industries;

(ii) Combating climate change, including, but not limited to, cooperation on clean energy, clean transportation, and climate-smart agriculture; and

(iii) Academic and cultural exchange.

(b) By June 30, 2024, the department must provide a report on the use of funds in this subsection, any key metrics and deliverables, and any recommendations for further opportunities for collaboration.

(29) $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to provide an economic development grant to a nongovernmental organization established in Federal Way, in operation for at least 30 years, whose primary focus is the economic development of the greater Federal Way region, in order to provide assessment for the development of innovation campuses in identified economic corridors.

(30) $200,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for a grant to a Tacoma based automotive museum as businesses assistance to address COVID-19 pandemic impacts to revenues from decreased attendance and loss of other revenue generating opportunities.

(31) $2,500,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation shall take effect January 1, 2025, and is provided solely to expand the industrial symbiosis program and create a circular economy market development program. At least 20 percent of the amount provided in this section must be prioritized to benefit individuals in overburdened communities.

(32) $4,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the Washington state public stadium authority to modernize interior stadium infrastructure. Funding is provided to improve operational infrastructure such that stadium can accommodate and attract mega events benefiting the state. Improvements will include, but are not limited to, installing new seating, improving ADA access, upgrading hospitality features, and making security enhancements.

(33)(a) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to provide grants to eligible sports commissions to support activities promoting sports tourism, sporting events, and tournaments, and fostering economic and community development.

(b) An "eligible sports commission" under this subsection means an entity whose primary purpose is to promote tourism through hosting sporting events in Washington state. Entities may be independent nonprofit organizations or a division of a regional or national convention or visitors bureau.

(c) The department must develop application criteria and eligible uses of funds for the grant program.

(d) In determining the distribution of grant awards under this subsection, the department may allocate funds in proportion to the population of the county or counties in which the eligible sports commission conducts its activities.

(e) The department must develop reporting requirements for grant recipients, including but not limited to how grant funds are used. All grant recipients must report back to the department by June 30, 2025.

(34) $250,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 shall take effect January 1, 2025, and is provided solely for a study or studies to assess strategies necessary for the state of Washington to engage in the offshore wind supply chain. The study may address public infrastructure needed for manufacturing, assembly, and transport of supply chain components, and an assessment of workforce needs and community benefits. The department shall submit a summary of the status or findings of studies funded in this subsection to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025.

(35) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to a Seattle-based nonprofit organization that functions as a workforce development intermediary to connect low-income individuals with living-wage jobs. Funding may be used to provide entry level assistance for 28 low-income mariners.

(36) $184,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to a nongovernmental organization whose primary focus is community and economic development in downtown Renton to provide holistic navigation and education services.

(37) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a Tacoma-based nonprofit organization that provides access and education through the arts to provide business training, technical assistance, and other services to emerging creative and cultural entrepreneurs.

(38) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the city of Seattle to lease space for nonprofit and academic institutions to incubate technology business startups, especially those focusing on artificial intelligence and develop and teach curricula to skill up workers to use artificial intelligence as a business resource.

(39) $1,339,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation shall take effect January 1, 2025, and is provided solely for the innovation cluster accelerator program. Funding provided in this subsection may only be used to develop and maintain clusters that aim to reduce and mitigate impacts from greenhouse gases in overburdened communities, deploy renewable energy resources, increase energy efficiency or reduction, or other permissible uses pursuant to RCW 70A.65.260.

(40) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the Washington state manufacturing council to convene a subgroup of at least two of its members, with at least four members representing advanced manufacturing who have expertise in diversity, equity and inclusion. Annually, the work group must provide recommendations to the manufacturing council to vastly improve the representation of black, indigenous, and people of color, as well as women, in manufacturing ownership and within the workforce across all levels of manufacturing.

Sec. 130. 2023 c 475 s 132 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE—ENERGY AND INNOVATION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($140,959,000))

$6,641,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($141,187,000))

$6,937,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($39,461,000))

$325,724,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$34,000

Building Code Council Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$13,000

Climate Commitment Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($52,611,000))

$233,599,000

Community and Economic Development Fee Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$160,000

Electric Vehicle Incentive Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$50,000,000

Low-Income Weatherization and Structural

Rehabilitation Assistance Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,399,000

Natural Climate Solutions Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($167,000))

$1,167,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($425,991,000))

$625,674,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department is authorized to require an applicant to pay an application fee to cover the cost of reviewing the project and preparing an advisory opinion on whether a proposed electric generation project or conservation resource qualifies to meet mandatory conservation targets.

(2)(a) $50,000,000 of the electric vehicle incentive account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to implement programs and incentives that promote the purchase of or conversion to alternative fuel vehicles. The department must work with the interagency electric vehicle coordinating council to develop and implement alternative fuel vehicle programs and incentives.

(b) In developing and implementing programs and incentives under this subsection, the department must prioritize programs and incentives that:

(i) Will serve individuals living in an overburdened community, as defined in RCW 70A.02.010;

(ii) Will serve individuals who are in greatest need of this assistance in order to reduce the carbon emissions and other environmental impacts of their current mode of transportation in the overburdened community in which they live; and

(iii) Will serve low-income communities, communities with the greatest health disparities, and communities of color that are most likely to receive the greatest health benefits from the programs through a reduction in greenhouse gas emissions and other pollutants that will result in improved groundwater and stormwater quality, improved air quality, and reductions in noise pollution.

(3) (($69,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $69,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the development of community electric vehicle charging infrastructure.

(a) Funding provided in this section must be used for projects that provide a benefit to the public through development, demonstration, and deployment of clean energy technologies that save energy and reduce energy costs, reduce harmful air emissions, or increase energy independence for the state.

(b) Projects that receive funding under this section must be implemented by, or include partners from, one or more of the following: Local governments, federally recognized tribal governments, or public and private electrical utilities that serve retail customers in the state.

(c) Grant funding must be used for level 2 or higher charging infrastructure and related costs including but not limited to construction and site improvements. Projects may include a robust public and private outreach plan that includes engaging with affected parties in conjunction with the new electric vehicle infrastructure.

(d) The department must prioritize funding for projects in the following order:

(i) Multifamily housing;

(ii) Publicly available charging at any location;

(iii) Schools and school districts;

(iv) State and local government buildings and office buildings;

(v) All other eligible projects.

(e) The department must coordinate with other electrification programs, including projects developed by the department of transportation, to determine the most effective distribution of the systems. The department must also collaborate with the interagency electric vehicle coordinating council established in RCW 43.392.030 to implement this subsection and must work to meet benchmarks established in chapter 182, Laws of 2022.

(4) $37,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $37,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to increase solar deployment and installation of battery storage in community buildings to enhance grid resiliency and provide backup power for critical needs, such as plug load and refrigeration for medication, during outages or to provide incentives to support electric utility demand response programs that include customer-sited solar and battery storage systems. Eligible uses of the amounts provided in this subsection include, but are not limited to, planning and predevelopment work with vulnerable, highly impacted, and rural communities. For the purposes of this subsection "community buildings" means K-12 schools, community colleges, community centers, recreation centers, libraries, tribal buildings, state and local government buildings, and other publicly owned infrastructure.

(5) $19,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $19,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant program to provide solar and battery storage community solar projects for public assistance organizations serving low-income communities. Eligible uses of the amounts provided in this subsection include, but are not limited to, planning and predevelopment work with vulnerable, highly impacted, and rural communities.

(a) Grants are not to exceed 100 percent of the cost of the project, taking into account any federal tax credits or other federal or nonfederal grants or incentives that the project is benefiting from.

(b) Priority must be given to projects sited on "preferred sites" such as rooftops, structures, existing impervious surfaces, landfills, brownfields, previously developed sites, irrigation canals and ponds, storm water collection ponds, industrial areas, dual-use solar projects that ensure ongoing agricultural operations, and other sites that do not displace critical habitat or productive farmland.

(c) For the purposes of this subsection "low-income" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 19.405.020 and "community solar project" means a solar energy system that: Has a direct current nameplate capacity that is greater than 12 kilowatts but no greater than 1,000 kilowatts; and has, at minimum, either two subscribers or one low-income service provider subscriber.

(6) $8,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $8,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to build a mapping and forecasting tool that provides locations and information on charging and refueling infrastructure as required in chapter 300, Laws of 2021 (zero emissions transp.). The department shall collaborate with the interagency electric vehicle coordinating council established in chapter 182, Laws of 2022 (transportation resources) when developing the tool and must work to meet benchmarks established in chapter 182, Laws of 2022 (transportation resources).

(7))) $10,000,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants to support port districts, counties, cities, towns, special purpose districts, any other municipal corporations or quasi-municipal corporations, and tribes to support siting and permitting of clean energy projects in the state. Eligible uses of grant funding provided in this section include supporting predevelopment work for sites intended for clean energy projects, land use studies, conducting or engaging in planning efforts such as planned actions and programmatic environmental impact statements, and staff to improve permit timeliness and certainty.

(((8)))(4)(a) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to contract with one or more of the western national laboratories, or a similar independent research organization, in consultation with state and federal energy agencies, stakeholders, and relevant utilities, to conduct an analysis for new electricity generation, transmission, ancillary services, efficiency and storage sufficient to offset those presently provided by the lower Snake river dams. The analysis should include a list of requirements for a replacement portfolio that diversifies and improves the resilience and maintains the reliability and adequacy of the electric power system, is consistent with the state's statutory and regulatory requirements for clean electricity generation, and is supplementary to the resources that will be required to replace fossil fuels in the electrical generation, transportation, industry, and buildings sectors. The department and its contractor's assessment will include quantitative analysis based on available data as well as qualitative input gathered from tribal and other governments, the Northwest power and conservation council, relevant utilities, and other key stakeholders. The analysis must include the following:

(i) Expected trends for demand, and distinct scenarios that examine potential outcomes for electricity demand, generation, and storage technologies development, land use and land use constraints, and cost through 2050, as well as the most recent analysis of future resource adequacy and reliability;

(ii) A resource portfolio approach in which a combination of commercially available generating resources, energy efficiency, conservation, and demand response programs, transmission resources, and other programs and resources that would be necessary prerequisites to replace the power and grid reliability services otherwise provided by the lower Snake river dams and the time frame needed to put those resources into operation;

(iii) Identification of generation and transmission siting options consistent with the overall replacement resource portfolio, in coordination with other state processes and requirements supporting the planning of clean energy and transmission siting;

(iv) An evaluation of alternatives for the development, ownership and operation of the replacement resource portfolio;

(v) Examination of possible impacts and opportunities that might result from the renewal of the Columbia river treaty, revisions of the Bonneville power administration preference contracts, implementation of the western resource adequacy program (WRAP), and other changes in operation and governance of the regional electric power system, consistent with statutory and regulatory requirements of the clean energy transformation act;

(vi) Identification of revenue and payment structures sufficient to maintain reliable and affordable electricity supplies for ratepayers, with emphasis on overburdened communities;

(vii) Development of distinct scenarios that examine different potential cost and timeline potentials for development and implementation of identified generation and transmission needs and options including planning, permitting, design, and construction, including relevant federal authorities, consistent with the statutory and regulatory requirements of the clean energy transformation act;

(viii) Quantification of impacts to greenhouse gas emissions including life-cycle emissions analysis associated with implementation of identified generation and transmission needs and options including (A) planning, permitting, design, and construction, and, if relevant, emissions associated with the acquisition of non-Washington state domestic or foreign sources of electricity, and (B) any additional operations of existing fossil-fueled generating resources; and

(ix) An inventory of electricity demand by state-owned or operated facilities and information needed to complete a request for proposals (RFP) to satisfy this demand through new nonhydro renewable energy generation and/or conservation.

(b) The department shall, to the extent determined practicable, consider related analyses undertaken by the federal government as part of the Columbia river system operation stay of litigation agreed to in National Wildlife Federation et al. v. National Marine Fisheries Service et al. in October 2021.

(c) The department shall provide a status update to the energy and environment committees of the legislature and governor's office by December 31, 2024.

(((9)))(5) $10,664,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to administer a pilot program to provide grants and technical assistance to support planning, predevelopment, and installation of commercial, dual-use solar power demonstration projects. Eligible grant recipients may include, but are not limited to, nonprofit organizations, public entities, and federally recognized tribes.

(((10)))(6) $20,592,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to administer a grant program to assist owners of public buildings in covering the costs of conducting an investment grade energy audit for those buildings. Public buildings include those owned by state and local governments, tribes, and school districts.

(((11)))(7)(a) $300,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to develop recommendations on a design for a statewide energy assistance program to address the energy burden and provide access to energy assistance for low-income households. The department may contract with a third-party entity to complete the work required in this subsection.

(b) The recommendations must include considerations for data collection on the energy burden and assistance need of households, universal intake coordination and data sharing across statewide programs serving low-income households, program eligibility, enrollment, multilingual services, outreach and community engagement, program administration, funding, and reporting.

(c) By January 1, 2024, the department must submit a report with the recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature.

(((12)))(8) $250,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit for a smart buildings education program to educate building owners and operators about smart building practices and technologies, including the development of onsite and digital trainings that detail how to operate residential and commercial facilities in an energy efficient manner. The grant recipient must be located in a city with a population of more than 700,000 and must serve anyone within Washington with an interest in better understanding energy efficiency in commercial and institutional buildings.

(((13)))(9) $111,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $109,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1390 (district energy systems). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(14)))(10) $3,152,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1216 (clean energy siting). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(15)))(11) $167,000 of the natural climate solutions account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1170 (climate response strategy). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(16)))(12) $250,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to convene stakeholders and plan for a statewide energy rebate navigator aimed at assisting residential and small commercial buildings, with priority for buildings owned or occupied by low-income, Black, indigenous, and people of color and converting overburdened communities to clean energy. Of this amount:

(a) $50,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is for the department to convene a summit of stakeholders around building energy topics related to the development of a statewide energy rebate navigator, including initial and ongoing guidance regarding program design and implementation. The summit should develop recommendations for the program to improve and grow, addressing gaps in program design and implementation, outreach into overburdened communities, HEAL Act compliance, workforce development issues, and contractor needs.

(b) $200,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is for statewide rebate navigator evaluation and project planning, which shall include:

(i) Evaluation of how technical assistance can focus on serving Black, indigenous, and people of color, and low-income communities;

(ii) Research of existing data and software solutions the state can leverage to provide a one-stop-shop for energy improvements;

(iii) Evaluation of program delivery models to optimize energy service delivery, including realizing economies of scale and reaching high rates of penetration in overburdened communities, indigenous communities, and communities of color;

(iv) Evaluation and cultivation of potential program implementers who are qualified to deliver navigator program services, including community energy efficiency program grantees; and

(v) Evaluation and cultivation of qualified potential energy services providers, including providers owned by Black, indigenous, and people of color, utility trade ally programs, and weatherization plus health weatherization agencies.

(((17)))(13) $33,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $17,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1329 (utility shutoffs/heat). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(18)))(14) $93,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $96,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1032 (wildfires/electric utilities). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(19)))(15)(a) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to contract with a third-party entity to conduct a study that analyzes how the economic impact of oil refining in Washington state is likely to impact Washington's refineries, refinery workers, and refinery communities. By December 31, 2024, the report must be distributed to the energy and environment committees of the state legislature.

(b) The study required in (a) of this subsection must include:

(i) An overview of Washington's five oil refineries including: Location, age, workforce demographics, direct and indirect jobs connected with the industry, health and environmental impacts, local tax revenues paid by refineries, and primary and secondary products and markets;

(ii) A summary of projected scenarios for Washington refineries' primary markets, taking into account realistic, real world outcomes, given existing mandated decarbonization targets, feedstock availability, and statutes that impact Washington refinery products;

(iii) A summary of anticipated short-term, medium-term, and long-term economic viability of the five Washington oil refineries based on refinery product demand forecasts as outlined in (b)(ii) of this subsection;

(iv) A forecast of direct and indirect effects of the projected petroleum decline, including indirect employment impacts, the geography of those impacts, and impacts to local jurisdictions, utilities, ports, and special purpose districts from reduction in tax revenues, and impacts to local nonprofits and community programs from the refining industry;

(v) An assessment of potential future uses of refinery sites that include energy industrial, nonenergy industrial, heavy manufacturing, and industrial symbiosis, including an assessment of previously closed refinery sites throughout the United States and current use of those sites. Each potential future use shall be assessed and include data regarding: Greenhouse gas emissions, local pollution and environmental health, direct and indirect employment benefits, estimated tax impacts, potential costs to Washington residents, and feasibility based on relevant market trends; and an assessment of previously closed refinery sites throughout the United States and current use of those sites;

(vi) The competitive position of Washington refineries to produce alternative fuels consistent with Washington's emissions reductions defined in RCW 70A.45.020, the anticipated regional, national, and global demand for these fuels between 2023 and 2050; and the likely employment, tax, environmental, cultural, and treaty impacts of refinery conversion to these alternative fuels;

(vii) An identification of refinery workers' skillsets, potential alternative sectors and industries of employment, an assessment and comparison of total compensation and benefit packages including retirement and health care programs of current and alternative jobs, impacts to apprenticeship utilization, and the current and expected availability of those jobs in Pierce, Skagit, and Whatcom counties;

(viii) A land and water remediation analysis; including cost estimates, current terrestrial and aquatic pollution mapping, an overview of existing policies and regulations that determine accountability for cleanup and identifies gaps that may leave local and state taxpayers financially liable, and an assessment of the workforce and skills required for potential cleanup;

(ix) A summary of existing petroleum refining capacity and trends in Washington, the United States, and internationally; and

(x) An assessment of decline or loss of tax revenues supporting state environmental programs including the model toxics control act, the pollution liability insurance agency, and other programs, as well as the decline or loss of transportation gas tax revenues.

(c) The department may require data and analysis from refinery owners and operators to inform the study. Pursuant to RCW 42.56.270, data shared or obtained in the course of this study is not subject to public disclosure. Where unavailable, the department and entity commissioned to complete the study shall rely on the best available public data.

(d) The study must include a robust public engagement process including local and state elected officials, labor groups, fence line communities, port districts, economic development associations, and environmental organizations in Skagit, Whatcom, and Pierce counties, and the five Washington refineries.

(e) The department must offer early, meaningful, and individual consultation with any affected Indian tribe for the purpose of understanding potential impacts to tribal rights and resources including cultural resources, archaeological sites, sacred sites, fisheries, and human health.

(((21)))(16) $600,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5447 (alternative jet fuel). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(22)))(17) $1,000,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for a grant to the Yakama Nation for an advanced rail energy storage project.

(18) $800,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation shall take effect January 1, 2025, and is provided solely to contract with a nonprofit entity to serve as a Washington state green bank. The funds are to be used to match federal funds available for green bank development to support development of sustainable and clean energy financing solutions within Washington.

(19)(a) $1,000,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation shall take effect January 1, 2025, and is provided solely for the department to build an internet web portal that provides a centralized location for grant seekers to find all state and federal grant and incentive opportunities in the energy, climate, and clean technology sectors. The portal shall include, but is not limited to, an interactive internet website that is launched to include, at a minimum, information identifying every grant administered by the state and incentive opportunities that will provide clean energy and climate assistance. The department, in consultation with the governor's office, shall ensure that the internet website is accessible and provides helpful information to a diverse set of potential applicants including, but not limited to, nonprofit and community-based organizations, and other entities that are working to support and benefit tribes, rural communities, and vulnerable and overburdened communities.

(b) Within the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection, the department must establish a marketing and outreach campaign that makes information about funding opportunities widely available and easy to understand, encouraging more people and organizations to participate. The department shall work with consultants and third-party administrators to identify a range of groups including tribes, vulnerable and overburdened communities, rural communities, local governments, businesses of all sizes, households, nonprofits, educational institutions, and the clean energy developers and clean tech manufacturers that would benefit from state and federal funding available for clean energy projects. The campaign shall include a comprehensive marketing and outreach strategy, using various ways to communicate, ensuring all materials are clear, simple, and available in multiple languages, and employing best practices for communicating with diverse and underserved communities. The department, along with selected partners and third-party administrators, shall work with organizations directly serving these communities to extend the reach of these communications, with a goal of directing at least 25 percent of the marketing and outreach funds expended to benefit vulnerable populations in overburdened communities.

(20)(a) $5,000,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation shall take effect January 1, 2025, and is provided solely for the department to administer a program to assist community-based organizations, local governments, ports, tribes, and other entities to access federal tax incentives and grants. Eligible entities for the program include, but are not limited to, local governments in Washington, tribal governments and tribal entities, community-based organizations, housing authorities, ports, transit agencies, nonprofit organizations, and for-profit businesses. The department shall prioritize assistance that benefits vulnerable populations in overburdened communities, with a goal of directing at least 25 percent of funds to this purpose.

(b) Within the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection, the department must contract with a nonprofit organization to provide the following services:

(i) Development of tax guidance resources for clean energy tax credits, including core legal documents to be used broadly across stakeholders;

(ii) Providing tailored marketing materials for these resources targeting underserved entities; and

(iii) Providing funds to subcontract with clean energy tax attorneys to pilot office hours style support available to eligible entities across the state.

(21)(a) $2,500,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to support a tribal clean energy innovation and training center in partnership and colocated at Northwest Indian College. The center aims to support tribal energy goals and pursue clean energy deployment opportunities that enhance tribal energy sovereignty and well-being among tribes.

(b) Activities of the center include, but are not limited to: (i) Developing technical training offerings that could build the tribal workforce pipeline, especially in emerging technologies like geothermal heat pumps and hydrogen technologies, and provide economic development opportunities and resources to the region; (ii) researching and demonstrating the feasibility of innovative clean energy technologies that protect the environment; and (iii) creating a model for tribal clean energy centers that can be adopted by other tribal colleges in the region to establish clean energy deployment and land use best practices built on tribal knowledge.

(22) $3,000,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation shall take effect January 1, 2025, and is provided solely for the department to administer a grant program to assist community-based organizations, local governments, ports, tribes, and other entities to author federal grant applications and to provide support for federal grant reporting for entities that receive federal grants. The department will determine a process for prioritizing applicants, including first time or underserved applicants, tribes, and rural areas of the state. The state may also partner with third-party administrators and regional and local partners, such as associate development organizations and other local nonprofits to ensure equitable access to resources. Eligible entities for the program include, but are not limited to, local governments in Washington, tribal governments and tribal entities, community-based organizations, housing authorities, ports, transit agencies, nonprofit organizations, and for-profit businesses. The department shall prioritize grants that provide benefit to vulnerable populations in overburdened communities, with a goal of directing at least 25 percent of funds to this purpose.

(23) $539,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation shall take effect January 1, 2025, and is provided solely for the department to develop plans to test hydrogen combustion and resulting nitrogen oxides (NOx) emissions, technical assistance for strategic end uses of hydrogen, a feasibility assessment regarding underground storage of hydrogen in Washington, and an environmental justice toolkit for hydrogen projects.

(24) $3,500,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation shall take effect January 1, 2025, and is provided solely for the department to provide and facilitate access to energy assistance programs, including incentives, energy audits, and rebate programs to retrofit homes and small businesses.

(25) $750,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation shall take effect January 1, 2025, and is provided solely for the department to provide technical assistance and education materials to help counties establish effective commercial property assessed clean energy and resiliency (C-PACER) programs.

(26) $3,000,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation shall take effect January 1, 2025, and is provided solely for the department to establish a Washington clean energy ambassadors program as a part of the clean energy community decarbonization expansion of the clean energy fund. This program will offer education, planning, technical assistance, and community engagement across the state. Ambassadors will link local entities with resources and best practices to enable clean energy access for all communities and promote a just transition to a net-zero economy. The department must prioritize providing meaningful benefits to vulnerable populations in overburdened communities as defined under RCW 70A.02.010. This program must:

(a) Identify a pilot cohort of intermediary organizations;

(b) Recruit and train clean energy ambassadors;

(c) Host community energy and resilience educational events and workshops; and

(d) Provide technical assistance to help governments, community-based organizations, businesses, and communities obtain clean energy resources.

(27) $150,000,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide grants for public and private electric utilities to provide one-time bill rebates for low-income and moderate-income residential electricity customers in the amount of $200 per household. Funding shall be prioritized for customers that have participated in the low-income home energy assistance program or ratepayer-funded assistance programs. Utilities may, but are not required to, work with community action agencies to administer these funds following the eligibility criteria for the low-income home energy assistance program. The department must prioritize providing meaningful benefits to vulnerable populations in overburdened communities as defined under RCW 70A.02.010. Each utility shall disburse funds directly to customer accounts by December 31, 2024, and adhere to program communications guidelines provided by the department. Utilities may account for and recover in rates administrative costs associated with the disbursement of funds provided in this subsection.

(28) $350,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation shall take effect January 1, 2025, and is provided solely for the authority to contract with Tacoma power, to conduct a feasibility study, including scoping project costs, on pumped storage at Tacoma power's Mossyrock dam. The contract is exempt from the competitive procurement requirements in chapter 39.26 RCW.

(29) $1,000,000 of the natural climate solutions account—state appropriation shall take effect January 1, 2025, and is provided solely for the department to provide grants to the following public utility districts for the costs of relocating utilities necessitated by fish barrier removal projects: Clallam, Grays Harbor, Jefferson, Kittitas, Mason public utility district no. 1, Mason public utility district no. 2, Skagit, and Thurston.

(30) $182,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for wildfire recovery costs from the Gray wildfire that impacted the city of Medical Lake. Recovery costs include procurement of water for firefighting, restoration of water and sewer infrastructure, replacement of water meters, emergency sewer capping, and various other costs associated with wildfire recovery.

(31) $250,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation shall take effect January 1, 2025, and is provided solely for the department to provide a grant to a nonprofit entity that represents the maritime industry to publish a strategic framework regarding the production, supply, and use of sustainable maritime fuels and deployment of low and zero-emissions vessel technologies in Washington. Funding under this subsection may be used for activities including, but not limited to, convening stakeholders and building organizational capacity. Stakeholder engagement pursuant to this subsection shall include, at a minimum, engagement with federal and state agencies, ports, industry, labor, research institutions, nongovernmental organizations, and relevant federally recognized tribes. The department shall submit a copy of its strategic framework and findings to the legislature in accordance with RCW 43.01.036 by June 30, 2025.

(32) $500,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation shall take effect January 1, 2025, and is provided solely for the department to provide a grant to the Muckleshoot Indian tribe for high-speed charging stations for electric vehicles on highway 164 near Dogwood street.

(33) $150,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation shall take effect January 1, 2025, and is provided solely for a grant to the smart building center education program to develop a qualified energy manager training program. The program must be available on demand and at no cost to the owners and operators of all tier 2 buildings to assist in complying with Washington's clean buildings performance standards.

(34) $150,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation shall take effect January 1, 2025, and is provided solely for a grant to conduct up to three feasibility studies that will investigate the expansion of sewer heat recovery programs and pilots, within Washington state, to support decarbonization of the built environment. The feasibility studies will explore and review sewer heat recovery systems' potential benefits, implementation strategies, and necessary considerations to maximize decarbonization. The sites will be selected from the following: Decarbonization of a university campus district steam system, a rural community with agricultural and/or industrial focus, a tribal development, and/or another appropriate site.

(35)(a) $500,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation shall take effect January 1, 2025, and is provided solely for a grant to establish the Washington just and rapid transition climate tech program. The grant will provide funding for the recruitment, development, business training, and support of underserved climate technology innovators, entrepreneurs, and organizations developing or deploying solutions in the areas of renewable energy, energy efficiency, sustainable transportation, and other technology solving for the environmental challenges facing overburdened communities in Washington.

(b) Activities may include supporting entrepreneurs in preparing for private investment; technical assistance for entrepreneurs receiving state directed federal equity and debt capital; assistance accessing or leveraging the use of federal funding; business coaching and mentoring; and connections to technical and business resources.

(c) The grant recipient must be a nonprofit organization that has been awarded, from the state of Washington, federal state small business credit initiative funds for investment in Washington climate tech entrepreneurs, and must also have experience managing investment funding and providing entrepreneurial support programs and federal funding assistance to early-stage climate start-ups and businesses based in Washington. The grant recipient should have experience providing services to individuals and companies led by individuals from underrepresented groups, including BIPOC, women, and individuals residing in rural communities and have working partnerships with state research universities, climate tech industry associations, and community-based organizations serving underserved communities.

(36) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to provide a grant for a study on how other states regulate and permit agritourism and bring the advocates of interested groups together to resolve outstanding issues about permitting in agricultural areas, the sale of beer, wine, and cider, and the use of agricultural buildings for agritourism purposes. A report of the findings and recommendations must be submitted to the legislature in accordance with RCW 43.01.036 by June 30, 2025.

(37) $750,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation shall take effect January 1, 2025, and is provided solely for a grant to the city of Ellensburg for decarbonization planning and implementation. The funding must be used by the city for staff or contractors to develop and implement strategies to comply with the requirements of climate commitment act and decarbonize their natural gas utility.

(38) $199,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6039 (geothermal energy resources). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 131. 2023 c 475 s 133 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE—PROGRAM SUPPORT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($26,300,000))

$24,848,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($18,107,000))

$20,393,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($7,822,000))

$7,875,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,055,000))

$2,073,000

Dedicated Cannabis Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2024)
. . . .
$5,000

Dedicated Cannabis Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2025)
. . . .
$7,000

Affordable Housing for All Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($184,000))

$186,000

Building Code Council Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,000

Climate Commitment Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$253,000

Community and Economic Development Fee Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($241,000))

$246,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$300,000

Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$47,000

Energy Efficiency Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$20,000

Financial Fraud and Identity Theft Crimes

Investigation and Prosecution Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$47,000

Growth Management Planning and Environmental Review

Fund—State Appropriation
. . . .
$147,000

Home Security Fund Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,401,000))

$1,413,000

Lead Paint Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$29,000

Liquor Excise Tax Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$398,000

Liquor Revolving Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$17,000

Low-Income Weatherization and Structural

Rehabilitation Assistance Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$10,000

Public Facilities Construction Loan Revolving

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($320,000))

$323,000

Public Works Assistance Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,005,000))

$2,016,000

Washington Housing Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,141,000))

$1,155,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($60,307,000))

$61,812,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants and associated technical assistance and administrative costs to foster collaborative partnerships that expand child care capacity in communities. Eligible applicants include nonprofit organizations, school districts, educational service districts, and local governments. These funds may be expended only after the approval of the director of the department of commerce and must be used to support planning and activities that help communities address the shortage of child care, prioritizing partnerships serving in whole or in part areas identified as child care access deserts. The department must submit a report to the legislature on the use of funds by June 30, 2025. The report shall include, but is not limited to:

(a) The number and location of organizations, school districts, educational service districts, and local governments receiving grants;

(b) The number of grants issued and their size; and

(c) Any information from grantee organizations on outcomes.

(2) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization located in the city of Vancouver that is the lead organization in a collaborative partnership to expand child care capacity in southwest Washington, for activities that will increase access to affordable, high-quality child care and help meet community needs.

(3) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the work group created in section 916 of this act to examine fire service delivery.

(4)(a) $30,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department to produce a study of the retirement preparedness of Washington residents and the feasibility of establishing a portable individual retirement account savings program with automatic enrollment (auto-IRA) for private sector workers who do not have workplace retirement benefits. To conduct the study, the department shall enter into an agreement with a nonprofit, nonpartisan think tank and research center based in Washington, D.C. that is unaffiliated with any institution of higher education and with a mission to generate a foundation of facts that enriches the public dialog and supports sound decision making. This research center will be responsible for the production of the study to the department. The center shall not be reimbursed for costs nor shall it receive or retain any of the funds. With the advice and consent of the department, the center may select a research institution, entity, or individual located in Washington state with expertise and proficiency in demographic analysis, retirement systems, or retirement planning to collaborate with on this study. The appropriation may be used by the department to enter into a contract with this partner entity for the partner entity's contributions to the study. Any funds not provided to the partner entity or otherwise unused shall be returned.

(b) The study must analyze current state and federal programs and recent state and federal statutory and rule changes that encourage citizens to save for retirement by participating in retirement savings plans, including plans pursuant to sections 401(k), 403(b), 408, 408(a), 408(k), 408(p), and 457(b) of the internal revenue code. The scope of the analysis must include:

(i) An examination of potential retirement savings options for self-employed individuals, part-time employees, and full-time employees whose employers do not offer a retirement savings plan;

(ii) Estimates of the impact on the state budget from shortfalls in retirement savings or income, including on public budgets from taxpayer-financed elderly assistance programs and a loss of economic activity by seniors;

(iii) The level of interest by private sector Washington employers in participating in an auto-IRA program;

(iv) A determination of how prepared financial institutions will be to offer these plans in compliance with federal requirements on all new retirement plans going into effect in 2025;

(v) Findings that clarify the gaps in retirement savings services currently offered by financial institutions;

(vi) An examination of the impact of retirement savings on income and wealth inequality;

(vii) An estimate of the costs to start up an auto-IRA program, an estimate of the time for the program to reach self-sufficiency, and potential funding options;

(viii) The experience of other states that have implemented or are implementing a similar auto-IRA program for employers and employees, as well as program impacts on the market for retirement plan products and services;

(ix) An evaluation of the feasibility and benefits of interstate partnerships and cooperative agreements with similar auto-IRA programs established in other jurisdictions, including contracting with another state to use that state's auto-IRA program, partnering with one or more states to create a joint auto-IRA program, or forming a consortium with one or more other states in which certain aspects of each state's auto-IRA program are combined for administrative convenience and efficiency;

(x) An assessment of potential changes in enrollment in a joint auto-IRA program if potential participants are concurrently enrolled in the federal "saver's credit" program;

(xi) An assessment of how a range of individuals or communities view wealth, as well as ways to accumulate assets;

(xii) The appropriate state agency and potential structure for implementing an auto-IRA program; and

(xiii) Recommendations for statutory changes or appropriations for establishing an auto-IRA program.

(c) By December 15, 2023, the department must submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature in compliance with RCW 43.01.036 on the study findings.

(5) $253,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation shall take effect January 1, 2025, and is provided for the department to incorporate equity and environmental justice into agency grant programs with the goal of reducing programmatic barriers to vulnerable populations in overburdened communities in accessing department funds. The department shall prioritize grant programs receiving funds from the accounts established under RCW 70A.65.080, 70A.65.240, 70A.65.250, and 70A.65.260.

(6)(a) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to examine allowable expenses and the contracting process of human service provider contracts that have been directly contracted by the department or have been contracted by an entity that received funding by these departments for human services. The department may contract with an external consultant to consult a work group and evaluate the following issues:

(i) Assess if existing contracting structures for human service providers that utilize state funding are adequate for sustaining the human services sector;

(ii) Assess alternative contracting structures for human service providers that may exist within the United States;

(iii) Assess the viability of a lowest responsible bidder contracting structure for state human service providers contracts;

(iv) Facilitate discussion amongst interested parties; and

(v) Develop recommendations for necessary changes in state RCW or agency rule.

(b) The department or consultant must engage with and seek recommendations from a work group representing diverse organizations from around the state and whose membership may include:

(i) Human service provider organizations;

(ii) State government agencies that manage human service contracts;

(iii) The office of equity; and

(iv) Local governments.

(d) The department must submit a final report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025. The final report must include:

(i) An evaluation of existing contracting structures for human service provider contracts that utilize state funding are creating hardship for human service providers; and

(ii) Recommendations for necessary changes in the Revised Code of Washington or agency rule to address structural hardships in human services contracting.

Sec. 132. 2023 c 475 s 134 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE ECONOMIC AND REVENUE FORECAST COUNCIL

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($973,000))

$1,155,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($1,040,000))

$1,027,000

Lottery Administrative Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$50,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($2,063,000))

$2,232,000

Sec. 133. 2023 c 475 s 135 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($19,943,000))

$19,813,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($21,286,000))

$21,843,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$38,384,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,499,000))

$3,943,000

Climate Investment Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($909,000))

$811,000

Climate Commitment Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,485,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$656,000

((Economic Development Strategic Reserve

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$68,000))

Personnel Service Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($26,815,000))

$27,021,000

Higher Education Personnel Services Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,497,000

Statewide 988 Behavioral Health Crisis Response Line

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$300,000

Statewide Information Technology System Development

Revolving Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($105,745,000))

$200,453,000

Office of Financial Management Central Service

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($30,929,000))

$31,786,000

((Performance Audits of Government Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$108,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$100,000))

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($252,724,000))

$350,992,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) The student achievement council and all institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.92.030 and eligible for state financial aid programs under chapters 28B.92 and 28B.118 RCW shall ensure that data needed to analyze and evaluate the effectiveness of state financial aid programs are promptly transmitted to the education data center so that it is available and easily accessible. The data to be reported must include but not be limited to:

(i) The number of Washington college grant and college bound recipients;

(ii) Persistence and completion rates of Washington college grant recipients and college bound recipients, disaggregated by institution of higher education;

(iii) Washington college grant recipients grade point averages; and

(iv) Washington college grant and college bound scholarship program costs.

(b) The student achievement council shall submit student unit record data for state financial aid program applicants and recipients to the education data center.

(2) (($100,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to the office of financial management to implement career connected learning.

(3)))(a) (($105,607,000))$200,312,000 of the information technology system development revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the one Washington enterprise resource planning statewide program phase 1A (agency financial reporting system replacement) and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(b) Of the amount provided in this subsection:

(i) (($41,000,000))$64,780,000 of the information technology system development revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for a technology pool ((in fiscal year 2024)) to pay for phase 1A (agency financial reporting system replacement—core financials) state agency costs due to legacy system remediation work associated with impacted financial systems and interfaces. The office of financial management must manage the pool, authorize funds, track costs by agency by fiscal month, and report after each fiscal month close on the agency spending to the consolidated technology services agency so that the spending is included in the statewide dashboard actual spending;

(ii) $5,650,000 of the information technology system development revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for organizational change management;

(iii) (($690,000))$1,380,000 of the information technology system development revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for an interagency agreement ((in fiscal year 2024)) with consolidated technology services for one dedicated information technology consultant and two dedicated system architect staff to be contracted from the office of the chief information officer. These staff will work with state agencies to ensure preparation and timely decommission of information technology systems that will no longer be necessary post implementation of phase 1A (agency financial reporting system replacement—core financials); and

(iv) $1,854,000 of the information technology system development revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for dedicated back office administrative support in fiscal year 2024. This includes resources for human resource staff, contract staff, information technology staff, and fiscal staff.

(c) The one Washington team must include at least the chair and ranking member of the technology committees and fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives in system demonstrations of at least these key deliverables:

(i) Demonstration of integration build, which must be completed by July 31, 2023; and

(ii) Demonstration of workday tenant, which must be completed by November 30, 2023.

(d) The one Washington solution and team must use an agile development model holding live demonstrations of functioning software, developed using incremental user research, held at the end of two-week sprints.

(e) The one Washington solution must be capable of being continually updated, as necessary.

(f) Beginning July 1, 2023, the office of financial management shall provide written quarterly reports, within 30 calendar days of the end of each fiscal quarter, to legislative fiscal committees and the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee to include how funding was spent compared to the budget spending plan for the prior quarter by fiscal month and what the ensuing quarter budget will be by fiscal month. All reporting must be separated by phase of one Washington subprojects. The written report must also include:

(i) A list of quantifiable deliverables accomplished and amount spent associated with each deliverable, by fiscal month;

(ii) A report on the contract full-time equivalent charged compared to the budget spending plan by month for each contracted vendor, to include interagency agreements with other state agencies, and what the ensuing contract equivalent budget spending plan assumes by fiscal month;

(iii) A report identifying each state agency that applied for and received technology pool resources, the staffing equivalent used, and the cost by fiscal month by agency compared to the budget spending plan by fiscal month;

(iv) A report on budget spending plan by fiscal month by phase compared to actual spending by fiscal month, and the projected spending plan by fiscal month for the ensuing quarter; and

(v) A report on current financial office performance metrics that at least 10 state agencies use, to include the monthly performance data, that began July 1, 2021.

(g) Prior to the expenditure of the amounts provided in this subsection, the director of the office of financial management must review and approve the spending in writing.

(h) The legislature intends to provide additional funding for fiscal year 2025 costs for phase 1A (agency financial reporting system replacement) to be completed, which is scheduled to be done by June 30, 2025.

(((4)))(3) $250,000 of the office of financial management central services account—state appropriation is provided solely for a dedicated information technology budget staff for the work associated with statewide information technology projects that at least are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act and are under the oversight of the office of the chief information officer. The staff will be responsible for providing a monthly financial report after each fiscal month close to fiscal staff of the senate ways and means and house appropriations committees to reflect at least:

(a) Fund balance of the information technology pool account after each fiscal month close;

(b) Amount by information technology project, differentiated if in the technology pool or the agency budget, of what funding has been approved to date and for the last fiscal month;

(c) Amount by agency of what funding has been approved to date and for the last fiscal month;

(d) Total amount approved to date, differentiated if in the technology pool or the agency budget, and for the last fiscal month;

(e) A projection for the information technology pool account by fiscal month through the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium close, and a calculation spent to date as a percentage of the total appropriation;

(f) A projection of each information technology project spending compared to budget spending plan by fiscal month through the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, and a calculation of amount spent to date as a percentage of total project cost; and

(g) A list of agencies and projects that have not yet applied for nor been approved for funding by the office of financial management.

(((5)))(4) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 245, Laws of 2022 (state boards, etc./stipends).

(((6) $137,000))(5) $39,000 of the climate investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the office of financial management to complete an analysis of laws regulating greenhouse gas emissions as required by RCW 70A.65.200(10).

(((7)))(6) $3,060,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation and $4,485,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1176 (climate-ready communities). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.)) A minimum of 60 percent of climate service corps positions created pursuant to the bill shall be provided to members of vulnerable populations in overburdened communities as defined in RCW 70A.65.010, the climate commitment act.

(((8)))(7) $366,000 of the office of financial management central services account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5512 (higher ed. financial reports). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(9)))(8) Within existing resources, the labor relations section shall produce a report annually on workforce data and trends for the previous fiscal year. At a minimum, the report must include a workforce profile; information on employee compensation, including salaries and cost of overtime; and information on retention, including average length of service and workforce turnover.

(((10)))(9) $298,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the office of financial management to convene a task force created in section 913 of this act to identify, plan, and make recommendations on the conversion of the Naselle youth camp property and facilities to an alternate use. Staff support for the task force must be provided by the office of financial management.

(((11)))(10) Within existing resources, the office of financial management shall convene a work group with the goal to improve the state salary survey and provide employees with a voice in the process. The work group shall consist of five employees from the office of financial management, five representatives from employee labor organizations to act as a coalition on behalf of all labor organizations representing state employees, and one chairperson appointed by the director of the office of financial management, to share information and identify concerns with the state salary survey and benchmark job descriptions. By December 31, 2023, the work group shall provide a report of identified concerns to the fiscal and state government committees of the legislature and the director of the office of financial management.

(((12)))(11)(a) $410,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $615,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office to establish a difficult to discharge task force to oversee a pilot program and make recommendations about how to address challenges faced with discharging patients from acute care settings and postacute care capacity by July 1, 2023.

(b) The task force shall consist of six members, one from each of the following:

(i) The governor's office;

(ii) The health care authority;

(iii) The department of social and health services;

(iv) The Washington state hospital association;

(v) Harborview medical center; and

(vi) Postacute care provider organizations.

(c) In consultation with stakeholder groups, the governor's office will identify task force members.

(d) The task force shall provide recommendations to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature on topics including, but not limited to:

(i) Pilot program implementation and evaluation, and recommendations for statewide implementation;

(ii) Available funding mechanisms;

(iii) Postacute care and administrative day rates;

(iv) Managed care contracting; and

(v) Legal, regulatory, and administrative barriers to discharge.

(e) The task force shall consult with stakeholders with relevant expertise to inform recommendations, including the health care authority, the department of social and health services, hospitals, postacute care providers, and medicaid managed care organizations.

(f) The task force may assemble ad hoc subgroups of stakeholders as necessary to complete its work.

(g) The task force and its operations, including any associated ad hoc subgroups, shall be organized and facilitated by the University of Washington through October 31, 2023. Beginning November 1, 2023, the office shall identify a contractor to undertake the following responsibilities, with oversight from the task force:

(i) Organization and facilitation of the task force, including any associated subgroups;

(ii) Management of task force process to ensure deliverables, including report writing;

(iii) Oversight of the launch of a ((five-site,)) two-year pilot project based on a model created by Harborview medical center by November 1, 2023; and

(iv) Coordination of pilot implementation, associated reports, and deliverables.

(h) The task force shall provide recommendations to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature outlining its initial recommendations by November 1, 2023. A report outlining interim recommendations and findings shall be provided by July 1, 2024, and a final report shall be provided by July 1, 2025.

(((13)))(12) $277,000 of the office of financial management central services account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1679 (student homelessness group). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(14)))(13) $772,000 of the climate investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the office to develop a data portal and other materials and strategies to improve public and community understanding of expenditures, funding opportunities, and grants, from climate commitment act accounts. The development of the data portal must be coordinated with the department of ecology and the expenditure tracking process described in section 302(13) of this act. "Climate commitment act accounts" means the carbon emissions reduction account created in RCW 70A.65.240, the climate commitment account created in RCW 70A.65.260, the natural climate solutions account created in RCW 70A.65.270, the climate investment account created in RCW 70A.65.250, the air quality and health disparities improvement account created in RCW 70A.65.280, the climate transit programs account created in RCW 46.68.500, and the climate active transportation account created in RCW 46.68.490.

(((15)))(14)(a) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a joint legislative and executive committee on behavioral health, with members as provided in this subsection:

(i) The president of the senate shall appoint three legislative members, including a chair of a senate committee that includes behavioral health within its jurisdiction and a member of the children and youth behavioral health work group;

(ii) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint three legislative members, including a chair of a house committee that includes behavioral health within its jurisdiction and a member of the children and youth behavioral health work group;

(iii) The governor or his or her designee;

(iv) The secretary of the department of social and health services or his or her designee;

(v) The director of the health care authority or his or her designee;

(vi) The insurance commissioner or his or her designee;

(vii) The secretary of the department of health or his or her designee; and

(viii) The secretary of the department of children, youth, and families or his or her designee;

(ix) Other agency directors or designees as necessary; and

(x) Two individuals representing the interests of individuals living with behavioral health conditions.

(b)(i) The committee must convene by September 1, 2023, and shall meet at least quarterly. Cochairs shall be one legislative member selected by members of the committee at the first meeting and the representative of the governor's office. All meetings are open to the public.

(ii) The office of financial management shall contract or hire dedicated staff to facilitate and provide staff support to the nonlegislative members and for facilitation and project management support of the committee. Senate committee services and the house of representatives office of program research shall provide staff support to the legislative members of the committee. The contractor shall support the work of all members of the committee, legislative and nonlegislative.

(iii) Within existing appropriations, the cost of meetings must be paid jointly by the senate, house of representatives, and the office of financial management. Committee expenditures are subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their successor committees. Committee members may be reimbursed for travel expenses as authorized under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, and chapter 44.04 RCW as appropriate.

(c) The purpose of the committee is to identify key strategic actions to improve access to behavioral health services, by conducting at least, but not limited to, the following tasks:

(i) Establishing a profile of Washington's current population and its behavioral health needs and a projection of population growth and anticipated need through 2028;

(ii) Establishing an inventory of existing and anticipated behavioral health services and supports for adults, children, and youth, including health care providers and facilities;

(iii) Assessing the areas of the current system where additional support is needed for Washington's current population;

(iv) Establishing an anticipated inventory of future services and supports that will be required to meet the behavioral health needs of the population in 2028 and beyond with a specific emphasis on prevention, early intervention, and home or community-based capacity designed to reduce reliance on emergency, criminal legal, crisis, and involuntary services;

(v) Reviewing the integrated care initiative on access to timely and appropriate behavioral health services for individuals with acute behavioral health needs; and

(vi)(A) Developing a strategy of actions that the state may take to prepare for the future demographic trends in the population and building the necessary capacity to meet these demands, including but not limited to:

(I) Exploring the role that education, housing and homelessness response systems, the criminal legal system, primary health care, and insurance systems have in the identification and treatment of behavioral health issues;

(II) Evaluating behavioral health workforce demand and workforce education, training, and continuing education requirements; and

(III) Statutory and regulatory changes to promote the most efficient use of resources, such as simplifying administrative procedures, facilitating access to services and supports systems, and improving transitions between care settings.

(B) Strategies must:

(I) Be based on explicit and measurable actions;

(II) Identify what must be done, by whom, and by when to assure implementation;

(III) Estimate a cost to the party responsible for implementation;

(IV) Recommend specific fiscal strategies that rely predominately on state and federal funding;

(V) Include recommendations for needed and appropriate additional caseload forecasting for state-funded behavioral health services; and

(VI) Incorporate and reconcile, where necessary, recommendations from past and current behavioral health work groups created by the legislature and network adequacy standards established by the health care authority.

(d) The committee shall incorporate input from the office of the insurance commissioner, the caseload forecast council, the health care authority, and other appropriate entities with specialized knowledge of the needs and growth trends of the population and people with behavioral health issues. In the conduct of its business, the committee shall have access, upon request, to health-related data available to state agencies by statute, as allowed by state and federal law. All requested data or other relevant information maintained by an agency shall be provided in a timely manner.

(e) The committee shall submit a sustainable five-year plan to substantially improve access to behavioral health for all Washington residents to the governor, the office of financial management, and the legislature by June 1, 2025.

(((16)))(15) The office of financial management must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and section 302(13) of this act.

(((17)))(16) $300,000 of the statewide 988 behavioral health crisis response and suicide prevention line account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1134 (988 system). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(17) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the purchase and distribution of accessible technology and devices to support the employment and reasonable accommodation for state employees with disabilities. The office may use funds to purchase accessible technology and devices or the office may provide funds to agencies that employ persons with a disability to purchase accessibility devices such as screen readers, large button/print equipment, magnifiers, accessibility software, and other equipment.

(18)(a) $274,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the office of financial management to conduct an analysis of health care services for pregnancy-related health care, including preconception, prenatal, labor and delivery, and postpartum care. With regard to these types of services, the analysis shall include, but not be limited to:

(i) Access to services and disparities in access;

(ii) Cost;

(iii) Location and type of provider; and

(iv) Demographics of patients and providers.

(b) The office of financial management shall submit a report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025. The report shall include the analysis in (a) of this subsection and must identify and represent the following information in both table and geographical map view:

(i) Community and hospital birth centers by name, city, and county;

(ii) Annual births by geographical location to include community and hospital birth center, if known;

(iii) Greatest gaps in service using data in this subsection.

(c) The report required in (b) of this subsection must also include any recommendations for how to fill the gaps in service identified in the data and any recommendations for future analysis.

(19) $298,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the office of financial management to convene a task force created in section 905 of this act to identify, plan, and make recommendations on the future use of the Larch corrections center property and facilities to an alternate use. Staff support for the task force must be provided by the office of financial management.

(20)(a) $20,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $120,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office to contract with a third party to complete market research on incarcerated individual communication rates in the United States. The market research must include:

(i) Detail by state on the amount each state pays to the vendor contracted to provide communication service rates and rate structures for incarcerated individuals at discrete points of time to include, at least, January 1, 2024, January 1, 2020, and January 1, 2015 for, at least but not limited to:

(A) Voice communication;

(B) Video communication;

(C) Email communication; and

(D) Text messaging communication;

(ii) The amount families paid in total for a state's contracted telecom vendor each state fiscal year for at least fiscal years 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, and 2023;

(iii) Comparative market research analysis on rate structures over time, how those rates compare to the telecommunication fees over the same time, and how the market is anticipated to change by calendar year from calendar year 2024 through calendar year 2030;

(iv) Analysis on how many states provide at least voice communication services or any other communication services free of charge to the person initiating and the person receiving the communication and what calendar date that began; and

(v) Comparative analysis of any impacted rate structures, and at least those in (a)(i) of this subsection, before communication services are made free of charge to the person initiating and the person receiving the communication compared to the new negotiated rate structures, and at least those in (a)(i) of this subsection, after communication services are made free of charge to the person initiating and the person receiving the communication.

(b) The report must be submitted to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2024.

Sec. 134. 2023 c 475 s 136 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS

Administrative Hearings Revolving Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($72,194,000))

$76,179,000

Administrative Hearings Revolving Account—Local

Appropriation
. . . .
$12,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($72,206,000))

$76,191,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $597,000 of the administrative hearings revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5080 (cannabis social equity). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(2) $80,000 of the administrative hearings revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5225 (working conn. child care). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(3) $34,000 of the administrative hearings revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5236 (hospital staffing standards). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(4) $61,000 of the administrative hearings revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1762 (warehouse employees). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(5) $2,487,000 of the administrative hearings revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5272 (speed safety cameras). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

Sec. 135. 2023 c 475 s 137 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE LOTTERY

Lottery Administrative Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($32,896,000))

$32,906,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($32,896,000))

$32,906,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) No portion of this appropriation may be used for acquisition of gaming system capabilities that violate state law.

(2) Pursuant to RCW 67.70.040, the commission shall take such action necessary to reduce retail commissions to an average of 5.1 percent of sales.

Sec. 136. 2023 c 475 s 138 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMISSION ON HISPANIC AFFAIRS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($1,494,000))

$1,495,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($1,347,000))

$1,346,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$2,841,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the commission to engage a contractor to:

(i) Conduct a detailed analysis of the opportunity gap for Hispanic and Latinx students;

(ii) Develop recommendations for continuing efforts to close the educational opportunity gap while meeting the state's academic achievement indicators as identified in the state's every student succeeds act consolidated plan; and

(iii) Identify performance measures to monitor adequate yearly progress.

(b) The contractor shall submit a study update by December 1, 2024, and submit a final report by June 30, 2025, to the educational opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee, the governor, the superintendent of public instruction, the state board of education, and the education committees of the legislature.

(2) $105,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $105,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to gang youth intervention specialists for a pilot program within high schools in Washington. Grants may be provided without using a competitive selection process.

Sec. 137. 2023 c 475 s 139 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMISSION ON AFRICAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($660,000))

$661,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$662,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,322,000))

$1,323,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the commission to engage a contractor to:

(i) Conduct a detailed analysis of the opportunity gap for African American and Black students;

(ii) Develop recommendations for continuing efforts to close the educational opportunity gap while meeting the state's academic achievement indicators, as identified in the state's every student succeeds act consolidated plan; and

(iii) Identify performance measures to monitor adequate yearly progress.

(b) The contractor shall submit a study update by December 1, 2024, and submit a final report by June 30, 2025, to the educational opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee, the governor, the superintendent of public instruction, the state board of education, and the education committees of the legislature.

Sec. 138. 2023 c 475 s 140 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS—OPERATIONS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$387,000

Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
(($115,088,000))

$116,700,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($115,475,000))

$117,087,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $34,491,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account—state appropriation is provided solely for pension system modernization, and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(2) $143,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1007 (military service credits). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(3) $1,172,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5538 (postretirement nursing). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(4) $1,058,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1056 (postretirement employment). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(5) $199,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1055 (public safety telecommunicators). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(6) $536,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1481 (tribal peace officers/LEOFF). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(7) $116,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6106 (DSHS workers/PSERS). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(8) $265,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6197 (LEOFF plan 2 provisions). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 139. 2023 c 475 s 141 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($427,926,000))

$358,211,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($436,344,000))

$395,439,000

Climate Commitment Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$895,000

Timber Tax Distribution Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($8,095,000))

$8,099,000

Business License Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($19,774,000))

$19,790,000

Waste Reduction, Recycling, and Litter Control

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$183,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$127,000

Financial Services Regulation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$5,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($898,344,000))

$787,744,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,669,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,661,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 196, Laws of 2021 (capital gains tax).

(2) (($251,639,000))$181,639,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($263,768,000))$221,768,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 195, Laws of 2021 (working families tax exempt.). Of the total amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) $16,639,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $15,768,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for administration of the working families tax exemption program; and

(b) (($235,000,000))$165,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($248,000,000))$206,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for remittances under the working families tax exemption program.

(3) $2,408,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $780,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $895,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department to implement 2023 revenue legislation.

(4) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department to develop an implementation plan for an online searchable database of all taxes and tax rates in the state for each taxing district. A report summarizing options, estimated costs, and timelines to implement each option must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2024. The implementation plan must include an array of options, including low cost options that may change the scope of the database. However, each low cost option must still provide ease of public access to state and local tax information that is currently difficult for the public to collect and efficiently navigate.

(5) $19,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1303 (property tax administration). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(6) $3,639,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,582,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1477 (working families' tax credit). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(7) $48,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1175 (petroleum storage tanks). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(8) $31,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5565 (tax and revenue laws). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(9)(a) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to research and analyze wealth taxes imposed in other countries and wealth tax legislation recently proposed by other states and the United States. At a minimum, the department must examine how existing and proposed wealth taxes are structured, compliance and administrative challenges of wealth taxes, best practices in the design and administration of wealth taxes, and potential data sources to aid the department in estimating the revenue impacts of future wealth tax proposals for this state or assisting the department in the administration of a wealth tax. As part of its examination and analysis, the department must seek to consult with relevant subject matter experts from within and outside of the United States.

(b) The department may contract with one or more institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 for assistance in carrying out its obligations under this subsection.

(c) The department must submit a status report to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature by January 1, 2024, and a final report to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature by November 1, 2024. The final report must include the department's findings.

(10) $42,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5448 (delivery of alcohol). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(11) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to study how to collect race and ethnicity information from organizations or entities that receive tax preferences, as defined in RCW 43.136.021.

(a) The department may contract with third parties and consult with other state entities to conduct all or any portion of the study.

(b) The department must submit a report to appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025. The report must include cost and timeline estimates for collecting the race and ethnicity information. The department must consult with the office of equity to ensure that data collection is consistent with other efforts. The report must also include, but is not limited to, the following information:

(i) The cost and time required for the department to revise current reporting requirements to include race and ethnicity data;

(ii) The cost and time required for the department to incorporate the collection of race and ethnicity data into future reporting;

(iii) The cost and time required for the department to incorporate the collection of race and ethnicity data into its existing information technology systems;

(iv) Recommendations on any exclusions from the requirement to report race and ethnicity data; and

(v) Any statutory changes necessary to collect race and ethnicity data.

(12) $3,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $251,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5334 (affordable housing funding). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(13) $4,000 of the business license account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5897 (business license services). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(14) $12,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5915 (ag. crop products/tax ex.). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(15) $16,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 6013 (homeownership dev. tax ex.). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(16) $4,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 6030 (ADU tax exemptions). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(17) $32,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6038 (child care tax preference). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(18) $36,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6105 (adult entertainment workers). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(19) $101,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6175 (existing structures/housing). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(20) $4,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 6215 (tax and revenue laws). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(21) $334,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 6303 (energy storage manufacturing). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 140. 2023 c 475 s 142 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE BOARD OF TAX APPEALS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$2,810,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($2,808,000))

$2,810,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($5,618,000))

$5,620,000

Sec. 141. 2023 c 475 s 143 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$3,837,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($3,799,000))

$4,099,000

Minority and Women's Business Enterprises Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
(($6,062,000))

$6,066,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($13,698,000))

$14,002,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The office of minority and women's business enterprises shall consult with the Washington state office of equity on the Washington state toolkit for equity in public spending.

(2) $540,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $529,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5268 (public works procurement). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(3) $151,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $151,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a policy analyst position.

(4) $941,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $900,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office to expand its outreach and communications department.

Sec. 142. 2023 c 475 s 144 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE INSURANCE COMMISSIONER

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$4,723,000

Insurance Commissioner's Regulatory Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($79,157,000))

$81,377,000

Insurance Commissioner's Fraud Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,269,000))

$4,270,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($88,149,000))

$90,370,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $52,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5242 (abortion cost sharing). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(2) $63,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1120 (annuity transactions). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(3) $72,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5036 (audio-only telemedicine). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(4) $55,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5300 (behavioral health continuity). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(5) $19,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5189 (behavioral health support). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(6) $52,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5396 (breast exam cost sharing). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(7) $260,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 87, Laws of 2023 (SSB 5338).

(8) $1,206,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5066 (health care benefit managers). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(9) $9,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 16, Laws of 2023 (SSB 5729).

(10) $272,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5581 (maternal support services). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(11) $237,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 42, Laws of 2023 (SB 5319).

(12) $25,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5720 (risk mitigation). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(13)(a) (($500,000))$700,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for the commissioner, in collaboration with the office of the attorney general, to study approaches to improve health care affordability including, but not limited to:

(i) Health provider price or rate regulation policies or programs, other than traditional health plan rate review, in use or under consideration in other states to increase affordability for health insurance purchasers and enrollees. At a minimum, this shall include:

(A) Analysis of payment rate or payment rate increase caps and reference pricing strategies;

(B) Analysis of research or other findings related to the outcomes of the policy or program, including experience in other states;

(C) A preliminary analysis of the regulatory authority and administrative capacity necessary to implement each policy or program reviewed in Washington state;

(D) Analysis of such approaches used in Washington state, including but not limited to the operation of the hospital commission, formerly established under chapter 70.39 RCW; and

(E) A feasibility analysis of implementing a global hospital budget strategy in one or more counties or regions in Washington state, including potential impacts on spending and access to health care services if such a strategy were adopted;

(ii) Regulatory approaches in use or under consideration by other states to address any anticompetitive impacts of horizontal consolidation and vertical integration in the health care marketplace to supplement federal antitrust law. At a minimum, this regulatory review shall include:

(A) Analysis of research, case law, or other findings related to the outcomes of the state's activities to encourage competition, including implementation experience;

(B) A preliminary analysis of regulatory authority and administrative capacity necessary to implement each policy or program reviewed in Washington state; and

(C) Analysis of recent health care consolidation and vertical consolidation activity in Washington state, to the extent information is available;

(iii) Recommended actions based on other state approaches and Washington data, if any; and

(iv) Additional related areas of data or study needed, if any.

(b) The office of the insurance commissioner or office of the attorney general may contract with third parties and consult with other state entities to conduct all or any portion of the study.

(c) The office of the insurance commissioner and office of the attorney general shall submit a preliminary report to the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 2023, and a final report by August 1, 2024.

(14) $190,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 27, Laws of 2023 (SHB 1266).

(15) $66,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1222 (hearing instruments coverage). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(16) $25,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 21, Laws of 2023 (HB 1061).

(17) $14,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1060 (mutual insurer reorg.). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(18) $132,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1357 (prior authorization). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(19)(a) (($250,000))$50,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for an analysis of how health plans define, cover, and reimburse for maternity care services, including prenatal, delivery, and postpartum care. The commissioner shall:

(i) Obtain necessary information regarding health plans offered by carriers with more than one percent accident and health market share based upon the commissioner's most recent annual market information report and health plans offered to public employees under chapter 41.05 RCW to evaluate:

(A) How health plan benefit designs define maternity care services;

(B) Whether and to what extent maternity care services are subject to deductibles and other cost-sharing requirements;

(C) Which maternity care services are considered preventive services under section 2713 of the federal public health service act and are therefore exempt from cost sharing;

(D) The five most used maternity care reimbursement methodologies used by each carrier; and

(E) With respect to reimbursement methodologies that bundle payment for maternity care services, which specific services are included in the bundled payment;

(ii) Estimate the total and per member per month impact on health plan rates of eliminating cost sharing for maternity care services in full, or for prenatal care only, for the following markets:

(A) Individual health plans other than Cascade select plans;

(B) Cascade select health plans;

(C) Small group health plans;

(D) Large group health plans;

(E) Health plans offered to public employees under chapter 41.05 RCW; and

(F) All health plans in the aggregate; and

(iii) Submit a report on the findings and cost estimate to the appropriate committees of the legislature by July 1, 2024.

(b) The commissioner may contract for all or a portion of the analysis required in this subsection.

(20) $86,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5821 (audio-only telemedicine). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(21) $549,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5986 (out-of-network health costs). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(22) $228,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5936 (palliative care work group). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(23) $195,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6228 (substance use treatment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(24) $316,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 6072 (LTSS commission recs.). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(25) $212,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5213 (pharmacy benefit managers). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(26) $12,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6127 (HIV prophylaxis). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(27) $578,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for the commissioner to continue its work on behavioral health parity compliance, enforcement, and provider network oversight. The commissioner may use internal staff and contracted experts to oversee provider directories and evaluate consumer access to services for mental health and substance use disorders in state-regulated individual, small group, and large group health plans.

Sec. 143. 2023 c 475 s 145 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE INVESTMENT BOARD

State Investment Board Expense Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($83,426,000))

$83,455,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($83,426,000))

$83,455,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $41,000 of the state investment board expense account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5084 (self-insured pensions/fund). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

Sec. 144. 2023 c 475 s 146 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE LIQUOR AND CANNABIS BOARD

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($2,383,000))

$2,478,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($850,000))

$1,609,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$3,187,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$75,000

Dedicated Cannabis Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2024)
. . . .
$13,481,000

Dedicated Cannabis Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2025)
. . . .
(($14,041,000))

$14,055,000

Liquor Revolving Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($124,765,000))

$126,603,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($158,782,000))

$161,488,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The liquor and cannabis board may require electronic payment of the cannabis excise tax levied by RCW 69.50.535. The liquor and cannabis board may allow a waiver to the electronic payment requirement for good cause as provided by rule.

(2) Of the liquor revolving account—state appropriation, $35,278,000 is provided solely for the modernization of regulatory systems and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(3) $1,526,000 of the liquor revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5448 (delivery of alcohol). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(4) $42,000 of the dedicated cannabis account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $42,000 of the dedicated cannabis account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5263 (psilocybin).

(5) $250,000 of the dedicated cannabis account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $159,000 of the dedicated cannabis account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5367 (products containing THC).

(6) (($1,527,000))$1,622,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $357,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, $2,255,000 of the dedicated cannabis account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, and $1,463,000 of the dedicated cannabis account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5080 (cannabis social equity).

(7) $35,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the liquor and cannabis board to conduct an agency analysis of commercial tobacco and vaping enforcement actions from fiscal year 2018 through fiscal year 2022 involving youth under the age of 18. This analysis shall be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2023, and must include:

(a) The total number of such interactions by fiscal year;

(b) Information on the nature of those interactions;

(c) How many interactions convert to administrative violation notices (AVNs);

(d) How many of those interactions and AVNs convert to retailer education and violations; and

(e) Descriptions of training for liquor and cannabis board officers, and the number of officers trained on interacting with youth, particularly LGBTQ youth and youth of color.

(8) $4,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5365 (vapor and tobacco/minors). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(9) $225,000 of the liquor revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1731 (short-term rentals/liquor). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(10) $99,000 of the liquor revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6105 (adult entertainment workers). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(11) $93,000 of the general fund—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 6133 (cannabis retail robberies). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(12) $245,000 of the general fund—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5376 (cannabis waste). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(13) $929,000 of the liquor revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5291 (liquor licenses). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(14) $63,000 of the general fund—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 6271 (cannabis excise tax/THC). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 145. 2023 c 475 s 147 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$1,201,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($1,201,000))

$1,426,000

Public Service Revolving Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($65,664,000))

$66,168,000

Public Service Revolving Account—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$100,000

Pipeline Safety Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$3,769,000

Pipeline Safety Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$3,404,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($75,339,000))

$76,068,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Up to $800,000 of the public service revolving account—state appropriation in this section is for the utilities and transportation commission to supplement funds committed by a telecommunications company to expand rural broadband service on behalf of an eligible governmental entity. The amount in this subsection represents payments collected by the utilities and transportation commission pursuant to the Qwest performance assurance plan.

(2) $43,000 of the public service revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5165 (electric transm. planning). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(3) $100,000 of the public service revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1032 (wildfires/electric utilities). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(4) $67,000 of the public service revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1216 (clean energy siting). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(5) $57,000 of the public service revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1329 (utility shutoffs/heat). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(6) The commission must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and section 302(13) of this act.

(7) $497,000 of the public service revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for staff to advance the state's objectives for better transmission planning, organized electric power markets or similar regional power coordination, and expanded regional and interregional transmission capacity.

(8)(a) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the commission to report to the legislature with information and recommendations for updating the statutes pertaining to the universal communications services program as described in chapter 80.36 RCW. The report must include:

(i) How the program has been utilized and audited since fiscal year 2022;

(ii) The most efficient and cost-effective technologies available to meet the state's broadband goals in rural areas;

(iii) The ways in which this program can work with the Washington state broadband office to ensure that appropriations for this program are additive and not duplicative to the office's broadband goals and how new technologies would help meet those goals;

(iv) The ways in which these dollars have been used to leverage federal funding;

(v) A list of other sources of state and federal funding that are available to maintain and repair existing broadband infrastructure;

(vi) How changes to the federal universal services fund could impact the provision of telecommunications services in Washington state; and

(vii) Any additional relevant information regarding the benefits of continuing this program that would be helpful for future appropriation decisions.

(b) The report is due to the appropriate committees of the legislature in accordance with RCW 43.01.036 by December 1, 2024.

(9)(a) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the commission to coordinate with the department of commerce, department of ecology, department of licensing and the antitrust division of the attorney general's office to convene a work group to collect existing data and reports that the state receives regarding transportation fuels, evaluate the history of transportation fuel prices in the state, explore options to ensure transparency in transportation fuel prices and examine the various factors that influence transportation fuel prices at the pump. In its examination the work group must:

(i) Employ a facilitator for the work group to facilitate and moderate three meetings, engage with work group members to ensure all participants are given an opportunity to provide input, provide objective facilitation and negotiation between work group members and collect and synthesize information provided by work group members;

(ii) In addition to the state agencies listed in this subsection, include members from fuel refineries, distributors, suppliers, and environmental and consumer advocacy organizations with knowledge in transportation fuels;

(iii) Identify and collect existing data submitted to the state from industry on transportation fuels;

(iv) Evaluate the history of transportation fuel prices in the state, to include historical trends versus national averages and any previous study or report the work group deems appropriate;

(v) Explore regulatory and nonregulatory options to increase transparency on transportation fuel pricing, including potential reporting and audit requirements; and

(vi) Examine the factors that influence transportation fuel pricing at the pump.

(b) The commission must report any findings from the work group with the governor's office and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024.

Sec. 146. 2023 c 475 s 148 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($16,490,000))

$16,782,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($16,446,000))

$16,947,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($146,122,000))

$146,290,000

911 Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$54,306,000

Disaster Response Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($59,466,000))

$62,179,000

Disaster Response Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,184,618,000))

$1,905,454,000

Military Department Rent and Lease Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,009,000

Military Department Active State Service Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$400,000

Natural Climate Solutions Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$113,000

Oil Spill Prevention Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,040,000

Worker and Community Right to Know Fund—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,042,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,482,052,000))

$2,206,562,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The military department shall submit a report to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees by February 1st and October 31st of each year detailing information on the disaster response account, including: (a) The amount and type of deposits into the account; (b) the current available fund balance as of the reporting date; and (c) the projected fund balance at the end of the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium based on current revenue and expenditure patterns.

(2) $40,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for homeland security, subject to the following conditions: Any communications equipment purchased by local jurisdictions or state agencies shall be consistent with standards set by the Washington state interoperability executive committee.

(3) $11,000,000 of the 911 account—state appropriation is provided solely for financial assistance to counties.

(4) $784,000 of the disaster response account—state appropriation is provided solely for fire suppression training, equipment, and supporting costs to national guard soldiers and airmen.

(5) (($386,000 of the military department rental and lease account—state appropriation is provided solely for maintenance staff.

(6))) $876,000 of the disaster response account—state appropriation is provided solely for a dedicated access and functional needs program manager, access and functional need services, and a dedicated tribal liaison to assist with disaster preparedness and response.

(((7)))(6) $136,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $132,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5518 (cybersecurity). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(8)))(7) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to provide a grant to Whatcom county for disaster relief and recovery activities in response to the November 2021 flooding and mudslides presidentially-declared disaster.

(((9)))(8) $625,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $625,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1728 (statewide resiliency program). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(10)))(9) $113,000 of the natural climate solutions account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1170 (climate response strategy). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(11)))(10)(a) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department to administer grants to local governments and federally recognized tribes for costs to respond to community needs during periods of extremely hot or cold weather or in situations of severe poor air quality from wildfire smoke.

(b) To qualify for a grant under (a) of this subsection, a local government or federally recognized tribe must:

(i) Be located in a geographic area where vulnerable populations face combined, multiple environmental harms and health impacts, as determined by the department;

(ii) Have demonstrated a lack of local resources to address community needs; and

(iii) Have incurred eligible costs as described in (c) of this subsection for the benefit of vulnerable populations.

(c) Costs eligible for reimbursement under (a) of this subsection include:

(i) Establishing and operating warming and cooling centers, including rental of equipment, purchase of supplies and water, staffing, and other associated costs;

(ii) Transporting individuals and their pets to warming and cooling centers;

(iii) Purchasing fans or other supplies needed for cooling of congregate living settings;

(iv) Providing emergency temporary housing such as rental of a hotel or convention center;

(v) Retrofitting or establishing facilities within warming and cooling centers that are pet friendly in order to permit individuals to evacuate with their pets; and

(vi) Other activities necessary for life safety during a period of extremely hot or cold weather or in situations of severe poor air quality from wildfire smoke, as determined by the department.

(((12)))(11) The department must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and section 302(13) of this act.

(12) $23,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5803 (national guard recruitment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(13) $132,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6164 (county emergency management). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 147. 2023 c 475 s 149 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$2,594,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($2,625,000))

$2,659,000

Personnel Service Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,825,000

Higher Education Personnel Services Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,629,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($11,673,000))

$11,707,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $98,000 of the higher education personnel services account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5238 (academic employee bargaining). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(2) $34,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6194 (legislative employee bargaining). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 148. 2023 c 475 s 150 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE BOARD OF ACCOUNTANCY

Certified Public Accountants' Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,770,000))

$5,119,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($4,770,000))

$5,119,000

Sec. 149. 2023 c 475 s 151 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE BOARD FOR VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTERS

Volunteer Firefighters' and Reserve Officers'

Administrative Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,533,000))

$3,625,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($3,533,000))

$3,625,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(($1,128,000))(1) $2,403,000 of the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative account—state appropriation is provided solely for a benefits management system, and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(2) $91,000 of the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative account—state appropriation is provided solely for contracting for small agency budget and accounting services with the department of enterprise services.

Sec. 150. 2023 c 475 s 152 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE FORENSIC INVESTIGATION COUNCIL

Death Investigations Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($822,000))

$821,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($822,000))

$821,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) $250,000 of the death investigations account—state appropriation is provided solely for providing financial assistance to local jurisdictions in multiple death investigations. The forensic investigation council shall develop criteria for awarding these funds for multiple death investigations involving an unanticipated, extraordinary, and catastrophic event or those involving multiple jurisdictions.

(b) Of the amount provided in this subsection, $30,000 of the death investigations account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Adams county crime lab to investigate a double homicide that occurred in fiscal year 2021.

(2) $210,000 of the death investigations account—state appropriation is provided solely for providing financial assistance to local jurisdictions in identifying human remains.

(3) Within the amount appropriated in this section, the forensic investigation council may enter into an interagency agreement with the department of enterprise services for the department to provide services related to public records requests, to include responding to, or assisting the council in responding to, public disclosure requests received by the council.

Sec. 151. 2023 c 475 s 153 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($14,819,000))

$15,185,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($13,426,000))

$14,601,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$102,000

Building Code Council Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,583,000))

$2,584,000

Climate Commitment Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$500,000

Electric Vehicle Incentive Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,722,000

Natural Climate Solutions Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$7,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($39,652,000))

$41,694,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($6,970,000))$7,010,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($6,894,000))$7,028,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the payment of facilities and services charges to include campus rent, parking, security, contracts, public and historic facilities, financial cost recovery, and capital projects surcharges allocable to the senate, house of representatives, statute law committee, legislative support services, and joint legislative systems committee. The department shall allocate charges attributable to these agencies among the affected revolving funds. The department shall maintain an interagency agreement with these agencies to establish performance standards, prioritization of preservation and capital improvement projects, and quality assurance provisions for the delivery of services under this subsection. The legislative agencies named in this subsection shall continue to have all of the same rights of occupancy and space use on the capitol campus as historically established.

(2) Before any agency may purchase a passenger motor vehicle as defined in RCW 43.19.560, the agency must have approval from the director of the department of enterprise services. Agencies that are exempted from the requirement are the Washington state patrol, Washington state department of transportation, and the department of natural resources.

(3) From the fee charged to master contract vendors, the department shall transfer to the office of minority and women's business enterprises in equal monthly installments $1,500,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $1,300,000 in fiscal year 2025.

(4) Within existing resources, the department, in collaboration with consolidated technology services, must provide a report to the governor and fiscal committees of the legislative by October 31 of each calendar year that reflects information technology contract information based on a contract snapshot from June 30 of that same calendar year, and must also include any contract that was active since July 1 of the previous calendar year. The department will coordinate to receive contract information for all contracts to include those where the department has delegated authority so that the report includes statewide contract information. The report must contain a list of all information technology contracts to include the agency name, contract number, vendor name, contract term start and end dates, contract dollar amount in total, and contract dollar amounts by state fiscal year. The report must also include, by contract, the contract spending projections by state fiscal year for each ensuing state fiscal year through the contract term, and note the type of service delivered. The list of contracts must be provided electronically in Excel and be sortable by all field requirements. The report must also include trend analytics on information technology contracts, and recommendations for reducing costs where possible.

(5) $654,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $654,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department, in collaboration with the state efficiency and environmental performance program, to implement the zero emission vehicle strategy.

(6) $2,671,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,671,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for zero emission electric vehicle supply equipment infrastructure at facilities to accommodate charging station installation. The electric vehicle charging equipment must allow for the collection of usage data and must be coordinated with the state efficiency and environmental performance program. The department must prioritize locations based on state efficiency and environmental performance location priorities, and at least where zero emission fleet vehicles are or are scheduled to be purchased. The department must report when and where the equipment was installed, usage data at each charging station, and the state agencies and facilities that benefit from the installation of the charging station to the fiscal committees of the legislature by June 30. The department shall collaborate with the interagency electric vehicle coordinating council to implement this subsection and must work to meet benchmarks established in chapter 182, Laws of 2022 (transportation resources).

(7) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5491 (residential building exits). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(9)))(8) $950,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for security enhancements to the governor's office lobby space and for security enhancement design for the remaining lobby and public spaces in the legislative building on the capitol campus. Enhancement designs must be provided to the senate committee on state government and elections and the house of representatives committee on state government and tribal relations no later than ((December 31, 2023))June 30, 2024.

(((10)))(9) $162,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $162,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to waive rent fees and charges through June 30, 2025, for vendors who are blind business enterprise program licensees by the department of services for the blind and who lease space and operate food service businesses, inclusive of delis, cafeterias, and espresso stands, in state government buildings.

(((11)))(10) $7,000,000 of the natural climate solutions account—state appropriation is provided solely to advance the preferred alternative of the final environmental impact statement for the capitol lake-Deschutes estuary long-term management project completed in October 2022. At a minimum, the department shall:

(a) Make tangible progress toward the next phase of design and permitting;

(b) Advance the memorandum of understanding for governance and funding of a restored estuary to an interlocal agreement that will govern long-term management of the restored estuary; and

(c) Initiate grant funding applications for design and permitting.

(((12)))(11) $400,000 of the state building code council account—state appropriation is provided solely for additional staffing to support the state building code council's work regarding the Washington state energy code.

(((13)))(12) The department must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and section 302(13) of this act.

(13) $500,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for legal services and fees incurred by the state building code council.

Sec. 152. 2023 c 475 s 154 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($4,043,000))

$4,047,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($4,010,000))

$4,198,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,899,000))

$3,249,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$14,000

Climate Commitment Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$977,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($11,943,000))

$12,485,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($103,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $103,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for archaeological determinations and excavations of inadvertently discovered skeletal human remains, and removal and reinterment of such remains when necessary.

(2))) $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Washington main street program.

(((3)))(2) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the implementation of the black historic sites survey project.

(((4)))(3) $477,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1216 (clean energy siting). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(5)))(4) The department must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and section 302(13) of this act.

(5) $31,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6125 (Lakeland Village records). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 153. 2023 c 475 s 155 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE CONSOLIDATED TECHNOLOGY SERVICES AGENCY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($21,697,000))

$7,623,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($1,700,000))

$30,310,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$134,292,000

Consolidated Technology Services Revolving Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
(($124,249,000))

$136,457,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($147,646,000))

$308,682,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($14,752,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the office of the chief information officer. Of this amount:

(a))) $2,000,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for experienced information technology project managers to provide critical support to agency IT projects that are under oversight from the office of the chief information officer. The staff or vendors will:

(((i)))(a) Provide master level project management guidance to agency IT stakeholders;

(((ii)))(b) Consider statewide best practices from the public and private sectors, independent review and analysis, vendor management, budget and timing quality assurance and other support of current or past IT projects in at least Washington state and share these with agency IT stakeholders and legislative fiscal staff at least twice annually and post these to the statewide IT dashboard; and

(((iii)))(c) Provide independent recommendations to legislative fiscal committees by December of each calendar year on oversight of IT projects to include opportunities for accountability and performance metrics.

(((b) $2,960,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the office of privacy and data protection.

(c)))(2) $2,226,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the enterprise data management pilot project, and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(((2)))(3) $16,890,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the office of cyber security.

(((3)))(4) $2,737,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the office of privacy and data protection.

(5) The consolidated technology services agency shall work with customer agencies using the Washington state electronic records vault (WASERV) to identify opportunities to:

(a) Reduce storage volumes and costs associated with vault records stored beyond the agencies' record retention schedules; and

(b) Assess a customized service charge as defined in chapter 304, Laws of 2017 for costs of using WASERV to prepare data compilations in response to public records requests.

(((4)))(6)(a) In conjunction with the office of the chief information officer's prioritization of proposed information technology expenditures, agency budget requests for proposed information technology expenditures must include the following:

(i) The agency's priority ranking of each information technology request;

(ii) The estimated cost by fiscal year and by fund for the current biennium;

(iii) The estimated cost by fiscal year and by fund for the ensuing biennium;

(iv) The estimated total cost for the current and ensuing biennium;

(v) The total cost by fiscal year, by fund, and in total, of the information technology project since it began;

(vi) The estimated cost by fiscal year and by fund over all biennia through implementation and close out and into maintenance and operations;

(vii) The estimated cost by fiscal year and by fund for service level agreements once the project is implemented;

(viii) The estimated cost by fiscal year and by fund for agency staffing for maintenance and operations once the project is implemented; and

(ix) The expected fiscal year when the agency expects to complete the request.

(b) The office of the chief information officer and the office of financial management may request agencies to include additional information on proposed information technology expenditure requests.

(((5)))(7) The consolidated technology services agency must not increase fees charged for existing services without prior approval by the office of financial management. The agency may develop fees to recover the actual cost of new infrastructure to support increased use of cloud technologies.

(((6)))(8) Within existing resources, the agency must provide oversight of state procurement and contracting for information technology goods and services by the department of enterprise services.

(((7)))(9) Within existing resources, the agency must host, administer, and support the state employee directory in an online format to provide public employee contact information.

(((8)))(10) The health care authority, the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, the department of health, the department of corrections, and the department of children, youth, and families shall work together within existing resources to establish the health and human services enterprise coalition (the coalition). The coalition, led by the health care authority, must be a multi-organization collaborative that provides strategic direction and federal funding guidance for projects that have cross-organizational or enterprise impact, including information technology projects that affect organizations within the coalition. The office of the chief information officer shall maintain a statewide perspective when collaborating with the coalition to ensure that the development of projects identified in this report are planned for in a manner that ensures the efficient use of state resources and maximizes federal financial participation. The work of the coalition and any project identified as a coalition project is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(((9) $4,508,000))(11) $7,084,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the creation and ongoing delivery of information technology services tailored to the needs of small agencies. The scope of services must include, at a minimum, full-service desktop support, service assistance, security, and consultation.

(((10) $75,935,000))(12) $82,811,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the procurement and distribution of Microsoft 365 licenses which must include advanced security features and cloud-based private branch exchange capabilities for state agencies. The office must report annually to fiscal committees of the legislature each December 31, on the count and type of licenses distributed by consolidated technology services to each state agency. The report must also separately report on the count and type of Microsoft 365 licenses that state agencies have in addition to those that are distributed by consolidated technology services so that the total count, type of license, and cost is known for statewide Microsoft 365 licenses.

(((11)))(13) The office of the chief information officer shall maintain an information technology project dashboard that, at minimum, provides updated information each fiscal month on the projects subject to section 701 of this act.

(a) The statewide information technology dashboard must include, at a minimum, the:

(i) Start date of the project;

(ii) End date of the project, when the project will close out and implementation will commence;

(iii) Term of the project in state fiscal years across all biennia to reflect the start of the project through the end of the project;

(iv) Total project cost from start date through the end date of the project in total dollars, and a subtotal of near general fund outlook;

(v) Near general fund outlook budget and actual spending in total dollars and by fiscal month for central service agencies that bill out project costs;

(vi) Start date of maintenance and operations;

(vii) Estimated annual state fiscal year cost of maintenance and operations after implementation and close out;

(viii) Actual spending by state fiscal year and in total for state fiscal years that have closed;

(ix) Date a feasibility study was completed or note if none has been completed to date;

(x) Monthly project status assessments on scope, schedule, budget, and overall by the:

(A) Office of the chief information officer;

(B) Quality assurance vendor, if applicable; and

(C) Agency project team;

(xi) Monthly quality assurance reports, if applicable;

(xii) Monthly office of the chief information officer status reports on budget, scope, schedule, and overall project status; and

(xiii) Historical project budget and expenditures through fiscal year 2023.

(b) The statewide dashboard must retain a roll up of the entire project cost, including all subprojects, that can display subproject detail. This includes coalition projects that are active. For projects that include multiple agencies or subprojects and roll up, the dashboard must display:

(i) A separate technology budget and investment plan for each impacted agency; and

(ii) A statewide project technology budget roll up that includes each affected agency at the subproject level.

(c) The office of the chief information officer may recommend additional elements to include but must have agreement with legislative fiscal committees and the office of financial management prior to including additional elements.

(d) The agency must ensure timely posting of project data on the statewide information technology dashboard for at least each project funded in the budget and those projects subject to the conditions of section 701 of this act to include, at a minimum, posting on the dashboard:

(i) The budget funded level by project for each project under oversight within 30 calendar days of the budget being signed into law;

(ii) The project historical expenditures through completed fiscal years by December 31; and

(iii) Whether each project has completed a feasibility study.

(e) The office of the chief information officer must post to the statewide dashboard a list of funding received by fiscal year by enacted session law, and how much was received citing chapter law as a list of funding provided by fiscal year.

(((12)))(14) Within existing resources, consolidated technology services must collaborate with the department of enterprise services on the annual contract report that provides information technology contract information. Consolidated technology services will:

(a) Provide data to the department of enterprise services annually by September 1 of each year; and

(b) Provide analysis on contract information for all agencies comparing spending across state fiscal years by, at least, the contract spending towers.

(((13)))(15) $8,666,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of the enterprise cloud computing program as outlined in the December 2020 Washington state cloud readiness report. Funding provided includes, but is not limited to, cloud service broker resources, cloud center of excellence, cloud management tools, a network assessment, cybersecurity governance, and a cloud security roadmap.

(((14)))(16) $3,498,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of the recommendations of the cloud transition task force report to include:

(a) A cloud readiness program to help agencies plan and prepare for transitioning to cloud computing;

(b) A cloud retraining program to provide a coordinated approach to skills development and retraining; and

(c) Staffing to define career pathways and core competencies for the state's information technology workforce.

(((15) $20,000,000))(17) $5,926,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 ((is)), $27,110,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $134,292,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for statewide electronic health records projects, which must comply with the approved statewide electronic health records plan. The purpose of the plan is to implement a common technology solution to leverage shared business processes and data across the state in support of client services.

(a) The statewide electronic health records plan must include, but is not limited to, the following elements:

(i) A proposed governance model for the electronic health records solution;

(ii) An implementation plan for the technology solution from kickoff through five years maintenance and operations post implementation;

(iii) A technology budget to include estimated budget and resources needed to implement the electronic health records solution by agency and across the state, including fund sources and all technology budget element requirements as outlined in section 701(4) of this act;

(iv) A licensing plan in consultation with the department of enterprise services that seeks to utilize the state data center;

(v) A procurement approach, in consultation with the department of enterprise services;

(vi) A system that must be capable of being continually updated, as necessary;

(vii) A system that will use an agile development model holding live demonstrations of functioning software, developed using incremental user research, held at the end of every two-week sprint;

(viii) A system that will deploy usable functionality into production for users within 180 days from the date there is an executed procurement contract after a competitive request for proposal is closed;

(ix) A system that uses quantifiable deliverables that must include live, accessible demonstrations of software in development to program staff and end users at each sprint or at least monthly;

(x) A requirement that the agency implementing its electronic health record solution must invite the office and the agency comptrollers or their designee to sprint reviews;

(xi) A requirement that there is an annual independent audit of the system to evaluate compliance of the software solution vendor's performance standards and contractual requirements and technical code quality, and that it meets user needs;

(xii) A recommended program structure for implementing a statewide electronic health records solution;

(xiii) A list of individual state agency projects that will need to implement a statewide electronic health records solution and the readiness of each agency to successfully implement;

(xiv) The process for agencies to request funding from the consolidated technology services for their electronic health records projects. The submitted application must:

(A) Include at least a technology budget in compliance with the requirements of section 701(4) of this act that each agency budget office will assist with; and

(B) Be posted to the statewide information technology dashboard and meet all dashboard posting requirements as outlined in section ((155(11)))152(13) of this act; and

(xv) The approval criteria for agencies to receive funds for their electronic health records project. The approval may not be given without an approved current technology budget, and the office must notify the fiscal committees of the legislature. The office may not approve funding for the project any earlier than 10 business days from the date of notification to the fiscal committees of the legislature.

(b) The plan described in (a) of this subsection:

(i) Must be submitted to the office of financial management, the chair and ranking member of the senate environment, energy, and information technology policy committee, the chairs and ranking members of the fiscal committees of the legislature, and the technology services board by July 1, 2023; and

(ii) Must be approved by the office of financial management and the technology services board established in RCW 43.105.285.

(c) (($20,000,000))$5,926,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 ((is)), $27,110,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $134,292,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for state agency electronic health record projects at the department of corrections, the department of social and health services, and the health care authority in accordance with the approved statewide electronic health record plan requirements in (a) of this subsection. For the amount provided in this subsection (((15)))(17):

(i) Funding may not be released until the office of financial management and the technology services board have approved the statewide electronic health record plan.

(ii) As required in section 701(2) of this act, consolidated technology services may not approve funding for the project any earlier than 10 business days from the date of notification to the fiscal committees of the legislature.

(iii) Funding may not cover any costs incurred by the state agencies for services or project costs prior to the date of statewide electronic health record plan approval.

(((iii)))(iv) State agencies must submit their proposed electronic health records project and technology budget to the office of the chief information officer for approval. The submitted application must:

(A) Include at least a technology budget in compliance with the requirements of section 701(4) of this act that each agency budget office will assist with; and

(B) Be posted to the statewide information technology dashboard and meet all dashboard posting requirements as outlined in section 152(13) of this act.

(((iv)))(v) When a funding request is approved, consolidated technology services will transfer the funds to the agency to execute their electronic health records project.

(vi) The office must enter into an interagency agreement with the health care authority who is, and will be, the reporting entity to the federal government on the application for and use of the federal funding.

(vii) Consolidated technology services must include this enterprise electronic health records program on the statewide information technology program dashboard and must ensure that the program detail will roll up the below required subprojects:

(A) Enterprise foundational electronic health records system;

(B) Department of corrections electronic health records;

(C) Department of social and health services health records; and

(D) Health care authority electronic health records.

(((16)))(18) $134,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5518 (cybersecurity). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(17)))(19) The office of the chief information officer must collaborate with the office of the secretary of state in the evaluation of the office of the secretary of state's information technology infrastructure and applications in determining the appropriate candidates for the location of data and the systems that could be exempt from consolidated technology services oversight.

(((18)))(20) $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($1,500,000))$3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for innovative technology solutions and modernization of legacy systems within state government. This funding is to be used for projects at other state agencies to improve the health of the state's overall information technology portfolio. Submitted projects are subject to review and approval by the technology services board as established in RCW 43.105.285. The agency must report to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature within 90 days of the close of fiscal year 2024 with the following information to measure the quantity of projects considered for this purpose and use of this funding:

(a) The agency name, project name, estimated time duration, estimated cost, and technology service board recommendation result of each project submitted for funding;

(b) The actual length of time and cost of the projects approved by the technology services board, from start to completion; and

(c) Any other information or metric the agency determines is appropriate to measure the quantity and use of the funding in this subsection.

(21) In collaboration with the department of health and the health care authority, consolidated technology services must actively consult and provide oversight over:

(a) The department of health 988 technology platform that must provide interoperable capabilities between the 988 call center platform and the health care authority's 988-related system;

(b) The health care authority 988 technology platform that must provide interoperable capabilities between the 988-related system and the department of health's 988 call center platform; and

(c) How the platforms in (a) and (b) of this subsection will meet statutory requirements for technology platform functionality and implementation dates as established in Senate Bill No. 6308 (extending timelines for implementation of the 988 system) and must report on the progress of both platforms' budget, scope, and schedule at a technology services board meeting by December 31, 2024.

Sec. 154. 2023 c 475 s 156 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE BOARD OF REGISTRATION OF PROFESSIONAL ENGINEERS AND LAND SURVEYORS

Professional Engineers' Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,622,000))

$4,627,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($4,622,000))

$4,627,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 155. A new section is added to 2023 c 475 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS

Financial Services Regulation Nonappropriated

Fund—State Appropriation
. . . .
$728,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$728,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $300,000 of the financial services regulation nonappropriated fund—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to study nontraditional financial services such as home equity sharing agreements, and their effect on communities of color, seniors, and other vulnerable populations.

(2) $428,000 of the financial services regulation nonappropriated fund—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6025 (predatory loans). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 156. 2023 c 475 s 157 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE LEADERSHIP BOARD

Washington State Leadership Board Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,691,000))

$1,761,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,691,000))

$1,761,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $374,000 of the Washington state leadership board account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 96, Laws of 2022 (WA state leadership board).

(2) $1,200,000 of the Washington state leadership board account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementing programming in RCW 43.388.010, and specifically the Washington world fellows program, sports mentoring program/boundless Washington, compassion scholars, and the Washington state leadership awards.

(End of part)

PART II

HUMAN SERVICES

Sec. 201. 2023 c 475 s 201 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

(1) The appropriations to the department of social and health services in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. Appropriations made in this act to the department of social and health services shall initially be allotted as required by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not include transfers of moneys between sections of this act except as expressly provided in this act, nor shall allotment modifications permit moneys that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for other than that purpose.

(2) The department of social and health services shall not initiate any services that require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation providing appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.

(3) The legislature finds that medicaid payment rates, as calculated by the department pursuant to the appropriations in this act, bear a reasonable relationship to the costs incurred by efficiently and economically operated facilities for providing quality services and will be sufficient to enlist enough providers so that care and services are available to the extent that such care and services are available to the general population in the geographic area. The legislature finds that cost reports, payment data from the federal government, historical utilization, economic data, and clinical input constitute reliable data upon which to determine the payment rates.

(4) The department shall to the maximum extent practicable use the same system for delivery of spoken-language interpreter services for social services appointments as the one established for medical appointments in the health care authority. When contracting directly with an individual to deliver spoken language interpreter services, the department shall only contract with language access providers who are working at a location in the state and who are state-certified or state-authorized, except that when such a provider is not available, the department may use a language access provider who meets other certifications or standards deemed to meet state standards, including interpreters in other states.

(5) Information technology projects or investments and proposed projects or investments impacting time capture, payroll and payment processes and systems, eligibility, case management, and authorization systems within the department of social and health services are subject to technical oversight by the office of the chief information officer.

(6)(a) The department shall facilitate enrollment under the medicaid expansion for clients applying for or receiving state funded services from the department and its contractors. Prior to open enrollment, the department shall coordinate with the health care authority to provide referrals to the Washington health benefit exchange for clients that will be ineligible for medicaid.

(b) To facilitate a single point of entry across public and medical assistance programs, and to maximize the use of federal funding, the health care authority, the department of social and health services, and the health benefit exchange will coordinate efforts to expand HealthPlanfinder access to public assistance and medical eligibility staff. The department shall complete medicaid applications in the HealthPlanfinder for households receiving or applying for public assistance benefits.

(7) The health care authority, the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, the department of health, the department of corrections, and the department of children, youth, and families shall work together within existing resources to establish the health and human services enterprise coalition (the coalition). The coalition, led by the health care authority, must be a multi-organization collaborative that provides strategic direction and federal funding guidance for projects that have cross-organizational or enterprise impact, including information technology projects that affect organizations within the coalition. The office of the chief information officer shall maintain a statewide perspective when collaborating with the coalition to ensure that projects are planned for in a manner that ensures the efficient use of state resources, support the adoption of a cohesive technology and data architecture, and maximize federal financial participation. The work of the coalition is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(8)(a) The appropriations to the department of social and health services in this act must be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, 2024, unless prohibited by this act, the department may transfer general fund—state appropriations for fiscal year 2024 among programs and subprograms after approval by the director of the office of financial management. However, the department may not transfer state appropriations that are provided solely for a specified purpose except as expressly provided in (b) of this subsection.

(b) To the extent that transfers under (a) of this subsection are insufficient to fund actual expenditures in excess of fiscal year 2024 caseload forecasts and utilization assumptions in the long-term care, developmental disabilities, and public assistance programs, the department may transfer state appropriations that are provided solely for a specified purpose. The department may not transfer funds, and the director of the office of financial management may not approve the transfer, unless the transfer is consistent with the objective of conserving, to the maximum extent possible, the expenditure of state funds. The director of the office of financial management shall notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature in writing seven days prior to approving any allotment modifications or transfers under this subsection. The written notification shall include a narrative explanation and justification of the changes, along with expenditures and allotments by budget unit and appropriation, both before and after any allotment modifications or transfers.

(9) The department may not transfer appropriations for the developmental disabilities program to any other program or subprograms of the department of social and health services.

Sec. 202. 2023 c 475 s 202 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—MENTAL HEALTH PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($610,452,000))

$808,919,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($679,312,000))

$782,615,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($148,488,000))

$168,599,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($10,732,000))

$6,500,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,448,984,000))

$1,766,633,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The state psychiatric hospitals and residential treatment facilities may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods, services, and supplies through hospital group purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.

(2) $311,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $311,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a community partnership between western state hospital and the city of Lakewood to support community policing efforts in the Lakewood community surrounding western state hospital. The amounts provided in this subsection are for the salaries, benefits, supplies, and equipment for the city of Lakewood to produce incident and police response reports, investigate potential criminal conduct, assist with charging consultations, liaison between staff and prosecutors, provide staff training on criminal justice procedures, assist with parking enforcement, and attend meetings with hospital staff.

(3) $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for payment to the city of Lakewood for police services provided by the city at western state hospital and adjacent areas.

(4) $311,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $311,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the salaries, benefits, supplies, and equipment for one full-time investigator, one full-time police officer, and one full-time community services officer for policing efforts at eastern state hospital. The department must collect data from the city of Medical Lake on the use of the funds and the number of calls responded to by the community policing program and submit a report with this information to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature each December of the fiscal biennium.

(5) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for payment to the city of Medical Lake for police services provided by the city at eastern state hospital and adjacent areas.

(6) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department, in collaboration with the health care authority, to develop and implement a predictive modeling tool which identifies clients who are at high risk of future involvement with the criminal justice system and for developing a model to estimate demand for civil and forensic state hospital bed needs pursuant to the following requirements.

(a) By the first day of each December during the fiscal biennium, the department, in coordination with the health care authority, must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature that summarizes how the predictive modeling tool has been implemented and includes the following: (i) The number of individuals identified by the tool as having a high risk of future criminal justice involvement; (ii) the method and frequency for which the department is providing lists of high-risk clients to contracted managed care organizations and behavioral health administrative services organizations; (iii) a summary of how the managed care organizations and behavioral health administrative services organizations are utilizing the data to improve the coordination of care for the identified individuals; and (iv) a summary of the administrative data to identify whether implementation of the tool is resulting in increased access and service levels and lower recidivism rates for high-risk clients at the state and regional level.

(b) The department must provide staff support for the forensic and long-term civil commitment bed forecast which must be conducted under the direction of the office of financial management. The forecast methodology, updates, and methodology changes must be conducted in coordination with staff from the department, the health care authority, the office of financial management, and the appropriate fiscal committees of the state legislature. The model shall incorporate factors for capacity in state hospitals as well as contracted facilities, which provide similar levels of care, referral patterns, wait lists, lengths of stay, and other factors identified as appropriate for estimating the number of beds needed to meet the demand for civil and forensic state hospital services. Factors should include identification of need for the services and analysis of the effect of community investments in behavioral health services and other types of beds that may reduce the need for long-term civil commitment needs. The forecast must be updated each February, June, and November during the fiscal biennium and the department must submit a report to the legislature and the appropriate committees of the legislature summarizing the updated forecast based on the caseload forecast council's schedule for entitlement program forecasts.

(7) $9,119,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $9,145,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the phase-in of the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States District Court for the Western District of Washington, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP. The department, in collaboration with the health care authority and the criminal justice training commission, must implement the provisions of the settlement agreement pursuant to the timeline and implementation plan provided for under the settlement agreement. This includes implementing provisions related to competency evaluations, competency restoration, forensic navigators, crisis diversion and supports, education and training, and workforce development.

(8) $7,147,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $7,147,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to maintain implementation of efforts to improve the timeliness of competency evaluation services for individuals who are in local jails pursuant to chapter 5, Laws of 2015 (timeliness of competency treatment and evaluation services). This funding must be used solely to maintain increases in the number of competency evaluators that began in fiscal year 2016 pursuant to the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States District Court for the Western District of Washington, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP.

(9) $71,690,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $77,825,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of efforts to improve the timeliness of competency restoration services pursuant to chapter 5, Laws of 2015 (timeliness of competency treatment and evaluation services) and the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States District Court for the Western District of Washington, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP. These amounts must be used to maintain increases that were implemented between fiscal year 2016 and fiscal year 2021, and further increase the number of forensic beds at western state hospital during the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium. Pursuant to chapter 7, Laws of 2015 1st sp. sess. (timeliness of competency treatment and evaluation services), the department may contract some of these amounts for services at alternative locations if the secretary determines that there is a need.

(10) (($84,483,000))$84,565,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $77,343,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and (($1,042,000))$960,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to continue to implement an acuity based staffing tool at western state hospital and eastern state hospital in collaboration with the hospital staffing committees. The staffing tool must be used to identify, on a daily basis, the clinical acuity on each patient ward and determine the minimum level of direct care staff by profession to be deployed to meet the needs of the patients on each ward. The department must evaluate interrater reliability of the tool within each hospital and between the two hospitals. The department must also continue to update, in collaboration with the office of financial management's labor relations office, the staffing committees, and state labor unions, an overall state hospital staffing plan that looks at all positions and functions of the facilities.

(a) Within the amounts provided in this section, the department must establish, monitor, track, and report monthly staffing and expenditures at the state hospitals, including overtime and use of locums, to the functional categories identified in the recommended staffing plan. The allotments and tracking of staffing and expenditures must include all areas of the state hospitals, must be done at the ward level, and must include contracted facilities providing forensic restoration services as well as the office of forensic mental health services.

(b) By December 1, 2023, and December 1, 2024, the department must submit reports to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature that provide a comparison of monthly spending, staffing levels, overtime, and use of locums for the prior year compared to allotments and to the recommended state hospital staffing model. The format for these reports must be developed in consultation with staff from the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature. The reports must include a summary of the results of the evaluation of the interrater reliability in use of the staffing acuity tool and an update from the hospital staffing committees.

(c) Monthly staffing levels and related expenditures at the state hospitals must not exceed official allotments without prior written approval from the director of the office of financial management. In the event the director of the office of financial management approves an increase in monthly staffing levels and expenditures beyond what is budgeted, notice must be provided to the appropriate committees of the legislature within 30 days of such approval. The notice must identify the reason for the authorization to exceed budgeted staffing levels and the time frame for the authorization. Extensions of authorizations under this subsection must also be submitted to the director of the office of financial management for written approval in advance of the expiration of an authorization. The office of financial management must notify the appropriate committees of the legislature of any extensions of authorizations granted under this subsection within 30 days of granting such authorizations and identify the reason and time frame for the extension.

(11) (($4,994,000))$5,083,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $7,535,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and (($672,000))$583,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to establish a violence reduction team at western state hospital to improve patient and staff safety at eastern and western state hospitals. A report must be submitted by December 1, 2023, and December 1, 2024, which includes a description of the violence reduction or safety strategy, a profile of the types of patients being served, the staffing model being used, and outcomes associated with each strategy. The outcomes section should include tracking data on facility-wide metrics related to patient and staff safety as well as individual outcomes related to the patients served.

(12) $2,593,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,593,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to increase services to patients found not guilty by reason of insanity under the Ross v. Lashway settlement agreement.

(13) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the department must develop and submit an annual state hospital performance report for eastern and western state hospitals. Each measure included in the performance report must include baseline performance data, agency performance targets, and performance for the most recent fiscal year. The performance report must include a one page dashboard as well as charts for each fiscal year and quality of care measure broken out by hospital and including but not limited to: (a) Monthly FTE expenditures compared to allotments; (b) monthly dollar expenditures compared to allotments; (c) monthly FTE expenditures per thousand patient bed days; (d) monthly dollar expenditures per thousand patient bed days; (e) percentage of FTE expenditures for overtime; (f) average length of stay by category of patient; (g) average monthly civil wait list; (h) average monthly forensic wait list; (i) rate of staff assaults per thousand patient bed days; (j) rate of patient assaults per thousand patient bed days; (k) average number of days to release after a patient has been determined to be clinically ready for discharge; and (l) average monthly vacancy rates for key clinical positions. The department must submit the state hospital performance report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by the first day of each December of the biennium.

(14) $546,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $566,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for design and planning activities for the new forensic hospital being constructed on the grounds of western state hospital.

(15) $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to maintain an on-site safety compliance officer, stationed at western state hospital, to provide oversight and accountability of the hospital's response to safety concerns regarding the hospital's work environment.

(16) $10,364,000 of the general fund state—appropriation for fiscal year 2024 are provided solely for the department to provide behavioral health and stabilization services at the King county south correctional entity to class members of Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States district court for the western district of Washington, cause no. 14-cv-01178-MJP.

(17) $2,619,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $5,027,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to hire additional forensic evaluators to provide in-jail competency evaluations and community-based evaluations.

(18) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to track compliance with the requirements of RCW 71.05.365 for transition of state hospital patients into community settings within 14 days of the determination that they no longer require active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient level of care. The department must use these amounts to track the following elements related to this requirement: (a) The date on which an individual is determined to no longer require active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient level of care; (b) the date on which the behavioral health entities and other organizations responsible for resource management services for the person is notified of this determination; and (c) the date on which either the individual is transitioned to the community or has been reevaluated and determined to again require active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient level of care. The department must provide this information in regular intervals to behavioral health entities and other organizations responsible for resource management services. The department must summarize the information and provide a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature on progress toward meeting the 14 day standard by December 1, 2023, and December 1, 2024.

(19) (($10,547,000))$2,190,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($37,480,000))$28,742,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to operate the 48 bed Clark county facility to provide long-term inpatient care beds as defined in RCW 71.24.025. The department must use this facility to provide treatment services for individuals who have been committed to a state hospital pursuant to the dismissal of criminal charges and civil evaluation ordered under RCW 10.77.086 or 10.77.088. In considering placements at the facility, the department must maximize forensic bed capacity at the state hospitals for individuals in jails awaiting admission that are class members of Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States district court for the western district of Washington, cause no. 14-cv-01178-MJP. The department must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2023, and December 1, 2024, providing a status update on progress toward opening the new facility.

(20) $8,048,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $7,677,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to reopen and operate a 30 bed ward for civil patients at western state hospital. The department must prioritize placements on this ward for individuals currently occupying beds on forensic wards at western state hospital who have been committed to a state hospital pursuant to the dismissal of criminal charges and a civil evaluation ordered under RCW 10.77.086 or 10.77.088, in order to maximize forensic bed capacity for individuals in jails awaiting admission that are class members of Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States district court for the western district of Washington, cause no. 14-cv-01178-MJP.

(21) (($13,324,000))$14,466,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($44,813,000))$51,582,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to operate the maple lane campus as described in (a) and (b) of this subsection. ((Of the amounts provided in this subsection:))

(a) (($4,764,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $5,239,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the))The department ((to))shall operate the Oak, Columbia, and Cascade cottages to provide:

(i) Treatment services to individuals committed to a state hospital under chapter 71.05 RCW pursuant to the dismissal of criminal charges and a civil evaluation ordered under RCW 10.77.086 or 10.77.088;

(ii) Treatment services to individuals acquitted of a crime by reason of insanity and subsequently ordered to receive treatment services under RCW 10.77.120; and

(iii) Through fiscal year 2024, competency restoration services at the Cascade cottage to individuals under RCW 10.77.086 or 10.77.088.

(b) (($8,560,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $39,574,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the))The department ((to))shall open and operate the Baker and Chelan cottages to provide treatment services to individuals committed to a state hospital under chapter 71.05 RCW pursuant to the dismissal of criminal charges and a civil evaluation ordered under RCW 10.77.086 or 10.77.088.

(c) In considering placements at the maple lane campus, the department must maximize forensic bed capacity at the state hospitals for individuals in jails awaiting admission that are class members of Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States district court for the western district of Washington, cause no. 14-cv-01178-MJP.

(22) $1,412,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,412,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for relocation, storage, and other costs associated with building demolition on the western state hospital campus.

(23) $455,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $455,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for western state hospital's vocational rehabilitation program and eastern state hospital's work readiness program to pay patients working in the programs an hourly wage that is equivalent to the state's minimum hourly wage under RCW 49.46.020.

(24) $4,054,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $5,236,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5440 (competency evaluations). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(25) (($2,233,000))$2,283,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $4,118,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and (($297,000))$247,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to address delays in patient discharge as provided in this subsection.

(a) The department shall hire staff dedicated to discharge reviews, including psychologists to complete reviews and staff for additional discharge review work, including, but not limited to, scheduling, planning, and providing transportation; and establish and implement a sex offense and problematic behavior program as part of the sex offense review and referral team program.

(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $504,000 per year shall be used for bed fees for patients who are not guilty by reason of insanity.

(c) The department shall track data as it relates to this subsection and, where available, compare it to historical data. The department will provide a report to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature. A preliminary report is due by December 1, 2023, and the final report is due by September 15, 2024, and at a minimum must include the:

(i) Volume of patients discharged;

(ii) Volume of patients in a sex offense or problematic behavior program;

(iii) Number of beds held for not guilty by reason of insanity patients;

(iv) Average and median duration to complete discharges;

(v) Staffing as it relates to this subsection; and

(vi) Average discharge evaluation caseload.

(((27)))(26)(a) $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to pursue immediate strategies to maximize existing forensic bed capacity for individuals in jails awaiting admission to the state hospitals that are class members of Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States district court for the western district of Washington, cause no. 14-cv-01178-MJP. The immediate strategies must include, but are not limited to:

(i) Additional approaches to resolving barriers to discharge for civil patients, including:

(A) In coordination with the behavioral health teaching facility at the University of Washington, identification of civil patients in the state hospitals that could receive appropriate treatment at the facility and work to resolve any barriers in such placement;

(B) Identification of civil patients in the state hospitals that could receive appropriate treatment at an enhanced services facility or any other community facility and work to resolve any barriers in such placement; and

(C) Coordination with the aging and long-term care administration and the office of public guardianship on the provision of qualified guardians for civil patients in need of guardianship that are otherwise eligible for discharge; and

(ii) Additional approaches to resolving any barriers to maximizing the use of existing civil wards at eastern state hospital for individuals currently occupying beds on forensic wards at western state hospital who have been committed to a state hospital pursuant to the dismissal of criminal charges and a civil evaluation ordered under RCW 10.77.086 or 10.77.088.

(b) By December 1, 2023, the department must submit a preliminary report to the appropriate committees of the legislature and to the office of financial management that provides:

(i) The number of individuals currently occupying beds on forensic wards at western state hospital who have been committed to a state hospital pursuant to the dismissal of criminal charges and a civil evaluation ordered under RCW 10.77.086 or 10.77.088; and

(ii) The department's plan for utilizing the funds provided in this subsection and estimated outcomes.

(c) By September 1, 2024, the department must submit a final report to the appropriate committees of the legislature and to the office of financial management that provides:

(i) The number of individuals currently occupying beds on forensic wards at western state hospital who have been committed to a state hospital pursuant to the dismissal of criminal charges and a civil evaluation ordered under RCW 10.77.086 or 10.77.088; and

(ii) Detailed reporting on how the funds provided in this subsection were used and the associated outcomes.

(((28) $53,000))(27) $76,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $53,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and (($94,000))$71,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1580 (children in crisis). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(29)))(28) Within the amounts provided in this section, the department is provided funding to operate civil long-term inpatient beds at the state hospitals as follows:

(a) Funding is sufficient for the department to operate 192 civil beds at eastern state hospital in both fiscal year 2024 and fiscal year 2025.

(b) Funding is sufficient for the department to operate 287 civil beds at western state hospital in both fiscal year 2024 and fiscal year 2025.

(c) The department shall fully operate funded civil capacity at eastern state hospital, including reopening and operating civil beds that are not needed for eastern Washington residents to provide services for western Washington residents.

(d) The department shall coordinate with the health care authority toward increasing community capacity for long-term inpatient services required under section 215(50) of this act.

(29)(a) $60,776,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $75,188,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to operate 72 beds in three wards in the Olympic heritage behavioral health facility.

(b) The department may not use the remaining 40 beds at the facility for any purpose and must permit the contractor selected by the health care authority to utilize the beds pursuant to and upon completion of the contracted process outlined in section 215 of this act.

(30) $100,318,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department to pay the court order filed July 7, 2023, issued in the case of Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States district court for the western district of Washington, cause no. 14-cv-01178-MJP, which requires the department to "pay all fines held in abeyance from September 2022 through May 2023, which totals $100,318,000.00."

(31) $6,900,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $13,610,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to operate an additional 30 beds at western state hospital.

(32) $3,228,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $6,088,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to operate an additional eight beds at eastern state hospital.

(33) $700,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5690 (conditional release transition teams). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(34) $1,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6106 (DSHS workers/PSERS). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 203. 2023 c 475 s 203 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES PROGRAM

(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($1,129,397,000))

$1,143,400,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($1,184,492,000))

$1,209,080,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,409,328,000))

$2,446,165,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$4,058,000

Developmental Disabilities Community Services

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$32,120,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($4,759,395,000))

$4,834,823,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) Individuals receiving services as supplemental security income (SSI) state supplemental payments may not become eligible for medical assistance under RCW 74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state supplemental payments.

(b) In accordance with RCW 18.51.050, 18.20.050, 70.128.060, and 43.135.055, the department is authorized to increase nursing facility, assisted living facility, and adult family home fees as necessary to fully support the actual costs of conducting the licensure, inspection, and regulatory programs. The license fees may not exceed the department's annual licensing and oversight activity costs and shall include the department's cost of paying providers for the amount of the license fee attributed to medicaid clients.

(i) The current annual renewal license fee for adult family homes is $225 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2024 and $225 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2025. A processing fee of $2,750 must be charged to each adult family home when the home is initially licensed. This fee is nonrefundable. A processing fee of $700 must be charged when adult family home providers file a change of ownership application.

(ii) The current annual renewal license fee for assisted living facilities is $116 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2024 and $116 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2025.

(iii) The current annual renewal license fee for nursing facilities is $359 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2024 and $359 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2025.

(c) $32,240,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $52,060,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $108,994,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the rate increase for the new consumer-directed employer contracted individual providers as set by the consumer-directed employer rate setting board in accordance with RCW 74.39A.530.

(d) $5,095,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $7,299,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $16,042,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the homecare agency parity consistent with the rate set by the consumer-directed employer rate setting board in accordance with RCW 74.39A.530.

(e) $1,099,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,171,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $5,515,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for administrative costs of the consumer-directed employer as set by the consumer-directed employer rate setting board in accordance with RCW 74.39A.530.

(f) $328,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $444,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $998,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase the administrative rate for home care agencies by 56 cents per hour effective July 1, 2023.

(g) $9,371,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $10,798,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $25,267,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of an agreement reached between the governor and the adult family home council under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, as provided in section 907 of this act.

(h) The department may authorize a one-time waiver of all or any portion of the licensing and processing fees required under RCW 70.128.060 in any case in which the department determines that an adult family home is being relicensed because of exceptional circumstances, such as death or incapacity of a provider, and that to require the full payment of the licensing and processing fees would present a hardship to the applicant. In these situations the department is also granted the authority to waive the required residential administrator training for a period of 120 days if necessary to ensure continuity of care during the relicensing process.

(i) Community residential cost reports that are submitted by or on behalf of contracted agency providers are required to include information about agency staffing including health insurance, wages, number of positions, and turnover.

(j) Sufficient appropriations are provided to continue community alternative placement beds that prioritize the transition of clients who are ready for discharge from the state psychiatric hospitals, but who have additional long-term care or developmental disability needs.

(i) Community alternative placement beds include enhanced service facility beds, adult family home beds, skilled nursing facility beds, shared supportive housing beds, state operated living alternative beds, and assisted living facility beds.

(ii) Each client must receive an individualized assessment prior to leaving one of the state psychiatric hospitals. The individualized assessment must identify and authorize personal care, nursing care, behavioral health stabilization, physical therapy, or other necessary services to meet the unique needs of each client. It is the expectation that, in most cases, staffing ratios in all community alternative placement options described in (j)(i) of this subsection will need to increase to meet the needs of clients leaving the state psychiatric hospitals. If specialized training is necessary to meet the needs of a client before he or she enters a community placement, then the person centered service plan must also identify and authorize this training.

(iii) When reviewing placement options, the department must consider the safety of other residents, as well as the safety of staff, in a facility. An initial evaluation of each placement, including any documented safety concerns, must occur within thirty days of a client leaving one of the state psychiatric hospitals and entering one of the community placement options described in (j)(i) of this subsection. At a minimum, the department must perform two additional evaluations of each placement during the first year that a client has lived in the facility.

(iv) In developing bed capacity, the department shall consider the complex needs of individuals waiting for discharge from the state psychiatric hospitals.

(k) Sufficient appropriations are provided for discharge case managers stationed at the state psychiatric hospitals. Discharge case managers will transition clients ready for hospital discharge into less restrictive alternative community placements. The transition of clients ready for discharge will free up bed capacity at the state psychiatric hospitals.

(l) $476,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $481,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1128 (personal needs allowance). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(m) The annual certification renewal fee for community residential service businesses is $859 per client in fiscal year 2024 and $859 per client in fiscal year 2025. The annual certification renewal fee may not exceed the department's annual licensing and oversight activity costs.

(n) $2,648,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,631,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $2,293,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for enhanced respite beds across the state for children. These services are intended to provide families and caregivers with a break in caregiving, the opportunity for behavioral stabilization of the child, and the ability to partner with the state in the development of an individualized service plan that allows the child to remain in his or her home. The department must provide the legislature with a respite utilization report in January of each year that provides information about the number of children who have used enhanced respite in the preceding year, as well as the location and number of days per month that each respite bed was occupied.

(o) $2,173,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,154,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for 13 community respite beds across the state for adults. These services are intended to provide families and caregivers with a break in caregiving and the opportunity for stabilization of the individual in a community-based setting as an alternative to using a residential habilitation center to provide planned or emergent respite. The department must provide the legislature with a respite utilization report by January of each year that provides information about the number of individuals who have used community respite in the preceding year, as well as the location and number of days per month that each respite bed was occupied.

(p) $144,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $181,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for funding the unfair labor practice settlement in the case of Adult Family Home Council v Office of Financial Management, PERC case no. 135737-U-22. If the settlement agreement is not reached by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(q) $351,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $905,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase funding of the assisted living medicaid methodology established in RCW 74.39A.032 to 79 percent of the labor component and 68 percent of the operations component, effective July 1, 2023.

(r) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding to implement chapter 220, Laws of 2020 (adult family homes/8 beds). A nonrefundable fee of $485 shall be charged for each application to increase bed capacity at an adult family home to seven or eight beds.

(s) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding to provide access to the individual and family services waiver and the basic plus waiver to those individuals on the service request list as forecasted by the caseload forecast council. For subsequent policy level budgets, the department shall submit a request for funding associated with individuals requesting to receive the individual and family services waiver and the basic plus waiver in accordance with the courtesy forecasts provided by the caseload forecast council.

(t) $1,729,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,669,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $4,206,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to operate intensive habilitation services and enhanced out-of-home services facilities.

(u) $1,363,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,363,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $2,092,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for additional staff to reduce the timeline for completion of financial eligibility determinations. No later than December 31, 2024, the department of social and health services shall submit a final report to the appropriate committees of the legislature that details how the funds were utilized and the associated outcomes, including, but not limited to, a description of how the timeline for completion of these determinations has changed.

(v) $485,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $484,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a feasibility study of the developmental disabilities assessment tool and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act. The resulting study must determine whether the assessment and its technology can be improved to meet regulatory obligations, be quicker and person-centered, reduce manual notations, and maintain viability across age groups and settings.

(w) $1,223,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,763,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $3,248,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for supported employment and community inclusion services for those individuals with intellectual or developmental disabilities who are transitioning from high school in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium and are anticipated to utilize these services.

(x) $11,074,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $13,222,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $19,206,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase rates paid to supported employment and community inclusion providers.

(y)(i) $79,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $76,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $121,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to develop a plan for implementing an enhanced behavior support specialty contract for community residential supported living, state-operated living alternative, or a group training home to provide intensive behavioral services and support to adults with intellectual and developmental disabilities who require enhanced services and support due to challenging behaviors that cannot be safely and holistically managed in an exclusively community setting, and who are at risk of institutionalization or out-of-state placement, or are transitioning to the community from an intermediate care facility, hospital, or other state-operated residential facility. The enhanced behavior support specialty contract shall be designed to ensure that enhanced behavior support specialty settings serve a maximum capacity of four clients and that they have the adequate levels of staffing to provide 24-hour nonmedical care and supervision of residents.

(ii) No later than June 30, 2025, the department must submit to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature a report that includes:

(A) A detailed description of the design of the enhanced behavior support specialty contract and setting, including a description of and the rationale for the number of staff required within each behavior support specialty setting and the necessary qualifications of these staff;

(B) A detailed description of and the rationale for the number of department staff required to manage the enhanced behavior support specialty program;

(C) A plan for implementing the enhanced behavior support specialty contracts that includes:

(I) An analysis of areas of the state where enhanced behavior support specialty settings are needed, including recommendations for how to phase in the enhanced behavior support specialty settings in these areas; and

(II) An analysis of the sufficiency of the provider network to support a phase in of the enhanced behavior support specialty settings, including recommendations for how to further develop this network; and

(D) An estimate of the costs to implement the enhanced behavior support specialty settings and program and any necessary recommendations for legislative actions to facilitate the ability of the department to:

(I) Enter into contracts and payment arrangements with providers choosing to provide the enhanced behavior support specialty setting and to supplement care in all community-based residential settings with experts trained in enhanced behavior support so that state-operated living alternatives, supported living facilities, and other community-based settings can specialize in the needs of individuals with developmental disabilities who are living with high, complex behavioral support needs;

(II) Enter into funding agreements with the health care authority for the provision of applied behavioral analysis and other applicable health care services within the community-based residential setting; and

(III) Provide the enhanced behavior support specialty through a medicaid waiver or other federal authority administered by the department, to the extent consistent with federal law and federal funding requirements to receive federal matching funds.

(z) $2,494,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,345,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to provide personal care services for up to 33 clients who are not United States citizens and who are ineligible for medicaid upon their discharge from an acute care hospital. The department must prioritize the funding provided in this subsection for such clients in acute care hospitals who are also on the department's wait list for services.

(aa) $2,605,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,402,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $3,840,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to establish transition coordination teams to coordinate transitions of care for clients who move from one care setting to another. The department of social and health services shall submit annual reports no later than December 1, 2023, and December 1, 2024, to the appropriate committees of the legislature that detail how the funds were utilized and the associated outcomes including, but not limited to:

(i) A detailed reporting of the number of clients served, the settings in which clients received care, and the progress made toward increasing stability of client placements;

(ii) A comparison of these outcomes against the outcomes achieved in prior fiscal years;

(iii) A description of lessons learned since the transition coordination teams were first implemented, including an identification of what processes were improved to reduce the timelines for completion; and

(iv) Recommendations for changes necessary to the transition coordination teams to improve increasing stability of client placements.

(bb) $1,448,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,807,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $3,626,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to pilot a specialty rate for adult family homes to serve up to 100 individuals with intellectual or developmental disabilities who also have co-occurring health or behavioral health diagnoses. No later than December 1, 2024, the department of social and health services shall submit a report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature that details how the funds were utilized and the associated outcomes including, but not limited to:

(i) A detailed reporting of the number of clients served and the setting from which each client entered the adult family home receiving this specialty rate;

(ii) A comparison of the rate of admissions to the adult family homes receiving this specialty rate against the rate of admissions to other state-operated settings including, but not limited to, state-operated living alternatives, enhanced services facilities, and the transitional care center of Seattle; and

(iii) A comparison of the length of stay in the setting from which the client entered the adult family home receiving this specialty rate against the average length of stay in settings prior to entering other state-operated settings including, but not limited to, state-operated living alternatives, enhanced services facilities, and the transitional care center of Seattle.

(cc) $2,856,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $3,104,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $5,948,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to pilot a program that provides a specialty rate for community residential providers who receive additional training to support individuals with complex physical and behavioral health needs.

(i) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $2,453,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,705,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $5,259,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the specialty rate for community residential providers to serve up to 30 individuals.

(ii) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $403,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $399,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $689,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to hire staff to support this specialty program, including expanding existing training programs available for community residential providers and to support providers in locating affordable housing.

(iii) No later than December 1, 2024, the department of social and health services shall submit a report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature that details how the funds were utilized and the associated outcomes including, but not limited to:

(A) A detailed reporting of the number of clients served and the setting from which each client entered the community residential setting receiving this specialty rate;

(B) A comparison of the rate of admissions to the community residential setting receiving this specialty rate against the rate of admissions to other community residential settings not receiving this specialty rate as well as against the rate of admissions to other state-operated settings including, but not limited to, state-operated living alternatives, enhanced services facilities, and the transitional care center of Seattle; and

(C) A comparison of the length of stay in the setting from which the client entered the community residential setting receiving this specialty rate against the average length of stay in settings prior to entering other community residential settings not receiving this specialty rate as well as prior to entering other state-operated settings including, but not limited to, state-operated living alternatives, enhanced services facilities, and the transitional care center of Seattle.

(dd)(i) $104,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department to contract with the Ruckleshaus center for a progress report on the recommendations in the December 2019 report, "Rethinking Intellectual and Developmental Disability Policy to Empower Clients, Develop Providers and Improve Services."

(ii) By February 29, 2024, a final report shall be submitted to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature that includes:

(A) Detailed information about the successes and barriers related to meeting the recommendations in the December 2019 report;

(B) Identification of other potential issues or options for meeting the recommendations in the December 2019 report, including but not limited to, an exploration of the enhanced behavioral support homes concept;

(C) A review of other state's approaches and innovations regarding any of the recommendations in the December 2019 report;

(D) Identification of any emergent issues; and

(E) Identification or recommendation for the organization of focus groups of state agencies and respective stakeholders.

(iii) In compiling the final report, members of the previous workgroup, as well as other interested parties, should be consulted for their feedback and to identify areas where there is potential for agreement to move forward and to make process recommendations if applicable.

(ee) $127,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $28,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $55,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for adult day respite. Of the amounts appropriated in this subsection:

(i) $27,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $28,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $55,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase adult day respite rates from $3.40 to $5.45 per 15-minute unit to expand and ensure the sustainability of respite services for clients with intellectual or developmental disabilities and their family caregivers.

(ii) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department to hire a project position to conduct a study and submit a report by December 1, 2023 to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature that examines the feasibility and operational resources needed to add adult day services to a state plan 1915(i) option or to the existing basic plus and core 1915(c) waivers.

(ff) $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $4,284,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $4,178,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to add 10 adult stabilization beds by June 2025, increase rates for existing adult stabilization beds by 23 percent, and expand mobile crisis diversion services to cover all three regions of the state.

(gg)(i) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department to study opportunities to enhance data collection on clients in family units with at least one parent having a developmental or intellectual disability. The study must identify:

(A) Opportunities to improve the existing assessment form and information technology systems by adding questions about clients' children, such as their ages, the number of children, and the K-12 enrollment status of each child;

(B) Ways to strengthen data sharing agreements with other departments, including the department of children, youth, and families, and local school districts;

(C) Strategies for surveying clients to collect information on their parenting and living arrangements, including support from other family members;

(D) Methods for analyzing new and existing data to determine and identify the total number of children with parents that have a developmental or intellectual disability, their needs, and access to specialized services;

(E) An inventory of existing support programs designed for families with a parent having a developmental or intellectual disability and their children, including educational support, financial assistance, and access to specialized services.

(ii) The department shall report its findings to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2024.

(hh) $81,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $219,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $371,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1407 (dev. disability/eligibility). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(ii) $62,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $72,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $116,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 1580 (children in crisis). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(jj) $63,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $73,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $136,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to conduct a study to explore opportunities to restructure services offered under the medicaid waivers for individuals with developmental disabilities served by the department. The plan should propose strategies to enhance service accessibility across the state and align services with the needs of clients, taking into account current and future demand. It must incorporate valuable input from knowledgeable stakeholders and a national organization experienced in home and community-based waivers in other states. This plan must be submitted to the governor and relevant legislative committees by December 1, 2024.

(kk) $5,431,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $11,084,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $16,737,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase rates by 2.5 percent, effective January 1, 2024, for community residential service providers offering supported living, group home, group training home, licensed staff residential services, community protection, and children's out-of-home services to individuals with developmental disabilities.

(ll) $456,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $898,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $416,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1188 (child welfare services/DD). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(mm) $446,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $5,274,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $2,089,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5440 (competency evaluations). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(nn)(i) $2,214,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $10,104,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $2,934,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to operate a staff-secure, voluntary, and transitional treatment facility specializing in services for adolescents over the age of 13 who have complex developmental disabilities, intellectual disabilities, or autism spectrum disorder and may also have a mental health or substance use diagnosis. These individuals require intensive behavioral supports and may also be in need of behavioral health services. Services must be provided at a property in lake Burien, serve no more than 12 youth at one time, and be implemented in a way that prioritizes transition to less restrictive community-based settings. Youth shall enter the facility only by their own consent or the consent of their guardian.

(ii) The department and health care authority shall collaborate in the identification and evaluation of strategies to obtain federal matching funding opportunities, specifically focusing on innovative medicaid framework adjustments and the consideration of necessary state plan amendments. This collaborative effort aims not only to enhance the funding available for the operation of the facility but also to maintain adherence to its fundamental objective of offering voluntary, transitional services. These services are designed to facilitate the transition of youth to community-based settings that are less restrictive, aligning with the facility's commitment to supporting youth with complex needs in a manner that encourages their movement toward independence.

(iii) By November 1, 2024, the department shall report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature on the program's design, results of preliminary implementation, financing opportunities, and recommendations. By June 30, 2025, the department shall report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature its initial findings, demographics on children served, and recommendations for program design and expansion.

(oo) $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely to pay for the cost of professional guardians for individuals who will transition from a residential habilitation center to a community residential setting.

(pp) $63,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $62,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department, in cooperation with the health care authority, to study the feasibility and cost of implementing a point of contact for individuals diagnosed with a rare disease to increase access and reduce barriers in navigating programs, services, and resources offered by both agencies.

(qq) $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely to establish respite care beds for individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities in the Tri-Cities.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($138,560,000))

$138,715,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($140,682,000))

$141,016,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($254,857,000))

$255,118,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$19,488,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($553,587,000))

$554,337,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) Individuals receiving services as supplemental security income (SSI) state supplemental payments may not become eligible for medical assistance under RCW 74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state supplemental payments.

(b) $495,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $495,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are for the department to fulfill its contracts with the school districts under chapter 28A.190 RCW to provide transportation, building space, and other support services as are reasonably necessary to support the educational programs of students living in residential habilitation centers.

(c) The residential habilitation centers may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods, services, and supplies through hospital group purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.

(d) $61,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $61,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $117,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1128 (personal needs allowance). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(e) $73,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $73,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6125 (Lakeland Village records). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(3) PROGRAM SUPPORT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($4,103,000))

$3,582,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($4,179,000))

$3,659,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,951,000))

$4,249,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($13,233,000))

$11,490,000

(4) SPECIAL PROJECTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$66,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$66,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,094,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,226,000

Sec. 204. 2023 c 475 s 204 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—AGING AND ADULT SERVICES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($2,202,547,000))

$2,168,174,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($2,385,171,000))

$2,400,557,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($5,611,805,000))

$5,660,562,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$53,719,000

Traumatic Brain Injury Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($5,586,000))

$4,486,000

Skilled Nursing Facility Safety Net Trust Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$133,360,000

Long-Term Services and Supports Trust Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($44,301,000))

$51,902,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($10,436,489,000))

$10,472,760,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) For purposes of implementing chapter 74.46 RCW, the weighted average nursing facility payment rate may not exceed $341.41 for fiscal year 2024 and may not exceed $364.67 for fiscal year 2025. The weighted average nursing facility payment rates in this subsection (1)(a) include the following:

(i) $17,361,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $17,361,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $34,722,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to maintain rate add-ons funded in the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium to address low-wage equity for low-wage direct care workers. To the maximum extent possible, the facility-specific wage rate add-on shall be equal to the wage payment received on June 30, 2023.

(ii) $2,227,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,227,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $4,456,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to maintain rate add-ons funded in the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium to address low-wage equity for low-wage indirect care workers. To the maximum extent possible, the facility-specific wage rate add-on shall be equal to the wage payment received on June 30, 2023.

(b) The department shall provide a medicaid rate add-on to reimburse the medicaid share of the skilled nursing facility safety net assessment as a medicaid allowable cost. The nursing facility safety net rate add-on may not be included in the calculation of the annual statewide weighted average nursing facility payment rate.

(2) In accordance with RCW 18.51.050, 18.20.050, 70.128.060, and 43.135.055, the department is authorized to increase nursing facility, assisted living facility, and adult family home fees as necessary to fully support the actual costs of conducting the licensure, inspection, and regulatory programs. The license fees may not exceed the department's annual licensing and oversight activity costs and shall include the department's cost of paying providers for the amount of the license fee attributed to medicaid clients.

(a) The current annual renewal license fee for adult family homes is $225 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2024 and $225 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2025. A processing fee of $2,750 must be charged to each adult family home when the home is initially licensed. This fee is nonrefundable. A processing fee of $700 shall be charged when adult family home providers file a change of ownership application.

(b) The current annual renewal license fee for assisted living facilities is $116 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2024 and $116 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2025.

(c) The current annual renewal license fee for nursing facilities is $359 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2024 and $359 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2025.

(3) The department is authorized to place long-term care clients residing in nursing homes and paid for with state-only funds into less restrictive community care settings while continuing to meet the client's care needs.

(4) $69,777,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $113,969,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $237,558,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the rate increase for the new consumer-directed employer contracted individual providers as set by the consumer-directed rate setting board in accordance with RCW 74.39A.530.

(5) $19,044,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $30,439,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $63,986,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the homecare agency parity consistent with the rate set by the consumer-directed employer rate setting board in accordance with RCW 74.39A.530.

(6) $2,385,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $4,892,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $12,502,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for administrative costs of the consumer-directed employer as set by the consumer-directed employer rate setting board in accordance with RCW 74.39A.530.

(7) $2,547,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $3,447,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $7,762,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase the administrative rate for home care agencies by 56 cents per hour effective July 1, 2023.

(8) $425,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $542,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for funding the unfair labor practice settlement in the case of Adult Family Home Council v Office of Financial Management, PERC case no. 135737-U-22. If the settlement agreement is not reached by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(9) The department may authorize a one-time waiver of all or any portion of the licensing and processing fees required under RCW 70.128.060 in any case in which the department determines that an adult family home is being relicensed because of exceptional circumstances, such as death or incapacity of a provider, and that to require the full payment of the licensing and processing fees would present a hardship to the applicant. In these situations the department is also granted the authority to waive the required residential administrator training for a period of 120 days if necessary to ensure continuity of care during the relicensing process.

(10) In accordance with RCW 18.390.030, the biennial registration fee for continuing care retirement communities shall be $900 for each facility.

(11) Within amounts appropriated in this subsection, the department shall assist the legislature to continue the work of the joint legislative executive committee on planning for aging and disability issues.

(a) A joint legislative executive committee on aging and disability is continued, with members as provided in this subsection.

(i) Four members of the senate, with the leaders of the two largest caucuses each appointing two members, and four members of the house of representatives, with the leaders of the two largest caucuses each appointing two members;

(ii) A member from the office of the governor, appointed by the governor;

(iii) The secretary of the department of social and health services or his or her designee;

(iv) The director of the health care authority or his or her designee;

(v) A member from disability rights Washington and a member from the office of long-term care ombuds;

(vi) The insurance commissioner or his or her designee, who shall serve as an ex officio member; and

(vii) Other agency directors or designees as necessary.

(b) The committee must make recommendations and continue to identify key strategic actions to prepare for the aging of the population in Washington and to serve people with disabilities, including state budget and policy options, and may conduct, but are not limited to, the following tasks:

(i) Identify strategies to better serve the health care needs of an aging population and people with disabilities to promote healthy living and palliative care planning;

(ii) Identify strategies and policy options to create financing mechanisms for long-term service and supports that allow individuals and families to meet their needs for service;

(iii) Identify policies to promote financial security in retirement, support people who wish to stay in the workplace longer, and expand the availability of workplace retirement savings plans;

(iv) Identify ways to promote advance planning and advance care directives and implementation strategies for the Bree collaborative palliative care and related guidelines;

(v) Identify ways to meet the needs of the aging demographic impacted by reduced federal support;

(vi) Identify ways to protect the rights of vulnerable adults through assisted decision-making and guardianship and other relevant vulnerable adult protections;

(vii) Identify options for promoting client safety through residential care services and consider methods of protecting older people and people with disabilities from physical abuse and financial exploitation; and

(viii) Identify other policy options and recommendations to help communities adapt to the aging demographic in planning for housing, land use, and transportation.

(c) Staff support for the committee shall be provided by the office of program research, senate committee services, the office of financial management, and the department of social and health services.

(d) Within existing appropriations, the cost of meetings must be paid jointly by the senate, house of representatives, and the office of financial management. Joint committee expenditures and meetings are subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their successor committees. Meetings of the task force must be scheduled and conducted in accordance with the rules of both the senate and the house of representatives. The joint committee members may be reimbursed for travel expenses as authorized under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, and chapter 44.04 RCW as appropriate. Advisory committee members may not receive compensation or reimbursement for travel and expenses.

(12) Appropriations in this section are sufficient to fund discharge case managers stationed at the state psychiatric hospitals. Discharge case managers will transition clients ready for hospital discharge into less restrictive alternative community placements. The transition of clients ready for discharge will free up bed capacity at the state psychiatric hospitals.

(13) Appropriations in this section are sufficient to fund financial service specialists stationed at the state psychiatric hospitals. Financial service specialists will help to transition clients ready for hospital discharge into alternative community placements. The transition of clients ready for discharge will free up bed capacity at the state hospitals.

(14) The department shall continue to administer tailored support for older adults and medicaid alternative care as described in initiative 2 of the 1115 demonstration waiver. This initiative will be funded by the health care authority through the medicaid quality improvement program. The secretary in collaboration with the director of the health care authority shall report to the office of financial management all expenditures of this subsection and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested. The department shall not increase general fund—state expenditures on this initiative.

(15) $61,209,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $70,352,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $161,960,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of an agreement reached between the governor and the adult family home council under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, as provided in section 907 of this act.

(16) $1,761,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,761,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $4,162,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for case managers at the area agencies on aging to coordinate care for medicaid clients with mental illness who are living in their own homes. Work shall be accomplished within existing standards for case management and no requirements will be added or modified unless by mutual agreement between the department of social and health services and area agencies on aging.

(17) Appropriations provided in this section are sufficient for the department to contract with an organization to provide educational materials, legal services, and attorney training to support persons with dementia. The funding provided in this subsection must be used for:

(a) An advance care and legal planning toolkit for persons and families living with dementia, designed and made available online and in print. The toolkit should include educational topics including, but not limited to:

(i) The importance of early advance care, legal, and financial planning;

(ii) The purpose and application of various advance care, legal, and financial documents;

(iii) Dementia and capacity;

(iv) Long-term care financing considerations;

(v) Elder and vulnerable adult abuse and exploitation;

(vi) Checklists such as "legal tips for caregivers," "meeting with an attorney," and "life and death planning;"

(vii) Standardized forms such as general durable power of attorney forms and advance health care directives; and

(viii) A selected list of additional resources.

(b) Webinars about the dementia legal and advance care planning toolkit and related issues and topics with subject area experts. The subject area expert presenters must provide their services in-kind, on a volunteer basis.

(c) Continuing legal education programs for attorneys to advise and assist persons with dementia. The continuing education programs must be offered at no cost to attorneys who make a commitment to participate in the pro bono program.

(d) Administrative support costs to develop intake forms and protocols, perform client intake, match participating attorneys with eligible clients statewide, maintain records and data, and produce reports as needed.

(18) Appropriations provided in this section are sufficient to continue community alternative placement beds that prioritize the transition of clients who are ready for discharge from the state psychiatric hospitals, but who have additional long-term care or developmental disability needs.

(a) Community alternative placement beds include enhanced service facility beds, adult family home beds, skilled nursing facility beds, shared supportive housing beds, state operated living alternative beds, assisted living facility beds, adult residential care beds, and specialized dementia beds.

(b) Each client must receive an individualized assessment prior to leaving one of the state psychiatric hospitals. The individualized assessment must identify and authorize personal care, nursing care, behavioral health stabilization, physical therapy, or other necessary services to meet the unique needs of each client. It is the expectation that, in most cases, staffing ratios in all community alternative placement options described in (a) of this subsection will need to increase to meet the needs of clients leaving the state psychiatric hospitals. If specialized training is necessary to meet the needs of a client before he or she enters a community placement, then the person centered service plan must also identify and authorize this training.

(c) When reviewing placement options, the department must consider the safety of other residents, as well as the safety of staff, in a facility. An initial evaluation of each placement, including any documented safety concerns, must occur within thirty days of a client leaving one of the state psychiatric hospitals and entering one of the community placement options described in (a) of this subsection. At a minimum, the department must perform two additional evaluations of each placement during the first year that a client has lived in the facility.

(d) In developing bed capacity, the department shall consider the complex needs of individuals waiting for discharge from the state psychiatric hospitals.

(19) The annual certification renewal fee for community residential service businesses is $859 per client in fiscal year 2024 and $859 per client in fiscal year 2025. The annual certification renewal fee may not exceed the department's annual licensing and oversight activity costs.

(20) $5,094,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $5,094,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for services and support to individuals who are deaf, hard of hearing, or deaf-blind.

(21)(a) $63,938,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $40,714,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $110,640,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for rate adjustments for skilled nursing facilities.

(b) Of the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection, $7,700,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $7,700,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5802 (nursing rate calculation). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in (b) of this subsection shall lapse.

(22) $32,470,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($34,090,000))$35,372,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and (($72,783,000))$74,246,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for rate adjustments for assisted living providers. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) $23,751,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $25,487,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $54,687,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase funding of the assisted living medicaid methodology established in RCW 74.39A.032 to 79 percent of the labor component and 68 percent of the operations component, effective July 1, 2023. The department of social and health services shall report, by December 1st of each year, on medicaid resident utilization of and access to assisted living facilities.

(b) $5,505,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($5,389,000))$6,671,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and (($11,588,000))$13,051,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a specialty dementia care rate add-on for all assisted living facilities of (($43.48))$50.00 per patient per day.

(c) $2,573,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,573,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $5,146,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a one-time bridge rate for assisted living facilities, enhanced adult residential centers, and adult residential centers, with high medicaid occupancy. The bridge rate does not replace or substitute the capital add-on rate found in RCW 74.39A.320 and the same methodology from RCW 74.39A.320 shall be used to determine each facility's medicaid occupancy percentage for the purposes of this one-time bridge rate add-on. Facilities with a medicaid occupancy level of 90 percent or more shall receive a $20.99 add-on per resident day.

(d) $641,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $641,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,362,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase the rate add-on for expanded community services by 5 percent.

(23) Within available funds, the aging and long term support administration must maintain a unit within adult protective services that specializes in the investigation of financial abuse allegations and self-neglect allegations.

(24) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding to implement chapter 220, Laws of 2020 (adult family homes/8 beds). A nonrefundable fee of $485 shall be charged for each application to increase bed capacity at an adult family home to seven or eight beds.

(25) $1,858,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,857,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for operation of the volunteer services program. Funding must be prioritized towards serving populations traditionally served by long-term care services to include senior citizens and persons with disabilities.

(26) $479,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($479,000))$989,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the kinship navigator program in the Colville Indian reservation, Yakama Nation, and other tribal areas.

(27) The traumatic brain injury council shall collaborate with other state agencies in their efforts to address traumatic brain injuries to ensure that efforts are complimentary and continue to support the state's broader efforts to address this issue.

(28) $1,297,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,297,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for community-based dementia education and support activities in three areas of the state, including dementia resource catalyst staff and direct services for people with dementia and their caregivers.

(29) $5,410,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $9,277,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $14,909,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the operating costs associated with the phase-in of enhanced services facilities and specialized dementia care beds that were established with behavioral health community capacity grants.

(30)(a) $71,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $68,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $141,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to develop a plan for implementing an enhanced behavior support specialty contract for community residential supported living, state-operated living alternative, or a group training home to provide intensive behavioral services and support to adults with intellectual and developmental disabilities who require enhanced services and support due to challenging behaviors that cannot be safely and holistically managed in an exclusively community setting, and who are at risk of institutionalization or out-of-state placement, or are transitioning to the community from an intermediate care facility, hospital, or other state-operated residential facility. The enhanced behavior support specialty contract shall be designed to ensure that enhanced behavior support specialty settings serve a maximum capacity of four clients and that they have the adequate levels of staffing to provide 24-hour nonmedical care and supervision of residents.

(b) No later than June 30, 2025, the department must submit to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature a report that includes:

(i) A detailed description of the design of the enhanced behavior support specialty contract and setting, including a description of and the rationale for the number of staff required within each behavior support specialty setting and the necessary qualifications of these staff;

(ii) A detailed description of and the rationale for the number of department staff required to manage the enhanced behavior support specialty program;

(iii) A plan for implementing the enhanced behavior support specialty contracts that includes:

(A) An analysis of areas of the state where enhanced behavior support specialty settings are needed, including recommendations for how to phase in the enhanced behavior support specialty settings in these areas; and

(B) An analysis of the sufficiency of the provider network to support a phase in of the enhanced behavior support specialty settings, including recommendations for how to further develop this network; and

(iv) An estimate of the costs to implement the enhanced behavior support specialty settings and program and any necessary recommendations for legislative actions to facilitate the ability of the department to:

(A) Enter into contracts and payment arrangements with providers choosing to provide the enhanced behavior support specialty setting and to supplement care in all community-based residential settings with experts trained in enhanced behavior support so that state-operated living alternatives, supported living facilities, and other community-based settings can specialize in the needs of individuals with developmental disabilities who are living with high, complex behavioral support needs;

(B) Enter into funding agreements with the health care authority for the provision of applied behavioral analysis and other applicable health care services within the community-based residential setting; and

(C) Provide the enhanced behavior support specialty through a medicaid waiver or other federal authority administered by the department, to the extent consistent with federal law and federal funding requirements to receive federal matching funds.

(31) (($2,874,000))$2,551,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($2,211,000))$3,134,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $70,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the kinship care support program. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) (($667,000))$1,344,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,944,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the kinship care support program.

(b) $344,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 ((is))and $323,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to continue the kinship navigator case management pilot program.

(((b) $900,000))(c) $863,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 ((and $900,000)), $867,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $70,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely ((to increase the rates paid to))for kinship navigators ((and to)), including an increase in the number of kinship navigators so that each area agency on aging has one kinship navigator and King county has two kinship navigators.

(32) $2,574,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,567,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to provide personal care services for up to 40 clients who are not United States citizens and who are ineligible for medicaid upon their discharge from an acute care hospital. The department must prioritize the funding provided in this subsection for such clients in acute care hospitals who are also on the department's wait list for services.

(33) $691,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $658,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,347,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to provide staff support to the difficult to discharge task force described in section ((135(12)))132(12) of this act, including any associated ad hoc subgroups, and to develop home and community services assessment timeliness requirements for pilot participants in cooperation with the health care authority as described in section 211(((65)))(64) of this act.

(34) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a study of functional assessments conducted by the department prior to acute care hospital discharge and placement in a post-acute facility. No later than June 30, 2025, a report must be submitted to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature that evaluates:

(a) The timeliness of the completion of these assessments;

(b) How requiring these assessments impacts:

(i) The length of a patient's hospital stay;

(ii) The patient's medical, emotional, and mental well-being;

(iii) The hospital staff who care for these patients; and

(iv) Access to inpatient and emergency beds for other patients;

(c) Best practices from other states for placing hospitalized patients in post-acute care settings in a timely and effective manner that includes:

(i) Identification of the states that require these assessments prior to post-acute placement; and

(ii) An analysis of a patient's hospital length of stay and a patient's medical, emotional, and mental well-being in states that require these assessments compared to the states that do not; and

(d) The potential benefits of, and barriers to, outsourcing some or all of the functional assessment process to hospitals. Barriers evaluated must include department policies regarding staff workloads, outsourcing work, and computer system access.

(35) $63,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $73,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $136,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to employ and train staff for outreach efforts aimed at connecting adult family home owners and their employees with health care coverage through the adult family home training network as outlined in RCW 70.128.305. These outreach activities must consist of:

(a) Informing adult family home owners and their employees about various health insurance options;

(b) Creating and distributing culturally and linguistically relevant materials to assist these individuals in accessing affordable or free health insurance plans;

(c) Offering continuous technical support to adult family home owners and their employees regarding health insurance options and the application process; and

(d) Providing technical assistance as a certified assister for the health benefit exchange, enabling adult family home owners and their employees to comprehend, compare, apply for, and enroll in health insurance via Washington healthplanfinder. Participation in the certified assister program is dependent on meeting contractual, security, and other program requirements set by the health benefit exchange.

(36) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department, in collaboration with the office of the insurance commissioner and the office of the attorney general, to create a regulatory oversight plan for continuing care retirement communities, focusing primarily on establishing and implementing resident consumer protections, as recommended in the 2022 report of the office of the insurance commissioner. As part of the process, the agencies must engage with relevant stakeholder groups for consultation. The final plan must be submitted to the health care committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024.

(37) (($16,952,000))$11,509,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($23,761,000))$15,363,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and (($41,407,000))$27,344,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for nursing home services and emergent building costs at the transitional care center of Seattle. No later than December 1, 2024, the department must submit to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature a report that includes, but is not limited to:

(a) An itemization of the costs associated with providing direct care services to residents and managing and caring for the facility; and

(b) An examination of the impacts of this facility on clients and providers of the long-term care and medical care sectors of the state that includes, but is not limited to:

(i) An analysis of areas that have realized cost containment or savings as a result of this facility;

(ii) A comparison of individuals transitioned from hospitals to this facility compared to other skilled nursing facilities over the same period of time; and

(iii) Impacts of this facility on lengths of stay in acute care hospitals, other skilled nursing facility, and transitions to home and community-based settings.

(38) $911,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $935,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $365,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1128 (personal needs allowance). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(39) $562,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $673,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,244,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase rates for long-term care case management services offered by area agencies on aging. The department must include this adjustment in the monthly per client rates paid to these agencies for case management services in the governor's projected maintenance level budget process, in accordance with RCW 43.88.030.

(40) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to contract with an organization to design and deliver culturally and linguistically competent training programs for home care workers, including individual providers.

(41) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $400,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a pilot project focused on providing translation services for interpreting mandatory training courses offered through the adult family home training network. The department of social and health services must collaborate with the adult family home council and the adult family home training network to assess the pilot project's outcomes. The department of social and health services shall submit a comprehensive report detailing the results to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than September 30, 2025.

(42) $635,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $635,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to continue the current pilot projects to provide personal care services to homeless seniors and people with disabilities from the time the person presents at a shelter to the time they become eligible for medicaid.

(43) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $72,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $147,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1188 (child welfare services/DD). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(44) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $250,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department, in collaboration with the consumer directed employer and home care agencies, to establish guidelines, collect and analyze data, and research the reasons and timing behind home care workers leaving the workforce.

(45) $703,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $3,297,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $2,735,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5440 (competency evaluations). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(46)(a) $4,792,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $4,894,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $9,881,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to support providers that are ready to accept patients who are in acute care beds and no longer require inpatient care, but are unable to be transitioned to appropriate postacute care settings. These patients are generally referred to as difficult to discharge hospital patients because of their behaviors.

(i) The department shall broaden the current discharge and referral case management practices for difficult to discharge hospital patients waiting in acute care hospitals to include referrals to all long-term care behavioral health settings, including enhanced services facilities, enhanced adult residential care, and enhanced adult residential care with community stability supports contracts or community behavioral health support services, including supportive supervision and oversight and skills development and restoration. These home and community-based providers are contracted to provide various levels of personal care, nursing, and behavior supports for difficult to discharge hospital patients with significant behavior support needs.

(ii) Patients ready to discharge from acute care hospitals with diagnosed behaviors or behavior history, and a likelihood of unsuccessful placement in other licensed long-term care facilities, a history of rejected applications for admissions, or a history of unsuccessful placements shall be fully eligible for referral to available beds in enhanced services facilities or enhanced adult residential care with contracts that adequately meet the patient's long-term care needs.

(iii) Previous or current detainment under the involuntary treatment act shall not be a requirement for individuals in acute care hospitals to be eligible for these specialized settings. The department shall develop a standard process for acute care hospitals to refer patients to the department for placement in enhanced services facilities and enhanced adult residential care with contracts to provide behavior support.

(b) The department must adopt a payment model that incorporates the following adjustments:

(i) The enhanced behavior services plus and enhanced behavior services respite rates for skilled nursing facilities shall be converted to $175 per patient per day add-on in addition to daily base rates to recognize additional staffing and care needs for patients with behaviors.

(ii) Enhanced behavior services plus with specialized services rates for skilled nursing facilities shall be converted to $235 per patient per day add-on on top of daily base rates.

(iii) The ventilator rate add-on for all skilled nursing facilities shall be $192 per patient per day.

(iv) The tracheotomy rate add-on for all skilled nursing facilities shall be $123 per patient per day.

(c) Of the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection, $3,838,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $3,917,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $7,911,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for an increase in the daily rate for enhanced services facilities to $596.10 per patient per day.

(47) $4,908,000 of the long-term services and supports trust account—state appropriation is provided solely to continue technological development for the Washington cares fund program and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(48) $63,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $62,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department, in cooperation with the health care authority, to study the feasibility and cost of implementing a point of contact for individuals diagnosed with a rare disease to increase access and reduce barriers in navigating programs, services, and resources offered by both agencies.

(49)(a) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the department shall convene a work group comprised of representatives from the department of social and health services, the department of commerce, the health care authority, and organizations representing relevant assisted living and housing providers utilizing department of housing and urban development housing choice vouchers in assisted living facilities to examine how assisted living facilities can use these vouchers for medicaid residents in a manner that aligns with federal requirements and does not negatively impact receipt of federal medicaid funding.

(b) The work group shall submit a preliminary report by December 1, 2024, to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature that includes any findings and policy recommendations for how to use housing and urban development project-based rental vouchers for medicaid residents living in licensed assisted living facilities. The work group findings must identify any barriers within the state and federal systems that would prevent the use of housing and urban development project-based rental vouchers for medicaid residents, including, but not limited to, licensing requirements and duplication of services.

(c) It is the intent of the legislature that this work group will continue its work through September 30, 2025, in order to facilitate completion of a final report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature at that time.

(50) $49,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $48,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5640 (independent living residents). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(51) $94,000 of the long-term services and supports trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 6072 (LTSS commission recs.). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(52) $962,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $962,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a 30 percent increase in the rates for adult day care and adult day health.

(53) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely to contract with an entity that is managed through a labor-management partnership to research and develop a benefit plan and implementation plan to deliver high quality health care benefits to nursing home workers. This entity must already be providing health care benefits to at least 20,000 long-term care workers in the state of Washington and should have at least five years of experience in administering health care benefits to this workforce. Their joint efforts will focus on examining the health care needs specific to the nursing home workforce in the state, formulating a benefit plan that effectively addresses these needs, determining the financial requirement to offer such benefits, developing informational materials on health benefits tailored for nursing home workers, and establishing procedures and systems.

Sec. 205. 2023 c 475 s 205 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—ECONOMIC SERVICES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($606,767,000))

$676,492,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($604,555,000))

$740,922,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,648,987,000))

$1,689,559,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$5,274,000

Domestic Violence Prevention Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,404,000

Information Technology Investment Revolving Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,329,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($2,867,987,000))

$3,118,980,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) (($169,050,000))$172,628,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($164,246,000))$198,637,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $853,777,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for all components of the WorkFirst program. Within the amounts provided for the WorkFirst program, the department may provide assistance using state-only funds for families eligible for temporary assistance for needy families. The department must create a WorkFirst budget structure that allows for transparent tracking of budget units and subunits of expenditures where these units and subunits are mutually exclusive from other department budget units. The budget structure must include budget units for the following: Cash assistance, child care, WorkFirst activities, and administration of the program. Within these budget units, the department must develop program index codes for specific activities and develop allotments and track expenditures using these codes. The department shall report to the office of financial management and the relevant fiscal and policy committees of the legislature prior to adopting a structure change.

(b) (($450,773,000))$481,959,000 of the amounts in (a) of this subsection is for assistance to clients, including grants, diversion cash assistance, and additional diversion emergency assistance including but not limited to assistance authorized under RCW 74.08A.210. The department may use state funds to provide support to working families that are eligible for temporary assistance for needy families but otherwise not receiving cash assistance. Of the amounts provided in this subsection (1)(b):

(i) $17,315,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely to increase the temporary assistance for needy families and state family assistance cash grants by $100 per month for households with a child under the age of three, effective November 1, 2023. The funding is intended to assist families with the cost of diapers as described in chapter 100, Laws of 2022.

(ii) $3,060,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $4,665,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $19,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to increase temporary assistance for needy families grants by eight percent, effective January 1, 2024.

(iii) $296,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $5,293,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,089,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1447 (assistance programs). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(iv) $632,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the replacement of skimmed or cloned cash benefits for impacted recipients. Benefits may be replaced up to two times each federal fiscal year for the temporary assistance for needy families and the state family assistance program. The replacement of stolen benefits shall align with the supplemental food assistance program benefit replacement guidelines in the consolidated appropriations act, 2023 (136 Stat. 4459). Any unspent funds in this subsection (1)(b)(iv) shall lapse on September 30, 2024, or on the date that the federal government ends the requirement that stolen supplemental nutrition assistance program benefits must be replaced, whichever is later.

(c) $167,710,000 of the amounts in (a) of this subsection is for WorkFirst job search, education and training activities, barrier removal services, limited English proficiency services, and tribal assistance under RCW 74.08A.040. The department must allocate this funding based on client outcomes and cost effectiveness measures. Within amounts provided in this subsection (1)(c), the department shall implement the working family support program.

(i) $2,474,000 of the amounts provided in this subsection (1)(c) is for enhanced transportation assistance. The department must prioritize the use of these funds for the recipients most in need of financial assistance to facilitate their return to work. The department must not utilize these funds to supplant repayment arrangements that are currently in place to facilitate the reinstatement of drivers' licenses.

(ii) $482,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,417,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the costs associated with increasing the temporary assistance for needy families grants by eight percent, effective January 1, 2024.

(iii) $185,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,820,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1447 (assistance programs). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(d) Of the amounts in (a) of this subsection, $353,402,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is for the working connections child care program under RCW 43.216.020 within the department of children, youth, and families. The department is the lead agency for and recipient of the federal temporary assistance for needy families grant. A portion of this grant must be used to fund child care subsidies expenditures at the department of children, youth, and families.

(i) The department of social and health services shall work in collaboration with the department of children, youth, and families to determine the appropriate amount of state expenditures for the working connections child care program to claim towards the state's maintenance of effort for the temporary assistance for needy families program. The departments will also collaborate to track the average monthly child care subsidy caseload and expenditures by fund type, including child care development fund, general fund—state appropriation, and temporary assistance for needy families for the purpose of estimating the annual temporary assistance for needy families reimbursement from the department of social and health services to the department of children, youth, and families.

(ii) Effective December 1, 2023, and annually thereafter, the department of children, youth, and families must report to the governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature the total state contribution for the working connections child care program claimed the previous fiscal year towards the state's maintenance of effort for the temporary assistance for needy families program and the total temporary assistance for needy families reimbursement from the department of social and health services for the previous fiscal year.

(e) Of the amounts in (a) of this subsection, $68,496,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is for child welfare services within the department of children, youth, and families.

(f) Of the amounts in (a) of this subsection, (($146,692,000))$153,475,000 is for WorkFirst administration and overhead. Of the amounts provided in this subsection (1)(f):

(i) $147,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $69,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for costs associated with increasing the temporary assistance for needy families grants by eight percent, effective January 1, 2024.

(ii) $204,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $179,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $575,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1447 (assistance programs). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(iii) $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely to process skimmed or cloned cash benefits for impacted recipients of the temporary assistance for needy families or state family assistance programs. Any unspent funds in this subsection (1)(f)(iii) shall lapse on September 30, 2024, or on the date that the federal government ends the requirement that stolen supplemental nutrition assistance program benefits must be replaced, whichever is later.

(g)(i) The department shall submit quarterly expenditure reports to the governor, the fiscal committees of the legislature, and the legislative WorkFirst poverty reduction oversight task force under RCW 74.08A.341. In addition to these requirements, the department must detail any fund transfers across budget units identified in (a) through (e) of this subsection. The department shall not initiate any services that require expenditure of state general fund moneys that are not consistent with policies established by the legislature.

(ii) The department may transfer up to 10 percent of funding between budget units identified in (b) through (f) of this subsection. The department shall provide notification prior to any transfer to the office of financial management and to the appropriate legislative committees and the legislative-executive WorkFirst poverty reduction oversight task force. The approval of the director of financial management is required prior to any transfer under this subsection.

(h) On January 2nd and July 1st of each year, the department shall provide a maintenance of effort and participation rate tracking report for temporary assistance for needy families to the office of financial management, the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature, and the legislative-executive WorkFirst poverty reduction oversight task force. The report must detail the following information for temporary assistance for needy families:

(i) An overview of federal rules related to maintenance of effort, excess maintenance of effort, participation rates for temporary assistance for needy families, and the child care development fund as it pertains to maintenance of effort and participation rates;

(ii) Countable maintenance of effort and excess maintenance of effort, by source, provided for the previous federal fiscal year;

(iii) Countable maintenance of effort and excess maintenance of effort, by source, for the current fiscal year, including changes in countable maintenance of effort from the previous year;

(iv) The status of reportable federal participation rate requirements, including any impact of excess maintenance of effort on participation targets;

(v) Potential new sources of maintenance of effort and progress to obtain additional maintenance of effort;

(vi) A two-year projection for meeting federal block grant and contingency fund maintenance of effort, participation targets, and future reportable federal participation rate requirements; and

(vii) Proposed and enacted federal law changes affecting maintenance of effort or the participation rate, what impact these changes have on Washington's temporary assistance for needy families program, and the department's plan to comply with these changes.

(i) In the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, it is the intent of the legislature to provide appropriations from the state general fund for the purposes of (a) of this subsection if the department does not receive additional federal temporary assistance for needy families contingency funds in each fiscal year as assumed in the budget outlook.

(2) $3,545,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,545,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for naturalization services.

(3) $2,366,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for employment services for refugees and immigrants, of which $1,774,000 is provided solely for the department to pass through to statewide refugee and immigrant assistance organizations for limited English proficiency pathway services; and $2,366,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for employment services for refugees and immigrants, of which $1,774,000 is provided solely for the department to pass through to statewide refugee and immigrant assistance organizations for limited English proficiency pathway services.

(4) On January 1, 2024, and January 1, 2025, the department must report to the governor and the legislature on all sources of funding available for both refugee and immigrant services and naturalization services during the current fiscal year and the amounts expended to date by service type and funding source. The report must also include the number of clients served and outcome data for the clients.

(5) To ensure expenditures remain within available funds appropriated in this section, the legislature establishes the benefit under the state food assistance program, pursuant to RCW 74.08A.120, to be 100 percent of the federal supplemental nutrition assistance program benefit amount.

(6) The department shall review clients receiving services through the aged, blind, or disabled assistance program, to determine whether they would benefit from assistance in becoming naturalized citizens, and thus be eligible to receive federal supplemental security income benefits. Those cases shall be given high priority for naturalization funding through the department.

(7) The department shall continue the interagency agreement with the department of veterans' affairs to establish a process for referral of veterans who may be eligible for veterans' services. This agreement must include out-stationing department of veterans' affairs staff in selected community service office locations in King and Pierce counties to facilitate applications for veterans' services.

(8) $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for operational support of the Washington information network 211 organization.

(9) $377,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $377,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the consolidated emergency assistance program.

(10) $560,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $560,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a state-funded employment and training program for recipients of the state's food assistance program.

(11) (($5,244,000))$4,999,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($3,805,000))$2,155,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and (($21,115,000))$27,765,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the integrated eligibility and enrollment modernization project to create a comprehensive application and benefit status tracker for multiple programs, an application and enrollment portal for multiple programs, and to establish a foundational platform. Funding is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(12) (($3,307,000))$2,352,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($257,000))$1,230,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and (($8,318,000))$7,576,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the integrated eligibility and enrollment modernization project for the discovery, innovation, and customer experience phase. Funding is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(13) (($1,067,000))$2,267,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($1,067,000))$2,638,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and (($4,981,000))$11,481,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the integrated eligibility and enrollment modernization project office.

(14) $189,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $953,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the expansion of the ongoing additional requirements program, effective April 1, 2024. Of the amount provided in this subsection, the maximum amount that may be expended on new items added to the ongoing additional requirements program is $53,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $710,000 in fiscal year 2025.

(15)(a) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for sponsorship stabilization funds for eligible unaccompanied children and their sponsors and a study to assess needs and develop recommendations for ongoing supports for this population.

(b) Of the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection, $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for sponsorship stabilization funds for eligible unaccompanied children and their sponsors in order to address financial hardship and support household well-being. Stabilization funds can be used to support the sponsorship household with costs of housing, childcare, transportation, internet and data services, household goods, and other unmet needs. The funds may be provided on behalf of an unaccompanied child when the following eligibility criteria are met:

(i) The unaccompanied child is between the ages of 0-17, has been placed in Washington under the care of a nonparental sponsor following release from the United States office of refugee resettlement custody, and has not been reunified with a parent; and

(ii) The sponsorship household demonstrates financial need and has an income below 250 percent of the federal poverty level. A sponsorship household receiving stabilization funds on behalf of a child who turns 18 may continue to receive funds for an additional 60 days after the child reaches 18 years of age.

(c) The department may work with community-based organizations to administer sponsorship stabilization supports. Up to 10 percent of the amounts provided in (b) of this subsection may be used by the community-based organizations to cover administrative expenses associated with the distribution of these supports.

(d) Of the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection, $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to cover the administrative resources necessary for the department to administer the sponsorship stabilization program and to convene a work group with the department of children, youth, and families, department of commerce's office of homeless youth prevention and programs, stakeholders, and community-based organization who have pertinent information regarding sponsorship households. The work group shall identify and analyze the resource and service needs for unaccompanied children and their sponsors, including the types and levels of financial supports and related services that will promote stability of sponsorship placements for this population.

(i) The department must produce a report that includes an overview of the number of impacted children and sponsors, existing services and supports that are available, any gaps in services, and potential changes to federal programs and policies that could impact unaccompanied children. The report shall include recommendations for how state agencies and community organizations can partner with the federal government to support sponsorship households, proposed services and supports that the state could provide to promote the ongoing stability of sponsorship households, and a recommended service delivery model.

(ii) The department shall submit the report required by (d)(i) of this subsection (15) to the governor and appropriate legislative committees no later than June 30, 2025.

(16) $111,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,016,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $21,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1447 (assistance programs) for the aged, blind, or disabled, refugee cash assistance, pregnant women assistance, and consolidated emergency assistance programs. ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(17) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department to contract with an organization located in Seattle with expertise in culturally and linguistically appropriate communications and outreach to conduct an outreach, education, and media campaign related to communities significantly impacted by or at risk for benefits trafficking, skimming, or other fraudulent activities, with particular focus on immigrant, refugee, migrant, and senior populations. This campaign must provide community-focused, culturally and linguistically appropriate education and assistance targeted to meet the needs of each community and related to safeguarding public assistance benefits provided through an electronic benefit card and how to avoid the trafficking or skimming of benefits. To the extent practical, the department must make available information and data to refine this campaign for those communities most impacted to ensure inclusion of any relevant groups not already identified in this provision. The contracted organization, in collaboration with the department, must focus its outreach in highly impacted geographic areas including, but not limited to, Burien, Federal Way, Kent, Lynnwood, White Center, West Seattle, Seattle's International District, Chinatown, and the Central District, Yakima and other identified locations.

(18) $10,881,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($10,131,000))$10,416,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, $6,734,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation, and $2,404,000 of the domestic violence prevention account—state appropriation are provided solely for domestic violence victim services. Of the amounts provided in this subsection((,)):

(a) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 must be distributed to domestic violence services providers proportionately, based upon bed capacity.

(b) $285,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 must be distributed to domestic violence emergency shelters that are experiencing a reduction in funding and must be used to continue current service levels. Funding in this subsection (b) must be allocated as follows:

(i) $70,000 is for a shelter providing services in Thurston county;

(ii) $50,000 is for a shelter providing services in Spokane county;

(iii) $45,000 is for a shelter providing services in Lewis county;

(iv) $40,000 is for a shelter providing services in Clallam county;

(v) $30,000 is for a shelter providing services in Yakima county;

(vi) $25,000 is for a shelter providing services in Mason county; and

(vii) $25,000 is for a shelter providing services in Cowlitz county.

(19) $1,100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $715,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to meet the terms of its settlement agreement with the United States department of agriculture (USDA).

(a) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department to repay USDA as part of the settlement agreement.

(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $715,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to fund employment and training program services and activities ((for))targeted to able-bodied adults without dependents receiving food benefits from the USDA supplemental nutrition assistance program, but open to all basic food employment and training participants including participants who are not able-bodied adults without dependents.

(20) $3,844,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $7,921,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,374,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to increase the aged, blind, or disabled, refugee cash assistance, pregnant women assistance, and consolidated emergency assistance grants by eight percent, effective January 1, 2024.

(21) $950,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $950,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a nonprofit organization in Pierce county to continue the operation of the guaranteed basic income program in Tacoma.

(22) $58,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $59,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5398 (domestic violence funding). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(23) $113,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,487,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,599,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to fully integrate the asset verification system into the automated client eligibility system (ACES).

(24) $16,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $34,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to implement the changes made to the state supplemental payment program in chapter 201, Laws of 2023.

(25) $51,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $178,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the staffing necessary to process medical assistance cases resulting from the July 1, 2024, implementation for the apple health expansion program.

(26) $2,786,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $5,888,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $8,334,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the transition of the automated client eligibility system (ACES) mainframe hardware operations to cloud technologies, using an enterprise contracted service through the consolidated technology services agency. Funding is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(27) $5,024,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $7,206,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $12,230,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of the summer electronic benefit transfer program for the summer break months following the 2023-2024 and 2024-2025 school years. The program implementation must align with the federal summer electronic benefit program requirements defined in the consolidated appropriations act, 2023 (136 Stat. 4459). The department may use a third-party entity to administer the program.

(28) $8,191,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $464,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $8,314,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to cover the increased costs of the maintenance and operations of the automated client eligibility system (ACES), including but not limited to a one-time vendor transition.

(29) $251,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $21,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to process and replace skimmed or cloned cash and food benefits for impacted recipients. Benefits may be replaced up to two times each federal fiscal year for the pregnant women assistance, refugee cash assistance, aged, blind, or disabled assistance, and state food assistance program. The replacement of stolen cash and food benefits shall align with the supplemental food assistance program benefit replacement guidelines in the consolidated appropriations act, 2023 (136 Stat. 4459). Any unspent funds in this subsection shall lapse on September 30, 2024, or on the date that the federal government ends the requirement that stolen supplemental nutrition assistance program benefits must be replaced, whichever is later.

(30)(a) $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely to the office of refugee and immigrant assistance to expand support services for individuals newly arriving to the United States and Washington who do not qualify for federal refugee resettlement program services. Support services include, but are not limited to, housing assistance, food, transportation, childhood education services, education and employment supports, connection to legal services, and social services navigation.

(b) Of the amounts in (a) of this subsection, $162,000 is provided solely for staffing at the office of refugee and immigrant assistance to cover the administrative expenses of coordinating a statewide approach to the supports described in (a) of this subsection.

(31)(a) $593,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,406,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $193,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement changes made through the fiscal responsibility act of 2023 (137 Stat. 10) for the supplemental nutrition assistance program's work requirements for able-bodied adults without dependents, and the corresponding impacts to the state food assistance program.

(b) Of the amounts in (a) of this subsection, $104,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $115,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $193,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for administrative and information technology expenses.

(32)(a) $236,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $3,367,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,329,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to hire additional public benefit specialists to help reduce the call center and lobby wait times within the community services division.

(b) By June 30, 2025, the department must submit a report to the governor and the legislature that shows the prior fiscal year's call and lobby wait times by month and queue, number of customer contacts by month and queue, processing times for the various queues for the three most recent fiscal years along with an explanation for any changes to the most recent year's processing times, number of filled public benefit specialists 3 positions and vacancies by month, wait time impacts associated with individual technology solution enhancements, any telephonic savings experienced due to fewer customers waiting on hold, and recommendations to continue reducing customer wait times.

(33) $103,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $65,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5889 (customer voice council). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 206. 2023 c 475 s 206 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($26,670,000))

$26,677,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($26,962,000))

$26,975,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$110,047,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($163,679,000))

$163,699,000

Sec. 207. 2023 c 475 s 207 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—SPECIAL COMMITMENT PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($82,011,000))

$81,275,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($81,976,000))

$80,461,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($163,987,000))

$161,736,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The special commitment center may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods and supplies through hospital group purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.

(((4)))(2)(a) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department to:

(i) Explore regulatory framework options for conditional release less restrictive alternative placements and make recommendations for a possible future framework. This exploration shall include collaboration with the department of corrections regarding their community custody programs;

(ii) Review and refine agency policies regarding communication and engagement with impacted local governments related to less restrictive alternatives, including exploring options for public facing communications on current county fair share status and any projected future need;

(iii) Identify opportunities for greater collaboration and possible fiscal support for local government entities regarding placements of conditional release less restrictive alternatives; and

(iv) Provide recommendations to improve cost-effectiveness of all less restrictive alternative placements.

(b) The department shall submit a report to the governor and appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature by December 1, 2023, with a summary of the results and provide any additional recommendations to the legislature that the department identifies. The report shall also include a summary of costs to the department for contracted and uncontracted less restrictive alternatives.

(((5)))(3) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department to conduct an assessment of wireless internet implementation needs and options, and must include an assessment of satellite and fiber options. The department shall provide a report that includes the assessment and estimated implementation time frame and costs to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 15, 2023.

(4) $2,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6106 (DSHS workers/PSERS). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 208. 2023 c 475 s 208 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($49,968,000))

$50,926,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($50,544,000))

$57,903,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($57,444,000))

$62,572,000

Climate Commitment Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,000,000

Information Technology Investment Revolving Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,876,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($157,956,000))

$177,277,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the department shall provide to the department of health, where available, the following data for all nutrition assistance programs funded by the United States department of agriculture and administered by the department. The department must provide the report for the preceding federal fiscal year by February 1, 2024, and February 1, 2025. The report must provide:

(a) The number of people in Washington who are eligible for the program;

(b) The number of people in Washington who participated in the program;

(c) The average annual participation rate in the program;

(d) Participation rates by geographic distribution; and

(e) The annual federal funding of the program in Washington.

(2) $5,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $22,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $14,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of an agreement reached between the governor and the Washington federation of state employees for the language access providers under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium as provided in section 907 of this act.

(3) $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to support the joint legislative and executive committee on behavioral health established in section 135 of this act.

(4) $115,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $111,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $64,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1745 (diversity in clinical trials). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(5) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $96,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $149,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5497 (medicaid expenditures). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(6) $231,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $65,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5304 (language access/testing). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(7)(a) $2,961,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the system for integrated leave, attendance, and scheduling (SILAS) project and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act. Funding is provided solely for continued project expansion at the:

(i) Yakima Valley school;

(ii) Maple Lane campus;

(iii) Brockmann campus;

(iv) Rainier school; and

(v) Fircrest school.

(b) By July 1, 2024, the department must submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature to include, at least, the implementation schedule and budget plans by facility deployment for each of the facilities listed in (a) of this subsection.

(c) By June 30, 2025, the department must submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature to include, but not be limited to, how funding was spent compared to the spending plan and the actual roll out by facility compared to the implementation schedule for each facility that the SILAS solution was planned and/or implemented at in the prior 12 calendar months.

(8) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the research and data analysis division of the department to analyze historical trends of admissions for felony civil conversion cases based on behavioral health administrative service organization regions. The research and data analysis division must create a report that provides information on the monthly averages for admission by region and any information about trends or cycles, and shall make a recommendation about how best to predict and model future admissions for this population by region. The report must be submitted to the governor, office of financial management, and appropriate committees of the legislature no later than November 1, 2024.

(9) $1,000,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation shall take effect January 1, 2025, and is provided solely for the department to pilot a statewide network of community assemblies with overburdened communities as defined in RCW 70A.02.010. The department must select topics for community assemblies that fall within its authority or must consult and coordinate with the agency who has authority on the proposed topic before selection. These assemblies will review state policy, program, and funding decisions.

(10)(a) $670,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to conduct a feasibility study regarding a resource data tool for the purpose of digitally connecting members of the public to state services in consultation with the advisory group created in (b) of this subsection. The feasibility study shall include recommendations for a mobile application and considerations for language access, alternative communication options, and equitable access for individuals living with disabilities. In making recommendations, the study shall include an examination of other available digital public resource.

(b) The department shall convene an advisory group for the purposes of participating in the decision-making process regarding the feasibility study directed in this subsection. The advisory group shall be composed of representatives from state agencies and the community in the area of system referral and resource navigation, and individuals with lived experience receiving public benefits. At a minimum, the department shall invite representatives from:

(i) Washington information network 211;

(ii) The state 911 coordination office established in the emergency management division of the state military department;

(iii) The department of health and the health care authority involved in the statewide 988 behavioral health crisis response and suicide prevention line;

(iv) WithinReach;

(v) Community living connections;

(vi) First five fundamentals;

(vii) Washington communities for children;

(viii) Washington resource data collaborative;

(ix) Help me grow; and

(x) Accountable communities of health.

(c) The advisory group shall inform and, upon a majority vote, approve the feasibility study. At a minimum, the feasibility study must include a plan and framework for launching the resource data tool, a web portal, and a mobile application. The department shall submit the approved study to the office of the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024.

(11)(a) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to complete a gap analysis of the existing housing and health care system and provide a report to the legislature detailing its findings. This report shall include, but not be limited to, a review of existing models related to individuals experiencing:

(i) Housing instability who have significant medical and/or behavioral health needs, including the inability to stay in or return to their current housing;

(ii) Homelessness and/or a significant history of being unhoused, including permanent supportive housing residents; and

(iii) Significant health-related social needs that are not severe enough to qualify for placement in existing facilities, but are too significant to be met in a shelter or permanent supportive housing.

(b) The gap analysis shall also include a review of:

(i) Hospitals with patients that have resolved the acute hospital-level needs of the patient, but cannot discharge patients to the community because there is no appropriate lower level of care available; and

(ii) Permanent supportive housing and shelter providers with residents whose medical needs exceed the location's ability to provide care.

(c) The department shall provide recommendations to fill the gaps identified in (a) and (b) of this subsection, which may include creation of complex care locations and enhanced behavioral health supports until an individual qualifies for either a higher or lower level of care.

(d) This report must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024.

Sec. 209. 2023 c 475 s 209 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—PAYMENTS TO OTHER AGENCIES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($63,781,000))

$66,483,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($60,934,000))

$63,617,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($60,794,000))

$61,814,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($185,509,000))

$191,914,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department must extend master property insurance to all buildings owned by the department valued over $250,000 and to all locations leased by the department with contents valued over $250,000.

Sec. 210. 2023 c 475 s 210 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY

(1)(a) During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the health care authority shall provide support and data as required by the office of the state actuary in providing the legislature with health care actuarial analysis, including providing any information in the possession of the health care authority or available to the health care authority through contracts with providers, plans, insurers, consultants, or any other entities contracting with the health care authority.

(b) Information technology projects or investments and proposed projects or investments impacting time capture, payroll and payment processes and systems, eligibility, case management, and authorization systems within the health care authority are subject to technical oversight by the office of the chief information officer.

(2) The health care authority shall not initiate any services that require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The health care authority may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the health care authority receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation providing appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.

(3)(a) The health care authority, the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, the department of health, the department of corrections, and the department of children, youth, and families shall work together within existing resources to establish the health and human services enterprise coalition (the coalition). The coalition, led by the health care authority, must be a multi-organization collaborative that provides strategic direction and federal funding guidance for projects that have cross-organizational or enterprise impact, including information technology projects that affect organizations within the coalition. The office of the chief information officer shall maintain a statewide perspective when collaborating with the coalition to ensure that projects are planned for in a manner that ensures the efficient use of state resources, supports the adoption of a cohesive technology and data architecture, and maximizes federal financial participation. The work of the coalition and any project identified as a coalition project is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(b) The health care authority must submit a report on November 1, 2023, and annually thereafter, to the fiscal committees of the legislature. The report must include, at a minimum:

(i) A list of active coalition projects as of July 1st of the fiscal year. This must include all current and ongoing coalition projects, which coalition agencies are involved in these projects, and the funding being expended on each project, including in-kind funding. For each project, the report must include which federal requirements each coalition project is working to satisfy, and when each project is anticipated to satisfy those requirements; and

(ii) A list of coalition projects that are planned in the current and following fiscal year. This must include which coalition agencies are involved in these projects, including the anticipated in-kind funding by agency, and if a budget request will be submitted for funding. This must reflect all funding required by fiscal year and by fund source and include the budget outlook period.

(4) The appropriations to the health care authority in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, 2024, unless prohibited by this act, the authority may transfer general fund—state appropriations for fiscal year 2024 among programs after approval by the director of the office of financial management. To the extent that appropriations in this section are insufficient to fund actual expenditures in excess of caseload forecast and utilization assumptions, the authority may transfer general fund—state appropriations for fiscal year 2024 that are provided solely for a specified purpose. The authority may not transfer funds, and the director of the office of financial management shall not approve the transfer, unless the transfer is consistent with the objective of conserving, to the maximum extent possible, the expenditure of state funds. The director of the office of financial management shall notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature in writing seven days prior to approving any allotment modifications or transfers under this subsection. The written notification must include a narrative explanation and justification of changes, along with expenditures and allotments by budget unit and appropriation, both before and after any allotment modifications and transfers.

Sec. 211. 2023 c 475 s 211 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY—MEDICAL ASSISTANCE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($2,682,912,000))

$2,858,495,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($2,672,393,000))

$2,926,861,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($15,431,138,000))

$16,707,064,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,074,465,000))

$1,252,273,000

Dedicated Cannabis Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2024)
. . . .
(($25,544,000))

$21,513,000

Dedicated Cannabis Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2025)
. . . .
(($28,936,000))

$23,376,000

Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems

Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$15,086,000

Family Medicine Workforce Development Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$7,000,000

Hospital Safety Net Assessment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,524,493,000))

$1,517,493,000

Long-Term Services and Supports Trust Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$314,000

Medical Aid Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$540,000

Statewide 988 Behavioral Health Crisis Response Line

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($21,606,000))

$11,624,000

Telebehavioral Health Access Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($8,394,000))

$7,836,000

Ambulance Transport Fund—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($13,872,000))

$14,316,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($23,499,379,000))

$25,363,791,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The authority shall submit an application to the centers for medicare and medicaid services to renew the 1115 demonstration waiver for an additional five years as described in subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section. The authority may not accept or expend any federal funds received under an 1115 demonstration waiver except as described in this section unless the legislature has appropriated the federal funding. To ensure compliance with legislative requirements and terms and conditions of the waiver, the authority shall implement the renewal of the 1115 demonstration waiver and reporting requirements with oversight from the office of financial management. The legislature finds that appropriate management of the renewal of the 1115 demonstration waiver as set forth in subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section requires sound, consistent, timely, and transparent oversight and analytic review in addition to lack of redundancy with other established measures. The patient must be considered first and foremost in the implementation and execution of the demonstration waiver. To accomplish these goals, the authority shall develop consistent performance measures that focus on population health and health outcomes. The authority shall limit the number of projects that accountable communities of health may participate in under initiative 1 to a maximum of six and shall seek to develop common performance measures when possible. The joint select committee on health care oversight will evaluate the measures chosen: (a) For effectiveness and appropriateness; and (b) to provide patients and health care providers with significant input into the implementation of the demonstration waiver to promote improved population health and patient health outcomes. In cooperation with the department of social and health services, the authority shall consult with and provide notification of work on applications for federal waivers, including details on waiver duration, financial implications, and potential future impacts on the state budget to the joint select committee on health care oversight prior to submitting these waivers for federal approval. Prior to final approval or acceptance of funds by the authority, the authority shall submit the special terms and conditions as submitted to the centers for medicare and medicaid services and the anticipated budget for the duration of the renewed waiver to the governor, the joint select committee on health care, and the fiscal committees of the legislature. By federal standard any programs created or funded by this waiver do not create an entitlement. The demonstration period for the waiver as described in subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section begins July 1, 2023.

(2)(a) (($150,219,000))$342,398,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation and (($150,219,000))$213,592,000 of the general fund—local appropriation are provided solely for accountable communities of health described in initiative 1 of the 1115 demonstration waiver and this is the maximum amount that may be expended for this purpose. In renewing this initiative, the authority shall consider local input regarding community needs and shall limit total local projects to no more than six. To provide transparency to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature, the authority shall provide fiscal staff of the legislature query ability into any database of the fiscal intermediary that authority staff would be authorized to access. The authority shall not supplement the amounts provided in this subsection with any general fund—state moneys appropriated in this section or any moneys that may be transferred pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. The director shall report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all expenditures under this subsection and provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested by the legislative fiscal committees.

(b) (($438,515,000))$467,787,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation and (($179,111,000))$191,068,000 of the general fund—private/local appropriation are provided solely for the medicaid quality improvement program and this is the maximum amount that may be expended for this purpose. Medicaid quality improvement program payments do not count against the 1115 demonstration waiver spending limits and are excluded from the waiver's budget neutrality calculation. The authority may provide medicaid quality improvement program payments to apple health managed care organizations and their partnering providers as they meet designated milestones. Partnering providers and apple health managed care organizations must work together to achieve medicaid quality improvement program goals according to the performance period timelines and reporting deadlines as set forth by the authority. The authority may only use the medicaid quality improvement program to support initiatives 1, 2, and 3 as described in the 1115 demonstration waiver and may not pursue its use for other purposes. Any programs created or funded by the medicaid quality improvement program do not constitute an entitlement for clients or providers. The authority shall not supplement the amounts provided in this subsection with any general fund—state, general fund—federal, or general fund—local moneys appropriated in this section or any moneys that may be transferred pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. The director shall report to the joint select committee on health care oversight not less than quarterly on financial and health outcomes. The director shall report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all expenditures under this subsection and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested by the legislative fiscal committees.

(c) In collaboration with the accountable communities of health, the authority will submit a report to the governor and the joint select committee on health care oversight describing how each of the accountable community of health's work aligns with the community needs assessment no later than December 1, 2023.

(d) Performance measures and payments for accountable communities of health shall reflect accountability measures that demonstrate progress toward transparent, measurable, and meaningful goals that have an impact on improved population health and improved health outcomes, including a path to financial sustainability. While these goals may have variation to account for unique community demographics, measures should be standardized when possible.

(3) (($115,713,000))$87,665,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation and (($115,725,000))$87,666,000 of the general fund—local appropriation are provided solely for long-term support services as described in initiative 2 of the 1115 demonstration waiver as well as administrative expenses for initiative 3 and this is the maximum amount that may be expended for this purpose. The authority shall contract with and provide funding to the department of social and health services to administer initiative 2. The director in cooperation with the secretary of the department of social and health services shall report to the office of financial management all of the expenditures of this section and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested. The authority shall not supplement the amounts provided in this subsection with any general fund—state moneys appropriated in this section or any moneys that may be transferred pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

(4)(a) (($54,912,000))$46,450,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation and (($30,162,000))$21,432,000 of the general fund—local appropriation are provided solely for supported housing and employment services described in initiative 3a and 3b of the 1115 demonstration waiver and this is the maximum amount that may be expended for this purpose. Under this initiative, the authority and the department of social and health services shall ensure that allowable and necessary services are provided to eligible clients as identified by the department or its third-party administrator. The authority and the department, in consultation with the medical assistance expenditure forecast work group, shall ensure that reasonable reimbursements are established for services deemed necessary within an identified limit per individual. The authority shall not supplement the amounts provided in this subsection with any general fund—state moneys appropriated in this section or any moneys that may be transferred pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. The director shall report to the joint select committee on health care oversight no less than quarterly on financial and health outcomes. The director shall also report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all of the expenditures of this subsection and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested by the legislative fiscal committees.

(b) ((The authority and the department shall seek))$28,156,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation and $22,067,000 of the general fund—local appropriation are provided solely for additional ((flexibilities for)) housing supports ((through the centers for medicare and medicaid services and shall coordinate with the office of financial management and the department of commerce to ensure that services are not duplicated))described in the 1115 demonstration waiver and this is the maximum amount that may be expended for this purpose. The authority shall not supplement the amounts provided in this subsection with any general fund—state moneys appropriated in this section or any moneys that may be transferred pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. The director shall report to the joint select committee on health care oversight no less than quarterly on financial and health outcomes. The director shall also report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all of the expenditures of this subsection and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested by the legislative fiscal committees.

(c) The director shall report to the joint select committee on health care oversight no less than quarterly on utilization and caseload statistics for both supportive housing and employment services and its progress toward increasing uptake and availability for these services.

(5) $1,432,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,008,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for supported employment services and $1,478,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,162,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for supported housing services, similar to the services described in initiatives 3a and 3b of the 1115 demonstration waiver to individuals who are ineligible for medicaid. Under these initiatives, the authority and the department of social and health services shall ensure that allowable and necessary services are provided to eligible clients as identified by the authority or its third-party administrator. Before authorizing services, eligibility for initiative 3a or 3b of the 1115 demonstration waiver must first be determined.

(6) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this subsection to implement the medicaid expansion as defined in the social security act, section 1902(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII).

(7) The legislature finds that medicaid payment rates, as calculated by the health care authority pursuant to the appropriations in this act, bear a reasonable relationship to the costs incurred by efficiently and economically operated facilities for providing quality services and will be sufficient to enlist enough providers so that care and services are available to the extent that such care and services are available to the general population in the geographic area. The legislature finds that the cost reports, payment data from the federal government, historical utilization, economic data, and clinical input constitute reliable data upon which to determine the payment rates.

(8) Based on quarterly expenditure reports and caseload forecasts, if the health care authority estimates that expenditures for the medical assistance program will exceed the appropriations, the health care authority shall take steps including but not limited to reduction of rates or elimination of optional services to reduce expenditures so that total program costs do not exceed the annual appropriation authority.

(9) In determining financial eligibility for medicaid-funded services, the health care authority is authorized to disregard recoveries by Holocaust survivors of insurance proceeds or other assets, as defined in RCW 48.104.030.

(10) The legislature affirms that it is in the state's interest for Harborview medical center to remain an economically viable component of the state's health care system.

(11) When a person is ineligible for medicaid solely by reason of residence in an institution for mental diseases, the health care authority shall provide the person with the same benefits as he or she would receive if eligible for medicaid, using state-only funds to the extent necessary.

(12) (($4,176,000))$4,261,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $4,261,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and (($8,607,000))$8,522,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for low-income disproportionate share hospital payments.

(13) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the health care authority shall provide disproportionate share hospital payments to hospitals that provide services to children in the children's health program who are not eligible for services under Title XIX or XXI of the federal social security act due to their citizenship status.

(14) $7,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for supplemental payments to nursing homes operated by public hospital districts. The public hospital district shall be responsible for providing the required nonfederal match for the supplemental payment, and the payments shall not exceed the maximum allowable under federal rules. It is the legislature's intent that the payments shall be supplemental to and shall not in any way offset or reduce the payments calculated and provided in accordance with part E of chapter 74.46 RCW. It is the legislature's further intent that costs otherwise allowable for rate-setting and settlement against payments under chapter 74.46 RCW shall not be disallowed solely because such costs have been paid by revenues retained by the nursing home from these supplemental payments. The supplemental payments are subject to retrospective interim and final cost settlements based on the nursing homes' as-filed and final medicare cost reports. The timing of the interim and final cost settlements shall be at the health care authority's discretion. During either the interim cost settlement or the final cost settlement, the health care authority shall recoup from the public hospital districts the supplemental payments that exceed the medicaid cost limit and/or the medicare upper payment limit. The health care authority shall apply federal rules for identifying the eligible incurred medicaid costs and the medicare upper payment limit.

(15) The health care authority shall continue the inpatient hospital certified public expenditures program for the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium. The program shall apply to all public hospitals, including those owned or operated by the state, except those classified as critical access hospitals or state psychiatric institutions. The health care authority shall submit reports to the governor and legislature by November 1, 2023, and by November 1, 2024, that evaluate whether savings continue to exceed costs for this program. If the certified public expenditures (CPE) program in its current form is no longer cost-effective to maintain, the health care authority shall submit a report to the governor and legislature detailing cost-effective alternative uses of local, state, and federal resources as a replacement for this program. During fiscal year 2024 and fiscal year 2025, hospitals in the program shall be paid and shall retain 100 percent of the federal portion of the allowable hospital cost for each medicaid inpatient fee-for-service claim payable by medical assistance and 100 percent of the federal portion of the maximum disproportionate share hospital payment allowable under federal regulations. For the purpose of determining the amount of any state grant under this subsection, payments will include the federal portion of medicaid program supplemental payments received by the hospitals. Inpatient medicaid payments shall be established using an allowable methodology that approximates the cost of claims submitted by the hospitals. Payments made to each hospital in the program in each fiscal year of the biennium shall be compared to a baseline amount. The baseline amount will be determined by the total of (a) the inpatient claim payment amounts that would have been paid during the fiscal year had the hospital not been in the CPE program based on the reimbursement rates developed, implemented, and consistent with policies approved in the 2023-2025 biennial operating appropriations act and in effect on July 1, 2015, (b) one-half of the indigent assistance disproportionate share hospital payment amounts paid to and retained by each hospital during fiscal year 2005, and (c) all of the other disproportionate share hospital payment amounts paid to and retained by each hospital during fiscal year 2005 to the extent the same disproportionate share hospital programs exist in the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium. If payments during the fiscal year exceed the hospital's baseline amount, no additional payments will be made to the hospital except the federal portion of allowable disproportionate share hospital payments for which the hospital can certify allowable match. If payments during the fiscal year are less than the baseline amount, the hospital will be paid a state grant equal to the difference between payments during the fiscal year and the applicable baseline amount. Payment of the state grant shall be made in the applicable fiscal year and distributed in monthly payments. The grants will be recalculated and redistributed as the baseline is updated during the fiscal year. The grant payments are subject to an interim settlement within 11 months after the end of the fiscal year. A final settlement shall be performed. To the extent that either settlement determines that a hospital has received funds in excess of what it would have received as described in this subsection, the hospital must repay the excess amounts to the state when requested. (($237,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $218,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for state grants for the participating hospitals.))

(16) The health care authority shall seek public-private partnerships and federal funds that are or may become available to provide ongoing support for outreach and education efforts under the federal children's health insurance program reauthorization act of 2009.

(17) The health care authority shall target funding for maternity support services towards pregnant women with factors that lead to higher rates of poor birth outcomes, including hypertension, a preterm or low birth weight birth in the most recent previous birth, a cognitive deficit or developmental disability, substance abuse, severe mental illness, unhealthy weight or failure to gain weight, tobacco use, or African American or Native American race. The health care authority shall prioritize evidence-based practices for delivery of maternity support services. To the extent practicable, the health care authority shall develop a mechanism to increase federal funding for maternity support services by leveraging local public funding for those services.

(18) The authority shall submit reports to the governor and the legislature by September 15, 2023, and no later than September 15, 2024, that delineate the number of individuals in medicaid managed care, by carrier, age, gender, and eligibility category, receiving preventative services and vaccinations. The reports should include baseline and benchmark information from the previous two fiscal years and should be inclusive of, but not limited to, services recommended under the United States preventative services task force, advisory committee on immunization practices, early and periodic screening, diagnostic, and treatment (EPSDT) guidelines, and other relevant preventative and vaccination medicaid guidelines and requirements.

(19) Managed care contracts must incorporate accountability measures that monitor patient health and improved health outcomes, and shall include an expectation that each patient receive a wellness examination that documents the baseline health status and allows for monitoring of health improvements and outcome measures.

(20) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the authority to provide an adult dental benefit.

(21) The health care authority shall coordinate with the department of social and health services to provide referrals to the Washington health benefit exchange for clients that will be ineligible for medicaid.

(22) To facilitate a single point of entry across public and medical assistance programs, and to maximize the use of federal funding, the health care authority, the department of social and health services, and the health benefit exchange will coordinate efforts to expand HealthPlanfinder access to public assistance and medical eligibility staff. The health care authority shall complete medicaid applications in the HealthPlanfinder for households receiving or applying for medical assistance benefits.

(23) $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $180,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to continue operation by a nonprofit organization of a toll-free hotline that assists families to learn about and enroll in the apple health for kids program.

(24) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall reimburse for primary care services provided by naturopathic physicians.

(25) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall continue to provide coverage for pregnant teens that qualify under existing pregnancy medical programs, but whose eligibility for pregnancy related services would otherwise end due to the application of the new modified adjusted gross income eligibility standard.

(26) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section to remove the mental health visit limit and to provide the shingles vaccine and screening, brief intervention, and referral to treatment benefits that are available in the medicaid alternative benefit plan in the classic medicaid benefit plan.

(27) The authority shall use revenue appropriated from the dedicated cannabis account for contracts with community health centers under RCW 69.50.540 in lieu of general fund—state payments to community health centers for services provided to medical assistance clients, and it is the intent of the legislature that this policy will be continued in subsequent fiscal biennia.

(28) Beginning no later than July 1, 2018, for any service eligible under the medicaid state plan for encounter payments, managed care organizations at the request of a rural health clinic shall pay the full published encounter rate directly to the clinic. At no time will a managed care organization be at risk for or have any right to the supplemental portion of the claim. Payments will be reconciled on at least an annual basis between the managed care organization and the authority, with final review and approval by the authority.

(29) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the authority to provide a medicaid equivalent adult dental benefit to clients enrolled in the medical care service program.

(30) During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, sufficient amounts are provided in this section for the authority to provide services identical to those services covered by the Washington state family planning waiver program as of August 2018 to individuals who:

(a) Are 19 years of age;

(b) Are at or below 260 percent of the federal poverty level as established in WAC 182-505-0100;

(c) Are not covered by other public or private insurance; and

(d) Need family planning services and are not currently covered by or eligible for another medical assistance program for family planning.

(((32)))(31)(a) The authority shall ensure that appropriate resources are dedicated to implementing the recommendations of the centers for medicare and medicaid services center for program integrity as provided to the authority in the January 2019 Washington focused program integrity review final report. Additionally, the authority shall:

(i) Work to ensure the efficient operations of the managed care plans, including but not limited to, a deconflicting process for audits with and among the managed care plans and the medicaid fraud division at the attorney general's office, to ensure the authority staff perform central audits of cases that appear across multiple managed care plans, versus the audits performed by the individual managed care plans or the fraud division;

(ii) Remain accountable for operating in an effective and efficient manner, including performing program integrity activities that ensure high value in the medical assistance program in general and in medicaid managed care specifically;

(iii) Work with its contracted actuary and the medical assistance expenditure forecast work group to develop methods and metrics related to managed care program integrity activity that shall be incorporated into annual rate setting; and

(iv) Work with the medical assistance expenditure forecast work group to ensure the results of program integrity activity are incorporated into the rate setting process in a transparent, timely, measurable, quantifiable manner.

(b) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $100,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to consider, as part of its program integrity activities, whether it is providing economical, efficient, and quality prescription drug services through its administrative services model and the quantifiable cost and benefit of this service delivery method. The authority must establish an annual reporting requirement for all covered entities participating in the 340B drug pricing program that receive medicaid funds under this section; and the authority shall provide at an aggregate level, broken down by covered entities defined by 42 U.S.C. §256b(a)(4)(A)-(O), the following minimum information to the governor and fiscal committees of the legislature no later than October 15, 2023:

(i) The cost and benefits of providing these prescription drug benefits through a carved-out fee-for-service benefit, both total cost and net of rebates;

(ii) The cost and benefits of providing these prescription drug benefits through a carved-in managed care benefit, both total cost and net of rebates;

(iii) The cost and benefits of providing these prescription drug benefits through the administrative services model, both total and net of rebates;

(iv) The community benefit attributable to 340B providers as a result of the administrative services or carved-in model as compared to each other and as compared to the carved-out model; and

(v) The federal financial participation provided to the state under each of these models.

(c) The authority shall submit a report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by October 1, 2023, that includes, but is not limited to:

(i) Specific, quantified actions that have been taken, to date, related to the recommendations of the centers for medicare and medicaid services center for program integrity as provided to the authority in the January 2019 Washington focused program integrity review final report;

(ii) Specific, quantified information regarding the work done with its contracted actuary and the medical assistance expenditure forecast expenditure work group to develop methods and metrics related to managed care program integrity activity that shall be incorporated into annual rate setting;

(iii) Specific, quantified information regarding the work done with the medical assistance expenditure forecast work group to ensure the results of program integrity activity are incorporated into the rate setting process in a transparent, timely, measurable, quantifiable manner;

(iv) Accounting by fiscal year, medicaid eligibility group, and service beginning with state fiscal year 2020 to include all program integrity recoveries attributable to the authority, including how these recoveries are categorized, to which year they are reported, how these recoveries are applied against legislative savings requirements, and what recoveries are attributable to the office of the attorney general's medicaid fraud control division and how these recoveries are considered when reporting program integrity activity and determining managed care rates; and

(v) Information detailing when the agency acquired a new fraud and abuse detection system and to what extent this system is being utilized.

(((33)))(32)(a) The authority shall not enter into any future value-based arrangements with federally qualified health centers or rural health clinics prior to receiving approval from the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature.

(b) The authority shall not modify the reconciliation process with federally qualified health centers or rural health clinics without notification to and the opportunity to comment from the office of financial management.

(c) The authority shall require all managed care organizations to provide information to the authority to account for all payments to rural health clinics and federally qualified health centers to include how payments are made, including any additional payments and whether there is a sub-capitation arrangement or value-based purchasing arrangement.

(d) Beginning with fiscal year 2021 and for each subsequent year thereafter, the authority shall reconcile on an annual basis with rural health clinics and federally qualified health centers.

(e) Beginning with fiscal year 2021 and for each subsequent year thereafter, the authority shall properly accrue for any anticipated reconciliations with rural health clinics and federally qualified health centers during the fiscal year close process following generally accepted accounting practices.

(((34)))(33) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority is to include allergen control bed and pillow covers as part of the durable medical equipment benefit for children with an asthma diagnosis enrolled in medical assistance programs.

(((35) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall reimburse for maternity services provided by doulas.

(36)))(34) $23,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $324,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $469,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the reimbursement of services provided by doulas for apple health clients consistent with utilization and uptake assumptions anticipated by the authority in its report to the legislature on December 1, 2020. The centers for medicare and medicaid services must approve a state plan amendment to reimburse for doula services prior to the implementation of this policy.

(35) Sufficient funds are provided in this section for the authority to extend continuous eligibility for apple health to children ages zero to six with income at or below 215 percent of the federal poverty level. The centers for medicare and medicaid services must approve the 1115 medicaid waiver prior to the implementation of this policy.

(((37)))(36) Sufficient funds are provided to continue reimbursing dental health aid therapists for services performed in tribal facilities for medicaid clients. The authority must leverage any federal funding that may become available as a result of appeal decisions from the centers for medicare and medicaid services or the United States court of appeals for the ninth circuit.

(((38)))(37) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall implement the requirements of RCW 74.09.830 (postpartum health care) and the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2, in extending health care coverage during the postpartum period. The authority shall make every effort to expedite and complete eligibility determinations for individuals who are likely eligible to receive health care coverage under Title XIX or Title XXI of the federal social security act to ensure the state is receiving maximum federal match. This includes, but is not limited to, working with managed care organizations to provide continuous outreach in various modalities until the individual's eligibility determination is completed. Beginning June 1, 2022, the authority must submit quarterly reports to the caseload forecast work group on the number of individuals who are likely eligible to receive health care coverage under Title XIX or Title XXI of the federal social security act but are waiting for the authority to complete eligibility determination, the number of individuals who were likely eligible but are now receiving health care coverage with the maximum federal match under Title XIX or Title XXI of the federal social security act, and outreach activities including the work with managed care organizations.

(((39)))(38) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the perinatal support warm line to provide peer support, resources, and referrals to new and expectant parents and people in the emotional transition to parenthood experiencing, or at risk of, postpartum depression or other mental health issues.

(((40)))(39) Sufficient funding is provided to remove the asset test from the medicare savings program review process.

(((41)))(40) Sufficient funding is provided to eliminate the mid-certification review process for the aged, blind, or disabled and housing and essential needs referral programs.

(((42)))(41) $403,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $1,185,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for an adult acupuncture benefit beginning January 1, 2025.

(((43)))(42) $581,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $1,706,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for an adult chiropractic benefit beginning January 1, 2025.

(((44)))(43)(a) $4,109,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,055,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to establish a two-year grant program for reimbursement for services to patients up to age 18 provided by community health workers in primary care clinics whose patients are significantly comprised of pediatric patients enrolled in medical assistance under chapter 74.09 RCW beginning January 1, 2023. Community health workers funded under this subsection may provide outreach, informal counseling, and social supports for health-related social needs. The authority shall seek a state plan amendment or federal demonstration waiver should they determine these services are eligible for federal matching funds. Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the authority will provide an initial report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by January 1, 2024, and a final report by January 1, 2025. The report shall include, but not be limited to, the quantitative impacts of the grant program, how many community health workers are participating in the grant program, how many clinics these community health workers represent, how many clients are being served, and evaluation of any measurable health outcomes identified in the planning period prior to January 2023.

(b) In collaboration with key stakeholders including pediatric primary care clinics and medicaid managed care organizations, the authority shall explore longer term, sustainable reimbursement options for the integration of community health workers in primary care to address the health-related social needs of families, including approaches to incorporate federal funding.

(((45)))(44) $1,635,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,024,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,765,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a technology solution for an authoritative client identifier, or master person index, for state programs within the health and human services coalition to uniformly identify clients across multiple service delivery systems. The coalition will clearly identify all state programs impacted by and all fund sources used in development and implementation of this project. This subsection is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(((46)))(45)(a) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the authority to provide coverage for all federal food and drug administration-approved HIV antiviral drugs without prior authorization. This coverage must be provided to apple health clients enrolled in both fee-for-service and managed care programs.

(b) Beginning July 1, 2023, upon initiation or renewal of a contract with the authority to administer a medicaid managed care plan, a managed care health care system shall provide coverage without prior authorization for all federal food and drug administration-approved HIV antiviral drugs.

(c) By December 1, 2023, and December 1, 2024, the authority must submit to the fiscal committees of the legislature the projected and actual expenditures and percentage of medicaid clients who switch to a new drug class without prior authorization as described in (a) and (b) of this subsection.

(((47)))(46) The authority shall consider evidence-based recommendations from the Oregon health evidence review commission when making coverage decisions for the treatment of pediatric autoimmune neuropsychiatric disorders associated with streptococcal infections and pediatric acute-onset neuropsychiatric syndrome.

(((48)))(47) $2,120,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,120,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $9,012,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase advanced life support code A0426 by 64 percent, basic life support base rates for nonemergency ambulance transports code A0428 by 80 percent, and mileage for both nonemergency and emergency ambulance transportation code A0425 by 35 percent, beginning July 1, 2023.

(((49)))(48) $2,047,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $3,390,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $5,135,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase reimbursement rates by 20 percent for applied behavior analysis codes 0362T and 0373T for individuals with complex behavioral health care needs; and by 15 percent for all other applied behavior analysis codes with the exception of Q3014, beginning January 1, 2024.

(((50)))(49) $280,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,992,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for modular replacement costs of the ProviderOne pharmacy point of sale system and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(((51)))(50) $709,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,410,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $4,075,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to maintain and increase access for behavioral health services through increased provider rates. The rate increases are effective January 1, 2024, and must be applied to the following codes for children and adults enrolled in the medicaid program: 90785, 90791, 90832, 90833, 90834, 90836, 90837, 90838, 90845, 90846, 90847, 90849, 90853, 96156, 96158, 96159, 96164, 96165, 96167, 96168, 96170, 96171, H0004, H0023, H0036, and H2015. The authority may use a substitute code in the event that any of the codes identified in this subsection are discontinued and replaced with an updated code covering the same service. Within the amounts provided in this subsection the authority must:

(a) Implement this rate increase in accordance with the process established in RCW 71.24.885 (medicaid rate increases);

(b) Raise the state fee-for-service rates for these codes by up to 7 percent, except that the state medicaid rate may not exceed the published medicare rate or an equivalent relative value unit rate if a published medicare rate is not available;

(c) Require in contracts with managed care organizations that, beginning January 2024, managed care organizations pay no lower than the fee-for-service rate for these codes, and adjust managed care capitation rates accordingly; and

(d) Not duplicate rate increases provided in subsection (((52)))(51) of this section.

(((52)))(51) $1,055,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $2,046,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to maintain and increase access for primary care services for medicaid-enrolled patients through increased provider rates beginning January 1, 2025. Within the amounts provided in this subsection the authority must:

(a) Increase the medical assistance rates for adult primary care services that are reimbursed solely at the existing medical assistance rates on a fee-for-service basis, as well as through managed care plans, by at least 2 percent above medical assistance rates in effect on January 1, 2023;

(b) Increase the medical assistance rates for pediatric primary care services that are reimbursed solely at the existing medical assistance rates on a fee-for-service basis, as well as through managed care plans, by at least 2 percent above medical assistance rates in effect on January 1, 2023;

(c) Increase the medical assistance rates for pediatric critical care, neonatal critical care, and neonatal intensive care services that are reimbursed solely at the existing medical assistance rates on a fee-for-service basis, as well as through managed care plans, by at least 2 percent above medical assistance rates in effect on January 1, 2023;

(d) Apply reimbursement rates required under this subsection to payment codes in a manner consistent with the temporary increase in medicaid reimbursement rates under federal rules and guidance in effect on January 1, 2014, implementing the patient protection and affordable care act, except that the authority may not require provider attestations;

(e) Pursue state plan amendments to require medicaid managed care organizations to increase rates under this subsection through adoption of a uniform percentage increase for network providers pursuant to 42 C.F.R. Sec. 438.6(c)(1)(iii)(B), as existing on January 1, 2023; and

(f) Not duplicate rate increases provided in subsection (((51)))(50) of this section.

(((53)))(52) The authority shall seek a waiver from the federal department of health and human services necessary to implement the requirements of RCW 74.09.670 (medical assistance benefits—incarcerated or committed persons—suspension). Additionally, the authority shall ((explore expanding))implement its waiver application for prerelease services ((from 30))up to 90 days; and provide the governor and fiscal committees of the legislature estimates of costs for implementation or maintenance of effort requirements of this expansion prior to entering into agreement with the centers for medicare and medicaid services.

(a) $124,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, $60,925,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation, and $60,785,000 of the general fund—private/local appropriation are provided solely for prerelease services including, but not limited to, case management, clinical consultations, medication assisted therapy, community health worker services, 30-day supply of medications, durable medical equipment, medications, laboratory services, and radiology services.

(b) The authority shall coordinate with the department of corrections for prison reentry implementation pursuant to the waiver terms. The authority will coordinate with tribes, other state agencies, and jail administrations as necessary to achieve the terms of the 1115 medicaid transformation waiver. The authority shall use its statutory reentry advisory work group and subgroups as necessary to coordinate with partners to achieve these goals.

(((54)))(53) Within the amounts appropriated in this section the authority in collaboration with UW Medicine shall explore funding options for clinical training programs including, but not limited to, family medical practice, psychiatric residencies, advanced registered nurse practitioners, and other primary care providers. Options should include, but not be limited to, shifting direct medicaid graduate medical education payments or indirect medicaid graduate medical education payments, or both, from rates to a standalone program. The authority in collaboration with UW Medicine shall submit a report outlining its findings to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature no later than December 1, 2023.

(((55)))(54) $143,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5263 (psilocybin). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(56)))(55) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5532 (small rural hospital payment). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(57)))(56) $56,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $111,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $166,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to increase pediatric palliative care rates to the equivalent medicare rates paid for hospice care in effect October 1, 2022, beginning January 1, 2024.

(((58)))(57) $598,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $591,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for work required of the authority as specified in RCW 41.05.840 (universal health care commission). Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(i) $216,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $216,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are for staff dedicated to contract procurement, meeting coordination, legislative reporting, federal application requirements, and administrative support;

(ii) $132,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are for additional staff dedicated to the work of the finance technical advisory committee; and

(iii) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are for consultant services, dedicated actuarial support, and economic modeling.

(((59)))(58) $2,395,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,395,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $10,178,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase air ambulance-fixed wing code A0430 by 189 percent, air ambulance-rotary wing code A0431 by 265 percent, fixed wing air mileage code A0435 by 57 percent, and rotary wing air mileage code A0436 by 68 percent, beginning July 1, 2023.

(((60)))(59) $37,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $73,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $218,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to increase the allowable number of periodontal treatments to up to four per 12 month period for apple health eligible adults, ages 21 and over, with a current diagnosis of diabetes, beginning January 1, 2024.

(((61)))(60)(a) $8,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 ((is))and $1,360,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for one-time bridge grants to hospitals in financial distress.

(b) To qualify for these grants, a hospital must:

(i) Be located in Washington;

(ii) Serve individuals enrolled in state and federal medical assistance programs;

(iii) Continue to maintain a medicaid population at similar utilization levels as in calendar year 2022;

(iv) Be necessary for an adequate provider network for the medicaid program;

(v) Demonstrate a plan for long-term financial sustainability; and

(vi) Meet one of the following criteria:

(A) Lack adequate cash-on-hand to remain financially solvent;

(B) Have experienced financial losses during hospital fiscal year 2022; or

(C) Be at risk of bankruptcy.

(c) Of the amounts appropriated in this subsection for fiscal year 2024, $4,000,000 must be distributed to a hospital that meets the qualifications in subsection (b) and is located on tribal land.

(d) Of the amounts appropriated in this subsection for fiscal year 2025, $1,360,000 must be distributed to a hospital that:

(i) Had fewer than 150 acute care licensed beds in fiscal year 2011;

(ii) Has a level III adult trauma service designation from the department of health as of January 1, 2014; and

(iii) Is owned and operated by the state or a political subdivision.

(((62)))(61)(a) Sufficient funds are provided in this section for an outpatient directed payment program.

(b) The authority shall:

(i) Maintain the program to support the state's access and other quality of care goals and to not increase general fund—state expenditures;

(ii) Seek approval from the centers for medicare and medicaid services to expand the medicaid outpatient directed payment program for hospital outpatient services provided to medicaid program managed care recipients by UW Medicine hospitals and, at their option, UW Medicine affiliated hospitals;

(iii) Direct managed care organizations to make payments to eligible providers at levels required to ensure enrollees have timely access to critical high-quality care as allowed under 42 C.F.R. 438.6(c); and

(iv) Increase medicaid payments for hospital outpatient services provided by UW Medicine hospitals and, at their option, UW Medicine affiliated hospitals to the average payment received from commercial payers.

(c) Any incremental costs incurred by the authority in the development, implementation, and maintenance of this program shall be the responsibility of the participating hospitals.

(d) Participating hospitals shall retain the full amount of payments provided under this program.

(((63)))(62)(a) No more than $200,661,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation and no more than $91,430,000 of the general fund—local appropriation may be expended for an inpatient directed payment program.

(b) The authority shall:

(i) Design the program to support the state's access and other quality of care goals and to not increase general fund—state expenditures;

(ii) Seek approval from the centers for medicare and medicaid services to create a medicaid inpatient directed payment program for hospital inpatient services provided to medicaid program managed care recipients by UW Medicine hospitals and, at their option, UW Medicine affiliated hospitals;

(iii) Upon approval, direct managed care organizations to make payments to eligible providers at levels required to ensure enrollees have timely access to critical high-quality care as allowed under 42 C.F.R. 438.6(c); and

(iv) Increase medicaid payments for hospital inpatient services provided by UW Medicine and, at their option, UW Medicine affiliated hospitals to the average payment received from commercial payers.

(c) Any incremental costs incurred by the authority in the development, implementation, and maintenance of this program shall be the responsibility of the participating hospitals.

(d) Participating hospitals shall retain the full amount of payments provided under this program.

(e) Participating hospitals will provide the local funds to fund the required nonfederal contribution.

(f) This program shall be effective as soon as administratively possible.

(((64)))(63) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall maintain and increase access for family planning services for patients seeking services through department of health sexual and reproductive health program family planning providers based on the rates in effect as of July 1, 2022.

(((65)))(64)(a) (($9,563,000))$5,063,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($12,727,000))$17,227,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $259,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to implement a ((five-site)) pilot program for difficult to discharge individuals as described in section ((135(12)))132(12) of this act.

(b) The authority shall work in collaboration with the contractor and task force identified in section ((135(12)))132(12) of this act to carry out the goals and objectives of the pilot program, including but not limited to:

(i) Providing enhanced care management and wraparound services that shall be provided by or delegated by managed care pilot participants, based on services currently provided by the Harborview medical center program;

(ii) Providing incentive payments to participating post acute care providers;

(iii) Developing home and community services assessment timeliness requirements for pilot participants in cooperation with the department of social and health services; and

(iv) Providing reimbursement for administrative support through Harborview medical center for the duration of the pilot project, including training and education to support pilot participants.

(c) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $44,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $42,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $259,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to provide staff support to the difficult to discharge task force described in section ((135(12)))132(12) of this act, including any associated ad hoc subgroups.

(((66)))(65)(a) Within the amounts appropriated in this section the authority, in consultation with the health and human services enterprise coalition, community-based organizations, health plans, accountable communities of health, and safety net providers, shall determine the cost and implementation impacts of a statewide community information exchange (CIE). A CIE platform must serve as a tool for addressing the social determinants of health, defined as nonclinical community and social factors such as housing, food security, transportation, financial strain, and interpersonal safety, that affect health, functioning, and quality-of-life outcomes.

(b) Prior to issuing a request for proposals or beginning this project, the authority must work with stakeholders in (a) of this subsection to determine which platforms already exist within the Washington public and private health care system to determine interoperability needs and fiscal impacts to both the state and impacted providers and organizations that will be using a single statewide community information exchange platform.

(c) The authority shall provide the office of financial management and fiscal committees of the legislature a proposal to leverage medicaid enterprise financing or other federal funds prior to beginning this project and shall not expend funds under a 1115 waiver or any other waiver without legislative authorization.

(d) ((This subsection))$4,817,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation and $4,817,000 of the general fund—private/local appropriation are provided solely for the authority to implement the community information exchange program. The technology solution chosen by the health care authority should be capable of interoperating with other state funded systems in Washington and should be able to electronically refer individuals to services using a closed-loop referral process. Funding for the community information exchange program is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(((67)))(66) $252,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $252,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for staff dedicated to data review, analysis, and management, and policy analysis in support of the health care cost transparency board as described in chapter 70.390 RCW.

(((68)))(67) $76,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $76,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, $152,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation, and $606,000 of the telebehavioral health access account—state appropriation are provided solely for additional staff support for the mental health referral service for children and teens.

(((69)))(68) $1,608,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,015,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $3,681,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a rate increase for the health homes program for fee-for-service enrollees, beginning July 1, 2023.

(((70)))(69) $295,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $307,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $123,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the first approach skills training program through the partnership access line.

(((71)))(70)(a) (($358,000))$362,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($358,000))$482,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and (($568,000))$895,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1357 (prior authorization) and the center for medicare and medicaid services' interoperability and prior authorization final rule (CMS-0057-F). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(b) The authority, in collaboration with managed care organizations, must provide a report to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature no later than December 1, 2023, outlining any challenges experienced by carriers in hiring sufficient numbers and types of staff to comply with the prior authorization response times required by Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1357 (prior authorization).

(((72)))(71) $9,369,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $22,611,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for an increase in medicaid reimbursement rates for professional services, beginning July 1, 2024, as follows:

(a) Service categories including diagnostics, intense outpatient, opioid treatment programs, emergency room, inpatient and outpatient surgery, inpatient visits, low-level behavioral health, office administered drugs, and other physician services are increased up to 50 percent of medicare rates.

(b) Service categories including office and home visits and consults are increased up to 65 percent of medicare rates.

(c) Service categories including maternity services are increased up to 100 percent of medicare rates.

(((73) $21,606,000 of the statewide 988 behavioral health crisis response line account—state appropriation and $2,946,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the 988 technology platform implementation project. These amounts are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act and any requirements as established in Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1134 (988 system).

(74)))(72) $11,624,000 of the statewide 988 behavioral health crisis response line account—state appropriation and $1,151,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the 988 technology platform implementation project as described in RCW 71.24.890 (5) and (6). These amounts are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements provided in section 701 of this act and any requirements as established in Senate Bill No. 6308 (extending timelines for implementation of the 988 system). The authority must actively collaborate with consolidated technology services and the department of health so that the statewide 988 technology solutions will be coordinated and interoperable.

(73) $969,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,938,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $3,024,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority, beginning January 1, 2024, to increase the children's dental rate for procedure code D1120 by at least 40 percent above the medical assistance fee-for-service rate in effect on January 1, 2023.

(((75)))(74) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for a grant to the nonprofit foundation managing the Washington patient safety coalition to support the communication and resolution programs certification program to improve outcomes for patients by providing in-depth feedback to health care organizations.

(((76)))(75) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to continue a public-private partnership with a state-based oral health foundation to connect medicaid patients to dental services and reduce barriers to accessing care. The authority shall submit a progress report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2024.

(((77)))(76) $103,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $205,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $442,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase birth center facility fee reimbursement to $2,500 and home birth kit reimbursement to $500 for providers approved by the authority within the planned home births and births in birth centers program.

(((78)))(77) $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $133,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1435 (home care safety net assess.). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(79)))(78) $194,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,724,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $1,918,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority in coordination with the department of social and health services to develop and implement a Katie Beckett 1115 demonstration waiver. The authority shall limit enrollment to 1,000 clients during the waiver period. Based upon the experience developed during the waiver period, the authority shall make recommendations to the legislature for a future tax equity and fiscal responsibility act state plan option.

(((80)))(79) $1,089,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,231,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $2,657,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for kidney dialysis services for medicaid-enrolled patients through increased reimbursement rates beginning January 1, 2024. Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the authority must increase the medical assistance rates for revenue code 0821 billed with procedure code 90999 and revenue codes 0831, 0841, and 0851, when reimbursed on a fee-for-service basis or through managed care plans, by at least 30 percent above the fee-for-service composite rates in effect on January 1, 2023.

(((81)))(80) $1,360,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,252,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase the rates paid to rural hospitals that meet the criteria in (a) through (d) of this subsection. Payments for state and federal medical assistance programs for services provided by such a hospital, regardless of the beneficiary's managed care enrollment status, must be increased to 150 percent of the hospital's fee-for-service rates. The authority must discontinue this rate increase after June 30, 2024, and return to the payment levels and methodology for these hospitals that were in place as of January 1, 2018. Hospitals participating in the certified public expenditures program may not receive increased reimbursement for inpatient services. Hospitals qualifying for this rate increase must:

(a) Be certified by the centers for medicare and medicaid services as sole community hospitals as of January 1, 2014;

(b) Have had less than 150 acute care licensed beds in fiscal year 2011;

(c) Have a level III adult trauma service designation from the department of health as of January 1, 2014; and

(d) Be owned and operated by the state or a political subdivision.

(((82)))(81) $55,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $110,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to contract with a medicaid managed care organization for continuous coverage beginning January 1, 2024, for individuals under age 26 that were enrolled in the unaccompanied refugee minor program as authorized by the office of refugee and immigrant assistance. There are no residency, social security number, or citizenship requirements to receive the continuous coverage as described in this subsection.

(((83)))(82)(a) (($45,696,000))$221,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $48,348,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 ((is))are provided solely for the authority, beginning July 1, 2024, to implement a program with coverage comparable to the amount, duration, and scope of care provided in the categorically needy medicaid program for adult individuals who:

(i) Have an immigration status making them ineligible for federal medicaid or federal subsidies through the health benefit exchange;

(ii) Are age 19 and older, including over age 65, and have countable income of up to 138 percent of the federal poverty level; and

(iii) Are not eligible for another full scope federally funded medical assistance program, including any expansion of medicaid coverage for deferred action for childhood arrivals recipients.

(b) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the authority shall use the same eligibility, enrollment, redetermination and renewal, and appeals procedures as categorically needy medicaid, except where flexibility is necessary to maintain privacy or minimize burden to applicants or enrollees.

(c) The authority in collaboration with the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, and community organizations must develop and implement an outreach and education campaign.

(d) The authority must provide the following information to the governor's office and appropriate committees of the legislature by February 1st and November 1st of each year:

(i) Actual and forecasted expenditures;

(ii) Actual and forecasted data from the caseload forecast council; and

(iii) The availability and impact of any federal program or proposed rule that expands access to health care for the population described in this subsection, such as the expansion of medicaid coverage for deferred action for childhood arrivals recipients.

(e) The amount provided in this subsection is the maximum amount allowable for the purposes of this program.

(((84)))(83)(a) $604,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,528,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $3,132,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to increase the eligibility threshold for the qualified medicare beneficiary program to up to 110 percent of the federal poverty level.

(b) The authority shall seek to maximize the availability of the qualified individual program through the centers for medicare and medicaid services.

(c) The authority may adopt any rules necessary to administer this subsection. Nothing in this subsection limits the authority's existing rule-making authority related to medicare savings programs.

(((85)))(84) $361,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $766,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $2,093,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the costs of, and pursuant to the conditions prescribed for, implementing the rate increase directed in section 215(44) for children for whom base funding for community behavioral health services is provided within this section.

(85)(a) $1,301,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the health care cost transparency board.

(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the health care cost transparency board, in conjunction with the health care authority, to study:

(i) Regulatory approaches to encouraging compliance with the health care cost growth benchmark established under chapter 70.390 RCW; and

(ii) Best practices from other states regarding the infrastructure of state health care cost growth programs, including the scope, financing, staffing, and agency structure of such programs.

(c) The board may conduct all or part of the study through the authority, by contract with a private entity, or by arrangement with another state agency conducting related work.

(d) The study, as well as any recommendations for changes to the health care cost transparency board arising from the study, must be submitted by the board as part of the annual report required under RCW 70.390.070, no later than December 1, 2024.

(86) The authority must enter into an interagency agreement with consolidated technology services for the federal funding authority for the electronic health records statewide solution given the authority is the single state agency responsible for reporting to the federal government on the application for and use of the federal funding.

(87) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall make administrative and system changes in anticipation of receiving federal authority to provide continuous eligibility for children ages zero to six covered though the apple health children's health insurance program. The centers for medicare and medicaid services must approve the section 1115 medicaid waiver prior to the implementation of this policy.

(88)(a) No more than $42,809,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation and no more than $13,314,000 of the general fund—local appropriation may be expended for a medicaid managed care multidisciplinary graduate medical education direct payment program.

(b) Participating hospitals are:

(i) University of Washington medical center, a state-owned and operated teaching hospital; and

(ii) Harborview medical center, a state-operated teaching hospital.

(c) The authority shall:

(i) Design the program to support the state's access and other quality of care goals and to not increase general fund—state expenditures;

(ii) Seek approval from the centers for medicare and medicaid services to create a medicaid managed care direct payment program for hospital multidisciplinary graduate medical education program for state-owned and state-operated teaching hospitals;

(iii) Reimburse participating hospitals for the medicaid managed care program's share of the unfunded costs incurred in providing graduate medical education training; and

(iv) Make payments directly to participating hospitals.

(d) Participating hospitals shall continue to be paid for inpatient and outpatient services provided to fee-for-service clients according to fee-for-service policies and rates, including payments under the certified public expenditure program.

(e) Payments shall be additional and separate from any graduate medical education funding included in managed care capitation payments.

(f) The authority shall calculate the medicaid managed care graduate medical education direct payments using cost and utilization data from the participating hospital's most recently filed medicare cost report to identify the participating hospital's total graduate medical education cost.

(g) Total allowable graduate medical education costs shall be calculated using medicare methodologies and must:

(i) Exclude medicare full-time equivalent and per resident amount limits;

(ii) Include indirect medical education costs related to both outpatient and inpatient services; and

(iii) Include other reimbursable training costs incurred by participating hospitals.

(h) The authority shall:

(i) Use ProviderOne as the primary source for fee-for-service and managed care claims and encounter data;

(ii) Calculate the medicaid managed care program's share of the total allowable graduate medical education cost as the participating hospital's total allowable graduate medical education cost, as derived from the medicare cost report, times the total managed care charges divided by total medicaid fee-for-service charges plus managed care charges, as derived from ProviderOne data;

(iii) Reduce the medicaid managed care graduate medical education direct payments by the fee-for-service equivalent graduate medical education payment included in managed care organization payments by applying the fee-for-service APR-DRG and EAPG conversion factors and rate adjustments applicable to the same year as the medicare cost report used to calculate allowable graduate medical education costs; and

(iv) Calculate the medicaid managed care graduate medical education direct payments as graduate medical education allowable cost less fee-for-service equivalent graduate medical education payment for managed care services.

(i) Medicaid managed care graduate medical education direct payments must be calculated prior to the beginning of the payment year.

(j) Medicaid managed care graduate medical education direct payments must be made quarterly.

(k) Any incremental costs incurred by the authority in the development, implementation, and maintenance of this program shall be the responsibility of the participating hospitals up to an amount not to exceed $150,000 per year.

(l) Participating hospitals shall retain the full amount of payments provided under this program.

(m) Payments received by hospitals and nonhospital participants in this program shall be in addition to all other payments received and shall not be used to supplant payments received through other programs.

(n) Participating hospitals shall provide the local funds to fund the required nonfederal contribution through intergovernmental transfer.

(o) The authority shall amend its current interagency agreement for funding and administration of similar programs to include the medicaid managed care graduate medical education direct payment program.

(p) This program shall be effective as soon as administratively possible.

(89)(a) $69,957,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $111,234,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $290,634,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for apple health managed care medical assistance and for the authority to maintain asymmetrical risk sharing corridors and requirements in their managed care contracts for managed care plan years 2024 and 2025. The authority must not change these requirements without first providing notice to the governor and fiscal committees of the legislature detailing anticipated and potential fiscal impacts, unless required by the centers for medicare and medicaid services.

(b) The authority must conduct annual retrospective rate acuity analyses to ensure that managed care rates have been set using appropriate acuity assumptions. Adjustments must be made as appropriate.

(c) For managed care plan year 2024 only, the authority must conduct a midyear acuity review to ensure that managed care rates for plan year 2024 were set using appropriate acuity assumptions and make any adjustments as appropriate reflective of the unique challenges of eligibility redeterminations and posteligibility review after the end of the public health emergency.

(d) The authority must provide information about any potential changes to rates or acuity assumptions to the medicaid expenditure forecast work group at the same time or before providing this information to managed care organizations.

(e) The authority must update managed care contracts as appropriate.

(90) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $250,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority, in cooperation with the department of social and health services, to study the feasibility and cost of implementing a point of contact for individuals diagnosed with a rare disease to increase access and reduce barriers in navigating programs, services, and resources offered by both agencies.

(91) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the authority to provide a report to the fiscal committees of the legislature by January 6, 2025, that details options for fully funding health care coverage for all individuals estimated to be eligible for the program described in subsection (82) of this section. The report must include data on how many residents are eligible for this program and cost estimates for providing full coverage to all eligible individuals.

(92)(a) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $100,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to contract with an external organization for participatory and equity-focused engagement with doulas and doula partners across the state of Washington. This organization must work in collaboration with community partners who advance equitable access to improve perinatal outcomes and care through holistic services for multiracial communities.

(b) The external organization will be responsible for:

(i) Creating a design and implementation plan for a statewide doula hub and referral system; and

(ii) Drafting a report, in partnership with the authority, summarizing the design and implementation plan, outlining ongoing funding required to support the doula workforce and clients accessing doula services through apple health, and providing any recommendations for both the doula hub and referral system.

(c) The report will include, but not be limited to, prioritized recommendations on how to:

(i) Provide statewide professional and workforce development support for birth doulas;

(ii) Increase statewide access to doula services for apple health birthing people;

(iii) Assist doulas with department of health credentialing requirements;

(iv) Assist doulas with the medicaid provider enrollment process, including, but not limited to, support with:

(A) Provider enrollment with the authority;

(B) Contracting with medicaid managed care organizations;

(C) Provider billing and claims submission processes;

(D) Provider payment requirements; and

(E) Eligibility support within ProviderOne; and

(v) Establish communications with birthing people, families, birth workers, and healthcare providers who are seeking to connect with state-certified and medicaid-enrolled birth doulas through a statewide directory or referral system.

(d) The report required in (c) of this subsection is due to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature no later than June 30, 2025.

(93) $2,548,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $2,964,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5580 (maternal health outcomes). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(94)(a) $7,000,000 of the family medicine workforce development account—state appropriation and $12,834,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority, in collaboration with the family medicine residency network and UW medicine, to establish a medicaid direct payment program to supplement family medicine provider graduate medical education funding in Washington state.

(b) The medicaid family medicine graduate medical education direct payment program shall:

(i) Support graduate medical education training;

(ii) Improve access to quality healthcare services;

(iii) Improve the state's ability to ensure that medicaid graduate medical education funding supports the state's workforce development goals; and

(iv) Focus on improving underserved populations' and regions' access to health care.

(c) The medicaid family medicine graduate medical education direct payment program participants shall include teaching sites that pay resident full-time equivalent costs that are eligible for federal financial participation.

(d) The authority must seek any necessary state plan amendments or waivers from the centers for medicare and medicaid services that are necessary to implement this program and receive federal financial participation at the earliest possible date, but no later than January 1, 2025.

(e) Any incremental costs incurred by the authority in the development, implementation, and maintenance of this program shall be the responsibility of the medicaid family medicine graduate medical education direct payment program up to an amount not to exceed $100,000 per year.

(f) The family medicine family education advisory board created in RCW 70.112.080 will have administrative oversight, including the amount and methodologies used to distribute funds deposited within the family medicine workforce development account, subject to the conditions described in this subsection (94).

(g) Of the amounts provided in this section, $150,000 of the family medicine workforce development account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided for consultant assistance, including program design and a payment model to estimate the effect of family medicine family education advisory board allocation decisions on all family medicine residency network participants.

(h) Annual allocations from the family medicine workforce development account—state appropriation will be determined by the family medicine family education advisory board.

(i) Participants in the medicaid family medicine graduate medical education direct payment program shall retain the full amount of payments provided under this program.

(j) Payments received by participants in the medicaid family medicine graduate medical education direct payment program shall be in addition to all other payments received and shall not be used to supplant payments received through other programs.

(95)(a) $481,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $489,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to conduct internal assessment of current staffing needs compared to current vacancies. The assessment shall include, but not be limited to:

(i) Reconciliation of current full time equivalent positions as appropriated through the legislative process, agency financial reporting system allotments, and vacancies;

(ii) Comparison of current needs in relation to current vacancies; and

(iii) Analysis of costs and benefits of reallocating positions, as appropriate, to meet immediate staffing needs, especially if positions have remained historically, or long-term vacant.

(b) The authority shall report its findings to the governor and fiscal committees of the legislature no later than December 31, 2024.

(96)(a) $26,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $51,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $172,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for program integrity managed care oversight, accountability, and savings. Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the authority shall:

(i) Report on the status of its fraud, abuse, and detection system, including when it was certified by the centers for medicare and medicaid services, and how it is currently being used to detect medicaid fraud, waste, and abuse;

(ii) Provide a quantifiable accounting, as required by the legislature, beginning with fiscal year 2020, to include all program integrity recoveries attributable to the authority, including how these recoveries are categorized, to which year they are reported, by medicaid eligibility group and service, how these recoveries are applied against legislative savings requirements, what recoveries are attributable to the office of the attorney general's medicaid fraud control division, and how these recoveries are considered when reporting program integrity activity and determining managed care rates; and

(iii) Employ statistically and algorithmically appropriate measures for reviewing managed care encounter data for fraud, waste, and abuse.

(b) The authority shall report its findings to the governor and fiscal committees of the legislature no later than December 31, 2024, and the legislature intends to require the authority to report its findings to the governor and fiscal committees of the legislature by December 31st each year thereafter.

(97)(a) $3,232,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $7,827,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to increase inpatient per diem rates for inpatient prospective payment system hospitals providing services under the substance using pregnant people program beginning July 1, 2024. Hospitals participating in the certified public expenditures program or the sole community hospital program may not receive increased reimbursement under this subsection.

(b) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority will review the rates for the substance using pregnant person program to determine if rebasing is appropriate and what rates would be required to sustain the program at current utilization levels.

(c) If the authority determines that rates require rebasing for this program, the authority will submit a request to the legislature through its normal budget process.

(98) $314,000 of the long-term services and supports trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 6072 (LTSS commission recs.). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(99) The authority and department of social and health services must collaborate in the identification and evaluation of strategies to obtain federal matching funding opportunities, specifically focusing on innovative medicaid framework adjustments and the consideration of necessary state plan amendments for the treatment facility described in section 203(1)(nn) of this act.

(100) $2,854,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $4,208,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to increase the nonemergency medical transportation broker administrative rate to ensure access to health care services for medicaid patients.

Sec. 212. 2023 c 475 s 212 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY—PUBLIC EMPLOYEES' BENEFITS BOARD AND EMPLOYEE BENEFITS PROGRAM

State Health Care Authority Administrative Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
(($44,102,000))

$44,929,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($44,102,000))

$44,929,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Any savings from reduced claims costs must be reserved for funding employee benefits during future fiscal biennia and may not be used for administrative expenses. The health care authority shall deposit any moneys received on behalf of the uniform medical plan resulting from rebates on prescription drugs, audits of hospitals, subrogation payments, or any other moneys received as a result of prior uniform medical plan claims payments, in the public employees' and retirees' insurance account to be used for insurance benefits.

(2) Any changes to benefits must be approved by the public employees' benefits board. The board shall not make any changes to benefits without considering a comprehensive analysis of the cost of those changes, and shall not increase benefits unless offsetting cost reductions from other benefit revisions are sufficient to fund the changes. The board shall not make any change in retiree eligibility criteria that reestablishes eligibility for enrollment in retiree benefits.

(3) Except as may be provided in a health care bargaining agreement pursuant to RCW 41.80.020, to provide benefits within the level of funding provided in part IX of this bill, the public employees' benefits board shall require: Employee premium copayments, increases increase in point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of managed competition, or make other changes to benefits consistent with RCW 41.05.065.

(4) The board shall collect a surcharge payment of not less than $25 dollars per month from members who use tobacco products, and a surcharge payment of not less than $50 per month from members who cover a spouse or domestic partner where the spouse or domestic partner has chosen not to enroll in another employer-based group health insurance that has benefits and premiums with an actuarial value of not less than 95 percent of the actuarial value of the public employees' benefits board plan with the largest enrollment. The surcharge payments shall be collected in addition to the member premium payment.

(5) $78,000 of the health care authority administrative account—state appropriation is provided solely for administrative costs associated with extending retiree coverage under Substitute House Bill No. 1804 (PEBB/subdivision retirees). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(6) $500,000 of the state health care authority administrative account—state appropriation is provided solely for consultation with retirees, including conducting listening sessions and facilitating public forums to gather feedback about retiree needs. By December 1, 2023, the authority must report to the legislature with its findings, including an analysis of government self-insured plans with benefits that are equal to or richer, and with more affordable premiums, than uniform medical plan classic medicare. The legislature intends that the results of stakeholder engagements will be used to inform future health care plan selections.

(7) During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the health care authority, in consultation with the office of financial management, shall review consolidating the administrative sections of the operating budget for the public employees' and school employees' benefits boards. Any change in budget structure must not result in changes to board or benefit policies. A budget structure change developed under this subsection may be included in the 2024 supplemental or the 2025-2027 biennial governor's budget submittal without being subject to the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee approval under RCW 43.88.030(7).

(8)(a) $250,000 of the state health care authority administrative account—state appropriation is provided solely for costs associated with the report in this subsection. The legislature intends to consolidate the public employees' benefits board (PEBB) and school employees' benefits board (SEBB) programs. By December 1, 2024, the authority must report to the legislature the necessary statutory and program changes required to achieve consolidation of:

(i) The PEBB and SEBB into a single governing board;

(ii) The current risk pools described in RCW 41.05.022 (2) and (3);

(iii) The existing eligibility provisions of the PEBB and SEBB programs; and

(iv) Benefit offerings.

(b) The report should describe the timeline for consolidation, assuming partial implementation as early as January 1, 2026, and full implementation no later than January 1, 2027. The report should also include estimates of any administrative savings that can be realized by this consolidation.

(9) By December 1, 2024, the authority shall submit a report to the legislature describing options, and a recommendation, for possible future coverage in the uniform medical plan for food and drug administration approved glucagon-like peptide 1 agonists for the treatment of obesity and weight loss.

Sec. 213. 2023 c 475 s 213 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY—SCHOOL EMPLOYEES' BENEFITS BOARD

School Employees' Insurance Administrative Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
(($33,743,000))

$33,723,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($33,743,000))

$33,723,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $324,000 of the school employees' insurance administrative account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5275 (SEBB benefit access). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(2) By December 1, 2024, the authority shall submit a report to the legislature describing options, and a recommendation, for possible future coverage in the uniform medical plan for food and drug administration approved glucagon-like peptide 1 agonists for the treatment of obesity and weight loss.

Sec. 214. 2023 c 475 s 214 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY—HEALTH BENEFIT EXCHANGE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($8,242,000))

$9,671,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($6,472,000))

$7,156,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($61,983,000))

$67,396,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$350,000

Health Benefit Exchange Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($76,214,000))

$83,528,000

State Health Care Affordability Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($110,000,000))

$125,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($263,261,000))

$293,101,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The receipt and use of medicaid funds provided to the health benefit exchange from the health care authority are subject to compliance with state and federal regulations and policies governing the Washington apple health programs, including timely and proper application, eligibility, and enrollment procedures.

(2)(a) By July 15th, October 15th, and January 15th of each year, the authority shall make a payment of ((one-half))30 percent of the general fund—state appropriation, ((one-half))30 percent of the health benefit exchange account—state appropriation, and ((one-half))30 percent of the health care affordability account—state appropriation to the exchange. By April 15th of each year, the authority shall make a payment of 10 percent of the general fund—state appropriation, 10 percent of the health benefit exchange account—state appropriation, and 10 percent of the health care affordability account—state appropriation to the exchange.

(b) The exchange shall monitor actual to projected revenues and make necessary adjustments in expenditures or carrier assessments to ensure expenditures do not exceed actual revenues.

(c) Payments made from general fund—state appropriation and health benefit exchange account—state appropriation shall be available for expenditure for no longer than the period of the appropriation from which it was made. When the actual cost of materials and services have been fully determined, and in no event later than the lapsing of the appropriation, any unexpended balance of the payment shall be returned to the authority for credit to the fund or account from which it was made, and under no condition shall expenditures exceed actual revenue.

(3) $1,939,000 of the health benefit exchange account—state appropriation and $6,189,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the modernizing healthplanfinder project. These amounts are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(4)(a) (($100,000,000))$115,000,000 of the state health care affordability account—state appropriation is provided solely for the exchange to administer a premium assistance program, beginning for plan year 2023, as established in RCW 43.71.110. An individual is eligible for the premium assistance provided if the individual: (i) Has income up to 250 percent of the federal poverty level; and (ii) meets other eligibility criteria as established in RCW 43.71.110(4)(a).

(b) $260,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for a study, in consultation with the health care authority and office of the insurance commissioner, of how the exchange's current section 1332 waiver could be amended to generate federal pass-through funding to support the affordability programs established in RCW 43.71.110. The actuarial study must focus on methods that could be most readily leveraged in Washington, considering those being used in other public option programs. Study findings must be reported to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2023.

(5) $10,000,000 of the state health care affordability account—state appropriation is provided solely to provide premium assistance for customers ineligible for federal premium tax credits who meet the eligibility criteria established in subsection (4)(a) of this section, and is contingent upon continued approval of the applicable waiver described in RCW 43.71.120.

(6) $102,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $865,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation, and $123,000 of the health benefit exchange account—state appropriation are provided solely for a technology solution for an authoritative client identifier, or master person index, in Healthplanfinder to support the health and human services coalition in uniformly identifying clients across multiple state service delivery systems. These amounts are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(7) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the exchange, in collaboration with the department of social and health services and the home training network as described in RCW 70.128.305, to provide educational resources and trainings to help connect owners and employees of adult family homes to health care coverage.

(8) $299,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $299,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $202,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for pass-through funding in the annual amount of $100,000 for each lead navigator organization in the four regions with the highest concentration of citizens of the compact of free association (COFA) to:

(a) Support a staff position within the COFA community to provide enrollment assistance to the COFA community beyond the scope of the current COFA program; and

(b) Support COFA community-led outreach and enrollment activities.

(9)(a) $300,000 of the health benefit exchange account—state appropriation is provided solely for staff and consultants to complete a study of options and recommendations for the state to ensure continuous health care coverage through qualified health plans for medicaid beneficiaries losing medicaid coverage through Washington Healthplanfinder. In coordination with the health care authority and department of social and health services, the study must include, but not be limited to:

(i) An analysis of transitional solutions used in other states to continue coverage for individuals losing medicaid eligibility;

(ii) In coordination with the department of social and health services' research and data analysis division, an analysis of monthly enrollment rates for persons who are determined no longer eligible for medicaid, including demographic and employment information, and those who enroll in qualified health plans, including demographic and employment information; and

(iii) A feasibility analysis of auto-enrolling clients that lose medicaid eligibility and are eligible for a no-premium qualified health plan through Washington Healthplanfinder.

(b) The study must be submitted to the office of financial management and appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2024.

Sec. 215. 2023 c 475 s 215 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY—COMMUNITY BEHAVIORAL HEALTH PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($1,015,063,000))

$1,026,580,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($1,097,193,000))

$1,192,461,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,853,321,000))

$3,073,066,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($38,826,000))

$38,904,000

Criminal Justice Treatment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$22,001,000

Problem Gambling Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,243,000))

$3,738,000

Dedicated Cannabis Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2024)
. . . .
$28,498,000

Dedicated Cannabis Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2025)
. . . .
(($28,501,000))

$28,251,000

Opioid Abatement Settlement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($54,415,000))

$79,820,000

Statewide 988 Behavioral Health Crisis Response Line

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($33,135,000))

$33,499,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($5,173,196,000))

$5,526,818,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) For the purposes of this section, "behavioral health entities" means managed care organizations and behavioral health administrative services organizations that reimburse providers for behavioral health services.

(2) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is provided for implementation of the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States District Court for the Western District of Washington, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP. In addition to amounts provided solely for implementation of the settlement agreement, class members must have access to supports and services funded throughout this section for which they meet eligibility and medical necessity requirements. The authority must include language in contracts that requires regional behavioral health entities to develop and implement plans for improving access to timely and appropriate treatment for individuals with behavioral health needs and current or prior criminal justice involvement who are eligible for services under these contracts.

(3)(a) $44,320,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $49,525,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $17,368,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to continue the phase-in of the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States District Court for the Western District of Washington, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP. The authority, in collaboration with the department of social and health services and the criminal justice training commission, must implement the provisions of the settlement agreement pursuant to the timeline and implementation plan provided for under the settlement agreement. This includes implementing provisions related to competency evaluations, competency restoration, crisis diversion and supports, education and training, and workforce development. Within these amounts, sufficient funding is provided to implement Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5440 (competency evaluations).

(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $5,108,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $6,341,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5440 (competency evaluations). Of these amounts, $186,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $186,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to increase compensation for staff in outpatient competency restoration programs pursuant to Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5440 (competency evaluations).

(4) $8,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 ((is))and $8,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to continue diversion grant programs funded through contempt fines pursuant to Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States District Court for the Western District of Washington, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP. The authority must consult with the plaintiffs and court monitor to determine, within the amounts provided, which of the programs will continue to receive funding through this appropriation. The programs shall use this funding to provide assessments, mental health treatment, substance use disorder treatment, case management, employment, and other social services. By December 1, 2023, the authority, in consultation with the plaintiffs and the court monitor, must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature which includes: Identification of the programs that receive funding through this subsection; a narrative description of each program model; the number of individuals being served by each program on a monthly basis; metrics or outcomes reported as part of the contracts; and recommendations related to further support of these programs in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium.

(5)(a) $12,359,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($12,359,000))$17,222,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and (($23,444,000))$24,349,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority and behavioral health entities to continue to contract for implementation of high-intensity programs for assertive community treatment (PACT) teams. In determining the proportion of medicaid and nonmedicaid funding provided to behavioral health entities with PACT teams, the authority shall consider the differences between behavioral health entities in the percentages of services and other costs associated with the teams that are not reimbursable under medicaid. The authority may allow behavioral health entities which have nonmedicaid reimbursable costs that are higher than the nonmedicaid allocation they receive under this section to supplement these funds with local dollars or funds received under subsection (7) of this section. The authority and behavioral health entities shall maintain consistency with all essential elements of the PACT evidence-based practice model in programs funded under this section. Sufficient funding is provided in this section for the authority to increase rates for PACT teams to the rates identified in the behavioral health comparison rate—phase II report.

(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $4,080,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the authority to distribute one-time stabilization funding to existing PACT teams to improve staff recruitment and retention and to cover general operating expenses to increase PACT capacity and utilization.

(6) $1,428,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $3,520,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation ((is))are provided solely for the authority to maintain a pilot project to incorporate peer bridging staff into behavioral health regional teams that provide transitional services to individuals returning to their communities.

(7) $144,519,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($163,088,000))$144,519,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for persons and services not covered by the medicaid program. To the extent possible, levels of behavioral health entity spending must be maintained in the following priority order: Crisis and commitment services; community inpatient services; and residential care services, including personal care and emergency housing assistance. These amounts must be distributed to behavioral health entities as follows:

(a) $108,803,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $124,713,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to contract with behavioral health administrative service organizations for behavioral health treatment services not covered under the medicaid program. Within these amounts, behavioral health administrative service organizations must provide a 15 percent rate increase to providers receiving state funds for nonmedicaid services under this section effective January 1, 2024.

(b) $35,716,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($38,375,000))$22,978,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to contract with medicaid managed care organizations for wraparound services to medicaid enrolled individuals that are not covered under the medicaid program. Within the amounts provided in this subsection:

(i) Medicaid managed care organizations must provide a 15 percent rate increase to providers receiving state funding for nonmedicaid services under this section effective January 1, 2024.

(ii) The authority shall assure that managed care organizations reimburse the department of social and health services, aging and long-term support administration for the general fund—state cost of individuals remaining on exceptional behavioral health personal care services for medicaid enrolled individuals who require these because of a psychiatric disability after the implementation of the community behavioral health support services—supportive supervision and oversight 1915(i) state plan amendment. Funding for the federal share of these services is separately appropriated to the department of social and health services.

(iii) Pursuant to RCW 41.56.029, during fiscal year 2024, the authority may work with the office of financial management to negotiate a tiered rate structure for behavioral health personal care services for adult family home providers serving medicaid enrollees. An agreement reached with the adult family home council must be submitted to the director of financial management by October 1, 2023, and certified as financially feasible in order to be considered for funding during the 2024 legislative session. Upon completion of bargaining, the authority shall coordinate with the department of social and health services to develop and submit to the centers for medicare and medicaid services an application to provide a 1915(i) state plan home and community-based services benefit. The application shall be developed to allow for the delivery of wraparound supportive behavioral health services for individuals with mental illnesses who also have a personal care need. The 1915(i) state plan shall be developed to standardize coverage and administration, improve the current benefit design, and clarify roles in administration of the behavioral health personal care services benefit.

(8)(a) $30,648,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $33,435,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to implement a tiered rate structure for supportive supervision and oversight in long-term care settings pursuant to a 1915(i) home and community based services state plan amendment and the collective bargaining agreement negotiated between the state and the adult family homes and set forth in part IX of this act. The authority may not implement a skills development and restoration benefit until funding is provided for that specific purpose.

(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $30,648,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $33,435,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided to implement tiered rates for supportive supervision and oversight in adult family home settings included in the collective bargaining agreement negotiated between the state and the adult family homes and set forth in part IX of this act.

(c) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $5,611,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $6,128,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided for supportive supervision and oversight tiered rates in other long-term care settings, including assisted living and enhanced adult residential care facilities.

(d) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $376,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $376,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided for administrative activities related to implementing the 1915(i) state plan amendment, including establishing a billing clearinghouse for these services.

(9) The authority is authorized to continue to contract directly, rather than through contracts with behavioral health entities for children's long-term inpatient facility services.

(((9)))(10) $1,204,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,204,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to reimburse Pierce and Spokane counties for the cost of conducting 180-day commitment hearings at the state psychiatric hospitals.

(11) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely to reimburse King county for involuntary treatment act court costs.

(((10)))(12) Behavioral health entities may use local funds to earn additional federal medicaid match, provided the locally matched rate does not exceed the upper-bound of their federally allowable rate range, and provided that the enhanced funding is used only to provide medicaid state plan or waiver services to medicaid clients. Additionally, behavioral health entities may use a portion of the state funds allocated in accordance with subsection (7) of this section to earn additional medicaid match, but only to the extent that the application of such funds to medicaid services does not diminish the level of crisis and commitment, community inpatient, residential care, and outpatient services presently available to persons not eligible for medicaid.

(((11)))(13) $2,291,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,291,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for mental health services for mentally ill offenders while confined in a county or city jail and for facilitating access to programs that offer mental health services upon release from confinement. The authority must collect information from the behavioral health entities on their plan for using these funds, the numbers of individuals served, and the types of services provided.

(((12)))(14) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is provided for the authority to develop and phase in intensive mental health services for high needs youth consistent with the settlement agreement in T.R. v. Dreyfus and Porter.

(((13)))(15)(a) The authority must establish minimum and maximum funding levels for all reserves allowed under behavioral health administrative service organization contracts and include contract language that clearly states the requirements and limitations. The reserve levels must be informed by the types of risk carried by behavioral health administrative service organizations for mandatory services and also consider reasonable levels of operating reserves. The authority must monitor and ensure that behavioral health administrative service organization reserves do not exceed maximum levels. The authority must monitor revenue and expenditure reports and must require a behavioral health administrative service organization to submit a corrective action plan on how it will spend its excess reserves within a reasonable period of time, when its reported reserves exceed maximum levels established under the contract. The authority must review and approve such plans and monitor to ensure compliance. If the authority determines that a behavioral health administrative service organization has failed to provide an adequate excess reserve corrective action plan or is not complying with an approved plan, the authority must reduce payments to the entity in accordance with remedial actions provisions included in the contract. These reductions in payments must continue until the authority determines that the entity has come into substantial compliance with an approved excess reserve corrective action plan. The authority must submit to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature, each December of the biennium, the minimum and maximum reserve levels established in contract for each of the behavioral health administrative service organizations for the prior fiscal year and the actual reserve levels reported at the end of the fiscal year.

(b) In contracts effective during fiscal year 2025, the authority must allow the north sound behavioral health administrative services organization to pilot reserve funding flexibility by allowing the north sound behavioral health administrative services organization to utilize, for other purposes, 30 percent of funding received prior to that contract period currently in reserves and that was received pursuant to a specific legislative proviso. Funding repurposed under this subsection must be used to support the duties of the administrative services organization under RCW 71.24.045 through programs serving individuals with severe and persistent behavioral health conditions and behavioral health services that promote stability and recovery within their regional service area. Expenditures pursuant to this pilot program may include, but are not limited to, crisis wraparound services, jail transition and diversion services, court costs, and co-responder programs. The authority, in partnership with the north sound behavioral health administrative services organization, must provide a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2024, describing the impacts of this pilot program to the regional crisis continuum of care. The report must also include information on which specific legislative provisos north sound behavioral health administrative services organization repurposed funding from under this subsection and for what purpose those funds were used.

(((14)))(16) During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, any amounts provided in this section that are used for case management services for pregnant and parenting women must be contracted directly between the authority and pregnant and parenting women case management providers.

(((15)))(17) $3,500,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the continued funding of existing county drug and alcohol use prevention programs.

(((16)))(18) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority may contract with the University of Washington and community-based providers for the provision of the parent-child assistance program or other specialized chemical dependency case management providers for pregnant, postpartum, and parenting women. For all contractors: (a) Service and other outcome data must be provided to the authority by request; and (b) indirect charges for administering the program must not exceed 10 percent of the total contract amount.

(((17)))(19) Within the amounts provided in this section, behavioral health entities must provide outpatient chemical dependency treatment for offenders enrolled in the medicaid program who are supervised by the department of corrections pursuant to a term of community supervision. Contracts with behavioral health entities must require that behavioral health entities include in their provider network specialized expertise in the provision of manualized, evidence-based chemical dependency treatment services for offenders. The department of corrections and the authority must develop a memorandum of understanding for department of corrections offenders on active supervision who are medicaid eligible and meet medical necessity for outpatient substance use disorder treatment. The agreement will ensure that treatment services provided are coordinated, do not result in duplication of services, and maintain access and quality of care for the individuals being served. The authority must provide all necessary data, access, and reports to the department of corrections for all department of corrections offenders that receive medicaid paid services.

(((18)))(20) The criminal justice treatment account—state appropriation is provided solely for treatment and treatment support services for offenders with a substance use disorder pursuant to RCW 71.24.580. The authority must offer counties the option to administer their share of the distributions provided for under RCW 71.24.580(5)(a). If a county is not interested in administering the funds, the authority shall contract with behavioral health entities to administer these funds consistent with the plans approved by local panels pursuant to RCW 71.24.580(5)(b). Funding from the criminal justice treatment account may be used to provide treatment and support services through the conclusion of an individual's treatment plan to individuals participating in a drug court program as of February 24, 2021, if that individual wishes to continue treatment following dismissal of charges they were facing under RCW 69.50.4013(1). Such participation is voluntary and contingent upon substantial compliance with drug court program requirements. The authority must provide a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature that identifies the distribution of criminal justice treatment account funds by September 30, 2023.

(((19)))(21)(a) (($11,426,000))$10,535,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($15,501,000))$14,610,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and (($21,554,000))$19,724,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for crisis triage facilities, crisis relief centers, or crisis stabilization units. Services in these facilities may include crisis stabilization and intervention, individual counseling, peer support, medication management, education, and referral assistance. The authority shall monitor each center's effectiveness at lowering the rate of state psychiatric hospital admissions.

(b) Within these amounts, the health care authority shall convene representatives from medicaid managed care organizations, behavioral health administrative organizations, private insurance carriers, self-insured organizations, crisis providers, and the office of the insurance commissioner to assess gaps in the current funding model for crisis services and recommend options for addressing these gaps including, but not limited to, an alternative funding model for crisis services. The assessment must consider available data to determine to what extent the costs of crisis services for clients of private insurance carriers, medicaid managed care organizations, and individuals enrolled in medicaid fee-for-service are being subsidized through state funded behavioral health administrative services organization contracts. The analysis shall examine crisis services provided by mobile crisis teams as well as facility-based services such as crisis triage and crisis stabilization units. In the development of an alternative funding model, the authority and office of the insurance commissioner must explore mechanisms that: (i) Determine the annual cost of operating crisis services and collect a proportional share of the program cost from each health insurance carrier; and (ii) differentiate between crisis services eligible for medicaid funding from other nonmedicaid eligible activities. The authority must submit a preliminary report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2023, and a final report by December 1, 2024. Up to $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 may be used for the assessment and reporting activities required under this subsection.

(c) Sufficient funding is provided in this subsection to implement Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5120 (crisis relief centers).

(((20)))(22) $9,795,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $10,015,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $15,025,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the operation of secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities. The authority may not use any of these amounts for services in facilities that are subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions for mental diseases, unless they have received a waiver that allows for full federal participation in these facilities. Within these amounts, funding is provided to increase the fee for service rate for these facilities up to $650 per day. The authority must require in contracts with behavioral health entities that they pay no lower than the fee for service rate. The authority must coordinate with regional behavioral health entities to identify and implement purchasing strategies or regulatory changes that increase access to services for individuals with complex behavioral health needs at secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities.

(((21)))(23) $1,401,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,401,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $3,210,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of intensive behavioral health treatment facilities within the community behavioral health service system pursuant to chapter 324, Laws of 2019 (2SHB 1394).

(((22)))(24)(a) $12,878,000 of the dedicated cannabis account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($12,878,000))$12,628,000 of the dedicated cannabis account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for:

(i) A memorandum of understanding with the department of children, youth, and families to provide substance abuse treatment programs;

(ii) A contract with the Washington state institute for public policy to conduct a cost-benefit evaluation of the implementations of chapter 3, Laws of 2013 (Initiative Measure No. 502);

(iii) Designing and administering the Washington state healthy youth survey and the Washington state young adult behavioral health survey;

(iv) Maintaining increased services to pregnant and parenting women provided through the parent child assistance program;

(v) ((Grants to the office of the superintendent of public instruction for life skills training to children and youth;

(vi))) Maintaining increased prevention and treatment service provided by tribes and federally recognized American Indian organization to children and youth;

(((vii)))(vi) Maintaining increased residential treatment services for children and youth;

(((viii)))(vii) Training and technical assistance for the implementation of evidence-based, research based, and promising programs which prevent or reduce substance use disorder;

(((ix)))(viii) Expenditures into the home visiting services account; and

(((x)))(ix) Grants to community-based programs that provide prevention services or activities to youth.

(b) The authority must allocate the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection amongst the specific activities proportionate to the fiscal year 2021 allocation.

(((23)))(25)(a) $1,125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for Spokane behavioral health entities to implement services to reduce utilization and the census at eastern state hospital. Such services must include:

(i) High intensity treatment team for persons who are high utilizers of psychiatric inpatient services, including those with co-occurring disorders and other special needs;

(ii) Crisis outreach and diversion services to stabilize in the community individuals in crisis who are at risk of requiring inpatient care or jail services;

(iii) Mental health services provided in nursing facilities to individuals with dementia, and consultation to facility staff treating those individuals; and

(iv) Services at the 16-bed evaluation and treatment facility.

(b) At least annually, the Spokane county behavioral health entities shall assess the effectiveness of these services in reducing utilization at eastern state hospital, identify services that are not optimally effective, and modify those services to improve their effectiveness.

(((24)))(26) $1,850,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,850,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $13,312,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for substance use disorder peer support services included in behavioral health capitation rates in accordance with section 213(5)(ss), chapter 299, Laws of 2018. The authority shall require managed care organizations to provide access to peer support services for individuals with substance use disorders transitioning from emergency departments, inpatient facilities, or receiving treatment as part of hub and spoke networks.

(((25)))(27) $1,423,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,423,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $5,908,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to continue to implement discharge wraparound services for individuals with complex behavioral health conditions transitioning or being diverted from admission to psychiatric inpatient programs. The authority must coordinate with the department of social and health services in establishing the standards for these programs.

(((26)))(28) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to maintain a memorandum of understanding with the criminal justice training commission to provide funding for community grants pursuant to RCW 36.28A.450.

(((27)))(29) $350,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation and $300,000 of the opioid abatement settlement account—state appropriation are provided solely to contract with a nationally recognized recovery residence organization and to provide technical assistance to operators of recovery residences seeking certification in accordance with chapter 264, Laws of 2019 (2SHB 1528).

(((28)))(30) $3,396,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $3,396,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $16,200,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for support of and to continue to increase clubhouse programs across the state. The authority shall work with the centers for medicare and medicaid services to review opportunities to include clubhouse services as an optional "in lieu of" service in managed care organization contracts in order to maximize federal participation.

(((29)))(31) $708,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $708,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,598,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementing mental health peer respite centers and a pilot project to implement a mental health drop-in center in accordance with chapter 324, Laws of 2019 (2SHB 1394).

(((30)))(32) $800,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $800,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,452,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to implement strategies related to suicide prevention and treatment.

(((31)))(33) $446,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $446,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $178,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the University of Washington's evidence-based practice institute which supports the identification, evaluation, and implementation of evidence-based or promising practices. The institute must work with the authority to develop a plan to seek private, federal, or other grant funding in order to reduce the need for state general funds. The authority must collect information from the institute on the use of these funds and submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1st of each year of the biennium.

(((32)))(34) As an element of contractual network adequacy requirements and reporting, the authority shall direct managed care organizations to make all reasonable efforts to develop or maintain contracts with provider networks that leverage local, federal, or philanthropic funding to enhance effectiveness of medicaid-funded integrated care services. These networks must promote medicaid clients' access to a system of services that addresses additional social support services and social determinants of health as defined in RCW 43.20.025 in a manner that is integrated with the delivery of behavioral health and medical treatment services.

(((33)))(35) $9,000,000 of the criminal justice treatment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the authority to maintain funding for new therapeutic courts created or expanded during fiscal year 2021, or to maintain the fiscal year 2021 expansion of services being provided to an already existing therapeutic court that engages in evidence-based practices, to include medication assisted treatment in jail settings pursuant to RCW 71.24.580. Funding provided under this subsection shall not supplant existing funds utilized for this purpose.

(((34)))(36) In establishing, re-basing, enhancing, or otherwise updating medicaid rates for behavioral health services, the authority and contracted actuaries shall use a transparent process that provides an opportunity for medicaid managed care organizations, behavioral health administrative service organizations, and behavioral health provider agencies, and their representatives, to review and provide data and feedback on proposed rate changes within their region or regions of service operation. The authority and contracted actuaries shall transparently incorporate the information gained from this process and make adjustments allowable under federal law when appropriate.

(((35)))(37) The authority shall seek input from representatives of the managed care organizations (MCOs), licensed community behavioral health agencies, and behavioral health administrative service organizations to develop specific metrics related to behavioral health outcomes under integrated managed care. These metrics must include, but are not limited to: (a) Revenues and expenditures for community behavioral health programs, including medicaid and nonmedicaid funding; (b) access to services, service denials, and utilization by state plan modality; (c) claims denials and record of timely payment to providers; (d) client demographics; and (e) social and recovery measures and managed care organization performance measures. The authority must work with managed care organizations and behavioral health administrative service organizations to integrate these metrics into an annual reporting structure designed to evaluate the performance of the behavioral health system in the state over time. The authority must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature, before December 30th of each year during the fiscal biennium, that details the implemented metrics and relevant performance outcomes for the prior calendar year.

(((36)))(38) $4,061,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $3,773,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $6,419,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to maintain pilot programs for intensive outpatient services and partial hospitalization services for certain children and adolescents and, pursuant to chapter 94, Laws of 2022 (2SSB 5736), add coverage for these services into the state medicaid program beginning January 1, 2024.

(a) The authority must establish minimum standards, eligibility criteria, authorization and utilization review processes, and payment methodologies for the programs in contract.

(b) Eligibility for the pilot sites is limited pursuant to the following:

(i) Children and adolescents discharged from an inpatient hospital treatment program who require the level of services offered by the pilot programs in lieu of continued inpatient treatment;

(ii) Children and adolescents who require the level of services offered by the pilot programs in order to avoid inpatient hospitalization; and

(iii) Services may not be offered if there are less costly alternative community-based services that can effectively meet the needs of an individual referred to the program.

(c) Eligibility for services through the state medicaid program shall be consistent with criteria approved by the centers for medicare and medicaid services pursuant to implementation of chapter 94, Laws of 2022 (2SSB 5736).

(d) The authority must collect data on the program sites and work with the actuaries responsible for establishing managed care rates for medicaid enrollees to develop and submit an annual report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature each December of the fiscal biennium that includes the following information:

(i) A narrative description of the services provided at each program site and identification of any specific gaps the sites were able to fill in the current continuum of care;

(ii) Clinical outcomes and estimated reductions in psychiatric inpatient costs associated with each of the program sites;

(iii) Recommendations for whether the pilot models should be expanded statewide, whether modifications should be made to the models to better address gaps in the continuum identified through the pilot sites, whether the models could be expanded to community behavioral health providers, and whether statewide implementation should be achieved through a state plan amendment or some other mechanism for leveraging federal medicaid match;

(iv) Actuarial projections on the statewide need for services related to the pilot sites and estimated costs of adding each of the services to the medicaid behavioral health benefit for children and adolescents and adults; and

(v) Annual costs and any quantifiable cost offsets associated with the program sites.

(((37)))(39) $25,587,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) and $9,828,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to promote the recovery of individuals with substance use disorders through expansion of substance use disorder services. The authority shall implement this funding to promote integrated, whole-person care to individuals with opioid use disorders, stimulant use disorders, and other substance use disorders. The authority shall use this funding to support evidence-based and promising practices as follows:

(a) $8,500,000 of the amounts provided in this subsection is provided solely for treatment services to low-income individuals with substance use disorders who are not eligible for services under the medicaid program and for treatment services that are not covered under the medicaid program. A minimum of $7,500,000 of this amount must be contracted through behavioral health administrative services organizations. The amounts in this subsection may be used for services including, but not limited to, outpatient treatment, residential treatment, mobile opioid use disorder treatment programs, law enforcement assisted diversion programs, contingency management interventions, modified assertive community treatment, trauma informed care, crisis respite, and for reimbursement of one-time start-up operating costs for opening new beds in withdrawal management treatment programs.

(b) $2,015,000 of the amounts provided in this subsection is provided solely for outreach programs that link individuals with substance use disorders to treatment options to include medication for opioid use disorder. The authority must contract for these services with programs that use interdisciplinary teams, which include peer specialists, to engage and facilitate linkage to treatment for individuals in community settings such as homeless encampments, shelters, emergency rooms, harm reduction programs, churches, community service offices, food banks, libraries, legal offices, and other settings where individuals with substance use disorders may be engaged. The services must be coordinated with emergency housing assistance and other services administered by the authority to promote access to a full continuum of treatment and recovery support options.

(c) $7,500,000 of the amounts provided in this subsection is provided solely for substance use disorder recovery support services not covered by the medicaid program including, but not limited to, emergency housing, recovery housing vouchers, supported employment, skills training, peer support, peer drop-in centers, and other community supports.

(d) $3,550,000 of the amounts provided in this subsection is provided solely for efforts to support the recovery of American Indians and Alaska natives with substance use disorders. This funding may be used for grants to urban Indian organizations, tribal opioid prevention media campaigns, and support for government to government communication, planning, and implementation of opioid use disorder related projects.

(e) $5,000,000 of the amounts provided in this subsection is provided solely for the authority, in coordination with the department of health, to expand the distribution of naloxone through the department's overdose education and naloxone distribution program. Funding must be prioritized to fill naloxone access gaps in community behavioral health and other community settings, including providing naloxone for agency staff in organizations such as syringe service programs, housing providers, and street outreach programs, and for law enforcement and emergency responders.

(f) $7,100,000 of the amounts provided in this subsection is provided solely for community services grants that support the implementation and evaluation of substance use disorder prevention services.

(g) Up to $1,750,000 of the amounts provided in this subsection may be used for the authority's administrative costs associated with services funded in this subsection.

(((38)))(40) $3,109,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,109,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for short-term rental subsidies for individuals with mental health or substance use disorders. This funding may be used for individuals enrolled in the foundational community support program while waiting for a longer term resource for rental support or for individuals transitioning from behavioral health treatment facilities or local jails. Individuals who would otherwise be eligible for the foundational community support program but are not eligible because of their citizenship status may also be served. Each December of the fiscal biennium, the authority must submit a report identifying the expenditures and number of individuals receiving short-term rental supports through the agency budget during the prior fiscal year broken out by region, treatment need, and the demographics of those served, including but not limited to age, country of origin within racial/ethnic categories, gender, and immigration status.

(((39)))(41) $25,332,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) is provided solely to promote the recovery of individuals with mental health disorders through expansion of mental health services. The authority shall implement this funding to promote integrated, whole-person care through evidence based and promising practices as follows:

(a) $8,153,000 of the amounts provided in this subsection is provided solely for treatment services to low-income individuals with mental health disorders who are not eligible for services under the medicaid program and for treatment services that are not covered under the medicaid program. A minimum of $7,000,000 of this amount must be contracted through behavioral health administrative services organizations. The amounts in this subsection may be used for services including, but not limited to, outpatient treatment, residential treatment, law enforcement assisted diversion programs, modified assertive community treatment, and trauma informed care.

(b) $8,200,000 of the amounts provided in this subsection is provided solely for mental health recovery support services not covered by the medicaid program including, but not limited to, supportive housing, emergency housing vouchers, supported employment, skills training, peer support, peer drop-in centers, and other community supports.

(c) $2,553,000 of the amounts provided in this subsection is provided solely for efforts to support the recovery of American Indians and Alaska natives with mental health disorders.

(d) $1,300,000 of the amounts provided in this subsection is provided solely to enhance crisis services and may be used for crisis respite care.

(e) $2,600,000 of the amounts provided in this subsection is provided solely for the expansion of first episode psychosis programs.

(f) Up to $1,279,000 of the amounts provided in this subsection may be used for the authority's administrative costs associated with services funded in this subsection.

(((40)))(42) The authority must pursue opportunities for shifting state costs to the state's unused allocation of federal institutions for mental disease disproportionate share hospital funding.

(((41)))(43) $500,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely to establish an emotional support network program for individuals employed as peer specialists. The authority must contract for these services which shall include, but not be limited to, facilitating support groups for peer specialists, support for the recovery journeys of the peer specialists themselves, and targeted support for the secondary trauma inherent in peer work.

(((42)))(44) $1,500,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the authority to contract on a one-time basis with the University of Washington behavioral health institute to continue and enhance its efforts related to training and workforce development. This funding may be used for the following activities:

(a) Making substance use disorder training content accessible to all community behavioral health providers;

(b) Refining and implementing a substance use disorder provider needs assessment to advance best practice implementation for treatment in inpatient and outpatient settings;

(c) Disseminating innovative best practices through training and technical assistance;

(d) Developing and launching a telebehavioral health training series, providing webinars and packaging the training content so that it is accessible to all community behavioral health providers;

(e) Planning for advanced telebehavioral health training and support to providers;

(f) Convening a race, equity, and social justice in behavioral health conference annually;

(g) Developing training and technical assistance opportunities for an annual series that translates lessons learned in behavioral health equity into actionable and sustainable change at the provider, organizational, and system levels;

(h) Developing recommendations for reducing health disparities and training the workforce in culturally and linguistically relevant practices to achieve improved outcomes;

(i) Increasing the number of community substance use providers that are trained in best practice assessment and treatment models;

(j) Convening a telebehavioral health summit of leading experts regarding long-term provider telebehavioral health training and workforce needs;

(k) Creating a behavioral health workforce strategy plan that identifies gaps that are not being addressed and suggests system improvements to address those gaps;

(l) Working with community partners and key stakeholders to identify best practice strategies to evaluate and measure equity and health disparities within the behavioral health system and make recommendations regarding potential metrics to help advance system change; and

(m) Developing metrics and evaluating telebehavioral health training needs and the impact of telebehavioral health training on provider knowledge and treatment protocols.

(((43)))(45) $1,250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to contract with the King county behavioral health administrative services organization to maintain children's crisis outreach response system services that were previously funded through the department of children, youth, and families. The authority, in consultation with the behavioral health administrative services organization, medicaid managed care organizations, and the actuaries responsible for developing medicaid managed care rates, must work to maximize federal funding provided for the children's crisis outreach response system program.

(((44)))(46) $31,891,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $63,395,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $172,425,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement a 15 percent increase to medicaid reimbursement for community behavioral health providers contracted through managed care organizations to be effective January 1, 2024. The authority must employ mechanisms such as directed payment or other options allowable under federal medicaid law to assure the funding is used by the managed care organizations for a 15 percent provider rate increase as intended and verify this pursuant to the process established in chapter 285, Laws of 2020 (EHB 2584). The rate increase shall be implemented to all behavioral health nonhospital inpatient, residential, and outpatient providers contracted through the medicaid managed care organizations. Psychiatric hospitals and other providers receiving rate increases under other subsections of this section must be excluded from the rate increase directed in this subsection.

(((45)))(47) $532,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,935,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $3,467,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase the number of beds and rates for community children's long-term inpatient program providers. The number of beds is increased on a phased in basis to 72 beds by the end of fiscal year 2024. The bed day rates are increased from $1,030 per day to $1,121 per day effective July 1, 2023.

(((46)))(48) $505,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,011,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,095,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase rates for parent child assistance program providers by 15 percent effective January 1, 2024.

(((47)))(49) $300,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for training of behavioral health consumer advocates. The authority must enter into a memorandum of understanding with the department of commerce to provide support for training of behavioral health consumer advocates pursuant to chapter 202, Laws of 2021 (E2SHB 1086).

(((48)))(50) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to contract with the Washington chapter of the national alliance on mental illness, a Washington based statewide mental health nonprofit organization that provides free community and school-based mental health education and support programs for consumers and families. The contractor must use this funding to provide access to programs tailored to peers living with mental illness as well as family members of people with mental illness and the community at large. Services provided by the contracted program shall include education, support, and assistance to reduce isolation and help consumers and families understand the services available in their communities. This contract is exempt from the competitive procurement requirements in chapter 39.26 RCW.

(((49)))(51) $15,474,000 of the generalfund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($15,474,000))$17,125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and (($14,312,000))$14,562,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for maintaining the expansion of local behavioral health mobile crisis response team capacity and ensuring each region has at least one adult and one children and youth mobile crisis team that is able to respond to calls coming into the 988 crisis hotline.

(a) In prioritizing this funding, the health care authority shall assure that there are a minimum of six new children and youth mobile crisis teams in comparison to the number of teams at the end of fiscal year 2021 and that there is one children and youth mobile crisis team in each region.

(b) In implementing funding for adult and youth mobile crisis response teams, the authority must establish standards in contracts with managed care organizations and behavioral health administrative services organizations for the services provided by these teams.

(c) Of these amounts, $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $2,024,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to maintain increased capacity for mobile crisis services in King county that was funded in fiscal year 2023. These amounts must supplement and not supplant funding to the county previously allocated by the authority under this subsection.

(d) Of these amounts, $1,651,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $250,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for adding stabilization staff to existing youth mobile crisis teams.

(((50) $57,580,000))(52) $59,421,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($61,807,000))$71,107,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and (($109,146,000))$69,409,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to contract with community hospitals or freestanding evaluation and treatment centers to provide long-term inpatient care beds as defined in RCW 71.24.025. Within these amounts, the authority must meet the requirements for reimbursing counties for the judicial services for patients being served in these settings in accordance with RCW 71.05.730. The authority must coordinate with the department of social and health services in developing the contract requirements, selecting contractors, and establishing processes for identifying patients that will be admitted to these facilities. Of the amounts in this subsection, sufficient amounts are provided in fiscal year 2024 and fiscal year 2025 for the authority to reimburse community hospitals and nonhospital residential treatment centers serving clients in long-term inpatient care beds as defined in RCW 71.24.025 as follows:

(a) For a hospital licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW that requires a hospital specific medicaid inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate for long-term civil commitment patients because the hospital has completed a medicare cost report, the authority shall analyze the most recent medicare cost report of the hospital after a minimum of 200 medicaid inpatient psychiatric days. The authority shall establish the inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate for long-term civil commitment patients for the hospital at 100 percent of the allowable cost of care, based on the most recent medicare cost report of the hospital.

(b) For a hospital licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW that has not completed a medicare cost report with more than 200 medicaid inpatient psychiatric days, the authority shall establish the medicaid inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate for long-term civil commitment patients for the hospital at the higher of the hospital's current medicaid inpatient psychiatric rate; or the annually updated statewide average of the medicaid inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate of all acute care hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW providing long-term civil commitment services.

(c) For a hospital licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW and currently providing long-term civil commitment services, the authority shall establish the medicaid inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate at $940 for fiscal year 2024 and $1,250 for fiscal year 2025 plus adjustments that may be needed to capture costs associated with long-term psychiatric patients that are not allowable on the medicare cost report or reimbursed separately. The hospital may provide the authority with supplemental data to be considered and used to make appropriate adjustments to the medicaid inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate of the hospital. Adjustment of costs may include:

(i) Costs associated with professional services and fees not accounted for in the hospital's medicare cost report or reimbursed separately;

(ii) Costs associated with the hospital providing the long-term psychiatric patient access to involuntary treatment court services that are not reimbursed separately; and

(iii) Other costs associated with caring for long-term psychiatric patients that are not reimbursed separately.

(d) For a hospital licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW that requires an initial medicaid inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate for long-term civil commitment services because it has not yet completed a medicare cost report, the authority shall establish the medicaid inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate at the higher of:

(i) The hospital's current medicaid inpatient psychiatric rate; or

(ii) The annually updated statewide average of the medicaid long-term inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate of all freestanding psychiatric hospitals licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW providing long-term civil commitment services.

(e) For nonhospital residential treatment centers certified to provide long-term inpatient care beds as defined in RCW 71.24.025, the authority shall establish the medicaid psychiatric per diem payment rate at the fiscal year 2023 level for fiscal year 2024 and $1,250 per bed for fiscal year 2025.

(f) Beginning in fiscal year 2024, the authority shall pay a rate enhancement for patients committed pursuant to the dismissal of criminal charges and a civil evaluation ordered under RCW 10.77.086 or 10.77.088. The enhancement shall be available to all hospital and nonhospital facilities providing services under this subsection except those whose rates are set at 100 percent of their most recent medicare cost report. The rate enhancement shall not exceed the tiered rate enhancements established under the 1915(i) state plan.

(g) Beginning in fiscal year 2025, the authority may pay a rate enhancement of $500 per day for individuals with complex medical needs, challenging behaviors often diagnosed with co-occurring intellectual or developmental disability, traumatic brain injury, dementia, or significant medical issues requiring personal care. The rate enhancement is available to providers contracting directly with the authority.

(h) Provider payments for vacant bed days shall not exceed six percent of their annual contracted bed days.

(((h)))(i) The authority, in coordination with the department of social and health services, the office of the governor, the office of financial management, and representatives from medicaid managed care organizations, behavioral health administrative service organizations, and community providers, must update its plan to continue the expansion of civil community long-term inpatient capacity. The plan shall identify gaps and barriers in the current array of community long-term inpatient beds in serving higher need individuals including those committed to a state hospital pursuant to the dismissal of criminal charges and a civil evaluation ordered under RCW 10.77.086 or 10.77.088. The plan shall identify strategies to overcome these barriers including, but not limited to, potential rate enhancements for high needs clients. The authority must submit its updated implementation plan to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 2023, and submit a status update on the implementation plan by October 15, 2024.

(((51)))(53)(a) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a one-time grant to Island county to maintain support for a pilot program to improve behavioral health outcomes for young people in rural communities. In administering the pilot program, Island county shall coordinate with school districts, community groups, and health care providers to increase access to behavioral health programs for children and youth aged birth to 24 years of age. The grant funds shall be used to coordinate and expand behavioral health services. The grant funding must not be used to supplant funding from existing programs. No more than 10 percent of the funds may be used for administrative costs incurred by Island county in administering the program. Services that may be provided with the grant funding include, but are not limited to:

(i) Support for children and youth with significant behavioral health needs to address learning loss caused by COVID-19 and remote learning;

(ii) School based behavioral health education, assessment, and brief treatment;

(iii) Screening and referral of children and youth to long-term treatment services;

(iv) Behavioral health supports provided by community agencies serving youth year-round;

(v) Expansion of mental health first aid, a program designed to prepare adults who regularly interact with youth for how to help people in both crisis and noncrisis mental health situations;

(vi) Peer support services; and

(vii) Compensation for the incurred costs of clinical supervisors and internships.

(b) The authority, in coordination with Island county, must submit to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature, a report summarizing how the funding was used and providing the number of children and youth served by the pilot during fiscal year 2024 by December 1, 2024.

(((52)))(54) $265,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $281,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $546,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to provide specialized training and consultation for physicians and professionals to support children with developmental disabilities and behavioral health needs.

(((53) $2,184,000))(55) $2,262,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation and (($2,184,000))$2,262,000 of the general fund—local appropriation are provided solely for supported housing and employment services described in initiative 3a and 3b of the 1115 demonstration waiver and this is the maximum amount that may be expended for this purpose. Within these amounts, funding is provided for the authority to support community discharge efforts for patients at the state hospitals. Under this initiative, the authority and the department of social and health services shall ensure that allowable and necessary services are provided to eligible clients as identified by the authority or its providers or third party administrator. The department and the authority in consultation with the medicaid forecast work group, shall ensure that reasonable reimbursements are established for services deemed necessary within an identified limit per individual. The authority shall not increase general fund—state expenditures above appropriated levels for this specific purpose. The secretary in collaboration with the director of the authority shall report to the joint select committee on health care oversight no less than quarterly on financial and health outcomes. The secretary in cooperation with the director shall also report to the fiscal committees of the legislature the expenditures of this subsection and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested by the legislative fiscal committees.

(((54)))(56) $130,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the authority to participate in efforts to ensure behavioral health agencies are compensated for their role as teaching clinics for students seeking professional education in behavioral health disciplines and for new graduates working toward licensure.

(((55)))(57) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $934,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,447,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for increasing case management services to pregnant and parenting women provided through the parent child assistance program and for increasing the number of residential treatment beds available for pregnant and parenting women.

(((56)))(58) Within the amounts provided in this section, sufficient funding is provided for the authority to maintain and increase the capabilities of a tool to track medication assisted treatment provider capacity.

(((57)))(59) $2,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for grants to law enforcement and other first responders to include a mental health professional on the team of personnel responding to emergencies.

(((58) $1,653,000))(60) $855,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and (($2,024,000))$1,149,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to contract for long-term involuntary treatment services in a 16-bed residential treatment facility being developed by the Tulalip tribe in Stanwood.

(((59)))(61) $956,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $956,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for wraparound with intensive services for youth ineligible for medicaid as outlined in the settlement agreement under AGC v. Washington State Health Care Authority, Thurston county superior court no. 21-2-00479-34.

(((60)))(62) $18,188,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $18,188,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for claims for services rendered to medicaid eligible clients admitted to institutions of mental disease that were determined to be unallowable for federal reimbursement due to medicaid's institutions for mental disease exclusion rules.

(((61)))(63) $6,010,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $6,010,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,980,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority, in coordination with the department of health, to deploy an opioid awareness campaign and to contract with syringe service programs and other service settings assisting people with substance use disorders to: Prevent and respond to overdoses; provide other harm reduction services and supplies, including but not limited to distributing naloxone; fentanyl testing and other drug testing supplies; and for expanding contingency management services. The authority is encouraged to use these funds to leverage federal funding for this purpose to expand buying power when possible. The authority should prioritize funds for naloxone in coordination with the department of health, to expand the distribution of naloxone through the department's overdose education and naloxone distribution program. Funding must be prioritized to fill naloxone access gaps in community behavioral health and other community settings, including providing naloxone for agency staff in organizations such as syringe service programs, housing providers, and street outreach programs. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to deploy an opioid awareness campaign targeted at youth to increase the awareness of the dangers of fentanyl.

(((62)))(64) $4,763,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $4,763,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $25,754,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to maintain a rate increase authorized for opioid treatment providers on January 1, 2023.

(((63)))(65) $2,387,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,387,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to support individuals enrolled in the foundational community supports initiative who are transitioning from benefits under RCW 74.04.805 due to increased income or other changes in eligibility. The authority, department of social and health services, and department of commerce shall collaborate on this effort.

(((64)))(66) $2,249,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,249,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to contract with programs to provide medical respite care for individuals with behavioral health needs. The programs must serve individuals with significant behavioral health needs and medical issues who do not require hospitalization but are unable to provide adequate self-care for their medical conditions. The programs must prioritize services to individuals with complex medical and behavioral health issues who are homeless or who were recently discharged from a hospital setting. The services must meet quality standards and best practices developed by the national health care for the homeless council and may include, but are not limited to, medical oversight and health education; care transitions; and discharge planning to and from primary care, inpatient hospital, emergency rooms, and supportive housing. In selecting the contractors, the authority must prioritize projects that demonstrate the active involvement of an established medical provider that is able to leverage federal medicaid funding in the provision of these services. The authority must work with the medicaid managed care organizations to encourage their participation and assist the plans and the contractor in identifying mechanisms for appropriate use of medicaid reimbursement in this setting.

(((65)))(67) $988,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $988,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $618,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to contract for three regional behavioral health mobile crisis response teams focused on supported housing to prevent individuals with behavioral health conditions at high risk of losing housing from becoming homeless, identify and prioritize serving the most vulnerable people experiencing homelessness, and increase alternative housing options to include short-term alternatives which may temporarily deescalate situations where there is high risk of a household from becoming homeless.

(((66)))(68) $5,623,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $5,623,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $3,748,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to maintain and expand access to no barrier, and low-barrier programs using a housing first model designed to assist and stabilize housing supports for adults with behavioral health conditions. Housing supports and services shall be made available with no requirement for treatment for their behavioral health condition and must be individualized to the needs of the individual. The authority and department of commerce shall collaborate on this effort and must submit a status report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2023.

(((67)))(69) $675,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $675,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a rental voucher and bridge program and to implement strategies to reduce instances where an individual leaves a state operated behavioral or private behavioral health facility directly into homelessness. The authority must prioritize this funding for individuals being discharged from state operated behavioral health facilities.

(((68)))(70) $361,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $361,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $482,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority, in collaboration with the department of social and health services research and data analysis division, to implement community behavioral health service data into the existing executive management information system. Of these amounts, $288,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $288,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $384,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to reimburse the research and data analysis division for staff costs associated with this project. The data elements shall be incorporated into the monthly executive management information system reports on a phased-in basis, allowing for elements which are readily available to be incorporated in the initial phase, and elements which require further definition and data collection changes to be incorporated in a later phase. The authority must collaborate with the research and data analysis division to ensure data elements are clearly defined and must include requirements in medicaid managed care organization and behavioral health administrative services organization contracts to provide the data in a consistent and timely manner for inclusion into the system. The community behavioral health executive management system information data elements must include, but are not limited to: Psychiatric inpatient bed days; evaluation and treatment center bed days; long-term involuntary community psychiatric inpatient bed days; children's long-term inpatient bed days; substance use disorder inpatient, residential, withdrawal evaluation and management, and secure withdrawal evaluation and management bed days; crisis triage and stabilization services bed days; mental health residential bed days; mental health and substance use disorder outpatient treatment services; opioid substitution and medication assisted treatment services; program of assertive treatment team services; wraparound with intensive services; mobile outreach crisis services; recovery navigator team services; foundational community supports housing and employment services; projects for assistance in transition from homelessness services; housing and recovery through peer services; other housing services administered by the authority; mental health and substance use disorder peer services; designated crisis responder investigations and outcomes; involuntary commitment hearings and outcomes; pregnant and parenting women case management services; and single bed certifications and no available bed reports. Wherever possible and practical, the data must include historical monthly counts and shall be broken out to distinguish services to medicaid and nonmedicaid individuals and children and adults. The authority and the research and data analysis division must consult with the office of financial management and staff from the fiscal committees of the legislature on the development and implementation of the community behavioral health data elements.

(((69)))(71) $2,587,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,587,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to support efforts by counties and cities to implement local response teams. Of these amounts:

(a) $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to provide a grant to the association of Washington cities to assist cities with the costs of implementing alternative response teams. This funding must be used to reimburse cities for documented costs associated with creating co-responder teams within different alternative diversion models including law enforcement assisted diversion programs, community assistance referral and education programs, and as part of mobile crisis teams. Cities are encouraged to partner with each other to create a regional response model. In awarding these funds, the association must prioritize applicants with demonstrated capacity for facility-based crisis triage and stabilization services. The association and authority must collect and report information regarding the number of facility-based crisis stabilization and triage beds available in the locations receiving funding through this subsection and submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature with this information by December 1, 2023.

(b) $587,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $587,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to support the Whatcom county alternative response team.

(((70)))(72) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to contract with the University of Washington addictions, drug, and alcohol institute. This funding must be used for advanced, evidence-based training for law enforcement to improve interactions with individuals who use drugs. The training must be developed so it can be adapted and used statewide to decrease stigmatizing beliefs among law enforcement through positive contact with people who use drugs and improve officer well-being and effectiveness by providing skills and techniques to address the drug overdose epidemic. The institute must develop and refine this training, leveraging prior work, and in partnership with a steering committee that includes people with lived or living experience of substance use disorder and criminal legal involvement, researchers, clinicians, law enforcement officers, and others. The training must complement, but not duplicate, existing curricula already provided by the criminal justice training commission. The institute must pilot the advanced training in a subset of regional law enforcement agencies and evaluate its acceptability and feasibility through participant interviews and pretraining and posttraining ratings of stigmatizing beliefs. The institute must incorporate feedback from the pilot training sessions into a final training program that it must make available to law enforcement agencies across the state.

(((71)))(73) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 ((is))and $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to continue development and implementation of the certified community behavioral health clinic model for comprehensive behavioral health services. Funding must be used to secure actuarial expertise, conduct research into national data and other state models, including obtaining resources and expertise from the national council for mental well-being certified community behavioral health clinic success center; and engage stakeholders, including representatives of licensed community behavioral health agencies and medicaid managed care organizations, in the process. The authority must provide a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature with findings, recommendations, and cost estimates by December 31, 2024. The study must build on the preliminary report submitted to the legislature in December 2022 and include:

(a) Overviews of options and considerations for implementing the certified community behavioral health clinic model within Washington state, including participation as a certified community behavioral health clinic demonstration state or for independent statewide implementation;

(b) An analysis of the impact of expanding the certified community behavioral health clinic model on the state's behavioral health systems;

(c) Relevant federal regulations and options to implement the certified community behavioral health clinic model under those regulations;

(d) Options for implementing a prospective payment system methodology;

(e) An analysis of the benefits and potential challenges for integrating the certified community behavioral health clinic reimbursement model within an integrated care environment;

(f) Actuarial analysis on the costs for implementing the certified community behavioral health clinic model, including opportunities for leveraging federal funding; and

(g) Recommendations to the legislature on a pathway for statewide implementation.

(h) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for grants to clinics who received certified community behavioral health clinic funding from the federal substance abuse and mental health services administration to continue their operations pending the end of their federal grant period.

(((72)))(74) $1,135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $568,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to develop and operate a 16-bed substance use disorder inpatient facility in Grays Harbor county that specializes in treating pregnant and parenting women using a family preservation model. The authority must contract for these services through behavioral health entities in a manner that allows leveraging of federal medicaid funds to pay for a portion of the costs. The authority must consult with the department of children, youth, and families in the implementation of this funding. The facility must allow families to reside together while a parent is receiving treatment. Of these amounts, $568,000 may be used for documented startup costs including the recruitment, hiring, and training of staff. If the authority is able to identify a provider that can begin developing these services before July 2024, it must notify the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature and submit a request for funding in the fiscal year 2024 supplemental operating budget.

(((73)))(75) $160,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided on a one-time basis solely for the authority to continue a grant to the city of Snoqualmie to pilot behavioral health emergency response and coordination services through a regional behavioral health coordinator. The regional behavioral health coordinator shall be a licensed mental health or substance use disorder professional who works directly with and accompanies law enforcement officers and fire and rescue first responders to help respond to crises involving persons with behavioral health needs. The coordinator shall plan, implement, and coordinate services related to crisis response and social service needs with the city of Snoqualmie, the city of North Bend, the Snoqualmie police and fire departments, and the eastside fire and rescue agency serving North Bend, and local community services, school districts, hospitals, and crisis response systems provided by King county for the region. The coordinator shall support the social services needs identified through police and fire response in the lower Snoqualmie valley and serve as a liaison between law enforcement, first responders, and persons accessing or requesting emergency services with social service needs. The authority shall collect information on the pilot project and, in coordination with the city of Snoqualmie, must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2023, summarizing the services provided through the grant funds and identifying recommendations on how to implement effective, integrated, coordinated behavioral health emergency response and community care services. The authority must also provide the report to the criminal justice training commission, the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, and the Washington fire commissioners association.

(((74)))(76) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to contract for services with a statewide recovery community organization. The authority must award this funding to an organization that: (a) Has experience building the capacity of the recovery community to advance substance use recovery and mental health wellness by catalyzing public understanding and shaping public policy; (b) is led and governed by representatives of local communities of recovery; (c) centers the voices of people with lived experience who are touched by addiction and mental health challenges, and harnesses the power of story to drive change in the mental health and addiction treatment systems; and (d) provides free community education, skills trainings, events, and a conference in order to increase the understanding of issues around behavioral health and recovery. Services provided by the contracted program must include education, support, and assistance to increase connection of the recovery community, recovery capital, and knowledge about recovery and mental health resources. In conducting this work, the contractor must engage diverse individuals in recovery, impacted families, and providers from all regions of the state and leverage the assistance of affiliated groups and organizations. The organization must also prioritize diversity, equity, and justice in their work to eradicate health disparities of marginalized communities.

(((75)))(77) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to continue and expand a contract with a Seattle based nonprofit organization with experience matching voluntary specialty care providers with patients in need of care to provide pro bono counseling and behavioral health services to uninsured and underinsured individuals with incomes below 300 percent of the federal poverty level. The authority may require the contractor to seek, document, and report to the authority on efforts to leverage local, federal, or philanthropic funding to provide sustained operational support for the program.

(((76)))(78) $2,437,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $4,772,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,705,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to contract for youth inpatient navigator services in seven regions of the state. The services must be provided through clinical response teams that receive referrals for children and youth inpatient services and manage a process to coordinate placements and alternative community treatment plans. Of these amounts for each fiscal year, $445,000 of the general fund—state appropriation and $79,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to contract for services through an existing program located in Pierce county.

(((77)))(79) $7,601,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $7,601,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $2,820,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for assisted outpatient treatment and other costs associated with implementation of chapter 210, Laws of 2022 (SHB 1773). Of the amount provided in this subsection, $1,000 is for implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5130 (assisted outpatient treatment).

(((78) $1,878,000))(80) $1,378,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($429,000))$929,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to continue to support the children and youth behavioral health work group to consider and develop longer term strategies and recommendations regarding the delivery of behavioral health services for children, transitioning youth, and their caregivers pursuant to chapter 76, Laws of 2022 (2SHB 1890).

(((79)))(81) Sufficient funding is provided for the authority to extend continuous eligibility for apple health to children ages zero to six with income at or below 215 percent of the federal poverty level. The centers for medicare and medicaid services must approve the 1115 medicaid waiver prior to the implementation of this policy.

(((80)))(82) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for contingency management resources in accordance with chapter 311, Laws of 2021 (ESB 5476).

(((81)))(83) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to continue a contract for services funded in section 215(127), chapter 297, Laws of 2022 (ESSB 5693) to provide information and support related to safe housing and support services for youth exiting inpatient mental health and/or substance use disorder facilities to stakeholders, inpatient treatment facilities, young people, and other community providers that serve unaccompanied youth and young adults.

(((82)))(84) $2,336,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, 2,336,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $3,036,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to contract with opioid treatment providers to operate mobile methadone units to address treatment gaps statewide.

(((83)))(85) $216,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $427,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,454,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to increase fee for service rates for mental health and substance use disorder treatment by 22 percent. This rate increase shall be effective January 1, 2024. This rate increase does not apply to per diem costs for long-term civil commitment inpatient services or for services for which rate increases were provided under other subsections of this section. Services affected by the psychiatric rebase in subsection (((84)))(86) of this section are excluded from this rate increase. The authority must include the proportional costs of increasing fee-for-service rates for mental health and substance use disorder treatment paid on behalf of tribal members not electing enrollment in managed care plans in any agency request decision package it submits during the fiscal biennium for increasing provider rates in the managed care behavioral health program.

(((84)))(86) Sufficient amounts are provided in this section for the authority to rebase community hospital psychiatric inpatient rates effective January 1, 2024. Rebasing adjustments shall be based on adjusted calendar year 2020 medicare cost reports.

(((85)))(87)(a) $3,805,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the authority, beginning July 1, 2024, to implement a program with coverage comparable to the amount, duration, and scope of care provided in the categorically needy medicaid program for adult individuals who:

(i) Have an immigration status making them ineligible for federal medicaid or federal subsidies through the health benefit exchange;

(ii) Are age 19 and older, including over age 65, and have countable income of up to 138 percent of the federal poverty level; and

(iii) Are not eligible for another full scope federally funded medical assistance program, including any expansion of medicaid coverage for deferred action for childhood arrivals recipients.

(b) Within the amount provided in this subsection, the authority shall use the same eligibility, enrollment, redetermination and renewal, and appeals procedures as categorically needy medicaid, except where flexibility is necessary to maintain privacy or minimize burden to applicants or enrollees.

(c) The authority in collaboration with the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, and community organizations must develop and implement an outreach and education campaign.

(d) The authority must provide the following information to the governor's office and appropriate committees of the legislature by February 1st and November 1st of each year:

(i) Actual and forecasted expenditures;

(ii) Actual and forecasted data from the caseload forecast council; and

(iii) The availability and impact of any federal program or proposed rule that expands access to health care for the population described in this subsection, such as the expansion of medicaid coverage for deferred action for childhood arrivals recipients.

(e) The amount provided in this subsection is the maximum amount that may be expended for the purposes of this program.

(((86)))(88)(a) $2,317,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $4,433,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a targeted grant program to three behavioral health administrative services organizations to transition persons who are either being diverted from criminal prosecution to behavioral health treatment services or are in need of housing upon discharge from crisis stabilization services. The authority must provide an opportunity for all of the behavioral health administrative service organizations to submit plans for consideration.

(b) Grant criteria must include, but are not limited to:

(i) A commitment to matching individuals with temporary lodging or permanent housing, including supportive housing services and supports, that is reasonably likely to fit their actual needs and situation, is noncongregate whenever possible, and takes into consideration individuals' immediate and long-term needs and abilities to achieve and maintain housing stability; and

(ii) A commitment to transition individuals who are initially matched to temporary lodging into a permanent housing placement, including appropriate supportive housing supports and services, within six months except under unusual circumstances.

(c) When awarding grants, the authority must prioritize applicants that:

(i) Provide matching resources;

(ii) Focus on ensuring an expeditious path to sustainable permanent housing solutions; and

(iii) Demonstrate an understanding of working with individuals who experience homelessness or have interactions with the criminal legal system to understand their optimal housing type and level of ongoing services.

(((87)))(89)(a) $2,266,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $14,151,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $19,269,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for services to medicaid and state funded clients in behavioral health residential treatment facilities that are scheduled to open during the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium.

(b) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to reimburse the department of social and health services for staffing costs related to tracking behavioral health community capacity through the community behavioral health executive management information system and providing annual reports on the implementation of new behavioral health community capacity.

(c) The department of commerce, the department of health, and the authority must cooperate with the department of social and health services in collecting and providing the data necessary to incorporate tracking of behavioral health beds into the behavioral health executive management information system and to prepare the required reports. The agencies must work to ensure they are using consistent definitions in classifying behavioral health bed types for the purpose of reporting capacity and utilization.

(d) The authority and the department of social and health services must begin tracking behavioral health bed utilization for medicaid and state funded clients by type of bed in the executive management information system by October 1, 2023. The department of commerce shall identify to the department of social and health services all providers that have received funding through their capital grant program since the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium. The department of social and health services must incorporate tracking of services by provider including an element to identify providers that have received funding through the capital budget so that reports can be provided related to the average daily client counts for medicaid and state funded clients being served by provider and by facility type.

(e) By November 1, 2023, the department of social and health services, in coordination with the department of commerce, the department of health, and the authority, must submit an annual report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature. The first annual report must provide information on the facilities that received funding through the department of commerce's behavioral health community capacity grant funding since the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium and the utilization across all behavioral health facilities for medicaid and state funded clients. The report must provide the following information for each facility that has received funding through the capital budget: (i) The amount received by the state and the total project cost; (ii) the facility address; (iii) the number of new beds or additional bed capacity by the service type being provided; and (iv) the utilization of the additional beds by medicaid or state funded clients by service type.

(f) By November 1, 2024, the department of social and health services must submit the second annual report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature. The second annual report must update the bed capacity and utilization information required in the first report and compare that capacity to demand by service type by geographical region of the state.

(((88)))(90) $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to support the efforts of the joint legislative and executive committee on behavioral health established in section 135 of this act.

(((89)))(91) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to support the provision of behavioral health co-responder services on nonlaw enforcement emergency medical response teams.

(((90)))(92) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to contract on a one-time basis with the King county behavioral health administrative services organization to expand medication for opioid use disorder treatment services in King county.

(((91)))(93) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the authority to contract on a one-time basis with the behavioral health administrative services organization serving Kitsap county for crisis triage services in the county that are not being reimbursed through the medicaid program.

(((92)))(94) $1,100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to contract on a one-time basis with the behavioral health administrative services organization serving Snohomish county for start-up costs in a new 32-bed community recovery center in Lynnwood that will provide crisis services to medicaid and other low income residents.

(((93) $3,142,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $3,869,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $10,574,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to reimburse the department of social and health services for the costs of medicaid services at a 16-bed residential treatment facility serving long-term involuntary inpatient patients. The authority and the department of social and health services must utilize case rate and cost based reimbursement models to maximize federal matching funds at the facility. Up to $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 may be used to facilitate these efforts.

(94)))(95) $313,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely to support a media campaign for Native Americans related to the prevention of substance abuse and suicide.

(((95)))(96) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to contract with up to two behavioral health agencies that are interested in offering or expanding wraparound with intensive services for children and youth. The funds may be used to support costs associated with recruitment, training, technical assistance, or other appropriate costs required to develop the capacity to offer these specialized services.

(((96)))(97) $22,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $22,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to contract with behavioral health administrative service organizations to implement the statewide recovery navigator program established in chapter 311, Laws of 2021 (ESB 5476) and for related technical assistance to support this implementation. This includes funding for recovery navigator teams to provide community-based outreach and case management services based on the law enforcement assisted diversion model and for technical assistance support from the law enforcement assisted diversion national support bureau. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 must be allocated to maintain recovery navigator services in King, Pierce, and Snohomish counties. These amounts must be in addition to the proportion of the allocation of the remaining funds in this subsection the regional behavioral health administrative services organizations serving those counties were allocated pursuant to section 22(1), chapter 311, Laws of 2021.

(((97)))(98) $3,114,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $3,114,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $5,402,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to implement clubhouse services in every region of the state.

(((98)))(99) $7,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $7,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to implement homeless outreach stabilization teams pursuant to chapter 311, Laws of 2021 (ESB 5476).

(((99)))(100) $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, $81,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation, and (($5,000,000))$12,280,000 of the opioid abatement settlement account—state appropriation are provided solely for the authority to expand efforts to provide opioid use disorder medication in city, county, regional, and tribal jails.

(((100)))(101) $1,400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for behavioral health administrative service organizations to develop regional recovery navigator program plans pursuant to chapter 311, Laws of 2021 (ESB 5476), and to establish positions focusing on regional planning to improve access to and quality of regional behavioral health services with a focus on integrated care.

(((101)))(102) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to contract with an organization with expertise in supporting efforts to increase access to and improve quality in recovery housing and recovery residences. This funding shall be used to increase recovery housing availability through partnership with private landlords, increase accreditation of recovery residences statewide, operate a grievance process for resolving challenges with recovery residences, and conduct a recovery capital outcomes assessment for individuals living in recovery residences.

(((102)))(103) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $4,000,000 of the opioid abatement settlement account—state appropriation are provided solely for the authority to provide short-term housing vouchers for individuals with substance use disorders.

(((103)))(104) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to convene and provide staff and contracted services support to the recovery oversight committee established in chapter 311, Laws of 2021 (ESB 5476).

(((104)))(105) $2,565,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,565,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to develop and implement the recovery services plan and to carry out other requirements of chapter 311, Laws of 2021 (ESB 5476). Within these amounts, funding is provided for the authority to:

(a) Establish an occupational nurse consultant position within the authority to provide contract oversight, accountability, and performance improvement activities, and to ensure medicaid managed care organization plan compliance with provisions in law and contract related to care transitions work with local jails; and

(b) Establish a position within the authority to create and oversee a program to initiate and support emergency department programs for inducing medications for patients with opioid use disorder paired with a referral to community-based outreach and case management programs.

(((105)))(106) $400,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely to support the development and implementation of the parent portal directed in chapter 134, Laws of 2022 (SHB 1800).

(((106) $23,763,000))(107) $23,148,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the authority to contract with the University of Washington behavioral health teaching facility to provide long-term inpatient care beds as defined in RCW 71.24.025. The authority must coordinate with the department of social and health services and the University of Washington to evaluate and determine criteria for the current population of state hospital patients, committed pursuant to the dismissal of criminal charges and a civil evaluation ordered under RCW 10.77.086 or 10.77.088, who can be effectively treated at the University of Washington behavioral health teaching facility. The authority, in coordination with the department of social and health services and the University of Washington, must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2023, summarizing the numbers and types of patients that are committed to the state hospitals pursuant to the dismissal of criminal charges and a civil evaluation ordered under RCW 10.77.086 or 10.77.088, the numbers and types that would be appropriate to be served at the University of Washington behavioral health teaching facility, and the criteria that was used to make the determination.

(((107)))(108) $444,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $444,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $716,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1515 (behavioral health contracts). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(108)))(109)(a) $320,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($796,000))$1,796,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,196,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1168 (prenatal substance exposure). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(b) Of the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection, $500,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the authority to contract with a statewide nonprofit entity with expertise in fetal alcohol spectrum disorders and experience in supporting parents and caregivers to offer free support groups for individuals living with fetal alcohol spectrum disorders and their parents and caregivers.

(((109)))(110) $91,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $91,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $126,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1580 (children in crisis). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(111) $5,474,000 of the statewide 988 behavioral health crisis response line account—state appropriation and $210,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to implement Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1134 (988 system).

(a) Within these amounts, $4,000,000 of the statewide 988 behavioral health crisis response line account—state appropriation is provided solely for the authority to provide grants to new or existing mobile rapid response teams and to community-based crisis teams to support efforts for meeting the standards and criteria for receiving an endorsement pursuant to provisions of the bill. In awarding grants under this subsection, the authority must prioritize funding for proposals that demonstrate experience and strategies that prioritize culturally relevant services to community members with the least access to behavioral health services.

(b) Within the remaining amounts, sufficient funding is provided for the authority to conduct the actuarial analysis and development of options for payment mechanisms for rate enhancements as directed in section ((8 of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1134 (988 system)))9, chapter 454, Laws of 2023 and to implement other activities required by the bill.

(((c) If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(112) $26,854,000 of the statewide 988 behavioral health crisis response line account—state appropriation and $17,636,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to expand and enhance regional crisis services. These amounts must be used to expand services provided by mobile crisis teams and community-based crisis teams either endorsed or seeking endorsement pursuant to standards adopted by the authority. Beginning in fiscal year 2025, the legislature intends to direct amounts within this subsection to be used for performance payments to mobile rapid response teams and community-based crisis teams that receive endorsements pursuant to Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1134 (988 system).

(113) $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the authority to increase resources for behavioral health administrative service organizations and managed care organizations for the increased costs of room and board for behavioral health inpatient and residential services provided in nonhospital facilities.

(114) $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a contract with a youth behavioral inpatient and outpatient program with facilities in Clark and Spokane counties that serve over 65 percent medicaid eligible clients for co-occurring substance use and mental health disorders and sexual exploitation behavioral health treatment. This funding is provided on a one-time basis and must be used for treatment and services.

(115) (($18,168,000))$36,993,000 of the opioid abatement settlement account—state appropriation is provided solely for prevention, treatment, and recovery support services to address and remediate the opioid epidemic. Of these amounts:

(a) $2,500,000 is provided solely for the authority to provide or contract for opioid prevention, outreach, treatment, or recovery support services that are not reimbursable under the state medicaid plan.

(b) $500,000 is provided solely for Spanish language opioid prevention services.

(c) $2,000,000 is provided solely to maintain prevention services that address underage drinking, cannabis and tobacco prevention, and opioid, prescription, and other drug misuse among individuals between the ages of 12 and 25.

(d) $1,830,000 is provided solely for programs to prevent inappropriate opioid prescribing.

(e) $538,000 is provided solely for technical support to improve access to medications for opioid use disorder in jails.

(f) $2,000,000 of the opioid abatement settlement account—state appropriation is provided solely for the authority, in coordination with the department of health, to develop and implement a health promotion and education campaign, with a focus on synthetic drug supplies, including fentanyl, and accurate harm reduction messaging for communities, law enforcement, emergency responders, and others.

(g) $3,500,000 of the opioid abatement settlement account—state appropriation is provided solely for the authority to provide support funds to new and established clubhouses throughout the state.

(h) $6,000,000 of the opioid abatement settlement account—state appropriation is provided solely for the authority to provide grants for the operational costs of new staffed recovery residences which serve individuals with substance use disorders who require more support than a level 1 recovery residence.

(i) $1,675,000 of the opioid abatement settlement account—state appropriation is provided solely for the authority to contract with the downtown emergency service center, for the support of an opioid recovery and care access center. The contract is exempt from the competitive procurement requirements in chapter 39.26 RCW.

(j) $3,000,000 of the opioid abatement settlement account—state appropriation is provided solely for the authority to increase access to long-acting injectable buprenorphine products. The authority must use these funds to provide one-time grants to small providers that are not financially affiliated with a hospital to purchase long-acting injectable buprenorphine products. The authority shall study alternative models that will ease access to long-acting injectable buprenorphine and report recommendations to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by October 15, 2024.

(k) $3,050,000 of the opioid abatement settlement account—state appropriation is provided solely for stabilization funding for current community prevention and wellness initiative programs across the state.

(l) $2,000,000 of the opioid abatement settlement account—state appropriation is provided solely to expand the number of health engagement hub pilot projects pursuant to chapter 1, Laws of 2023 sp. sess.

(m) $750,000 of the opioid abatement settlement account—state appropriation is provided solely for additional outreach workers to support the expansion of oxford houses.

(n) $450,000 of the opioid abatement settlement account—state appropriation is provided solely for the authority to purchase and maintain smart health machines. This purchase is exempt from the competitive procurement requirements in chapter 39.26 RCW.

(o) $3,700,000 of the opioid abatement settlement account—state appropriation is provided solely for five pilot programs of health care professionals that will assess and address the acute and chronic physical and behavioral health needs of people living homeless in encampments and on the streets with substance use disorders including opioid use disorder. Of the amounts provided:

(i) $1,000,000 of the opioid abatement settlement account—state appropriation is for a grant to King county;

(ii) $1,000,000 of the opioid abatement settlement account—state appropriation is for a grant to the city of Spokane;

(iii) $1,000,000 of the opioid abatement settlement account—state appropriation is for a grant to the city of Tacoma;

(iv) $500,000 of the opioid abatement settlement account—state appropriation is for a grant to the city of Everett; and

(v) $200,000 of the opioid abatement settlement account—state appropriation is for a grant to Kitsap county.

(p) $500,000 of the opioid abatement settlement account—state appropriation is provided solely to convene an annual tribal fentanyl summit.

(q) $1,000,000 of the opioid abatement settlement account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants to tribes to implement the Icelandic model of prevention in their communities.

(r) $2,000,000 of the opioid abatement settlement account—state appropriation is provided solely for a tribal opioid prevention campaign to inform and educate tribal communities about opioid misuse prevention, overdose response, and treatment.

(s) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, the authority may use up to 10 percent for staffing and administrative expenses.

(((j)))(t) In contracting for programs and services under this subsection, the authority must consider data and implement strategies that prioritize culturally relevant services to community members with the least access to behavioral health services.

(116) $5,000,000 of the opioid abatement settlement account—state appropriation is provided solely for the authority to maintain funding for ongoing grants to law enforcement assisted diversion programs outside of King county under RCW 71.24.590.

(117) $5,500,000 of the opioid abatement settlement account—state appropriation is provided on a one-time basis solely for the authority to implement a pilot program to reimburse a licensed pediatric transitional care facility in Spokane county to provide neonatal abstinence syndrome services to infants who have prenatal substance exposure. The pilot program must study and evaluate the efficacy, outcomes, and impact of providing these services to avoid more costly medical interventions. Within these amounts, $190,000 is provided solely for the authority to contract with Washington State University to conduct research analyzing the prevalence of neonatal abstinence syndrome and infant and maternal health outcomes associated with neonatal transitional nurseries in Washington. The university must submit a report articulating findings to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024. The report must identify to what extent the federal medicaid program allows for reimbursement of these services and identify the barriers in leveraging federal medicaid funding for these services in Washington's state medicaid plan.

(118) $15,447,000 of the opioid abatement settlement account—state appropriation is provided solely for the authority to pass through to tribes and urban Indian health programs for opioid and overdose response activities. The funding must be used for prevention, outreach, treatment, recovery support services, and other strategies to address and mitigate the effects of the misuse and abuse of opioid related products. The authority must provide the tribes and urban Indian health programs the latitude to use the funding as they see fit to benefit their communities, provided the activities are allowable under the terms of the opioid settlement agreements.

(119) $66,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $502,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $171,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5189 (behavioral health support). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(120) $190,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $354,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,106,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5228 (behavioral health OT). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(121) $3,605,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,850,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,539,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5555 (certified peer specialists). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(122) $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to the city of Arlington in partnership with the north county regional fire authority for a mobile integrated health pilot project. The project shall provide mobile integrated health services for residents who cannot navigate resources through typical methods through brief therapeutic intervention, biopsychosocial assessment and referral, and community care coordination.

(123) $1,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5536 (controlled substances).

(124) $300,000 of the opioid abatement settlement account—state appropriation is provided for support of a statewide safe supply work group. The purpose of the work group is to evaluate potential models for safe supply services and make recommendations on inclusion of a safe supply framework in the Washington state substance use recovery services plan to provide a regulated, tested supply of controlled substances to individuals at risk of drug overdose. The work group membership shall be reflective of the community of individuals living with substance use disorder, including persons who are black, indigenous, and persons of color, persons with co-occurring substance use disorders and mental health conditions, as well as persons who represent the unique needs of rural communities.

(a) The work group membership shall consist of, but is not limited to, members appointed by the governor representing the following:

(i) At least one adult in recovery from substance use disorder;

(ii) At least one youth in recovery from substance use disorder;

(iii) One expert from the addictions, drug, and alcohol institute at the University of Washington;

(iv) One outreach services provider;

(v) One substance use disorder treatment provider;

(vi) One peer recovery services provider;

(vii) One recovery housing provider;

(viii) One expert in serving persons with co-occurring substance use disorders and mental health conditions;

(ix) One expert in antiracism and equity in health care delivery systems;

(x) One employee who provides substance use disorder treatment or services as a member of a labor union representing workers in the behavioral health field;

(xi) One representative of the association of Washington healthcare plans;

(xii) One representative of sheriffs and police chiefs;

(xiii) One representative of a federally recognized tribe; and

(xiv) One representative of local government.

(b) The work group's evaluation shall include, but is not limited to, the following:

(i) Examining the concept of "safe supply," defined as a legal and regulated supply of mind or body altering substances that traditionally only have been accessible through illicit markets;

(ii) Examining whether there is evidence that a proposed "safe supply" would have an impact on fatal or nonfatal overdose, drug diversion, or associated health and community impacts;

(iii) Examining whether there is evidence that a proposed "safe supply" would be accompanied by increased risks to individuals, the community, or other entities or jurisdictions;

(iv) Examining historical evidence regarding the overprescribing of opioids; and

(v) Examining whether there is evidence that a proposed "safe supply" would be accompanied by any other benefits or consequences.

(c) Staffing for the work group shall be provided by the authority.

(d) The work group shall provide a preliminary report and recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2023, and shall provide a final report by December 1, 2024.

(125) Within existing resources, the authority shall collaborate with the department of social and health services to develop a new program for individuals admitted to a state hospital for purposes of civil commitment under RCW 10.77.086. The program must prioritize the use of assisted outpatient treatment resources for eligible individuals and draw upon existing programs, including the program of assertive community treatment and the governor's opportunity for supportive housing program to provide wraparound services for individuals who may be ready to quickly return to the community following an admission.

(126) $820,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to Island county to maintain crisis stabilization services provided by the Ituha stabilization facility.

(127) $760,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a one-time grant to evergreen treatment services to increase funding for three opioid treatment program mobile medication units. This grant must be used to ensure continued access to mobile medication services in critical areas to address the opioid epidemic.

(128)(a) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,035,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to solicit a provider to operate up to 40 beds at the Olympic heritage behavioral health facility and for the authority to contract with that provider to operate contracted beds beginning March 15, 2025.

(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to conduct a survey of provider interest to determine service options for operating up to 40 beds at the Olympic heritage behavioral health facility, with a target opening date of March 15, 2025. The primary focus of the survey shall be providers able to address the needs of adults with a history or likelihood of criminal legal involvement to reduce the number of people with behavioral health or other diagnoses accessing treatment through the criminal legal system. The survey must seek information from providers, including tribal governments, interested in offering one or more, but not limited to, the following types of services:

(i) Short-term or step down residential behavioral health care, particularly for individuals who may have received treatment or services through crisis stabilization or a 23-hour crisis facility;

(ii) Residential, transitional, or supportive services that would divert individuals from the criminal legal system or emergency departments;

(iii) Substance use or co-occurring treatment, including inpatient or outpatient programming as well as programs designed for the treatment of opioid use disorder; and

(iv) Supportive and residential services for individuals in outpatient competency restoration, subject to assisted outpatient treatment orders or released on personal recognizance while awaiting competency services.

(c) Based upon a review of the survey results and in consultation with the department of social and health services, the authority will develop a recommendation for approval from the office of financial management.

(d) No later than August 1, 2024, upon approval from the office of financial management, the authority shall release a request for proposals to operate up to 40 beds at the Olympic heritage behavioral health facility. The request for proposal shall include, but not be limited to:

(i) The proposed timeline for operations of selected service;

(ii) How the proposal would reduce the number of individuals with behavioral health needs entering the criminal legal system; and

(iii) Additional information solicited in the survey of interest.

(e) The authority must submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2024, detailing the outcomes of the survey and request for proposals and, if applicable, the provider selected for operating the bed capacity and projections related to the provider cost of operating the contracted space.

(f) $885,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 provided in this subsection is provided solely for the authority to contract for services with the provider selected under (d) of this subsection. It is the intent of the legislature to align funding provided for these services with the cost of these services in the 2025 legislative session. Amounts appropriated should not be construed as minimum or maximum amounts available for contracted services and the authority must contract with the provider selected under (d) of this subsection at standard rates for the services offered.

(129) $282,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $253,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6251 (behavioral crisis coord.). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(130) $461,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $462,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6228 (substance use treatment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(131) $248,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $213,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5660 (mental health adv directives). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 216. 2023 c 475 s 216 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($4,799,000))

$4,804,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($4,720,000))

$4,726,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,975,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($12,494,000))

$12,505,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $448,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $420,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for investigative staff to address the commission's caseload backlog.

(2) $77,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5186 (contracting/discrimination). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

Sec. 217. 2023 c 475 s 217 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE BOARD OF INDUSTRIAL INSURANCE APPEALS

Worker and Community Right to Know Fund—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$10,000

Accident Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($27,516,000))

$27,520,000

Medical Aid Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($27,510,000))

$27,514,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($55,036,000))

$55,044,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $650,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $650,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for the board of appeals information system modernization project, and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(2) $47,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $47,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1521 (industrial insurance/duties). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(3) $22,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $21,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5454 (RN PTSD/industrial insurance). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

Sec. 218. 2023 c 475 s 218 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($53,805,000))

$55,096,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($50,466,000))

$58,763,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($11,970,000))

$7,901,000

Death Investigations Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,708,000

Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$460,000

Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
(($7,167,000))

$14,167,000

Washington Internet Crimes Against Children Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,270,000

24/7 Sobriety Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$20,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($127,866,000))

$140,385,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided to the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs solely to verify the address and residency of registered sex offenders and kidnapping offenders under RCW 9A.44.130.

(2) Funding in this section is sufficient for 75 percent of the costs of providing 23 statewide basic law enforcement trainings in each fiscal year 2024 and fiscal year 2025. The criminal justice training commission must schedule its funded classes to minimize wait times throughout each fiscal year and meet statutory wait time requirements. The criminal justice training commission must track and report the average wait time for students at the beginning of each class and provide the findings in an annual report to the legislature due in December of each year. At least three classes must be held in Spokane each year.

(3) The criminal justice training commission may not run a basic law enforcement academy class of fewer than 30 students.

(4) $2,270,000 of the Washington internet crimes against children account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 84, Laws of 2015.

(5) $4,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $4,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the mental health field response team program administered by the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs. The association must distribute $7,000,000 in grants to the phase one and phase two regions as outlined in the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et. al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et. al., U.S. District Court-Western District, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP. The association must submit an annual report to the Governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by September 1st of each year of the biennium. The report shall include best practice recommendations on law enforcement and behavioral health field response and include outcome measures on all grants awarded.

(6) $899,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $899,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for crisis intervention training for the phase one regions as outlined in the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et. al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et. al., U.S. District Court-Western District, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP.

(7) $1,598,000 of the death investigations account—state appropriation is provided solely for the commission to provide 240 hours of medicolegal forensic investigation training to coroners and medical examiners to meet the recommendations of the national commission on forensic science for certification and accreditation.

(8) $346,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of chapter 321, Laws of 2021 (officer duty to intervene).

(9) $30,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $30,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for additional grants to local jurisdictions to investigate instances where a purchase or transfer of a firearm was attempted by an individual who is prohibited from owning or possessing a firearm.

(10) $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the criminal justice training commission to provide grant funding to local law enforcement agencies to support law enforcement wellness programs. Of the amount provided in this subsection:

(a) $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the commission to provide grants to local law enforcement agencies for the purpose of establishing officer wellness programs. Grants provided under this subsection may be used for, but not limited to building resilience, injury prevention, peer support programs, physical fitness, proper nutrition, stress management, suicide prevention, and physical or behavioral health services. The commission must consult with a representative from the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs and a representative of the Washington state fraternal order of police and the Washington council of police and sheriffs in the development of the grant program.

(b) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs to establish and coordinate an online or mobile-based application for any Washington law enforcement officer; 911 operator or dispatcher; and any other current or retired employee of a Washington law enforcement agency, and their families, to anonymously access on-demand wellness techniques, suicide prevention, resilience, physical fitness, nutrition, and other behavioral health and wellness supports.

(11) $290,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $290,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for academy training for limited authority Washington peace officers employed by the Washington state gambling commission, Washington state liquor and cannabis board, Washington state parks and recreation commission, department of natural resources, and the office of the insurance commissioner.

(a) Up to 30 officers must be admitted to attend the basic law enforcement academy and up to 30 officers must be admitted to attend basic law enforcement equivalency academy.

(b) Allocation of the training slots amongst the agencies must be based on the earliest application date to the commission. Training does not need to commence within six months of employment.

(c) The state agencies must reimburse the commission for the actual cost of training.

(12) (($6,687,000))$6,987,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($4,668,000))$4,968,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to establish and provide basic law enforcement academy classes at three new regional training academies, one in Pasco, one in ((Skagit))Snohomish county, and one in Clark county. Funding in this subsection is sufficient for 75 percent of the costs of providing six classes per year beginning in fiscal year 2024. The criminal justice training commission must schedule its funded classes to minimize wait times throughout each fiscal year and meet statutory wait time requirements. The criminal justice training commission must track and report the average wait time for students at the beginning of each class and provide the findings in an annual report to the legislature due in December of each year. The six classes per year are in addition to the classes in subsection (2) of this section.

(13) (($150,000))$120,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 ((is))and $30,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the criminal justice training commission to develop plans for increasing training capacity. The planning process should include engagement with limited law enforcement agencies, tribal law enforcement representatives, and local law enforcement agencies and representatives. The criminal justice training commission will provide recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature in a preliminary report due November 15, 2023, and in a final report due September 30, 2024. The reports should include the following:

(a) Identifying the demand for additional basic law enforcement academy courses to support law enforcement agencies and develop a proposal to meet any identified training needs, including basic law enforcement academy and advanced training needs;

(b) A plan for how to provide basic law enforcement academy training to limited law enforcement officers and tribal law enforcement officers, including providing additional capacity for training classes. The plan should also consider alternatives for distribution of the costs of the training course; and

(c) A plan for providing at least two basic law enforcement training academy classes per year to candidates who are not yet employed with a law enforcement agency. The plan should, at a minimum, include the following:

(i) A recruitment strategy that emphasizes recruitment of diverse candidates from different geographic areas of the state; diverse race, ethnicity, gender, and sexual orientation; and candidates with diverse backgrounds and experiences including nontraditional educational programs or work experience;

(ii) Pathways from training to employment with a law enforcement agency; and

(iii) Plans to address capacity for and delivery of training.

(14) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the criminal justice training commission to provide accreditation incentive awards.

(a) The commission may provide an accreditation incentive award totaling up to $50,000 to each law enforcement agency that receives an accreditation during the fiscal biennium from a national or state accrediting entity recognized by the commission. The commission must divide award amounts provided pursuant to this section equally among qualifying law enforcement agencies. A law enforcement agency may not receive more than one accreditation incentive award per fiscal biennium. Funds received by a law enforcement agency pursuant to this subsection must be made available to the law enforcement agency to which they are awarded and may not supplant or replace existing funding received by the law enforcement agency.

(b) The commission must submit a report to the legislature by June 30th of each fiscal year during the biennium that lists each law enforcement agency that received an accreditation incentive award during the fiscal year.

(15) $1,085,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,040,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1028 (crime victims & witnesses). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(16) $236,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $226,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1132 (limited authority officers). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(17) $1,200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for body camera grant funding to local law enforcement agencies.

(a) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall develop and implement a body-worn camera grant program. The purpose of the program is to assist law enforcement agencies to establish and expand body-worn camera programs.

(b) Law enforcement agencies may use the grants for: (i) The initial purchase, maintenance, and replacement of body-worn cameras; (ii) ongoing costs related to the maintenance and storage of data recorded by body worn cameras; (iii) costs associated with public records requests for body worn-camera footage; and (iv) hiring of personnel necessary to operate a body-worn camera program.

(c) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall develop and implement a grant application process and review applications from agencies based on locally developed proposals to establish or expand body-worn camera programs.

(d) Law enforcement agencies that are awarded grants must:

(i) Comply with the provisions of chapter 10.109 RCW;

(ii) Demonstrate the ability to redact body-worn camera footage consistent with RCW 42.56.240 and other applicable provisions;

(iii) Provide training to officers who will wear body-worn cameras and other personnel associated with implementation of the body-worn camera program; and

(iv) Agree to comply with any data collection and reporting requirements that are established by the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs.

(e) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs must submit an annual report regarding the grant program to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1st of each year the program is funded. The report must be submitted in compliance with RCW 43.01.036.

(18) $381,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $628,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1715 (domestic violence). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(19) $280,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for confidential secretary staff for the training bureau director and the accountability bureau director.

(20) $694,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5780 (public defense & prosecution). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(21) $4,446,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 6242 (law enforcement training). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(22) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the commission to provide training to the Okanogan county sheriff's office. The commission must coordinate with the sheriff's office to provide the training on a date or dates least likely to interrupt the operations of the sheriff's office and the training must take place at a suitable location in Okanogan county. The training must, at a minimum, include best practices for victim centered, trauma-informed policing practices, procedural justice, implicit and explicit bias, trauma-informed investigation and interviewing skills, understanding the lethality potentials of stalking, best practices in serving and enforcing protection orders, investigation of potential violations of protection orders, and assistance to and services for victims and children. The commission is encouraged to utilize existing relevant training materials assembled pursuant to RCW 10.99.033, RCW 43.101.276, and other evidence-based resources as deemed appropriate by the commission. The commission must ensure that the training provides participants an opportunity to practice interviewing skills and receive feedback from instructors. The commission may not insinuate or otherwise communicate that the training is mandatory for any employee of the sheriff's office, but the commission must keep a detailed attendance and participation record for each employee of the sheriff's office who attends. The amounts provided in this subsection, not required for use by the commission to conduct the training listed above, must be made available to reimburse the sheriff's office for any reasonable and necessary overtime costs associated with participating in the training.

Sec. 219. 2023 c 475 s 219 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF INDEPENDENT INVESTIGATIONS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($17,037,000))

$17,049,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($17,211,000))

$18,725,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($34,248,000))

$35,774,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $9,383,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $9,383,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for dedicated staffing at regional offices to include at least regional investigator supervisors, investigators, forensic investigators, family liaisons, and evidence technicians.

(2) $1,124,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,124,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to contract with the Washington state patrol for laboratory-based testing and processing of crime scene evidence collected during investigations.

(3) $251,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $251,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for contracted specialized training for investigators relating to death investigations in cases involving deadly force.

(4) $2,257,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,057,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for training development, additional staff training costs, crime lab processing, and contract services to include polygraphs, background checks, personnel evaluations, contracted security, and software licensing.

(5) $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided for the office to pay for one-time tenant improvements necessary for a central evidence storage facility.

(6) $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided for the office to pay for one-time tenant improvements for two regional offices.

Sec. 220. 2023 c 475 s 220 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($15,789,000))

$17,531,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($19,773,000))

$25,217,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($11,470,000))

$11,521,000

Asbestos Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$629,000

Electrical License Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($71,526,000))

$73,525,000

Farm Labor Contractor Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$28,000

Opioid Abatement Settlement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$250,000

Worker and Community Right to Know Fund—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,138,000

Construction Registration Inspection Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($30,754,000))

$31,189,000

Public Works Administration Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($18,304,000))

$17,763,000

Manufactured Home Installation Training Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$455,000

Accident Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($427,767,000))

$432,165,000

Accident Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($15,823,000))

$19,953,000

Medical Aid Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($414,710,000))

$418,788,000

Medical Aid Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,571,000))

$3,920,000

Plumbing Certificate Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,624,000))

$3,633,000

Pressure Systems Safety Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($5,065,000))

$5,067,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($14,200,000))

$20,440,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,054,876,000))

$1,083,212,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($4,714,000))$6,756,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and (($4,711,000))$6,753,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for the labor and industries workers' compensation information system replacement project and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act. The department must:

(a) Submit quarterly data within 30 calendar days of the end of each quarter, effective July 1, 2023, on:

(i) The quantifiable deliverables accomplished and the amount spent by each deliverable in each of the following subprojects:

(A) Business readiness;

(B) Change readiness;

(C) Commercial off the shelf procurement;

(D) Customer access;

(E) Program foundations;

(F) Independent assessment; and

(G) In total by fiscal year;

(ii) All of the quantifiable deliverables accomplished by subprojects identified in (a)(i)(A) through (F) of this subsection and in total and the associated expenditures by each deliverable by fiscal month;

(iii) The contract full time equivalent charged by subprojects identified in (a)(i)(A) through (F) of this subsection, and in total, compared to the budget spending plan by month for each contracted vendor and what the ensuing contract equivalent budget spending plan by subprojects identified in (a)(i)(A) through (F) of this subsection, and in total, assumes by fiscal month;

(iv) The performance metrics by subprojects identified in (a)(i)(A) through (F) of this subsection, and in total, that are currently used, including monthly performance data; and

(v) The risks identified independently by at least the quality assurance vendor and the office of the chief information officer, and how the project:

(A) Has mitigated each risk; and

(B) Is working to mitigate each risk, and when it will be mitigated;

(b) Submit the report in (a) of this subsection to fiscal and policy committees of the legislature; and

(c) Receive an additional gated project sign off by the office of financial management, effective September 1, 2023. Prior to spending any project funding in this subsection each quarter, there is an additional gate of approval required for this project. The director of financial management must agree that the project shows accountability, effective and appropriate use of the funding, and that risks are being mitigated to the spending and sign off on the spending for the ensuing quarter.

(2) $250,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation and $250,000 of the accident account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department of labor and industries safety and health assessment and research for prevention program to conduct research to address the high injury rates of the janitorial workforce. The research must quantify the physical demands of common janitorial work tasks and assess the safety and health needs of janitorial workers. The research must also identify potential risk factors associated with increased risk of injury in the janitorial workforce and measure workload based on the strain janitorial work tasks place on janitors' bodies. The department must conduct interviews with janitors and their employers to collect information on risk factors, identify the tools, technologies, and methodologies used to complete work, and understand the safety culture and climate of the industry. The department must produce annual progress reports through the year 2025 or until the tools are fully developed and deployed. The annual progress report must be submitted to the governor and legislature by December 1st of each year such report is due.

(3) $258,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $258,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department of labor and industries safety and health assessment research for prevention program to conduct research to prevent the types of work-related injuries that require immediate hospitalization. The department will develop and maintain a tracking system to identify and respond to all immediate in-patient hospitalizations and will examine incidents in defined high-priority areas, as determined from historical data and public priorities. The research must identify and characterize hazardous situations and contributing factors using epidemiological, safety-engineering, and human factors/ergonomics methods. The research must also identify common factors in certain types of workplace injuries that lead to hospitalization. The department must submit a report to the governor and appropriate legislative committees by August 30, 2023, and annually thereafter, summarizing work-related immediate hospitalizations and prevention opportunities, actions that employers and workers can take to make workplaces safer, and ways to avoid severe injuries.

(4)(a) $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to promote workforce development in aerospace and aerospace related supply chain industries by: Expanding the number of registered apprenticeships, preapprenticeships, and aerospace-related programs; and providing support for registered apprenticeships or programs in aerospace and aerospace-related supply chain industries.

(b) Grants awarded under this section may be used for:

(i) Equipment upgrades or new equipment purchases for training purposes;

(ii) New training space and lab locations to support capacity needs and expansion of training to veterans and veteran spouses, and underserved populations;

(iii) Curriculum development and instructor training for industry experts;

(iv) Tuition assistance for degrees in engineering and high-demand degrees that support the aerospace industry; and

(v) Funding to increase capacity and availability of child care options for shift work schedules.

(c) An entity is eligible to receive a grant under this subsection if it is a nonprofit, nongovernmental, or institution of higher education that provides training opportunities, including apprenticeships, preapprenticeships, preemployment training, aerospace-related degree programs, or incumbent worker training to prepare workers for the aerospace and aerospace-related supply chain industries.

(d) The department may use up to 5 percent of these funds for administration of these grants.

(5) $3,774,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $890,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for the creation of an agriculture compliance unit within the division of occupational safety and health. The compliance unit will perform compliance inspections and provide bilingual outreach to agricultural workers and employers.

(6) $1,642,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation is provided solely to cover the overhead rent costs to increase the number of labor and industry vocational specialists embedded in WorkSource offices and to implement a comprehensive quality-assurance team to ensure the continuous improvement of vocational services for injured workers through the workers' compensation program.

(7) $1,798,000 of the public works administration account—state appropriation is provided solely to maintain expanded capacity to investigate and enforce prevailing-wage complaints.

(8) $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the crime victims' compensation program to pay for medical exams for suspected victims of domestic violence. Neither the hospital, medical facility, nor victim is to pay for the cost of the medical exam. This funding must not supplant existing funding for sexual assault medical exams. If the cost of medical exams exceeds the funding provided in this subsection, the program shall not reduce the reimbursement rates for medical providers seeking reimbursement for other claimants, and instead the program shall return to paying for domestic violence medical exams after insurance.

(9)(($1,065,000))(a) $1,209,000 of the construction registration inspection account—state appropriation, (($57,000))$66,000 of the accident account—state appropriation, and (($12,000))$14,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for the conveyance management system replacement project and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(b) $270,000 of the construction registration inspection account—state appropriation, $17,000 of the accident account—state appropriation, and $3,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for the maintenance and operations of the conveyance management system replacement project.

(10) $250,000 of the opioid abatement settlement account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to analyze patients who are maintained on chronic opioids. The department must submit an annual report of its findings to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than October 1st of each year of the fiscal biennium. The report shall include analysis of patient data, describing the characteristics of patients who are maintained on chronic opioids and their clinical needs, and a preliminary evaluation of potential interventions to improve care and reduce harms in this population.

(11) $1,363,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation is provided solely to improve access to medical and vocational providers of the workers' compensation program by expanding the use of navigators to recruit and assist providers in underserved communities and by ensuring access to high quality and reliable interpreter services.

(12) $3,000,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation, $1,870,000 of the accident account—state appropriation, and $330,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department, in coordination with the Washington state apprenticeship council, to administer grants to continue the growth of behavioral health apprenticeship programs. Grants may be awarded for provider implementation costs, apprentice tuition and stipend costs, curriculum development, and program administration. Grant awardees must use a minimum of one-half of amounts provided to compensate behavioral health providers for employer implementation costs including mentor wage differentials, related instruction wages, and administrative costs. In awarding this funding, special preference must be given to entities with experience in implementation of behavioral health sector apprenticeships and labor-management partnerships. By June 30, 2024, and June 30, 2025, grantees must report to the department on the number of individuals that were recruited and upskilled in the preceding fiscal year. The department may use up to five percent of the amount provided in this subsection for administration of these grants.

(13) $1,000,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department, in coordination with the Washington state apprenticeship training council, to administer grants to address the behavioral health workforce shortage through behavioral health preapprenticeship and behavioral health entry level training, including nursing assistant certified programs. Grants may cover program costs including, but not limited to, provider implementation costs, apprentice tuition and stipend costs, curriculum development, and program administration. In awarding this funding, special preference must be given to entities with experience in implementation of behavioral health sector apprenticeships and labor-management partnerships. By June 30, 2024, and June 30, 2025, grantees must report to the department on the number of individuals that were recruited and upskilled in the preceding fiscal year. The department may use up to five percent of the amount provided in this subsection for administration of these grants.

(14)(a) $300,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for certified construction trade preapprenticeship programs that use a nationally approved multicraft curriculum and emphasize construction math, tool use, job safety, equipment, life skills, and financial literacy. The preapprenticeship programs should focus on disadvantaged, nontraditional, and underrepresented populations, and on populations reentering the community from incarceration and houselessness. Funding provided in this subsection may be used to:

(i) Provide incentives for participation in preapprenticeship programs, such as covering program costs, providing stipends to preapprentices, or covering the costs of construction tools; or

(ii) Address barriers for participation in preapprenticeship programs, such as covering costs of child care or transportation, or facilitating interviews for apprenticeship programs.

(b) The department may use up to five percent of the amount provided in (a) of this subsection for administration of these grants.

(15)(a) $400,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants to nonprofit organizations to:

(i) Expand meatcutter registered apprenticeship and preapprenticeship programs to new locations; or

(ii) Develop a new fishmonger registered apprenticeship program.

(b) Grants awarded under this subsection may be used for:

(i) Equipment upgrades or new equipment purchases for training purposes;

(ii) New training space and lab locations to support the expansion and establishment of apprenticeship and preapprenticeship training in new locations;

(iii) Curriculum development, including the creation of elearning content, and instructor training for apprenticeship and preapprenticeship instructors;

(iv) Tuition assistance for apprentices in registered apprenticeship programs accredited by a community or technical college;

(v) Stipends for preapprentices; and

(vi) Apprenticeship and preapprenticeship coordination and administration services.

(c) An entity is eligible to receive a grant under this subsection if it is a nonprofit organization that administers or directly provides apprenticeship and preapprenticeship training opportunities, overseen by a committee with at least one labor union and one employer representative or with an active program with participation of both labor union and employer partners, for retail meatcutters and/or fishmongers.

(d) The department may use up to five percent of the amount provided in this subsection for administration of these grants.

(16) (($6,000,000))$12,000,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to distribute funding to multiemployer nonprofit programs providing apprenticeship education and job training for general journey level (01) electricians to increase funding for related supplemental instruction costs. Funding shall be allocated to programs by formula based on delivered related supplemental instruction hours for active apprentices under chapter 49.04 RCW and operating in compliance for administrative procedures. If a program is partnered with a Washington community or technical college to deliver the related supplemental instruction, the program may apply for up to a 25 percent increase in allocated funding based on the level of contracted support provided by the college. The department may use up to five percent of the amount provided in this subsection for administration of these grants.

(17) (($1,249,000))$873,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and (($507,000))$883,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for the creation of the center for work equity research. The center will study and systematically address employer and employment factors that place historically marginalized workers at increased risk for work-related injuries and illnesses and social and economic hardship.

(18) $2,908,000 of the public works administration account—state appropriation is provided solely for system improvements to the prevailing wage program information technology system. This project is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(19) $205,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $205,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to continue conducting a four-year retention study of state registered apprentices as provided in chapter 156, Laws of 2022 (apprenticeship programs). The study shall include the collection of data from all apprentices three months into their apprenticeship to understand challenges and barriers they face towards program participation. The aggregate data by trade must be displayed on a publicly available dashboard. Study data must be provided with apprenticeship coordinators to implement an early response to connect apprentices with needed supports. The department shall submit an annual report to the governor and appropriate legislative committees on June 30, 2024 and June 30, 2025.

(20) $3,500,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to administer a grant program intended to provide wraparound support services to mitigate barriers to beginning or participating in apprenticeship programs as described in chapter 156, Laws of 2022. Up to five percent of the total funding provided in this subsection may be used to cover administrative expenses.

(21) (($1,963,000))$1,798,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and (($797,000))$960,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely to expand access to worker rights and safety information for workers with limited English proficiency (LEP) through outreach and translation of safety-related information, training, and other materials. $1,000,000 of the amount provided in this subsection is provided solely for grants to community-based organizations to provide workplace rights and safety outreach to underserved workers.

(22) $857,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $855,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for enhancements to the workers' compensation training modules to include strategies on reducing long-term disability among claimants.

(23) $6,702,000 from the electrical license account—state appropriation is provided solely for an additional wage increase for all positions within the electrical construction inspector, electrical construction inspector lead, electrical inspection field supervisor/technical specialist, and electrical plans examiner job class series consistent with the July 1, 2023, range differentials, subject to an agreement between the state and the exclusive collective bargaining representative of the electrical construction inspectors.

(24) $165,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $165,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to an organization in Pierce county experienced in providing peer-to-peer training to continue implementation of a program aimed at reducing workplace sexual harassment in the agricultural sector. The department may use up to five percent of the amount provided in this subsection for administration of this grant. The organization receiving the grant must:

(a) Continue peer-to-peer trainings for farmworkers in Yakima county and expand to provide peer-to-peer trainings for farmworkers in Grant and Benton counties;

(b) Support an established network of peer trainings as farmworker leaders, whose primary purpose is to prevent workplace sexual harassment and assault through leadership, education, and other tools; and

(c) Share best practices from the peer-to-peer model at a statewide conference for farmworkers, industry representatives, and advocates.

(25) $250,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $278,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1197 (workers' comp. providers). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(26) (($1,645,000))$1,088,000 of the public works administration account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1050 (apprenticeship utilization). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(27) (($365,000))$318,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and (($64,000))$56,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1217 (wage complaints). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(28) $105,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $19,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1323 (fire-resistant materials). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(29) $239,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $239,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1521 (industrial insurance/duties). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(30) $256,000 of the construction registration inspection account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1534 (construction consumers). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(31) $1,311,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $243,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1762 (warehouse employees). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(32) $431,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $76,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1013 (regional apprenticeship prgs). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(33) $560,000 of the public works administration account—state appropriation is provided solely to update computer applications for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5088 (contractor registration). This project is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act. ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(34) $84,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $84,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5084 (self-insured pensions/fund). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(35) $226,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $240,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5070 (nonfatal strangulation). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(36) $216,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $37,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5156 (farm internship program). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(37) $1,470,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $260,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5217 (musculoskeletal injuries/L&I). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(38) $354,000 of the public works administration account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5268 (public works procurement). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(39) $234,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $41,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5582 (nurse supply). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(40) $230,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $41,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5111 (sick leave/construction). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(41) $4,663,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $884,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5236 (hospital staffing standards). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(42) (($333,000))$367,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and (($333,000))$369,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5454 (RN PTSD/industrial insurance). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(43) $1,906,000 of the electrical license account—state appropriation is provided solely for electrical inspector staffing to expand capacity to conduct electrical inspections, effective July 1, 2024.

(44) $200,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $200,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department of labor and industries to contract with a third-party vendor to produce a study that assesses post-traumatic stress disorder related workers' compensation policies and claims in Washington and other states. The intent of the study is to inform the department on policy and best practices that improve worker outcomes for law enforcement officers, firefighters, and nurses. The department shall submit a report describing the outcomes, best practices, and recommendations to the governor and appropriate legislative committees by June 30, 2025.

(45) $240,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for a grant to a statewide-serving nonprofit organization providing support services to apprentices and preapprentices for the provision of new work boots and other resources to state recognized apprenticeship preparation participants in correctional facilities and as they transition from incarceration to state registered apprenticeship programs. The work boots and other resources must be within allowable guidelines for incarcerated and community supervised individuals. The department may use up to five percent of the amount provided in this subsection for administration of this grant.

(46) $300,000 of the surgical smoke evacuation nonappropriated account—state appropriation is provided solely to implement the reimbursement requirements established in chapter 129, Laws of 2022.

(47)(a) $470,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department of labor and industries to conduct a study to evaluate all construction-related training programs in Washington correctional facilities and to provide recommendations to strengthen and expand the state recognized preapprenticeship options in construction in those facilities and transitional supports toward enrollment in state registered apprenticeship programs, and to establish a work group facilitated by the department to help guide the development of the study and report on the study findings and recommendations. The work group shall include representatives from the department of corrections, the state board for community and technical colleges, the Washington student achievement council, an organization representing building trades labor organizations, the department of children, youth, and families, and construction-related registered apprenticeship programs. A report detailing the study and the associated recommendations must be submitted to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024.

(b) Of the amount provided in (a) of this subsection:

(i) Up to $150,000 is provided solely to compensate employers for their participation in the work group. The total amount available per employer is $5,000.

(ii) Up to $60,000 is provided to cover information technology and data costs for the state board for community and technical colleges and the department of corrections.

(iii) Up to $50,000 is provided solely for the department to host an apprenticeship coordinator summit in partnership with college corrections navigator and department of corrections.

(48) $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to contract with the municipal research and services center to conduct a public works study. The study shall evaluate the application of public works requirements, including prevailing wage and apprentice utilization, on publicly funded construction, including those supported in part or in whole with state funds, the granting or loaning of public dollars, and tax deferrals or reimbursements. The department may use up to five percent of these funds for administration. A report to the relevant committees of the legislature shall be submitted by June 30, 2025.

(49) $100,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation and $100,000 of the accident account—state appropriation are provided solely for the staffing of a resolution process for complaints regarding light duty work under Title 51 RCW. The department shall submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025, on outcomes related to this funding and data regarding light duty resolution processes provided in this subsection.

(50) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to survey registered apprenticeship programs and assimilate data that documents the fee structure and contractual elements of partnerships between the various registered apprenticeship programs and community and technical college system. This information will be used to inform a report and recommendations to the legislature on registered apprenticeship funding and how this funding is directed to community and technical colleges. The department shall submit a report to the legislature summarizing the survey findings by November 15, 2024.

(51) Within the amounts provided in this section, the department of labor and industries shall provide support to the underground economy task force created in section 906 of this act.

(52) $187,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5368 (stay-at-work program). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(53) $479,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $102,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5793 (paid sick leave). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(54) $8,000 of the plumbing certificate account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5997 (plumbing hours reporting). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(55) $477,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $84,000 of the medical account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6105 (adult entertainment workers). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(56) $44,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $139,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6069 (retirement savings). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(57) $79,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $471,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5937 (crime victims/witnesses). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(58) $50,000 from the electrical license account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to work with the association of Washington cities and associated stakeholders having an interest in the installation and maintenance of electric security alarm systems to identify appropriate pathways to streamline the permitting process and any other recommendations in order to facilitate the installation of these systems in this state. The department shall submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature with its findings and recommendations, in accordance with RCW 43.01.036, by December 15, 2024.

Sec. 221. 2023 c 475 s 221 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

(1) The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The department of veterans affairs shall not initiate any services that will require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys that are unrelated to the coronavirus response and not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys that are unrelated to the coronavirus response, those moneys must be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation that provides appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.

(b) Each year, there is fluctuation in the revenue collected to support the operation of the state veteran homes. When the department has foreknowledge that revenue will decrease, such as from a loss of census or from the elimination of a program, the legislature expects the department to make reasonable efforts to reduce expenditures in a commensurate manner and to demonstrate that it has made such efforts. In response to any request by the department for general fund—state appropriation to backfill a loss of revenue, the legislature shall consider the department's efforts in reducing its expenditures in light of known or anticipated decreases to revenues.

(2) HEADQUARTERS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($4,932,000))

$4,974,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($4,978,000))

$5,022,000

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$10,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($9,920,000))

$10,006,000

(3) FIELD SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($10,998,000))

$11,016,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($10,860,000))

$10,879,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($10,323,000))

$10,328,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($6,538,000))

$6,542,000

Veteran Estate Management Account—Private/Local

Appropriation
. . . .
(($717,000))

$718,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($39,436,000))

$39,483,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $1,200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5358 (veterans' services). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.)) Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(i) $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for one veterans service officer each in Island county, Walla Walla county, Clallam county, and Stevens county.

(b) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to contract with an organization located in Thurston county that has experience in the delivery of no-cost equine therapy for military veterans and active members of the military.

(c) $138,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5268 (public works procurement). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(4) STATE VETERANS HOMES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($25,818,000))

$26,775,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($20,386,000))

$19,995,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($127,227,000))

$136,122,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($17,330,000))

$11,957,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($190,761,000))

$194,849,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) If the department receives additional unanticipated federal resources that are unrelated to the coronavirus response at any point during the remainder of the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, an equal amount of general fund—state must be placed in unallotted status so as not to exceed the total appropriation level specified in this subsection. The department may submit as part of the policy level budget submittal documentation required by RCW 43.88.030 a request to maintain the general fund—state resources that were unallotted as required by this subsection.

(b) Appropriations have been adjusted in this section to reflect anticipated changes in state, federal, and local resources as a result of census changes. The department shall incorporate these adjustments in the governor's projected maintenance level budget required in RCW 43.88.030.

(5) CEMETERY SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$167,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$169,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,055,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,391,000

Sec. 222. 2023 c 475 s 222 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($168,127,000))

$192,851,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($148,005,000))

$174,686,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($589,208,000))

$602,409,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($174,244,000))

$187,854,000

Dedicated Cannabis Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2024)
. . . .
$11,863,000

Dedicated Cannabis Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2025)
. . . .
(($12,356,000))

$12,368,000

Climate Commitment Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($89,552,000))

$90,880,000

Climate Investment Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$902,000

Foundational Public Health Services Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$23,066,000

Hospital Data Collection Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$592,000

Health Professions Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($192,069,000))

$195,627,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$642,000

Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems

Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$10,175,000

Medicaid Fraud Penalty Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$3,027,000

Natural Climate Solutions Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$72,000

((Public Health Supplemental Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$293,000))

Safe Drinking Water Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($8,946,000))

$8,951,000

Drinking Water Assistance Account—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
(($25,867,000))

$25,884,000

Waterworks Operator Certification Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,089,000

Drinking Water Assistance Administrative Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,480,000

Site Closure Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$197,000

Biotoxin Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,773,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($8,953,000))

$15,494,000

Medical Test Site Licensure Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$5,239,000

Secure Drug Take-Back Program Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,474,000

Youth Tobacco and Vapor Products Prevention Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$3,273,000

Public Health Supplemental Account—Private/Local

Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,824,000))

$4,118,000

Accident Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$388,000

Medical Aid Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$58,000

Statewide 988 Behavioral Health Crisis Response Line

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($42,865,000))

$53,045,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
(($27,022,000))

$22,000

Opioid Abatement Settlement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($7,400,000))

$10,773,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,566,041,000))

$1,642,272,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department of health shall not initiate any services that will require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department of health and the state board of health shall not implement any new or amended rules pertaining to primary and secondary school facilities until the rules and a final cost estimate have been presented to the legislature, and the legislature has formally funded implementation of the rules through the omnibus appropriations act or by statute. The department may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation that provides appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.

(2) During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, each person subject to RCW 43.70.110(3)(c) is required to pay only one surcharge of up to $25 annually for the purposes of RCW 43.70.112, regardless of how many professional licenses the person holds.

(3) In accordance with RCW 43.70.110 and 71.24.037, the department is authorized to adopt license and certification fees in fiscal years 2024 and 2025 to support the costs of the regulatory program. The department's fee schedule shall have differential rates for providers with proof of accreditation from organizations that the department has determined to have substantially equivalent standards to those of the department, including but not limited to the joint commission on accreditation of health care organizations, the commission on accreditation of rehabilitation facilities, and the council on accreditation. To reflect the reduced costs associated with regulation of accredited programs, the department's fees for organizations with such proof of accreditation must reflect the lower costs of licensing for these programs than for other organizations which are not accredited.

(4) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, and in accordance with RCW 70.41.100, the department shall set fees to include the full costs of the performance of inspections pursuant to RCW 70.41.080.

(5) In accordance with RCW 43.70.110 and 71.24.037, the department is authorized to adopt fees for the review and approval of mental health and substance use disorder treatment programs in fiscal years 2024 and 2025 as necessary to support the costs of the regulatory program. The department's fee schedule must have differential rates for providers with proof of accreditation from organizations that the department has determined to have substantially equivalent standards to those of the department, including but not limited to the joint commission on accreditation of health care organizations, the commission on accreditation of rehabilitation facilities, and the council on accreditation. To reflect the reduced costs associated with regulation of accredited programs, the department's fees for organizations with such proof of accreditation must reflect the lower cost of licensing for these programs than for other organizations which are not accredited.

(6) The health care authority, the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, the department of health, the department of corrections, and the department of children, youth, and families shall work together within existing resources to establish the health and human services enterprise coalition (the coalition). The coalition, led by the health care authority, must be a multi-organization collaborative that provides strategic direction and federal funding guidance for projects that have cross-organizational or enterprise impact, including information technology projects that affect organizations within the coalition. The office of the chief information officer shall maintain a statewide perspective when collaborating with the coalition to ensure that projects are planned for in a manner that ensures the efficient use of state resources, supports the adoption of a cohesive technology and data architecture, and maximizes federal financial participation. The work of the coalition and any project identified as a coalition project is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(7) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, and in accordance with RCW 43.70.110 and 71.12.470, the department shall set fees to include the full costs of the performance of inspections pursuant to RCW 71.12.485.

(8) $492,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $492,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to coordinate with local health jurisdictions to establish and maintain comprehensive group B programs to ensure safe drinking water. These funds shall be used for implementation costs, including continued development and adoption of rules, policies, and procedures; technical assistance; and training.

(9) $96,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $92,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for community outreach to prepare culturally and linguistically appropriate hepatitis B information in a digital format to be distributed to ethnic and cultural leaders and organizations to share with foreign-born and limited or non-English speaking community networks.

(10) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the Washington ((nursing commission))board of nursing must hire sufficient staff to process applications for nursing licenses so that the time required for processing does not exceed seven days.

(11) $725,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $725,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the Washington poison center. This funding is provided in addition to funding pursuant to RCW 69.50.540.

(12) $622,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $622,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $3,000,000 of the medicaid fraud penalty account—state appropriation are provided solely for the ongoing operations and maintenance of the prescription monitoring program maintained by the department.

(13) $2,265,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,265,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for:

(a) Staffing by the department, the department of veterans affairs, and the department of corrections to expand statewide suicide prevention efforts, which efforts include suicide prevention efforts for military service members and veterans and incarcerated persons;

(b) A suicide prevention public awareness campaign to provide education regarding the signs of suicide, interventions, and resources for support;

(c) Staffing for call centers to support the increased volume of calls to suicide hotlines;

(d) Training for first responders to identify and respond to individuals experiencing suicidal ideation;

(e) Support for tribal suicide prevention efforts;

(f) Strengthening behavioral health and suicide prevention efforts in the agricultural sector;

(g) Support for the three priority areas of the governor's challenge regarding identifying suicide risk among service members and their families, increasing the awareness of resources available to service members and their families, and lethal means safety planning;

(h) Training for community health workers to include culturally informed training for suicide prevention;

(i) Coordination with the office of the superintendent of public instruction; and

(j) Support for the suicide prevention initiative housed in the University of Washington.

(14) $4,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($4,500,000))$4,600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the fruit and vegetable incentives program. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are for the fruit and vegetable prescription program, which provides food as medicine to individuals experiencing food insecurity or are at high risk of developing a chronic health condition.

(15) $627,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $627,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to implement the recommendations from the community health workers task force to provide statewide leadership, training, and integration of community health workers with insurers, health care providers, and public health systems.

(16) $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Washington ((nursing commission))board of nursing to manage a grant process to incentivize nurses to supervise nursing students in health care settings. The goal of the grant program is to create more clinical placements for nursing students to complete required clinical hours to earn their nursing degree and related licensure.

(17) $1,490,000 of the health professional services account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Washington ((nursing commission))board of nursing to continue to implement virtual nursing assistant training and testing modalities, create an apprenticeship pathway into nursing for nursing assistants, implement rule changes to support a career path for nursing assistants, and collaborate with the workforce training and educational coordinating board on a pilot project to transform the culture and practice in long term care settings. The goal of these activities is to expand the nursing workforce for long term care settings.

(18) $186,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $186,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to test for lead in child care facilities to prevent child lead exposure and to research, identify, and connect facilities to financial resources available for remediation costs.

(19) $814,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $814,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to provide grants to support school-based health centers and behavioral health services.

(20) $1,300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to coordinate and lead a multi-agency approach to youth suicide prevention and intervention.

(21)(a) $486,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for maintenance of the community health worker platform and continued implementation of the community health worker trainings in the pediatric setting for children with behavioral health needs.

(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection for fiscal year 2024, $250,000 is provided solely for a grant to a pediatric organization to convene a learning collaborative to support community health workers to ensure their success while on the job with their multidisciplinary clinic teams and for the development of this new integrated health care worker field.

(22) $1,390,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,378,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the child profile health promotion notification system.

(23) $5,000,000 of the opioid abatement settlement account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to expand the distribution of naloxone through the department's overdose education and naloxone distribution program. Funding must be prioritized to fill naloxone access gaps in community behavioral health and other community settings, including providing naloxone to first responders and agency staff in organizations such as syringe service programs, house providers, and street outreach programs.

(24) $2,000,000 of the opioid abatement settlement account—state appropriation is provided solely for prevention, treatment, and recovery support services to remediate the impacts of the opioid epidemic. This funding must be used consistent with conditions of the opioid settlement agreements that direct how funds deposited into the opioid abatement settlement account created in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5293 must be used.

(25) $400,000 of the opioid abatement settlement account—state appropriation is provided solely for the completion of work identified in the state opioid response plan related to maternal and infant health.

(26)(a) $10,000,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely to support and administer a workplace health and safety program for workers who are affected by climate impacts, including but not limited to, extreme heat and cold, wildfire smoke, drought, and flooding. This program will focus on workplace health and safety for farmworkers, construction workers, and other workers who face the most risk from climate-related impacts. This amount shall be limited to supporting vulnerable populations in overburdened communities under the climate commitment act as defined in RCW 70A.65.010. Funding shall be provided for:

(i) Pass through grants to community-based organizations, tribal governments, and tribal organizations to support workplace health and safety for workers who are burdened by the intersection of their work and climate impacts; and

(ii) Procurement and distribution of equipment and resources for workers who are burdened by the intersection of their work and climate impacts directly by the department of health, or through pass-through grants to community-based organizations, tribal governments, and tribal organizations. Equipment and resources may include but are not limited to: Personal protective equipment, other protective or safety clothing for cold and heat, air purifiers for the workplace or worker housing, protection from ticks and mosquitoes, and heating and cooling devices.

(b) The department of health, in consultation with the environmental justice council, community groups, and the department of labor and industries, shall evaluate mechanisms to provide workers with financial assistance to cover lost wages or other financial hardships caused by extreme weather events and climate threats.

(c) No more than five percent of this funding may be used to administer this grant program.

(27) (($5,996,000))$7,174,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation, of which $1,178,000 takes effect January 1, 2025, is provided solely for the department to implement the healthy environment for all act under chapter 70A.02 RCW, including additional staff and support for the environmental justice council and implementation of a community engagement plan.

(28)(a) $26,355,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to administer capacity grants to tribes and tribal organizations and to overburdened communities and vulnerable populations to provide guidance and input:

(i) To agencies and to the environmental justice council on implementation of the healthy environment for all act; and

(ii) To the department on updates to the environmental health disparities map.

(b) At least 50 percent of the total amount distributed for capacity grants in this subsection must be reserved for grants to tribes and tribal organizations.

(c) Funding provided in this subsection may be used for tribes and tribal organizations to hire staff or to contract with consultants to engage in updating the environmental health disparities map or on implementing the healthy environment for all act.

(d) The department may use a reasonable amount of funding provided in this subsection to administer the grants.

(29) $17,752,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely to sustain information technology infrastructure, tools, and solutions developed to respond to the COVID-19 pandemic. The department shall submit a plan to the office of financial management by September 15, 2023, that identifies a new funding strategy to maintain these information technology investments within the department's existing state, local, and federal funding. Of this amount, a sufficient amount is appropriated for the department to create an implementation plan for real-time bed capacity and tracking for hospitals and skilled nursing facilities, excluding behavioral health hospitals and facilities. The department will provide the implementation plan and estimated cost for an information technology system and implementation costs to the office of financial management by September 15, 2023, for the bed capacity and tracking tool.

(30) $20,000,000 of the ((coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal))general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely to support COVID-19 public health and response activities. The department must continue to distribute COVID-19 testing supplies to agricultural workers and tribal governments. The department must submit a spending plan to the office of financial management for approval. These funds may only be allocated and expended after approval of the spending plan.

(31) $7,657,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $7,853,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for programs and grants to maintain access to abortion care. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) $2,939,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,939,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to providers of abortion care;

(b) $368,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $364,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for outreach, patient navigation, staffing at the department, and training;

(c) $4,100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $4,300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to providers of abortion care who participate in the department's sexual and reproductive health program for workforce retention and recruitment initiatives to ensure continuity of services; and

(d) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to providers of abortion care that participate in the department's sexual and reproductive health program for security investments.

(32) $285,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $295,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $214,000 of the general fund—private/local appropriation are provided solely for the behavioral health agency program for licensure and regulatory activities.

(33) $104,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $104,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $42,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department to conduct credentialing and inspections under chapter 324, Laws of 2019 (behavioral health facilities).

(34) (($3,298,000))$1,398,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 ((is))and $1,900,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the breast, cervical and colon screening program, comprehensive cancer community partnerships, and Washington state cancer registry.

(35) $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for continued implementation of chapter 58, Laws of 2022 (cardiac & stroke response).

(36) $671,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $329,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the care-a-van mobile health program.

(37) $702,000 of the climate investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 316, Laws of 2021 (climate commitment act).

(38) $200,000 of the climate investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the environmental justice council to coordinate with the department of ecology on a process to track state agency expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as described in section 302(13) of this act. Funding is for the following as they relate to development of the department of ecology process:

(a) Public engagement with tribes and vulnerable populations within the boundaries of overburdened communities; and

(b) Cost recovery or stipends for participants in the public process to reduce barriers to participation, as described in RCW 43.03.220.

(39) $31,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $31,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 204, Laws of 2022 (truck drivers/restrooms).

(40) $808,000 of the drinking water assistance administrative account—state appropriation is provided solely for the water system consolidation grant program.

(41) $1,044,000 of the safe drinking water account—state appropriation is provided solely for the drinking water technical services program.

(42) $288,000 of the secure drug take-back program account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 155, Laws of 2021 (drug take-back programs).

(43) $7,146,000 of the drinking water assistance account—federal appropriation is provided solely for the office of drinking water to provide technical assistance, direct engineering support, and construction management to small water systems.

(44) $381,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $607,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the early hearing detection, diagnosis, and intervention program.

(45) $954,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $686,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5263 (psilocybin). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(46) (($12,466,000))$26,096,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for the regulation of health professions.

(47) $599,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for ongoing maintenance of the HEALWA web portal to provide access to health information for health care providers.

(48) $1,359,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $680,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $680,000 of the general fund—private/local appropriation are provided solely for the department to perform investigations to address the backlog of hospital complaints.

(49) $12,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 204, Laws of 2021 (international medical grads).

(50) $634,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to onboard systems to, and maintain, the master person index as part of the health and human services coalition master person index initiative, and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(51) $2,062,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,454,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to complete upgrades to the medical cannabis authorization database to improve reporting functions and accessibility, and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(52) $1,865,000 of the medical test site licensure account—state appropriation is provided solely for the medical test site regulatory program for inspections and other regulatory activities.

(53) $2,276,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for the ((nursing care quality assurance commission))Washington board of nursing for nursing licensure and other regulatory activities.

(54) $813,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $811,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to assist with access to safe drinking water for homes and businesses with individual wells or small water systems that are contaminated.

(55) $146,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 264, Laws of 2022 (chemicals/consumer products).

(56) $1,150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to expand the birth equity project with the goal of reducing prenatal and perinatal health disparities.

(57) $1,738,000 of the general fund—private/local appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 115, Laws of 2020 (psychiatric patient safety).

(58) $23,066,000 of the foundational public health services account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to maintain the RAINIER (reporting array for incident, noninfectious and infectious event response) suite, RHINO (rapid health information network) program, WAIIS (Washington immunization information system) system, and data exchange services.

(59) $7,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $7,355,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and (($7,022,000))$22,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery—federal appropriation are provided solely for operation of the statewide medical logistics center. Within these amounts, the department must coordinate with the department of social and health services to develop processes that will minimize the disposal and destruction of personal protective equipment and for interagency distribution of personal protective equipment.

(60) $315,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $315,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to operate the universal development screening system.

(61) $2,000,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation and $293,000 of the public health supplemental account—state appropriation are provided solely for the Washington medical commission for regulatory activities, administration, and addressing equity issues in processes and policies.

(62) (($200,000))$250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department, in collaboration with the Washington medical coordination center, to create an implementation plan for real-time bed capacity and tracking for hospitals. The department must provide the implementation plan and estimated costs for the bed capacity and tracing tool to the office of the governor and the office of financial management by ((September 15, 2023))September 1, 2024.

(63) $48,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Puget Sound clean air agency to coordinate meetings with local health jurisdictions in King, Pierce, Snohomish, and Kitsap counties to better understand air quality issues, align messaging, and facilitate delivery of ready-to-go air quality and health interventions. The amount provided in this subsection may be used for agency staff time, meetings and events, outreach materials, and tangible air quality and health interventions.

(64) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the midwifery licensure and regulatory program to supplement revenue from fees. The department shall charge no more than $525 annually for new or renewed licenses for the midwifery program.

(65) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the office of radiation protection to conduct a review of the state's readiness for licensing fusion energy projects. The legislature intends for Washington to support the deployment of fusion energy projects and larger research facilities by taking a leading role in the licensing of future fusion power plants. The department, in consultation with relevant state-level regulatory agencies, must review and provide recommendations and costs estimates for the necessary staffing and technical resources to fulfill the state's registration, inspection, and licensure obligations. The department must report its findings and any recommendations to the governor and appropriate legislative committees by December 1, 2023.

(66) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for blood supply relief. The department must distribute this amount equally between the four largest nonprofit blood donation organizations operating in the state. The amounts distributed may be used only for activities to rebuild the state's blood supply, including increased staffing support for donation centers and mobile blood drives.

(67) $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for tobacco, vapor product, and nicotine control, cessation, treatment, and prevention, and other substance use prevention and education, with an emphasis on community-based strategies. These strategies must include programs that consider the disparate impacts of nicotine addiction on specific populations, including youth and racial or other disparities.

(68) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for an existing program that works with community members and partners to bridge health equity gaps to establish a pilot health care program in Pierce county to serve the unique needs of the African American community, including addressing diabetes, high blood pressure, low birth weight, and health care for preventable medical, dental, and behavioral health diagnoses.

(69) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to Island county to contract for a study of cost-effective waste treatment solutions, as an alternative to septic and sewer, for unincorporated parts of Island county. The study must:

(a) Identify any regulatory barriers to the use of alternative technology-based solutions;

(b) Include an opportunity for review and consultation by the department; and

(c) Include any recommendations from the department in the final report.

(70) $2,656,000 of the general fund—private/local appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide cystic fibrosis DNA testing and to engage with a courier service to transport specimens to the public health laboratory.

(71) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely in support of the department's activities pursuant to chapter 226, Laws of 2016 (commonly known as the caregiver advise, record, enable act). This funding must be used to:

(a) Create a communication campaign to notify hospitals across the state of available resources to support family caregivers;

(b) Curate or create a set of online training videos on common caregiving tasks including, but not limited to, medication management, injections, nebulizers, wound care, and transfers; and

(c) Provide information to patients and family caregivers upon admission.

(72) $29,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1275 (athletic trainers). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(73) $126,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1001 (audiology & speech compact). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(74) $9,157,000 of the statewide 988 behavioral health crisis response line account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1134 (988 system). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(75) $1,016,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $453,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, $30,000 of the general fund—private/local appropriation, and $676,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1724 (behavioral health workforce). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(76) $72,000 of the natural climate solutions account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1170 (climate response strategy). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(77) $418,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1047 (cosmetic product chemicals). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(78) $46,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1466 (dental auxiliaries). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(79) $12,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1287 (dental hygienists). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(80) $136,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $193,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1678 (dental therapists). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(81) $158,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1576 (dentist compact). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(82) $4,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $700,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1503 (health care licenses/info.). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(83) $29,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $124,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1255 (health care prof. SUD prg.). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(84) $48,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1694 (home care workforce shortage). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(85) $282,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1039 (intramuscular needling). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(86) $1,892,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,895,000 of the general fund—private/local appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5236 (hospital staffing standards). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(87) $407,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1181 (climate change/planning). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(88) $65,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1073 (medical assistants). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(89) $447,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $448,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1452 (medical reserve corps). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(90) $195,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1069 (mental health counselor comp). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(91) $158,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1009 (military spouse employment). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(92) (($400,000))$165,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($165,000))$400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1457 (motor carriers/restrooms). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(93) $126,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($102,000))$202,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $81,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1247 (music therapists). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(94) $39,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $119,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1271 (organ transport vehicles). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(95) (($862,000))$627,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($526,000))$761,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1470 (private detention facilities). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(96) $97,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $27,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1230 (school websites/drug info.). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(97) $77,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $76,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1578 (wildland fire safety). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(98) $2,773,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,773,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grant funding and administrative costs for the school-based health center program established in chapter 68, Laws of 2021 (school-based health centers).

(99) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to contract with a community-based nonprofit organization located in the Yakima Valley to continue a Spanish-language public radio media campaign aimed at providing education on the COVID-19 pandemic through an outreach program. The goal of the radio media campaign is to reach residents considered "essential workers," including but not limited to farmworkers, and provide information on health and safety guidelines, promote vaccination events, and increase vaccine confidence. The nonprofit organization must coordinate with medical professionals and other stakeholders on the content of the radio media campaign. The department, in coordination with the nonprofit, must provide a preliminary report to the legislature no later than December 31, 2024. A final report to the legislature must be submitted no later than June 30, 2025. Both reports must include: (a) A description of the outreach program and its implementation; (b) the number of individuals reached through the outreach program; and (c) any relevant demographic data regarding those individuals.

(100) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to contract with an equity consultant to evaluate the effect of changes made by, and vulnerabilities in, Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5179 (death with dignity act). The consultant shall partner with interested parties, vulnerable populations, and communities of color to solicit feedback on barriers to accessing the provisions of the act, any unintended consequences, and any challenges and vulnerabilities in the provision of services under the act, recommendations on ways to improve data collection, and recommendations on additional measures to be reported to the department. The department must report the findings and recommendations to the legislature by June 30, 2025.

(101) $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for a rural nursing workforce initiative to create a hub for students to remain in rural environments while working toward nursing credentials, including for program personnel, support, and a rural nursing needs assessment. Funding is provided to develop a program based on the rural nursing needs assessment.

(102)(a) $1,393,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants to King county to address the disproportionate rates of asthma among children who reside within 10 miles of the Seattle-Tacoma international airport.

(b) Of the amount provided in this subsection, $971,000 is provided to increase access to community health worker asthma interventions.

(c) Of the amount provided in this subsection, $412,000 is for an independent investigation of the added benefit of indoor air quality interventions, including high efficiency particulate air filters, on disparities in indoor air pollution.

(d) Of the amount provided in this subsection, $10,000 is for a regional data analysis and surveillance of asthma diagnoses and hospitalizations in King county.

(e) The county may contract with the University of Washington for the work described in (c) and (d) of this subsection.

(103) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to continue the collaboration between the local public health jurisdiction, related accountable communities of health, and health care providers to reduce potentially preventable hospitalizations in Pierce county. This collaboration will build from the first three years of the project, planning to align care coordination efforts across health care systems and support the related accountable communities of health initiatives, including innovative, collaborative models of care. Strategies to reduce costly hospitalizations include the following: (a) Working with partners to prevent chronic disease; (b) improving heart failure rates; (c) incorporating community health workers as part of the health care team and improving care coordination; (d) supporting the COVID-19 response with improved access to immunizations; and (e) the use of community health workers to provide necessary resources to prevent hospitalization of people who are in isolation and quarantine. By December 15, 2024, the members of the collaboration shall report to the legislature regarding the effectiveness of each of the strategies identified in this subsection. In addition, the report shall describe the most significant challenges and make further recommendations for reducing costly hospitalizations.

(104) $70,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $30,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to contract with a community-based organization to host a deliberative democratic processes workshop for the HEAL act interagency work group established under RCW 70A.02.110, then develop, in consultation with environmental justice council or its staff, best practices for how agencies can incorporate deliberative democratic processes into community engagement practices.

(105) $1,305,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the climate health adaptation initiative.

(106) $65,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5179 (death with dignity act). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(107) $604,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $552,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5582 (nurse supply). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(108) $95,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5389 (optometry). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(109) $1,205,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5499 (multistate nurse licensure). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(110) $30,000 of the general fund state—appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $52,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5547 (nursing pool transparency). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(111) $32,000 of the general fund—private/local appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5569 (kidney disease centers). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(112) $446,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $441,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5453 (female genital mutilation). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(113) $466,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $487,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5278 (home care aide certification). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(114) $131,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $91,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5523 (forensic pathologist). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(115) $36,000 of the general fund—private/local appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5515 (child abuse and neglect). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(116) $339,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $485,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5555 (certified peer specialists). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(117) $198,000 of the general fund—private/local appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5120 (crisis relief centers). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(118) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $207,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $133,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5189 (behavioral health support). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(119) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department of health to provide grants to federally qualified health centers (FQHCs) for the purchase of long-acting reversible contraceptives (LARCs). For LARCs purchased with the funding provided in this subsection, FQHCs shall provide patients with LARCs the same day they are seeking that family planning option.

(a) The department shall develop criteria for how the grant dollars will be distributed, including that FQHCs are required to participate in contraceptive training related to patient-centered care, shared decision making, and reproductive bias and coercion.

(b) The department shall survey the FQHCs participating in the grant program regarding the use of LARCs by their patients, as compared to the two years prior to participation in the grant program, and report the results of the survey to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2025.

(120) $63,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department to utilize materials from the "count the kicks" program in designing, preparing, and making available online written materials to inform health care providers and staff of evidence-based research and practices that reduce the incident of stillbirth, by December 31, 2023.

(121) $351,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $624,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Snohomish county health department to convene a leadership planning group that will:

(a) Conduct a landscape analysis of current sexually transmitted infection, postexposure prophylaxis, preexposure prophylaxis, and hepatitis B virus services and identify treatment improvements for HIV preexposure prophylaxis;

(b) Establish sexually transmitted infection clinical services at the Snohomish county health department and identify opportunities to expand sexual health services provided outside of clinical settings;

(c) Conduct research on opportunities to expand jail-based sexual health services;

(d) Establish an epidemiology and technical team;

(e) Expand field-based treatment for syphilis; and

(f) Establish an in-house comprehensive, culturally responsive sexual health clinic at the Snohomish county health department.

(122) $49,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $53,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1216 (clean energy siting). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(123) $5,496,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide grants to school districts making updates to existing heating, venting, and air conditioning systems using small district modernization grants.

(124) $38,600,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to develop a grant program to fund projects that benefit overburdened communities as defined in RCW 70A.02.010(11). Of the amount provided in this subsection:

(a) $6,000,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely ((for fiscal year 2024)) for the department and the environmental justice council created in RCW 70A.02.110 to engage in a participatory budgeting process with at least five geographically diverse overburdened communities, as identified by the department, to develop a process to select and fund projects that mitigate the disproportional impacts of climate change on overburdened communities. The process must allow for full community engagement and develop criteria for eligible entities and projects and establish priorities to achieve the greatest gain for decarbonization and resiliency. A report of the outcomes of the participatory budgeting process detailing its recommendations for funding as well as future improvements to the participatory budgeting process must be provided to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2023.

(b) $32,600,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely ((for fiscal year 2025)) for the department to provide grants that benefit overburdened communities. The department must submit to the governor and the legislature a ranked list of projects consistent with the recommendations developed in (a) of this subsection. The department shall not sign contracts or otherwise financially obligate funds under this section until the legislature has approved a specific list of projects.

(125) $5,430,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $5,326,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to maintain the current level of credentialing staff until the completion of the study on fees by Results WA.

(126) $280,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $280,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to contract with the central nursing resource center established in RCW 18.79.202 to facilitate communication between nursing education programs and health care facilities that offer clinical placements for the purpose of increasing clinical education and practice experiences for nursing students. The department shall contract with the central nursing resource center to:

(a) Gather data to assess current clinical placement practices, opportunities, and needs;

(b) Identify all approved nursing education programs and health care facilities that offer clinical placement opportunities in the state;

(c) Convene and facilitate quarterly stakeholder meetings between representatives from approved nursing education programs and health care facilities that offer clinical placement opportunities, and other relevant stakeholders, in order to:

(i) Connect representatives by region;

(ii) Facilitate discussions between representatives, by region, to determine:

(A) Clinical placement barriers;

(B) The number and types of clinical placement opportunities needed; and

(C) The number and types of clinical placement opportunities available; and

(iii) Develop strategies to resolve clinical placement barriers;

(d) Provide a digital message board and communication platform representatives can use to maintain ongoing communication and clinical placement needs and opportunities;

(e) Identify other policy options and recommendations to help increase the number of clinical placement opportunities, if possible; and

(f) Submit a report of findings, progress, and recommendations to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2025.

(127) $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department of health to contract with an organization located in Thurston county that dedicates itself to the promotion of education, holistic health, and trauma healing in the African American community to provide behavioral health education, mental wellness training, evidence based health programs, events, and conferences to individuals, youth/adults, parents/parent partners, and families, that have suffered from generational and systemic racism. In conducting this work, the organization will engage diverse individuals in racial healing and reparative justice in the field of mental wellness. The organization will also prioritize mental health equity and reparative justice in their work to eradicate health disparities that African American communities have faced due to generational racism.

(128) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1745 (diversity in clinical trials). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(129) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for three full-time emergency medical technicians and other resources necessary for the Franklin county public health district to provide health services as part of medical transport operations services, including services to the Coyote Ridge corrections center.

(130) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to conduct an analysis of the certificate of need program established under chapter 70.38 RCW and report its findings and recommendations for statutory updates to the governor and appropriate legislative committees by June 30, 2025. The department must, at a minimum, consider other state approaches to certificate of need, impacts on access to care, cost control of health services, and equity, and approaches to identifying health care service needs at the statewide and community levels.

(131) $9,982,000 of the statewide 988 behavioral health crisis response line account—state appropriation is provided solely for the 988 technology platform implementation project as described in RCW 71.24.890(5)(a). This amount is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements provided in section 701 of this act and any requirements as established in Senate Bill No. 6308 (extending timelines for implementation of the 988 system). The department must actively collaborate with consolidated technology services and the health care authority so that the statewide 988 technology solutions will be coordinated and interoperable.

(132) $750,000 of the opioid abatement settlement account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with rise above, a native youth focused nonprofit organization. The contract is exempt from the competitive procurement requirements in chapter 39.26 RCW.

(133)(a) $15,953,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $13,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to maintain public health information technology infrastructure in a cloud-based environment.

(b) The department shall develop an initial plan to identify efficiencies in the cloud-based environment and submit it to the office of financial management and the office of the chief information officer by October 1, 2024. The plan should include, at a minimum, strategies to identify efficiencies within the cloud-based environment; new funding strategies for cloud technology for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium budget; an update on the department's cloud road map that identifies key systems that will be modernized, consolidated, and migrated or implemented in the cloud; an overview of existing public health technology data systems in the cloud and data systems that are scheduled to transition to the cloud with an estimated implementation schedule, including a summary of data retention policies; and strategies to minimize cost increases where possible through efficient implementation strategies.

(134) $1,000,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely to implement actions provided in the nitrate water hazard mitigation plan to support safe drinking water in the lower Yakima valley. Implementation of this plan includes, but is not limited to, education and outreach, well testing, and provision of alternate water supplies. The department may contract with local governments, local health jurisdictions, and nonprofit organizations to administer the plan.

(135) $5,000,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide grants to entities that operate supportive housing or shelter programs for the purposes of remediating hazards related to chemical or hazardous material contamination.

(136) $154,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and, effective January 1, 2025, $150,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation are provided solely to support health equity zones, as defined in RCW 43.70.595, for identification and implementation of targeted interventions to have a significant impact on health outcomes and health disparities. Use of the climate commitment account—state appropriation must be for permitted uses defined in RCW 70A.65.260.

(137) $112,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 6166 (pesticide application comm.). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(138) $49,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5184 (anesthesiologist assistants). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(139) $10,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5815 (physician assistant compact). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(140) $95,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5880 (MRI technologists). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(141) $29,000 of the general fund—private/local appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5920 (psychiatric/cert. of need). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(142) $29,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5940 (medical assistant-EMT cert.). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(143) $29,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5983 (syphilis treatment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(144) $161,000 of the general fund—private/local appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6101 (hospital at-home services). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(145) $215,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 6234 (newborn screening for BCKDK). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(146) $198,000 of the statewide 988 behavioral health crisis response line account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6251 (behavioral crisis coord.). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(147) $67,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6228 (substance use treatment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(148) $49,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5986 (out-of-network health costs). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(149) $59,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5271 (DOH facilities/enforcement). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(150)(a) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely to review and update the rules for school environmental health and safety. The state board of health and the department shall conduct the review in collaboration with a multi-disciplinary technical advisory committee. The proposed new rules shall establish the minimum statewide health and safety standards for schools. In developing proposed rules, the state board of health shall:

(i) Convene and consult with an advisory committee consisting of, at minimum, representatives from:

(A) The office of the superintendent of public instruction;

(B) Small and large school districts;

(C) The Washington association of school administrators;

(D) The Washington state school directors' association;

(E) The Washington association of maintenance and operations administrators; and

(F) The Washington association of school business officials;

(ii) Collaborate with the office of the superintendent of public institution and develop a fiscal analysis regarding proposed rules that considers the size of school districts, regional cost differences, range of costs for implementing the proposed rules by section or subject area, and any other variables that may affect costs as identified by the advisory committee; and

(iii) Assist the department in completing environmental justice assessments on any proposed rules.

(b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, the department, the state board of health, the advisory committee, and local health jurisdictions shall work collaboratively to develop and provide a report to the office of the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025, detailing prioritized sections or subject areas of the proposed rules that will provide the greatest health and safety benefits for students, the order in which they should be implemented, and any additional recommendations for implementation.

(151)(a) $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to contract with an independent third-party consultant to review the department's commercial shellfish regulatory program, including licensing, testing, and certification practices and requirements. The consultant must assess how the department sets commercial shellfish fees under RCW 43.70.250.

(i) The consultant must seek input from the department, the commercial shellfish industry, and tribes and must consider:

(A) Data sources and methods used by the department in setting or proposing increases to commercial shellfish fees; 

(B) All costs associated with administering the department's regulatory authority over the testing of shellfish, the certification of operations and the issuance of licenses, and issuing export certificates for the commercial shellfish industry;

(C) Activities conducted by the department related to regulating the shellfish industry's regulatory activities that should be exempt from inclusion in the fee; and

(D) Relevant fees, methods, and considerations from other states that regulate the commercial shellfish industry under the Model Ordinance of the Interstate Shellfish Sanitation Conference for comparable services the department is providing the shellfish industry.

(ii) The consultant must also evaluate the viability of the industry to support full cost recovery as required under RCW 43.70.250 and recommend strategies to address any shortfalls. The consultant shall submit a report to the governor and legislature by June 30, 2025.

(b) Using the amounts provided in this subsection, the department shall also contract with a LEAN management consultant to review the shellfish licensing and certification program to identify program improvements and consider methods to offer data transparency to the industry and measures to potentially reduce program administration costs. The LEAN assessment must be completed and provided to the department by June 30, 2025.

(c) The department shall not increase commercial shellfish fees under RCW 43.70.250 during fiscal year 2025.

(152)(a) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to collaborate with the department of commerce to assess the need for and feasibility of a statewide low-income assistance program for water utility customers. The study must include, but is not limited to:

(i) A summary of existing local, state, and federal low-income assistance;

(ii) A review of low-income populations' water utility service cost burden; and

(iii) Recommendations for the design of a statewide drinking water and wastewater utility assistance program, which must include:

(A) Ongoing data collection on water-related assistance need of households;

(B) Intake coordination and data sharing across statewide programs serving low-income households;

(C) Program eligibility;

(D) Multilingual services;

(E) Outreach and community engagement;

(F) Program administration;

(G) Funding; and

(H) Reporting.

(b) Before commencing the study, the department of health and the department of commerce must convene a stakeholder group to advise the agencies throughout the study. The stakeholder group must include representatives from the governor's office, low-income advocates, wastewater system operators, drinking water system operators, and other interested parties.

(c) By June 30, 2025, the department must submit the study to the appropriate committees of the legislature.

(153) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to cancer pathways to provide cancer risk reduction education classes in K-12 schools, treatment and prevention education, and to implement a program to address cancer in the workplace.

(154) $465,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to a Washington-based organization with expertise in end-of-life care and in the requirements of chapter 70.245 RCW, to provide training, outreach, and education to medical professionals, hospice teams, and other Washingtonians, to support the provision of care under chapter 70.245 RCW.

(155) $168,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to coordinate work related to dementia, including but not limited to:

(a) Coordinating dementia-related activities with the department of social and health services, the health care authority, and other state agencies as needed;

(b) Implementing recommendations from the dementia action collaborative in the updated state Alzheimer's plan within the department; and

(c) Other dementia-related activities as determined by the secretary.

(156) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5629 (hepatitis B and C). The amount provided is for the department to design an awareness campaign regarding hepatitis B and C. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(157) $2,623,000 of opioid abatement settlement account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5906 (drug overdose prevention). The amount provided is for implementation of a drug overdose prevention campaign for youth and adults. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(158) $162,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6286 (nurse anesthetist workforce). The amount provided is for the department to provide grants to certified registered nurse anesthetists that precept nurse anesthesia residents. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(159) $3,172,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementing improvements to licensure processes. Improvements may include, but are not limited to, updating internal policies and procedures, creating web-based tutorials for applicants, updating existing web content for applicants, and researching the feasibility of live chat technology for applicants.

(160) $972,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5937 (crime victims/witnesses). The amount provided is for creation of the statewide forensic nurse coordination program. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(161) $384,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6109 (children and families). Of the amount provided in this subsection, $359,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is for two full-time equivalent staff to provide health education to the Latinx community. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(162) $132,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6110 (child fatalities). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(163) $114,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5829 (congenital cytomegalovirus). The amount provided is for the department to develop, translate, and distribute educational materials regarding congenital cytomegalovirus. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(164) $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6127 (HIV prophylaxis). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(165) $134,000 of the general fund—private/local appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5853 (behav crisis services/minors). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 223. 2023 c 475 s 223 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

The health care authority, the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, the department of health, the department of corrections, and the department of children, youth, and families shall work together within existing resources to establish the health and human services enterprise coalition (the coalition). The coalition, led by the health care authority, must be a multiorganization collaborative that provides strategic direction and federal funding guidance for projects that have cross-organizational or enterprise impact, including information technology projects that affect organizations within the coalition. The office of the chief information officer shall maintain a statewide perspective when collaborating with the coalition to ensure that the development of projects identified in this report are planned for in a manner that ensures the efficient use of state resources and maximizes federal financial participation. The work of the coalition and any project identified as a coalition project is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

The appropriations to the department of corrections in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, 2024, after approval by the director of financial management and unless specifically prohibited by this act, the department may transfer general fund—state appropriations for fiscal year 2024 between programs. The department may not transfer funds, and the director of financial management may not approve the transfer, unless the transfer is consistent with the objective of conserving, to the maximum extent possible, the expenditure of state funds. The director of financial management shall notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature in writing seven days prior to approving any deviations from appropriation levels. The written notification must include a narrative explanation and justification of the changes, along with expenditures and allotments by budget unit and appropriation, both before and after any allotment modifications or transfers.

(1) ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($96,389,000))

$100,912,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($95,589,000))

$101,146,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$400,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$168,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($192,378,000))

$202,626,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) (($819,000))$1,959,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($58,000))$169,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to acquire and implement a sentencing calculation module for the offender management network information system and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act. This project must use one discrete organizational index across all department of corrections programs. Implementation of this sentencing calculation module must result in a reduction of tolling staff within six months of the project implementation date and the department must report this result. In addition, the report must include the budgeted and actual tolling staffing levels by fiscal month beginning with fiscal year 2023 and the count of tolling staff reduced by fiscal month from date of implementation through six months post implementation. The report must be submitted to the senate ways and means and house appropriations committees within 30 calendar days after six months post implementation.

(b) $445,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $452,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for restrictive housing to reduce the use of solitary confinement by increasing correctional staffing, incorporating mental health training, and implementing change to restrictive housing environments.

(c) $932,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $434,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the amend collaboration and training statewide program administration team.

(d) $2,056,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,056,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for reentry investments to include reentry and discharge services. The staffing and resources must provide expanded reentry and discharge services to include, but not limited to, transition services, preemployment testing, enhanced discharge planning, housing voucher assistance, cognitive behavioral interventions, educational programming, and community partnership programs.

(e) $127,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for chapter 160, Laws of 2022 (body scanners).

(f) $127,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6187 (DOC body scanner pilot) to operate body scanner programs at the Washington corrections center for women and the Washington corrections center for men. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(g) $30,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5032 (impaired driving). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(h) $11,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5056 (habitual property offenders). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(i) $17,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5299 (law enf. officer protection). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(j) $2,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5891 (school bus trespass). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(k) $3,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5917 (bias-motivated defacement). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(l) $15,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6146 (tribal warrants). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(2) CORRECTIONAL OPERATIONS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($729,679,000))

$445,521,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($738,933,000))

$765,035,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$4,326,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$334,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$294,000,000

Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,837,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,478,109,000))

$1,514,053,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The department may contract for local jail beds statewide to the extent that it is at no net cost to the department. The department shall calculate and report the average cost per offender per day, inclusive of all services, on an annual basis for a facility that is representative of average medium or lower offender costs. The department shall not pay a rate greater than $85 per day per offender excluding the costs of department of corrections provided services, including evidence-based substance abuse programming, dedicated department of corrections classification staff on-site for individualized case management, transportation of offenders to and from department of corrections facilities, and gender responsive training for jail staff. The capacity provided at local correctional facilities must be for offenders whom the department of corrections defines as close medium or lower security offenders. Programming provided for offenders held in local jurisdictions is included in the rate, and details regarding the type and amount of programming, and any conditions regarding transferring offenders must be negotiated with the department as part of any contract. Local jurisdictions must provide health care to offenders that meets standards set by the department. The local jail must provide all medical care including unexpected emergent care. The department must utilize a screening process to ensure that offenders with existing extraordinary medical/mental health needs are not transferred to local jail facilities. If extraordinary medical conditions develop for an inmate while at a jail facility, the jail may transfer the offender back to the department, subject to terms of the negotiated agreement. Health care costs incurred prior to transfer are the responsibility of the jail.

(b) $671,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 ((and $671,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are))is provided solely for the department to maintain the facility, property, and assets at the institution formerly known as the maple lane school in Rochester.

(c) (($1,713,000))$4,270,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($146,000))$422,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to acquire and implement a sentencing calculation module for the offender management network information system and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act. This project must use one discrete organizational index across all department of corrections programs. Implementation of this sentencing calculation module must result in a reduction of tolling staff within six months of the project implementation date and the department must report this result. In addition, the report must include the budgeted and actual tolling staffing levels by fiscal month beginning with fiscal year 2023 and the count of tolling staff reduced by fiscal month from date of implementation through six months post implementation. The report must be submitted to the senate ways and means and house appropriations committees within 30 calendar days after six months post implementation.

(d) Within the appropriated amounts in this subsection, the department of corrections must provide a minimum of one dedicated prison rape elimination act compliance specialist at each institution.

(e) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $320,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for continuing two contracted parent navigator positions. One parent navigator must be located at the Washington correction center for women and one parent navigator position must be located at the Airway Heights corrections center or another state correctional facility that houses incarcerated male individuals and is selected by the department of corrections as a more suitable fit for a parent navigator. The parent navigators must have lived experience in navigating the child welfare system. The parent navigators must provide guidance and support to incarcerated individuals towards family reunification including, but not limited to, how to access services, navigating the court system, assisting with guardianship arrangements, and facilitating visitation with their children. The goal of the parent navigator program is to assist incarcerated parents involved in dependency or child welfare cases to maintain connections with their children and to assist these individuals in successfully transitioning and reuniting with their families upon release from incarceration. As part of the parent navigation program, the department of corrections must also review and provide a report to the legislature on the effectiveness of the program that includes the number of incarcerated individuals that received assistance from the parent navigators and the type of assistance the incarcerated individuals received, and that tracked the outcome of the parenting navigator program. A final report must be submitted to the legislature by September 1, 2024. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $20,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department's review and report on the effectiveness of the parent navigator program.

(f) $4,504,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($4,009,000))$5,417,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for restrictive housing to reduce the use of solitary confinement by increasing correctional staffing, incorporating mental health training, and implementing change to restrictive housing environments.

(g) $579,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,058,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the amend collaboration and training program.

(h) $1,294,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,294,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for reentry investments to include reentry and discharge services. The staffing and resources must provide expanded reentry and discharge services to include, but not limited to, transition services, preemployment testing, enhanced discharge planning, housing voucher assistance, cognitive behavioral interventions, educational programming, and community partnership programs.

(i) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5131 (commissary funds). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(j) $1,839,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,839,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5134 (reentry services & supports) to increase gate money from $40 to $300 at release. ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(k) $2,871,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for chapter 160, Laws of 2022 (body scanners).

(l) $586,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $576,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a planning and development manager and an executive secretary in the women's prison division.

(m) $1,817,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,538,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to provide specialized gender-affirming services, including medical and mental health services, to transgender incarcerated individuals in a manner that is consistent with the October 2023 settlement agreement in Disability Rights Washington v. Washington Department of Corrections, United States district court for the western district of Washington.

(n) $3,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department of corrections to provide wages and gratuities of no less than $1.00 per hour to incarcerated persons working in class III correctional industries.

(o) $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to maintain the facility, property, and assets at the Larch corrections center in Yacolt.

(p) $11,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5032 (impaired driving). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(q) $2,871,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6187 (DOC body scanner pilot) to operate body scanner programs at the Washington corrections center for women and the Washington corrections center for men. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(3) COMMUNITY SUPERVISION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($242,761,000))

$252,551,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($252,147,000))

$258,839,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$4,142,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$10,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($499,050,000))

$515,542,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The department of corrections shall contract with local and tribal governments for jail capacity to house offenders who violate the terms of their community supervision. A contract rate increase may not exceed five percent each year. The department may negotiate to include medical care of offenders in the contract rate if medical payments conform to the department's offender health plan and pharmacy formulary, and all off-site medical expenses are preapproved by department utilization management staff. If medical care of offender is included in the contract rate, the contract rate may exceed five percent to include the cost of that service. Beginning July 1, 2024, the department shall pay the bed rate for the day of release.

(b) The department shall engage in ongoing mitigation strategies to reduce the costs associated with community supervision violators, including improvements in data collection and reporting and alternatives to short-term confinement for low-level violators.

(c) (($1,233,000))$2,880,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($88,000))$253,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to acquire and implement a sentencing calculation module for the offender management network information system and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act. This project must use one discrete organizational index across all department of corrections programs. Implementation of this sentencing calculation module must result in a reduction of tolling staff within six months of the project implementation date and the department must report this result. In addition, the report must include the budgeted and actual tolling staffing levels by fiscal month beginning with fiscal year 2023 and the count of tolling staff reduced by fiscal month from date of implementation through six months post implementation. The report must be submitted to the senate ways and means and house appropriations committees within 30 calendar days after six months post implementation.

(d) $110,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the amend collaboration and training program.

(e) $1,409,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,386,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for staffing and operational costs to operate the Bellingham reentry center as a state-run facility.

(f) (($1,320,000))$615,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,320,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for staffing and operational costs to operate the Helen B. Ratcliff reentry center as a state-run facility.

(g) $18,813,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $19,027,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for reentry investments to include reentry and discharge services. The staffing and resources must provide expanded reentry and discharge services to include, but not limited to, transition services, preemployment testing, enhanced discharge planning, housing voucher assistance, cognitive behavioral interventions, educational programming, and community partnership programs.

(h) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a jail medical bed rate adjustment.

(i) $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6146 (tribal warrants). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4) CORRECTIONAL INDUSTRIES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($12,638,000))

$9,348,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($12,836,000))

$9,100,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$600,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$2,634,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($25,474,000))

$21,682,000

((The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $3,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department of corrections to provide wages and gratuities of no less than $1.00 per hour to incarcerated persons working in class III correctional industries.))

(5) INTERAGENCY PAYMENTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($68,680,000))

$69,190,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($64,929,000))

$65,612,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($133,609,000))

$134,802,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(((b)))(a) $19,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $19,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5502 (sub. use disorder treatment). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(c)))(b) $36,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for chapter 160, Laws of 2022 (body scanners).

(c) $36,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6187 (DOC body scanner pilot) to operate body scanner programs at the Washington corrections center for women and the Washington corrections center for men. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(d) $3,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6146 (tribal warrants). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(6) OFFENDER CHANGE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($83,659,000))

$85,926,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($84,659,000))

$89,157,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,436,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($169,754,000))

$176,519,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The department of corrections shall use funds appropriated in this subsection (6) for programming for incarcerated individuals. The department shall develop and implement a written comprehensive plan for programming for incarcerated individuals that prioritizes programs which follow the risk-needs-responsivity model, are evidence-based, and have measurable outcomes. The department is authorized to discontinue ineffective programs and to repurpose underspent funds according to the priorities in the written plan.

(b) The department of corrections shall collaborate with the state health care authority to explore ways to utilize federal medicaid funds as a match to fund residential substance use disorder treatment-based alternative beds under RCW 9.94A.664 under the drug offender sentencing alternative program and residential substance use disorder treatment beds that serve individuals on community custody.

(c) Within existing resources, the department of corrections may provide reentry support items such as disposable cell phones, prepaid phone cards, hygiene kits, housing vouchers, and release medications associated with individuals resentenced or ordered released from confinement as a result of policies or court decisions including, but not limited to, the State v. Blake decision.

(d) $11,454,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $11,454,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for expanded reentry investments to include, but not be limited to, transition services, preemployment testing, enhanced discharge planning, housing voucher assistance, cognitive behavioral interventions, educational programming, and community partnership programs.

(((f)))(e) $1,177,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,154,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5502 (sub. use disorder treatment) for dedicated staffing for substance use disorder assessments and for coordinated treatment care in the community at release. ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(g)))(f) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 ((and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are))is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization to assist fathers transitioning from incarceration to community and family reunification. The grant recipient must have experience contracting with the department of corrections to support incarcerated individual betterment projects and contracting with the department of social and health services to provide access and visitation services.

(((h)))(g) $424,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for chapter 160, Laws of 2022 (body scanners).

(h) $424,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6187 (DOC body scanner pilot) to operate body scanner programs at the Washington corrections center for women and the Washington corrections center for men. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(i) $122,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for continued cross agency reentry collaboration and work on the state's medicaid 1115 transformation waiver impacts to the department. By October 1, 2024, the department must report to fiscal committees of the legislature:

(i) The total spend in fiscal years 2022 and 2023 for authorized prerelease services under the medicaid 1115 transformation waiver, including but not limited to medications, laboratory services, and radiology; and

(ii) How much of each qualifying service listed in (i)(i) of this subsection would be required for reinvestment and how much would be allowable to offset existing expenditures based on federal medicaid rules for state fiscal years 2022 and 2023 if the waiver had been in place during those fiscal years.

(7) HEALTH CARE SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($241,145,000))

$250,846,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($245,589,000))

$259,333,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,084,000))

$6,720,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$2,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($489,818,000))

$516,901,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The state prison medical facilities may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods, supplies, and services through hospital or other group purchasing organizations when it is cost effective to do so.

(((c)))(b) $842,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($1,192,000))$2,256,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for restrictive housing to reduce the use of solitary confinement by increasing correctional staffing, incorporating mental health training, and implementing change to restrictive housing environments.

(((d)))(c) $73,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $387,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the amend collaboration and training program.

(((e)))(d) $1,236,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,236,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for reentry investments to include reentry and discharge services. The staffing and resources must provide expanded reentry and discharge services to include, but not limited to, transition services, enhanced health care discharge planning, case management, and evaluation of physical health and behavioral health.

(((f)))(e) $13,605,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $13,605,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for medical staffing in prisons for patient centered care and behavioral health care. Funding must be used to increase access to care, addiction care, and expanded screening of individuals in prison facilities to include chronic illnesses, infectious disease, diabetes, heart disease, serious mental health, and behavioral health services.

(((g)))(f) $1,612,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for chapter 160, Laws of 2022 (body scanners).

(((h)))(g) $1,115,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,115,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for an electronic health records system solution and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act and must be in compliance with the statewide electronic health records plan that must be approved by the office of financial management and the technology services board.

(((i)))(h) $405,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $399,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5768 (DOC/abortion medications). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(i) $627,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,715,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to provide specialized gender-affirming services, including medical and mental health services, to transgender incarcerated individuals in a manner that is consistent with the October 2023 settlement agreement in Disability Rights Washington v. Washington Department of Corrections, United States district court for the western district of Washington.

(j) To promote the safety, health, and well-being of health care workers and to support patient quality of care, the department will continue to engage in reasonable efforts to reduce the use of overtime for licensed practical nurses, registered nurses, and certified nursing assistants.

(k) Within the appropriated amounts in this subsection, funding is provided to ensure every single person transferring into the department of corrections' custody on full confinement is provided medications for opioid use disorder if they were on medications for opioid use disorder in jail or out of custody.

(l) $12,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5032 (impaired driving). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(m) $1,612,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6187 (DOC body scanner pilot) to operate body scanner programs at the Washington corrections center for women and the Washington corrections center for men. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 224. 2023 c 475 s 224 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES FOR THE BLIND

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($7,061,000))

$7,064,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($7,387,000))

$9,217,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($25,672,000))

$32,824,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($61,000))

$67,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($40,181,000))

$49,172,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $201,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $201,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the continuation of statewide services for blind or low vision youth under the age of 14.

(2) $184,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $367,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the independent living program.

(3) $1,820,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the renovation of the food service café located in the natural resources building.

Sec. 225. 2023 c 475 s 225 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($33,506,000))

$29,204,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($23,898,000))

$28,400,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($216,616,000))

$177,229,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($38,458,000))

$38,445,000

Climate Commitment Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$404,000

Unemployment Compensation Administration Account—

Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($270,724,000))

$306,951,000

Administrative Contingency Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($28,741,000))

$42,628,000

Employment Service Administrative Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($85,070,000))

$96,695,000

Family and Medical Leave Insurance Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($158,644,000))

$159,003,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($14,556,000))

$15,555,000

Long-Term Services and Supports Trust Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($40,960,000))

$51,988,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($911,577,000))

$946,502,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department is directed to maximize the use of federal funds. The department must update its budget annually to align expenditures with anticipated changes in projected revenues.

(2) $15,399,000 of the long-term services and supports trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of the long-term services and support trust program information technology project and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(3) Within existing resources, the department must reassess its ongoing staffing and funding needs for the paid family medical leave program and submit documentation of the updated need to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by September 1, 2023, and annually thereafter.

(4) Within existing resources, the department shall coordinate outreach and education to paid family and medical leave benefit recipients with a statewide family resource, referral, and linkage system that connects families with children prenatal through age five and residing in Washington state to appropriate services and community resources. This coordination shall include but is not limited to placing information about the statewide family resource, referral, and linkage system on the paid family and medical leave program web site and in printed materials, and conducting joint events.

(5) Within existing resources, the department shall report the following to the legislature and the governor by October 15, 2023, and each year thereafter:

(a) An inventory of the department's programs, services, and activities, identifying federal, state, and other funding sources for each;

(b) Federal grants received by the department, segregated by line of business or activity, for the most recent five fiscal years, and the applicable rules;

(c) State funding available to the department, segregated by line of business or activity, for the most recent five fiscal years;

(d) A history of staffing levels by line of business or activity, identifying sources of state or federal funding, for the most recent five fiscal years;

(e) A projected spending plan for the employment services administrative account and the administrative contingency account. The spending plan must include forecasted revenues and estimated expenditures under various economic scenarios.

(6)(($14,510,000))(a) $15,510,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for career connected learning grants as provided in RCW 28C.30.050, including sector intermediary grants and administrative expenses associated with grant administration.

(b) Within the amount provided in (a) of this subsection:

(i) Up to $921,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation may be used for the department to contract with the student achievement council to lead the career connected learning cross-agency work group and provide staffing support as required in RCW 28C.30.040.

(ii) Up to $2,192,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation may be used for technical assistance and implementation support grants associated with the career connected learning grant program as provided in RCW 28C.30.050.

(7) $2,000,000 of the unemployment compensation administration account—federal appropriation is provided solely for the department to continue implementing the federal United States department of labor equity grant. This grant includes improving the translation of notices sent to claimants as part of their unemployment insurance claims into any of the 10 languages most frequently spoken in the state and other language, demographic, and geographic equity initiatives approved by the grantor. The department must also ensure that letters, alerts, and notices produced manually or by the department's unemployment insurance technology system are written in plainly understood language and evaluated for ease of claimant comprehension before they are approved for use.

(8) $3,136,000 of the unemployment compensation administration account—federal appropriation is provided solely for a continuous improvement team to make customer, employer, and equity enhancements to the unemployment insurance program. If the department does not receive adequate funding from the United States department of labor to cover these costs, the department may use funding made available to the state through section 903 (d), (f), and (g) of the social security act (Reed act) in an amount not to exceed the amount provided in this subsection.

(9) $404,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for participation on the clean energy technology work force advisory committee and collaboration on the associated report established in Second Substitute House Bill No. 1176 (climate-ready communities). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(10) The department must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and section 302(13) of this act.

(11)(((a) $9,323,000))$18,948,000 of the employment service administrative account—state appropriation is provided solely for the replacement of the WorkSource integrated technology platform. The replacement system must support the workforce administration statewide to ensure adoption of the United States department of labor's integrated service delivery model and program performance requirements for the state's workforce innovation and opportunity act and other federal grants. This subsection is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(((b) $2,290,000 of the employment services administrative account—state appropriation is provided solely for the maintenance and operation of the WorkSource integrated technology platform.))

(12) $6,208,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $6,208,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the continuation of the economic security for all program. The department must collect quarterly data on the number of participants that participate in the program, the costs associated with career, training, and other support services provided by category, including but not limited to, child care, housing, transportation, and car repair, and progress made towards self-sufficiency. The department must provide a report to the governor and the legislature on December 1 and June 1 of each year that includes an analysis of the program, a detailed summary of the quarterly data collected, and associated recommendations for program delivery.

(13)(a) $5,292,000 of the employment service administrative account—state appropriation is provided to expand the economic security for all program to residents of Washington state that are over 200 percent of the federal poverty level but who demonstrate financial need for support services or assistance with training costs to either maintain or secure employment. ((Supports to each participant must not exceed $5,000 per year.))Unspent funds from this subsection may be used for economic security for all participants who are under 200 percent of the federal poverty level as defined in subsection (12) of this section.

(b) The department must collect quarterly data on the number of participants that participate in the program, the costs associated with career, training, and other support services provided by category, including but not limited to, child care, housing, transportation, and car repair, and progress made towards self-sufficiency. The department must provide a report to the governor and the legislature on December 1 and June 1 of each year that includes an analysis of the program, a detailed summary of the quarterly data collected, and associated recommendations for program delivery.

(c) Of the amounts in (a) of this subsection, the department may use $146,000 each year to cover program administrative expenses.

(14) $1,655,000 of the administrative contingency account—state appropriation is provided to increase the department's information security team to proactively address critical security vulnerabilities, audit findings, and process gaps.

(15) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for two project managers to assist with the coordination of state audits.

(16) $1,448,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,448,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for business navigators at the local workforce development boards to increase employer engagement in an effort to support industry recovery and growth. Of the amounts in this subsection, the department may use $148,000 per year to cover associated administrative expenses.

(17) $11,895,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of the quality jobs, equity strategy, and training (QUEST) grant to enhance the workforce system's ongoing efforts to support employment equity and employment recovery from the COVID-19 pandemic. The funds are for partnership development, community outreach, business engagement, and comprehensive career and training services.

(18) $3,264,000 of the employment services administration account—state appropriation is provided solely for the continuation of the office of agricultural and seasonal workforce services.

(19) $3,539,000 of the long-term services and supports trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for the programs in the department's leave and care division to increase outreach to underserved communities, perform program evaluation and data management, perform necessary fiscal functions, and make customer experience enhancements.

(((21)))(20) $140,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $140,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for one full-time employee to provide casework on behalf of constituents who contact their legislators to escalate unresolved claims.

(((22)))(21)(a) $250,000 of the family and medical leave insurance account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with the University of Washington Evans school of public policy and governance to conduct a study on the impacts of the state family and medical leave program's job protection standards on equitable utilization of paid leave benefits under the program.

(b) The study shall consider the following:

(i) The rates at which paid leave benefits under chapter 50A.15 RCW are used by persons who qualify for job protection under RCW 50A.35.010 or the federal family and medical leave act;

(ii) Worker perspectives on the effects of job protection under RCW 50A.35.010 and the federal family and medical leave act on the use of paid leave benefits under chapter 50A.15 RCW; and

(iii) Employment outcomes and other impacts for persons using paid leave benefits under chapter 50A.15 RCW.

(c)(i) In conducting the study, the university must collect original data directly from workers about paid leave and job protection, including demographic information such as race, gender, income, geography, primary language, and industry or job sector.

(ii) In developing the study, the university must consult with the advisory committee under RCW 50A.05.030, including three briefings: An overview on the initial research design with an opportunity to provide feedback; a midpoint update; and final results. The university must consult with the committee regarding appropriate methods for collecting and assessing relevant data in order to protect the reliability of the study.

(d) A preliminary report, including the initial research design and available preliminary results must be submitted by December 1, 2023, and a final report by December 1, 2024, to the governor and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature, in accordance with RCW 43.01.036.

(((23)))(22) $4,433,000 of the family and medical leave insurance account—state appropriation and $351,000 of the unemployment compensation administration account—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1570 (TNC insurance programs). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(24)))(23) $50,000 of the unemployment compensation administration account—federal appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1458 (apprenticeship programs/UI). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(25)))(24)(a) $10,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 ((and)), $11,227,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, $9,963,000 of the administrative contingency account—state appropriation, and $4,271,000 of the employment services administrative account—state appropriation are provided solely to address a projected shortfall of federal revenue that supports the administration of the unemployment insurance program.

(b) The department must submit an initial report no later than November 1, 2023, and a subsequent report no later than November 1, 2024, to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature outlining how the funding in (a) of this subsection is being utilized and recommendations for long-term solutions to address future decreases in federal funding.

(((26) $11,976,000))(25) $7,644,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 ((is))and $4,332,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to create a dedicated team of staff to process the unemployment insurance overpayment caseload backlog.

(((27)))(26) $3,389,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $4,540,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to increase the stipend for Washington service corps members to $26,758 per year and for one staff member to assist with program outreach. The stipend increase is for members that enter into a service year with income below 200 percent of the federal poverty level.

(((28)))(27) $794,000 of the unemployment compensation administration account—federal appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5176 (employee-owned coop UI). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(29)))(28) $30,000 of the family and medical leave insurance account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5286 (paid leave premiums). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(30)))(29) $2,896,000 of the family and medical leave insurance account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5586 (paid leave data). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(31)))(30) $35,000 of the employment service administrative account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide research and consultation on the feasibility of replicating the unemployment insurance program for and expanding other social net programs to individuals regardless of their citizenship status.

(((32)))(31) $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department to design a form for employer use to voluntarily report no show, no call interview data. This data shall be used to inform potential trend analysis or policy development for job search compliance.

(32) $5,655,000 of the family and medical leave insurance account—state appropriation is provided solely to increase staffing for the paid family and medical leave program to process claims and respond to customer inquiries in a timely manner.

(33) $7,305,000 of the family and medical leave insurance account—state appropriation is provided solely for information technology staffing to complete system enhancements for any remaining statutorily required components of the paid family and medical leave program, including, but not limited to, the establishment and collection of overpayments, crossmatching eligibility with other programs, and elective coverage for tribes.

(34) $51,000 of the employment services administrative account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely to support the underground economy task force created in section 906 of this act.

(35) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to report how it will collect employee race and ethnicity information from employers that participate in the unemployment insurance program and employees who participate in the paid family medical leave program.

(a) The department may contract to complete the report.

(b) The department must submit a report to the legislature by June 30, 2025. The report must include accurate cost and time estimates needed to collect the race and ethnicity information from employers and employees. The department must consult with the office of equity to ensure that data collections is consistent with other efforts. The report must also include, but is not limited to, the following information:

(i) The cost and time required for the department to revise current reporting requirements to include race and ethnicity data;

(ii) The cost and time required for the department to incorporate the collection of race and ethnicity data into future reporting;

(iii) The cost and time required for the department to incorporate the collection of race and ethnicity data into its existing information technology systems;

(iv) Recommendations on any exclusions from the requirement to report race and ethnicity data; and

(v) Any statutory changes required to collect race and ethnicity data.

(36) $961,000 of the unemployment compensation administration account—federal appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 6028 (unemployment overpayments). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(37)(a) $30,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $70,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to convene a wage replacement program for undocumented workers work group. The work group shall convene by June 1, 2024, and must include:

(i) Three members representing immigrants' interests;

(ii) Two members representing workers' interests in unemployment, each of whom must be appointed from a list of names submitted by a recognized statewide organization of employees;

(iii) Two members representing employers' interests in unemployment, each of whom must be appointed from a list of names submitted by a recognized statewide organization of employers;

(iv) Three ex officio members, representing the state commission on African American affairs, the state commission on Hispanic affairs, and the state commission on Asian Pacific American affairs; and

(v) One ex officio member, representing the department and who will serve as the chair.

(b) The work group shall:

(i) Identify dedicated streams of revenue within the current unemployment insurance taxation model to fully fund an equitable wage replacement program for undocumented workers;

(ii) Review funding mechanisms from other states administering similar programs;

(iii) Identify funding mechanisms that do not duplicate employer contributions paid into the unemployment trust fund on behalf of undocumented workers nor increase social taxes paid for employers;

(iv) Explore the impact of identified funding mechanisms on solvency of the unemployment trust fund; and

(v) Provide a calculation of the amount of benefits that would be annually provided to undocumented workers through this program.

(c) By November 15, 2024, the department shall submit a report to the governor and related legislative committees that includes the information included in (b) of this subsection and a recommended plan of how to fully fund the program.

(38) $11,054,000 of the long-term services and supports trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 6072 (LTSS commission recs.). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 226. 2023 c 475 s 226 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES—GENERAL

(1)(a) The appropriations to the department of children, youth, and families in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. Appropriations made in this act to the department of children, youth, and families shall initially be allotted as required by this act. The department shall seek approval from the office of financial management prior to transferring moneys between sections of this act except as expressly provided in this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not include transfers of moneys between sections of this act except as expressly provided in this act, nor shall allotment modifications permit moneys that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for other than that purpose. However, after May 1, 2024, unless prohibited by this act, the department may transfer general fund—state appropriations for fiscal year 2024 among programs after approval by the director of the office of financial management. However, the department may not transfer state appropriations that are provided solely for a specified purpose except as expressly provided in (b) of this subsection.

(b) To the extent that transfers under (a) of this subsection are insufficient to fund actual expenditures in excess of fiscal year 2024 caseload forecasts and utilization assumptions in the foster care, adoption support, child protective services, working connections child care, and juvenile rehabilitation programs, the department may transfer appropriations that are provided solely for a specified purpose.

(2) The health care authority, the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, the department of health, the department of corrections, and the department of children, youth, and families shall work together within existing resources to establish the health and human services enterprise coalition (the coalition). The coalition, led by the health care authority, must be a multi-organization collaborative that provides strategic direction and federal funding guidance for projects that have cross-organizational or enterprise impact, including information technology projects that affect organizations within the coalition. The office of the chief information officer shall maintain a statewide perspective when collaborating with the coalition to ensure that projects are planned for in a manner that ensures the efficient use of state resources, supports the adoption of a cohesive technology and data architecture, and maximizes federal financial participation.

(3) Information technology projects or investments and proposed projects or investments impacting time capture, payroll and payment processes and systems, eligibility, case management, and authorization systems within the department are subject to technical oversight by the office of the chief information officer.

Sec. 227. 2023 c 475 s 227 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES—CHILDREN AND FAMILIES SERVICES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($488,869,000))

$488,623,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($500,457,000))

$524,250,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($503,359,000))

$518,560,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$2,824,000

Opioid Abatement Settlement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,304,000))

$5,169,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,497,813,000))

$1,539,426,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $748,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $748,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to contract for the operation of one pediatric interim care center. The center shall provide residential care for up to 13 children through two years of age. Seventy-five percent of the children served by the center must be in need of special care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers. The center shall also provide on-site training to biological, adoptive, or foster parents. The center shall provide at least three months of consultation and support to the parents accepting placement of children from the center. The center may recruit new and current foster and adoptive parents for infants served by the center. The department shall not require case management as a condition of the contract.

(2) $453,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $453,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the costs of hub home foster and kinship families that provide a foster care delivery model that includes a hub home. Use of the hub home model is intended to support foster parent retention, provide support to biological families, improve child outcomes, and encourage the least restrictive community placements for children in out-of-home care.

(3) $579,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $579,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $110,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a receiving care center east of the Cascade mountains.

(4) $1,620,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,620,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for services provided through children's advocacy centers.

(5) In fiscal year 2024 and in fiscal year 2025, the department shall provide a tracking report for social service specialists and corresponding social services support staff to the office of financial management, and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature. The report shall detail continued implementation of the targeted 1:18 caseload ratio standard for child and family welfare services caseload-carrying staff and targeted 1:8 caseload ratio standard for child protection services caseload carrying staff. To the extent to which the information is available, the report shall include the following information identified separately for social service specialists doing case management work, supervisory work, and administrative support staff, and identified separately by job duty or program, including but not limited to intake, child protective services investigations, child protective services family assessment response, and child and family welfare services:

(a) Total full-time equivalent employee authority, allotments and expenditures by region, office, classification, and band, and job duty or program;

(b) Vacancy rates by region, office, and classification and band; and

(c) Average length of employment with the department, and when applicable, the date of exit for staff exiting employment with the department by region, office, classification and band, and job duty or program.

(6) $94,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $94,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a contract with a child advocacy center in Spokane to provide continuum of care services for children who have experienced abuse or neglect and their families.

(7)(a) $999,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, $656,000 of the general fund—private/local appropriation, and $252,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a contract with an educational advocacy provider with expertise in foster care educational outreach. The amounts in this subsection are provided solely for contracted education coordinators to assist foster children in succeeding in K-12 and higher education systems and to assure a focus on education during the department's transition to performance-based contracts. Funding must be prioritized to regions with high numbers of foster care youth, regions where backlogs of youth that have formerly requested educational outreach services exist, or youth with high educational needs. The department is encouraged to use private matching funds to maintain educational advocacy services.

(b) The department shall contract with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, which in turn shall contract with a nongovernmental entity or entities to provide educational advocacy services pursuant to RCW 28A.300.590.

(8) For purposes of meeting the state's maintenance of effort for the state supplemental payment program, the department of children, youth, and families shall track and report to the department of social and health services the monthly state supplemental payment amounts attributable to foster care children who meet eligibility requirements specified in the state supplemental payment state plan. Such expenditures must equal at least $3,100,000 annually and may not be claimed toward any other federal maintenance of effort requirement. Annual state supplemental payment expenditure targets must continue to be established by the department of social and health services. Attributable amounts must be communicated by the department of children, youth, and families to the department of social and health services on a monthly basis.

(9) $197,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $197,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to conduct biennial inspections and certifications of facilities, both overnight and day shelters, that serve those who are under 18 years old and are homeless.

(10)(a) $6,195,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($6,195,000))$8,981,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,188,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to operate emergent placement and enhanced emergent placement contracts.

(b) The department shall not include the costs to operate emergent placement contracts in the calculations for family foster home maintenance payments and shall submit as part of the budget submittal documentation required by RCW 43.88.030 any costs associated with increases in the number of emergent placement contract beds after the effective date of this section that cannot be sustained within existing appropriations.

(11) Beginning January 1, 2024, and continuing through the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the department must provide semiannual reports to the governor and appropriate legislative committees that includes the number of in-state behavioral rehabilitation services providers and licensed beds, the number of out-of-state behavioral rehabilitation services placements, and a comparison of these numbers to the same metrics expressed as an average over the prior six months. The report shall identify separately beds with the enhanced behavioral rehabilitation services rate. Effective January 1, 2024, and to the extent the information is available, the report shall include the same information for emergency placement services beds and enhanced emergency placement services beds.

(12) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementing the supportive visitation model that utilizes trained visit navigators to provide a structured and positive visitation experience for children and their parents.

(13) $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for enhanced adoption placement services for legally free children in state custody, through a partnership with a national nonprofit organization with private matching funds. These funds must supplement, but not supplant, the work of the department to secure permanent adoptive homes for children with high needs.

(14) The department of children, youth, and families shall make foster care maintenance payments to programs where children are placed with a parent in a residential program for substance abuse treatment. These maintenance payments are considered foster care maintenance payments for purposes of forecasting and budgeting at maintenance level as required by RCW 43.88.058.

(15) $511,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $511,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $306,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for continued implementation of chapter 210, Laws of 2021 (2SHB 1219) (youth counsel/dependency).

(16) If the department receives an allocation of federal funding through an unanticipated receipt, the department shall not expend more than what was approved or for another purpose than what was approved by the governor through the unanticipated receipt process pursuant to RCW 43.79.280.

(17) $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to contract with one or more nonprofit, nongovernmental organizations to purchase and deliver concrete goods to low-income families.

(18) $2,400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of performance-based contracts for family support and related services pursuant to RCW 74.13B.020.

(19) The department will only refer child welfare cases to the department of social and health services division of child support enforcement when the court has found a child to have been abandoned by their parent or guardian as defined in RCW 13.34.030.

(20) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and 100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the provision of SafeCare, an evidence-based parenting program, for families in Grays Harbor county.

(21) $7,685,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($8,354,000))$11,079,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and (($2,682,000))$3,326,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the phase-in of the settlement agreement under D.S. et al. v. Department of Children, Youth and Families et al., United States district court for the western district of Washington, cause no. 2:21-cv-00113-BJR. The department must implement the provisions of the settlement agreement pursuant to the timeline and implementation plan provided for under the settlement agreement. This includes implementing provisions related to the emerging adulthood housing program, professional therapeutic foster care, statewide hub home model, revised licensing standards, family group planning, referrals and transition, qualified residential treatment program, and monitoring and implementation. To comply with the settlement agreement, funding in this subsection is provided as follows:

(a) $276,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $264,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $104,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation and monitoring of the state's implementation plan, which includes receiving recurring updates, requesting data on compliance, reporting on progress, and resolving disputes that may arise.

(b) $2,022,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,432,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $42,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the statewide hub home model. The department shall develop and adapt the existing hub home model to serve youth as described in the settlement agreement.

(c) $452,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $864,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $334,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to establish a negotiated rule-making method to align and update foster care and group care licensing standards.

(d) $2,195,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,110,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $238,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for revised referral and transition procedures for youth entering foster care.

(e) $1,868,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,852,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,543,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to develop and implement a professional therapeutic foster care contract and licensing category. Therapeutic foster care professionals are not required to have another source of income and must receive specialized training and support.

(f) $872,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $832,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $421,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to update assessment and placement procedures prior to placing a youth in a qualified residential treatment program, as well as updating the assessment schedule to every 90 days.

(g) $2,725,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $644,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for family team decision making and shared planning meetings as informed by attachment a–stakeholder facilitator and process description.

(h) The department shall implement all provisions of the settlement agreement, including those described in (a) through (f) of this subsection; revisions to shared planning meeting and family team decision-making policies and practices; and any and all additional settlement agreement requirements and timelines established.

(22) (($8,919,000))$7,379,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($19,521,000))$26,325,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and (($6,595,000))$7,195,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of a seven-level foster care support system. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) $5,527,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $11,054,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $5,284,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to expand foster care maintenance payments from a four-level to a seven-level support system, beginning January 1, 2024.

(b) (($2,572,000))$1,032,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($7,717,000))$14,521,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and (($1,173,000))$1,773,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for expanded caregiver support services. Services include, but are not limited to, placement, case aide, and after-hours support, as well as training, coaching, child care, and respite coordination.

(c) $573,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $566,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for project management to oversee the shift in systems and practices.

(d) $247,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $184,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $138,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a contract with the department of social and health services research and data analysis division to track program outcomes through monitoring and analytics.

(23) $732,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $732,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $362,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase staff to support statewide implementation of the kinship caregiver engagement unit.

(24) (($7,332,000))$1,913,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($7,332,000))$4,119,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to issue foster care maintenance payments for up to 90 days to those kinship caregivers who obtain an initial license.

(25) $6,696,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $6,696,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $2,940,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for contracted visitation services for children in temporary out-of-home care. Funding is provided to reimburse providers for certain uncompensated services, which may include work associated with missed or canceled visits.

(26) $4,104,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $5,589,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to expand combined in-home services to serve more families. By December 1, 2023, and annually thereafter, the department shall provide a report to the legislature detailing combined in-home services expenditures and utilization, including the number of families served and a listing of services received by those families.

(27) $892,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $892,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $796,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for increased licensing staff. Licensing staff are increased in anticipation that more kinship placements will become licensed due to recent legislation and court decisions, including In re Dependency of K.W. and chapter 211, Laws of 2021 (E2SHB 1227) (child abuse or neglect).

(28) $755,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,014,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5124 (nonrelative kin placement). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(29) $338,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $317,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $54,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5515 (child abuse and neglect). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(30) $851,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,412,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $108,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5683 (foster care/Indian children). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(31) $2,304,000 of the opioid abatement settlement account—state appropriation is for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5536 (controlled substances).

(32) $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $112,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to develop, implement, and expand strategies to improve the capacity, reliability, and effectiveness of contracted visitation services for children in temporary out-of-home care and their parents and siblings. Strategies may include, but are not limited to, increasing mileage reimbursement for providers, offering transportation-only contract options, and mechanisms to reduce the level of parent-child supervision when doing so is in the best interest of the child. The department shall report to the office of financial management and the relevant fiscal and policy committees of the legislature regarding these strategies by September 1, 2023. The report shall include the number and percentage of parents requiring supervised visitation and the number and percentage of parents with unsupervised visitation, prior to reunification.

(33) $499,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $499,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $310,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1204 (family connections program), which will support the family connections program in areas of the state in which the program is already established. To operate the program, the department must contract with a community-based organization that has experience working with the foster care population and administering the family connections program. ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(34) $2,020,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,894,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,247,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase the basic foster care maintenance rate for all age groups and the supervised independent living subsidy for youth in extended foster care each by $50 per youth per month effective July 1, 2023.

(35) $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a contract with a Washington state mentoring organization to provide oversight and training for a pilot program that mentors foster youth. The goal of the program is to improve outcomes for youth in foster care by surrounding them with ongoing support from a caring adult mentor. Under the program, mentors provide a positive role model and develop a trusted relationship that helps the young person build self-confidence, explore career opportunities, access their own resourcefulness, and work to realize their fullest potential. The organization shall serve as the program administrator to provide grants to nonprofit organizations based in Washington state that meet department approved criteria specific to mentoring foster youth. Eligible grantees must have programs that currently provide mentoring services within the state and can provide mentors who provide one-to-one services to foster youth, or a maximum ratio of one mentor to three youth.

(36) $1,100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 ((is))and $1,400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization in Spokane that has experience administering a family-centered drug treatment and housing program for families experiencing substance use disorder. The amount provided in this subsection is intended to support the existing program while the department works to develop a sustainable model of the program and expand to new regions of the state.

(37) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department to lead the development of a sustainable operating funding model for programs using the rising strong model that provides comprehensive, family-centered drug treatment and housing services to keep families together while receiving treatment and support. The department shall work in coordination with the health care authority, the department of commerce, other local agencies, and stakeholders on development of the model. The department shall submit the sustainable operating model to the appropriate committees of the legislature by July 1, 2024.

(38) $107,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $102,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $50,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1580 (children in crisis). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(39) $269,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $269,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to increase the new foster home incentive payment for child-placing agencies to $1,000 for each new foster home certified for licensure, effective July 1, 2023.

(40) $1,350,000 of the opioid abatement settlement account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to establish a pilot for public health nurses, including contracts for up to eight public health nurses distributed by case count across the regions to support caseworkers in engaging and communicating with families about the risks of fentanyl and child health and safety practices.

(41) $900,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $231,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5908 (extended foster care). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(42) $333,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $76,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6006 (victims of human trafficking). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(43) $266,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5591 (dependent youth financial ed). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(44)(a) $1,638,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, $337,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation, and $1,515,000 of the opioid abatement settlement account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6109 (children and families). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(b) Of the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection:

(i) $1,515,000 of the opioid abatement settlement account—state appropriation is provided solely for a pilot program to include third-party safety plan participants and public health nurses in child protective services safety planning.

(ii) $574,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $301,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for at least one legal liaison position in each region to work with both the department and the office of the attorney general for the purpose of assisting with the preparation of child abuse and neglect court cases.

(iii) $972,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for two pilot programs to implement an evidence-based, comprehensive, intensive, in-home parenting services support model to serve children and families from birth to age 18 who are involved in the child welfare, children's mental health, or juvenile justice systems.

(45) The department shall collaborate with the department of social and health services to identify, place, and assist in the voluntary transition of adolescents aged 13 and older who have complex developmental, intellectual disabilities, or autism spectrum disorder, alongside potential mental health or substance use diagnoses, into a leased facility for specialized residential treatment at Lake Burien operated by the department of social and health. The partnership is dedicated to transitioning individuals to community-based settings in a seamless and voluntary manner that emphasizes care in less restrictive community-based environments.

Sec. 228. 2023 c 475 s 228 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES—JUVENILE REHABILITATION PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($140,231,000))

$148,567,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($143,975,000))

$151,778,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$694,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$205,000

Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$196,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($285,301,000))

$301,440,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $2,841,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,841,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to county juvenile courts for effective, community-based programs that are culturally relevant, research-informed, and focused on supporting positive youth development, not just reducing recidivism. Additional funding for this purpose is provided through an interagency agreement with the health care authority. County juvenile courts shall apply to the department of children, youth, and families for funding for program-specific participation and the department shall provide grants to the courts consistent with the per-participant treatment costs identified by the institute. The block grant oversight committee, in consultation with the Washington state institute for public policy, shall identify effective, community-based programs that are culturally relevant, research-informed, and focused on supporting positive youth development to receive funding.

(2) $1,537,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,537,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for expansion of the juvenile justice treatments and therapies in department of children, youth, and families programs identified by the Washington state institute for public policy in its report: "Inventory of Evidence-based, Research-based, and Promising Practices for Prevention and Intervention Services for Children and Juveniles in the Child Welfare, Juvenile Justice, and Mental Health Systems." The department may concentrate delivery of these treatments and therapies at a limited number of programs to deliver the treatments in a cost-effective manner.

(3)(a) $6,198,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $6,198,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to implement evidence- and research-based programs through community juvenile accountability grants, administration of the grants, and evaluations of programs funded by the grants. In addition to funding provided in this subsection, funding to implement alcohol and substance abuse treatment programs for locally committed offenders is provided through an interagency agreement with the health care authority.

(b) The department of children, youth, and families shall administer a block grant to county juvenile courts for the purpose of serving youth as defined in RCW 13.40.510(4)(a) in the county juvenile justice system. Funds dedicated to the block grant include: Consolidated juvenile service funds, community juvenile accountability act grants, chemical dependency/mental health disposition alternative, and suspended disposition alternative. The department of children, youth, and families shall follow the following formula and must prioritize evidence-based programs and disposition alternatives and take into account juvenile courts program-eligible youth in conjunction with the number of youth served in each approved evidence-based program or disposition alternative: (i) Thirty-seven and one-half percent for the at-risk population of youth ten to seventeen years old; (ii) fifteen percent for the assessment of low, moderate, and high-risk youth; (iii) twenty-five percent for evidence-based program participation; (iv) seventeen and one-half percent for minority populations; (v) three percent for the chemical dependency and mental health disposition alternative; and (vi) two percent for the suspended dispositional alternatives. Funding for the special sex offender disposition alternative shall not be included in the block grant, but allocated on the average daily population in juvenile courts. Funding for the evidence-based expansion grants shall be excluded from the block grant formula. Funds may be used for promising practices when approved by the department of children, youth, and families and juvenile courts, through the community juvenile accountability act committee, based on the criteria established in consultation with Washington state institute for public policy and the juvenile courts.

(c) The department of children, youth, and families and the juvenile courts shall establish a block grant funding formula oversight committee with equal representation from the department of children, youth, and families and the juvenile courts. The purpose of this committee is to assess the ongoing implementation of the block grant funding formula, utilizing data-driven decision making and the most current available information. The committee will be co-chaired by the department of children, youth, and families and the juvenile courts, who will also have the ability to change members of the committee as needed to achieve its purpose. The committee may make changes to the formula categories in (b) of this subsection if it determines the changes will increase statewide service delivery or effectiveness of evidence-based program or disposition alternative resulting in increased cost/benefit savings to the state, including long-term cost/benefit savings. The committee must also consider these outcomes in determining when evidence-based expansion or special sex offender disposition alternative funds should be included in the block grant or left separate.

(d) The juvenile courts and administrative office of the courts must collect and distribute information and provide access to the data systems to the department of children, youth, and families and the Washington state institute for public policy related to program and outcome data. The department of children, youth, and families and the juvenile courts must work collaboratively to develop program outcomes that reinforce the greatest cost/benefit to the state in the implementation of evidence-based practices and disposition alternatives.

(4) $645,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $645,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for funding of the teamchild project.

(5) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant program focused on criminal street gang prevention and intervention. The department of children, youth, and families may award grants under this subsection. The department of children, youth, and families shall give priority to applicants who have demonstrated the greatest problems with criminal street gangs. Applicants composed of, at a minimum, one or more local governmental entities and one or more nonprofit, nongovernmental organizations that have a documented history of creating and administering effective criminal street gang prevention and intervention programs may apply for funding under this subsection. Each entity receiving funds must report to the department of children, youth, and families on the number and types of youth served, the services provided, and the impact of those services on the youth and the community.

(6) The juvenile rehabilitation institutions may use funding appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods, supplies, and services through hospital group purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.

(7) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to county juvenile courts to establish alternative detention facilities similar to the proctor house model in Jefferson county, Washington, that will provide less restrictive confinement alternatives to youth in their local communities. County juvenile courts shall apply to the department of children, youth, and families for funding and each entity receiving funds must report to the department on the number and types of youth serviced, the services provided, and the impact of those services on the youth and the community.

(8) $432,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $432,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to provide housing services to clients releasing from incarceration into the community.

(9)(a) $878,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $879,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 206, Laws of 2021 (concerning juvenile rehabilitation community transition services).

(b) Of the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection, $105,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $105,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for housing vouchers.

(10) $123,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $123,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 265, Laws of 2021 (supporting successful reentry).

(11) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a credible messenger mentorship organization located in Kitsap county to provide peer counseling, peer support services, and mentorship for at-risk youth and families.

(12) $1,791,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,754,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for maintenance of the facility, property, and assets at the facility formerly known as the Naselle youth camp in Naselle. The department of children, youth, and families must enter into an interagency agreement with the department of social and health services for the management and warm closure maintenance of the Naselle youth camp facility and grounds during the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium.

(13)(a) $140,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $140,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1394 (sexual offenses by youth). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(b) The department of children, youth, and families—juvenile rehabilitation shall develop and implement a grant program that allows defense attorneys and counties to apply for funding for sex offender evaluation and treatment programs. The department shall provide funding to counties for: (a) Process mapping, site assessment, and training for additional sex offender treatment modalities such as multisystemic therapy-problem sexual behavior or problematic sexual behavior-cognitive behavioral therapy; and (b) for any evaluation and preadjudication treatment costs which are not covered by the court.

(14) $2,436,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,206,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a dedicated institutional educational oversight and accountability team and 12 staff to provide a transition team at both green hill and echo glen that will serve as an education engagement team at the facility and will also coordinate and engage with community enrichment programs and community organizations to afford more successful transitions.

(15) $505,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $505,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for contracted services for housing for youth exiting juvenile rehabilitation facilities.

(16) (($3,306,000))$2,701,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($8,732,000))$9,915,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for caseload costs and staffing. Of the amount provided in this subsection: (($1,752,000))$1,221,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($2,428,000))$2,055,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for staffing necessary to operate the baker cottage north living unit at green hill school that is anticipated to be operational by ((February))March 1, 2024.

(17) $967,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department to purchase body scanners, one for echo glen, and two for green hill school, to comply with chapter 246-230 WAC (security screening systems).

(18) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to contract with a nonprofit entity doing statewide gender-responsive, race equity training and girls' advocacy programming in the juvenile rehabilitation system. The entity must provide:

(a) Girl-centered, antibias training for adults working with girls;

(b) Youth stipends for girls involved in advocacy programming; and

(c) Program facilitation for girls in the continuum of the juvenile rehabilitation system.

(19) $68,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6006 (victims of human trafficking). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 229. 2023 c 475 s 229 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES—EARLY LEARNING PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($576,454,000))

$587,754,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($699,147,000))

$749,967,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($525,447,000))

$659,630,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$104,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($385,965,000))

$385,401,000

Home Visiting Services Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($35,809,000))

$35,795,000

Home Visiting Services Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($36,417,000))

$37,256,000

Opioid Abatement Settlement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,179,000

Washington Opportunity Pathways Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$80,000,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$22,764,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($2,362,107,000))

$2,561,850,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) (($123,623,000))$132,698,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($148,314,000))$158,496,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, $91,810,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation, and $80,000,000 of the opportunity pathways account—state appropriation are provided solely for the early childhood education and assistance program. These amounts shall support at least 16,778 slots in fiscal year 2024 and 17,278 slots in fiscal year 2025. Of the total slots in each fiscal year, 100 slots must be reserved for foster children to receive school-year-round enrollment.

(b) Of the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection:

(i) $23,647,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $26,412,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a slot rate increase of 18 percent for full day slots, a 9 percent increase for extended day slots, and a 7 percent increase for part day slots, beginning July 1, 2023.

(ii) $10,182,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a rate increase of 6 percent for full day slots and 10 percent for extended day slots, beginning July 1, 2024.

(iii) $9,862,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $9,862,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to convert 1,000 part day slots to full day slots, and to increase full day slots by 500, beginning in fiscal year 2024.

(((iii)))(iv) $9,862,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely to convert 1,000 part day slots to full day slots((,)) and to increase full day slots by 500, beginning in fiscal year 2025.

(c) Of the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection, $2,509,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,278,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to increase complex needs grant funds for the early childhood education and assistance program.

(d) The department of children, youth, and families must develop a methodology to identify, at the school district level, the geographic locations of where early childhood education and assistance program slots are needed to meet the entitlement specified in RCW 43.216.556. This methodology must be linked to the caseload forecast produced by the caseload forecast council and must include estimates of the number of slots needed at each school district and the corresponding facility needs required to meet the entitlement in accordance with RCW 43.216.556. This methodology must be included as part of the budget submittal documentation required by RCW 43.88.030.

(2) The department is the lead agency for and recipient of the federal child care and development fund grant. Amounts within this grant shall be used to fund child care licensing, quality initiatives, agency administration, and other costs associated with child care subsidies.

(3) The department of children, youth, and families shall work in collaboration with the department of social and health services to determine the appropriate amount of state expenditures for the working connections child care program to claim towards the state's maintenance of effort for the temporary assistance for needy families program. The departments will also collaborate to track the average monthly child care subsidy caseload and expenditures by fund type, including child care development fund, general fund—state appropriation, and temporary assistance for needy families for the purpose of estimating the annual temporary assistance for needy families reimbursement from the department of social and health services to the department of children, youth, and families. Effective December 1, 2023, and annually thereafter, the department of children, youth, and families must report to the governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature the total state contribution for the working connections child care program claimed the previous fiscal year towards the state's maintenance of effort for the temporary assistance for needy families program and the total temporary assistance for needy families reimbursement from the department of social and health services for the previous fiscal year.

(4)(a) (($144,632,000))$145,852,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $208,181,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, $56,400,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation, and (($51,500,000))$99,100,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) are provided solely for enhancements to the working connections child care program.

(b) Of the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection:

(i) $47,637,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $87,556,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, $36,249,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation, and $33,085,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) are provided solely to increase subsidy base rates to the 85th percentile of market based on the 2021 market rate survey for child care centers.

(ii) (($96,995,000))$98,215,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $120,625,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, $20,151,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation, and $18,415,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) are provided solely to implement the 2023-2025 collective bargaining agreement covering family child care providers as provided in section 907 of this act. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(A) $8,263,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $9,793,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are for an 85 cent per hour per child rate increase for family, friends, and neighbor providers (FFNs) beginning July 1, 2023, and a 15 cent per hour per child rate increase beginning July 1, 2024.

(B) $26,515,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $48,615,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, $20,151,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation, and $18,415,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) are provided to increase subsidy base rates to the 85th percentile of market based on the 2021 market rate survey.

(C) $370,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $370,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to pay the background check application and fingerprint processing fees.

(D) (($61,847,000))$63,067,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $61,847,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are for a cost of care rate enhancement.

(c) Funding in this subsection must be expended with internal controls that provide child-level detail for all transactions beginning in fiscal year 2025.

(d) On July 1, 2023, and July 1, 2024, the department, in collaboration with the department of social and health services, must report to the governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature on the status of overpayments in the working connections child care program. The report must include the following information for the previous fiscal year:

(i) A summary of the number of overpayments that occurred;

(ii) The reason for each overpayment;

(iii) The total cost of overpayments;

(iv) A comparison to overpayments that occurred in the past two preceding fiscal years; and

(v) Any planned modifications to internal processes that will take place in the coming fiscal year to further reduce the occurrence of overpayments.

(e) Within available amounts, the department in consultation with the office of financial management shall report enrollments and active caseload for the working connections child care program to the governor and the legislative fiscal committees and the legislative-executive WorkFirst poverty reduction oversight task force on an agreed upon schedule. The report shall also identify the number of cases participating in both temporary assistance for needy families and working connections child care. The department must also report on the number of children served through contracted slots.

(5) $2,362,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 ((and)), $2,362,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $3,582,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase the nonstandard hours bonus ((to $135 per child per month)). Of the amounts in this subsection:

(a) $2,362,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,362,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to increase the nonstandard hours bonus to $135 per child per month, beginning July 1, 2023.

(b) $3,582,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely to increase the nonstandard hours bonus to $300 per child per month, beginning July 1, 2024.

(6) $22,764,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the working connections child care program under RCW 43.216.135.

(7) $353,402,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is reimbursed by the department of social and health services to the department of children, youth, and families for qualifying expenditures of the working connections child care program under RCW 43.216.135.

(8) $1,560,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,560,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $6,701,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the seasonal child care program.

(9) $871,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $871,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department of children, youth, and families to contract with a countywide nonprofit organization with early childhood expertise in Pierce county for a project to prevent child abuse and neglect using nationally recognized models.

(a) The nonprofit organization must continue to implement a countywide resource and referral linkage system for families of children who are prenatal through age five.

(b) The nonprofit organization must offer a voluntary brief newborn home visiting program. The program must meet the diverse needs of Pierce county residents and, therefore, it must be flexible, culturally appropriate, and culturally responsive. The department, in collaboration with the nonprofit organization, must examine the feasibility of leveraging federal and other fund sources, including federal Title IV-E and medicaid funds, for home visiting provided through the pilot. The department must report its findings to the governor and appropriate legislative committees by September 1, 2023.

(10) $3,577,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $3,587,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $9,588,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation are provided solely for the early childhood intervention prevention services (ECLIPSE) program. The department shall contract for ECLIPSE services to provide therapeutic child care and other specialized treatment services to abused, neglected, at-risk, and/or drug-affected children. The department shall pursue opportunities to leverage other funding to continue and expand ECLIPSE services. Priority for services shall be given to children referred from the department.

(11) The department shall place a ten percent administrative overhead cap on any contract entered into with the University of Washington. In a bi-annual report to the governor and the legislature, the department shall report the total amount of funds spent on the quality rating and improvements system and the total amount of funds spent on degree incentives, scholarships, and tuition reimbursements.

(12) $1,728,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,728,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for reducing barriers for low-income providers to participate in the early achievers program.

(13) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a contract with a nonprofit entity experienced in the provision of promoting early literacy for children through pediatric office visits.

(14) $4,000,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for early intervention assessment and services.

(15) The department shall work with state and local law enforcement, federally recognized tribal governments, and tribal law enforcement to develop a process for expediting fingerprinting and data collection necessary to conduct background checks for tribal early learning and child care providers.

(16) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for continued implementation of chapter 202, Laws of 2017 (children's mental health).

(17) Within existing resources, the department shall continue implementation of chapter 409, Laws of 2019 (early learning access).

(18) $515,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $515,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a statewide family resource and referral linkage system, with coordinated access point of resource navigators who will connect families with children prenatal through age five with services, programs, and community resources through a facilitated referral and linkage process.

(19)(a) $114,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $173,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, $6,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation, and $31,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) are provided solely for the department to complete its pilot project to determine the feasibility of a child care license category for multi-site programs operating under one owner or one entity and to complete one year of transition activities. The department shall adopt rules to implement the pilot project and may waive or adapt licensing requirements when necessary to allow for the operation of a new license category. Pilot participants must include, at least:

(i) One governmental agency;

(ii) One nonprofit organization; and

(iii) One for-profit private business.

(b) New or existing license child care providers may participate in the pilot. When selecting and approving pilot project locations, the department shall aim to select a mix of rural, urban, and suburban locations. By July 1, 2024, the department shall submit to the governor and relevant committees of the legislature a plan for permanent implementation of this license category, including any necessary changes to law.

(20) $3,020,000 of the home visiting account—state appropriation and $6,540,000 of the home visiting account—federal appropriation are provided solely for the home visiting program. Of the amounts in this subsection:

(a) $2,020,000 of the home visiting account—state appropriation and $6,540,000 of the home visiting account—federal appropriation are provided solely for a funding increase, including to increase funding for contracts to support wage and cost increases and create more equity in contracting among the home visiting workforce.

(b) $1,000,000 of the home visiting account—state appropriation is provided solely for the expansion of visiting services.

(21) Within the amounts provided in this section, funding is provided for the department to make permanent the two language access coordinators with specialties in Spanish and Somali as funded in chapter 334, Laws of 2021.

(22)(a) The department must provide to the education research and data center, housed at the office of financial management, data on all state-funded early childhood programs. These programs include the early support for infants and toddlers, early childhood education and assistance program (ECEAP), and the working connections and seasonal subsidized childcare programs including license-exempt facilities or family, friend, and neighbor care. The data provided by the department to the education research data center must include information on children who participate in these programs, including their name and date of birth, and dates the child received services at a particular facility.

(b) ECEAP early learning professionals must enter any new qualifications into the department's professional development registry starting in the 2015-16 school year, and every school year thereafter. By October 2017, and every October thereafter, the department must provide updated ECEAP early learning professional data to the education research data center.

(c) The department must request federally funded head start programs to voluntarily provide data to the department and the education research data center that is equivalent to what is being provided for state-funded programs.

(d) The education research and data center must provide an updated report on early childhood program participation and K-12 outcomes to the house of representatives appropriations committee and the senate ways and means committee using available data every March for the previous school year.

(e) The department, in consultation with the department of social and health services, must withhold payment for services to early childhood programs that do not report on the name, date of birth, and the dates a child received services at a particular facility.

(23) $260,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $260,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to continue implementation of an infant and early childhood mental health consultation initiative to support tribal child care and early learning programs. Funding may be used to provide culturally congruent infant and early childhood mental health supports for tribal child care, the tribal early childhood education and assistance program, and tribal head start providers. The department must consult with federally recognized tribes which may include round tables through the Indian policy early learning committee.

(24) $860,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $860,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for continued expansion and support of family, friend, or neighbor caregivers with a focus on the provision of play and learn groups. The amounts provided in this subsection may be used for the department to:

(a) Fund consistent staffing across the state's six geographic regions to support the needs of family, friend, or neighbor caregivers;

(b) Contract with a statewide child care resource and referral program to sustain and expand the number of facilitated play groups to meet the needs of communities statewide;

(c) Support existing infrastructure for organizations that have developed the three existing play and learn program models so they have capacity to provide training, technical assistance, evaluation, data collection, and other support needed for implementation; and

(d) Provide direct implementation support to community-based organizations that offer play and learn groups.

(25) $3,750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for tribal early learning grants to be distributed to providers with tribal children enrolled in early childhood education and assistance program, early ECEAP, childcare, head start, early head start and home visiting programs. Grants will be administered by the department of children, youth and families office of tribal relations and may be awarded for purposes including but not limited to culturally appropriate mental health supports for addressing historical trauma, incorporating indigenous foods, culturally-responsive books and materials, staff professional development, curriculum adaptations and supplements, tribal language education, elders and storytelling in classrooms, traditional music and arts instruction, and transportation to facilitate tribal child participation in early childhood education. Of the amounts in this subsection, the department may use $143,000 in fiscal year 2024 and up to $136,000 in fiscal year 2025 to cover associated administrative expenses.

(26) $7,698,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $7,698,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to increase complex needs grant funds for child care providers.

(27) $2,624,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,624,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for equity grants established under chapter 199, Laws of 2021 (E2SSB 5237).

(28) $2,354,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,431,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to continue the birth-to-three early childhood education and assistance program. Funding is sufficient for a 20 percent rate increase beginning July 1, 2023, and a 1.8 percent rate increase beginning July 1, 2024.

(29) $3,352,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $9,916,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to implement Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5225 (working conn. child care). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(30) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to help close the gap in childcare access in the King county region by providing pandemic recovery support funding to the Launch learning organization.

(31) (($533,000))$169,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 ((is))and $364,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to submit an implementation plan to expand access to Washington's mixed delivery child care system. The plan must assume that any financial contribution by families is capped at no more than seven percent of household income and that the child care workforce are provided living wages and benefits. The plan must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025, and should:

(a) Follow the intent of chapter 199, Laws of 2021;

(b) Be aligned with the cost of quality care rate model;

(c) Include timelines, costs, and statutory changes necessary for timely and effective implementation; and

(d) Be developed through partnership with the statewide child care resource and referral organization and the largest union representing child care providers, with consultation from families.

(32) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for infant and early childhood mental health consultation.

(33) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to contract with Washington communities for children to maintain a community-based early childhood network.

(34) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to contract with a Washington state based nonprofit digital child care marketing and matching service to deliver child care marketing and matching services in order to increase the number of licensed providers offering nonstandard hours care and to provide effective outreach to workforces in order to help them find and match with available nonstandard hours care providers.

(35) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to contract with an organization that provides relationship-based professional development support to family, friend, and neighbor, child care center, and licensed family care providers to work with child care workers to establish new affordable, high quality child care and early learning programs. To be eligible to receive funding, the organization must:

(a) Provide professional development services for child care providers and early childhood educators, including training and mentorship programs;

(b) Provide mentorship and other services to assist with child care provider and facility licensing;

(c) Administer or host a system of shared services and consulting related to operating a child care business; and

(d) Administer a state sponsored substitute pool child care provider program.

(36) $830,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1447 (assistance programs). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(37) $972,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,728,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1525 (apprenticeships/child care). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(38) $2,438,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department to provide a one-time rate enhancement in fiscal year 2024 for early support for infants and toddlers program providers.

(39) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the imagination library.

(40) $1,313,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of chapter 420, Laws of 2023 (transition to kindergarten program).

(41) $5,561,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely to increase the infant rate enhancement for child care providers from $90 to $300, beginning July 1, 2024.

(42) $650,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely to expand the inclusion mentorship program for increasing access in child care team, which provides early learning providers with the necessary skills and knowledge to effectively care for and educate children with disabilities, developmental delays, or challenging behaviors.

(43) $497,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely to conduct a feasibility study and provide cost estimates for a pilot program to award start-up grants, in local jurisdictions over 100,000 persons, to assist in the establishment and operation of child care programs and services with nonstandard hours for the minor children of individuals in high demand professions, including, but not limited to, peace officers and criminal justice personnel, firefighters, medical professionals in rural areas, and construction workers during shift work and abnormal work hours. A report is due to the legislature by June 30, 2025.

(44) $254,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5774 (fingerprint backgr. checks). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(45)(a) $3,179,000 of the opioid abatement settlement account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6109 (children and families). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(b) Of the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection:

(i) $1,600,000 of the opioid abatement settlement account—state appropriation is provided solely to enter into targeted contracts with existing home visiting programs established by RCW 43.216.130 in locales with the historically highest rates of child welfare screened-in intake and shall be targeted to families experiencing high-potency synthetic opioid-related substance use disorder.

(ii) $1,579,000 of the opioid abatement settlement account—state appropriation is provided solely to establish a pilot program for contracted child care slots for infants in child protective services in locales with the historically highest rates of child welfare screened-in intake due to the exposure or presence of high-potency synthetic opioids in the home, which may be used as part of a safety plan.

Sec. 230. 2023 c 475 s 230 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES—PROGRAM SUPPORT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($269,989,000))

$372,098,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($267,333,000))

$287,874,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($154,741,000))

$172,600,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,133,000))

$2,131,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($180,000))

$744,000

Home Visiting Services Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$482,000

Home Visiting Services Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$380,000

Information Technology Investment Revolving Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,985,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($695,238,000))

$838,294,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a Washington state mentoring organization to continue its public-private partnerships providing technical assistance and training to mentoring programs that serve at-risk youth.

(2) $2,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $6,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $2,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of an agreement reached between the governor and the Washington federation of state employees for the language access providers under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, as provided in section 907 of this act.

(3) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a full-time employee to coordinate policies and programs to support pregnant and parenting individuals receiving chemical dependency or substance use disorder treatment.

(4) (($2,719,000))$3,525,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($2,632,000))$4,145,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and (($174,000))$248,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the phase-in of the settlement agreement under D.S. et al. v. Department of Children, Youth and Families et al., United States district court for the western district of Washington, cause no. 2:21-cv-00113-BJR. The department must implement the provisions of the settlement agreement pursuant to the timeline and implementation plan provided for under the settlement agreement. This includes implementing provisions related to the emerging adulthood housing program, professional therapeutic foster care, statewide hub home model, revised licensing standards, family group planning, referrals and transition, qualified residential treatment program, and monitoring and implementation. To comply with the settlement agreement, funding in this subsection is provided as follows:

(a) $2,406,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,382,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $174,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for supported housing programs for hard-to-place foster youth age 16 and above. The department shall provide housing and case management supports that ensure youth placement stability, promote mental health and well-being, and prepare youth for independent living.

(b) $313,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation and monitoring of the state's implementation plan, which includes receiving recurring updates, requesting data on compliance, reporting on progress, and resolving disputes that may arise.

(c) $806,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,513,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $74,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for plaintiff legal fees, stakeholder facilitation, and fiduciary support to support rate modeling and payments for the emerging adult housing program, professional therapeutic foster parents, referrals and transitions, and hub homes.

(5) $704,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,022,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $222,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to implement a language access plan, which will include but is not limited to:

(a) Translation of department materials;

(b) Hiring staff to form a centralized language access team to provide language access supports and coordination across all department divisions;

(c) Outreach to community organizations serving multilingual children and families regarding department programs;

(d) Webinars and other technical assistance provided in multiple languages for department programs;

(e) Training for department staff on language access resources; and

(f) Other means of increasing language access and equity for providers and caregivers in health and safety, licensing and regulations, and public funding opportunities for programs offered by the department.

(6) $1,885,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,885,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a feasibility study to develop an implementation plan and determine costs for a new child welfare information system.

(7) $2,149,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $7,851,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $10,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a comprehensive child welfare information system. The funding in this section is sufficient to complete procurement and the initial stages of implementation and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(8) $1,187,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,187,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for housing support services for youth exiting foster care and juvenile rehabilitation.

(((8)))(9) $19,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $19,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $6,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for indirect costs associated with the implementation of a seven-level foster care support system.

(((9)))(10) $1,494,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for continued implementation of the family first prevention services act requirements, including technology enhancements to support the automated assessments, data quality, and reporting requirements. Funding provided in this subsection is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(((10)))(11) $717,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $717,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $324,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for continued implementation of chapter 210, Laws of 2021 (2SHB 1219).

(((11)))(12) $1,248,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,248,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the continuation of the emergency adolescent housing pilot program. The housing pilot will serve hard-to-place foster youth who are at least 16 years old with housing and intensive case management.

(((12)))(13) $319,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $319,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $170,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to continue implementation of chapter 137, Laws of 2022 (2SHB 1905).

(((13)))(14) $26,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $26,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to continue implementation of chapter 39, Laws of 2022 (SHB 2068).

(((14)))(15) $23,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $31,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $7,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5225 (working conn. child care). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(15)))(16) $1,571,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,571,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5316 (DCYF background check fees). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(16)))(17) $53,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $53,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $16,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5515 (child abuse and neglect). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(17)))(18) $43,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $78,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $18,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5124 (nonrelative kin placement). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(18)))(19) $2,627,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,628,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5256 (child welfare housing). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(19)))(20) $33,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $58,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $14,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5683 (foster care/Indian children). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(20)))(21) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the partnership council for juvenile justice to consider and provide recommendations regarding juvenile justice policy projects and for one additional staff for ongoing policy and program analysis. The partnership council is authorized to consult with experts to study and gather research on best practices regarding juvenile justice, and to consult with relevant stakeholders regarding its potential recommendations. Relevant stakeholders may include but are not limited to the superior court judges association; Washington association of juvenile court administrators; Washington association of county clerks; the association of Washington counties; community-based organizations with expertise in legal financial obligation reform, community compensation funds, supporting victims and survivors of crime, or supporting youth who have been convicted or adjudicated of criminal offenses; law enforcement, prosecutors; public defenders; incarcerated and formerly incarcerated youth and young adults; the administrative office of the courts; the crime victims compensation program; and the office of crime victims advocacy.

(a) The council shall:

(i) By October 31, 2024, report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature recommendations for establishing a state-funded community compensation program to address out of pocket expenses for those who have been harmed by juvenile criminal offenses. Recommendations shall consider restorative principles and best practices and shall be developed in consultation with those who have been adjudicated and charged restitution and those who have been owed restitution. The council shall provide recommendations for program implementation including, but not limited to, structure and placement within state government; scope and scale of funding including eligibility criteria; retroactivity; documentation requirements; and coordination with the existing crime victims compensation fund. The council shall provide estimates of startup costs and ongoing operational costs, including administration and direct compensation to victims.

(ii) By October 31, 2024, report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature recommendations regarding retention, dissemination, confidentiality, sealing, consequences, and general treatment of juvenile court records. In making recommendations, the council shall take into consideration developments in brain science regarding decision-making amongst youth; the impact the juvenile court records can have on future individual well-being; principles of racial equity; and impacts that the recommendations could have on recidivism.

(iii) By June 30, 2025, report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature recommendations regarding implementation of juvenile court jurisdiction expansion to encompass persons 18, 19, and 20 years old. Recommendations shall include an implementation plan for the expansion, including necessary funding, essential personnel and programmatic resources, measures necessary to avoid a negative impact on the state's child protection response, and specific milestones related to operations and policy. The implementation plan shall also include a timeline for structural and systemic changes within the juvenile justice system for the juvenile rehabilitation division; the department of children, youth, and families; the department of corrections; and the juvenile court pursuant to chapter 13.04 RCW. The implementation plan shall also include an operations and business plan that defines benchmarks including possible changes to resource allocations; a review of the estimated costs avoided by local and state governments with the reduction of recidivism and an analysis of cost savings reinvestment options; and estimated new costs incurred to provide juvenile justice services to persons 18, 19, and 20 years old.

(((21)))(22) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to contract with a statewide nonprofit with demonstrated capability of partnering with agencies and community organizations to develop public-facing regionalized data dashboards and reports to measure change in equitable early learning access as a result of programs and grants administered by the department. The nonprofit must provide the data in a consumer-friendly format and include updates on program supply and demand for subsidized child care and preschool programs. The data must be disaggregated by program and facility type, geography, family demographics, copayments, and outcomes of grants and rate enhancements disaggregated by staff role, program and facility type, and geography.

(((22)))(23) $1,206,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,554,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,416,000 of the general fund—private/local appropriation are provided solely for the department to contract with one or more community organizations with expertise in the LifeSet case management model to serve youth and adults currently being served in or exiting the foster care, juvenile justice, and mental health systems to successfully transition to adulthood.

(((23)))(24) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to increase rates for independent living service providers.

(((24)))(25) $700,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $700,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for funding of the teamchild project.

(((25)))(26) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to contract with an entity for three separate studies. The department must submit the studies to the governor and the legislature by June 30, 2025. The studies must analyze:

(a) The feasibility of implementing a universal child allowance, universal child care, and universal baby boxes;

(b) The feasibility of a social wealth fund for Washington state; and

(c) The current cash and cash-equivalent benefits currently available for Washington state residents who are nonworkers.

(((26)))(27) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to contract with an all-male, African American organization to mentor youth ages 12 through 19 in south King county.

(((27)))(28) $37,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $37,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $74,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1188 (child welfare services/DD). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(28)))(29) $18,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $18,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $8,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1580 (children in crisis). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(29)))(30)(a) $118,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $41,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to report on a plan to discontinue the practice of using any benefits, payments, funds, or accrual paid to or on behalf of a child or youth to reimburse itself for cost of care by the earliest date feasible. The report must include an implementation plan to conserve funds for the future needs of the child in a manner in which the funds will not count against eligibility for federal or state means tested programs. The report must include a strategy for developing the financial literacy and capability of youth and young adults exiting foster care and juvenile rehabilitation. The department will develop the report in consultation with stakeholders, including but not limited to:

(i) Individuals with disabilities and organizations representing the interests of or serving individuals with disabilities;

(ii) Youth in foster care and juvenile rehabilitation and their parents;

(iii) The social security administration; and

(iv) Other relevant state agencies.

(b) The department must provide periodic status updates and must submit the final report no later than October 1, 2024. The department must convene the first meeting of the work group no later than September 1, 2023.

(31) $938,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $961,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $172,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for:

(a) Compliance with the settlement agreement reached in Ta'afulisia et al. v. Washington State Department of Children, Youth, and Families, et al., Thurston county superior court, cause no. 22-2-02974-34. The department must implement the provisions of the settlement agreement, which includes providing hearings to incarcerated youth under age 25 serving their sentence at a department of children, youth, and families facility prior to transfer to an adult corrections facility operated by the department of corrections; and

(b) Providing hearings for youth under age 25 transferred from a department of children, youth, and families community partial confinement facility to a department of children, youth, and families total confinement facility.

(32) $94,615,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for legal costs that exceed the amount covered by the self-insurance liability account as follows:

(a) $91,250,000 for the costs associated with a jury verdict resulting from Cox et al. v. State of Washington et al., Pierce county superior court, cause no. 12-2-11389-6; and

(b) $3,365,000 for the costs associated with a settlement agreement reached in Aroni et al., v. State of Washington, King county superior court, cause no. 21-2-16587-3.

(33) $1,628,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $1,926,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a feasibility study for the social service payment system replacement project.

(34) $1,272,000 of the general fund—state appropriation is provided solely to transact with the necessary level of detail regarding working connections child care program payments to address the repeated findings made by the state auditor's office related to the child care and development fund and temporary assistance for needy families federal grants.

(End of part)

PART III

NATURAL RESOURCES

Sec. 301. 2023 c 475 s 301 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COLUMBIA RIVER GORGE COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$1,728,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($1,273,000))

$1,288,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$32,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,574,000))

$2,589,000

Climate Commitment Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$138,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($5,745,000))

$5,775,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $105,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $108,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a land use planner to provide land use planning services dedicated to Klickitat county. Because the activities of the land use planner are solely for the benefit of Washington state, Oregon is not required to provide matching funds for this activity.

(2) $553,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $352,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $905,000 of the general fund—private/local appropriation are provided solely for the access database replacement project. The commission must consult with the office of the chief information officer regarding the access database replacement project.

(3) $138,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for staff to lead implementation of the agency's climate change action plan and to support implementation of the vital sign indicators monitoring program.

(4) The commission must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and section 302(13) of this act.

Sec. 302. 2023 c 475 s 302 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($39,381,000))

$39,604,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($37,256,000))

$39,546,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($108,485,000))

$145,439,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$29,544,000

Dedicated Cannabis Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2025)
. . . .
$782,000

Climate Commitment Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($14,792,000))

$25,163,000

Emergency Drought Response Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$6,000,000

Natural Climate Solutions Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($12,795,000))

$13,395,000

Reclamation Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,753,000))

$4,762,000

Flood Control Assistance Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($5,041,000))

$5,243,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$150,000

Refrigerant Emission Management Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,795,000))

$3,112,000

State Emergency Water Projects Revolving Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$40,000

Waste Reduction, Recycling, and Litter Control

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($33,866,000))

$33,915,000

State Drought Preparedness Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,204,000))

$2,219,000

State and Local Improvements Revolving Account—Water

Supply Facilities—State Appropriation
. . . .
$186,000

Water Rights Tracking System Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$48,000

Site Closure Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$582,000

Wood Stove Education and Enforcement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$605,000

Worker and Community Right to Know Fund—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,212,000))

$2,215,000

Water Rights Processing Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$39,000

Water Quality Permit Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($65,774,000))

$66,904,000

Underground Storage Tank Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,987,000))

$5,001,000

Biosolids Permit Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,054,000))

$3,056,000

Hazardous Waste Assistance Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($9,393,000))

$9,429,000

Radioactive Mixed Waste Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($23,955,000))

$24,305,000

Air Pollution Control Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,706,000))

$4,904,000

Oil Spill Prevention Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($8,485,000))

$9,098,000

Air Operating Permit Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($5,510,000))

$5,565,000

Wastewater Treatment Plant Operator Certification

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($801,000))

$805,000

Oil Spill Response Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$7,076,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($342,888,000))

$347,444,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—Local

Appropriation
. . . .
(($499,000))

$1,000,000

Model Toxics Control Stormwater Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$16,991,000

Voluntary Cleanup Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$344,000

Paint Product Stewardship Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$151,000

Water Pollution Control Revolving Administration

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($8,506,000))

$8,606,000

Clean Fuels Program Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,801,000))

$5,004,000

Climate Investment Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($50,290,000))

$58,791,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($858,985,000))

$927,063,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $455,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $455,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to grant to the northwest straits commission to provide funding, technical assistance, and/or coordination support equally to the seven Puget Sound marine resources committees.

(2) $170,000 of the oil spill prevention account—state appropriation is provided solely for a contract with the University of Washington's sea grant program to continue an educational program targeted to small spills from commercial fishing vessels, ferries, cruise ships, ports, and marinas.

(3) $102,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $102,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Executive Order No. 12-07, Washington's response to ocean acidification.

(4) $24,000,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide grants to local governments for the purpose of supporting local solid waste and financial assistance programs.

(5) $150,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of the state marine management plan and ongoing costs of the Washington coastal marine advisory council to serve as a forum and provide recommendations on coastal management issues.

(6) $2,000,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to convene a stakeholder group, including representatives from overburdened communities, to assist with developing a water quality implementation plan for polychlorinated biphenyls and to address other emerging contaminants in the Spokane river. The department must also consult with the Spokane tribe of Indians and other interested tribes when developing and implementing actions to address water quality in the Spokane river.

(7) $4,002,000 of the natural climate solutions account—state appropriation is provided solely to address flood prevention in the Nooksack basin and Sumas prairie. Of this amount:

(a) $2,000,000 is provided solely to expand and sustain Whatcom county's floodplain integrated planning (FLIP) team planning process, including supporting communication, community participation, coordination, technical studies and analysis, and development of local solutions.

(b) $900,000 is provided solely for the department to support transboundary coordination, including facilitation and technical support to develop and evaluate alternatives for managing transboundary flooding in Whatcom county and British Columbia.

(c) $1,102,000 is provided solely to support dedicated local and department capacity for floodplain planning and technical support. Of the amount in this subsection (c), $738,000 is solely for a grant to Whatcom county. The remaining amount is for the department to provide ongoing staff technical assistance and support to flood prevention efforts in this area.

(8) (($16,472,000))$21,504,000 of the climate investment account—state appropriation, of which $5,032,000 takes effect January 1, 2025, is provided solely for capacity grants to federally recognized tribes for: (a) Consultation on spending decisions on grants in accordance with RCW 70A.65.305; ((and)) (b) consultation on clean energy siting projects; (c) activities supporting climate resilience and adaptation; (d) developing tribal clean energy projects; (e) applying for state or federal grant funding; and (f) other related work. In order to meet the requirements of RCW 70A.65.230(1)(b), tribal applicants are encouraged to include a tribal resolution supporting their request with their grant application.

(9) $1,363,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for preparation and filing of adjudications of state water rights in water resource inventory area 1 (Nooksack).

(10) $573,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $963,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for preparation and filing of adjudications of state water rights in lake Roosevelt and its immediate tributaries.

(11) $2,479,000 of the climate investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for addressing air quality in overburdened communities highly impacted by air pollution under RCW 70A.65.020.

(12) $177,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $177,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to validate a proposed standardized channel migration zone mapping methodology, develop a statewide channel migration zone mapping implementation plan, and provide technical assistance to local and tribal governments looking to use the new standard.

(13)(a) $640,000 of the climate investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department, in consultation with the office of financial management and the environmental justice council, to develop and implement a process to track, summarize, and report on state agency expenditures from climate commitment act accounts that provide direct and meaningful benefits to vulnerable populations within the boundaries of overburdened communities as described in RCW 70A.65.030 and 70A.65.230, and expenditures that are formally supported by a resolution of an Indian tribe as described in RCW 70A.65.230. The department must incorporate the process under this subsection into existing efforts to track climate commitment act expenditures under RCW 70A.65.300. The department must incorporate the Washington state proequity antiracism (PEAR) plan and playbook and executive order 22-04 into the work of this subsection as appropriate.

(b) The information that agencies provide to the department, and that the department tracks and reports on under this subsection, must include, at a minimum:

(i) The amount of each expenditure that provides direct and meaningful benefits to vulnerable populations within the boundaries of overburdened communities;

(ii) An explanation of how the expenditure provides such benefits;

(iii) The methods by which overburdened communities and vulnerable populations were identified by the agency and an explanation of the outcomes of those identification processes, including the geographic location impacted by the expenditure where relevant, and the geographic boundaries of overburdened communities identified by the agency;

(iv) The amount of each expenditure used for programs, activities, or projects formally supported by a resolution of an Indian tribe; and

(v) For expenditures that do not meet, or it is unclear whether they meet, (b)(i) or (iv) of this subsection, an explanation of why.

(c) The department, in consultation with the environmental justice council and the office of financial management, and in coordination with reporting under RCW 70A.65.300, must report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by September 30, 2024, on the following:

(i) A summary of the information provided by agencies through the process in this subsection; and

(ii) Any recommendations for improvements to the process under this subsection or potential amendments to RCW 70A.65.030, 70A.65.230, or 70A.02.080, or other statutes relevant to this subsection. In making recommendations, the department must consider any statutory changes necessary to ensure consistent tracking of the uses of climate commitment account funds, including standardization or coordination of the process for identifying the overburdened communities used for purposes of tracking expenditures and the methods for determining whether an expenditure contributes a direct and meaningful benefit to a vulnerable population or overburdened community.

(d) "Climate commitment act accounts" means the carbon emissions reduction account created in RCW 70A.65.240, the climate commitment account created in RCW 70A.65.260, the natural climate solutions account created in RCW 70A.65.270, the climate investment account created in RCW 70A.65.250, the air quality and health disparities improvement account created in RCW 70A.65.280, the climate transit programs account created in RCW 46.68.500, and the climate active transportation account created in RCW 46.68.490.

(14) $238,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for technical assistance and compliance assurance associated with the ban of certain hydrofluorocarbon-related products.

(15) $2,500,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to conduct a statewide compost emissions study, which will provide essential data needed to improve the quality of air permitting decisions, improve compost facility operations, and support state goals to reduce organic waste in landfills reducing climate change impacts.

(16) $2,256,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide technical assistance to landowners and local governments to promote voluntary compliance, implement best management practices, and support implementation of water quality clean-up plans in shellfish growing areas, agricultural areas, forestlands, and other types of land uses, including technical assistance focused on protection and restoration of critical riparian management areas important for salmon recovery.

(17) $2,702,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to develop a 6PPD action plan and complete a safer alternatives assessment of the 6PPD compound used in tires, including obtaining any data necessary to complete the alternatives assessment. The action plan should identify, characterize, and evaluate uses and releases of 6PPD and related chemicals, and recommend actions to protect human health and the environment. The department shall provide a progress report on the action plan and alternatives assessment to the governor's office, the office of financial management, and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2024. The department may provide funding from this subsection to the University of Washington and Washington State University for the purposes of this subsection.

(18) $5,195,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely to establish a program to monitor 6PPD compounds in water and sediment, identify effective best management practices to treat 6PPD in stormwater runoff, produce guidance on how and when to use best management practices for toxicity reduction to protect salmon and other aquatic life, and incorporate the guidance into stormwater management manuals. The department may provide funding from this subsection to the University of Washington and Washington State University for the purposes of this subsection.

(19) $2,296,000 of the natural climate solutions account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5104 (marine shoreline habitat). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(20)(a) $500,000 of the model toxics control operating account— state appropriation is provided solely for the department to carry out the following activities to inform the development of legislative proposals to increase recycling, reuse, and source reduction rates, which must include consideration of how to design and implement a producer responsibility model for consumer packaging, including paper, plastic, metal, and glass, and paper products:

(i) Conduct a recycling, reuse, and source reduction targets study; and

(ii) Carry out a community input process on the state's recycling system.

(b) The department must contract with an impartial third-party consultant with relevant technical expertise and capabilities in facilitation and gathering public input, including from overburdened communities, to carry out the activities specified in (a) of this subsection. In order to ensure that the state is receiving a variety of expert perspectives on the topic of packaging management, the contractor should include in their team individuals and/or subcontractors with a wide range of expertise and experience. The third party consultant must submit a report to the appropriate committees of the house of representatives and the senate by December 1, 2023.

(c) The recycling, reuse, and source reduction targets study must:

(i) Document recycling rates, reuse rates, and the reduction of single-use plastics for consumer packaging and paper products that have been adopted in other jurisdictions, measure methods used, and the basis or justification for recommended target rates selected;

(ii) Recommend highest achievable performance rates, including an overall recycling rate, a separate specific minimum reuse rate, a recycling rate for each material category, and a source reduction rate to be achieved solely by eliminating plastic components, that could be achieved under up to four different scenarios, including a producer responsibility program and other policies; and

(iii) Make recommendations that consider the commercial viability and technological feasibility of achieving rates based on current rates achieved in the state, rates achieved based on real world performance data, and other data, with performance rates designed to be achieved statewide by 2032.

(d) For purposes of this subsection, "eliminate" or "elimination," with respect to source reduction, means the removal of a plastic component from a covered material without replacing that component with a nonplastic component.

(e) The community input process on the state's recycling system must include:

(i) In-person and virtual workshops and community meetings held at locations in urban and rural areas and in ways that are accessible to stakeholders across the state, including overburdened communities;

(ii) Public opinion surveys that are representative of Washington residents across the state, including overburdened communities and urban and rural areas; and

(iii) A focus on eliciting an improved understanding of public values and opinions related to the state's recycling system, the current public experience with respect to the state's recycling systems, and ways the public believes that their recycling experience and system outcomes could be improved.

(21)(a) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department, in consultation with other agencies as necessary, to conduct an analysis of water use for irrigation under the potential scenario of lower Snake river dam removal. Analysis must include continued water use during drawdown and thereafter from the river postremoval. The analysis must include the following:

(i) A plan identifying potential mitigation needs and interim approaches for delivery of water for irrigation pursuant to existing water rights for those using pumps, wells, or both, from Ice Harbor reservoir during a possible transition from the current reservoir-based irrigation to irrigation from the river;

(ii) Identification of cost-effective options for continued irrigation at current amounts and with existing water rights from the lower Snake river at the area of the current Ice Harbor pool; and

(iii) Cost estimates for any necessary irrigation system upgrades required to continue irrigation from the lower Snake river.

(b) The department may, as necessary and appropriate, consult for this analysis with irrigators and tribal governments.

(c) The department shall provide a status update to the environment and energy committees of the legislature and the office of the governor by December 31, 2024.

(22) $3,914,000 of the natural climate solutions account—state appropriation is provided solely for activities related to coastal hazards, including expanding the coastal monitoring and analysis program, establishing a coastal hazard organizational resilience team, and establishing a coastal hazards grant program to help local communities design projects and apply for funding opportunities. At least 25 percent of the funding in this subsection must be used for the benefit of tribes.

(23) $340,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1033 (compostable product usage). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(24) $1,124,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1047 (cosmetic product chemicals). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(25) $139,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1085 (plastic pollution). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(26) $6,000,000 of the emergency drought response account—state appropriation and $2,000,000 of the state drought preparedness account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1138 (drought preparedness). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(27) $1,123,000 of the natural climate solutions account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1170 (climate response strategy). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(28) $43,000 of the underground storage tank account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1175 (petroleum storage tanks). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(29) $1,174,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1181 (climate change/planning). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(30) $13,248,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1216 (clean energy siting). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(31) $140,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1578 (wildland fire safety). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(32) Expenditures on upgrading or developing the turboplan system, Washington fuel reporting system, and EAGL system are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(33) $1,263,000 of the clean fuels program account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5447 (alternative jet fuel). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(34) $370,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely as a grant to the Puget Sound clean air agency to identify emission reduction projects and to help community-based organizations, local governments, and ports in overburdened communities author grant applications and provide support for grant reporting for entities that receive grants. The department must prioritize projects located in overburdened communities so that those communities can reap the public health benefits from the climate commitment act, inflation reduction act, and other new funding opportunities.

(35) $1,220,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5144 (batteries/environment). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(36) (($822,000))$77,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5369 (polychlorinated biphenyls). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(37) $330,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide a grant to Clark county for the purpose of developing and implementing a lake management plan to restore and maintain the health of Vancouver lake, a category 5 303(d) status impaired body of water. The department must work with the county to include involvement by property owners around the lake and within the watersheds that drain to the lake, the department of natural resources, other state agencies and local governments with proprietary or regulatory jurisdiction, tribes, and nonprofit organizations advocating for the health of the lake. The plan should incorporate work already completed by the county and other entities involved in development of the lake management strategy.

(38) $276,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for a grant to San Juan county for the enhancement of ongoing oil spill response preparedness staff hiring, spill response equipment acquisition, and spill response training and operational expenses.

(39) $1,460,000 of the natural climate solutions account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide grants to the following organizations in the amounts specified for the purpose of coordinating, monitoring, restoring, and conducting research for Puget Sound kelp conservation and recovery:

(a) $300,000 to the Squaxin Island Tribe;

(b) $200,000 to the Samish Indian Nation;

(c) $144,000 to the Lower Elwha Klallam Tribe;

(d) $200,000 to the Northwest straits commission;

(e) $366,000 to the Puget Sound restoration fund to subcontract with sound data systems and Vashon nature center; and

(f) $250,000 to the reef check foundation.

(40) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department's engagement with the federal government, Indian tribes, water users, and local governments on a process that could result in a federal Indian water rights settlement through the Nooksack adjudication. The department shall produce a monthly report during the claims filing period to monitor the progress of claims filed by water users. The department shall provide a report to the appropriate standing committees of the legislature regarding the status of the adjudication and any potential settlement structure by June 30, 2024, and by June 30, 2025.

(41) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to Whatcom county to provide technical assistance that must be made available to all water users in WRIA 1 in filing adjudication claims under RCW 90.03.140. This assistance must be administered by Whatcom county and no portion of this funding may be used to contest the claims of any other claimant in the adjudication.

(42) $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to Whatcom county acting as fiscal agent for the WRIA 1 watershed management board, in support of collaborative water supply planning in WRIA 1. Funding may be used to collect or analyze technical information, to develop and assess the feasibility of water supply solutions in WRIA 1, and for facilitation and mediation among parties including, but not limited to, the department, Whatcom county, the public utility district, the city of Bellingham, Lummi Nation, and the Nooksack Tribe. Specific funding allocations, including purpose and amount, will be determined by the WRIA 1 watershed management board. Funding under this subsection will be available only after the filing of the Nooksack adjudication, and no funding provided for the Nooksack adjudication will be used to support the activities funded by this subsection. It is anticipated that these activities will run in parallel with the Nooksack adjudication.

(43) $200,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with a consultant to develop a report that conducts a full emissions life cycle assessment for solid waste processed at the Spokane Waste to Energy Facility (WTEF) compared to solid waste processed at three other landfills within the region that waste may be sent to if the WTEF were to cease operations. The report must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2023.

(44) $896,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for Washington conservation corps (WCC) cost-share requirements for qualifying organizations, as identified through a competitive application process that prioritizes communities that have not previously received WCC support, are in areas with a high cumulative impact on the department of health's environmental health disparities map, are identified by the office of financial management as distressed, and/or have a high percentile of people of color or low-income.

(45) $410,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely to implement the recommendations from the agency's June 2023 report on Puget Sound nutrient credit trading, including conducting a market feasibility analysis and developing a stakeholder outreach plan, a tribal engagement plan, and trading resource materials.

(46) $782,000 of the dedicated cannabis account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely to create and sustain a program to accredit cannabis testing laboratories. If Second Substitute House Bill No. 2151 (cannabis lab accreditation) is enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(47) $338,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation shall take effect January 1, 2025, and is provided solely for the department to increase planning, engagement, and evaluation tools for effective ocean management and offshore wind energy development.

(48) $500,000 of the natural climate solutions account—state appropriation shall take effect January 1, 2025, and is provided solely for the department to grant to the Squaxin Island tribe for implementing and monitoring various blue carbon sequestration projects in south Puget Sound.

(49) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to develop a groundwater modeling guidance publication.

(a) The publication must provide consistency in the department's evaluation of groundwater models submitted for water right permitting actions and ensure continued transparency to water right applicants in the department's permitting processes. The core purpose of the publication is to establish best practices for groundwater modeling. The publication will:

(i) Define criteria for evaluating model suitability for proposed projects;

(ii) Identify the department's approach to evaluating model error and uncertainty;

(iii) Identify circumstances where model outputs are insufficient for permit decision making; and

(iv) Address the appropriateness of refining a regional groundwater model in water right permitting decisions.

(b) The department must convene a technical advisory committee of licensed hydrogeologists or professional engineers with experience in groundwater modeling to review the workplan and provide comments on the guidance. The publication must be peer reviewed by the United States geological survey or other state or national hydrogeologic professional organization.

(c) The department must invite any federally recognized Indian tribes that may be potentially affected by the publication to participate in the technical advisory committee and engage in consultation with any federally recognized Indian tribe as requested.

(d) The department must provide an update to the appropriate committees of the legislature and to the office of financial management by June 30, 2025. The department must indicate the estimated time to complete the publication, including draft guidance, recommended further research, and key implementation steps in the update.

(50) $200,000 of the flood control assistance account—state appropriation is provided solely for a grant to the Cowlitz-Wahkiakum council of governments to advance the Spirit Lake-Toutle/Cowlitz river system collaborative by facilitating meetings, and supporting strategic communication and planning among federal, state, and local partners. The work of the collaborative includes flood risk reduction, ecosystem recovery, scientific research, and other activities related to sediment management and flooding in the Spirit Lake-Toutle/Cowlitz river system.

(51) $650,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation shall take effect January 1, 2025, and is provided solely for a feasibility and engineering study for the city of Spokane's waste to energy plant carbon emissions reductions project.

(52) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the implementation of the Spanaway lake cyanobacteria plan and the aquatic plant management plan, including testing, sample collection, and monitoring for tracking water quality and determining treatment options.

(53) $130,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $170,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to Whatcom county to provide technical assistance that must be made available to all water users in WRIA 1 in filing adjudication claims under RCW 90.03.140. This assistance must be administered by Whatcom county and no portion of this funding may be used to contest the claims of any other claimant in the adjudication.

(54) $300,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for a grant for the removal of tires containing 6PPD from docks serving floatplanes in salmon-bearing waterways. Funds may be used to reduce the cost of conversion to alternative products that are free of 6PPD.

(55)(a) $300,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for an analysis of waste tires to better understand how the disposal, distribution, and management of waste tires contributes to 6PPD-q pollution. The department must conduct a study of the disposal, repurposing, reuse, recycling, handling, and management of waste tires in the state. At a minimum, the study must include a characterization of the markets for waste tires; a description of the sectoral and geographic origins and destinations of waste tires; an assessment of which Washington state policies and programs impact the market; and alternatives to using tire derived rubber in these markets.

(b) The department may contract with a third party for the study as outlined. A final study report is due to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025, in accordance with RCW 43.01.036.

(c) For purposes of this subsection, "waste tires" has the definition provided in RCW 70A.205.440.

(56) $37,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5649 (floodproofing improvements). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(57) $76,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5812 (electric vehicle fires). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(58) $665,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5931 (motorized vehicle tires/6PPD). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(59) $44,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6061 (housing development/SEPA). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(60) $50,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6164 (county emergency management). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(61) $1,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6010 (SEPA/trails and paths). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(62) $748,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementing Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6092 (greenhouse gas disclosures). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(63) $1,070,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6039 (geothermal energy resources). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(64) $1,787,000 of the climate investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6058 (carbon market linkage). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(65) $114,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6163 (biosolids). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(66) $750,000 of the model toxics control account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to identify additional priority consumer products containing PFAS for potential regulatory action and to issue orders to manufacturers to obtain ingredient information, including for chemical ingredients used to replace priority chemicals, as provided in chapter 70A.350 RCW.

(67) $501,000 of the model toxics control operating account—local appropriation is provided solely for cleanup costs at the Stillwater holdings Chevron site in Walla Walla.

Sec. 303. 2023 c 475 s 303 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($868,000))

$1,237,000

Pollution Liability Insurance Agency Underground

Storage Tank Revolving Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$957,000

Pollution Liability Insurance Program Trust Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
(($10,190,000))

$10,203,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($12,015,000))

$12,397,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $8,340,000 of the pollution liability insurance program trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1175 (petroleum storage tanks). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

Sec. 304. 2023 c 475 s 304 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($39,617,000))

$41,128,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($39,564,000))

$42,845,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($7,231,000))

$7,232,000

Climate Commitment Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,083,000))

$2,883,000

Natural Climate Solutions Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($350,000))

$650,000

Winter Recreation Program Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,928,000))

$5,009,000

ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$396,000

Snowmobile Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($5,715,000))

$5,796,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$367,000

Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($148,388,000))

$154,722,000

Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account—Private/Local

Appropriation
. . . .
(($420,000))

$720,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($248,059,000))

$261,748,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $5,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $5,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $142,000 of the parks renewal and stewardship account—state appropriation are provided solely for operating budget impacts from capital budget projects completed in the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.

(2) $127,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $128,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $750,000 of the parks renewal and stewardship account—state appropriation are provided solely to monitor known cultural resource sites, perform needed evaluations for historic properties, manage historic preservation capital projects, and support native American grave protection and repatriation act compliance.

(3) $299,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $299,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,797,000 of the parks renewal and stewardship account—state appropriation are provided solely for additional staff and technical support for scoping and scheduling to proactively address tribal and community concerns and increase the quality of capital project requests.

(4) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to complete a park master plan and an environmental impact statement for Miller peninsula park.

(5) $3,750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the maintenance of state parks, including maintaining grounds and facilities, trails, restrooms, water access areas, and similar activities.

(6) (($1,083,000))$2,883,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation and (($350,000))$650,000 of the natural climate solutions account—state appropriation, of which $1,800,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation and $300,000 of the natural climate solutions account—state appropriation shall take effect January 1, 2025, are provided solely to identify and reduce the state park system's carbon emissions and assess areas of vulnerability for climate change.

(7) $336,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $336,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to create a statewide data management system with the department of natural resources and the department of fish and wildlife to make informed management decisions that meet conservation goals for public lands. The agencies will also collaborate with tribal governments to ensure cultural resources and cultural practices are considered and incorporated into management plans.

(8) $129,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $129,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant for the operation of the Northwest weather and avalanche center.

(9) The commission must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and section 302(13) of this act.

(10)(a) $170,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $170,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a contract with a statewide trail maintenance and hiking nonprofit organization to provide the emerging leaders program: expanding equity in the outdoors. The goal of the program is expanding both the number and diversity of trained, qualified individuals available for employment in the outdoor recreation and natural resource management sectors.

(b) The program must demonstrate a commitment to diversity, equity, and inclusion by providing a safe and supportive environment for individuals of diverse backgrounds, including those who have been historically underrepresented in the outdoor recreation and natural resource sectors, such as indigenous people and people of color.

(c) The program must provide both technical outdoor skills training and professional development opportunities that include, but are not limited to, outdoor leadership, representation in the outdoors, and team building.

(11) $21,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5371 (orca vessel protection). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(12) $450,000 of the parks renewal and stewardship account—state appropriation is provided solely for grounds and facilities maintenance costs at the Fort Worden state park campus. The state parks and recreation commission shall work with the Fort Worden lifelong learning center public development authority to develop a report that reviews the historic public development authority financial records, identifies a cost-recovery model to pay for campus maintenance, and proposes any changes to the current lease structure necessary to maintain the public development authority. The commission must submit the report to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature no later than June 1, 2024.

Sec. 305. 2023 c 475 s 305 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($10,190,000))

$10,323,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($6,501,000))

$6,782,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$6,196,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$24,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$464,000

Climate Investment Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$200,000

Firearms Range Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$37,000

Natural Climate Solutions Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$398,000

Recreation Resources Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($5,040,000))

$5,058,000

NOVA Program Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,564,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($30,614,000))

$31,046,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $37,000 of the firearms range account—state appropriation is provided solely to the recreation and conservation funding board for administration of the firearms range grant program as described in RCW 79A.25.210.

(2) $5,040,000 of the recreation resources account—state appropriation is provided solely to the recreation and conservation funding board for administrative and coordinating costs of the recreation and conservation office and the board as described in RCW 79A.25.080(1).

(3) $1,564,000 of the NOVA program account—state appropriation is provided solely to the recreation and conservation funding board for administration of the nonhighway and off-road vehicle activities program as described in chapter 46.09 RCW.

(4) $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the governor's salmon recovery office to implement the governor's salmon recovery strategy update by convening the natural resources subcabinet on a regular basis and developing biennial statewide work priorities with a recommended budget for salmon recovery pursuant to RCW 77.85.030(4)(e) that align with tribal priorities and regional salmon recovery plans. The office shall submit the biennial implementation plan to the governor's office and the office of financial management no later than October 31, 2024.

(5) $1,714,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,714,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for operational and administrative support of lead entities and salmon recovery regions.

(6) $200,000 of the climate investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the agency to complete the required community engagement plan as outlined in RCW 70A.65.030, the climate commitment act.

(7) $1,464,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation and $50,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account—state appropriation are provided solely to support removal efforts for flowering rush in the Columbia river basin and Whatcom county.

(8) $398,000 of the natural climate solutions account—state appropriation is provided solely to establish a riparian coordinator position within the governor's salmon recovery office to work with state agencies to improve project coordination, develop common metrics across programs, and consolidate data platforms.

(9) $3,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization with a mission for salmon and steelhead restoration to install near-term solutions to prevent steelhead mortality at the Hood canal bridge.

(10) The office must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and section 302(13) of this act.

(11) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the connections and snow to sea programs, which provide youth outdoor learning experiences in the Blaine, Mount Baker, and Nooksack Valley school districts.

(12) $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to local parks to address any maintenance backlog of existing facilities, trails, and capital improvements. The funds should be dispersed on a needs-based set of criteria and on a one-time basis. Grants are limited to $100,000 per organization. Allowable uses of grant funding include, but are not limited to, maintenance, repair, or replacement of trails, restroom facilities, picnic sites, playgrounds, signage, and kiosks, as well as necessary Americans with disabilities act upgrades delayed due to the pandemic. Local parks agencies may partner with nonprofit organizations in deploying this maintenance and Americans with disabilities act funding.

(13) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for updating the economic analysis of outdoor recreation in Washington state and adding an analysis of the impacts of the outdoor recreation economy in underserved communities.

(14) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for motorized and nonmotorized boater education and outreach on Lake Union, with a specific goal of preventing boat and airplane conflicts on the lake during peak recreation season, given the provisions of the United States coast guard navigation rules that seaplanes must in general keep well clear of other vessels. The office may grant funding to local or federal government agencies or nonprofit organizations. The office must publish a publicly available summary report by June 30, 2025, on funding recipients, uses of the funding, and the successes and failures of programs funded. Funding provided in this subsection may not be used to preclude or restrict public use of Lake Union, including recreational, commercial, or tribal use of waters of the state.

Sec. 306. 2023 c 475 s 306 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE ENVIRONMENTAL AND LAND USE HEARINGS OFFICE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$3,484,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($3,792,000))

$4,180,000

Climate Investment Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$898,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($8,174,000))

$8,562,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $164,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $379,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $898,000 of the climate investment account—state appropriation are provided solely for the agency to hire staff to respond to increased caseloads, including appeals as a result of the climate commitment act, chapter 316, Laws of 2021.

(2) $52,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1047 (cosmetic product chemicals). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(3) $20,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $20,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1110 (middle housing). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(4) The office must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and section 302(13) of this act.

Sec. 307. 2023 c 475 s 307 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($16,461,000))

$16,493,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($16,453,000))

$17,197,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,482,000

Climate Commitment Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($30,200,000))

$5,300,000

Climate Investment Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$250,000

Natural Climate Solutions Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$20,023,000

Public Works Assistance Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$10,332,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,110,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($97,311,000))

$73,187,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $250,000 of the climate investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the agency to complete the required community engagement plan as outlined in RCW 70A.65.030, the climate commitment act.

(2) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to increase technical assistance and operational capacity of conservation districts.

(3) $3,000,000 of the natural climate solutions account—state appropriation is provided solely to support the outreach, identification, and implementation of salmon riparian habitat restoration projects.

(4) $5,000,000 of the natural climate solutions account—state appropriation is provided solely to the commission to work with conservation districts to address unhealthy forests and build greater community resiliency to wildfire.

(5) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to connect scientists, practitioners, and researchers and coordinate efforts to monitor and quantify benefits of best management practices on agricultural lands, and better understand values and motivations of landowners to implement voluntary incentive programs.

(6) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to support the continued development of the disaster assistance program established in RCW 89.08.645, to provide short-term financial support for farmers and ranchers during disasters. Funding must be prioritized for farmers and ranchers who are the most economically vulnerable.

(7) $1,420,000 of the public works assistance account—state appropriation is provided solely to support monitoring and reporting efforts necessary to evaluate the implementation and effectiveness of voluntary stewardship program work plans.

(8) $8,533,000 of the public works assistance account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of the voluntary stewardship program. This amount may not be used to fund agency indirect and administrative expenses.

(9) (($30,000,000))$5,100,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants through the sustainable farms and fields program for organic agricultural waste and greenhouse gas emissions reduction through climate-smart livestock management. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(a)(((i) The commission may grant up to $22,000,000 toward cost share agreements for anaerobic digester development to dairy farm owners. Grants awarded for anaerobic digester development must have at least a 50 percent nonstate match and be awarded through a competitive process that considers:

(A) The amount of greenhouse gas reduction that will be achieved by the proposal; and

(B) The amount of untreated effluent that will be decreased.

(ii) Recipients of grants under (a)(i) of this subsection must provide a report to the commission within one year of receipt of the grant, detailing the success of the project in meeting the stated criteria for the competitive process.

(b))) The commission may grant up to (($6,000,000))$3,000,000 for technical and financial assistance to increase implementation of climate-smart livestock management, alternative manure management, and other best management practices to reduce greenhouse gas emissions and increase carbon sequestration.

(((c)))(b) The commission may grant up to $2,000,000 for research on, or demonstration of, projects with greenhouse gas reduction benefits.

(((d)))(c) When funding for specific technologies, including anaerobic digesters, the commission must enter into appropriate agreements to support the state's interest in advancing innovation solution to decarbonize while ensuring compliance with Article VIII, section 5 and Article XII, section 9 of the state Constitution.

(((e)))(d) The commission must submit a report summarizing the grants awarded and the likely annual greenhouse gas emission reductions achieved as a result to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024.

(10) $23,000 of the natural climate solutions account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1170 (climate response strategy). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(11) $379,000 of the public works assistance account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5353 (voluntary stewardship program). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(12) The commission must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and section 302(13) of this act.

(13) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to the King county conservation district to reduce the impacts of artificial lighting on or near the water on the behavior of salmon and other aquatic life in Lake Sammamish and Lake Washington. The grant funding may be used for:

(a) Research, including quantifying light intensities and conducting field studies of fish behavior;

(b) Community education, engagement, and technical assistance; and

(c) Development of model lighting ordinances.

(14) $2,000,000 of the natural climate solutions account—state appropriation is provided solely to develop and implement an educational communication plan to the general public and landowners in urban, suburban, rural, agricultural, and forested areas regarding the importance of riparian buffers and the actions they can take to protect and enhance these critical areas.

(15) $200,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the commission to conduct an evaluation of the current contribution that organic and climate smart agriculture makes toward Washington's climate response goals, what potential there is for increasing this contribution, and how additional investments will help realize this potential, while supporting resiliency. The commission must include the departments of agriculture and ecology and other relevant state agencies, Washington state university, conservation districts, tribal governments, nongovernmental organizations, and other relevant stakeholders who will participate in the evaluation. The commission must submit a report of its findings and recommendation to the appropriate committees of the legislature by May 1, ((2024))2025.

(16) $10,000,000 of the natural climate solutions account—state appropriation is provided solely for the commission to provide grants to local government and private landowners for fire wise projects to reduce forest fuel loading in areas deemed a high hazard for potential wildfire.

(17) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for staffing to support administrative operations of the commission. The commission will adopt an administrative rate policy for funding indirect support costs for future programmatic operating budget requests.

(18) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for post wildfire recovery actions in central Klickitat conservation district and eastern Klickitat conservation district to provide technical assistance and conduct fire recovery activities such as seeding, weed control, dozer line repair, forest health, and shrub steppe restoration, on areas that are necessary for public resource protection.

(19) $30,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $41,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6278 (organic agriculture). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 308. 2023 c 475 s 308 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($159,066,000))

$161,725,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($163,912,000))

$178,838,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($144,941,000))

$158,203,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($69,907,000))

$70,022,000

Climate Commitment Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$3,398,000

Natural Climate Solutions Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,748,000))

$5,748,000

ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$696,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($14,104,000))

$14,125,000

Recreational Fisheries Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,721,000))

$3,757,000

Salmon Recovery Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$3,000,000

Warm Water Game Fish Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,088,000))

$3,089,000

Eastern Washington Pheasant Enhancement Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
(($673,000))

$675,000

Limited Fish and Wildlife Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($36,826,000))

$36,947,000

Special Wildlife Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,924,000))

$2,926,000

Special Wildlife Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$531,000

Special Wildlife Account—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,819,000))

$3,843,000

Wildlife Rehabilitation Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$661,000

Ballast Water and Biofouling Management Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$10,000

Regional Fisheries Enhancement Salmonid Recovery

Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$5,001,000

Oil Spill Prevention Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,284,000

Aquatic Invasive Species Management Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,154,000))

$1,158,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$7,724,000

Fish, Wildlife, and Conservation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($83,640,000))

$83,995,000

Forest Resiliency Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,000,000

Oyster Reserve Land Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$524,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($718,352,000))

$751,880,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,777,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,777,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to grant to the northwest Indian fisheries commission for hatchery operations that are prioritized to increase prey abundance for southern resident orcas, including $200,000 per fiscal year for tagging and marking costs, and the remainder to grant to tribes in the following amounts per fiscal year: $150,000 for the Quinault Indian Nation, $199,000 for the Tulalip Tribes, $268,000 for the Quileute Tribe, $186,000 for the Puyallup Tribe, $122,000 for the Port Gamble S'Klallam Tribe, $25,000 for the Muckleshoot Indian Tribe, $207,000 for the Squaxin Island Tribe, $142,000 for the Skokomish Indian Tribe, and $278,000 for the Lummi Nation.

(2) $330,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $330,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to provide to the Yakama Nation for hatchery operations that are prioritized to increase prey abundance for southern resident orcas.

(3) $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to grant to public utility districts for additional hatchery production that is prioritized to increase prey abundance for southern resident orcas.

(4) (($467,000))$217,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $467,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to pay for emergency fire suppression costs. These amounts may not be used to fund agency indirect and administrative expenses.

(5) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a state match to support the Puget Sound nearshore partnership between the department and the United States army corps of engineers.

(6)(a) $6,082,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $6,082,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to implement eradication and control measures on European green crabs through coordination and grants with partner organizations. The department must provide quarterly progress reports on the success and challenges of the measures to the appropriate committees of the legislature.

(b) The department must develop a comprehensive long-term plan for Washington's response to European green crab. The plan must identify where permanent trapping efforts should occur, where efficiencies over current operations may be achieved, which agencies, tribes, or organizations require ongoing funding to support the state's eradication and control measures, and the potential for federal funding for control efforts, and include a recommended funding level to implement the plan in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium. The plan shall be submitted to the governor and legislature by October 1, 2024.

(7) $403,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $377,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to develop conflict mitigation strategies for wolf recovery and staff resources in northeast Washington for response to wolf-livestock conflicts. The department shall not hire contract range riders in northeast Washington unless there is a gap in coverage from entities funded through the northeast Washington wolf-livestock management grant program as provided in RCW 16.76.020. No contract riders shall be deployed in areas already sufficiently covered by other riders. The department must focus on facilitating coordination with other entities providing conflict deterrence, including range riding, and technical assistance to livestock producers in order to minimize wolf-livestock issues in the Kettle Range and other areas of northeast Washington with existing or emerging chronic conflict. The department is discouraged from the use of firearms from helicopters for removing wolves.

(8) $852,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $852,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to provide additional capacity to the attorney general's office to prosecute environmental crimes. The department must provide an annual report by December 1st of each year, to the appropriate committees of the legislature, on the progress made in prosecuting environmental crimes.

(9) $753,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $753,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for expanded management of pinniped populations on the lower Columbia river and its tributaries with the goal of increasing chinook salmon abundance and prey availability for southern resident orcas.

(10) $470,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $470,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to expand efforts to survey the diets of seals and sea lions in the Salish sea and identify nonlethal management actions to deter them from preying on salmon and steelhead.

(11) $518,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $519,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to continue to provide policy and scientific support to the department of ecology regarding surface and groundwater management issues as part of implementing chapter 90.94 RCW streamflow restoration.

(12) $4,096,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely to analyze salmon contaminants of emerging concern (CEC), including substances such as 6PPD-quinone and polychlorinated biphenyls (PCB) in already collected tissue samples. This research will accelerate recovery and protection by identifying the location and sources of CEC exposure.

(13) $130,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $130,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for an external facilitator to seek solutions through a collaborative process using the department's wolf advisory group.

(14) $194,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $194,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to update and maintain rule making related to chapter 77.57 RCW, fishways, flow, and screening.

(15) $822,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $822,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to monitor recreational steelhead spawning and harvest in freshwater streams and rivers in Puget Sound.

(16) $2,714,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for additional law enforcement officers for marine and freshwater fisheries compliance and a patrol vessel dedicated to coastal operations.

(17) $509,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $305,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to monitor recreational shellfish harvests, monitor intertidal and crustacean fisheries, address emerging environmental issues, maintain a new data management infrastructure, and develop a disease and pest management program to protect shellfish fisheries in the Puget Sound.

(18) $360,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $224,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to complete and maintain a statewide prioritization of fish passage barriers in collaboration with regional salmon recovery organizations.

(19) $997,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $997,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to continue the assessment of riparian ecosystems. The assessment must include identifying common statewide definitions of terms for riparian usage, recommendations to improve data sharing, and identifying any gaps in vegetated cover relative to a science-based standard for a fully functioning riparian ecosystem and comparing the status and gaps to water temperature impairments, known fish passage barriers, and status of salmonid stocks.

(20) (($900,000))$419,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the Lummi Nation to make infrastructure updates at the Skookum hatchery.

(21) $285,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $285,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to manage electronic tracked crab fishery gear to avoid whale entanglements during their migration as the agency develops a conservation plan to submit for an endangered species act incidental take permit.

(22) $480,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $435,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to equip officers with body worn cameras to advance public safety.

(23) $158,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $163,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5371 (orca vessel protection). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(24) $3,000,000 of the salmon recovery account—state appropriation is provided solely for pass-through to tribes of the upper Columbia river to support reintroduction of Chinook salmon above Grand Coulee and Chief Joseph dams.

(25) $741,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $741,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for operation and maintenance capacity and technical assistance for state fish passage facilities.

(26) $948,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $948,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to continue operations of the Toutle and Skamania hatcheries.

(27) $283,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $283,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to create a statewide data management system with the department of natural resources and the state parks and recreation commission to make informed management decisions that meet conservation goals for public lands. The agencies will also collaborate with tribal governments to ensure cultural resources and cultural practices are considered and incorporated into management plans.

(28) $385,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $385,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to increase wildlife conflict specialists to address crop damage, dangerous wildlife interactions, and conflict preventative education and outreach.

(29) $430,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $430,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $3,564,000 of the natural climate solutions account—state appropriation are provided solely to increase capacity in three aspects of the department's mission most vulnerable to climate change including species recovery planning, providing technical assistance, permitting, and planning support, and managing agency lands and infrastructure.

(30) $1,752,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the first phase of the department's sustainability plan, including advancing energy efficiency and renewable energy projects, creating a commute trip reduction program, and supporting foundational research and capacity-building.

(31) $4,000,000 of the forest resiliency account—state appropriation ((is))and, effective January 1, 2025, $2,000,000 of the natural climate solutions account—state appropriation are provided solely to reduce severe wildfire risk and increase forest resiliency through fuels reduction, thinning, fuel break creation, and prescribed burning on agency lands. The amounts provided in this subsection may not be used to fund agency indirect and administrative expenses.

(32)(a) (($8,000,000))$7,280,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($15,000,000))$15,095,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the protection, recovery, and restoration of biodiversity, the recovery of threatened and endangered species, and a review of the department of fish and wildlife. Examples include habitat protection and restoration, technical assistance for growth management act planning, fish passage improvements, conservation education, scientific research for species and ecosystem protection, and similar activities. Funding in this subsection may include pass-throughs to public, nonprofit, academic, or tribal entities for the purposes of this subsection.

(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, (($300,000))$205,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 ((is))and $95,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to the Ruckelshaus center for a review of the department of fish and wildlife, as referenced in (a) of this subsection. The review must focus on the department's efforts to fulfill its obligations as the trustee of state fish and wildlife on behalf of all current and future Washingtonians, to meet the mixed goals of the mandate set forth in RCW 77.04.012, and to respond to the equity principles articulated in RCW 43.06D.020. The review must explore the following areas and recommend changes as appropriate:

(i) The department's ability to meet threats created by climate change and biodiversity loss;

(ii) An alignment of mandate with the department's responsibility as a public trustee;

(iii) The department's governance structure;

(iv) The department's funding model; and

(v) Accountability and transparency in department decision making at both the commission and management levels.

(c) Within this scope, the Ruckelshaus center must also examine the following areas and provide recommendations as appropriate:

(i) Fish and wildlife commission structure, composition, duties, and compensation;

(ii) Influence on the department by special interest groups;

(iii) The process by which the department uses science and social values in its decision making;

(iv) Outreach and involvement of Washington citizens who have historically been excluded from fish and wildlife decisions, including nonconsumptive users and marginalized communities;

(v) The department's adherence to state laws, including the state environmental policy act and the public records act; and

(vi) Any other related issues that arise during the review.

(d) Based on the results of the review, the Ruckelshaus center must provide options for making changes to the department's mandate and governance structure as deemed necessary to improve the department's ability to function as a trustee for state fish and wildlife.

(e) The Ruckelshaus center must submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by ((June 30, 2024))December 1, 2024.

(33) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for a contract with a nonprofit organization that operates a zoological garden in King county and that has developed an educators' toolkit for nature play programming for youth in communities historically excluded from nature experiences to provide inclusive nature-based programming statewide to children from racially, ethnically, and culturally diverse backgrounds.

(34) $310,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $160,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to perform the following tasks related to net ecological gain:

(a) Of the amount provided in this subsection, $160,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $160,000 in fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to facilitate a work group focused on developing a net ecological gain implementation framework.

(i) Participation in the work group is as follows:

(A) The work group must include representatives from the department, the department of commerce, the department of ecology, and the department of transportation; and

(B) The work group may include representatives from, and consultation with, as appropriate, other state agencies, federally recognized Indian tribes, local governments, and other relevant stakeholders.

(ii) The work group is responsible for accomplishing the following tasks:

(A) Define net ecological gain criteria;

(B) Create monitoring and assessment criteria related to net ecological gain;

(C) Develop an assessment model to evaluate and quantify contributions to overall net ecological gain;

(D) Consider the geographic scale at which net ecological gain criteria may be effectively applied;

(E) Provide budget and policy recommendations for net ecological gain to the legislature and to the office of financial management;

(F) Identify existing state-administered or state-funded programs and projects that:

(I) Already contribute to net ecological gain;

(II) Can or should give funding priority to funding applicants that commit to incorporating net ecological gain principles; and

(III) Programs and projects that can or should have a net ecological gain requirement in the future; and

(G) Generate interim recommendations for a project to serve as a net ecological gain proof of concept within a county that chooses to adopt a net ecological gain standard.

(iii) The department may contract with an independent entity to facilitate the work group, including the tasks identified in (b) of this subsection.

(iv) The work group must submit an interim and final report of its work, including any budget and policy recommendations, to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than June 30, 2024, and June 30, 2025.

(b) Of the amount provided in this subsection, $150,000 in fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department to contract with an independent entity to perform the following tasks:

(i) Review existing grant programs; and

(ii) Make recommendations on the potential addition of net ecological gain into grant prioritization criteria.

(35)(a) (($400,000))$700,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($300,000))$700,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to initiate a demonstration project to contribute to rebuilding of salmon runs in the Lake Washington basin through suppression of predatory fish species. The project shall include:

(i) Removal of nonnative species and northern pike minnow using trap, nets, or other means;

(ii) Assessment of the benefits of reduced predator abundance on juvenile salmon survival; and

(iii) Assessment of the recreational fishing rules that were implemented in 2020 in the Lake Washington basin.

(b) An interim report on the demonstration project must be provided to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024.

(((37)))(36) $270,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $57,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1085 (plastic pollution). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(38)))(37) $184,000 of the natural climate solutions account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1170 (climate response strategy). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(39)))(38) $1,026,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1181 (climate change/planning). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(40)))(39) $620,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1216 (clean energy siting). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(41)))(40) The department must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and section 302(13) of this act.

(((42)))(41) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department to enter into individual damage prevention contract agreements for the use of hiring range riders for proactive wolf-livestock conflict deterrence outside of the service area of the northeast Washington wolf-livestock management grant program as provided in RCW 16.76.020.

(((43)))(42) $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a conflict resolution process mediated by the federal mediation and conciliation service. This funding must be used by the department to facilitate meetings between Skagit tribes, drainage and irrigation districts, and state and federal resource agencies and support the technical work necessary to resolve conflict. Invited parties must include the national marine fisheries service, Washington state department of agriculture, Washington state department of fish and wildlife, Swinomish Indian tribal community, Upper Skagit Indian Tribe, Sauk-Suiattle Indian Tribe, and Skagit drainage and irrigation districts consortium LLC. A report documenting meeting notes, points of resolution, and recommendations must be provided to the legislature no later than June 30, 2025.

(((44)))(43) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to evaluate the abundance and distribution of white and green sturgeon on the Washington coast and Puget Sound tributaries and to evaluate genetic relatedness with Columbia and Fraser river sturgeon populations. The funding is also provided to increase monitoring of the abundance and distribution of eulachon to use the information as a baseline for sturgeon and eulachon management plans.

(((45)))(44) $235,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $409,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to the department of fish and wildlife to proactively survey for wildlife disease risks and provide action plans and management for healthy wildlife in Washington.

(((46)))(45) $325,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for a contract with a nonprofit organization that operates a zoological garden in King county for the purpose of an outreach campaign on pollinator health issues. The pollinator outreach campaign is intended to further the mission of the department's pollinator conservation efforts and the department of agriculture's pollinator health task force goals.

(((47)))(46) Within amounts provided in this section, but not to exceed $20,000, the department must prioritize derelict and abandoned crab pot removal in north Hood Canal.

(((48)))(47) $1,175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to continue to restore shrubsteppe habitat and associated wildlife on public lands as well as private lands by landowners who are willing to participate. The restoration effort must be coordinated with other natural resource agencies and interested stakeholders.

(((49)))(48) $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to continue to address the maintenance backlog associated with providing recreation on lands managed by the department. Allowable uses include, but are not limited to, maintenance, repair, or replacement of trails, toilet facilities, roads, parking lots, campgrounds, picnic sites, water access areas, signs, kiosks, and gates. The department is encouraged to partner with nonprofit organizations in the maintenance of public lands.

(((50)))(49) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to increase the work of regional fisheries enhancement groups.

(((51)))(50) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to commercial fishers to modify fishing gear in order to facilitate participation in the emerging commercial fishery in the lower Columbia river, and to fund staffing and supplies needed to monitor the emerging commercial fishery on the lower Columbia river. The purpose of the grants to modify fishing gear is to support the state's efforts to develop fishing tools that allow for increased harvest of hatchery fish while minimizing impacts to salmonid species listed as threatened or endangered under the federal endangered species act. The department must provide a report of goods and services purchased with grant funds to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025.

(51) $1,657,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for habitat recovery and restoration work on agency owned and managed lands damaged from wildfires.

(52) $443,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $6,313,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, $86,000 of the limited fish and wildlife account—state appropriation, and $196,000 of the fish, wildlife, and conservation account—state appropriation are provided solely for additional safety capacity in each region, development of a technology solution for training requirements, increased support to remote employees, and a third-party review of the agency safety program.

(53) $403,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for two new positions to support statewide fish health through veterinary services and maintenance support for the fish marking trailer fleet.

(54) $17,000 of the fish, wildlife, and conservation account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5862 (hunting license/students). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(55) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6164 (county emergency management). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(56) $184,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $521,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5784 (deer & elk crop damage). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(57) $81,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementing Substitute Senate Bill No. 6020 (nonspot shrimp pot license). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(58) $801,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to rebuild an Autofish marking system.

(59) $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to remove sea lions under the marine mammal protection act section 120(f) permit in tributaries of the Columbia river where federally listed salmon spawn and in the mainstem above river mile 112. The department must coordinate with treaty tribes and adjacent state fish and wildlife agencies on the implementation of the federal permit to remove sea lions. The department must also engage in avian predation forums in the Columbia river basin to reduce avian predation on salmon smolts where predation is documented to hinder salmon recovery.

Sec. 309. 2023 c 475 s 309 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIP

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($9,218,000))

$9,222,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($9,213,000))

$9,221,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($32,036,000))

$32,040,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,503,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,350,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($53,320,000))

$53,336,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) By October 15, 2024, the Puget Sound partnership shall provide the governor and appropriate legislative fiscal committees a single, prioritized list of state agency 2025-2027 capital and operating budget requests related to Puget Sound recovery and restoration.

(2) $14,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1170 (climate response strategy). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(3) $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the partnership to implement shipping noise reduction initiatives and monitoring programs in the Puget Sound, in coordination with Canadian and United States authorities. The partnership must contract with Washington maritime blue in order to establish and administer the quiet sound program to better understand and reduce the cumulative effects of acoustic and physical disturbance from large commercial vessels on southern resident orcas throughout their range in Washington state. Washington maritime blue will support a quiet sound leadership committee and work groups that include relevant federal and state agencies, ports, industry, research institutions, and nongovernmental organizations and consult early and often with relevant federally recognized tribes.

Sec. 310. 2023 c 475 s 310 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($152,490,000))

$180,640,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($154,017,000))

$157,997,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($49,985,000))

$98,106,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,500,000))

$6,055,000

Access Road Revolving Nonappropriated Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$108,000

Climate Commitment Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($11,820,000))

$12,682,000

Derelict Structure Removal Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$325,000

((Contract Harvesting Revolving

Nonappropriated Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$78,000))

Forest Development Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($58,594,000))

$58,341,000

Forest Fire Protection Assessment Nonappropriated

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$88,000

Forest Health Revolving Nonappropriated Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$106,000

Natural Climate Solutions Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($29,571,000))

$30,164,000

Natural Resources Federal Lands Revolving

Nonappropriated Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$6,000

ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($7,928,000))

$7,958,000

State Forest Nursery Revolving Nonappropriated

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$34,000

Surveys and Maps Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,376,000))

$2,377,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($20,003,000))

$21,852,000

Resource Management Cost Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($121,583,000))

$122,543,000

Surface Mining Reclamation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,628,000))

$4,632,000

Disaster Response Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($23,594,000))

$23,624,000

Forest and Fish Support Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($12,667,000))

$12,670,000

Aquatic Land Dredged Material Disposal Site Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$405,000

Natural Resources Conservation Areas Stewardship

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$211,000

Forest Practices Application Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,181,000))

$2,184,000

Air Pollution Control Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$920,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,000,000))

$2,474,000

Wildfire Response, Forest Restoration, and Community

Resilience Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($118,115,000))

$120,033,000

Derelict Vessel Removal Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$10,643,000

Community Forest Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$52,000

Agricultural College Trust Management Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,414,000))

$4,419,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($792,117,000))

$881,649,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,857,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,857,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to carry out the forest practices adaptive management program pursuant to RCW 76.09.370 and the May 24, 2012, settlement agreement entered into by the department and the department of ecology. Scientific research must be carried out according to the master project schedule and work plan of cooperative monitoring, evaluation, and research priorities adopted by the forest practices board.

(2) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the small forest landowner office, in order to restore staffing capacity reduced during the great recession and to support small forest landowners, including assistance related to forest and fish act regulations.

(3) $1,583,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,515,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for deposit into the agricultural college trust management account and are provided solely to manage approximately 70,700 acres of Washington State University's agricultural college trust lands.

(4) (($60,883,000))$88,617,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $60,883,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $16,050,000 of the disaster response account—state appropriation are provided solely for emergency response, including fire suppression. The department shall provide a monthly report to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature with an update of fire suppression costs incurred and the number and type of wildfires suppressed.

(5) $5,647,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $8,470,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $330,000 of the disaster response account—state appropriation are provided solely for indirect and administrative expenses related to fire suppression.

(6) $5,500,000 of the forest and fish support account—state appropriation is provided solely for outcome-based performance contracts with tribes to participate in the implementation of the forest practices program. Contracts awarded may only contain indirect costs set at or below the rate in the contracting tribe's indirect cost agreement with the federal government. Of the amount provided in this subsection, $500,000 is contingent upon receipts under RCW 82.04.261 exceeding $8,000,000 per biennium. If receipts under RCW 82.04.261 are more than $8,000,000 but less than $8,500,000 for the biennium, an amount equivalent to the difference between actual receipts and $8,500,000 shall lapse.

(7) Consistent with the recommendations of the Wildfire Suppression Funding and Costs (18-02) report of the joint legislative audit and review committee, the department shall submit a report to the governor and legislature by December 1, 2023, and December 1, 2024, describing the previous fire season. At a minimum, the report shall provide information for each wildfire in the state, including its location, impact by type of land ownership, the extent it involved timber or range lands, cause, size, costs, and cost-share with federal agencies and nonstate partners. The report must also be posted on the agency's website.

(8) $4,206,000 of the aquatic land enhancement account—state appropriation is provided solely for the removal of creosote pilings and debris from the marine environment and to continue monitoring zooplankton and eelgrass beds on state-owned aquatic lands managed by the department. Actions will address recommendations to recover the southern resident orca population and to monitor ocean acidification as well as help implement the Puget Sound action agenda.

(9) $279,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $286,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for compensation to the trust beneficiaries and department for lost revenue from leases to amateur radio operators who use space on the department managed radio towers for their equipment. The department is authorized to lease sites at the rate of up to $100 per year, per site, per lessee. The legislature makes this appropriation to fulfill the remaining costs of the leases at market rate per RCW 79.13.510.

(10) $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($2,500,000))$3,280,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to collect and refresh statewide lidar data.

(11) $1,200,000 of the resource management cost account—state appropriation is provided solely for the agency to pursue opportunities to provide workforce housing on state trust lands.

(12)(a) $1,500,000 of the natural climate solutions account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department, in close collaboration with the department of ecology, to convene a group composed of a balanced representation of experts and stakeholders to conduct a state ecosystem services inventory and develop a state lands ecosystem services asset plan. The plan must outline how state lands under the department's jurisdiction can be monetized, including ecosystem services credits, and utilized to reduce the overall greenhouse emissions, or increase greenhouse gas sequestration and storage, in the state, including both public and private emissions.

(b) In developing the plan, the department must:

(i) Conduct a resource and asset inventory to identify all state-owned or controlled lands under its jurisdiction that could be eligible or utilized in ecosystem services credits, including carbon offset markets;

(ii) Explore opportunities for the department to utilize its inventoried proprietary assets in offering ecosystem services credits, including carbon offset credits, both under the regulatory offset programs, such as the one established under RCW 70A.65.170, and existing or future voluntary, private ecosystem service markets, including carbon offset programs;

(iii) Develop a marginal cost abatement model to inform highest and best use of state assets in ecosystem services markets, including carbon markets;

(iv) Conduct a needs assessment in relation to marketing state-owned carbon assets on state lands under the department's jurisdiction to third party developers, including a proposed implementation plan and recommendations for plan execution;

(v) Identify any known or suspected policy or regulatory limitations to the formation and full execution of the ecosystem services inventory and asset plan identified above;

(vi) Create an implementation plan for a virtual dashboard where public and private sector participants in regulatory or voluntary carbon markets can locate the inventory created under this subsection, understand the marginal cost abatement model, and locate any requests for proposals from state asset-involved carbon projects on lands under the department's jurisdiction; and

(vii) Make recommendations for the creation of an ecosystems services equity and innovation account that includes:

(A) New modes of ecosystem services; and

(B) Identification of new or different beneficiaries of carbon investments that increase the participation of historically marginalized groups in ecosystem service opportunities.

(c) The department must report its progress and findings under this subsection to the legislature no later than December 31, 2024.

(13) $3,166,000 of the natural climate solutions account—state appropriation is provided solely for silvicultural treatments on forested trust lands in western Washington to support maintenance of healthy, resilient forests as a critical component of climate adaptation and mitigation efforts.

(14) $2,185,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,705,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for increased law enforcement capacity on agency managed lands, to develop a statewide recreation plan, and to jointly create a statewide data management system with the Washington department of fish and wildlife and the state parks and recreation commission to make informed management decisions that meet conservation goals for public lands. The agencies will also collaborate with tribal governments to ensure cultural resources and cultural practices are considered and incorporated into management plans.

(15) $2,066,000 of the natural climate solutions account—state appropriation is provided solely for the agency to develop a comprehensive strategy to tackle barriers to reforestation, including through expanding seed collection, increasing the capacity of the state's public nursery, and addressing workforce needs.

(16) $2,864,000 of the natural climate solutions account—state appropriation is provided solely for the agency to implement aspects of their watershed resilience action plan for the Snohomish watershed, including activities to support kelp and eelgrass stewardship, a large woody debris program, aquatic restoration grants, and culvert removal.

(17) $5,991,000 of the natural climate solutions account—state appropriation is provided solely for investment in urban forestry to support reduction of negative environmental conditions such as heat, flooding, and pollution and helping communities become greener, cleaner, healthier, and more resilient.

(18) $7,791,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the agency to analyze current infrastructure and build a plan for the department to achieve its greenhouse gas emission reduction targets.

(19) $2,365,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to make investments in education and training to bolster a statewide natural resources workforce to support the health and resilience of Washington's forests. Of this amount, $800,000 is provided solely to provide wildland fire management training to tribal communities and members.

(20) $3,356,000 of the natural climate solutions account—state appropriation is provided solely to increase the agency's capacity to provide active management of department of natural resources natural areas.

(21) $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 ((and)), $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,817,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account—state appropriation are provided solely for full-time and seasonal crews from the Washington conservation corps and other corps programs to conduct work benefiting the management of state managed lands, including aquatic reserves management, natural areas restoration and conservation, trail work, and forest resiliency activities as well as other recreation and habitat projects with agency partners.

(22)(a) $475,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $253,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $62,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation are provided solely for a geoduck task force. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $411,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $208,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are for the department's costs for the task force, and the remaining amounts are for the department to provide to the department of ecology, the department of fish and wildlife, and the Puget Sound partnership for their projected costs for the task force.

(b) The task force must investigate opportunities to reduce negative impacts to tribal treaty and state geoduck harvest and promote long-term opportunities to expand or sustain geoduck harvest. The task force must provide a report to the commissioner of public lands and the legislature, in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, by December 1, 2024, that includes analysis and recommendations related to the following elements:

(i) The feasibility of intervention to enhance the wildstock of geoduck, including reseeding projects;

(ii) Factors that are preventing areas from being classified for commercial harvest of wildstock geoduck or factors that are leading to existing wildstock geoduck commercial tract classification downgrade, and recommendations to sustainably and cost-effectively increase the number and area of harvestable tracts, including:

(A) Consideration of opportunities and recommendations presented in previous studies and reports;

(B) An inventory of wastewater treatment plant and surface water runoff point sources impacting state and tribal geoduck harvesting opportunities within the classified commercial shellfish growing areas in Puget Sound;

(C) A ranking of outfalls and point sources identified in (b)(ii)(B) of this subsection prioritized for future correction to mitigate downgraded classification of areas with commercial geoduck harvest opportunity;

(D) An inventory of wildstock geoduck tracts that are most impacted by poor water quality or other factors impacting classification;

(E) Consideration of the role of sediment load and urban runoff, and pathways to mitigate these impacts; and

(F) Recommendations for future actions to improve the harvest quantity of wildstock geoduck and to prioritize areas that can attain improved classification most readily, while considering the influence of outfalls ranked pursuant to (b)(ii)(C) of this subsection.

(c) The commissioner of public lands must invite the following representatives to participate in the task force:

(i) A representative of the department of natural resources, who shall serve as the chair of the task force;

(ii) Representatives of tribes with treaty or reserved rights to geoduck harvest in Washington state;

(iii) A representative of the department of ecology;

(iv) A representative of the department of health;

(v) A representative of the department of fish and wildlife;

(vi) A representative of the Puget Sound partnership; and

(vii) A representative of the academic community.

(d) The commissioner of public lands must appoint each representative. The commissioner may invite and appoint other individuals to the task force, not to exceed the number of seats of tribal entities.

(e) Members of the task force may be reimbursed for travel expenses as authorized in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(23) $636,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $353,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1032 (wildfires/electric utilities). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(24) $65,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $55,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1085 (plastic pollution). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(25) $350,000 of the natural climate solutions account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1170 (climate response strategy). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(26) $250,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1181 (climate change/planning). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(27) $164,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1216 (clean energy siting). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(28) $591,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $552,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5433 (derelict aquatic structures). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(29) $431,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $331,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1498 (aviation assurance funding). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(30) $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($2,500,000))$2,822,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1578 (wildland fire safety). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $322,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the agency to operate the post-fire debris flow program.

(31) The department must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and section 302(13) of this act.

(32) $1,000,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for tire removal projects in Puget Sound, with specific priority to remove tire reefs.

(33) $321,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $427,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5390 (forestlands/safeharbor). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(34) $70,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $30,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to advance research and cooperation with governmental agencies of Finland and Finnish organizations to implement sustainable forestry practices. The department must report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2024, on the use of the funds and the research conducted and cooperation accomplished, and make recommendations for further opportunities for collaboration.

(35) $278,000 of the natural climate solutions account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to perform coordination and monitoring related to Puget Sound kelp conservation and recovery.

(36) $312,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $313,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to coordinate with the Olympic natural resources center to study emerging ecosystem threats such as Swiss needlecast disease, fully implement the T3 watershed experiments on state trust lands, continue field trials for long-term ecosystem productivity, and engage stakeholders through learning-based collaboration. The department may expend up to $30,000 in one fiscal year to conduct Swiss needlecast surveys.

(37) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to continue the work specified in section 3291, chapter 413, Laws of 2019 to assess public school seismic safety for school buildings not yet assessed, focused on highest risk areas of the state as a priority.

(((39)))(38) $10,000,000 of the natural climate solutions account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to prepare commercial thinning timber sales for the purposes of restoring spotted owl and riparian habitat as specified in the 1997 state lands habitat conservation plan, facilitating access to more timber volume than is possible under normal operating funding and increasing carbon sequestration. Thinning operations in designated spotted owl management areas must be conducted in stands that do not yet meet spotted owl habitat conditions. Thinning in riparian areas must comply with department procedures for restoring riparian habitat under the 1997 state lands habitat conservation plan.

(((40)))(39) $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to continue to address the maintenance backlog associated with providing recreation on lands managed by the department. Allowable uses include, but are not limited to, maintenance, repair, or replacement of trails, toilet facilities, roads, parking lots, campgrounds, picnic sites, water access areas, signs, kiosks, and gates. The department is encouraged to partner with nonprofit organizations in the maintenance of public lands.

(((41)))(40) $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to implement a pilot project to evaluate the costs and benefits of marketing and selling specialty forest products including cedar salvage, alder, and other hardwood products. The pilot project must include: Identifying suitable areas for hardwood or cedar sales within the administrative areas of the Olympic and Pacific Cascade regions, preparing and conducting sales, and evaluating the costs and benefits from conducting the sales.

(a) The pilot project must include an evaluation that:

(i) Determines if revenues from the sales are sufficient to cover the costs of preparing and conducting the sales;

(ii) Identifies and evaluates factors impacting the sales, including regulatory constraints, staffing levels, or other limitations;

(iii) Compares the specialty sales to other timber sales that combine the sale of cedar and hardwoods with other species;

(iv) Evaluates the bidder pool for the pilot sales and other factors that impact the costs and revenues received from the sales; and

(v) Evaluates the current and future prices and market trends for cedar salvage and hardwood species.

(b) The department must work with affected stakeholders and report to the appropriate committees of the legislature with the results of the pilot project and make recommendations for any changes to statute by June 30, 2025.

(41) $857,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to implement eradication and control measures on European green crabs on state-owned aquatic lands and adjacent lands as appropriate. The department must report to and coordinate with the department of fish and wildlife to support the department of fish and wildlife's quarterly progress reports to the legislature.

(42) $710,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $473,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department to develop and lead a stakeholder-driven process to identify potential locations for development of target shooting ranges to create alternatives to dispersed shooting and to address lead pollution in known dispersed shooting sites.

(43) $524,000 of the resource management cost account—state appropriation is provided solely for the agency to supplement the cost of the contract with the department of fish and wildlife for biological geoduck survey work. Within existing appropriations, the agency will develop a proposal with the department of fish and wildlife for the equitable and sustainable ongoing funding of this work.

(44) $593,000 of the natural climate solutions account—state appropriation shall take effect January 1, 2025, and is provided solely for the department to conduct the remote sensing, stressor studies, and imagery and survey work of kelp forests and eelgrass meadows pursuant to RCW 79.135.440 and development and management of the native kelp forest and eelgrass meadow health and conservation plan.

(45) $1,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 6166 (pesticide application comm.). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(46) $83,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5667 (forestry riparian easements). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(47) $862,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6039 (geothermal energy resources). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(48) $88,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 6120 (wildland urban interface). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 311. 2023 c 475 s 311 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($52,938,000))

$91,987,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($69,710,000))

$74,111,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($38,414,000))

$48,259,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$193,000

Agricultural Pest and Disease Response Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,000,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,839,000))

$2,840,000

Climate Commitment Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,819,000))

$4,450,000

Natural Climate Solutions Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$261,000

Water Quality Permit Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$73,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($13,589,000))

$13,613,000

Northeast Washington Wolf-Livestock Management

Nonappropriated Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,600,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
(($36,875,000))

$10,875,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($220,311,000))

$250,262,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $18,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $17,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to continue the we feed Washington program, a state alternative to the United States department of agriculture farmers to families food box program, and provide resources for hunger relief organizations.

(2) $4,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $4,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for local food system infrastructure and market access grants.

(3) (($3,655,000))$4,992,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,655,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementing a Popillia japonica monitoring and eradication program in central Washington.

(4) (($15,000,000))$51,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $15,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 ((and $15,000,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation)) are provided solely for implementing the emergency food assistance program as defined in RCW 43.23.290.

(5) $246,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $246,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,550,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementing a Vespa mandarinia eradication program.

(6) $1,600,000 of the northeast Washington wolf-livestock management nonappropriated account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to conduct the following:

(a) Offer grants for the northeast Washington wolf-livestock management program as provided in RCW 16.76.020, in the amount of $1,400,000 for the biennium.

(i) Funds from the grant program must be used only for the deployment of nonlethal deterrence, specifically with the goal to reduce the likelihood of cattle being injured or killed by wolves by deploying proactive, preventative methods that have a high probability of producing effective results. Grant proposals will be assessed partially on this intent. Grantees who use funds for range riders or herd monitoring must deploy this tool in a manner so that targeted areas with cattle are visited daily or near daily. Grantees must collaborate with other grantees of the program and other entities providing prevention efforts resulting in coordinated wolf-livestock conflict deterrence efforts, both temporally and spatially, therefore providing well timed and placed preventative coverage on the landscape. Additionally, range riders must document their activities with GPS track logs and provide written description of their efforts to the department of fish and wildlife on a monthly basis. The department shall incorporate the requirements of this subsection into contract language with the grantees.

(ii) In order to provide continuity of services to meet the long-term intent of the program, no less than $1,100,000 of the funding allocated in this subsection (a) shall be awarded to entities who have proven ability to meet program intent as described in (a)(i) of this subsection and who have been awarded funds through this grant program or pass-through funds from the northeast Washington wolf-livestock management nonappropriated account in the past. The remaining $300,000 may be awarded to new applicants whose applications meet program intent and all of other requirements of the program. If no applications from new entities are deemed qualified, the unused funds shall be awarded in equal amounts to successful grantees. The department retains the final decision making authority over disbursement of funds. Annual reports from grantees will be assessed for how well grant objectives were met and used to decide whether future grant funds will be awarded to past grantees.

(b) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the department must provide $100,000 each fiscal year to the sheriffs offices of Ferry and Stevens counties for providing a local wildlife specialist to aid the department of fish and wildlife in the management of wolves in northeast Washington.

(7) $1,000,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for grants and technical assistance to producers and processors for meat and poultry processing.

(8) $842,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $822,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 135, Laws of 2022, which requires the department to establish cannabis testing lab quality standards by rule.

(9) $3,038,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely to implement organic materials legislation passed in the 2022 legislative session.

(10) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to contract with Washington State University's IMPACT Center to conduct an analysis of the threats, barriers, and challenges facing the state's agricultural producers.

(11) $581,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely to implement a science-based, voluntary software program called saving tomorrow's agricultural resources (STAR) which provide producers tools to track soil health improvements and the ability to generate market-based incentives.

(12) $1,492,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely to increase capacity and support work to reduce nitrate pollution in groundwater from irrigated agriculture in the lower Yakima valley.

(13) (($88,000))$394,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $88,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and (($702,000))$1,053,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to match federal funding for eradication treatments and follow-up monitoring of invasive moths.

(14) $120,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $120,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to continue the early detection program for the spotted lanternfly and the associated invasive Ailanthus altissima, known colloquially as tree-of-heaven, survey and control programs.

(15) $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to implement changes that advance equity for underrepresented farmers and ranchers in the department's programs and services. In carrying out this duty, the department may focus on implementation of:

(a) Proequity and inclusion strategies within the activities and services of the regional markets program;

(b) Recommendations from the department's 2022 report to the legislature on equity for underrepresented farmers and ranchers; and

(c) Community-generated suggestions resulting from stakeholder engagement activities. In carrying out this duty, the department may engage with underrepresented farmers and ranchers to advise and provide guidance as the department works to implement changes to improve equity and inclusion in the department's services and programs, and where possible in the agricultural industry more broadly.

(16) $261,000 of the natural climate solutions account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1170 (climate response strategy). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(17) $200,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1216 (clean energy siting). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(18) $116,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $110,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1500 (cottage food sales cap). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(19) The department must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and section 302(13) of this act.

(20) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to a community-based organization in Whatcom county for the food and farm finder program, which connects local food producers with retail and wholesale consumers throughout the state.

(21) $10,600,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for local food system infrastructure and market access grants, the emergency food assistance program, and a state farmers to families food box program. The total expenditures from the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal for these purposes in fiscal year 2023 and fiscal year 2024 may not exceed the total amounts provided in section 311(1), (3), and (7), chapter 334, Laws of 2021, from the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal for these purposes.

(22) $47,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $47,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5263 (psilocybin). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(23) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to provide a grant to a food bank in Pierce county for the continued provision of food bank services to low-income individuals, including costs related to the potential relocation of the food bank.

(24) $128,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $127,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to the Tri-Cities food bank for operations including food storage.

(25) $170,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $170,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to continue a shellfish coordinator position.

(26) $635,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $635,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for compliance-based laboratory analysis of pesticides in cannabis.

(27) $220,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the agency to partner with the department of commerce to conduct a study to better understand the opportunities and challenges, as well as identify solutions to existing barriers, to create a healthy marketplace for hemp.

(28) $112,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $683,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the agency to partner with organizations to promote diversity and develop agricultural leadership and educational opportunities.

(29) $250,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to facilitate a work group and prepare a comprehensive report with recommendations regarding the establishment of a grant program to support farmers in the purchase of green fertilizer produced within the state of Washington.

(a) The work group convened by the department shall include representatives from the department of ecology, the department of commerce, Washington state agricultural organizations, manufacturers of green fertilizer products, and other relevant stakeholders as determined by the department.

(b) The work group shall review, analyze, and propose the structure of a grant program designed to encourage farmers to purchase green fertilizer produced within the state of Washington. The review shall include considerations of:

(i) The environmental benefits of green fertilizer;

(ii) Economic impacts on farmers;

(iii) The development and capacity of local green fertilizer manufacturers; and

(iv) Ensuring equitable access to the grant program among different agricultural sectors.

(c) The department shall submit a comprehensive report of its findings and recommendations to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature no later than November 1, 2024, including a detailed plan for the administration of the proposed grant program and a recommended funding level. The report shall include legislative and regulatory changes, if necessary, to establish and manage the program effectively.

(30) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to a Washington based nonprofit organization that supports farmworkers to help develop and share farmworker ideas to improve production in ways that are meaningful to both workers and growers. These funds must be used to conduct outreach to farmworkers, provide support, and facilitate access to educational materials, tools, and technology to further the engagement and collaboration of both farmworkers and their employers.

(31) $250,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation shall take effect January 1, 2025, and is provided solely for the department to complete an assessment of how many acres of agricultural land could be removed from active production for the state to meet the requirements of the clean energy transformation act and the state energy strategy. The assessment may include a comparison of possible alternative scenarios ranging from lowest to highest impact. The department must report the legislature on its assessment in accordance with RCW 43.01.036 by June 30, 2025.

(32) $131,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation shall take effect January 1, 2025, and is provided solely for a dedicated position to lead and direct the department's climate strategy. Tasks for this position include research, stakeholder engagement, program inventory, and coordination, as well as long-term planning.

(33) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to provide a grant to a food bank in Tacoma for the expanded provision of food bank services to low-income individuals.

(34) $120,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6278 (organic agriculture). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(35) $2,000,000 of the agricultural pest and disease response account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6036 (agriculture pest & disease). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(36) $139,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5972 (neonicotinoid pesticides). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(37) $2,000,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for research, including, but not limited to, ongoing research and trial research; larger scale treatment trials; and permit development, including required monitoring and review, to assist with development of an integrated pest management plan to find a suitable replacement for imidacloprid to address burrowing shrimp in Willapa bay and Grays Harbor and facilitate continued shellfish cultivation on tidelands. In selecting research recipients for this purpose, the department must incorporate the advice of the Willapa-Grays Harbor working group formed on October 15, 2019. Up to eight percent of the amount provided in this subsection may be used by the department to reimburse any participating group or individual for their expenses associated with meeting participation, preparation, or travel, in accordance with chapter 43.03 RCW.

(38) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for grants to farmers to help offset the costs of gaining organic certification and the associated inspection fees.

(39)(a) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to administer a grant program to farmers to promote hiring local workers, providing locally grown food, reducing transportation pollution, and strengthening food sovereignty and climate and disaster resiliency.

(b) To qualify for the grant program, the farm must grow handpicked specialty crop vegetables that are provided to local markets or schools, hire only domestic agricultural workers, and be owned and operated by a state resident.

(c) Under the grant program, each farm submitting proof of eligibility for the grant program to the department may be offered grant funding in an amount up to the equivalent of four weeks of their paid overtime hours during peak harvest for their specialty crop vegetable, up to $20,000.

Sec. 312. 2023 c 475 s 312 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE ENERGY FACILITY SITE EVALUATION COUNCIL

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($924,000))

$893,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($919,000))

$887,000

Climate Commitment Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$7,369,000

Energy Facility Site Evaluation Council Account—

Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$26,896,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($36,108,000))

$36,045,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $2,352,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely to support agency operations and to hire additional environmental siting and compliance positions needed to support an anticipated workload increase from new clean energy projects.

(2) $757,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for ((grants to tribes to review green energy project applications))preapplication development and clean energy manufacturing review, reimbursement to tribes for costs associated with clean energy project application reviews, and contracted services for green hydrogen and clean energy manufacturing programs.

(3) $358,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1216 (clean energy siting). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(4) The council must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and section 302(13) of this act.

(5) $3,902,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5165 (electric transm. planning). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(End of part)

PART IV

TRANSPORTATION

Sec. 401. 2023 c 475 s 401 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($4,041,000))

$4,043,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($3,640,000))

$4,004,000

Architects' License Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,759,000))

$1,823,000

Climate Investment Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$30,000,000

Real Estate Commission Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($15,753,000))

$15,726,000

Uniform Commercial Code Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,481,000))

$3,496,000

Real Estate Education Program Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($316,000))

$308,000

Real Estate Appraiser Commission Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,067,000))

$2,396,000

Business and Professions Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($30,924,000))

$31,236,000

Real Estate Research Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$461,000

Firearms Range Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$74,000

Funeral and Cemetery Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($118,000))

$125,000

Landscape Architects' License Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($86,000))

$95,000

Appraisal Management Company Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($250,000))

$258,000

Concealed Pistol License Renewal Notification

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$142,000

Geologists' Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($48,000))

$55,000

Derelict Vessel Removal Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$37,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($63,197,000))

$94,279,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $142,000 of the concealed pistol license renewal notification account—state appropriation and $74,000 of the firearms range account—state appropriation are provided solely to implement chapter 74, Laws of 2017 (concealed pistol license).

(2) $6,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $9,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, $8,000 of the architects' license account—state appropriation, $74,000 of the real estate commission account—state appropriation, $14,000 of the uniform commercial code account—state appropriation, $10,000 of the real estate appraiser commission account—state appropriation, and $139,000 of the business and professions account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department to redesign and improve its online services and website, and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(3) $7,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $9,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, $5,000 of the architects' license account—state appropriation, $43,000 of the real estate commission account—state appropriation, $8,000 of the uniform commercial code account—state appropriation, $8,000 of the real estate ((education program))appraiser commission account—state appropriation, $166,000 of the business and professions account—state appropriation, $9,000 of the funeral and cemetery account—state appropriation, $3,000 of the landscape architects' license account—state appropriation, $2,000 of the appraisal management company account—state appropriation, and $5,000 of the geologists' account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1009 (military spouse employment). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(4) $20,000 of the business and professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1017 (cosmetologists, licenses, etc.). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(5) $320,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1143 (firearms purchase and transfer). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(6) $5,000 of the architects' license account—state appropriation, $31,000 of the real estate commission account—state appropriation, $5,000 of the real estate appraiser commission account—state appropriation, $64,000 of the business and professions account—state appropriation, $5,000 of the funeral and cemetery account—state appropriation, $5,000 of the landscape architects' license account—state appropriation, $5,000 of the appraisal management company account—state appropriation, and $5,000 of the geologists' account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1301 (license review and requirements). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(7) $25,000 of the real estate ((appraiser)) commission account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5191 (real estate agency). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(8) $19,000 of the funeral and cemetery account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5261 (cemetery authority deadlines). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(9) $308,000 of the real estate appraiser commission account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed House Bill No. 1797 (real estate appraisers). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(10) $45,000 of the architects' license account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5794 (architecture licensing exams). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(11) $354,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5995 (interpreters and translators). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(12)(a) $30,000,000 of the climate investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for payments to support farm fuel users and transporters who have purchased fuel for agricultural purposes that is exempt from the requirements of the climate commitment act, as described in RCW 70A.65.080(7)(e), but paid a surcharge or an additional fee. In providing such payments, the department must prioritize:

(i) Farming and transportation operations, prioritizing noncorporate farms first;

(ii) Ease of use and accessibility for recipients; and

(iii) Speed and efficiency in administering the payments.

(b) The department must use a tiered system of payments based on the annual number of gallons of agricultural fuel consumed, as determined by the farm fuel user or transporter in a signed attestation. The department shall use the following payment tiers:

(i) $600 to recipients with annual agricultural fuel use of less than 1,000 gallons;

(ii) $2,300 to recipients with annual agricultural fuel use greater than or equal to 1,000 gallons and less than 4,000 gallons;

(iii) $3,400 to recipients with annual agricultural fuel use greater than or equal to 4,000 gallons and less than 10,000 gallons; and

(iv) $4,500 to recipients with annual agricultural fuel use greater than or equal to 10,000 gallons.

(c) Recipients of payments under this subsection may submit receipts and other documentation as part of their attestation showing that they were overcharged for fuel costs due to the impact of chapter 70A.65 RCW.

(d) The department may use no more than five percent of the amounts provided for this specific purpose on administration. The department must begin providing payments by September 1, 2024.

Sec. 402. 2023 c 475 s 402 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($77,651,000))

$77,278,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($78,281,000))

$83,583,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$16,972,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$3,091,000

Death Investigations Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($9,145,000))

$9,592,000

County Criminal Justice Assistance Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,893,000))

$4,894,000

Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,800,000

Fire Service Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$131,000

Vehicle License Fraud Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$119,000

Disaster Response Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$8,000,000

Fire Service Training Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($13,456,000))

$13,457,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$596,000

Fingerprint Identification Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$15,200,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($229,335,000))

$234,713,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $8,000,000 of the disaster response account—state appropriation is provided solely for Washington state fire service resource mobilization costs incurred in response to an emergency or disaster authorized under RCW 43.43.960 through 43.43.964. The state patrol shall submit a report quarterly to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing information on current and planned expenditures from this account. This work shall be done in coordination with the military department.

(2) $79,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $146,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for compensation adjustments for commissioned staff as provided for in the omnibus transportation appropriations act.

(3) $20,000 of the fingerprint identification account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1452 (medical reserve corps). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(4) $16,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $15,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1179 (nonconviction data/auditor). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(5) $26,000 of the fingerprint identification account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1069 (mental health counselor compensation). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(6) $500,000 of the disaster response account—state appropriation, is provided solely to continue a pilot project for the early deployment or prepositioning of Washington state fire service resources in advance of an expected mobilization event. Any authorization for the deployment of resources under this section must be authorized in accordance with section 6 of the Washington state fire services resource mobilization plan.

(7) $320,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $68,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5367 (products containing THC). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(8) $1,133,000 of the fingerprint identification account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5499 (multistate nurse licensure). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(9) $1,000,000 of the fire service training account—state appropriation is provided solely for the firefighter apprenticeship training program.

(10) $12,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $12,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to support the Washington state missing and murdered indigenous women and people task force in section 912 of this act.

(11)(a) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for financial assistance to local jurisdictions to conduct DNA testing for unidentified remains, and for those remains that failed to yield a CODIS match, for forensic genetic genealogy DNA testing to be conducted. Local jurisdictions may contract for these services. The purpose of this funding is to provide sufficient funding to eliminate the backlog of unidentified remains awaiting testing. This funding is intended to supplement DNA testing and investigative genealogy available through the national missing and unidentified persons system or the Washington state patrol crime lab to provide timely identification of remains and entry into CODIS, and should be prioritized for cases not meeting eligibility requirements for the national missing and unidentified persons system or cases already tested for DNA analysis that failed to yield a CODIS match.

(b) For purposes of this subsection, "forensic genetic genealogy DNA testing" means any technology performed in a forensic laboratory capable of producing a forensic genealogy profile with a minimum of 100,000 genetic markers and compatible with multiple genealogical databases consented for law enforcement use and includes associated genealogical research.

(c) Records from the DNA testing or forensic genetic genealogy DNA testing, including DNA profiles and markers, of unidentified remains funded under this subsection are sensitive and shall be treated as confidential to the fullest extent allowed under the law.

(12) Any funds provided to the missing and exploited children task force shall ensure operations are adherent to federally established internet crimes against children standards.

(13) $2,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5299 (law enf. officer protection). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(14) Within existing resources, the Washington state patrol may provide security and protection to the secretary of state and to his or her family during a presidential election campaign and through two weeks following inauguration.

(15) $88,742 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5812 (electrical vehicle fires). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(End of part)

PART V

EDUCATION

Sec. 501. 2023 c 475 s 501 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($46,191,000))

$46,840,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($45,208,000))

$54,232,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($108,354,000))

$148,569,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$8,079,000

Dedicated Cannabis Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2024)
. . . .
(($593,000))

$550,000

Dedicated Cannabis Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2025)
. . . .
(($618,000))

$550,000

Washington Opportunity Pathways Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$8,429,000

Performance Audits of Government Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$213,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$9,479,000

Elementary and Secondary School Emergency Relief III

Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$3,524,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($230,688,000))

$280,465,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) BASE OPERATIONS AND EXPENSES OF THE OFFICE

(a) (($21,778,000))$22,389,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($21,778,000))$22,470,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(i) The superintendent shall recognize the extraordinary accomplishments of four students who have demonstrated a strong understanding of the civics essential learning requirements to receive the Daniel J. Evans civic education award.

(ii) By October 31st of each year, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall produce an annual status report on implementation of the budget provisos in section 501, chapter 415, Laws of 2019 and sections 515 and 522, chapter 334, Laws of 2021. The status report of each proviso shall include, but not be limited to, the following information: Purpose and objective, number of state staff funded by the proviso, number of contractors, status of proviso implementation, number of beneficiaries by year, list of beneficiaries, a comparison of budgeted funding and actual expenditures, other sources and amounts of funding, and proviso outcomes and achievements.

(iii) Districts shall annually report to the office of the superintendent of public instruction on: (A) The annual number of graduating high school seniors within the district earning the Washington state seal of biliteracy provided in RCW 28A.300.575; and (B) the number of high school students earning competency-based high school credits for world languages by demonstrating proficiency in a language other than English. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide a summary report to the office of the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1st of each year.

(iv) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall perform ongoing program reviews of alternative learning experience programs, dropout reengagement programs, and other high risk programs. Findings from the program reviews will be used to support and prioritize the office of the superintendent of public instruction outreach and education efforts that assist school districts in implementing the programs in accordance with statute and legislative intent, as well as to support financial and performance audit work conducted by the office of the state auditor.

(v) The superintendent of public instruction shall integrate climate change content into the Washington state learning standards across subject areas and grade levels. The office shall develop materials and resources that accompany the updated learning standards that encourage school districts to develop interdisciplinary units focused on climate change that include authentic learning experiences, that integrate a range of perspectives, and that are action oriented.

(vi) Funding provided in this subsection (1)(a) is sufficient for maintenance of the apportionment system, including technical staff and the data governance working group.

(b) $494,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $494,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 240, Laws of 2010, including staffing the office of equity and civil rights.

(c) $61,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $61,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the ongoing work of the education opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee.

(d) $96,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $96,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 380, Laws of 2009 (enacting the interstate compact on educational opportunity for military children).

(e) $285,000 of the Washington opportunity pathways account—state appropriation is provided solely for activities related to public schools other than common schools authorized under chapter 28A.710 RCW.

(f) $123,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $123,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 163, Laws of 2012 (foster care outcomes). The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall annually report each December on the implementation of the state's plan of cross-system collaboration to promote educational stability and improve education outcomes of foster youth.

(g) $1,060,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,060,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of native education to increase services to tribes, including but not limited to, providing assistance to tribes and school districts to implement Since Time Immemorial, applying to become tribal compact schools, convening the Washington state native American education advisory committee, and extending professional learning opportunities to provide instruction in tribal history, culture, and government. The professional development must be done in collaboration with school district administrators and school directors. Funding in this subsection is sufficient for the office, the Washington state school directors' association government-to-government task force, and the association of educational service districts to collaborate with the tribal leaders congress on education to develop a tribal consultation training and schedule. Of the amounts provided in this subsection: $525,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $525,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of native education to convene a work group to develop the supports necessary to serve American Indian and Alaska Native students identified as needing additional literacy supports. The work group must include representation from Washington's federally recognized tribes and federally recognized tribes with reserved treaty rights in Washington. The work group must conduct tribal consultations, develop best practices, engage in professional learning, and develop curricula and resources that may be provided to school districts and state-tribal education compact schools to serve American Indian and Alaska Native students with appropriate, culturally affirming literacy supports.

(h) $481,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $481,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for additional full-time equivalent staff to support the work of the safety net committee and to provide training and support to districts applying for safety net awards.

(i) Districts shall report to the office the results of each collective bargaining agreement for certificated staff within their district using a uniform template as required by the superintendent, within thirty days of finalizing contracts. The data must include but is not limited to: Minimum and maximum base salaries, supplemental salary information, and average percent increase for all certificated instructional staff. Within existing resources by December 1st of each year, the office shall produce a report for the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee summarizing the district level collective bargaining agreement data.

(j) $3,524,000 of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account—federal appropriation from funds attributable to subsection 2001(f)(4), the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2 is provided solely for administrative costs related to the management of federal funds provided for COVID-19 response and other emergency needs.

(k) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to plan for the development and implementation of a common substitute teacher application platform.

(l) $465,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for office of the attorney general legal services related to special education related litigation.

(2) DATA SYSTEMS

(a) $1,802,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,802,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementing a comprehensive data system to include financial, student, and educator data, including development and maintenance of the comprehensive education data and research system (CEDARS).

(b) $281,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $281,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for K-20 telecommunications network technical support in the K-12 sector to prevent system failures and avoid interruptions in school utilization of the data processing and video-conferencing capabilities of the network. These funds may be used to purchase engineering and advanced technical support for the network.

(c) $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the superintendent of public instruction to develop and implement a statewide accountability system to address absenteeism and to improve student graduation rates. The system must use data to engage schools and districts in identifying successful strategies and systems that are based on federal and state accountability measures. Funding may also support the effort to provide assistance about successful strategies and systems to districts and schools that are underperforming in the targeted student subgroups.

(3) WORK GROUPS

(a) $68,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $68,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1013 (regional apprenticeship prgs). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(b) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to meet statutory obligations related to the provision of medically and scientifically accurate, age-appropriate, and inclusive sexual health education as authorized by chapter 206, Laws of 1988 (AIDS omnibus act) and chapter 265, Laws of 2007 (healthy youth act).

(c) $118,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $118,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 75, Laws of 2018 (dyslexia).

(d) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 386, Laws of 2019 (social emotional learning).

(e) $107,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $107,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office to support the children and youth behavioral health work group created in chapter 130, Laws of 2020 (child. mental health wk. grp).

(4) STATEWIDE PROGRAMS

(a) $2,590,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,590,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills. State funding shall support statewide administration and district implementation of the inventory under RCW 28A.655.080.

(b) $703,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $703,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 72, Laws of 2016 (educational opportunity gap).

(c) $950,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $950,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Washington reading corps. The superintendent shall allocate reading corps members to schools identified for comprehensive or targeted support and school districts that are implementing comprehensive, proven, research-based reading programs. Two or more schools may combine their Washington reading corps programs.

(d) $457,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $260,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for chapter 102, Laws of 2014 (biliteracy seal). Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(i) $197,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the office to develop and establish criteria for school districts to award the seal of biliteracy to graduating high school students.

(ii) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office to provide students with access to methods for students to demonstrate proficiency in less commonly taught or assessed languages.

(e)(i) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for school bullying and harassment prevention activities.

(ii) $15,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $15,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 240, Laws of 2016 (school safety).

(iii) $570,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $570,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to provide statewide support and coordination for the regional network of behavioral health, school safety, and threat assessment established in chapter 333, Laws of 2019 (school safety and well-being).

(iv) $196,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $196,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the school safety center within the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(A) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (4)(e)(iv), $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a school safety program to provide school safety training for all school administrators and school safety personnel. The school safety center advisory committee shall develop and revise the training program, using the best practices in school safety.

(B) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (4)(e)(iv), $96,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $96,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for administration of the school safety center. The safety center shall act as an information dissemination and resource center when an incident occurs in a school district in Washington or in another state, coordinate activities relating to school safety, review and approve manuals and curricula used for school safety models and training, and maintain a school safety information web site.

(f)(i) $162,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $162,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for youth suicide prevention activities.

(ii) $76,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $76,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 64, Laws of 2018 (sexual abuse of students).

(g)(i) $280,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $280,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, (($593,000))$550,000 of the dedicated cannabis account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, and (($618,000))$550,000 of the dedicated cannabis account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for dropout prevention, intervention, and reengagement programs((, including the jobs for America's graduates (JAG) program)), dropout prevention programs that provide student mentoring, and the building bridges statewide program. ((Students in the foster care system or who are homeless shall be given priority by districts offering the jobs for America's graduates program.)) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall convene staff representatives from high schools to meet and share best practices for dropout prevention. Of these amounts, the entire dedicated cannabis account—state appropriation is provided solely for the building bridges statewide program and for grants to districts for life skills training for children and youth in K-12.

(ii) $293,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $293,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to support district implementation of comprehensive guidance and planning programs in support of high-quality high school and beyond plans consistent with RCW 28A.230.090.

(iii) $178,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $178,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 291, Laws of 2017 (truancy reduction efforts).

(h) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to create a process and provide assistance to school districts in planning for future implementation of the summer knowledge improvement program grants.

(i) $358,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $358,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 221, Laws of 2019 (CTE course equivalencies).

(j) $196,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $196,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 252, Laws of 2019 (high school graduation reqs.).

(k) $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $680,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 295, Laws of 2019 (educator workforce supply). Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $680,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for title II SEA state-level activities to implement section 103, chapter 295, Laws of 2019 relating to the regional recruiters program.

(l) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a tribal liaison at the office of the superintendent of public instruction to facilitate access to and support enrollment in career connected learning opportunities for tribal students, including career awareness and exploration, career preparation, and career launch programs, as defined in RCW 28C.30.020, so that tribal students may receive high school or college credit to the maximum extent possible.

(m) $57,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $57,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 288, Laws of 2020 (school meals at no cost).

(n) $269,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $142,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 353, Laws of 2020 (innovative learning pilot).

(o) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to provide statewide coordination towards multicultural, culturally responsive, and anti-racist education to support academically, socially, and culturally literate learners. The office must engage community members and key interested parties to:

(i) Develop a clear definition and framework for African American studies to guide instruction in grades seven through twelve;

(ii) Develop a plan for aligning African American studies across all content areas; and

(iii) Identify professional development opportunities for educators and administrators to build capacity in creating high-quality learning environments centered in belonging and racial equity, anti-racist approaches, and asset-based methodologies that pull from all students' cultural funds of knowledge.

(p) $49,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $49,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 38, Laws of 2021 (K-12 safety & security serv.).

(q) $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 111, Laws of 2021 (learning assistance program).

(r) $1,152,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,157,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 164, Laws of 2021 (institutional ed./release).

(s) $553,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $553,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to develop and implement a mathematics pathways pilot to modernize algebra II. The office should use research and engage stakeholders to develop a revised and expanded course.

(t) $3,348,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,348,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 107, Laws of 2022 (language access in schools).

(u) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the superintendent to establish a media literacy and digital citizenship ambassador program to promote the integration of media literacy and digital citizenship instruction.

(v) $294,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $294,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 provided solely for implementation of chapter 9, Laws of 2022 (school consultation/tribes).

(w) $8,144,000 of the Washington state opportunity pathways account—state appropriation is provided solely for support to small school districts and public schools receiving allocations under chapters 28A.710 and 28A.715 RCW that have less than 800 enrolled students, are located in urban or suburban areas, and budgeted for less than $20,000 per pupil in general fund expenditures in the 2022-23 school year. For eligible school districts and schools, the superintendent of public instruction must allocate an amount equal to the lesser of amount 1 or amount 2, as provided in (w)(i) and (ii) of this subsection, multiplied by the school district or school's budgeted enrollment in the 2022-23 school year.

(i) Amount 1 is $1,550.

(ii) Amount 2 is $20,000 minus the school district or school's budgeted general fund expenditures per pupil in the 2022-23 school year.

(x) $76,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $15,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5072 (highly capable students). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(y) $72,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($96,000))$4,663,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5243 (high school and beyond plan). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(z) $17,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5257 (elementary school recess). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(aa) $169,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $76,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5315 (special education/nonpublic). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(bb) $39,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5403 (school depreciation subfunds). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(cc) $532,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $436,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5593 (student data transfer). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(dd) $51,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $36,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5617 (career and technical education courses). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(ee) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to contract with a community-based youth development nonprofit organization for a pilot program to provide behavioral health support for youth and trauma-informed, culturally responsive staff training.

(ff) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the office to consult with one or two public high schools that offer established courses in the early childhood development and services career pathway and develop model materials that may be employed by other school districts with an interest in establishing or expanding similar instructional offerings to students. The model materials must be developed by January 1, 2024.

(gg) $62,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $62,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the creation of a deliberative democratic climate change education program in public high schools based on the Washington student climate assembly pilot program. The office must use the funding to develop and promote a full curriculum for student climate assemblies that can be replicated in public high schools across the state and to fund a part-time statewide coordinator position to oversee program outreach and implementation. By January 1, 2025, the office must collect and evaluate feedback from teachers, students, local government employees, and elected officials participating in the pilot program and report to the legislature on options to improve, expand, and extend the program.

(hh) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office to contract with a nongovernmental agency to coordinate and serve as a fiscal agent and to cover direct costs of the project education impact workgroup to achieve educational parity for students experiencing foster care and/or homelessness, consistent with chapter 233, Laws of 2020. The office must contract with a nongovernmental agency with experience coordinating administrative and fiscal support for project education impact.

(ii) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the office to contract for a feasibility study for the creation of a maritime academy on the Olympic peninsula. The study must include the scope, location, design, and budget for the construction of the maritime academy. The study must include plans to address systems, policies, and practices that address disparities of historically marginalized communities in the maritime industry. A preliminary report is due to the legislature by December 1, 2023, with the final feasibility study due to the legislature by June 3, 2024. Funding provided in this subsection may be matched by a nonprofit organization that provides high school students with accredited career and technical postsecondary education for maritime vessel operations and maritime curriculum to high schools in Jefferson, Clallam, Kitsap, King, Mason, Pierce, Island, and Snohomish counties.

(jj) $74,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $69,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1701 (institutional ed. programs). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(kk) $141,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $130,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1308 (graduation pathway options). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(ll) $73,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $72,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1346 (purple star award). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(mm)(i) $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office to provide statewide professional development and technical assistance to school districts and to provide a limited number of grants for demonstration projects. The demonstration projects must build school-level and district-level systems that eliminate student isolation, track and reduce restraint use, and build schoolwide systems to support students in distress and prevent crisis escalation cycles that may result in restraint or isolation. The schoolwide systems must include trauma-informed positive behavior and intervention supports, de-escalation, and problem-solving skills. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(A) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are for grants for 10 district demonstration sites;

(B) $1,334,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,334,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are for professional development and training; and

(C) $166,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $166,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are for staff and administration support for the demonstration sites and the professional development and training.

(ii) The office must create a technical assistance manual to support the elimination of isolation and reduction of restraint and room clears based on the results of the demonstration projects, and must provide a report to the education committees of the legislature by September 1, 2024. The report must include:

(A) A status update on demonstration projects that occurred during the 2023-24 school year, the technical assistance manual, and professional development offered statewide;

(B) Key implementation challenges and findings; and

(C) Recommendations for statewide policy changes or funding.

(iii) In developing the manual, the office must consult with, at minimum:

(A) Representatives from state associations representing both certificated and classified staff;

(B) An association representing principals;

(C) An association representing school administrators;

(D) The Washington state school directors' association;

(E) An association representing parents;

(F) An individual with lived experience of restraint and isolation; and

(G) A representative of the protection and advocacy agency of Washington.

(iv) The office must prioritize the provision of professional development and selection of the demonstration sites to local education agencies, educational programs, and staff who provide educational services to students in prekindergarten through grade five and who have high incidents of isolation, restraint, or injury related to use of restraint or isolation. Grant recipients must commit to isolation phaseout and must report on restraint reduction and progress to the office by June 30, 2025.

(nn) $498,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5849 (computer science/graduation). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(oo) $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5850 (chronically absent students). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(pp) $430,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5462 (inclusive learning standards). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(qq) $28,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5647 (school safety/temp employees). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(rr) $581,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5852 (special education safety net). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(ss) $3,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6053 (education data sharing). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(tt) $39,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6264 (competency-based education). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(uu) $30,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the office to create and distribute age appropriate promotional and educational materials to school districts for Americans of Chinese descent history month.

(vv) $35,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely to print 5,000 copies, in Spanish, of the league of women voters Washington elementary civics textbook to distribute to students and teachers across the state.

(ww) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a study to examine how free and reduced-price school meal data is used as a funding driver for programs. The department must provide a report to the legislature by January 1, 2025, that includes recommendations for an alternative metric or metrics to utilize as a funding driver for educational programs in the state.

(5) CAREER CONNECTED LEARNING

(a) $919,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for expanding career connected learning as provided in RCW 28C.30.020.

(b) $960,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for increasing the funding per full-time equivalent for career launch programs as described in RCW 28A.700.130. In the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, for career launch enrollment exceeding the funding provided in this subsection, funding is provided in section 504 of this act.

(c) $3,600,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to administer grants to skill centers for nursing programs to purchase or upgrade simulation laboratory equipment.

(d) $4,000,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1013 (regional apprenticeship prgs.). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.)) Of the amount provided in this subsection, $2,000,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Marysville school district to collaborate with Arlington school district, Everett Community College, other local school districts, local labor unions, local Washington state apprenticeship and training council registered apprenticeship programs, and local industry groups to continue the regional apprenticeship pathways program.

Sec. 502. 2023 c 475 s 502 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($2,155,000))

$2,161,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($6,695,000))

$7,043,000

Elementary and Secondary School Emergency Relief III

Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,779,000

Washington Opportunity Pathways Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$353,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($10,982,000))

$11,336,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,852,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,864,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are for the operation and expenses of the state board of education.

(2) $1,779,000 of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account—federal appropriation, $280,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, and $4,808,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to the state board of education for implementation of mastery-based learning in school district demonstration sites. The state board of education shall require grant recipients to report on impacts and participate in a collaborative to share best practices. The funds must be used for grants to school districts, charter schools, or state tribal education compact schools established under chapter 28A.715 RCW; professional development of educators; development of a resource suite for school districts statewide; evaluation of the demonstration project; implementation and policy support provided by the state board of education and other partners; and a report outlining findings and recommendations to the governor and education committees of the legislature by December 31, 2025. Grants for mastery-based learning may be made in partnership with private matching funds.

(3) $23,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $23,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the state board of education to be a member in the education commission of the states.

(4) $6,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5849 (computer science/graduation). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(5) $156,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6264 (competency-based education). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 503. 2023 c 475 s 503 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE PROFESSIONAL EDUCATOR STANDARDS BOARD

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($22,535,000))

$17,368,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($21,417,000))

$21,664,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($43,952,000))

$39,032,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,930,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($1,945,000))$2,035,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are for the operation and expenses of the Washington professional educator standards board including implementation of chapter 172, Laws of 2017 (educator prep. data/PESB).

(2)(a) $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to improve preservice teacher training and funding of alternate routes to certification programs administered by the professional educator standards board.

(b) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (2), up to $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and up to $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to public or private colleges of education in Washington state to develop models and share best practices for increasing the classroom teaching experience of preservice training programs.

(3) $1,005,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,001,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the recruiting Washington teachers program with priority given to programs that support bilingual teachers, teachers from populations that are underrepresented, and English language learners. Of the amounts provided in this subsection (3), $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation and expansion of the bilingual educator initiative pilot project established under RCW 28A.180.120.

(4) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 295, Laws of 2019 (educator workforce supply).

(5) (($17,535,000))$12,335,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $17,535,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 237, Laws of 2017 (paraeducators). Of the amounts provided in this subsection: (($16,873,000))$11,550,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $16,873,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to districts to provide two days of training per school year in the paraeducator certificate program to all paraeducators. Funds in this subsection are provided solely for reimbursement to school districts that provide paraeducators with two days of training in the paraeducator certificate program in each of the 2022-23 and 2023-24 school years. Funding provided in this subsection is sufficient for new paraeducators to receive four days of training in the paraeducator certificate program during their first year. School districts receiving grants under this subsection must prioritize funding toward compensation for paraeducators who complete the required hours of instruction per school year.

(6) $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $28,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the board to review national certification opportunities for educational staff associates through the relevant national associations for their profession and through the national board for professional teaching standards. The board must compare the standards and processes for achieving these certifications, including an analysis of how educational staff associate positions' national certification aligns with school roles and the professional expertise of school-based education staff associates. The board must submit the comparison report to the education committees of the legislature by October 1, 2024.

(7) $147,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $158,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1009 (military spouse employment). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(8) $71,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the professional educator standards board and the paraeducator board to collaborate with the office of the superintendent of public instruction to report on a plan to align bilingual education and English language learner endorsement standards and to determine language assessment requirements for multilingual teachers and paraeducators. The report is due to the legislature by September 1, 2023.

(9) $1,012,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the professional educator standards board, in coordination with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, to develop a teacher residency program through Western Washington University focused on special education instruction beginning in the 2024-25 school year.

(10) $33,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $155,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the professional educator standards board to convene two separate groups to review implementation of new and existing standards in teacher preparation programs and to perform preparation program gap analyses.

(a) By October 1, 2024, the board shall convene a group of educators, including principals and teachers, to identify what preparation programs must be providing candidates to prepare them for the modern classroom.

(i) Prior to the convening of the group, the board, in collaboration with the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the state board of education, shall develop a list of major changes to the educational system in statute and rule during the last 10 years that might require pedagogical changes in preparation programs. The group of educators shall review the list in order to identify what programs must be providing candidates.

(ii) The group of educators must include a wide variety of representatives from different subject matter areas including, but not limited to, any shortage areas, different grade levels, rural and urban school districts, large and small school districts, schools participating in the mastery-based learning collaborative, schools implementing inclusionary practices to support students with disabilities, and educators of color.

(iii) By June 1, 2025, the board shall compile a summary of the findings from the group of educators. Members of the legislature may review this summary upon request.

(b) By December 1, 2024, the board shall develop a process to facilitate an ongoing and collaborative process to help educator preparation programs in Washington state respond to the continuously changing needs of the modern classroom; provide a feedback loop between school staff and programs; and promote continuity, consistency, and coherence across the educator preparation system regarding implementing new and existing standards. This process must at a minimum meet the following requirements:

(i) Convening of a group representing the educator preparation programs to review the list developed in (a)(i) of this subsection and, when completed, the summary compiled under (a)(iii) of this subsection;

(ii) Requiring each preparation program to perform a gap analysis of their programs. The board shall determine the components of this gap analysis;

(iii) Submission of a plan of improvement and action plan, as needed, to address the areas identified in the gap analysis;

(iv) A plan for compliance monitoring including recommendations related to potential consequences for programs not making sufficient progress; and

(v) A timeline that requires educator preparation programs to complete the process at least once every three years and aligns the process with other review processes.

(c) In creating the process, the board shall begin with a process for teacher preparation programs offered at institutions of higher education and develop a phase-in plan for how to eventually include alternative route teacher certification programs and principal preparation programs.

Sec. 504. 2023 c 475 s 504 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR GENERAL APPORTIONMENT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($9,765,637,000))

$9,743,015,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($10,027,638,000))

$9,739,510,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,538,730,000))

$1,800,730,000

Washington Opportunity Pathways Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$28,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($21,332,005,000))

$21,311,255,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(b) For the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years, the superintendent shall allocate general apportionment funding to school districts as provided in the funding formulas and salary allocations in sections 504 and 505 of this act, excluding (c) of this subsection.

(c) From July 1, 2023, to August 31, 2023, the superintendent shall allocate general apportionment funding to school districts programs as provided in sections 504 and 505, chapter 297, Laws of 2022, as amended.

(d) The enrollment of any district shall be the annual average number of full-time equivalent students and part-time students as provided in RCW 28A.150.350, enrolled on the fourth day of school in September and on the first school day of each month October through June, including students who are in attendance pursuant to RCW 28A.335.160 and 28A.225.250 who do not reside within the servicing school district. Any school district concluding its basic education program in May must report the enrollment of the last school day held in May in lieu of a June enrollment.

(e)(i) Funding provided in part V of this act is sufficient to provide each full-time equivalent student with the minimum hours of instruction required under RCW 28A.150.220.

(ii) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall align the agency rules defining a full-time equivalent student with the increase in the minimum instructional hours under RCW 28A.150.220, as amended by the legislature in 2014.

(f) The superintendent shall adopt rules requiring school districts to report full-time equivalent student enrollment as provided in RCW 28A.655.210.

(g) For the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years, school districts must report to the office of the superintendent of public instruction the monthly actual average district-wide class size across each grade level of kindergarten, first grade, second grade, and third grade classes. The superintendent of public instruction shall report this information to the education and fiscal committees of the house of representatives and the senate by September 30th of each year.

(2) CERTIFICATED INSTRUCTIONAL STAFF ALLOCATIONS

Allocations for certificated instructional staff salaries for the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years are determined using formula-generated staff units calculated pursuant to this subsection.

(a) Certificated instructional staff units, as defined in RCW 28A.150.410, shall be allocated to reflect the minimum class size allocations, requirements, and school prototypes assumptions as provided in RCW 28A.150.260. The superintendent shall make allocations to school districts based on the district's annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment in each grade.

(b) Additional certificated instructional staff units provided in this subsection (2) that exceed the minimum requirements in RCW 28A.150.260 are enhancements outside the program of basic education, except as otherwise provided in this section.

(c)(i) The superintendent shall base allocations for each level of prototypical school, including those at which more than fifty percent of the students were eligible for free and reduced-price meals in the prior school year, on the following regular education average class size of full-time equivalent students per teacher, except as provided in (c)(ii) of this subsection:

General education class size:

Grade

RCW 28A.150.260

2023-24

School Year

2024-25

School Year

Grade K

17.00

17.00

Grade 1

17.00

17.00

Grade 2

17.00

17.00

Grade 3

17.00

17.00

Grade 4

27.00

27.00

Grades 5-6

27.00

27.00

Grades 7-8

28.53

28.53

Grades 9-12

28.74

28.74

The superintendent shall base allocations for: Laboratory science average class size as provided in RCW 28A.150.260; career and technical education (CTE) class size of 23.0; and skill center program class size of 19. Certificated instructional staff units provided for skills centers that exceed the minimum requirements of RCW 28A.150.260 achieve class size reductions under RCW 28A.400.007 and are part of the state's program of basic education.

(ii) Pursuant to RCW 28A.150.260(4)(a), the assumed teacher planning period, expressed as a percentage of a teacher work day, is 13.42 percent in grades K-6, and 16.67 percent in grades 7-12; and

(iii) Advanced placement and international baccalaureate courses are funded at the same class size assumptions as general education schools in the same grade; and

(d)(i) Funding for teacher librarians, school nurses, social workers, school psychologists, and guidance counselors is allocated based on the school prototypes as provided in RCW 28A.150.260, as amended by chapter 109, Laws of 2022, and is considered certificated instructional staff.

(ii) For qualifying high-poverty schools in the 2023-24 school year, at which more than 50 percent of the students were eligible for free and reduced-price meals in the prior school year, in addition to the allocation under (d)(i) of this subsection, the superintendent shall allocate additional funding for guidance counselors for each level of prototypical school as follows:

Elementary

Middle

High

Guidance counselors

0.166

0.166

0.157

(iii) Students in approved career and technical education and skill center programs generate certificated instructional staff units to provide for the services of teacher librarians, school nurses, social workers, school psychologists, and guidance counselors at the following combined rate per 1000 student full-time equivalent enrollment:

2023-24

School Year

2024-25

School Year

Career and Technical Education

3.65

3.91

Skill Center

3.98

4.25

(3) ADMINISTRATIVE STAFF ALLOCATIONS

(a) Allocations for school building-level certificated administrative staff salaries for the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years for general education students are determined using the formula generated staff units calculated pursuant to this subsection. The superintendent shall make allocations to school districts based on the district's annual average full-time equivalent enrollment in each grade. The following prototypical school values shall determine the allocation for principals, assistant principals, and other certificated building level administrators:

Prototypical School Building:

Elementary School

1.253

Middle School

1.353

High School

1.880

(b) Students in approved career and technical education and skill center programs generate certificated school building-level administrator staff units at per student rates that are a multiple of the general education rate in (a) of this subsection by the following factors:

Career and Technical Education students. . . .1.025

Skill Center students. . . .1.198

(4) CLASSIFIED STAFF ALLOCATIONS

Allocations for classified staff units providing school building-level and district-wide support services for the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years are determined using the formula-generated staff units provided in RCW 28A.150.260 and pursuant to this subsection, and adjusted based on each district's annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment in each grade.

(5) CENTRAL OFFICE ALLOCATIONS

In addition to classified and administrative staff units allocated in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, classified and administrative staff units are provided for the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years for the central office administrative costs of operating a school district, at the following rates:

(a) The total central office staff units provided in this subsection (5) are calculated by first multiplying the total number of eligible certificated instructional, certificated administrative, and classified staff units providing school-based or district-wide support services, as identified in RCW 28A.150.260(6)(b) and the increased allocations provided pursuant to subsections (2) and (4) of this section, by 5.3 percent.

(b) Of the central office staff units calculated in (a) of this subsection, 74.53 percent are allocated as classified staff units, as generated in subsection (4) of this section, and 25.48 percent shall be allocated as administrative staff units, as generated in subsection (3) of this section.

(c) Staff units generated as enhancements outside the program of basic education to the minimum requirements of RCW 28A.150.260, and staff units generated by skill center and career-technical students, are excluded from the total central office staff units calculation in (a) of this subsection.

(d) For students in approved career-technical and skill center programs, central office classified units are allocated at the same staff unit per student rate as those generated for general education students of the same grade in this subsection (5), and central office administrative staff units are allocated at staff unit per student rates that exceed the general education rate established for students in the same grade in this subsection (5) by ((12.30))12.31 percent in the 2023-24 school year and ((12.46))12.44 percent in the 2024-25 school year for career and technical education students, and ((17.62))17.64 percent in the 2023-24 school year and ((17.79))17.77 percent in the 2024-25 school year for skill center students.

(6) FRINGE BENEFIT ALLOCATIONS

Fringe benefit allocations shall be calculated at a rate of 17.97 percent in the 2023-24 school year and ((17.97))17.99 percent in the 2024-25 school year for certificated salary allocations provided under subsections (2), (3), and (5) of this section, and a rate of 22.06 percent in the 2023-24 school year and ((21.56))21.58 percent in the 2024-25 school year for classified salary allocations provided under subsections (4) and (5) of this section.

(7) INSURANCE BENEFIT ALLOCATIONS

Insurance benefit allocations shall be calculated at the rates specified in section 506 of this act, based on the number of benefit units determined as follows: Except for nonrepresented employees of educational service districts, the number of calculated benefit units determined below. Calculated benefit units are staff units multiplied by the benefit allocation factors established in the collective bargaining agreement referenced in section 909 of this act. These factors are intended to adjust allocations so that, for the purpose of distributing insurance benefits, full-time equivalent employees may be calculated on the basis of 630 hours of work per year, with no individual employee counted as more than one full-time equivalent. The number of benefit units is determined as follows:

(a) The number of certificated staff units determined in subsections (2), (3), and (5) of this section multiplied by 1.02; and

(b) The number of classified staff units determined in subsections (4) and (5) of this section multiplied by 1.43.

(8) MATERIALS, SUPPLIES, AND OPERATING COSTS (MSOC) ALLOCATIONS

Funding is allocated per annual average full-time equivalent student for the materials, supplies, and operating costs (MSOC) incurred by school districts, consistent with the requirements of RCW 28A.150.260.

(a)(i) MSOC funding for general education students are allocated at the following per student rates:

MSOC RATES/STUDENT FTE

MSOC Component

2023-24

School Year

2024-25

School Year

Technology

$178.98

(($182.72))

$182.38

Utilities and Insurance

$416.26

(($425.01))

$424.18

Curriculum and Textbooks

$164.48

(($167.94))

$167.61

Other Supplies

$326.54

(($333.40))

$332.75

Library Materials

$22.65

(($23.13))

$23.08

Instructional Professional Development for Certificated

and Classified Staff

$25.44

(($25.97))

$25.92

Facilities Maintenance

$206.22

(($210.55))

$210.13

Security and Central Office

$142.87

(($145.87))

$145.58

TOTAL MSOC/STUDENT FTE

$1,483.44

(($1,514.59))

$1,511.63

(ii) For the 2023-24 school year and 2024-25 school year, as part of the budget development, hearing, and review process required by chapter 28A.505 RCW, each school district must disclose: (A) The amount of state funding to be received by the district under (a) and (d) of this subsection (8); (B) the amount the district proposes to spend for materials, supplies, and operating costs; (C) the difference between these two amounts; and (D) if (a)(ii)(A) of this subsection (8) exceeds (a)(ii)(B) of this subsection (8), any proposed use of this difference and how this use will improve student achievement.

(iii) Within the amount provided in (a)(i) of this subsection (8), allocations for MSOC technology in excess of RCW 28A.150.260 are not part of the state's basic education.

(b) Students in approved skill center programs generate per student FTE MSOC allocations of $1,724.62 for the 2023-24 school year and (($1,760.84))$1,757.39 for the 2024-25 school year.

(c) Students in approved exploratory and preparatory career and technical education programs generate per student FTE MSOC allocations of $1,724.62 for the 2023-24 school year and (($1,760.84))$1,757.39 for the 2024-25 school year.

(d) Students in grades 9-12 generate per student FTE MSOC allocations in addition to the allocations provided in (a) through (c) of this subsection at the following rate:

MSOC Component

2023-24

School Year

2024-25

School Year

Technology

$44.04

(($44.97))

$51.88

Curriculum and Textbooks

$48.06

(($49.06))

$51.37

Other Supplies

$94.07

$96.04

Library Materials

$6.05

$6.18

Instructional Professional Development for Certified

and Classified Staff

$8.01

(($8.18))

$8.56

TOTAL GRADE 9-12 BASIC EDUCATION MSOC/STUDENT FTE

$200.23

(($204.43))

$214.03

(9) SUBSTITUTE TEACHER ALLOCATIONS

For the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years, funding for substitute costs for classroom teachers is based on four (4) funded substitute days per classroom teacher unit generated under subsection (2) of this section, at a daily substitute rate of $151.86.

(10) ALTERNATIVE LEARNING EXPERIENCE PROGRAM FUNDING

(a) Amounts provided in this section from July 1, 2023, to August 31, 2023, are adjusted to reflect provisions of chapter 297, Laws of 2022, as amended (allocation of funding for students enrolled in alternative learning experiences).

(b) The superintendent of public instruction shall require all districts receiving general apportionment funding for alternative learning experience (ALE) programs as defined in WAC 392-121-182 to provide separate financial accounting of expenditures for the ALE programs offered in district or with a provider, including but not limited to private companies and multidistrict cooperatives, as well as accurate, monthly headcount and FTE enrollment claimed for basic education, including separate counts of resident and nonresident students.

(11) DROPOUT REENGAGEMENT PROGRAM

The superintendent shall adopt rules to require students claimed for general apportionment funding based on enrollment in dropout reengagement programs authorized under RCW 28A.175.100 through 28A.175.115 to meet requirements for at least weekly minimum instructional contact, academic counseling, career counseling, or case management contact. Districts must also provide separate financial accounting of expenditures for the programs offered by the district or under contract with a provider, as well as accurate monthly headcount and full-time equivalent enrollment claimed for basic education, including separate enrollment counts of resident and nonresident students.

(12) ALL DAY KINDERGARTEN PROGRAMS

$670,803,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $869,125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to fund all day kindergarten programs in all schools in the 2023-24 school year and 2024-25 school year, pursuant to RCW 28A.150.220 and 28A.150.315. Beginning in the 2023-24 school year, funding for students admitted early to kindergarten under exceptions to the uniform entry qualifications under RCW 28A.225.160 must be limited to children deemed to be likely to be "successful in kindergarten."

(13) ADDITIONAL FUNDING FOR SMALL SCHOOL DISTRICTS AND REMOTE AND NECESSARY PLANTS

For small school districts and remote and necessary school plants within any district which have been judged to be remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction, additional staff units are provided to ensure a minimum level of staffing support. Additional administrative and certificated instructional staff units provided to districts in this subsection shall be reduced by the general education staff units, excluding career and technical education and skills center enhancement units, otherwise provided in subsections (2) through (5) of this section on a per district basis.

(a) For districts enrolling not more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within any school district which have been judged to be remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction and enroll not more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8:

(i) For those enrolling no students in grades 7 and 8, 1.76 certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five students, plus one-twentieth of a certificated instructional staff unit for each additional student enrolled; and

(ii) For those enrolling students in grades 7 or 8, 1.68 certificated instructional staff units and 0.32 certificated administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five students, plus one-tenth of a certificated instructional staff unit for each additional student enrolled;

(b) For specified enrollments in districts enrolling more than twenty-five but not more than one hundred average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within any school district which enroll more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8 and have been judged to be remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction:

(i) For enrollment of up to sixty annual average full-time equivalent students in grades K-6, 2.76 certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units; and

(ii) For enrollment of up to twenty annual average full-time equivalent students in grades 7 and 8, 0.92 certificated instructional staff units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units;

(c) For districts operating no more than two high schools with enrollments of less than three hundred average annual full-time equivalent students, for enrollment in grades 9-12 in each such school, other than alternative schools, except as noted in this subsection:

(i) For remote and necessary schools enrolling students in any grades 9-12 but no more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-12, four and one-half certificated instructional staff units and one-quarter of a certificated administrative staff unit;

(ii) For all other small high schools under this subsection, nine certificated instructional staff units and one-half of a certificated administrative staff unit for the first sixty average annual full-time equivalent students, and additional staff units based on a ratio of 0.8732 certificated instructional staff units and 0.1268 certificated administrative staff units per each additional forty-three and one-half average annual full-time equivalent students;

(iii) Districts receiving staff units under this subsection shall add students enrolled in a district alternative high school and any grades nine through twelve alternative learning experience programs with the small high school enrollment for calculations under this subsection;

(d) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more than seventy annual average full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-8 program or a grades 1-8 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional staff unit;

(e) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-6 program or a grades 1-6 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional staff unit;

(f)(i) For enrollments generating certificated staff unit allocations under (a) through (e) of this subsection, one classified staff unit for each 2.94 certificated staff units allocated under such subsections;

(ii) For each nonhigh school district with an enrollment of more than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty students, an additional one-half of a classified staff unit; and

(g) School districts receiving additional staff units to support small student enrollments and remote and necessary plants under this subsection (13) shall generate additional MSOC allocations consistent with the nonemployee related costs (NERC) allocation formula in place for the 2010-11 school year as provided section 502, chapter 37, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess. (2010 supplemental budget), adjusted annually for inflation.

(14) Any school district board of directors may petition the superintendent of public instruction by submission of a resolution adopted in a public meeting to reduce or delay any portion of its basic education allocation for any school year. The superintendent of public instruction shall approve such reduction or delay if it does not impair the district's financial condition. Any delay shall not be for more than two school years. Any reduction or delay shall have no impact on levy authority pursuant to RCW 84.52.0531 and local effort assistance pursuant to chapter 28A.500 RCW.

(15) The superintendent may distribute funding for the following programs outside the basic education formula during fiscal years 2024 and 2025 as follows:

(a) $650,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $650,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for fire protection for school districts located in a fire protection district as now or hereafter established pursuant to chapter 52.04 RCW.

(b) $436,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $436,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for programs providing skills training for secondary students who are enrolled in extended day school-to-work programs, as approved by the superintendent of public instruction. The funds shall be allocated at a rate not to exceed $500 per full-time equivalent student enrolled in those programs.

(16) Funding in this section is sufficient to fund a maximum of 1.6 FTE enrollment for skills center students pursuant to chapter 463, Laws of 2007.

(17) Funding in this section is sufficient to fund a maximum of 1.2 FTE enrollment for career launch students pursuant to RCW 28A.700.130. Expenditures for this purpose must come first from the appropriations provided in section 501(5) of this act; funding for career launch enrollment exceeding those appropriations is provided in this section. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide a summary report to the office of the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by January 1, 2024. The report must include the total FTE enrollment for career launch students, the FTE enrollment for career launch students that exceeded the appropriations provided in section 501(5) of this act, and the amount expended from this section for those students.

(18)(a) Students participating in running start programs may be funded up to a combined maximum enrollment of 1.4 FTE including school district and institution of higher education enrollment consistent with the running start course requirements provided in chapter 202, Laws of 2015 (dual credit education opportunities). In calculating the combined 1.4 FTE, the office of the superintendent of public instruction:

(i) Must adopt rules to fund the participating student's enrollment in running start courses provided by the institution of higher education during the summer academic term; and

(ii) May average the participating student's September through June enrollment to account for differences in the start and end dates for courses provided by the high school and the institution of higher education.

(iii) In consultation with the state board for community and technical colleges, the participating institutions of higher education, the student achievement council, and the education data center, must annually track and report to the fiscal committees of the legislature on the combined FTE experience of students participating in the running start program, including course load analyses at both the high school and community and technical college system.

(b) $1,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1316 (dual credit program access).

(19) If two or more school districts consolidate and each district was receiving additional basic education formula staff units pursuant to subsection (13) of this section, the following apply:

(a) For three school years following consolidation, the number of basic education formula staff units shall not be less than the number of basic education formula staff units received by the districts in the school year prior to the consolidation; and

(b) For the fourth through eighth school years following consolidation, the difference between the basic education formula staff units received by the districts for the school year prior to consolidation and the basic education formula staff units after consolidation pursuant to subsection (13) of this section shall be reduced in increments of twenty percent per year.

(20)(a) Indirect cost charges by a school district to approved career and technical education middle and secondary programs shall not exceed the lesser of five percent or the cap established in federal law of the combined basic education and career and technical education program enhancement allocations of state funds. Middle and secondary career and technical education programs are considered separate programs for funding and financial reporting purposes under this section.

(b) Career and technical education program full-time equivalent enrollment shall be reported on the same monthly basis as the enrollment for students eligible for basic support, and payments shall be adjusted for reported career and technical education program enrollments on the same monthly basis as those adjustments for enrollment for students eligible for basic support.

(21) Funding in this section is sufficient to provide full general apportionment payments to school districts eligible for federal forest revenues as provided in RCW 28A.520.020. For the 2023-2025 biennium, general apportionment payments are not reduced for school districts receiving federal forest revenues.

(22) $38,753,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely to implement Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5882 (prototypical school staffing). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 505. 2023 c 475 s 505 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—BASIC EDUCATION EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION

(1) The following calculations determine the salaries used in the state allocations for certificated instructional, certificated administrative, and classified staff units as provided in RCW 28A.150.260, and under section 504 of this act: For the 2023-24 school year and the 2024-25 school year salary allocations for certificated instructional staff, certificated administrative staff, and classified staff units are determined for each school district by multiplying the statewide minimum salary allocation for each staff type by the school district's regionalization factor shown in LEAP Document 3.

Statewide Minimum Salary Allocation

Staff Type

2023-24

School Year

2024-25

School Year

Certificated Instructional

$75,419

(($78,360))

$78,209

Certificated Administrative

$111,950

(($116,316))

$116,092

Classified

$54,103

(($56,213))

$56,105

(2) For the purposes of this section, "LEAP Document 3" means the school district regionalization factors for certificated instructional, certificated administrative, and classified staff, as developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee on April 20, 2023, at 6:09 hours.

(3) Incremental fringe benefit factors are applied to salary adjustments at a rate of 17.33 percent for school year 2023-24 and ((17.33))17.35 percent for school year 2024-25 for certificated instructional and certificated administrative staff and 18.56 percent for school year 2023-24 and ((18.06))18.08 percent for the 2024-25 school year for classified staff.

(4) The salary allocations established in this section are for allocation purposes only except as provided in this subsection, and do not entitle an individual staff position to a particular paid salary except as provided in RCW 28A.400.200, as amended by chapter 13, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. (fully funding the program of basic education).

Sec. 506. 2023 c 475 s 506 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR SCHOOL EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($391,668,000))

$390,257,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($871,433,000))

$886,620,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,263,101,000))

$1,276,877,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The salary increases provided in this section are 3.7 percent for the 2023-24 school year, and ((3.9))3.7 percent for the 2024-25 school year, the annual inflationary adjustments pursuant to RCW 28A.400.205.

(2)(a) In addition to salary allocations, the appropriations in this section include funding for professional learning as defined in RCW 28A.415.430, 28A.415.432, and 28A.415.434. Funding for this purpose is calculated as the equivalent of three days of salary and benefits for each of the funded full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff units. Nothing in this section entitles an individual certificated instructional staff to any particular number of professional learning days.

(b) Of the funding provided for professional learning in this section, the equivalent of one day of salary and benefits for each of the funded full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff units in the 2023-24 school year must be used to train school district staff on cultural competency, diversity, equity, or inclusion, as required in chapter 197, Laws of 2021.

(3)(a) The appropriations in this section include associated incremental fringe benefit allocations at 17.33 percent for the 2023-24 school year and ((17.33))17.35 percent for the 2024-25 school year for certificated instructional and certificated administrative staff and 18.56 percent for the 2023-24 school year and ((18.06))18.08 percent for the 2024-25 school year for classified staff.

(b) The appropriations in this section include the increased or decreased portion of salaries and incremental fringe benefits for all relevant state-funded school programs in part V of this act. Changes for general apportionment (basic education) are based on the salary allocations and methodology in sections 504 and 505 of this act. Changes for special education result from changes in each district's basic education allocation per student. Changes for educational service districts and institutional education programs are determined by the superintendent of public instruction using the methodology for general apportionment salaries and benefits in sections 504 and 505 of this act. Changes for pupil transportation are determined by the superintendent of public instruction pursuant to RCW 28A.160.192, and impact compensation factors in sections 504, 505, and 506 of this act.

(c) The appropriations in this section include no salary adjustments for substitute teachers.

(4) The appropriations in this section are sufficient to fund the collective bargaining agreement referenced in part 9 of this act and reflect the incremental change in cost of allocating rates as follows: For the 2023-24 school year, $1,100 per month and for the 2024-25 school year, (($1,157))$1,178 per month.

(5) The rates specified in this section are subject to revision each year by the legislature.

(6) $46,426,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $211,538,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 50, Laws of 2023.

(7) $5,155,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $12,076,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1436 (special education funding). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(8) $864,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely to increase the special education enrollment funding cap in RCW 28A.150.390.

(9) $3,995,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely to implement Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5882 (prototypical school staffing). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(10) $671,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,555,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to account for the office of the superintendent of public instruction allocation of transportation funding to school districts.

Sec. 507. 2023 c 475 s 507 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR PUPIL TRANSPORTATION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($763,749,000))

$803,792,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($762,332,000))

$832,615,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,526,081,000))

$1,636,407,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2)(a) For the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school district programs for the transportation of eligible students as provided in RCW 28A.160.192. Funding in this section constitutes full implementation of RCW 28A.160.192, which enhancement is within the program of basic education. Students are considered eligible only if meeting the definitions provided in RCW 28A.160.160.

(b) From July 1, 2023, to August 31, 2023, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts programs for the transportation of students as provided in section 507, chapter 297, Laws of 2022, as amended.

(3) Within amounts appropriated in this section, up to $10,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and up to $10,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are for a transportation alternate funding grant program based on the alternate funding process established in RCW 28A.160.191. The superintendent of public instruction must include a review of school district efficiency rating, key performance indicators and local school district characteristics such as unique geographic constraints in the grant award process.

(4) A maximum of $939,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and a maximum of $939,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 may be expended for regional transportation coordinators and related activities. The transportation coordinators shall ensure that data submitted by school districts for state transportation funding shall, to the greatest extent practical, reflect the actual transportation activity of each district.

(5) Subject to available funds under this section, school districts may provide student transportation for summer skills center programs.

(6) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide reimbursement funding to a school district for school bus purchases only after the superintendent of public instruction determines that the school bus was purchased from the list established pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195(2) or a comparable competitive bid process based on the lowest price quote based on similar bus categories to those used to establish the list pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195.

(7) The superintendent of public instruction shall base depreciation payments for school district buses on the presales tax five-year average of lowest bids in the appropriate category of bus. In the final year on the depreciation schedule, the depreciation payment shall be based on the lowest bid in the appropriate bus category for that school year.

(8) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall annually disburse payments for bus depreciation in August.

(9)(a) $13,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $13,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the superintendent to provide transportation safety net funding to school districts with a convincingly demonstrated need for additional transportation funding for special passengers. Transportation safety net awards shall only be provided when a school district's allowable transportation expenditures attributable to serving special passengers exceeds the amount allocated under subsection (2)(a) of this section and any excess transportation costs reimbursed by federal, state, tribal, or local child welfare agencies. A transportation safety net award may not exceed a school district's excess expenditures directly attributable to serving special passengers in the pupil transportation program.

(b) To be eligible for additional transportation safety net award funding, the school district must report, in accordance with statewide accounting guidance, the amount of the excess costs and the specific activities or services provided to special passengers that created the excess costs. The office of the superintendent of public instruction must request from school districts an application for transportation safety net funding. The office must submit to the office of financial management, and to the education and fiscal committees of the legislature, the total demonstrated need and awards by school district.

(c) Transportation safety net awards allocated under this subsection are not part of the state's program of basic education.

(10) $23,033,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5873 (student transportation), including: (a) $4,000,000 is provided for supplemental transportation allocations to school districts that experience an increase in costs to pupil transportation services contracts due to new benefit requirements; (b) $400 per student for 32,086 homeless students; (c) $170,000 for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to collect student transportation expenditure data; and (d) $6,000,000 for transportation allocations to school districts. If Substitute Senate Bill No. 5873 is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(11) $130,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6031 (student transportation allocation). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(12) $32,177,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $41,519,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to account for the office of the superintendent of public instruction allocation of transportation funding to school districts.

Sec. 508. 2023 c 475 s 508 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—SCHOOL FOOD SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($33,334,000))

$55,834,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($79,857,000))

$102,357,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($573,104,000))

$925,799,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($686,295,000))

$1,083,990,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $11,548,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $11,548,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for state matching money for federal child nutrition programs, and may support the meals for kids program through the following allowable uses:

(a) Elimination of breakfast copays for eligible public school students and lunch copays for eligible public school students in grades pre-kindergarten through twelfth grades who are eligible for reduced-price lunch as required in chapter 74, Laws of 2021 (reduced-price lunch copays);

(b) Assistance to school districts and authorized public and private nonprofit organizations for supporting summer food service programs, and initiating new summer food service programs in low-income areas;

(c) Reimbursements to school districts for school breakfasts served to students eligible for free and reduced-price lunch, pursuant to chapter 287, Laws of 2005; and

(d) Assistance to school districts in initiating and expanding school breakfast programs.

(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall report annually to the fiscal committees of the legislature on annual expenditures in subsection (1)(a) through (c) of this section.

(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall provide the department of health with the following data, where available, for all nutrition assistance programs that are funded by the United States department of agriculture and administered by the office of the superintendent of public instruction. The superintendent must provide the report for the preceding federal fiscal year by February 1, 2024, and February 1, 2025. The report must provide:

(a) The number of people in Washington who are eligible for the program;

(b) The number of people in Washington who participated in the program;

(c) The average annual participation rate in the program;

(d) Participation rates by geographic distribution; and

(e) The annual federal funding of the program in Washington.

(4)(a) (($21,167,000))$44,167,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($52,167,000))$74,667,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $28,500,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA) are provided solely for reimbursements to school districts for schools and groups of schools required to participate in the federal community eligibility program under section 1, chapter 7, Laws of 2022 (schools/comm. eligibility) for meals not reimbursed at the federal free meal rate.

(b) $119,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $119,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 271, Laws of 2018 (school meal payment) to increase the number of schools participating in the federal community eligibility program and to support breakfast after the bell programs authorized by the legislature that have adopted the community eligibility provision, and for staff at the office of the superintendent of public instruction to implement section 1, chapter 7, Laws of 2022 (schools/comm. eligibility).

(5) $7,426,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA/GEER) and $16,023,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1238 (free school meals). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

Sec. 509. 2023 c 475 s 509 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR SPECIAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($1,719,541,000))

$1,804,368,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($1,789,729,000))

$1,921,104,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($529,429,000))

$664,372,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$54,694,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($4,093,393,000))

$4,444,538,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) Funding for special education programs is provided on an excess cost basis, pursuant to RCW 28A.150.390. School districts shall ensure that special education students as a class receive their full share of the general apportionment allocation accruing through sections 504 and 506 of this act. To the extent a school district cannot provide an appropriate education for special education students under chapter 28A.155 RCW through the general apportionment allocation, it shall provide services through the special education excess cost allocation funded in this section.

(b) Funding provided within this section is sufficient for districts to provide school principals and lead special education teachers annual professional development on the best-practices for special education instruction and strategies for implementation. Districts shall annually provide a summary of professional development activities to the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(2)(a) The superintendent of public instruction shall ensure that:

(i) Special education students are basic education students first;

(ii) As a class, special education students are entitled to the full basic education allocation; and

(iii) Special education students are basic education students for the entire school day.

(b)(i) The superintendent of public instruction shall continue to implement the full cost method of excess cost accounting, as designed by the committee and recommended by the superintendent, pursuant to section 501(1)(k), chapter 372, Laws of 2006, except as provided in (b)(ii) of this subsection.

(ii) The superintendent of public instruction shall implement any changes to excess cost accounting methods required under Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1436 (special education funding).

(3) Each fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(4)(a) For the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school district programs for special education students as provided in RCW 28A.150.390, except that the calculation of the base allocation also includes allocations provided under section 504 (2) and (4) of this act and RCW 28A.150.415, which enhancement is within the program of basic education.

(b) From July 1, 2023, to August 31, 2023, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school district programs for special education students as provided in section 509, chapter 297, Laws of 2022, as amended.

(5) The following applies throughout this section: The definitions for enrollment and enrollment percent are as specified in RCW 28A.150.390(3). Each district's general fund—state funded special education enrollment shall be the lesser of the district's actual enrollment percent or 15 percent.

(6) At the request of any interdistrict cooperative of at least 15 districts in which all excess cost services for special education students of the districts are provided by the cooperative, the maximum enrollment percent shall be calculated in accordance with RCW 28A.150.390(3) (c) and (d), and shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than individual district units. For purposes of this subsection, the average basic education allocation per full-time equivalent student shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than individual district units.

(7) (($106,931,000))$151,047,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($112,431,000))$151,046,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $29,574,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for safety net awards for districts with demonstrated needs for special education funding beyond the amounts provided in subsection (4) of this section. If the federal safety net awards based on the federal eligibility threshold exceed the federal appropriation in this subsection (7) in any fiscal year, the superintendent shall expend all available federal discretionary funds necessary to meet this need. At the conclusion of each school year, the superintendent shall recover safety net funds that were distributed prospectively but for which districts were not subsequently eligible.

(a) For the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years, safety net funds shall be awarded by the state safety net oversight committee as provided in section 109(1) chapter 548, Laws of 2009 (education).

(b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall make award determinations for state safety net funding in August of each school year, except that the superintendent of public instruction shall make award determinations for state safety net funding in July of each school year for the Washington state school for the blind and for the center for childhood deafness and hearing loss. Determinations on school district eligibility for state safety net awards shall be based on analysis of actual expenditure data from the current school year.

(8) A maximum of $1,250,000 may be expended from the general fund—state appropriations to fund teachers and aides at Seattle children's hospital. This amount is in lieu of money provided through the home and hospital allocation and the special education program.

(9) The superintendent shall maintain the percentage of federal flow-through to school districts at 85 percent. In addition to other purposes, school districts may use increased federal funds for high-cost students, for purchasing regional special education services from educational service districts, and for staff development activities particularly relating to inclusion issues.

(10) A school district may carry over from one year to the next year up to 10 percent of the general fund—state funds allocated under this program; however, carryover funds shall be expended in the special education program.

(11) $87,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $87,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $214,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a special education family liaison position within the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(12)(a) $13,538,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) is provided solely for allocations from federal funding as authorized in section 2014, the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2.

(b) $1,777,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) is provided solely for providing preschool services to qualifying special education students under section 619 of the federal individuals with disabilities education act, pursuant to section 2002, the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2.

(13) $153,091,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $199,246,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1436 (special education funding). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(14) $12,542,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely to increase the special education enrollment funding cap in RCW 28A.150.390.

(15) $6,590,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely to implement Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5882 (prototypical school staffing). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(16)(a) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for compilation of reporting as required under this subsection. By November 1, 2024, each district shall report to the superintendent on the district's utilization of funds provided by the legislature under chapter 475, Laws of 2023 and this act, including under subsections (13) and (14) of this section. The report shall include the following:

(i) To what extent the district has increased special services, programs, and supports to students with disabilities for the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years;

(ii) How the district has modified staffing ratios during the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years in special programs to provide more intensive staff support to students enrolled in special education programs;

(iii) How the district has used the resources provided under chapter 475, Laws of 2023 and this act to increase employee compensation for both certificated and classified staff during the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years to improve staff retention and recruitment of new staff;

(iv) To what extent the district has increased staff development programs and curriculum that is both timely and relevant to the needs of students with disabilities during the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years; and

(v) To what extent the district has used the resources provided under chapter 475, Laws of 2023 and this act to purchase staff safety equipment during the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years in order to reduce work-related injuries.

(b) The office shall compile the reports provided under (a) of this subsection and provide a report to the relevant committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024, summarizing statewide trends and providing each district's individual responses.

(17) $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to support professional development in inclusionary practices for classroom teachers. Funding must be prioritized to the public schools with the highest percentage of students with individualized education programs aged three through 21 who spend the least amount of time in general education classrooms.

Sec. 510. 2023 c 475 s 510 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR EDUCATIONAL SERVICE DISTRICTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($40,799,000))

$41,625,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($35,780,000))

$39,185,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,700,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($79,279,000))

$83,510,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The educational service districts shall continue to furnish financial services required by the superintendent of public instruction and RCW 28A.310.190 (3) and (4).

(2) Funding within this section is provided for regional professional development related to mathematics and science curriculum and instructional strategies aligned with common core state standards and next generation science standards. Funding shall be distributed among the educational service districts in the same proportion as distributions in the 2007-2009 biennium. Each educational service district shall use this funding solely for salary and benefits for a certificated instructional staff with expertise in the appropriate subject matter and in professional development delivery, and for travel, materials, and other expenditures related to providing regional professional development support.

(3) Funding in this section is provided for regional professional development related to English language arts curriculum and instructional strategies aligned with common core state standards. Each educational service district shall use this funding solely for salary and benefits for certificated instructional staff with expertise in the appropriate subject matter and in professional development delivery, and for travel, materials, and other expenditures related to providing regional professional development support.

(4) Funding in this section is provided for regional technical support for the K-20 telecommunications network to prevent system failures and avoid interruptions in school utilization of the data processing and video-conferencing capabilities of the network. These funds may be used to purchase engineering and advanced technical support for the network.

(5) Funding in this section is provided for a corps of nurses located at the educational service districts, to be dispatched in coordination with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, to provide direct care to students, health education, and training for school staff. In fiscal years 2024 and 2025, allocations for the corps of nurses is sufficient to provide one day per week of nursing services for all second-class school districts.

(6) Funding in this section is provided for staff and support at the nine educational service districts to provide a network of support for school districts to develop and implement comprehensive suicide prevention and behavioral health supports for students.

(7) Funding in this section is provided for staff and support at the nine educational service districts to provide assistance to school districts with comprehensive safe schools planning, conducting needs assessments, school safety and security trainings, coordinating appropriate crisis and emergency response and recovery, and developing threat assessment and crisis intervention teams. In fiscal years 2024 and 2025, allocations for staff and support for regional safety centers are increased to 3 full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff for each regional safety center.

(8) Funding in this section is provided for regional English language arts coordinators to provide professional development of teachers and principals around the new early screening for dyslexia requirements.

(9) The educational service districts, at the request of the state board of education pursuant to RCW 28A.310.010 and 28A.305.130, may receive and screen applications for school accreditation, conduct school accreditation site visits pursuant to state board of education rules, and submit to the state board of education post-site visit recommendations for school accreditation. The educational service districts may assess a cooperative service fee to recover actual plus reasonable indirect costs for the purposes of this subsection.

(10) $2,169,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,169,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for each educational service district to provide technology consultation, procurement, and training required under chapter 301, Laws of 2021 (schools/computers & devices).

(11) $1,009,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,009,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 87, Laws of 2022 (ed. service district funding).

(12) $2,700,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the cost of employing one full-time equivalent employee at each of the nine education service districts to support the expansion of career connected learning.

(13) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for educational service districts to provide students attending school in rural areas with access to a mental health professional using telemedicine. Funding must be prioritized to districts where mental health services are inadequate or nonexistent due to geographic constraints. Funding may be used for schools or school districts for technology upgrades to provide secure access for students, for contracted services, or to pay applicable copays or fees for telemedicine visits if not covered by a student's public or private insurance.

(14) $325,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $325,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Puget Sound educational service district 121 to administer a Washington state capitol civic engagement grant program for the Auburn, Federal Way, Highline, Kent, Renton, and Tukwila public school districts. Grant recipients must use the grant awards to transport one grade of either fourth or fifth grade students to the Washington state capitol campus for a day of civic engagement, which may include a capitol tour, mock legislative committee hearings, presentations on the legislative process, meet and greets with legislative members, and other related activities. If funding remains after all eligible school districts have received grant awards, the remaining funding may be used to support the program for high school students within the eligible school districts. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $5,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $5,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided for the Puget Sound educational service district to administer the grant program.

(15) $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 ((is))and $2,355,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to continue behavioral health regional services grants to support school districts with the least access to behavioral health services. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall conduct an evaluation of the investments in behavioral health supports and by December 31, 2024, report to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature, the number of students served by specific behavioral health supports, how the students were selected for specific behavioral health supports, and how the students may have received behavioral health supports, and make recommendations for improving behavioral health supports for students.

(16) $2,800,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,800,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the educational service districts to expand and maintain student behavioral health and mental health services.

(17) $643,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $643,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for educational service districts 121 and 101 to coordinate with local mental health agencies and local school districts to arrange for in-school placements of social worker associates licensed under RCW 18.225.145 and masters in social work candidates enrolled in an accredited university program who commit to working as school social workers, and to coordinate clinical supervision for approved supervisors that meet the requirements as defined in rule by the department of health to provide the necessary supervision to the social worker associates and masters in social work candidates.

(18) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to work with educational service districts, the health care authority, and the department of health to review and update materials for information sessions provided to students designed to prevent the use of opioids, including fentanyl, specifically outlining the risks of death related to uneven dosages and pills that look like prescription drugs. If Second Substitute House Bill No. 1956 (relating to fentanyl and other substance use prevention education) is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 511. 2023 c 475 s 511 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR LOCAL EFFORT ASSISTANCE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($215,327,000))

$213,689,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($211,159,000))

$211,467,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($426,486,000))

$425,156,000

Sec. 512. 2023 c 475 s 512 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR INSTITUTIONAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($14,899,000))

$16,138,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($14,635,000))

$16,736,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($29,534,000))

$32,874,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund—state fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2) State funding provided under this section is based on salaries and other expenditures for a 220-day school year. The superintendent of public instruction shall monitor school district expenditure plans for institutional education programs to ensure that districts plan for a full-time summer program.

(3) State funding for each institutional education program shall be based on the institution's annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment. Staffing ratios for each category of institution shall remain the same as those funded in the 1995-97 biennium.

(4) The funded staffing ratios for education programs for juveniles age 18 or less in department of corrections facilities shall be the same as those provided in the 1997-99 biennium.

(5) $701,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $701,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to maintain at least one certificated instructional staff and related support services at an institution whenever the K-12 enrollment is not sufficient to support one full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff to furnish the educational program. The following types of institutions are included: Residential programs under the department of social and health services for developmentally disabled juveniles, programs for juveniles under the department of corrections, programs for juveniles under the juvenile rehabilitation administration, and programs for juveniles operated by city and county jails.

(6) Within the amounts provided in this section, funding is provided to increase the capacity of institutional education programs to differentiate instruction to meet students' unique educational needs, including students with individualized educational plans. Those needs may include but are not limited to one-on-one instruction, enhanced access to counseling for social emotional needs of the student, and services to identify the proper level of instruction at the time of student entry into the facility. Allocations of amounts for this purpose in a school year must be based on 45 percent of full-time enrollment in institutional education receiving a differentiated instruction amount per pupil equal to the total statewide allocation generated by the distribution formula under RCW 28A.150.260 (4)(a), (5), (6), and (8) and the allocation under RCW 28A.150.415, per the statewide full-time equivalent enrollment in common schools.

(7) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2024 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to support two student records coordinators to manage the transmission of academic records for each of the long-term juvenile institutions. One coordinator is provided for each of the following: The Issaquah school district for the Echo Glen children's center and for the Chehalis school district for Green Hill academic school.

(8) Ten percent of the funds allocated for the institution may be carried over from one year to the next.

(9) $588,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $897,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for one educational advocate to each institution with enrollments above 40 full-time equivalent students in addition to any educational advocates supported by federal funding. Educational advocates will provide the following supports to students enrolled in or just released from institutional education programs:

(a) Advocacy for institutional education students to eliminate barriers to educational access and success;

(b) Consultation with juvenile rehabilitation staff to develop educational plans for and with participating youth;

(c) Monitoring educational progress of participating students;

(d) Providing participating students with school and local resources that may assist in educational access and success upon release from institutional education facilities; and

(e) Coaching students and caregivers to advocate for educational needs to be addressed at the school district upon return to the community.

(10) Within the amounts provided in this section, funding is provided to increase materials, supplies, and operating costs by $85 per pupil for technology supports for institutional education programs. This funding is in addition to general education materials, supplies, and operating costs provided to institutional education programs, which exclude formula costs supported by the institutional facilities.

(11) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to support instruction in cohorts of students grouped by similar age and academic levels.

Sec. 513. 2023 c 475 s 513 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($33,233,000))

$33,171,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($32,990,000))

$32,964,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($66,223,000))

$66,135,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2)(a) For the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school district programs for highly capable students as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(c) except that allocations must be based on 5.0 percent of each school district's full-time equivalent enrollment. In calculating the allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following: (i) Additional instruction of 2.1590 hours per week per funded highly capable program student; (ii) fifteen highly capable program students per teacher; (iii) 36 instructional weeks per year; (iv) 900 instructional hours per teacher; and (v) the compensation rates as provided in sections 505 and 506 of this act.

(b) From July 1, 2023, to August 31, 2023, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts programs for highly capable students as provided in section 513, chapter 297, Laws of 2022, as amended.

Sec. 514. 2023 c 475 s 514 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR MISCELLANEOUS—EVERY STUDENT SUCCEEDS ACT

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($9,802,000))

$11,416,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($9,802,000))

$11,416,000

Sec. 515. 2023 c 475 s 515 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—EDUCATION REFORM PROGRAMS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($139,296,000))

$132,050,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($141,513,000))

$145,739,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($95,825,000))

$97,181,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$1,450,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,664,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($379,748,000))

$378,084,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) ACCOUNTABILITY

(a) $26,975,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $26,975,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, $1,350,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation, and $15,868,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for development and implementation of the Washington state assessment system.

(b) $14,352,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $14,352,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 159, Laws of 2013 (K-12 education - failing schools).

(2) EDUCATOR CONTINUUM

(a) (($75,317,000))$65,070,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($77,424,000))$77,518,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the following bonuses for teachers who hold valid, unexpired certification from the national board for professional teaching standards and who are teaching in a Washington public school, subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(i) For national board certified teachers, a bonus of $6,206 per teacher in the 2023-24 school year and a bonus of (($6,336))$6,324 per teacher in the 2024-25 school year;

(ii) An additional $5,000 annual bonus shall be paid to national board certified teachers who teach in either: (A) High schools where at least 50 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free or reduced-price lunch, (B) middle schools where at least 60 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free or reduced-price lunch, or (C) elementary schools where at least 70 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free or reduced-price lunch;

(iii) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to ensure that national board certified teachers meet the qualifications for bonuses under (b) of this subsection for less than one full school year receive bonuses in a prorated manner. All bonuses in this subsection will be paid in July of each school year. Bonuses in this subsection shall be reduced by a factor of 40 percent for first year NBPTS certified teachers, to reflect the portion of the instructional school year they are certified; and

(iv) During the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years, and within available funds, certificated instructional staff who have met the eligibility requirements and have applied for certification from the national board for professional teaching standards may receive a conditional loan of two thousand dollars or the amount set by the office of the superintendent of public instruction to contribute toward the current assessment fee, not including the initial up-front candidacy payment. The fee shall be an advance on the first annual bonus under RCW 28A.405.415. The conditional loan is provided in addition to compensation received under a district's salary allocation and shall not be included in calculations of a district's average salary and associated salary limitation under RCW 28A.400.200. Recipients who fail to receive certification after fully exhausting all years of candidacy as set by the national board for professional teaching standards are required to repay the conditional loan. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to define the terms for initial grant of the assessment fee and repayment, including applicable fees. To the extent necessary, the superintendent may use revenues from the repayment of conditional loan scholarships to ensure payment of all national board bonus payments required by this section in each school year.

(b) $3,418,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,418,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of a new performance-based evaluation for certificated educators and other activities as provided in chapter 235, Laws of 2010 (education reform) and chapter 35, Laws of 2012 (certificated employee evaluations).

(c) $477,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $477,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the leadership internship program for superintendents, principals, and program administrators.

(d) $810,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $810,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the development of a leadership academy for school principals and administrators. The superintendent of public instruction shall contract with an independent organization to operate a state-of-the-art education leadership academy that will be accessible throughout the state. Semiannually the independent organization shall report on amounts committed by foundations and others to support the development and implementation of this program. Leadership academy partners shall include the state level organizations for school administrators and principals, the superintendent of public instruction, the professional educator standards board, and others as the independent organization shall identify.

(e) $11,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $11,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a beginning educator support program (BEST). The program shall prioritize first year educators in the mentoring program. School districts and/or regional consortia may apply for grant funding. The program provided by a district and/or regional consortia shall include: A paid orientation; assignment of a qualified mentor; development of a professional growth plan for each beginning educator aligned with professional certification; release time for mentors and new educators to work together; and educator observation time with accomplished peers. Funding may be used to provide statewide professional development opportunities for mentors and beginning educators. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to support first year educators in the mentoring program.

(f) $4,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $4,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the provision of training for teachers, principals, and principal evaluators in the performance-based teacher principal evaluation program.

(g) $3,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to contract with an approved educator preparation program run by a statewide labor organization representing educators to fund one cohort of teacher residents. This program shall choose its candidates from among the paraeducators working in those districts. Through completing this program, participants shall attain a teaching certification with an endorsement in special education.

(h) $621,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to contract with a statewide labor association that represents educators to provide a suite of supports and professional development opportunities for 15,000 emergency substitute teachers.

Sec. 516. 2023 c 475 s 516 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR TRANSITIONAL BILINGUAL PROGRAMS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($236,993,000))

$249,957,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($236,173,000))

$260,357,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($107,124,000))

$137,117,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($580,290,000))

$647,431,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2)(a) For the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts for transitional bilingual programs under RCW 28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080, including programs for exited students, as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(b) and the provisions of this section. In calculating the allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following averages: (i) Additional instruction of 4.7780 hours per week per transitional bilingual program student in grades kindergarten through six and 6.7780 hours per week per transitional bilingual program student in grades seven through twelve in school years 2023-24 and 2024-25; (ii) additional instruction of 3.0000 hours per week in school years 2023-24 and 2024-25 for the head count number of students who have exited the transitional bilingual instruction program within the previous two years based on their performance on the English proficiency assessment; (iii) fifteen transitional bilingual program students per teacher; (iv) 36 instructional weeks per year; (v) 900 instructional hours per teacher; and (vi) the compensation rates as provided in sections 505 and 506 of this act. Pursuant to RCW 28A.180.040(1)(g), the instructional hours specified in (a)(ii) of this subsection (2) are within the program of basic education.

(b) From July 1, 2023, to August 31, 2023, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts for transitional bilingual instruction programs as provided in section 516, chapter 297, Laws of 2022, as amended.

(3) The superintendent may withhold allocations to school districts in subsection (2) of this section solely for the central provision of assessments as provided in RCW 28A.180.090 (1) and (2) up to the following amounts: ((1.75))1.63 percent for school year 2023-24 and ((1.74))1.57 percent for school year 2024-25.

(4) The general fund—federal appropriation in this section is for migrant education under Title I Part C and English language acquisition, and language enhancement grants under Title III of the elementary and secondary education act.

(5) $35,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $35,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to track current and former transitional bilingual program students.

(6) $1,461,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2024 and $1,916,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the central provision of assessments as provided in RCW 28A.180.090, and is in addition to the withholding amounts specified in subsection (3) of this section.

Sec. 517. 2023 c 475 s 517 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR THE LEARNING ASSISTANCE PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($467,338,000))

$484,953,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($466,985,000))

$491,111,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($533,487,000))

$636,543,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,467,810,000))

$1,612,607,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The general fund—state appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The appropriations include such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(b)(i) For the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts for learning assistance programs as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(a). In calculating the allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following averages: (A) Additional instruction of 2.3975 hours per week per funded learning assistance program student for the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years; (B) additional instruction of 1.1 hours per week per funded learning assistance program student for the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years in qualifying high-poverty school building; (C) fifteen learning assistance program students per teacher; (D) 36 instructional weeks per year; (E) 900 instructional hours per teacher; and (F) the compensation rates as provided in sections 505 and 506 of this act.

(ii) From July 1, 2023, to August 31, 2023, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts for learning assistance programs as provided in section 517, chapter 297, Laws of 2022, as amended.

(c) A school district's funded students for the learning assistance program shall be the sum of the district's full-time equivalent enrollment in grades K-12 multiplied by the district's percentage of October headcount enrollment in grades K-12 eligible for free or reduced-price lunch in the school year period defined under RCW 28A.150.260(10)(a). A school year's October headcount enrollment for free and reduced-price lunch shall be as reported in the comprehensive education data and research system.

(2) Allocations made pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be adjusted to reflect ineligible applications identified through the annual income verification process required by the national school lunch program, as recommended in the report of the state auditor on the learning assistance program dated February, 2010.

(3) The general fund—federal appropriation in this section is provided for Title I Part A allocations of the every student succeeds act of 2016.

(4) A school district may carry over from one year to the next up to 10 percent of the general fund—state funds allocated under this program; however, carryover funds shall be expended for the learning assistance program.

(5) Within existing resources, during the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years, school districts are authorized to use funds allocated for the learning assistance program to also provide assistance to high school students who have not passed the state assessment in science.

Sec. 518. 2023 c 475 s 518 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—PER PUPIL ALLOCATIONS

Statewide Average Allocations

Per Annual Average Full-Time Equivalent Student

Basic Education Program

2023-24

School Year

2024-25

School Year

General Apportionment

(($10,329))

$10,303

(($10,814))

$10,849

Pupil Transportation

(($725))

$788

(($745))

$822

Special Education Programs

(($11,960))

$12,214

(($12,495))

$12,750

Institutional Education Programs

(($26,938))

$25,766

(($27,909))

$27,295

Programs for Highly Capable Students

(($648))

$647

$674

Transitional Bilingual Programs

(($1,555))

$1,571

(($1,591))

$1,620

Learning Assistance Program

(($1,008))

$1,009

(($1,049))

$1,050

Sec. 519. 2023 c 475 s 519 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

(1) Amounts distributed to districts by the superintendent through part V of this act are for allocation purposes only, unless specified by part V of this act, and do not entitle a particular district, district employee, or student to a specific service, beyond what has been expressly provided in statute. Part V of this act restates the requirements of various sections of Title 28A RCW. If any conflict exists, the provisions of Title 28A RCW control unless this act explicitly states that it is providing an enhancement. Any amounts provided in part V of this act in excess of the amounts required by Title 28A RCW provided in statute, are not within the program of basic education unless clearly stated by this act.

(2) When adopting new or revised rules or policies relating to the administration of allocations in part V of this act that result in fiscal impact, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall seek legislative approval through the budget request process.

(3) Appropriations made in this act to the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall initially be allotted as required by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not include transfers of moneys between sections of this act, except as provided in ((subsection))subsections (6) and (7) of this section.

(4) Appropriations in sections 504 and 506 of this act for insurance benefits under chapter 41.05 RCW are provided solely for the superintendent to allocate to districts for employee health benefits as provided in section 909 of this act. The superintendent may not allocate, and districts may not expend, these amounts for any other purpose beyond those authorized in section 909 of this act.

(5) As required by RCW 28A.710.110, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall transmit the charter school authorizer oversight fee for the charter school commission to the charter school oversight account.

(6) By January 15, 2024, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must identify funding in this Part V from the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account—federal appropriation from funds attributable to subsection 2001(f), the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 11 117-2 and general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA/GEER) that are provided solely for the purposes defined in sections 507, 522, and 523 of this act and are at risk of being unobligated or unspent by federal deadlines, as of January 15, 2024. Funding identified at risk under this subsection must be reported to the fiscal committees of the legislature and expended as allocations to school districts in the same proportion as received under part A of title I of the elementary and secondary education act of 1965 in the most recent fiscal year.

(7) The appropriations to the office of the superintendent of public instruction in this act shall be expended for the programs and amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, 2024, unless specifically prohibited by this act and after approval by the director of financial management, the superintendent of public instruction may transfer state general fund appropriations for fiscal year 2024 among the following programs to meet the apportionment schedule for a specified formula in another of these programs: General apportionment; employee compensation adjustments; pupil transportation; special education programs; institutional education programs; transitional bilingual programs; highly capable programs; and learning assistance programs.

(8) The director of financial management shall notify the appropriate legislative fiscal committees in writing prior to approving any allotment modifications or transfers under this section.

Sec. 520. 2023 c 475 s 520 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR CHARTER SCHOOLS

Washington Opportunity Pathways Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($184,721,000))

$181,418,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($184,721,000))

$181,418,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The superintendent shall distribute funding appropriated in this section to charter schools under chapter 28A.710 RCW. Within amounts provided in this section the superintendent may distribute funding for safety net awards for charter schools with demonstrated needs for special education funding beyond the amounts provided under chapter 28A.710 RCW.

(2) $3,293,000 of the opportunity pathways account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 50, Laws of 2023 (K-12 inflationary increases).

(3) $1,421,000 of the opportunity pathways account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1436 (special education funding). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(4) $77,000 of the opportunity pathways account—state appropriation is provided solely to increase the special education enrollment funding cap in RCW 28A.150.390.

(5) $11,128,000 of the opportunity pathways account—state appropriation is provided solely for payment for enrichment to state-tribal schools and charter schools.

(6) $260,000 of the opportunity pathways account—state appropriation is provided solely to implement Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5882 (prototypical school staffing). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(7) $969,000 of the opportunity pathways account—state appropriation is provided solely to account for the office of the superintendent of public instruction allocation of transportation funding to school districts.

Sec. 521. 2023 c 475 s 521 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CHARTER SCHOOL COMMISSION

Washington Opportunity Pathways Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($23,000))

$640,000

Charter Schools Oversight Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,572,000))

$4,571,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($4,595,000))

$5,211,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The entire Washington opportunity pathways account—state appropriation in this section is provided to the superintendent of public instruction solely for the operations of the Washington state charter school commission under chapter 28A.710 RCW.

(2) $28,000 of the charter schools oversight account—state appropriation is provided solely to the Washington state charter school commission to enable each charter school to participate in the governance training required under chapter 197, Laws of 2021 (schools/equity training).

(3) $238,000 of the charter schools oversight account—state appropriation is provided solely for office of the attorney general legal services related to litigation challenging the commission's authority to oversee and regulate charter schools.

Sec. 522. 2023 c 475 s 522 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR GRANTS AND PASS THROUGH FUNDING

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($85,370,000))

$86,090,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($81,400,000))

$89,607,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($111,255,000))

$113,347,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,487,000

Elementary and Secondary School Emergency Relief III

Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$897,895,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,175,920,000))

$1,188,426,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $132,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $162,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for global compensation changes.

(2) GRADUATION SUCCESS AND PREPARATION FOR POSTSECONDARY PATHWAYS

(a) $4,894,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $4,894,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to administer programs and grants which increase equitable access to dual credit programs, including subsidizing or eliminating student costs for dual credit courses or exams. By November 2024, the office shall submit a report to relevant committees of the legislature describing options for entering into statewide agreements with dual credit exam companies that will reduce the overall costs for all students and eliminate costs for students who are low income.

(b) $3,152,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,152,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for secondary career and technical education grants pursuant to chapter 170, Laws of 2008, including parts of programs receiving grants that serve students in grades four through six. If equally matched by private donations, $1,475,000 of the 2024 appropriation and $1,475,000 of the 2025 appropriation shall be used to support FIRST robotics programs in grades four through twelve. Of the amounts provided in this subsection (2)(b), $800,000 of the fiscal year 2024 appropriation and $800,000 of the fiscal year 2025 appropriation are provided solely for the purpose of statewide supervision activities for career and technical education student leadership organizations.

(c) $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for science, technology, engineering and mathematics lighthouse projects, consistent with chapter 238, Laws of 2010.

(d) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for advanced project lead the way courses at ten high schools. To be eligible for funding in 2024, a high school must have offered a foundational project lead the way course during the 2022-23 school year. The 2024 funding must be used for one-time start-up course costs for an advanced project lead the way course, to be offered to students beginning in the 2023-24 school year. To be eligible for funding in 2025, a high school must have offered a foundational project lead the way course during the 2023-24 school year. The 2025 funding must be used for one-time start-up course costs for an advanced project lead the way course, to be offered to students beginning in the 2024-25 school year. The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the education research and data center at the office of financial management shall track student participation and long-term outcome data. The office may require the recipient of these funds to report the impacts of the recipient's efforts in alignment with the measures of the Washington school improvement framework.

(e) $2,527,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,527,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for annual startup, expansion, or maintenance of core plus programs in maritime, construction, and aerospace and advanced manufacturing programs. To be eligible for funding to start up, maintain, or expand programs under (e)(i) through (iii) of this subsection (2), the skills center, high school, or middle school must be selected through a grant process administered by the office of the superintendent of public instruction in consultation with the advisory committee established in (e)(vi) of this subsection (2). The office and the education research and data center shall report annually student participation and long-term outcome data. Within the amounts provided in this subsection (2)(e):

(i) $900,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $900,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants for the annual startup, expansion, or maintenance of core plus programs in aerospace and advanced manufacturing programs.

(ii) $550,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $550,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants for the annual startup, expansion, or maintenance of core plus programs in construction programs.

(iii) $550,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $550,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants for the annual startup, expansion, or maintenance of core plus programs in maritime programs.

(iv) For (e)(i) through (iii) of this subsection (2), when the grant demand does not align with the specified allocation, the superintendent may allocate funding toward sector areas that meet criteria based on agreement from industry sector representatives.

(v) $527,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $527,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office to administer, evaluate, and promote programs under (e)(i) through (iii) of this subsection (2) based on industry sector recommendations, including contracts with sector-specific entities to expand sector-specific employer engagement programs, increase work placement opportunities, validate credentials necessary for direct employment, and provide professional development to support schools, teachers, and students. Professional development must include pedagogy-based learning to increase English language arts, mathematics, and science outcomes through core plus programming.

(vi) The office shall collaborate with industry sector leadership from the core plus program areas and a representative from a statewide business and manufacturing association to inform the administration and continual improvement of core plus programs, review data and outcomes, recommend program improvements, ensure core plus programs reflect current industry competencies, and identify appropriate program credentials.

(f) $4,940,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $4,940,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Washington state achievers scholarship and Washington higher education readiness program. The funds shall be used to: Support community involvement officers that recruit, train, and match community volunteer mentors with students selected as achievers scholars; and to identify and reduce barriers to college for low-income and underserved middle and high school students. The office may require the recipient of these funds to report the impacts of the recipient's efforts in alignment with the measures of the Washington school improvement framework.

(g) $1,454,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,454,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for contracting with a college scholarship organization with expertise in conducting outreach to students concerning eligibility for the Washington college bound scholarship consistent with chapter 405, Laws of 2007. The office may require the recipient of these funds to report the impacts of the recipient's efforts in alignment with the measures of the Washington school improvement framework.

(h) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for an education and workforce pathway pilot program at the northwest career and technical academy. The pilot program will oversee a pathway including high schools, skills centers, community and technical colleges, and employers that results in students earning a high school diploma and an associate in technical arts degree, while maintaining summer employment.

(i) $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office to distribute after-exit running start grants to school districts that identify running start students that have exceeded maximum enrollment under running start formulas and high school graduates who have 15 or fewer college credits to earn before meeting associate degree requirements for instruction not funded under section 504(18) of this act. High school graduates who meet these requirements are eligible to receive funds from these grants for fees to the community and technical college to earn up to 15 college credits during the summer academic term following their high school graduation.

(j) $2,094,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,076,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the competitive grant program created in Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5582 (nurse supply). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(k) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the West Sound STEM Network to increase STEM activities for students in school and after school and to develop industry education pathways in high demand sectors.

(l) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the office to contract with a nongovernmental entity for a controls programmer apprenticeship program.

(m) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a skill center located in Vancouver, Washington to support the center's criminal justice and fire science programs.

(n) $1,250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to conduct summer open doors pilots with up to 12 dropout reengagement programs to support summer programming. To select pilot participants, the office must prioritize schools and programs that work with postresident youth as defined in RCW 28A.190.005. Amounts provided in this subsection must be used to support programming during the summer months and are in addition to funding generated by enrollment under state funding formulas.

(o) $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for grants to school districts for ninth grade success. Within the amounts in this subsection, funding is provided for the office to contract with an evaluator to conduct a yearly evaluation of the program's success.

(p) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the office for a grant to the Seattle public school district to conduct an analysis of why families have left the district and how they may be attracted back. The Seattle public school district shall provide a report to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025, that addresses the reasons for families leaving the district and specific steps necessary for them to return to the district.

(q) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the office for grants to school districts to install at least one automatic external defibrillator. The office shall establish a grant program to assist school districts to offset the costs of purchasing an automatic external defibrillator (AED) or to maintain or replace an AED.

(r) $700,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to small districts to enable access to skills centers and technical education. For purposes of this subsection (2)(r), "small district" means a district having an enrollment of fewer than 2,750 students.

(s) $20,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $20,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office for a grant to Evergreen high school in White Center to support the associated student body at the high school.

(t) $425,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the office for a grant to an established network for a pilot project to provide opportunities for youth to see themselves in high demand science, technology, engineering, and math in the northwest and southeast regions.

(u) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the office for grants to school districts to develop and implement capacity building supports for community-based youth development. School districts receiving grants under this subsection will offer programs that serve youth between the ages of 11 and 19.

(3) CURRICULUM DEVELOPMENT, DISSEMINATION, AND SUPPORTS

(a) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for project citizen and we the people: The citizen and the constitution programs sponsored by the national conference of state legislatures and the center for civic education to promote participation in government by middle and high school students. Of the amounts provided, $15,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $15,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for awarding a travel grant to the winner of the we the people: The citizen and the constitution state competition.

(b) $373,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $373,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 127, Laws of 2018 (civics education). Of the amounts provided in this subsection (3)(b), $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grant programs to school districts to help cover travel costs associated with civics education competitions.

(c) $55,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $55,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction for statewide implementation of career and technical education course equivalency frameworks authorized under RCW 28A.700.070 for math and science. This may include development of additional equivalency course frameworks, course performance assessments, and professional development for districts implementing the new frameworks.

(d) Within the amounts appropriated in this section the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall ensure career and technical education courses are aligned with high-demand, high-wage jobs. The superintendent shall verify that the current list of career and technical education courses meets the criteria established in RCW 28A.700.020(2). The superintendent shall remove from the list any career and technical education course that no longer meets such criteria.

(e) $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to provide grants to school districts and educational service districts for science teacher training in the next generation science standards including training in the climate science standards. At a minimum, school districts shall ensure that teachers in one grade level in each elementary, middle, and high school participate in this science training. Of the amount appropriated $1,000,000 is provided solely for community-based nonprofits including tribal education organizations to partner with public schools for next generation science standards.

(f) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Kip Tokuda memorial Washington civil liberties public education program. The superintendent of public instruction shall award grants consistent with RCW 28A.300.410.

(g) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Washington state leadership and assistance for science education reform (LASER) regional partnership activities, including instructional material purchases, teacher and principal professional development, and school and community engagement events. The office may require the recipient of these funds to report the impacts of the recipient's efforts in alignment with the measures of the Washington school improvement framework.

(h) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants of $2,500 to provide twenty middle and high school teachers each year with professional development training for implementing integrated math, science, technology, and engineering programs in their schools.

(i) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the computer science and education grant program to support the following three purposes: Train and credential teachers in computer sciences; provide and upgrade technology needed to learn computer science; and, for computer science frontiers grants to introduce students to and engage them in computer science. The office of the superintendent of public instruction must use the computer science learning standards adopted pursuant to chapter 3, Laws of 2015 (computer science) in implementing the grant, to the extent possible. Additionally, grants provided for the purpose of introducing students to computer science are intended to support innovative ways to introduce and engage students from historically underrepresented groups, including girls, low-income students, and minority students, to computer science and to inspire them to enter computer science careers. The office of the superintendent of public instruction may award up to $500,000 each year, without a matching requirement, to districts with greater than fifty percent of students eligible for free and reduced-price meals. All other awards must be equally matched by private sources for the program, including gifts, grants, or endowments.

(j) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to contract with a qualified 501(c)(3) nonprofit community-based organization physically located in Washington state that has at least 18 years of experience collaborating with the office and school districts statewide to integrate the state learning standards in English language arts, mathematics, and science with FieldSTEM outdoor field studies and project-based and work-based learning opportunities aligned with the environmental, natural resource, and agricultural sectors. The office may require the recipient of these funds to report the impacts of the recipient's efforts in alignment with the measures of the Washington school improvement framework.

(k) $62,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $62,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for competitive grants to school districts to increase the capacity of high schools to offer AP computer science courses. In making grant allocations, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must give priority to schools and districts in rural areas, with substantial enrollment of low-income students, and that do not offer AP computer science. School districts may apply to receive either or both of the following grants:

(i) A grant to establish partnerships to support computer science professionals from private industry serving on a voluntary basis as coinstructors along with a certificated teacher, including via synchronous video, for AP computer science courses; or

(ii) A grant to purchase or upgrade technology and curriculum needed for AP computer science, as well as provide opportunities for professional development for classroom teachers to have the requisite knowledge and skills to teach AP computer science.

(l) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Mobius science center to expand mobile outreach of science, technology, engineering, and mathematics (STEM) education to students in rural, tribal, and low-income communities.

(m) $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the centrum program at Fort Worden state park.

(n) $20,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $20,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office to administer an outdoor learning grant program to develop and support outdoor educational experiences for students in Washington public schools. A portion of the amount provided must be used to provide outdoor educational opportunities for people with disabilities. The office may consult with the Washington recreation and conservation office on outdoor learning program grants. Of the amounts provided in this subsection (3)(n):

(i) $195,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $195,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office to implement chapter 112, Laws of 2022 (outdoor learning grant prg.).

(ii) $3,903,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,903,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the outdoor learning grant program, which consists of two types of grants:

(A) Allocation-based grants for school districts to develop or support outdoor educational experiences; and

(B) Competitive grants for outdoor education providers that are designed to support existing capacity and to increase future capacity for outdoor learning experiences.

(iii) $15,902,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $15,902,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the outdoor education experiences program. The office must prioritize providing the program to fifth and sixth grade students in high poverty schools, expanding to other fifth and sixth grade students subject to available funds.

(o) $3,205,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,205,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 238, Laws of 2022 (student financial literacy) which provides grants to school districts for integrating financial literacy education into professional development for certificated staff.

(p)(i) $1,425,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $4,725,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for dual language grants to grow capacity for high quality dual language learning. Grant funding may be used for new and existing dual language programs, heritage language programs for immigrant and refugee students, and indigenous language programs for native students. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for tribal language grants.

(ii) Each grant recipient must convene an advisory board to guide the development and continuous improvement of its dual language program, including but not limited to: Determining which schools and languages will be prioritized; conducting outreach to the community; and addressing enrollment considerations and the hiring of staff. At least half the members of the board must be parents of English learner students or current or former English learner students. The other members of the board must represent teachers, students, school leaders, governing board members, youth, and community-based organizations that support English learners.

(q) $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 ((is))and $3,004,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a statewide information technology academy program. This public-private partnership will provide educational software, as well as information technology certification and software training opportunities for students and staff in public schools ((for the 2023-24 school year only)). ((The office must evaluate other options that may be available in the state for a future public-private partnership to deliver similar services to students and staff of public schools at no cost to the state.))

(r) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office to contract with a nongovernmental entity whose goals are to reduce disparities in student performance and improve algebraic achievement to create a statewide interactive math tutoring tool for middle and high school students that is accessible on a 24 hour basis to students, teachers, and parents across the state. The nongovernmental entity must have previously contracted with five other states and have demonstrated experience creating statewide interactive math tools with proven outcomes in math proficiency.

(s) $2,036,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for a gravitational wave observatory located in southeastern Washington that is supported through the national science foundation to purchase hands-on, interactive exhibits to expand the number of developmentally appropriate learning activities available for K-12 students attending the observatory.

(t) $170,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $170,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the continuation of the math improvement pilot program. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(i) $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Spokane school district.

(ii) $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Chehalis school district.

(u) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to administer grants to school districts for a plant-based school meals pilot program. Grants may be used for food supplies, delivery costs, equipment purchases, education, and other expenditures to increase access to plant-based school meals. Grant awards to school districts may not exceed $10,000 per district and may only be distributed to school districts that have not received funding for the pilot program previously.

(v) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office to contract with an organization that works with educators to secure salmon eggs, offer learning opportunities as the fry develop, and assist when students release their fry into local creeks and lakes. Funding may only be used for new programs located in elementary schools that are eligible for high-poverty allocations from the learning assistance program. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, the office may use no more than $35,000 each fiscal year for office administration costs related to the contract.

(w) $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for transitional support grants to school districts to support schools that incur costs transitioning from Native American school mascots, logos, or team names under chapter 301, Laws of 2021. In awarding grants under this subsection, the office must prioritize maximizing the number of schools that receive grant awards and address the most immediate school needs in order to comply with chapter 301, Laws of 2021, and must prioritize applications that are narrowly tailored to address specific compliance issues. School districts receiving funding to comply with the requirements of chapter 301, Laws of 2021 must use the methods that are the least costly and that leave intact existing facilities, including interiors and flooring, to the greatest extent possible. Grants awarded under this section may not be used for general maintenance or improvements of school facilities.

(4) ELIMINATING INEQUITABLE STUDENT OUTCOMES

(a) $5,895,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,105,000 of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account—federal appropriation, and $7,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a contract with a nongovernmental entity or entities for demonstration sites to improve the educational outcomes of students who are dependent pursuant to chapter 13.34 RCW pursuant to chapter 71, Laws of 2016 (foster youth edu. outcomes). The office may require the recipient of these funds to report the impacts of the recipient's efforts in alignment with the measures of the Washington school improvement framework.

(i) Of the amount provided in this subsection (4)(a), $446,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $446,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the demonstration site established pursuant to the 2013-2015 omnibus appropriations act, section 202(10), chapter 4, Laws of 2013, 2nd sp. sess.

(ii) Of the amount provided in this subsection (4)(a), $1,015,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,015,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the demonstration site established pursuant to the 2015-2017 omnibus appropriations act, section 501(43)(b), chapter 4, Laws of 2015, 3rd sp. sess., as amended.

(iii) Of the amounts provided in this subsection (4)(a), $684,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $684,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the demonstration site established with funding provided in the 2017-2019 omnibus appropriations act, chapter 1, Laws of 2017, 3rd sp. sess., as amended.

(iv) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the demonstration site established with funding provided in this act.

(v) $55,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $55,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for maintaining and implementing the data sharing agreement between the office, the department of children, youth, and families, and the contractors to support targeted service delivery, program evaluation, and statewide education outcomes measurement for students served under this section.

(vi) Of the amounts provided in this subsection (4)(a), $1,105,000 of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account—federal appropriation and $1,105,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the expansion of individualized education services such as monitoring and supporting completion of educational milestones, remediation needs, and special education needs of middle school students who are dependent pursuant to chapter 13.34 RCW.

(b) $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 157, Laws of 2016 (homeless students).

(c) $36,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $36,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for chapter 212, Laws of 2014 (homeless student educational outcomes).

(d) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for contracts with Washington state based nonprofit organizations that provide a career-integrated one-to-one mentoring program for disadvantaged students facing academic and personal challenges with the goal of keeping them on track for graduation and post-high school success. An applicant requesting funding under this subsection must successfully demonstrate to the office that it currently provides a career-integrated one-to-one volunteer mentoring program and has been mentoring school youth for at least 20 years in the state prior to application.

(e) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office to contract with an organization to create an after-school and summer learning program in the city of Federal Way. The program shall provide comprehensive, culturally competent academic support and cultural enrichment for primarily latinx, spanish-speaking, low-income sixth, seventh, and eighth grade students. The department must contract with an organization with over forty years of experience that serves the latino community in Seattle and King county and has previously established an after-school and summer learning program.

(f) $850,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $850,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to create and administer a grant program for districts to reduce associated student body fees or participation fees for students who are eligible to participate in the federal free and reduced-price meals program. The office must distribute grants for the 2023-24 school year to school districts by August 10, 2023, and grants for the 2024-25 school year by August 1, 2024.

(i) Grant awards must be prioritized in the following order:

(A) High schools implementing the United States department of agriculture community eligibility provision;

(B) High schools with the highest percentage of students in grades nine through twelve eligible to participate in the federal free and reduced-price meals program; and

(C) High schools located in school districts enrolling 5,000 or fewer students.

(ii) High schools that do not comply with the data collection and reporting requirements in RCW 28A.320.540 are not eligible for grant funding.

(iii) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall award grants that are the lesser of the cost of the high school's associated student body card multiplied by the number of students eligible for the free or reduced-price meals program that purchased a student body card in either 2022-23 or 2023-24 school year, whichever is higher, or $10,000.

(iv) The office may award additional funding if:

(A) The appropriations provided are greater than the total amount of funding requested at the end of the application cycle; and

(B) The applicant shows a demonstrated need for additional support.

(g) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to contract with a Washington-based nonprofit organization to promote equitable access in science, technology, engineering, and math education for historically underserved students and communities. The nonprofit shall provide a system of science educational programming specifically for migrant and bilingual students, including teacher professional development, culturally responsive classroom resources that are aligned with Washington state science and environmental and sustainability learning standards, and implementation support. At least 50 percent of the funding provided in this subsection must serve schools and school districts in eastern Washington. The nonprofit organization must have experience developing and implementing science and environmental science programming and resources for migrant and bilingual students.

(h) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to contract with a nonprofit organization serving opportunity youth in Pierce, King and Snohomish counties. The organization must assist traditionally underrepresented students on nontraditional educational pathways by providing mentorship and technical assistance in navigating higher education and financial aid. The office may require the recipient of these funds to report the impacts of the efforts in alignment with the measures of the Washington school improvement framework.

(i) $1,399,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,399,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for school districts to support youth who are truant under chapter 28A.225 RCW or at risk of becoming truant, and for costs associated with filing or serving petitions under RCW 28A.225.030.

(j) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to school districts and educational service districts operating institutional education programs for youth in state long-term juvenile institutions to provide access to computer science elective courses created in chapter 234, Laws of 2022 (computer science instruction).

(k) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to school districts, charter schools, and state-tribal education compact schools to establish K-12 intensive tutoring programs. Grants shall be used to recruit, train, and hire tutors to provide one-on-one tutoring services to K-12 students experiencing learning loss as a result of the COVID-19 pandemic. The tutors must receive training in proven tutoring models to ensure their effectiveness in addressing learning loss.

(l) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 180, Laws of 2017 (Washington Aim program).

(m) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to the pacific science center to increase hands-on learning opportunities for Title I K-5 students statewide by increasing access to science on wheels and virtual field trips.

(n)(i) $216,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office to administer a peer support competitive grant program in Washington public schools. The office must award grants to eligible school districts starting in the 2023-24 school year. Programs should be designed to be primarily youth-led and aim to increase youth school engagement and support personal/cultural identities, and reduce risks associated with depression, school violence, and bullying. Successful grantees may consult with Washington teen link and the natural helper program in the development of the grant criteria, and the development of training material support. Program components should include:

(A) Identification of trusted peers and staff who other students confide in;

(B) Development or adaption of training materials;

(C) Intensive training for peer and staff supporters;

(D) Avenues to advertise peer support communication strategies; and

(E) Participant and program evaluations.

(ii) School districts may also use funds to develop a sister school rapid trauma response strategy. Under this component, successful applicants reach out to other schools also receiving a peer support grant to develop a trauma response plan that quickly organizes students and staff to contact peers within those schools during times of school trauma and offer support.

(iii) The office shall evaluate the program to share best practices and for consideration by other school districts.

(o) $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office to contract with a nonprofit organization to develop and provide a Latino youth-on-youth gang violence prevention program for students. The program must target Latino students ages 11 through 17 who are either involved in or at risk of becoming involved in a gang or in gang activities. Eligible youth must be enrolled in either the Moses Lake or Federal Way school districts. The nonprofit organization must have at least 15 years of experience serving Latino communities and promoting advocacy and must provide social kindergarten through 12th grade social emotional learning, mental health wraparound services, and parent engagement programs in Washington.

(p) $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office to administer the technology grant program established under chapter 301, Laws of 2021.

(q) $625,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the office to contract with an organization located in SeaTac, Washington to provide wraparound social services and expand and maintain existing education and family engagement programs that serve students and their families in the Federal Way and Highline public school districts. The work of the organization must focus on housing and social services, education, and economic development for African immigrant and refugee communities.

(r) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office to contract with a nonprofit organization located in Everett, Washington to provide arts and culture programs to 500 low-income children and youth from diverse racial and ethnic backgrounds to close the education achievement gap in Snohomish county by improving student and youth confidence and improving mental health outcomes.

(s) $360,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the Shelton School District to contract with an organization that provides a free early childhood music education to teach music literacy and key skills to prepare children for success in school. The organization must provide Spanish, Mam, and Q'anjob'al versions of the early learning music education program during the 2023-24 school year.

(5) EDUCATOR GROWTH AND DEVELOPMENT

(a) $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a nonviolence and ethical leadership training and professional development program provided by the institute for community leadership.

(b) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the office to contract with the association of Washington school principals to provide support, mentoring, mediation, and professional learning services to school principals and assistant principals in the greater Seattle area.

(c) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to contract with a nonprofit organization that supports Washington teachers in implementing lessons on the Holocaust for the expansion of comprehensive Holocaust and genocide education.

(6) FEDERAL GRANTS FOR COVID-19 RECOVERY

(a) $7,791,000 of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account—federal appropriation from funds attributable to subsection 2001(f)(4), the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2 is provided solely to administer a grant program for community-based organizations to collaborate with school districts to support learning recovery and acceleration.

(b) $102,002,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA/ESSER) from funds attributable to subsection 313(c), the coronavirus response and relief supplemental appropriations act, P.L. 116-260, division M is provided solely for subgrants to local education agencies. Total subgrants awarded under this subsection (6)(b), section 1517(47)(b) of this act, and section 12, chapter 3, Laws of 2021 may not exceed the federal amounts provided under subsection 313(c), the coronavirus response and relief supplemental appropriations act, P.L. 116-260, division M.

(c) $9,253,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA/GEER) ((is))and $1,487,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CSFRS) are provided solely to provide emergency assistance to nonpublic schools, as authorized in section 312(d), the coronavirus response and relief supplemental appropriations act, P.L. 116-260, division M. Total funds provided under this subsection (6)(c), section 1517(47)(c)(i) of this act, and section 13, chapter 3, Laws of 2021 may not exceed the federal amounts provided in section 312(d), the coronavirus response and relief supplemental appropriations act, P.L. 116-260, division M.

(d) $671,375,000 of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account—federal appropriation is provided solely for allocations from funds attributable to subsection 2001(e)(2) the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2 for subgrants to local education agencies. Total subgrants awarded under this subsection (6)(d) and section 1517(47)(d) of this act may not exceed the federal amounts provided under subsection 2001(e)(2), the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2.

(e) $123,373,000 of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account—federal appropriation is provided solely for allocations from funds attributable to subsection 2001(e)(1), the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2 for subgrants to local education agencies to address learning loss. Total subgrants awarded under this subsection (6)(e) and section 1517(47)(e) of this act may not exceed the federal amounts provided under subsection 2001(e)(1), the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2, and may not exceed the funding authorized in section 1517(47)(e) of this act.

(f) $10,335,000 of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account—federal appropriation from funds attributable to subsection 2001(f)(3), the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2 is provided solely to support evidence-based comprehensive afterschool programs. Total funds provided under this subsection (6)(f) and section 1517(47)(g) of this act may not exceed the funding authorized in section 1517(47)(g) of this act.

(g) $6,184,000 of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account—federal appropriation from funds attributable to subsection 2001(f)(4), the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2 is provided solely for grants to districts to expand the number of dual language classrooms in early grades and professional development to accelerate literacy gains in early grades, especially for English learners. Total funds provided under this subsection (6)(g) and section 1517(47)(h) of this act may not exceed the funding authorized in section 1517(47)(h) of this act.

(h)(i) $8,428,000 of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account—federal appropriation from funds attributable to subsection 2001(b), the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2, is provided solely for the purposes of identifying children and youth experiencing homelessness and providing children and youth experiencing homelessness with:

(A) Wrap-around services due to the challenges of the COVID-19 public health emergency; and

(B) Assistance needed to enable children and youth experiencing homelessness to attend school and participate fully in school activities.

(ii) Total funds provided under this subsection (6)(h) and section 1517(47)(n) of this act may not exceed the federal amounts provided in subsection 2001(b), the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2.

(i) $65,610,000 of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account—federal appropriation is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to administer grants for the purposes of learning recovery and acceleration. Allowable uses of the funds are limited to:

(i) One-time contracts for classified, certificated, or administrative staff who will provide tiered academic and social-emotional supports to students most impacted by the disruption of in-person learning, including locating and reengaging students who have disengaged from school, one-on-one and small-group instruction, and other intensive learning supports;

(ii) Professional learning for educators focused on learning recovery and acceleration, including assessing student learning and social-emotional needs, transitioning to standards-based curricula and grading, adopting competency or mastery-based options specifically for credit retrieval purposes, and family and student engagement strategies;

(iii) Procuring assessment or data systems that provide actionable just-in-time data regarding student progress throughout the school year; and

(iv) Direct supports to students to improve school engagement and accelerate learning.

(j) $995,000 of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account—federal appropriation from funds attributable to subsection 2001(b), the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2, is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to contract with the Washington school principals' education foundation to support pandemic related learning loss through outdoor learning and overnight camp experiences.

(k) $173,000 of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account—federal appropriation from funds attributable to subsection 2001(f)(2), the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2 is provided solely for grants to entities or organizations to provide outdoor education summer enrichment programs to youth. Recipients must prioritize activities or programs that:

(i) Promote students connecting socially with their classmates;

(ii) Encourage students to engage in physical activity; and

(iii) Support families who have struggled with child care needs.

(l) $143,000 of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account—federal appropriation from funds attributable to subsection 2001(f)(4), the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2 is provided solely for grants for supplies, equipment, staffing, and services to increase access to summer meals and safe school meals in the 2023-24 school year and summer prior to the start of the school year.

(m) $2,383,000 of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account—federal appropriation from funds attributable to subsection 2001(f)(4), the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2, is provided solely for grants to school districts to expand career and technical education graduation pathway options, including career-connected learning opportunities. Total funds provided under this subsection (6)(m) and section 1517(47)(i) of this act for the same purpose may not exceed the funding authorized in section 1517(47)(i) of this act.

Sec. 523. 2023 c 475 s 523 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR TRANSITION TO KINDERGARTEN PROGRAMS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($5,172,000))

$6,870,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($67,008,000))

$69,959,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$41,848,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($114,028,000))

$118,677,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(($5,172,000))(1) $6,720,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($67,008,000))$69,809,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $41,848,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA/GEER) are for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1550 (transition to kindergarten). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must distribute the amounts appropriated in this section for enrollment funding for transitional kindergarten programs to participating school districts, charter schools authorized pursuant to RCW 28A.710.080(2), and state-tribal education compact schools during the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years. Enrollment funding for transitional kindergarten is not part of the state's statutory program of basic education.

(2) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for staff and administrative costs necessary to provide interdepartmental coordination and engagement with stakeholders with respect to the program authorized in chapter 420, Laws of 2023 (transition to kindergarten).

(End of part)

PART VI

HIGHER EDUCATION

Sec. 601. 2023 c 475 s 605 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($918,693,000))

$920,342,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($984,293,000))

$986,321,000

Climate Commitment Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$475,000

Community/Technical College Capital Projects

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$21,368,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$164,067,000

Invest in Washington Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$92,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($300,417,000))

$302,271,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($2,388,838,000))

$2,394,936,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $33,261,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $33,261,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely as special funds for training and related support services, including financial aid, as specified in RCW 28C.04.390. Funding is provided to support at least 7,170 full-time equivalent students in fiscal year 2024 and at least 7,170 full-time equivalent students in fiscal year 2025.

(2) $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $5,450,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation are provided solely for administration and customized training contracts through the job skills program. The state board shall make an annual report by January 1st of each year to the governor and to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature under RCW 43.01.036 regarding implementation of this section, listing the scope of grant awards, the distribution of funds by educational sector and region of the state, and the results of the partnerships supported by these funds.

(3) $425,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $425,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for Seattle Central College's expansion of allied health programs.

(4) $5,250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $5,250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the student achievement initiative.

(5) $1,610,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,610,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $904,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation are provided solely for the mathematics, engineering, and science achievement program.

(6) $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for operating a fabrication composite wing incumbent worker training program to be housed at the Washington aerospace training and research center.

(7) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the aerospace center of excellence currently hosted by Everett community college to:

(a) Increase statewide communications and outreach between industry sectors, industry organizations, businesses, K-12 schools, colleges, and universities;

(b) Enhance information technology to increase business and student accessibility and use of the center's web site; and

(c) Act as the information entry point for prospective students and job seekers regarding education, training, and employment in the industry.

(8) (($23,748,000))$24,001,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($24,270,000))$24,601,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.

(9) Community and technical colleges are not required to send mass mailings of course catalogs to residents of their districts. Community and technical colleges shall consider lower cost alternatives, such as mailing postcards or brochures that direct individuals to online information and other ways of acquiring print catalogs.

(10) The state board for community and technical colleges shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

(11) $157,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $157,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Wenatchee Valley college wildfire prevention program.

(12) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Puget Sound welcome back center at Highline College to create a grant program for internationally trained individuals seeking employment in the behavioral health field in Washington state.

(13) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for increased enrollments in the integrated basic education and skills training program. Funding will support approximately 120 additional full-time equivalent enrollments annually.

(14) $216,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $216,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the opportunity center for employment and education at North Seattle College.

(15) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for Highline College to implement the Federal Way higher education initiative in partnership with the city of Federal Way and the University of Washington Tacoma campus.

(16) $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for Peninsula College to maintain the annual cohorts of the specified programs as follows:

(a) Medical assisting, 40 students;

(b) Nursing assistant, 60 students; and

(c) Registered nursing, 32 students.

(17) $338,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $338,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Washington state labor education and research center at South Seattle College.

(18) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the aerospace and advanced manufacturing center of excellence hosted by Everett Community College to develop a semiconductor and electronics manufacturing branch in Vancouver.

(19)(a) $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for a pilot program to help students, including those enrolled in state registered apprenticeship programs, connect with health care coverage. The state board for community and technical colleges must provide resources for up to two community or technical colleges, one on the east side and one on the west side of the Cascade mountains, to hire or train an employee to:

(i) Provide information to students and college staff about available health insurance options;

(ii) Develop culturally relevant materials and conduct outreach for historically marginalized and underserved student populations to assist these populations in their knowledge of access to low cost or free health insurance plans;

(iii) Provide ongoing technical assistance to students about health insurance options or the health insurance application process; and

(iv) Provide technical assistance to students as a health benefit exchange certified assister, to help students understand, shop, apply, and enroll in health insurance through Washington health planfinder.

(b) Participation in the exchange assister program is contingent on fulfilling applicable contracting, security, and other program requirements.

(c) The state board, in collaboration with the student achievement council and the health benefit exchange, must submit a report by June 30, 2024, to the appropriate committees of the legislature, pursuant to RCW 43.01.036, on information about barriers students, including those enrolled in state registered apprenticeship programs, encountered accessing health insurance coverage; and to provide recommendations on how to improve student access to health coverage based on data gathered from the pilot program.

(20) $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $75,847,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation are provided solely for statewide implementation of guided pathways at each of the state's community and technical colleges or similar programs designed to improve student success, including, but not limited to, academic program redesign, student advising, and other student supports.

(21) $15,220,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for college operating costs, including compensation and central services, in recognition that these costs exceed estimated increases in undergraduate operating fee revenue as a result of RCW 28B.15.067.

(22) $15,220,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for employee compensation, academic program enhancements, student support services, and other institutional priorities that maintain a quality academic experience for Washington students.

(23) $40,800,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to continue to fund nurse educator salaries.

(24) $40,000,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided to continue to fund high-demand program faculty salaries, including but not limited to nurse educators, other health-related professions, information technology, computer science, and trades.

(25) (($8,000,000))$9,000,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the state board for community and technical colleges to maintain high-demand and career launch enrollments, as provided under RCW 28C.30.020. Within the amounts provided in this subsection (25):

(a) (($6,000,000))$7,000,000 of the amounts in this subsection (25) are provided to maintain and grow career launch enrollments, as provided under RCW 28C.30.020. Up to three percent of this amount may be used for administration, technical assistance, and support for career launch programs within the community and technical colleges.

(b) $2,000,000 of the amounts in this subsection (25) are provided to maintain enrollments in high demand programs. These programs include, but are not limited to, allied health, computer and information science, manufacturing, and other fields identified by the state board for community and technical colleges.

(c) The state board for community and technical colleges may transfer amounts between (a) and (b) of this subsection if either program does not have sufficient demand to spend the allocated funding. Any transfer must be approved by the state board for community and technical colleges and the office of financial management.

(26) $8,000,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the emergency assistance grant program in RCW 28B.50.295.

(27) $1,119,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,119,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $4,221,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of diversity, equity, inclusion, and antiracism provisions in chapter 28B.10 RCW.

(28) $20,473,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of equity and access provisions in chapter 28B.50 RCW.

(29)(a) $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to promote workforce development in trucking and trucking-related supply chain industries and the school bus driving industry by expanding the number of registered apprenticeships, preapprenticeships, and trucking related training programs; and providing support for registered apprenticeships or programs in trucking and trucking-related supply chain industries and the school bus driving industry.

(b) Grants awarded under this subsection may be used for:

(i) Equipment upgrades or new equipment purchases for training purposes;

(ii) New training spaces and locations to support capacity needs and expansion of training to veterans and veteran spouses, and underserved populations to include foster care and homeless transition populations and previously incarcerated persons;

(iii) Faculty curriculum development and instructor training for driving, repair, and service of technological advancements facing the industries;

(iv) Tuition assistance for commercial vehicle driver and related supply chain industry training, fees associated with driver testing, and other reasonable and necessary student support services, including child care costs; and

(v) Fees and other reasonable costs associated with commercial truck driving examiner training and certification.

(c) An entity is eligible to receive a grant if it is a nonprofit, nongovernmental, or institution of primary or higher education that provides training opportunities, including apprenticeships, preapprenticeships, preemployment training, commercial vehicle driver training and testing, or vocational training related to mechanical and support functions that support the trucking industry or the school bus driving industry; or incumbent worker training to prepare workers for the trucking and trucking-related supply chain industries or the school bus driving industry. Preference will be given to entities in compliance with government approved or accredited programs. Reporting requirements, as determined by the board, shall be required.

(d) The board may use up to five percent of funds for administration of grants.

(30) $3,200,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for costs associated with grants awarded in fiscal year 2023 for nursing programs to purchase or upgrade simulation laboratory equipment.

(31)(a) $9,336,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to expand cybersecurity academic enrollments by 500 FTE students.

(b) The state board for community and technical colleges must coordinate with the student achievement council as provided in section ((612(10)))608(10) of this act to submit a progress report on the new or expanded cybersecurity academic programs, including the number of students enrolled.

(32) $410,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to establish a center for excellence in cybersecurity.

(33) $2,068,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,068,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for legal services related to litigation by employees within the community and technical college system challenging the denial of retirement and sick leave benefits. The cases include Wolf v. State and SBCTC, Rush v. State and SBCTC (retirement), and Rush v. State and SBCTC (sick leave).

(34) $4,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $4,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the opportunity grant program to provide health care workforce grants for students.

(35) $2,720,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,720,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for each community and technical college to contract with a community-based organization to assist with financial aid access and support in communities.

(36) (($6,456,000))$7,456,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the expansion of existing programming to accommodate refugees and immigrants who have arrived in Washington state on or after July 1, 2021, and are eligible for federal refugee resettlement services, including those from Afghanistan and Ukraine.

(37)(a) $2,160,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,160,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $3,600,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation are provided solely for nursing education, to increase the number of nursing slots by at least 400 new slots in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium.

(b) The state board for community and technical colleges must coordinate with the student achievement council as provided in section ((612(10)))608(10) of this act to submit a progress report on the new or expanded nursing academic programs, including the number of students enrolled per program.

(38) $200,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Bellingham Technical College maritime apprenticeship program.

(39) $2,100,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Skagit Valley College dental therapy education program.

(40) $855,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Seattle Central College for partnership with the Seattle maritime academy. Seattle Central College must enter into a memorandum of agreement with Washington state ferries. Funding may not be expended until Seattle Central College certifies to the office of financial management that a memorandum of agreement with Washington state ferries has been executed. The memorandum of agreement must address:

(A) The shared use of training and other facilities and implementation of joint training opportunities where practicable;

(B) Development of a joint recruitment plan aimed at increasing enrollment of women and people of color, with specific strategies to recruit existing community and technical college students, maritime skills center students, high school students from maritime programs, foster care graduates, and former juvenile rehabilitation and adult incarcerated individuals; and

(C) Development of a training program and recruitment plan and a five-year operational plan.

(ii) The joint training program and recruitment plan and the five-year operational plan must be submitted to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 2023.

(41) $200,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the state board for community and technical colleges to work with interested parties, such as local law enforcement agencies, the department of corrections, representatives of county or city jail facilities, the Washington state patrol, Washington community and technical colleges, and other organizations and entities as appropriate to assess the recruitment and retention challenges for their agencies and develop recommendations to meet the workforce needs. These recommendations should focus on education and training programs that meet the needs of law enforcement and corrections agencies and must include an outreach strategy designed to inform and attract students in non-traditional program pathways. The assessment and recommendations shall be provided in a report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature, pursuant to RCW 43.01.036, by October 1, 2024.

(42) $12,000,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to support the continued diversity, equity, and inclusion efforts of institutions.

(43) $331,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $331,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,360,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of state registered apprenticeship provisions in chapter 28B.124 RCW.

(44) $200,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Everett Community College parent leadership training institute to recruit and train new course instructors to build additional capacity.

(45) $19,850,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $35,024,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for compensation support.

(46) $243,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $180,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $400,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation are provided solely for Renton Technical College. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) $400,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is for the college to award full tuition and fees to students who attend the college and graduated high school in the school district where the main campus is located. Eligible students must complete a free application for federal student aid or the Washington application for state financial aid. A report on the number of students utilizing the funding must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature, pursuant to RCW 43.01.036, by January 15, 2024.

(b) $243,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $180,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are for continuing outreach and participation in running start and adult education programs, including the program described in (a) of this subsection.

(47)(a) $700,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the state board to administer a pilot program to increase career and technical education dual credit participation and credential attainment in professional technical programs. The state board, in collaboration with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, must select up to three community and technical colleges to participate in the pilot program during the 2023-24 and 2024-25 academic years. The three colleges must be located within the same educational service district and one must be located in a county with a population between 115,000 and 150,000. Colleges and school districts participating in the career and technical education dual credit grant program may utilize funding to cover the following expenses:

(i) Subsidized out-of-pocket costs to students and families for supplies, textbooks, materials, and credit transcription fees;

(ii) Outreach to prospective students and students who have completed career and technical education dual credit courses and are eligible to receive postsecondary credit to encourage participation and credit transcription;

(iii) Costs associated with staff or teacher time dedicated to curriculum alignment or the development of articulation agreements; and

(iv) Equipment and supplies for career and technical education dual credit courses required to meet postsecondary learning objectives.

(b) By December 10, 2024, the state board, in collaboration with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, must issue a preliminary report to the appropriate committees of the legislature, pursuant to RCW 43.01.036, with findings and recommendations regarding the pilot program that may be scaled statewide. The final report is due by December 10, 2025. The state board must establish a stakeholder committee that is representative of students, faculty, staff, and agency representatives to inform this work. The report must include recommendations on the following topics:

(i) Course articulation and development of model articulation agreements;

(ii) Data collection and reporting;

(iii) Credit transcription and transfer;

(iv) Student advising and career guidance supports;

(v) Alignment of career and technical education dual credit programs with credential pathways and in-demand career fields;

(vi) Funding for industry-recognized credentials;

(vii) Identification of priority courses and programs; and

(viii) Evaluation of the statewide enrollment and data system, and recommendations for improvements to or replacement of the system to reflect articulation agreement data, student data, and transcription information to support data validity, credit portability, and program improvement.

(48) $500,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for Olympic College to partner with regional high schools for college ((in))at the high school courses on-site at one or more regional high schools.

(49) $1,262,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the centers of excellence.

(50) $5,236,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1559 (postsecondary student needs). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(51) $3,718,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5702 (student homelessness pilot). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(52) (($7,470,000))$5,429,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5048 (college in high school fees). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(53) $882,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5582 (nurse supply). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(54) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the state board for community and technical colleges shall develop a plan that includes the cost to provide compensation to part-time and adjunct faculty that equals or exceeds 85 percent of the compensation provided to comparably qualified full-time and tenured faculty by the 2026-27 academic year. The plan must be submitted to the governor and the higher education committees of the legislature, in accordance with RCW 43.01.036, by July 1, 2024.

(55) $598,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the state board to move to the Jefferson building.

(56) $475,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation shall take effect January 1, 2025, and is provided solely to develop a climate solutions and climate justice curriculum at all 34 community and technical colleges.

(57) $257,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the creation of a hospitality center of excellence hosted at Columbia basin college.

(58) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely to the state board for community and technical colleges to collaborate with a nonprofit, professional association of state, county, city, and town officials engaged in development, enforcement, and administration of building construction codes and ordinances to design and implement training programs to accelerate the hiring of city and county permit technicians.

(59) $819,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5953 (incarcerated student grants). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(60) $12,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 6296 (retail industry work group). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(61) $850,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to expand the student aid outreach and completion initiative pilot program in RCW 28B.50.940 to participating community and technical colleges located within capital region educational service district 113.

(62) $1,053,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to support college in the high school program expansion resulting from passage of chapter 314, Laws of 2023 (2SSB 5048).

Sec. 602. 2023 c 475 s 606 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($521,181,000))

$523,299,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($453,529,000))

$546,621,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,646,000

Climate Commitment Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,150,000))

$3,413,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$20,000,000

Natural Climate Solutions Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$837,000

Statewide 988 Behavioral Health Crisis Response Line

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$280,000

University of Washington Building Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,546,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($39,643,000))

$39,644,000

Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,127,000

Biotoxin Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$632,000

Dedicated Cannabis Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2024)
. . . .
$351,000

Dedicated Cannabis Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2025)
. . . .
(($365,000))

$366,000

Accident Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$8,586,000

Medical Aid Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$8,025,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($89,216,000))

$88,941,000

Geoduck Aquaculture Research Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$414,000

Opioid Abatement Settlement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$250,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,152,528,000))

$1,247,978,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($49,289,000))$49,816,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($50,374,000))$51,061,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.

(2) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $100,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation are provided solely for ((labor archives of Washington. The university shall work in collaboration with the state board for community and technical colleges))one head archivist for the labor archives of Washington and reserved solely for labor archives activities, staffing, supplies, and equipment. The head will determine budget priorities and oversee expenditures on the budget. Budget funds will be reserved solely for the labor archives and shall not be used to supplant or supplement other activities of the University of Washington libraries unrelated to the collections and activities of the labor archives. The university and the head shall work in collaboration with the friends of the labor archives community advisory board.

(3) $10,000,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for the family medicine residency network at the university to maintain and expand the number of residency slots available in Washington.

(4) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in computer science and engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in computer science and engineering programs above the prior academic year.

(5) $14,000,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for the expansion of degrees in the department of computer science and engineering at the Seattle campus.

(6) $3,062,000 of the economic development strategic reserve account—state appropriation is provided solely to support the joint center for aerospace innovation technology.

(7) The University of Washington shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

(8) $7,345,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $7,345,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the continued operations and expansion of the Washington, Wyoming, Alaska, Montana, Idaho medical school program.

(9) $2,625,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,625,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the institute for stem cell and regenerative medicine. Funds appropriated in this subsection must be dedicated to research utilizing pluripotent stem cells and related research methods.

(10) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided to the University of Washington to support youth and young adults experiencing homelessness in the university district of Seattle. Funding is provided for the university to work with community service providers and university colleges and departments to plan for and implement a comprehensive one-stop center with navigation services for homeless youth; the university may contract with the department of commerce to expand services that serve homeless youth in the university district.

(11) $1,200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,200,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation are provided solely for the adult psychiatry residency program at the University of Washington to offer additional residency positions that are approved by the accreditation council for graduate medical education.

(12) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the University of Washington's psychiatry integrated care training program.

(13) $427,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $427,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $426,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation are provided solely for child and adolescent psychiatry residency positions that are approved by the accreditation council for graduate medical education, as provided in RCW 28B.20.445.

(14) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the University of Washington School of Dentistry to support its role as a major oral health provider to individuals covered by medicaid and the uninsured.

(15) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the pre-law pipeline and social justice program at the University of Washington-Tacoma.

(16) $226,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $226,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the university's neurology department to create a telemedicine program to disseminate dementia care best practices to primary care practitioners using the project ECHO model. The program shall provide a virtual connection for providers and content experts and include didactics, case conferences, and an emphasis on practice transformation and systems-level issues that affect care delivery. The initial users of this program shall include referral sources in health care systems and clinics, such as the university's neighborhood clinics and Virginia Mason Memorial in Yakima with a goal of adding 15 to 20 providers from smaller clinics and practices per year.

(17) $102,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $102,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $350,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation are provided solely for the university's center for international trade in forest products.

(18) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $500,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation are provided solely for the Latino center for health.

(19) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a firearm policy research program. The program will:

(a) Support investigations of firearm death and injury risk factors;

(b) Evaluate the effectiveness of state firearm laws and policies;

(c) Assess the consequences of firearm violence; and

(d) Develop strategies to reduce the toll of firearm violence to citizens of the state.

(20) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the climate impacts group in the college of the environment.

(21) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the college of education to collaborate with teacher preparation programs and the office of the superintendent of public instruction to develop open access climate science educational curriculum for use in teacher preparation programs.

(22) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $300,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation are provided solely for the Harry Bridges center for labor studies. The center shall work in collaboration with the state board for community and technical colleges.

(23) $8,000,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for employee compensation, academic program enhancements, student support services, and other institutional priorities that maintain a quality academic experience for Washington students.

(24) $8,000,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to maintain degree production in the college of engineering at the Seattle campus.

(25)(a) $2,724,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to maintain the Washington state academic redshirt program on the Seattle campus and establish a program on the Bothell campus.

(b) The university must provide a report on the redshirt program at the Seattle and Bothell campuses, including, but not limited to, the following:

(i) The number of students who have enrolled in the program and the number of students by cohort;

(ii) The number of students who have completed the program and the number of students by cohort;

(iii) The placements of students by academic major;

(iv) The number of students placed in first-choice majors;

(v) The number of underrepresented minority students in the program;

(vi) The number of first-generation college students in the program;

(vii) The number of Washington college grant eligible or Pell grant eligible students in the program;

(viii) The number of Washington state opportunity scholarship recipients in the program;

(ix) The number of students who completed the program and graduated with a science, technology, engineering, or math related degree and the number of graduates by cohort; and

(x) Other program outcomes.

(c) A preliminary report is due to the appropriate committees of the legislature, pursuant to RCW 43.01.036, by December 1, 2023, and a final report is due December 1, 2024.

(26) $2,700,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to maintain degree capacity and undergraduate enrollments in engineering, mathematics, and science programs to support the biomedical innovation partnership zone at the Bothell campus.

(27) $3,268,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to maintain bachelor of science programs in mechanical and civil engineering to support increased student and local employer demand for graduates in these fields at the Tacoma campus.

(28) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $700,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation are provided solely for Washington mathematics, engineering, science achievement programs to provide enrichment opportunities in mathematics, engineering, science, and technology to students who are traditionally underrepresented in these programs. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $500,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is for Washington State University to plan and implement expansion of MESA activities at the Everett campus to facilitate increased attendance and degree completion by students who are underrepresented in science, technology, engineering, and mathematics degrees.

(29) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a community care coordinator for transitional-age youth for the doorway project in partnership with the Seattle campus.

(30) $14,000,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the expansion of the Paul G. Allen school of computer science and engineering in order to award an additional 200 degrees per year focusing on traditionally underrepresented students. A report on the program graduation rates, waitlist for entry into the program, time to degree completion, and degrees awarded must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature, pursuant to RCW 43.01.036, by June 30, 2024, and June 30, 2025.

(31) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to expand a series of online courses related to behavioral health and student well-being that are currently offered at the Bothell campus for school district staff. The standards for the courses must be consistent with knowledge, skill, and performance standards related to mental health and well-being of public school students. The online courses must provide:

(a) Foundational knowledge in behavioral health, mental health, and mental illness;

(b) Information on how to assess, intervene upon, and refer behavioral health and intersection of behavioral health and substance use issues; and

(c) Approaches to promote health and positively influence student health behaviors.

(32) To ensure transparency and accountability, in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium the University of Washington shall comply with any and all financial and accountability audits by the Washington state auditor including any and all audits of university services offered to the general public, including those offered through any public-private partnership, business venture, affiliation, or joint venture with a public or private entity, except the government of the United States. The university shall comply with all state auditor requests for the university's financial and business information including the university's governance and financial participation in these public-private partnerships, business ventures, affiliations, or joint ventures with a public or private entity. In any instance in which the university declines to produce the information to the state auditor, the university will provide the state auditor a brief summary of the documents withheld and a citation of the legal or contractual provision that prevents disclosure. The summaries must be compiled into a report by the state auditor and provided on a quarterly basis to the legislature.

(33) $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Burke museum of natural history and culture to make education programs offered by the museum accessible to more students across Washington, especially students in underserved schools and locations. The funding shall be used for:

(a) Increasing the number of students who participate in Burke education programs at reduced or no cost, including virtual programs;

(b) Providing bus reimbursement for students visiting the museum on field trips and to support travel to bring museum programs across the state;

(c) Staff who will form partnerships with school districts to serve statewide communities more efficiently and equitably, including through the Burkemobile program; and

(d) Support of tribal consultation work, including expanding Native programming, and digitization of Native collections.

(34) $410,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $410,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the university's center for human rights. The appropriation must be used to supplement, not supplant, other funding sources for the center for human rights.

(35) $143,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $143,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to the University of Washington for the establishment and operation of the state forensic anthropologist. The university shall work in conjunction with and provide the full funding directly to the King county medical examiner's office to support the statewide work of the state forensic anthropologist.

(36) $64,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $64,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for one full-time mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW who has experience and training specifically related to working with active members of the military or military veterans.

(37) $443,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($443,000))$750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the operation of the center for environmental forensic science.

(38) $1,250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation are provided solely for the community-engagement test to facilitate clean energy transitions by partnering with communities, utilities, and project developers.

(39) $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for staffing and operational expenditures related to the battery fabrication testbed.

(40) $505,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $505,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for pharmacy behavioral health. The University of Washington school of pharmacy/medicine pharmacy services will hire two residency training positions and one behavioral health faculty to create a residency program focused on behavioral health.

(41) $1,242,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,242,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $742,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation are provided solely for an increase in the number of nursing slots and graduates in the already established accelerated bachelor of science in nursing program. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $273,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $273,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Tacoma school of nursing and healthcare leadership.

(42) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($100,000))$150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the memory and brain wellness center to support the statewide expansion of the dementia friends program.

(43) $77,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $77,000 of the general fund—state appropriation are provided solely to maintain a data repository to assist the state and all political subdivisions with evaluating whether and to what extent existing laws and practices with respect to voting and elections are consistent with public policy, implementing best practices in voting and elections, and to investigate potential infringements upon the right to vote.

(44) $122,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $122,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for sexual assault nurse examiner training.

(45) (($143,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $143,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to the University of Washington for the operation of the state forensic anthropologist. The university shall work in conjunction with and provide the full funding directly to the King county medical examiner's office to support the statewide work of the state forensic anthropologist.

(46))) Within existing resources, the institution must resume a mentoring, organization, and social support for autism inclusion on campus program. The program must focus on academic coaching, peer-mentoring, support for social interactions, and career preparation.

(((47)))(46) $6,532,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $11,108,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for compensation support.

(((48)))(47) $712,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $4,183,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the behavioral health teaching faculty physician and facility support.

(((49)))(48) $1,869,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,738,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for operations and maintenance support of the behavioral health teaching faculty.

(((50)))(49) $1,000,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the center for indigenous health to increase the number of American Indian and Alaska Native physicians practicing in the state of Washington.

(((51)))(50) $484,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to the university for Friday harbor labs in the amount of $125,000 each fiscal year and the school of aquatic and fishery sciences in the amount of $117,000 each fiscal year to perform coordinating, monitoring, and research related to Puget Sound kelp conservation and recovery.

(((52)))(51) $200,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to develop a framework for research to help determine inequities in poverty, access to service, language, barriers, and access to justice for individuals of Middle Eastern descent.

(((53)))(52) $3,000,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the development of an energy transformation strategy to modernize the energy infrastructure and better align the institution's sustainability values at the Seattle campus.

(((54)))(53) $2,854,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for increasing enrollments in computing and engineering programs at the Tacoma campus.

(((55)))(54)(a) $800,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the colab for community and behavioral health policy to collaborate with ((the Latino center for health and)) allies in healthier systems for health and abundance in youth to pilot test a culturally responsive training curricula for an expanded children's mental health workforce in community behavioral health sites. Community and lived experience stakeholders, representing communities of color, must make up over half of the project team. The pilot implementation shall include expansion of:

(i) The clinical training of both a lived experience workforce and licensed workforce to provide culturally responsive and evidence-informed mental health services focused on families, children, and youth;

(ii) An implementation plan that allows for local flexibility and local community input; and

(iii) An evaluation plan that will yield information about the potential success in implementation statewide and the improved experiences of those seeking mental health services.

(b) The project team must report its findings and recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature in compliance with RCW 43.01.036 by June 30, 2025.

(((56)))(55) $520,000 of the natural climate solutions account—state appropriation is provided solely for the biological response to ocean acidification to advance high-priority biological experiments to better understand the relationship between marine organisms and ocean acidification.

(((57)))(56) $300,000 of the natural climate solutions account—state appropriation is provided solely for monitoring assistance at the Washington ocean acidification center.

(((58)))(57) $104,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $104,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the continued implementation of chapter 191, Laws of 2022 (veterans & military suicide).

(((59)))(58) $426,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the continued implementation of RCW 49.60.525 (racial restrictions/review).

(((60)))(59) $205,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely to organize and facilitate the difficult to discharge task force described in section ((135(12)))132(12) of this act and its operations, including any associated ad hoc subgroups through October 31, 2023.

(((61)))(60) $500,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the addictions, drug and alcohol institute to continue cannabis and public health impact research. Funding may be used to develop resources regarding the connection between first episode psychosis and cannabis use.

(((62)))(61) $2,224,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for program support and student scholarships for the expansion of the master of arts in applied child and adolescent psychology program. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) $1,116,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for program support at the Seattle site.

(b) $1,108,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for student scholarships at the Seattle site.

(((63)))(62) $800,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the development and implementation of a program to support pathways from prison to the university's Tacoma campus. The university shall collaborate with formerly incarcerated women, Tacoma Community College, the freedom education project Puget Sound, the women's village, the state board for community and technical colleges, and the department of corrections, in development and implementation of the pathways program.

(((64) $250,000))(63) $580,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the ((startup program))Allen school scholars program.

(((65)))(64) $1,397,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for increased student support services at the Tacoma campus.

(((66)))(65) $158,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $158,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $798,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation are provided solely for continued implementation of diversity, equity, inclusion, and antiracism professional development for faculty and staff, student training, and campus climate assessments in chapter 28B.10 RCW.

(((67)))(66) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 are provided solely for the college of education to partner with the Chehalis and Spokane school districts to continue the math improvement pilot program.

(((68)))(67) $300,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for support and promotion of a long-term care nursing residency program and externship.

(((69)))(68) $400,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for nanocellulose based research to produce a replacement for cellophane and clear plastic products with one made with plant materials that is biodegradable.

(((70)))(69) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to the University of Washington for the operation of a pilot plant to produce nanocellulose based materials for evaluation by potential users, such as packaging manufacturers and companies that produce polylactic acid composites.

(((71)))(70) $1,238,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to establish washpop, a statewide integrated data repository for population and policy research on topics, including criminal justice and safety, economic prosperity and equity, and health and social well-being.

(((72)))(71) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for continuation of the collaborative for the advancement of telemedicine, hosted by the institution's telehealth services.

(((73)))(72) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the center for health workforce studies to continue a program to track dental workforce trends, needs, and enhancements to better serve the increasing population and demand for access to adequate oral health care. The center shall continue the program in consultation with dental stakeholders including, but not limited to, provider associations and oral health philanthropic leaders. The workforce reporting program is to be considered a public-private partnership. The institutions may accept matching funds from interested stakeholders to help facilitate and administer the workforce reporting program. Information generated by the dental workforce reporting program shall be made available on the center's website in a deidentified, aggregate format.

(((74)))(73) $200,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for planning student studios to assist cities and counties with planning projects. Assistance shall focus on students and supporting faculty to facilitate on-site learning with cities and counties.

(((75)))(74) The institution must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and section 302(13) of this act.

(((76)))(75) $440,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1559 (postsecondary student needs). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(77)))(76) $686,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $669,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1745 (diversity clinical trials). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(78)))(77) $150,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1181 (climate change/planning). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(79)))(78) $208,000 of the statewide 988 behavioral health crisis response account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1134 (988 system). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(80) $3,288,000))(79) $2,053,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5048 (college in high school fees). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(81)))(80) $157,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5189 (behavioral health support). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(82)))(81) $7,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for support of staff, training, and other costs necessary to facilitate the opening of the behavioral health teaching facility.

(((83)))(82) $450,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to continue financial student assistance in public service oriented graduate and professional degree programs, referred to as "fee-based" programs, whose tuition for public service degrees is over $18,000 per year. Programs shall create mechanisms to prioritize assistance to traditionally underrepresented students, specifically those who have expressed a commitment to service in the physician assistant, community oriented public health, or social work programs. The institution may offer financial assistance for students that volunteer or work with public health agencies, including as contact tracers.

(((84)))(83) $1,100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a pilot program for short-term stabilization and transition support for individuals incompetent to stand trial due to intellectual or developmental disability as provided in Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5440 (competency evaluations). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(85)))(84) $1,464,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5263 (psilocybin). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(86)))(85) $2,000,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1715 (domestic violence). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(87)))(86) $80,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $65,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $20,000,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to support the operations and teaching mission of the University of Washington medical center and harborview medical center.

(87) $239,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of chapter 232, Laws of 2023 (alternative jet fuel).

(88) $263,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation shall take effect January 1, 2025, and is provided solely for two grant writers to offer technical assistance to tribal and community groups in the thriving communities technical assistance program.

(89) $20,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely to support behavioral health care and training at the University of Washington medical center. A report detailing how these funds and any federal funds are expended for the medical center shall be submitted to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature, pursuant to RCW 43.01.036, by June 30, 2025.

(90) $2,505,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the expansion of the University of Washington school of dentistry regional initiatives in dental education (RIDE) program.

(91) $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the University of Washington to establish a pilot program to support activities related to cooperation with academic institutions and governmental and public agencies of the Republic of Finland, the Kingdom of Sweden, and the Kingdom of Norway. Eligible activities include, but are not limited to, cooperation in clean energy, clean technology, clean transportation, telecommunications, agriculture and wood science technology, general economic development, and other areas of mutual interest with Nordic nations and institutions.

(92) $180,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely to support project planning and management, soccer field renovation, and LED lighting upgrades to prepare for the 2026 World Cup hosted by Seattle.

(93) $412,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely to develop and implement the Washington reproductive access alliance, so the public hospital districts under

chapter 70.44 RCW can provide substantially equivalent services under the reproductive privacy act under chapter 9.02 RCW. The alliance will provide a service coordination website and phone line, administrative support and coordination of the alliance, patient care coordination, and social support for patient travel.

(94) $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5890 (ballot rejection). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(95) $4,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $4,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 6166 (pesticide application comm). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(96) $264,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 6308 (988 system timeline). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(97) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the behavioral health institute at Harborview medical center and the University of Washington school of medicine, in consultation with the office of financial management, to develop recommendations considering multiple different long-term uses of up to 40 residential treatment facility licensed beds located at the Olympic heritage behavioral health facility. The recommendations shall include estimated costs and required staffing for each of the options presented and an assessment of the current landscape of inpatient and outpatient behavioral health care services in the region to determine community needs. Options for use may include care and treatment for: (i) Patients with co-occurring diagnoses of mental health and substance use disorders; (ii) individuals with developmental disabilities, dementia and traumatic brain injury; and (iii) individuals in need of intensive mental health treatment, including partial hospitalization and intensive outpatient care. The recommendations shall be provided to the appropriate committees of the legislature, pursuant to RCW 43.01.036, by December 1, 2024.

(98) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5837 (state elections database). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(99) $267,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6125 (Lakeland village records). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(100) $148,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6286 (nurse anesthetist workforce). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(101) $630,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to support college in the high school program expansion resulting from passage of chapter 314, Laws of 2023 (2SSB 5048).

(102) $250,000 of the opioid abatement settlement account—state appropriation is provided solely for the University of Washington center for novel therapeutics in addiction psychiatry for an initial study of ibogaine assisted therapy.

Sec. 603. 2023 c 475 s 607 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($277,544,000))

$282,381,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($286,975,000))

$290,755,000

Climate Commitment Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$8,321,000

Washington State University Building Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$792,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$33,995,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,771,000

Dedicated Cannabis Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2024)
. . . .
$189,000

Dedicated Cannabis Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2025)
. . . .
$197,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$48,117,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($658,901,000))

$667,518,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a rural economic development and outreach coordinator.

(2) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in computer science and engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in computer science and engineering programs above the prior academic year.

(3) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for state match requirements related to the federal aviation administration grant.

(4) Washington State University shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletic programs.

(5) $7,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $7,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $22,800,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation are provided solely for the continued development and operations of a medical school program in Spokane.

(6) $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a honey bee biology research position.

(7) (($35,037,000))$35,411,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($35,808,000))$36,296,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.

(8) $580,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $580,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the development of an organic agriculture systems degree program located at the university center in Everett.

(9) $630,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $630,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the creation of an electrical engineering program located in Bremerton. At full implementation, the university is expected to increase degree production by 25 new bachelor's degrees per year. The university must identify these students separately when providing data to the education research data center as required in subsection (2) of this section.

(10) $1,370,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,370,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the creation of software engineering and data analytic programs at the university center in Everett. At full implementation, the university is expected to enroll 50 students per academic year. The university must identify these students separately when providing data to the education research data center as required in subsection (2) of this section.

(11) General fund—state appropriations in this section are reduced to reflect a reduction in state-supported tuition waivers for graduate students. When reducing tuition waivers, the university will not change its practices and procedures for providing eligible veterans with tuition waivers.

(12) $1,154,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,154,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for RCW 82.16.120 and 82.16.165 (renewable energy, tax incentives).

(13) $376,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $376,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for RCW 28B.30.357 (children's mental health).

(14) $585,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $585,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for RCW 77.12.272 (elk hoof disease).

(15) $2,076,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for the university's soil health initiative and its network of long-term agroecological research and extension (LTARE) sites. The network must include a Mount Vernon REC site.

(16) $42,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $42,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for one full-time mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW who has experience and training specifically related to working with active members of the military or military veterans.

(17) $33,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $33,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for compensation funding for Western Washington University employees that work on the Washington State University Everett campus.

(18) $327,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $327,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for pharmacy behavioral health. Washington State University college of pharmacy and pharmaceutical sciences will hire two residency training positions and one behavioral health faculty to create a residency program focused on behavioral health.

(19) $1,921,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,526,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for compensation support.

(20) $608,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $608,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the Washington state academy of sciences to provide support for core operations and to accomplish its mission of providing science in the service of Washington, pursuant to its memorandum of understanding with the university.

(21) $188,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $188,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for stormwater research to study the long-term efficacy of green stormwater infrastructure that incorporates compost to remove pollutants.

(22) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the joint center for deployment and research in earth abundant materials.

(23) $4,112,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to establish a bachelor's degree in cybersecurity operations.

(24) $568,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $568,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 212, Laws of 2022 (community solar projects).

(25) $7,721,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the creation of the institute for northwest energy futures.

(26) $3,910,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for increasing nursing salaries at the institution.

(27) $476,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for nursing program equipment.

(28) $2,521,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the establishment of a bachelor of science in public health degree at the Pullman, Spokane, and Vancouver campuses.

(29) $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for increasing the base funding for the William D. Ruckleshaus Center.

(30) (($200,000))$50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 ((is))and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for Washington State University extension service to hire a qualified contractor to assess program performance of the northeast Washington wolf-livestock management grant program as provided in RCW 16.76.020 and recipients of pass-through grants from the northeast Washington wolf-livestock management nonappropriated account. The program must be assessed for the period of 2021-2023 as to whether grant recipients met the intent of the appropriation.

(a) For recipients of grant funds from the program authorized in RCW 16.76.020, performance must be evaluated on the deployment of nonlethal deterrence, specifically with the goal to reduce the likelihood of cattle being injured or killed by wolves by deploying proactive, preventative methods that have a good probability of producing effective results. Grantees who use funds for range riders or herd monitoring must deploy this tool in a manner so that targeted areas with cattle are visited daily or near daily. Grantees must collaborate with other entities providing prevention efforts resulting in coordinated wolf-livestock conflict deterrence efforts, both temporally and spatially, therefore providing well timed and placed preventative coverage on the landscape.

(b) For recipient of the pass-through funds from the northeast Washington wolf-livestock management nonappropriated account, performance must be based on the intent of conducting proactive deterrence activities with the goal to reduce the likelihood of cattle being injured or killed by wolves.

(c) The contractor must have at least five years of experience in the combination of field work as a range rider and running range riding programs in areas with wolf-livestock conflict in the western United States. In conducting the assessment, the contractor may access written range rider logs and georeferenced data produced by the grant recipients, in addition to reading annual reports of the recipients and interviewing relevant participants. The contractor may also provide general recommendations for improvement of programs intended to provide effective wolf-livestock deterrence, taking into account the terrain and other challenges faced in northeast Washington. The contractor must complete their assessment for Washington State University extension service to be delivered to the legislature, pursuant to RCW 43.01.036, by ((June 30, 2024))December 1, 2024.

(31) $500,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the energy program for residential energy code education and support, including training, hotline support to the building industry, and information material and web resources.

(32) $695,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for turf grass resilience research in high traffic areas.

(33)(((a))) $95,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year ((2025 is))2024 and $215,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the William D. Ruckelshaus center to ((conduct a jail modernization task force convening assessment and design a facilitated collaborative process and work plan for))support the jail modernization task force created in section 915 ((of this act)), chapter 475, Laws of 2023.

(a) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $95,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the center to conduct a jail modernization task force convening assessment and design a facilitated collaborative process and work plan for the jail modernization task force created in section 915, chapter 475, Laws of 2023.

(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $215,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the center to provide staff support, facilitation, and development of the task force's initial report of findings and recommendations described in section 915, chapter 475, Laws of 2023.

(c) The convening assessment shall include, but not be limited to:

(i) Gathering and reviewing additional background information relevant to the project;

(ii) Meeting and consulting with the Washington state association of counties to gather background on issues, confirm the list of members to interview, and provide updates throughout the duration of the work; and meeting and consulting with the Washington state institute for public policy to coordinate, inform, and share information and findings gathered; and

(iii) Setting up individual conversations with task force members, and others as needed, to assess their goals, expectations, interests, and desired outcomes for the task force. The purpose of these conversations will also be to gather insights and perspectives from members about, but not limited to, the following:

(A) What key components and issues should be included in a statewide jail modernization plan, what existing facilities are in need of upgrades or remodel, and any need for building new facilities;

(B) Identifying any additional key stakeholders;

(C) Employee retention issues and potential solutions;

(D) The impact of overtime, jail atmosphere, emergency response time, inexperienced corrections officers, and how to overcome these challenges;

(E) The type of and design of facilities needed to house those with behavioral health needs and associated costs of these facilities;

(F) Available diversion programs and their costs;

(G) Types of existing behavioral health facilities for those involved in the criminal justice system, the costs of building and running these facilities, how these facilities vary by location, the viability of offering facilities in every county, and potential system improvements to the types of services and supports offered and delivered to those with behavioral health needs;

(H) The types of services and supports provided to those exiting the jail system; and

(I) Reforms necessary to create and enhance a seamless transition back to the community following jail confinement.

(((b)))(d) Center staff will provide a convening assessment report that will include the overall process design and work plan for the task force by June 30, ((2025))2024.

(34) $1,596,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the creation of a bachelor's and master's degree in social work at the Tri-Cities campus.

(35) The institution must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and section 302(13) of this act.

(36) $372,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1559 (postsecondary student needs). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(37) $77,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1390 (district energy systems). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(38) $600,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1216 (clean energy siting), for a least-conflict pumped storage siting project. ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(39) $125,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5287 (wind turbine blades). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(40)(a) $1,200,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the development and implementation of a Native American scholarship program during the 2023-2025 biennium. Of the amounts in this subsection, no more than $100,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $100,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 may be spent on administration; development of the program; support services for students; outreach regarding the program; and technical support for application.

(b) "Eligible student" means a member of a federally recognized Indian tribe located within Washington who files a free application for federal student aid (FAFSA) and enrolls in an undergraduate degree program. Eligible students need to maintain satisfactory academic progress during the 2023-2025 biennium to remain eligible for the scholarship. The institution shall determine award priorities based on tribal consultation. Awards must be distributed to students no later than May of each fiscal year.

(c) The institution must submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature, pursuant to RCW 43.01.036, by June 30, 2025. The report must include: The number of eligible students; the number of students who receive a scholarship; how recipients were determined; and how many members of federally recognized Indian tribes in Washington received scholarships versus members of federally recognized Indian tribes from other states.

(41) $44,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $49,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1745 (diversity in clinical trials). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(42) $2,425,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the development and operations of a journalism fellowship program focused on civic affairs.

(43) $70,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $70,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5447 (alternative jet fuel). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(44) $4,271,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,573,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to purchase the obligated amount of carbon emission allowances.

(45) $190,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely to continue the statewide broadband coordinator position in the Washington State University extension program.

(46) $1,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 6166 (pesticide application comm). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 604. 2023 c 475 s 608 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($65,367,000))

$65,677,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($67,576,000))

$67,933,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$16,838,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($24,730,000))

$24,889,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($174,511,000))

$175,337,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) At least $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and at least $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 must be expended on the Northwest autism center.

(2) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in computer science and engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in computer science and engineering programs above the prior academic year.

(3) Eastern Washington University shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

(4) (($12,586,000))$12,720,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($12,862,000))$13,038,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.

(5) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the university is encouraged to increase the number of tenure-track positions created and hired.

(6) $2,274,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for institution operating costs, including compensation and central services, in recognition that these costs exceed estimated increases in undergraduate operating fee revenue as a result of RCW 28B.15.067.

(7) $2,636,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to maintain a computer engineering degree program in the college of science, technology, engineering, and math.

(8) $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for one full-time mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW who has experience and training specifically related to working with active members of the military or military veterans.

(9) $300,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to establish a center for inclusive excellence for faculty and staff.

(10) $536,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for a professional masters of science cyber operations degree option.

(11) $2,144,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the operation of a bachelor of science in cybersecurity degree option through the computer science program.

(12) $2,108,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the operation of a coordinated care network that will help to maximize the collaboration of various student support services to create wraparound care for students to address obstacles to degree completion. The amount provided in this subsection must be used to supplement, not supplant, other funding sources for the program.

(13) $532,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $940,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for compensation support.

(14) $4,598,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to expand faculty and staff to create a cohort of 80 students in the bachelor of nursing program.

(15) $476,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the continued implementation of RCW 49.60.525 (racial restrictions/review).

(16) $110,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $110,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a summer bridge program.

(17) (($500,000))$1,020,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the establishment and operating support of a university mathematics, engineering, and science achievement program.

(18) $200,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for planning student studios to assist cities and counties with planning projects. Assistance shall focus on students and supporting faculty to facilitate on-site learning with cities and counties.

(19) $118,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1559 (postsecondary student needs). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(20) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1028 (crime victims and witnesses). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(21) (($5,000,000))$3,977,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5048 (college in high school fees). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(22) $18,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $18,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5238 (academic employee bargaining). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(23) $127,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to develop the postbaccalaureate dental therapy certificate in the college of health science and public health.

(24) $535,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to support college in high school program expansion resulting from passage of chapter 314, Laws of 2023 (2SSB 5048).

Sec. 605. 2023 c 475 s 609 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($68,760,000))

$68,916,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($71,733,000))

$72,016,000

Central Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$76,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$19,076,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($16,537,000))

$15,793,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($176,182,000))

$175,877,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in engineering programs above the prior academic year.

(2) Central Washington University shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

(3) (($14,186,000))$14,337,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($14,498,000))$14,696,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.

(4) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the university is encouraged to increase the number of tenure-track positions created and hired.

(5) $2,236,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for institution operating costs, including compensation and central services, in recognition that these costs exceed estimated increases in undergraduate operating fee revenue as a result of RCW 28B.15.067.

(6) $1,050,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to increase the number of certified K-12 teachers.

(7) $736,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to maintain mental health counseling positions.

(8) $240,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $240,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for two counselor positions to increase access to mental health counseling for traditionally underrepresented students.

(9) $52,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $52,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for one full-time mental health outreach and service coordination position who has knowledge of issues relevant to veterans.

(10) $240,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for expanding cybersecurity capacity by adding additional faculty resources in the department of computer science.

(11) $586,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for a peer mentoring program. The amount provided in this subsection must be used to supplement, not supplant, other funding sources for the program.

(12) $286,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the operation of an extended orientation program to help promote retention of underserved students. The amount provided in this subsection must be used to supplement, not supplant, other funding sources for the program.

(13) $12,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $12,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the cost of the criminal justice training center's use of office and classroom space at the Lynnwood campus.

(14) $592,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,091,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for compensation support.

(15) $1,406,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for student success. Students will receive discipline specific tutoring programs, peer assisted learning sessions, and academic success coaching.

(16) $967,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for grow your own teacher residency programs in high need areas of elementary, bilingual, special education, and English language learners.

(17) $844,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for dual language expansion programs in Yakima and Des Moines.

(18) $126,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1559 (postsecondary student needs). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(19) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1028 (crime victims and witnesses). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(20) $57,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1390 (district energy systems). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(21) (($8,060,000))$5,709,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5048 (college in high school fees). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(22) $18,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $18,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5238 (academic employee bargaining). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(23) $398,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to support two financial aid coaching specialists, the university food pantry, including a coordinator, and an assistant director and advocate to support students who have experienced sexual violence.

(24) Appropriations in this section are sufficient to implement provisions of the collective bargaining agreement that go into effect on or after July 1, 2024, between Central Washington University and the campus police officers and sergeants negotiated under chapter 41.80 RCW and as set forth in part IX of this act.

(25) $1,209,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to support college in the high school program expansion resulting from passage of chapter 314, Laws of 2023 (2SSB 5048).

Sec. 606. 2023 c 475 s 610 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($39,088,000))

$38,787,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($38,499,000))

$39,454,000

The Evergreen State College Capital Projects

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$80,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$5,450,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($5,554,000))

$6,347,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($88,671,000))

$90,118,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($4,315,000))$4,361,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($4,410,000))$4,470,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.

(2) Funding provided in this section is sufficient for The Evergreen State College to continue operations of the Longhouse Center and the Northwest Indian applied research institute.

(3) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the college is encouraged to increase the number of tenure-track positions created and hired.

(4) (($4,063,000))$3,715,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($2,732,000))$3,583,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Washington state institute for public policy to initiate, sponsor, conduct, and publish research that is directly useful to policymakers and manage reviews and evaluations of technical and scientific topics as they relate to major long-term issues facing the state. Within the amounts provided in this subsection (4):

(a) $1,665,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2024 and $1,685,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2025 are provided for administration and core operations.

(b) (($1,229,000))$1,069,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2024 and (($529,000))$709,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for ongoing and continuing studies on the Washington state institute for public policy's work plan.

(c) (($202,000))$142,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2024 and (($80,000))$140,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Washington state institute for public policy to update its adult corrections inventory of evidence-based, research-based, and promising programs and expand the inventory to include new programs that were not included in the last published Washington state institute for public policy inventory in 2018. This update must focus on programs for incarcerated individuals in prison facilities to include family and relationships programs, learning and working programs, and therapeutic and support programs. The institute should prioritize the addition of programs currently offered by the Washington state department of corrections. Of this amount:

(i) No later than ((December 31, 2023))June 30, 2024, the institute shall publish a preliminary report identifying the list of programs currently offered in Washington state department of corrections prison facilities and the list of new programs to be analyzed for inclusion on the updated adult corrections inventory. The preliminary report must include an indication of whether the Washington state department of corrections programs have ever been evaluated for their effect on recidivism; and

(ii) No later than December 31, 2024, the institute shall publish a final report with the updated adult corrections inventory classifying programs as evidence-based, research-based, or promising programs. The report shall include a list of programs currently offered in Washington state department of corrections prison facilities and a determination of their likely effectiveness in reducing recidivism based on the results of the adult corrections inventory.

(d)(i) $154,000 of the amount for fiscal year ((2024))2025 is provided solely for the institute to examine the costs associated with conservation district elections under current law, and the projected costs and benefits for shifting conservation district election to be held on general election ballots under Title 29A RCW. The examination must include, to the extent that the data allows:

(A) An analysis of the amount of money that each conservation district spends on holding elections for supervisors under current law, and a description of the funding sources that each conservation district utilizes to fund its elections;

(B) Information about voter turnout in each conservation district supervisor election in at least the past six years and up to the past 20 years, if the conservation district has such data, as well as a calculation of the total cost per ballot cast that each conservation district spent in those elections;

(C) A projection of the costs that would be expected to be incurred by each county and each conservation district for its supervisor elections if the district were to hold its supervisor elections on general election ballots under the processes and procedures in Title 29A RCW, including:

(I) Switching all supervisor positions to elected positions; and

(II) Changing term lengths to four years, with terms staggered such that elections are held every two years, to align with the elections for other local government officials;

(D) A projection of the costs that would be expected to be incurred by each county and each conservation district for its supervisor elections if, in addition to the changes described in (d)(i)(C) of this subsection, the conservation districts were divided into zones such that each zone is represented by a single supervisor, rather than electing each supervisor at-large throughout the district; and

(E) An overall description of potential nonmonetary costs and benefits associated with switching conservation district supervisor elections to the general election ballots under Title 29A RCW and incorporating the changes described in (d)(i) (C) and (D) of this subsection.

(ii) A preliminary report which contains any available information to date must be completed by December 1, ((2023))2024. A final report must be completed by June 30, ((2024))2025, and submitted in accordance with RCW 43.01.036 to the standing committees of the house of representatives and the senate with jurisdiction over elections and conservation district issues.

(e) $100,000 of the amounts for fiscal year 2024 and $100,000 of the amounts for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the institute to conduct a review of all assessments and charges imposed on individuals incarcerated in department of corrections facilities and their family members and its effect on the financial status of incarcerated individuals. The review must include, at a minimum:

(i) An evaluation of all costs incurred by incarcerated individuals for items that include but are not limited to:

(A) Food;

(B) Commissary items;

(C) Personal hygiene items;

(D) Electronic devices and services, tablets, digital stamps, and downloadable media and services such as music, movies, and other programs;

(E) Stationary, mail, and postage;

(F) Communication devices such as telephones, local and nonlocal telephone services, and video chat services;

(G) Clothing and shoes;

(H) Copayments for medical, dental, and optometry visits, care, and medication;

(I) Eyeglasses;

(J) Gym, television services, and any other recreational activities;

(K) Educational and vocational classes, programming, and related materials; and

(L) Any and all items and services charged to incarcerated persons under RCW 72.09.450 and 72.09.470 including, but not limited to, a complete list of any other item that an individual was or could have been charged for while incarcerated;

(ii) A complete itemized list of: (A) All items in (e)(i) of this subsection; (B) the cost of each item and service purchased by the department or negotiated with a vendor in (e)(i) of this subsection; (C) the resale or purchased price charged to incarcerated individuals and their family members for the same items in (e)(i) of this subsection; (D) the revenue or profit retained or reinvested by the department for each individual item in (e)(i) of this subsection; (E) the cost of items and services listed in (e)(i) of this subsection compared to comparable items and services that are not provided through correctional industries; and (F) an assessment of the prices charged for the items and services listed in (e)(i) of this subsection as compared to comparable items and services provided by other companies and vendors that do not service prisons;

(iii) A complete list of all items including, but not limited to, clothing and personal hygiene items, that are distributed monthly free of charge: (A) To all incarcerated individuals irrespective of their financial status; and (B) solely to indigent inmates as defined in RCW 72.09.015 provided the individual remains in indigent status during his or her period of incarceration;

(iv) The average annual debt incurred by an individual while incarcerated. This includes debt solely recorded and posted by the department for debt incurred between the individual's first day of confinement within the department of corrections through the individual's day of release from incarceration from prison;

(v) The average debt owed by incarcerated individuals to the department for items and services under (e)(i) of this subsection upon release from confinement;

(vi) The average amount paid by incarcerated individuals to the department for items and services under (e)(i) of this subsection during their period of confinement;

(vii) A list of the: (A) Required deductions from wages and gratuities earned pursuant to RCW 72.09.100 through 72.09.111; (B) required deductions from the funds received, by the department on behalf of an incarcerated person from outside sources, in addition to an incarcerated individual's wages or gratuities pursuant to RCW 72.09.480; and (C) wages and gratuities earned by an incarcerated individual and any funds received, by the department on behalf of an incarcerated person, from outside sources for specific items listed in (e)(i) of this subsection that are exempt from statutory deductions;

(viii) The average amount of funds remaining in an incarcerated individual's savings account at the time of his or her release from confinement; and

(ix) A review and evaluation of the fines, fees, and commission generated from any of the items and services listed in (e)(i) of this subsection that are used in the department's budget.

The institute must provide a final report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025.

(f)(i) (($50,000))$76,000 of the amount for fiscal year 2024 ((is))and $128,000 of the amount for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the institute to study the contracting practices for goods and services, and manufactured products, made or offered by correctional industries to state agencies and various political subdivisions within the state. A cost benefit analysis must be included in the report which must:

(A) Determine the costs of all contracts utilizing the labor of incarcerated individuals providing services or the manufacture of goods for state entities and other political subdivisions;

(B) Compare the cost savings to the state of Washington that is projected when those goods and services are procured from or produced by corrections industries and not private businesses engaged in a competitive bidding process with the state and its various political subdivisions;

(C) Provide a detailed break out of total number of labor positions that are offered to incarcerated individuals, ranked from least skilled to most skilled and the rate per hour of the gratuities the individuals are given monthly for this labor, including the amount if the gratuity given to incarcerated individuals was the federal or state mandated minimum wage;

(D) Provide a detailed listing of all commissary items purchased by and offered for sale to individuals incarcerated within the facilities operated by the department of corrections. This listing of individual items must also include the wholesale price from outside vendors that correction industries pays for each line item offered to incarcerated individuals, and the price charged to the incarcerated individual for those items; and

(E) Provide a comprehensive list of all positions offered by corrections industries that provide substantive training and labor ready skills for individuals to assume positions in the workforce outside of incarceration; and to the extent the data allows, provide the number of individuals who have positions upon release that were obtained with skills obtained through work at correctional industries.

(ii) The institute must submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025, in compliance with RCW 43.01.036.

(g)(i) $260,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2024 and $98,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Washington state institute for public policy to conduct a study of the Washington jail system and county juvenile justice facilities.

(ii) The institute's report shall include, to the extent possible, consideration of the following:

(A) A longitudinal study of how the county jail and county juvenile detention populations have changed over the last 12 years including, but not limited to, an analysis of demographics, physical and behavioral health issues, number of inmates, and types of convictions;

(B) An analysis of county jail and county juvenile detention facility survey data provided by the Washington state association of counties as described in (g)(v) of this subsection; and

(C) Examination of the availability of criminal justice training commission classes for corrections officers.

(iii) The health care authority, department of social and health services, administrative office of the courts, criminal justice training commission, state auditor's office, office of financial management, and Washington state patrol must provide the institute with access to data or other resources if necessary to complete this work.

(iv) The institute shall submit the report to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the governor by December 1, 2024.

(v) As part of the study, the institute shall contract with the Washington state association of counties to conduct a survey of jail and juvenile detention facilities in Washington state. The survey shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(A) Age of the facilities;

(B) Age of systems within the facilities;

(C) Cost of remodeling facilities;

(D) Cost of building new facilities;

(E) General maintenance costs of the facilities;

(F) Operational costs of the facilities;

(G) Workforce, to include, but not be limited to, employee vacancies as a percentage of total employees;

(H) Services, supports, and programming, to include, but not be

limited to:

(I) Costs of housing those with behavioral health needs;

(II) Number of individuals with behavioral health needs;

(III) Cost of competency restoration;

(IV) Physical health services and related costs;

(V) Number of individuals booked and housed on behalf of state

agencies;

(VI) Percent of individuals waiting for a state hospital;

(VII) Available nonincarcerative alternatives and diversion programs; and

(VIII) Available release and reentry services;

(I) Funding sources, to include, but not be limited to:

(I) County tax structure and revenue raising ability; and

(II) Jail and juvenile detention facility funding sources.

(vi) The Washington state association of counties shall consult with the Washington state institute for public policy during the design and distribution of the survey. Responses to the survey shall be compiled and provided to the Washington state institute for public policy by December 31, 2023.

(h)(i) $240,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2024 and $240,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Washington state institute for public policy, in consultation with the Washington traumatic brain injury strategic partnership advisory council, to study the potential need for developing specialized long-term services and supports for adults with traumatic brain injuries.

(ii) At a minimum, the study must include an examination of:

(A) The demographics of adults with traumatic brain injuries in the state who are anticipated to be in need of long-term services and supports, including an examination of those who are likely to be eligible for medicaid long-term services and supports;

(B) The industry standards of providing long-term care services and supports to individuals with traumatic brain injuries; and

(C) The methods other states are utilizing to provide long-term services and supports to individuals with traumatic brain injuries, including identifying the rates paid for these services and a description of any specialized facilities established to deliver these services.

(iii) A report of the findings of this study and any recommendations for increasing access to appropriate long-term services and supports for individuals with traumatic brain injuries shall be submitted to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than June 30, 2025.

(i) $163,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2024 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5236 (hospital staffing standards). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(j) $222,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of chapter 29, Laws of 2022 (reentry and rehabilitation).

(k) $107,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the Washington state institute for public policy to examine programs in peer states related to breast cancer education and prevention prior to diagnosis and support and resources after diagnosis for native communities. The study must focus on programs that are operated by either the state, tribes solely, or tribes in coordination with the state. To identify peer states, the institute may consider factors such as the population of American Indians and Alaska natives, number of federally recognized tribes, and whether the state has expanded medicaid. The report shall include for each peer state the existence of any programs that meet the criteria described in this section, and summarize any research findings on these programs, if available. The institute must submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025, in compliance with RCW 43.01.036.

(l) Notwithstanding other provisions in this subsection, the board of directors for the Washington state institute for public policy may adjust due dates for projects included on the institute's 2023-25 work plan as necessary to efficiently manage workload.

(5) $213,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $213,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for additional faculty to support Native American and indigenous programs.

(6) $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to the native pathways program for an assistant director.

(7) $110,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $110,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a tribal liaison position.

(8) $39,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $39,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for one full-time mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW who has experience and training specifically related to working with active members of the military or military veterans.

(9) $137,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $137,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for student mental health and wellness. The amount provided in this subsection must be used to supplement, not supplant, other funding sources for the program.

(10) $196,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for additional laboratory, art, and media lab sections.

(11) $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to develop and expand current corrections education programs offered in department of corrections facilities. The college shall appoint a project implementation team, collaborate with stakeholders to plan student success programs and curriculum which lead to transferable credit, associate and bachelor's degrees, and other workforce credentials, and train faculty and staff on working with incarcerated populations.

(12) $2,636,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for institution operating costs, including compensation and central services, in recognition that these costs exceed estimated increases in undergraduate operating fee revenue as a result of RCW 28B.15.067.

(13) $670,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to maintain enrollment capacity in psychology programs.

(14) $600,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to increase student success by maintaining support for a student precollege immersion program and the Evergreen first-year experience.

(15) $988,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for student enrollment and retention support. Funding is provided for hiring a student advisor and underserved student specialist to provide student support and administrative support for the native pathways program.

(16) $554,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the expansion of corrections education offerings to currently incarcerated students and the expansion of reentry services.

(17) (($106,000))$161,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1559 (postsecondary student needs). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))Of the amount provided in this subsection, $55,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to increase the benefits navigator position to 1.0 FTE and extend the hours of operation for the student basic needs/advocacy center.

(18) $26,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $26,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5238 (academic employee bargaining). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(19) $6,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1028 (crime victims and witnesses). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(20) $738,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Shelton promise pilot program.

(21) $42,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5953 (incarcerated student grants). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 607. 2023 c 475 s 611 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($98,802,000))

$99,084,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($103,707,000))

$104,563,000

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,424,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$13,831,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($21,399,000))

$21,844,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($239,163,000))

$240,746,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in computer science and engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in computer science and engineering programs above the prior academic year.

(2) Western Washington University shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

(3) (($19,580,000))$19,789,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($20,010,000))$20,283,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.

(4) $700,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $700,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the creation and implementation of an early childhood education degree program at the western on the peninsulas campus. The university must collaborate with Olympic college. At full implementation, the university is expected to grant approximately 75 bachelor's degrees in early childhood education per year at the western on the peninsulas campus.

(5) $1,306,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,306,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the university to develop a new program in marine, coastal, and watershed sciences.

(6) $886,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $886,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the university to reduce tuition rates for four-year degree programs offered in partnership with Olympic college—Bremerton, Olympic college—Poulsbo, and Peninsula college—Port Angeles that are currently above state-funded resident undergraduate tuition rates.

(7) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to recruit and retain high quality and diverse graduate students.

(8) $548,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $548,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for critical support services to ensure traditionally underrepresented students receive the same opportunities for academic success as their peers.

(9) $48,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $48,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for one full-time mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW who has experience and training specifically related to working with active members of the military or military veterans.

(10) $530,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $530,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the operation of two bilingual educator programs in the south King county region, including a bilingual elementary education degree program and a secondary education degree program. At full implementation, each cohort shall support up to 25 students per year.

(11) $361,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $361,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a master of science program in nursing.

(12) $433,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $433,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the registered nurse to bachelors in nursing program.

(13) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the university is encouraged to increase the number of tenure-track positions created and hired.

(14) $2,256,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for institution operating costs, including compensation and central services, in recognition that these costs exceed estimated increases in undergraduate operating fee revenue as a result of RCW 28B.15.067.

(15) $3,426,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to maintain access to science, technology, engineering, and mathematics degrees.

(16) $908,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to establish an academic curriculum in ethnic studies.

(17) $400,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for upgrading cyber range equipment and software.

(18) $2,520,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for student support services that include resources for outreach and financial aid support, retention initiatives including targeted support for underserved student populations, mental health support, and initiatives aimed at addressing learning disruption due to the global pandemic. The amount provided in this subsection must be used to supplement, not supplant, other funding sources for student support services.

(19) $200,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for planning student studios to assist cities and counties with planning projects. Assistance shall focus on students and supporting faculty to facilitate on-site learning with cities and counties.

(20) $500,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the student civic leaders initiative.

(21) $1,610,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,875,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for compensation support.

(22) $3,186,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the western on the peninsulas expansion. This includes new two plus two degrees programs such as industrial engineering, data science, and sociology.

(23) $1,577,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for expanded remedial math and additional English 101 courses, as well first year seminars, and disability accommodation counselors. Of the amounts provided in this subsection for first year seminars, $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided for the university to develop a student orientation program for students receiving the Washington college grant, focusing on first-generation and traditionally underrepresented students. The program may include evidence-based student success metrics, peer support, and mentorship following orientation. The program proposal must be submitted to the legislature by December 1, 2023 for implementation in the 2024-2025 academic year.

(24) $100,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for mental health first aid training for faculty.

(25) $150,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the small business development center to increase technical assistance to black, indigenous, and other people of color small business owners in Whatcom county.

(26) $694,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided to establish a master of social work program at western on the peninsulas.

(27) $2,478,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for expansion of bilingual educators education.

(28) $1,000,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided for additional student support and outreach at western on the peninsulas.

(29) $580,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to convert the human services program at western on the peninsulas from self-sustaining to state-supported to reduce tuition rates for students in the program.

(30) $118,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1559 (postsecondary student needs). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(31) $23,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1028 (crime victims and witnesses). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(32) $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5238 (academic employee bargaining). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(33) $1,306,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to establish and administer a teacher residency program focused on special education instruction beginning in the 2024-25 school year. Amounts provided in this subsection are sufficient to support one cohort of 17 residents per school year, and must be prioritized to communities that are anticipated to be most positively impacted by teacher residents who fill teacher vacancies upon completing the teacher residency program and who remain in the communities in which they are mentored. The teacher residency program must meet the following requirements:

(a) Residents receive compensation equivalent to first year paraeducators, as defined in RCW 28A.413.010;

(b) Each resident is assigned a preservice mentor;

(c) Preservice mentors receive a stipend of $2,500 per year;

(d) Residents receive at least 900 hours of preservice clinical practice over the course of the school year;

(e) At least half of the residency hours specified in (d) of this subsection are in a coteaching setting with the resident's preservice mentor and the other half of the residency hours are in a coteaching setting with another teacher;

(f) Residents may not be assigned the lead or primary responsibility for student learning;

(g) Coursework taught during the residency is codesigned by the teacher preparation program and the school district, state-tribal education compact school, or consortium, tightly integrated with residents' preservice clinical practice, and focused on developing culturally responsive teachers; and

(h) The program must prepare residents to meet or exceed the knowledge, skills, performance, and competency standards described in RCW 28A.410.270(1).

(34) $445,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to expand the undergraduate electrical and computer engineering program.

(35) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the university to contract with a nonprofit organization in Kitsap county that provides cyber security curriculum to postsecondary institutions for cyber security education in partnership with the Washington state cyber range in Poulsbo.

(36) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the university to contract with a nonprofit organization in Whatcom county that provides economic and financial education to conduct foundational research on the efficacy of financial education course formats.

Sec. 608. 2023 c 475 s 612 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT COUNCIL—POLICY COORDINATION AND ADMINISTRATION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($9,850,000))

$9,895,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($9,416,000))

$9,978,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($20,996,000))

$20,998,000

Washington Student Loan Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($90,000,000))

$50,000,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$16,311,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($146,573,000))

$107,182,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $126,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $126,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the consumer protection unit.

(2) The student achievement council must ensure that all institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.92.030 and eligible for state financial aid programs under chapters 28B.92 and 28B.118 RCW provide the data needed to analyze and evaluate the effectiveness of state financial aid programs. This data must be promptly transmitted to the education data center so that it is available and easily accessible.

(3) Community-based organizations that receive state funding under subsection (11) of this section and section ((605(35)))601(35) of this act are not eligible for Washington career and college pathways innovation challenge program grant funding for the same purpose.

(4) $575,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $575,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided to increase the number of high school seniors and college bound scholars that complete the free application for federal student aid and the Washington application for state financial aid through digital engagement tools, expanded training, and increased events for high school students.

(5) $850,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $850,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for administrative support services to carry out duties and responsibilities necessary for recipients of the Washington college grant who are enrolled in a state registered apprenticeship program.

(6)(a) $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for a pilot program to help students, including those enrolled in state registered apprenticeship programs, connect with health care coverage. The student achievement council, in cooperation with the council of presidents, must provide resources for up to two four-year colleges or universities, one on the east side and one on the west side of the Cascade mountains, to hire or train an employee to:

(i) Provide information to students and college and university staff about available health insurance options;

(ii) Develop culturally relevant materials and conduct outreach for historically marginalized and underserved student populations to assist these populations in their knowledge of access to low cost or free health insurance plans;

(iii) Provide ongoing technical assistance to students about health insurance options or the health insurance application process; and

(iv) Provide technical assistance to students as a health benefit exchange certified assister, to help students understand, shop, apply, and enroll in health insurance through Washington health planfinder.

(b) Participation in the exchange assister program is contingent on fulfilling applicable contracting, security, and other program requirements.

(c) The council, in collaboration with the council of presidents and the health benefit exchange, must submit a report by June 30, 2024, to the appropriate committees of the legislature, pursuant to RCW 43.01.036, on information about barriers students, including those enrolled in state registered apprenticeship programs, encountered accessing health insurance coverage; and to provide recommendations on how to improve student and staff access to health coverage based on data gathered from the pilot program.

(7) $1,208,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,208,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Washington award for vocational excellence. Of the amount provided in this subsection, $70,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $70,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 may be used for administration and that is the maximum amount that may be expended for this purpose.

(8) $2,000,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the career launch grant pool for the public four-year institutions.

(9) $179,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $179,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the complete Washington program.

(10) $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the council to submit a progress report on the new or expanded cybersecurity and nursing academic programs that receive funding in sections ((605 through 611))601 through 607 of this act, including the number of students enrolled. The council must coordinate with the institutions of higher education and the state board for community and technical colleges as provided in ((sections 603(3), 605(31), and 605(37)))section 603(3), chapter 475, Laws of 2023 and section 601 (31) and (37) of this act. The progress report must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature, pursuant to RCW 43.01.036, by December 1, 2024.

(11) $5,778,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Washington student achievement council to contract with a statewide nonprofit organization located in King county to expand college services to support underserved students and improve college retention and completion rates.

(12) $46,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $46,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the state of Washington's annual dues to the education commission of the state.

(13) $150,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for an implementation review of the passport to careers program. The review must include short and long-term recommendations to improve the reach and effectiveness of the passport program. The review must include consultation with organizations serving foster youth, the state board of community and technical colleges, public four-year institutions, and other organizations involved in the passport to college and passport to apprenticeship programs. Amounts provided in this subsection may be used to provide stipends for youth participating in the review who are receiving funds from passport programs or are eligible to receive funds from passport programs. The review must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2024.

(14) $1,485,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation and (($90,000,000))$50,000,000 of the Washington student loan account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed House Bill No. 1823 (WA student loan program). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(15) $16,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the good jobs challenge grant expenditure authority.

(16) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for contraception vending machines for students and staff stocked with emergency contraceptive medication and other forms of contraception, including condoms, at discreet and geographically accessible locations, such as gender-neutral restrooms and student union buildings, and locations that are accessible on weekends and after 5:00 p.m. The council must distribute $10,000 to each public four-year institution and community and technical college who apply on a first-come, first-served basis.

(17) $1,150,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1559 (postsecondary student needs). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(18) $200,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the council to provide grants to law schools in the state who offer a law clinic focusing on crime victim support.

(19)(a) $100,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to contract with a nonprofit organization located in Tacoma that focuses on coordinated systems of support for postsecondary success to conduct a comprehensive study on the feasibility and potential impacts on postsecondary enrollment of a policy of universal free application for federal financial aid (FAFSA) completion. For purposes of this subsection, universal FAFSA completion means making completion of the financial aid form a requirement for high school graduation and requiring schools to support students through the process. The study will include, but is not limited to, the following:

(i) A landscape scan of existing state and local level universal FAFSA completion policies, both in Washington and nationally;

(ii) Input from key stakeholder groups, including students, parents, state agency staff, K-12 district staff and leadership, and student serving organizations; and

(iii) Recommendations for possible policy change at the state level.

(b) A report of findings and recommendations must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature pursuant to RCW 43.01.036 by November 30, 2023.

(20) $648,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for distribution to four-year institutions of higher education participating in the students experiencing homelessness program without reduction by the Washington student achievement council, pursuant to Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5702 (student homelessness pilot). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(21) $46,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the administration of the students experiencing homelessness program pursuant to Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5702 (student homelessness pilot). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(22) $400,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5687 (wrestling grant program). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(23) $356,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Washington student achievement council to staff the workforce education investment accountability and oversight board as provided in Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5534 (workforce investment board). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(24) $191,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a full-time position to support an increased workload in contracting activities.

(25) $330,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5953 (incarcerated student grants). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 609. 2023 c 475 s 613 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT COUNCIL—OFFICE OF STUDENT FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($302,029,000))

$302,031,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($301,772,000))

$301,775,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($12,250,000))

$12,263,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$300,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$85,488,000

Washington Opportunity Pathways Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($78,914,000))

$76,603,000

Aerospace Training Student Loan Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$220,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($226,415,000))

$328,722,000

Health Professionals Loan Repayment and Scholarship

Program Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$11,720,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,019,108,000))

$1,119,122,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $7,834,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $7,835,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for student financial aid payments under the state work study program, including up to four percent administrative allowance for the state work study program.

(2) $276,416,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $276,416,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, (($169,036,000))$258,584,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation, $69,639,000 of the education legacy trust fund—state appropriation, and $67,654,000 of the Washington opportunity pathways account—state appropriation are provided solely for the Washington college grant program as provided in RCW 28B.92.200.

(3) Changes made to the state work study program in the 2009-2011 and 2011-2013 fiscal biennia are continued in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium including maintaining the increased required employer share of wages; adjusted employer match rates; discontinuation of nonresident student eligibility for the program; and revising distribution methods to institutions by taking into consideration other factors such as off-campus job development, historical utilization trends, and student need.

(4) $1,165,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,165,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, $15,849,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation, and (($11,260,000))$8,949,000 of the Washington opportunity pathways account—state appropriation are provided solely for the college bound scholarship program and may support scholarships for summer session. The office of student financial assistance and the institutions of higher education shall not consider awards made by the opportunity scholarship program to be state-funded for the purpose of determining the value of an award amount under RCW 28B.118.010.

(5) $6,999,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 ((and)), $6,999,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $2,000,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation are provided solely for the passport to college program. The maximum scholarship award is up to $5,000. The council shall contract with a nonprofit organization to provide support services to increase student completion in their postsecondary program and shall, under this contract, provide a minimum of $500,000 in fiscal years 2024 and 2025 for this purpose.

(6) $55,254,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for an annual bridge grant of $500 to eligible students. A student is eligible for a grant if the student receives a maximum college grant award and does not receive the college bound scholarship program under chapter 28B.118 RCW. Bridge grant funding provides supplementary financial support to low-income students to cover higher education expenses.

(7) $500,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the behavioral health apprenticeship stipend pilot program, with stipends of $3,000 available to students. The pilot program is intended to provide a stipend to assist students in high-demand programs for costs associated with completing a program, including child care, housing, transportation, and food.

(8) (($1,000,000))$1,425,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the national guard grant program. Of the amount provided in this subsection, $425,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely to increase national guard grant award amounts.

(9) $1,000,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for educator conditional scholarship and loan repayment programs established in chapter 28B.102 RCW. Dual language educators must receive priority.

(10) $10,000,000 of the health professionals loan repayment and scholarship program account—state appropriation is provided solely to increase loans within the Washington health corps.

(11) $1,156,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1232 (college bound scholarship). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(12) $500,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Washington award for vocational excellence program.

(13) $8,280,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5904 (financial aid terms). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 610. 2023 c 475 s 614 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WORKFORCE TRAINING AND EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($4,845,000))

$4,847,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($4,311,000))

$4,613,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($55,868,000))

$55,870,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$212,000

Climate Commitment Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$904,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$250,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,350,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($68,740,000))

$69,046,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $240,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $240,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the health workforce council of the state workforce training and education coordinating board. In partnership with the office of the governor, the health workforce council shall continue to assess workforce shortages across behavioral health disciplines and incorporate the recommended action plan completed in 2020.

(2) $250,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for an accredited osteopathic medical school to purchase necessary equipment to support the education and training of community-focused occupational therapists.

(3) $564,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $573,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to conduct health workforce surveys, in collaboration with the nursing care quality assurance commission, to collect and analyze data on the long-term care workforce, and to manage a stakeholder process to address retention and career pathways in long-term care facilities.

(4) $1,200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for apprenticeship grants, in collaboration with the nursing care quality assurance commission and the department of labor and industries, to address the long-term care workforce.

(5) $109,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $109,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for administrative expenditures for the Washington award for vocational excellence.

(6) $2,000,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the workforce board to award grants for the purposes of providing apprenticeship, industry certifications and wraparound student supports to workers pursuing job advancement and enhancement through college readiness, apprenticeship, degree, certification, or professional development opportunities in the health care field. Grant recipients must be labor-management partnerships established under section 302 of the labor-management relations act, 29 U.S.C. Sec. 186 that demonstrate adequate funding match and competency in the provision of student supports, or employers who can demonstrate service serving greater than 50 percent medicaid populations who can demonstrate that they will use the grant to join or establish a labor-management partnership dedicated to the purposes of this section. Preference must be given to applications that demonstrate an ability to support students from racially diverse backgrounds, and that are focused on in-demand fields with career ladders to living wage jobs. Grant recipients must use the funds to provide services including, but not limited to, development and implementation of apprenticeship and industry certifications, benefits administration, tuition assistance, counseling and navigation, tutoring and test preparation, instructor/mentor training, materials and technology for students, childcare, and travel costs.

(7) $92,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $92,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a full-time information technology position to collaborate with other state workforce agencies to establish and support a governance structure that provides strategic direction on cross-organizational information technology projects. The board must submit a report to the governor's office and the appropriate committees of the legislature, pursuant to RCW 43.01.036, with a progress update and recommendations on a coalition model that will result in better service coordination and public stewardship that enables the efficient delivery of workforce development services by September 1, 2023, and September 1, 2024.

(8) The workforce board must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and section 302(13) of this act.

(9) $84,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1724 (behavioral health workforce). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(10) $904,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1176 (climate-ready communities), which creates a clean energy technology workforce advisory committee. ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.)) The agency must conduct a study in fiscal year 2024 of the feasibility of a transition to retirement program to ensure income and medical and retirement benefits are not interrupted for workers close to retirement that face job loss or transition because of clean energy technology sector changes.

(11) $256,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5582 (nurse supply). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(12) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a new application portal for the Washington award for vocational excellence scholarship program.

Sec. 611. 2023 c 475 s 615 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($11,090,000))

$11,093,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($11,186,000))

$11,192,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$34,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($22,310,000))

$22,319,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: Funding provided in this section is sufficient for the school to offer to students enrolled in grades six through twelve for full-time instructional services at the Vancouver campus or online with the opportunity to participate in a minimum of one thousand eighty hours of instruction and the opportunity to earn twenty-four high school credits.

Sec. 612. 2023 c 475 s 616 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON CENTER FOR DEAF AND HARD OF HEARING YOUTH

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($17,953,000))

$18,421,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($17,997,000))

$18,514,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,050,000))

$4,052,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($39,000,000))

$40,987,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Funding provided in this section is sufficient for the center to offer students ages three through 21 enrolled at the center the opportunity to participate in a minimum of 1,080 hours of instruction and the opportunity to earn 24 high school credits.

(2) $225,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $225,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a mentoring program for persons employed as educational interpreters in public schools.

(3) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for additional student-based safety training as well as diversity, equity, and inclusion training for staff.

Sec. 613. 2023 c 475 s 617 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE ARTS COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($6,615,000))

$6,331,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($6,795,000))

$7,241,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,230,000))

$2,830,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$184,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($15,824,000))

$16,586,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $79,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $79,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the creative districts program.

(2) $868,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $867,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the establishment of a tribal cultural affairs program. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to support tribal cultural, arts, and creative programs.

(3) $151,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $137,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the commission to hire a temporary collections technician to maintain and repair public art in the state art collection.

(4) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the commission to implement a pilot program for in-person and online arts programming, targeting adults and families impacted by housing instability, mental health challenges, and trauma.

(5) (($489,000))$199,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($654,000))$944,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1639 (Billy Frank Jr. statue). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(6) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for an outdoor public art project in downtown Everett on the façade of the Schack art center. The project shall feature stainless steel images of Sasquatch and Pacific Northwest elements, honoring the rich cultural heritage of the region and the narrative history of the Coast Salish Tribes.

Sec. 614. 2023 c 475 s 618 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($5,327,000))

$5,410,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($5,467,000))

$6,185,000

Local Museum Account—Washington State Historical

Society—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$70,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($10,864,000))

$11,665,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the purpose of supporting the Washington museums connect initiative, creating an inventory of rural, volunteer, and multidiscipline museums and place-based heritage groups to connect at-risk museums to a statewide funding and operational network. The department shall contract with an organization that works with and connects museums in Washington state.

(a) The contracted organization must:

(i) Submit to the department a report regarding funding needs for the museums and place-based heritage groups identified in the statewide inventory created in the first phase of the initiative;

(ii) Submit to the department a strategic plan assessing opportunities for the entities identified in the statewide inventory to access local, state, and national funding; and

(iii) Distribute to the entities identified in the inventory information regarding opportunities to apply for local, state, and national funding for the duration of the contract.

(b) The report and the strategic plan are due by June 30, 2025.

(2) $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $88,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for an assistant curator at the Washington state history museum.

(3) $4,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $4,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $70,000 of the local museum account—Washington state historical society—private/local appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1639 (Billy Frank Jr. statue). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(4) $99,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $242,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Washington state historical society to partner with statewide organizations specializing in the preservation of Washington state aviation history to organize a centennial celebration of the first round-the-world flight that captures the narratives and contributions of Washingtonians to the history of aviation.

(5) $320,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the Washington state historical society to partner with a statewide organization specializing in the preservation of Washington state Jewish history to transform and expand the collection of oral histories from Jewish Washingtonians in order to build awareness and to provide education.

Sec. 615. 2023 c 475 s 619 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($4,429,000))

$4,799,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($4,452,000))

$4,661,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($8,881,000))

$9,460,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $103,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $103,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a director of support services.

(2) $52,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $52,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for an information technology staff to replace the society's contracted information technology support.

(3) $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for acquisition, transportation, archiving, and storage of the following two collections:

(a) A collection of artworks created by Harold Balazs;

(b) A collection of Southern Plateau tribal beadwork and culturally historic photographs.

(End of part)

PART VII

SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS

Sec. 701. 2023 c 475 s 701 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY INVESTMENT POOL

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($26,470,000))

$27,023,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($9,022,000))

$22,993,000

Other Appropriated Funds
. . . .
(($6,559,000))

$18,508,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($42,051,000))

$68,524,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the information technology investment revolving account created in RCW 43.41.433. Amounts in the account are provided solely for the information technology projects shown in LEAP omnibus documents IT-2023, dated April 22, 2023, and IT-2024, dated February 18, 2024, which ((is))are hereby incorporated by reference. To facilitate the transfer of moneys from other funds and accounts that are associated with projects contained in LEAP omnibus documents IT-2023, dated April 22, 2023, and IT-2024, dated February 18, 2024, the state treasurer is directed to transfer moneys from other funds and accounts to the information technology investment revolving account in accordance with schedules provided by the office of financial management. Restricted federal funds may be transferred only to the extent permitted by law, and will otherwise remain outside the information technology investment account. The projects affected remain subject to the other provisions of this section.

(2) Agencies must apply to the office of the chief information officer for certification and release of funding for each gate of the project. When the office of the chief information officer certifies the key deliverables of the gate have been met, a current technology budget is approved; and if applicable to the stage or gate of the project, that the project is putting functioning software into production that addresses user needs, is in compliance with the quality assurance plan, and meets a defined set of industry best practices for code quality that the office of the chief information officer will post to their website by July 1, 2023, it must notify the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature. The office of financial management may not approve funding for the certified project gate any earlier than ten business days from the date of notification to the fiscal committees of the legislature.

(3)(a) Allocations and allotments of information technology investment revolving account must be made for discrete stages of projects as determined by the technology budget approved by the office of the chief information officer and the office of financial management.

(b) Fifteen percent of total funding allocated by the office of financial management, or another amount as defined jointly by the office of financial management and the office of the chief information officer, will be retained in the account, but remain allocated to that project. The retained funding will be released to the agency only after successful completion of that stage of the project and only after the office of the chief information officer certifies the stage as required in subsection (2) of this section. For the one Washington project, the amount retained is increased to at least twenty percent of total funding allocated for any stage of that project. If there is no significant risk to the project, the holdback does not apply to the final gate during a biennial close.

(4)(a) Each project must have a technology budget. The technology budget must have the detail by fiscal month for the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium. The technology budget must use a method similar to the state capital budget, identifying project costs, each fund source, and anticipated deliverables through each stage of the entire project investment and across fiscal periods and biennia from project onset through implementation and close out, as well as at least five years of maintenance and operations costs.

(b) As part of the development of a technology budget and at each request for funding, the agency shall submit an updated technology budget, if changes occurred, to include detailed financial information to the office of financial management and the office of the chief information officer. The technology budget must describe the total cost of the project, as well as maintenance and operations costs, to include and identify at least:

(i) Fund sources:

(A) If the project is funded from the information technology revolving account, the technology budget must include a worksheet that provides the fund sources that were transferred into the account by fiscal year;

(B) If the project is by a central service agency, and funds are driven out by the central service model, the technology budget must provide a statewide impact by agency by fund as a worksheet in the technology budget file;

(ii) Full time equivalent staffing level to include job classification assumptions. This is to assure that the project has adequate state staffing and agency support to ensure success, ensure user acceptance, and adequately test the functionality being delivered in each sprint before it is accepted by the agency's contracting officer or their representative. Key project functions that are deemed "critical" must be retained by state personnel and not outsourced, to ensure that knowledge is retained within state government and that the state can self-sufficiently support the system and make improvements without long-term dependence on a vendor;

(iii) Discrete financial budget codes to include at least the appropriation index and program index;

(iv) Object and subobject codes of expenditures;

(v) Anticipated deliverables to include software demonstration dates;

(vi) Historical budget and expenditure detail by fiscal year; and

(vii) Maintenance and operations costs by fiscal year for at least five years as a separate worksheet.

(c) If a project technology budget changes and a revised technology budget is completed, a comparison of the revised technology budget to the last approved technology budget must be posted to the dashboard, to include a narrative rationale on what changed, why, and how that impacts the project in scope, budget, and schedule.

(5)(a) Each project must have a project charter. The charter must include:

(i) An organizational chart of the project management team that identifies team members and their roles and responsibilities, and shows that the project is adequately staffed by state personnel in key functions to ensure success;

(ii) The office of the chief information officer staff assigned to the project;

(iii) A project roadmap that includes the problems the team is solving and the sequence in which the team intends to take on those problems, updated periodically to reflect what has been learned;

(iv) Metrics to support the project strategy and vision, to determine that the project is incrementally meeting user needs;

(v) An implementation schedule covering activities, critical milestones, and deliverables at each stage of the project for the life of the project at each agency affected by the project;

(vi) Performance measures used to determine that the project is on time, within budget, and meeting expectations for quality of work product;

(vii) Ongoing maintenance and operations cost of the project post implementation and close out delineated by agency staffing, contracted staffing, and service level agreements; and

(viii) Financial budget coding to include at least discrete financial coding for the project.

(b) If required by the office of the chief information officer, a project may also need to have an investment plan. The office of the chief information officer must:

(i) Base the requirement of an agency needing to have an investment plan on the complexity and risk of the project;

(ii) Establish requirements by project risk level in statewide technology policy, and publish the requirements by September 30, 2023; and

(iii) In collaboration with the department of enterprise services, define the circumstances under which the vendor will be terminated or replaced and establish the process by which the agency will transition to a new vendor with a minimal reduction in project productivity.

(6)(a) Projects with estimated costs greater than $100,000,000 from initiation to completion and implementation may be divided into discrete subprojects as determined by the office of the chief information officer, except for the one Washington project which must be divided into the following discrete subprojects: Core financials, expanding financials and procurement, budget, and human resources. Each subproject must have a technology budget as provided in this section.

(b) If the project affects more than one agency:

(i) A separate technology budget and investment plan must be prepared by each agency; and

(ii) There must be a budget roll up that includes each affected agency at the subproject level.

(7) The office of the chief information officer shall maintain a statewide information technology project dashboard that provides updated information each fiscal month on projects subject to this section. The statewide dashboard must meet the requirements in section 155 of this act.

(8) For any project that exceeds $2,000,000 in total funds to complete, requires more than one biennium to complete, or is financed through financial contracts, bonds, or other indebtedness:

(a) Independent quality assurance services for the project must report independently to the office of the chief information officer;

(b) The office of the chief information officer, based on project risk assessments, may require additional quality assurance services and independent verification and validation services;

(c) The office of the chief information officer must review, and, if necessary, revise the proposed project to ensure it is flexible and adaptable to advances in technology;

(d) The technology budget must specifically identify the uses of any financing proceeds. No more than thirty percent of the financing proceeds may be used for payroll-related costs for state employees assigned to project management, installation, testing, or training;

(e) The agency must consult with the office of the state treasurer during the competitive procurement process to evaluate early in the process whether products and services to be solicited and the responsive bids from a solicitation may be financed;

(f) The agency must consult with the contracting division of the department of enterprise services for a review of all contracts and agreements related to the project's information technology procurements;

(g) The agency and project must use an agile development model holding live demonstrations of functioning software, developed using incremental user research, held at the end of every two-week sprint, except for:

(i) Hardware or infrastructure projects; and

(ii) Projects that have implemented all phases and are now in maintenance and operations;

(h) The project solution must be capable of being continually updated, as necessary; and

(i) The agency and project must deploy usable functionality into production for users within 180 days from the date of an executed procurement contract in response to a competitive request for proposal.

(9) The office of the chief information officer must evaluate the project at each stage and certify whether the project is putting functioning software into production that addresses user needs, is projected to be completed within budget, is in compliance with the quality assurance plan, and meets a defined set of industry best practices for code quality, and whether the project is planned, managed, and meeting deliverable targets as defined in the project's approved technology budget and investment plan.

(10) The office of the chief information officer may suspend or terminate a project at any time if it determines that the project is not meeting or not expected to meet anticipated performance and technology outcomes. Once suspension or termination occurs, the agency shall unallot any unused funding and shall not make any expenditure for the project without the approval of the office of financial management. The office of the chief information officer must report on December 1 each calendar year any suspension or termination of a project in the previous 12-month period to the legislative fiscal committees.

(11) The office of the chief information officer, in consultation with the office of financial management, may identify additional projects to be subject to this section, including projects that are not separately identified within an agency budget. The office of the chief information officer must report on December 1 each calendar year any additional projects to be subjected to this section that were identified in the previous 12-month period to the legislative fiscal committees.

(12) Any cost to administer or implement this section for projects listed in subsection (1) of this section, must be paid from the information technology investment revolving account. For any other information technology project made subject to the conditions, limitations, and review of this section, the cost to implement this section must be paid from the funds for that project.

(13) The following information technology projects are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review of this section:

(a) The state network firewall replacement of the consolidated technology services agency;

(b) The resident portal of the consolidated technology services agency; and

(c) The resident identity and access management modernization project of the consolidated technology services agency.

Sec. 702. 2023 c 475 s 702 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR DEBT SUBJECT TO THE DEBT LIMIT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($1,419,445,000))

$1,401,902,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($1,549,610,000))

$1,495,940,000

State Building Construction Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($14,092,000))

$20,863,000

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$3,000

Watershed Restoration and Enhancement Bond Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
(($204,000))

$64,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$876,000

Debt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$119,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($2,984,346,000))

$2,919,767,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriations are for expenditure into the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account.

Sec. 703. 2023 c 475 s 703 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR GENERAL OBLIGATION DEBT TO BE REIMBURSED AS PRESCRIBED BY STATUTE

Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
(($51,730,000))

$51,761,000

School Construction and Skill Centers Building

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($51,730,000))

$51,765,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriation is for expenditure into the nondebt limit general fund bond retirement account.

Sec. 704. 2023 c 475 s 704 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$1,400,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$1,400,000

State Building Construction Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,821,000))

$3,921,000

Watershed Restoration and Enhancement Bond Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
(($44,000))

$24,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$176,000

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,000

School Construction and Skill Centers Building

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($5,841,000))

$6,923,000

Sec. 705. 2023 c 475 s 705 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—GOVERNOR'S EMERGENCY FUNDING

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($3,500,000))

$5,000,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$3,500,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($7,000,000))

$8,500,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($1,000,000))$1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided for the critically necessary work of any state agency in the event of an emergent or unforeseen circumstance. Prior to the allocation of funding from this subsection (1), the requesting agency and the office of financial management must comply with the provisions of RCW 43.88.250.

(2) (($2,500,000))$3,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided for individual assistance consistent with RCW 38.52.030(9) during an emergency proclaimed by the governor, as defined in RCW 38.52.010. The office of financial management must notify the fiscal committees of the legislature of the receipt by the governor or adjutant general of each application ((or)), request, or allocation for individual assistance from the amounts provided in this subsection (2). ((The office of financial management may not approve or release funding for 10 business days from the date of notification to the fiscal committees of the legislature.))

Sec. 706. 2023 c 475 s 717 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—STATE HEALTH CARE AFFORDABILITY ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$55,000,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($30,000,000))

$45,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($85,000,000))

$100,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the state health care affordability account created in RCW 43.71.130.

(2) It is the intent of the legislature to continue the policy of expending $5,000,000 into the account each fiscal year in future biennia for the purpose of funding premium assistance for customers ineligible for federal premium tax credits who meet the eligibility criteria established in section 214(4)(a) of this act. Future expenditures into the account are contingent upon approval of the waiver described in RCW 43.71.120.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 707. A new section is added to 2023 c 475 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR SUNDRY CLAIMS

The following sums, or so much thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated from the general fund for fiscal year 2024, unless otherwise indicated, for relief of various individuals, firms, and corporations for sundry claims.

These appropriations are to be disbursed on vouchers approved by the director of the department of enterprise services, except as otherwise provided, for reimbursement of criminal defendants acquitted on the basis of self-defense, pursuant to RCW 9A.16.110, as follows:

(1) Clifford T. Snow, claim number 9991014081. . . .$13,659

(2) Shanna S. Parker, claim number 9991013694. . . .$14,913

(3) Leah M. Eggleson, claim number 9991013115. . . .$20,852

(4) Shannon E. Garner, claim number 9991013103. . . .$15,325

(5) Stephanie S. Westby, claim number 9991012517. . . .$199,459

(6) Clyde E. McCoy, claim number 9991014232. . . .$139

(7) Kevin R. Ash, claim number 9991014512. . . .$14,810

(8) Kenneth M. Salazar, claim number 9991014683. . . .$231,920

(9) Victor O. Alejandre-Mejia, claim number 9991014791. . . .$213,297

(10) James K. Warren, claim number 9991014924. . . .$20,843

(11) Marcus Buchanan, claim number 9991015324. . . .$70,102

Sec. 708. 2023 c 475 s 710 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—COUNTY CLERK LEGAL FINANCIAL OBLIGATION GRANTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$541,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($441,000))

$800,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($982,000))

$1,341,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: By October 1st of each fiscal year, the state treasurer shall distribute the appropriations to the following county clerk offices in the amounts designated as grants for the collection of legal financial obligations pursuant to RCW 2.56.190:

County Clerk

FY 2024

FY 2025

Adams County Clerk

$2,103

(($1,714))

$3,109

Asotin County Clerk

$2,935

(($2,392))

$4,339

Benton County Clerk

$18,231

(($14,858))

$26,953

Chelan County Clerk

$7,399

(($6,030))

$10,939

Clallam County Clerk

$5,832

(($4,753))

$8,622

Clark County Clerk

$32,635

(($26,597))

$48,249

Columbia County Clerk

$384

(($313))

$568

Cowlitz County Clerk

$16,923

(($13,792))

$25,020

Douglas County Clerk

$3,032

(($2,471))

$4,483

Ferry County Clerk

$422

(($344))

$624

Franklin County Clerk

$5,486

(($4,471))

$8,111

Garfield County Clerk

$243

(($198))

$359

Grant County Clerk

$10,107

(($8,237))

$14,942

Grays Harbor County Clerk

$8,659

(($7,057))

$12,802

Island County Clerk

$3,059

(($2,493))

$4,523

Jefferson County Clerk

$1,859

(($1,515))

$2,748

King County Court Clerk

$119,290

(($97,266))

$176,446

Kitsap County Clerk

$22,242

(($18,127))

$32,883

Kittitas County Clerk

$3,551

(($2,894))

$5,250

Klickitat County Clerk

$2,151

(($1,753))

$3,180

Lewis County Clerk

$10,340

(($8,427))

$15,287

Lincoln County Clerk

$724

(($590))

$1,070

Mason County Clerk

$5,146

(($4,194))

$7,608

Okanogan County Clerk

$3,978

(($3,242))

$5,881

Pacific County Clerk

$2,411

(($1,965))

$3,565

Pend Oreille County Clerk

$611

(($498))

$903

Pierce County Clerk

$77,102

(($62,837))

$113,990

San Juan County Clerk

$605

(($493))

$894

Skagit County Clerk

$11,059

(($9,013))

$16,350

Skamania County Clerk

$1,151

(($938))

$1,702

Snohomish County Clerk

$38,143

(($31,086))

$56,392

Spokane County Clerk

$44,825

(($36,578))

$66,355

Stevens County Clerk

$2,984

(($2,432))

$4,412

Thurston County Clerk

$22,204

(($18,096))

$32,827

Wahkiakum County Clerk

$400

(($326))

$591

Walla Walla County Clerk

$4,935

(($4,022))

$7,296

Whatcom County Clerk

$20,728

(($16,893))

$30,645

Whitman County Clerk

$2,048

(($1,669))

$3,028

Yakima County Clerk

$25,063

(($20,426))

$37,054

TOTAL APPROPRIATIONS

$541,000

(($441,000))

$800,000

Sec. 709. 2023 c 475 s 715 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—ANDY HILL CANCER RESEARCH ENDOWMENT FUND MATCH TRANSFER ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$684,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$3,486,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($684,000))

$4,170,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for expenditure into the Andy Hill cancer research endowment fund match transfer account per RCW 43.348.080 to fund the Andy Hill cancer research endowment program. Matching funds using the amounts appropriated in this section may not be used to fund new grants that exceed two years in duration.

Sec. 710. 2023 c 475 s 726 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—LANDLORD MITIGATION PROGRAM ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$8,000,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$7,200,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($8,000,000))

$15,200,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for expenditure into the landlord mitigation program account created in RCW 43.31.615.

Sec. 711. 2023 c 475 s 727 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS—CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS

(1) The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations for the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system shall be made on a monthly basis consistent with chapter 41.45 RCW, and the appropriations for the judges and judicial retirement systems shall be made on a quarterly basis consistent with chapters 2.10 and 2.12 RCW.

(2) There is appropriated for state contributions to the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system:

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($88,700,000))

$94,400,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($92,600,000))

$98,600,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($181,300,000))

$193,000,000

(3) There is appropriated for contributions to the judicial retirement system:

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$6,300,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$6,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$12,300,000

(4) There is appropriated for contributions to the judges' retirement system:

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$300,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$300,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$600,000

Sec. 712. 2023 c 475 s 734 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT COUNCIL—RURAL JOBS PROGRAM MATCH TRANSFER ACCOUNT

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($400,000))

$404,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($400,000))

$404,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the rural jobs program match transfer account created in RCW 28B.145.120.

Sec. 713. 2023 c 475 s 735 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT COUNCIL—OPPORTUNITY SCHOLARSHIP MATCH TRANSFER ACCOUNT

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($11,600,000))

$14,856,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($11,600,000))

$14,856,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the opportunity scholarship match transfer account created in RCW 28B.145.050.

Sec. 714. 2023 c 475 s 740 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—WASHINGTON STATE LEADERSHIP BOARD ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($843,000))

$1,019,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($848,000))

$1,022,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,691,000))

$2,041,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the Washington state leadership board account created in RCW 43.388.020.

Sec. 715. 2023 c 475 s 747 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—CRIME VICTIM AND WITNESS ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
(($2,000,000))

$4,000,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
(($2,000,000))

$4,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($4,000,000))

$8,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the state crime victim and witness assistance account created in Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1169 (legal financial obligations). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amounts appropriated in this section shall lapse.))

Sec. 716. 2023 c 475 s 745 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—WASHINGTON HORSE RACING COMMISSION OPERATING ACCOUNT

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,150,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$1,350,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,150,000))

$2,500,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The ((appropriation is))appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the Washington horse racing commission operating account created in RCW 67.16.280.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 717. A new section is added to 2023 c 475 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—CORONAVIRUS STATE FISCAL RECOVERY

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$250,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$250,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The entire coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation is provided solely to the office of financial management for allocation to state agencies for costs eligible to be paid from the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund and where funding is provided elsewhere in this act or the capital omnibus appropriations act for those costs using a funding source other than the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund. For any agency receiving an allocation under this section, the office must place an equal amount of the agency's state or other source appropriation authority in unallotted reserve status, and those amounts may not be expended. In determining the use of amounts appropriated in this section, the office of financial management shall prioritize the preservation of state general fund moneys. The office must report on the use of the amounts appropriated in this section to the fiscal committees of the legislature when all coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund moneys are expended or June 30, 2025, whichever is earlier.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 718. A new section is added to 2023 c 475 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—SKELETAL HUMAN REMAINS ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$500,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$500,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for expenditure into the skeletal human remains assistance account created in RCW 43.334.077.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 719. A new section is added to 2023 c 475 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—SURGICAL SMOKE EVACUATION ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$300,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$300,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for expenditure into the surgical smoke evacuation account created in RCW 49.17.505.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 720. A new section is added to 2023 c 475 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—WASHINGTON STATE LIBRARY OPERATIONS ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$2,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$2,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for expenditure into the Washington state library operations account created in RCW 43.07.129.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 721. A new section is added to 2023 c 475 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—QUENDALL TERMINALS SUPERFUND SITE ON LAKE WASHINGTON

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$8,500,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$8,500,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is for the remedial design for the Quendall terminals superfund site on Lake Washington. Expenditure of the appropriation is conditioned on reaching agreement with the environmental protection agency that offsets any money spent from this appropriation against any future state liability, and memorializing the agreement in an agreed order, settlement agreement, or other similar document.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 722. A new section is added to 2023 c 475 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—ELECTRIC VEHICLE ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$4,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$4,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for expenditure into the electric vehicle account created in RCW 82.44.200, which is appropriated in the transportation budget, for the completion of an electric vehicle mapping tool as provided in chapter 300, Laws of 2021 (E2SHB 1287).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 723. A new section is added to 2023 c 475 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—DOWN PAYMENT ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$250,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$250,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for expenditure into the down payment assistance account created in RCW 82.45.240.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 724. A new section is added to 2023 c 475 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—LEGISLATIVE ORAL HISTORY ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$50,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$50,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for expenditure into the legislative oral history account created in RCW 44.04.345.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 725. A new section is added to 2023 c 475 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—PORT DISTRICT EQUITY FUND

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$1,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for expenditure into the port district equity fund created in Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5955 (large port districts). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount appropriated in this section shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 726. A new section is added to 2023 c 475 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—MUNICIPAL CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$18,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$18,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for expenditure into the municipal criminal justice assistance account to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5032 (impaired driving). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount appropriated in this section shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 727. A new section is added to 2023 c 475 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—COUNTY CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$27,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$27,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for expenditure into the county criminal justice assistance account to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5032 (impaired driving). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount appropriated in this section shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 728. A new section is added to 2023 c 475 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—HEALTH PROFESSIONS ACCOUNT

Opioid Abatement Settlement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$743,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$743,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for expenditure into the health professions account created in RCW 43.70.320 to implement Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6228 (substance use treatment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts appropriated in this section shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 729. A new section is added to 2023 c 475 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—BUSINESS ENTERPRISES REVOLVING ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$83,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$85,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$168,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the business enterprises revolving account created in RCW 74.18.230. Funds in this section are provided solely for rent fees and charges for blind business enterprise program licensees at state off-campus facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 730. A new section is added to 2023 c 475 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—SECRETARY OF STATE ARCHIVES AND RECORDS MANAGEMENT CENTRAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
($1,000)

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$34,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$10,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$1,000

Other Appropriated Funds
. . . .
$13,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$57,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section reflect adjustments in agency appropriations related to corresponding adjustments in the secretary of state's billing authority for archives and records management. The office of financial management shall adjust allotments in the amounts specified, and to the state agencies specified, in LEAP omnibus document 92C-2024, dated February 18, 2024, and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 731. A new section is added to 2023 c 475 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—STATE AUDITOR AUDIT SERVICES CENTRAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$2,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$27,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$11,000

Other Appropriated Funds
. . . .
$9,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$49,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section reflect adjustments in agency appropriations related to corresponding adjustments in the state auditor's billing authority for state agency auditing services. The office of financial management shall adjust allotments in the amounts specified, and to the state agencies specified, in LEAP omnibus document 92D-2024, dated February 18, 2024, and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 732. A new section is added to 2023 c 475 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL LEGAL SERVICES CENTRAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$689,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$1,622,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$168,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$9,000

Other Appropriated Funds
. . . .
$1,072,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$3,560,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section reflect adjustments in agency appropriations related to corresponding adjustments in the attorney general's billing authority for legal services. The office of financial management shall adjust allotments in the amounts specified, and to the state agencies specified, in LEAP omnibus document 92E-2024, dated February 18, 2024, and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 733. A new section is added to 2023 c 475 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS CENTRAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$4,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$57,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$52,000

Other Appropriated Funds
. . . .
$102,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$215,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section reflect adjustments in agency appropriations related to corresponding adjustments in the office of administrative hearings' billing authority. The office of financial management shall adjust allotments in the amounts specified, and to the state agencies specified, in LEAP omnibus document 92G-2024, dated February 18, 2024, and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 734. A new section is added to 2023 c 475 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—CONSOLIDATED TECHNOLOGY SERVICES CENTRAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$1,575,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$4,367,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,164,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$75,000

Other Appropriated Funds
. . . .
$1,725,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$8,906,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section reflect adjustments in agency appropriations related to corresponding adjustments in the consolidated technology services' billing authority. The office of financial management shall adjust allotments in the amounts specified, and to the state agencies specified, in LEAP omnibus document 92J-2024, dated February 18, 2024, and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 735. A new section is added to 2023 c 475 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES CENTRAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$73,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$217,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$198,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$2,000

Other Appropriated Funds
. . . .
($7,000)

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$483,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section reflect adjustments in agency appropriations related to corresponding adjustments in the department of enterprise services' billing authority. The office of financial management shall adjust allotments in the amounts specified, and to the state agencies specified, in LEAP omnibus document 92K-2024, dated February 18, 2024, and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 736. A new section is added to 2023 c 475 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT CENTRAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2024)
. . . .
$12,688,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2025)
. . . .
$40,891,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$673,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$1,454,000

Other Appropriated Funds
. . . .
$16,960,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$72,666,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section reflect adjustments in agency appropriations related to corresponding adjustments in the office of financial management billing authority. The office of financial management shall adjust allotments in the amounts specified, and to the state agencies specified, in LEAP omnibus document 92R-2024, dated February 18, 2024, and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly.

(End of part)

PART VIII

OTHER TRANSFERS AND APPROPRIATIONS

Sec. 801. 2023 c 475 s 801 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION

General Fund Appropriation for fire insurance

premium distributions
. . . .
(($13,766,000))

$14,606,000

General Fund Appropriation for prosecuting attorney

distributions
. . . .
(($8,284,000))

$8,690,000

General Fund Appropriation for boating safety and

education distributions
. . . .
$4,272,000

General Fund Appropriation for public utility

district excise tax distributions
. . . .
(($71,825,000))

$71,424,000

Death Investigations Account Appropriation for

distribution to counties for publicly funded

autopsies
. . . .
(($4,947,000))

$6,000,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account Appropriation for

harbor improvement revenue distributions
. . . .
$140,000

Timber Tax Distribution Account Appropriation for

distribution to "timber" counties
. . . .
(($82,143,000))

$92,948,000

County Criminal Justice Assistance Appropriation
. . . .
(($129,509,000))

$129,925,000

Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Appropriation
. . . .
(($51,247,000))

$51,744,000

City-County Assistance Appropriation
. . . .
(($45,960,000))

$34,604,000

Liquor Excise Tax Account Appropriation for liquor

excise tax distribution
. . . .
$89,385,000

Columbia River Water Delivery Account Appropriation

for the Confederated Tribes of the Colville

Reservation
. . . .
$9,587,000

Columbia River Water Delivery Account Appropriation

for the Spokane Tribe of Indians
. . . .
(($6,893,000))

$6,919,000

Liquor Revolving Account Appropriation for liquor

profits distribution
. . . .
$98,876,000

General Fund Appropriation for other tax

distributions
. . . .
$104,000

Dedicated Cannabis Account Appropriation for

Cannabis Excise Tax distributions pursuant to

Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No.

5796 (cannabis revenue)
. . . .
(($50,472,000))

$52,831,000

General Fund Appropriation for Habitat Conservation

Program distributions
. . . .
$5,754,000

General Fund Appropriation for payment in lieu of

taxes to counties under Department of Fish and

Wildlife Program
. . . .
$4,496,000

Puget Sound Taxpayer Accountability Account

Appropriation for distribution to counties in

amounts not to exceed actual deposits into the

account and attributable to those counties'

share pursuant to RCW 43.79.520.
. . . .
(($27,990,000))

$28,630,000

Manufacturing and Warehousing Job Centers Account

Appropriation for distribution to local taxing

jurisdictions to mitigate the unintended

revenue redistributions effect of sourcing law

changes pursuant to chapter 83, Laws of 2021

(warehousing & manufacturing jobs).
. . . .
$7,780,000

State Crime Victim and Witness Assistance Account

Appropriation for distribution to counties. ((If

Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1169 is not

enacted by June 30, 2023, this amount shall

lapse.))
. . . .
(($4,000,000))

$8,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($717,430,000))

$726,715,000

The total expenditures from the state treasury under the appropriations in this section shall not exceed the funds available under statutory distributions for the stated purposes.

Sec. 802. 2023 c 475 s 802 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—FOR THE COUNTY CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT

Impaired Driving Safety Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,065,000))

$1,642,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($2,065,000))

$1,642,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The amount appropriated in this section shall be distributed quarterly during the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium in accordance with RCW 82.14.310. This funding is provided to counties for the costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including, but not limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving penalties); chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 208, Laws of 1998 (deferred prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998 (DUI/license suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock violations); chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication levels lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); and chapter 215, Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions).

Sec. 803. 2023 c 475 s 803 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—MUNICIPAL CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT

Impaired Driving Safety Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,377,000))

$1,095,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,377,000))

$1,095,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The amount appropriated in this section shall be distributed quarterly during the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium to all cities ratably based on population as last determined by the office of financial management. The distributions to any city that substantially decriminalizes or repeals its criminal code after July 1, 1990, and that does not reimburse the county for costs associated with criminal cases under RCW 3.50.800 or 3.50.805(2), shall be made to the county in which the city is located. This funding is provided to cities for the costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including, but not limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving penalties); chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 208, Laws of 1998 (deferred prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998 (DUI/license suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock violations); chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication levels lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); and chapter 215, Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions).

Sec. 804. 2023 c 475 s 805 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—TRANSFERS

Dedicated Cannabis Account: For transfer to the

basic health plan trust account, the lesser of

the amount determined pursuant to RCW 69.50.540

or this amount for fiscal year 2024,

(($269,000,000))$250,000,000 and this amount

for fiscal year 2025, (($278,000,000))

$270,000,000
. . . .
(($547,000,000))

$520,000,000

Dedicated Cannabis Account: For transfer to the

state general fund, the lesser of the amount

determined pursuant to RCW 69.50.540 or this

amount for fiscal year 2024, (($162,000,000))

$155,000,000 and this amount for fiscal year

2025, (($172,000,000))$170,000,000
. . . .
(($334,000,000))

$325,000,000

Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the

state general fund, in an amount not to exceed

the actual amount of the annual base payment to

the tobacco settlement account for fiscal year

2024
. . . .
$92,000,000

Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the

state general fund, in an amount not to exceed

the actual amount of the annual base payment to

the tobacco settlement account for fiscal year

2025
. . . .
$92,000,000

Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the

state general fund, in an amount not to exceed

the actual amount of the tobacco arbitration

payment to the tobacco settlement account, for

fiscal year 2024
. . . .
$24,500,000

State Treasurer's Service Account: For transfer to

the state general fund, $15,000,000 for fiscal

year 2024 and $15,000,000 for fiscal year 2025.

It is the intent of the legislature to continue

this policy in the subsequent fiscal biennium.
. . . .
$30,000,000

General Fund: For transfer to the fair fund under

RCW 15.76.115, $3,500,000 for fiscal year 2024

and $3,500,000 for fiscal year 2025
. . . .
$7,000,000

Financial Services Regulation Account: For transfer

to the state general fund, $3,500,000 for

fiscal year 2024 and $3,500,000 for fiscal year

2025. It is the intent of the legislature to

continue this policy in the subsequent fiscal

biennium.
. . . .
$7,000,000

General Fund: For transfer to the wildfire response,

forest restoration, and community resilience

account, solely for the implementation of

chapter 298, Laws of 2021 (2SHB 1168)

(long-term forest health), (($44,903,000))

$52,224,000 for fiscal year 2024 and

(($44,903,000))$60,995,000 for fiscal year

2025
. . . .
(($89,806,000))

$113,219,000

Washington Rescue Plan Transition Account: For

transfer to the state general fund,

$1,302,000,000 for fiscal year 2024
. . . .
$1,302,000,000

Business License Account: For transfer to the state

general fund, $7,200,000 for fiscal year 2025
. . . .
$7,200,000

General Fund: For transfer to the manufacturing and

warehousing job centers account pursuant to RCW

82.14.545 for distribution in section 801 of

this act, $4,320,000 for fiscal year 2024 and

$3,460,000 for fiscal year 2025
. . . .
$7,780,000

Long-Term Services and Supports Trust Account: For

transfer to the state general fund as full

repayment of the long-term services program

start-up costs and interest, in an amount not

to exceed the actual amount of the total

remaining principal and interest of the loan,

for fiscal year 2024
. . . .
(($64,281,000))

$66,000,000

General Fund: For transfer to the forest resiliency

account trust fund, $4,000,000 for fiscal year

2024
. . . .
$4,000,000

Water Pollution Control Revolving Administration

Account: For transfer to the water pollution

control revolving account, $6,000,000 for

fiscal year 2024
. . . .
$6,000,000

General Fund: For transfer to the salmon recovery

account, $3,000,000 for fiscal year 2024
. . . .
$3,000,000

Washington Student Loan Account: For transfer to the

state general fund, $40,000,000 for fiscal year

2024
. . . .
$40,000,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account: For transfer

to the state general fund, $50,000,000 for

fiscal year 2025
. . . .
$50,000,000

General Fund: For transfer to the home security

fund, $44,500,000 for fiscal year 2024 and

$4,500,000 for fiscal year 2025
. . . .
$49,000,000

General Fund: For transfer to the state drought

preparedness account, $2,000,000 for fiscal

year 2024
. . . .
$2,000,000

General Fund: For transfer to the disaster response

account, $6,725,000 for fiscal year 2024
. . . .
$6,725,000

General Fund: For transfer to the motor vehicle

account, $14,000,000 for fiscal year 2024
. . . .
$14,000,000

Washington Student Loan Account: For transfer to the

education legacy trust account, $40,000,000 for

fiscal year 2025
. . . .
$40,000,000

From auction proceeds received under RCW

70A.65.100(7)(b): For transfer to the air

quality and health disparities improvement

account, $2,500,000 for fiscal year 2024
. . . .
$2,500,000

From auction proceeds received under RCW

70A.65.100(7)(c): For transfer to the air

quality and health disparities improvement

account, $2,500,000 for fiscal year 2025
. . . .
$2,500,000

Climate Investment Account: For transfer to the

carbon emissions reduction account,

$200,000,000 for fiscal year 2025
. . . .
$200,000,000

((Climate Investment Account: For transfer to the

climate commitment account, $100,000,000 for

fiscal year 2025
. . . .
$100,000,000

Climate Investment Account: For transfer to the

natural climate solutions account, $70,000,000

for fiscal year 2025
. . . .
$70,000,000))

Climate Investment Account: For transfer to the

carbon emissions reduction account,

$324,000,000 on January 1, 2025
. . . .
$324,000,000

General Fund: For transfer to the local government

archives account, $1,900,000 for fiscal year

2025
. . . .
$1,900,000

General Fund: For transfer to the death

investigations account, $3,000,000 for fiscal

year 2025
. . . .
$3,000,000

(End of part)

PART IX

MISCELLANEOUS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 901. A new section is added to 2023 c 475 (uncodified) to read as follows:

COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS

(1) In accordance with chapters 41.80 and 41.56 RCW, agreements have been reached between the governor and organizations representing state employee bargaining units and nonstate employee bargaining units for the 2025 fiscal year presented to the legislature during the 2024 legislative session. Funding is not provided for compensation and fringe benefit provisions not presented to the legislature by the end of the 2024 legislative session. Funding is approved for agreements and awards with the following organizations:

(a) Fish and wildlife officers guild;

(b) Teamsters local 760, department of fish and wildlife sergeants; and

(c) Adult family home council, adult family home providers.

(2) In accordance with chapter 41.80 RCW, an agreement has been reached between Central Washington University, an institution of higher education, and an employee organization representing state employee bargaining units for the 2025 fiscal year and funding is provided in Part VI of this act for the agreement with the following organization: Central Washington University agreement with the campus police officers & sergeants.

(3) Expenditures for agreements in subsections (1) and (2) of this section may also be funded from nonappropriated accounts. If positions are funded with lidded grants or dedicated fund sources with insufficient revenue, additional funding from other sources is not provided.

Sec. 902. 2023 c 475 s 908 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

COMPENSATION—REPRESENTED EMPLOYEES—HEALTH CARE COALITION—INSURANCE BENEFITS

(1)(a) An agreement was reached for the 2023-2025 biennium between the governor and the health care coalition under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW. Appropriations in this act for state agencies, including institutions of higher education, are sufficient to implement the provisions of the 2023-2025 collective bargaining agreement, which maintains the provisions of the prior agreement.

(b) Appropriations for state agencies in this act are sufficient for represented employees outside the coalition and for nonrepresented state employee health benefits.

(2) The appropriations for state agencies in this act are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit premiums, public employees' benefits board administration, and the uniform medical plan, shall not exceed $1,145 per eligible employee for fiscal year 2024. For fiscal year 2025, the monthly employer funding rate shall not exceed (($1,191))$1,174 per eligible employee. These rates are sufficient to separate vision benefits out of medical plans into stand-alone vision insurance and increase the hardware benefit to $200 every two years, beginning January 1, 2025, and sufficient to cover in the uniform medical plan, effective July 1, 2023, coverage with no cost share for up to two over the counter COVID-19 tests for each member each month. The rates are sufficient to cover a diabetes management program and apply the cost-share provisions outlined in chapter 366, Laws of 2023 (breast examinations—health plan cost sharing) in the uniform medical plan, effective January 1, 2025. The rates are not sufficient to add coverage of prescription drugs for the treatment of obesity or weight loss. The authority shall not add coverage of prescription drugs for the treatment of obesity or weight loss without a specific appropriation from the legislature. Nothing in this section requires removal of any existing coverage of prescription drugs to treat diabetes.

(b) The board shall collect a $25 per month surcharge payment from members who use tobacco products and a surcharge payment of not less than $50 per month from members who cover a spouse or domestic partner where the spouse or domestic partner has chosen not to enroll in another employer-based group health insurance that has benefits and premiums with an actuarial value of not less than 95 percent of the actuarial value of the public employees' benefits board plan with the largest enrollment. The surcharge payments shall be collected in addition to the member premium payment.

(c) The health care authority, subject to the approval of the public employees' benefits board, shall provide subsidies for health benefit premiums to eligible retired or disabled public employees and school district employees who are eligible for medicare, pursuant to RCW 41.05.085. For calendar years 2024 and 2025, the subsidy shall be up to $183 per month. Funds from reserves accumulated for future adverse claims experience, from past favorable claims experience, or otherwise, may not be used to increase this retiree subsidy beyond what is authorized in this subsection.

(d) School districts and educational service districts shall remit to the health care authority for deposit into the public employees' and retirees' insurance account established in RCW 41.05.120 the following amounts:

(i) For each full-time employee, $68.41 per month beginning September 1, 2023, and (($78.58))$80.38 beginning September 1, 2024;

(ii) For each part-time employee, who at the time of the remittance is employed in an eligible position as defined in RCW 41.32.010 or 41.40.010 and is eligible for employer fringe benefit contributions for basic benefits, $68.41 each month beginning September 1, 2023, and (($78.58))$80.38 beginning September 1, 2024, prorated by the proportion of employer fringe benefit contributions for a full-time employee that the part-time employee receives. The remittance requirements specified in this subsection do not apply to employees of a school district or educational service district who purchase insurance benefits through contracts with the health care authority.

(e) The board has the authority to forgo the federal retiree drug subsidy collected under RCW 41.05.068 for uniform medical plan classic medicare, only to leverage additional federal subsidies via adoption of a medicare part D employer group waiver plan to help reduce premiums for medicare retirees enrolled in uniform medical plan classic medicare.

Sec. 903. 2023 c 475 s 909 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

COMPENSATION—SCHOOL EMPLOYEES—INSURANCE BENEFITS

An agreement was reached for the 2023-2025 biennium between the governor and the school employee coalition under the provisions of chapters 41.56 and 41.59 RCW. Appropriations in this act for allocations to school districts are sufficient to implement the provisions of the 2023-2025 collective bargaining agreement, which maintains the provisions of the prior agreement, and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit premiums, school employees' benefits board administration, retiree remittance, and the uniform medical plan, shall not exceed the rates identified in section 506(4) of this act.

(a) These rates are sufficient to cover, effective January 1, 2024:

(i) The following in the uniform medical plan:

(A) Offering a diabetes management program; and

(B) Effective July 1, 2023, coverage with no cost share for up to two over the counter COVID-19 tests for each member each month; and

(ii) The following in the uniform dental plan:

(A) Increasing the temporomandibular joint benefit to $1,000 annually and $5,000 per lifetime;

(B) Eliminating the deductible for children up to age 15;

(C) Covering composite fillings on posterior teeth; and

(D) Increasing plan coverage of crowns to 70 percent.

(b) These rates include funding to cover, effective January 1, 2025, ((increasing)):

(i) Increasing the stand-alone vision insurance hardware benefit to $200 every 2 years; and

(ii) Applying the cost share provisions outlined in chapter 366, Laws of 2023 (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5396) in the uniform medical plan.

(c) The rates are not sufficient to add coverage of prescription drugs for the treatment of obesity or weight loss. The authority shall not add coverage of prescription drugs for the treatment of obesity or weight loss without a specific appropriation from the legislature. Nothing in this section requires removal of any existing coverage of prescription drugs to treat diabetes.

(2) Rates established in subsection (1) of this section are sufficient to reduce member costs as provided in article 1.3 of the school employees health care funding agreement.

(3) Except as provided by the parties' health care agreement, in order to achieve the level of funding provided for health benefits, the school employees' benefits board shall require any or all of the following: Employee premium copayments, increases in point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of managed competition, or other changes to benefits consistent with RCW 41.05.740. The board shall collect a $25 per month surcharge payment from members who use tobacco products and a surcharge payment of not less than $50 per month from members who cover a spouse or domestic partner where the spouse or domestic partner has chosen not to enroll in another employer-based group health insurance that has benefits and premiums with an actuarial value of not less than 95 percent of the actuarial value of the public employees' benefits board plan with the largest enrollment. The surcharge payments shall be collected in addition to the member premium payment.

(4) The health care authority shall deposit any moneys received on behalf of the school employees' medical plan as a result of rebates on prescription drugs, audits of hospitals, subrogation payments, or any other moneys recovered as a result of prior uniform medical plan claims payments, into the school employees' and retirees' insurance account to be used for insurance benefits. Such receipts may not be used for administrative expenditures.

(5) When bargaining for funding for school employees health benefits for subsequent fiscal biennia, any proposal agreed upon must assume the imposition of a $25 per month surcharge payment from members who use tobacco products and a surcharge payment of not less than $50 per month from members who cover a spouse or domestic partner where the spouse or domestic partner has chosen not to enroll in another employer-based group health insurance that has benefits and premiums with an actuarial value of not less than 95 percent of the actuarial value of the public employees' benefits board plan with the largest enrollment. The surcharge payments shall be collected in addition to the member premium payment.

Sec. 904. 2023 c 475 s 911 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

COMPENSATION—PENSION CONTRIBUTIONS

The appropriations in this act for school districts and state agencies, including institutions of higher education, are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Appropriations are adjusted to reflect changes to agency appropriations to reflect pension contribution rates adopted by the pension funding council and the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2 board, and as adjusted under Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5294 (plan 1 UAAL rates).

(2) An increase of 0.12 percent is funded for state employer contributions to the public employees' retirement system, the public safety employees' retirement systems, and the school employees' retirement system, and an increase of 0.23 percent for employer contributions to the teachers' retirement system is funded for the provisions of Senate Bill No. 5350 (providing a benefit increase to certain retirees of the public employees' retirement system plan 1 and the teachers' retirement system plan 1). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, this subsection is null and void and appropriations for school districts and state agencies, including institutions of higher education, shall be held in unallotted status.

(3) An increase of 0.13 percent is funded for state employer contributions to the Washington state patrol retirement system and an increase of 0.01 percent is funded for state contributions to the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2 for the provisions of Substitute House Bill No. 1007 (military service credit). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, this subsection is null and void and appropriations for state agencies shall be held in unallotted status.

(4) An increase of 0.01 percent for school district and state employer contributions is funded for the teachers' retirement system for the provisions of Substitute House Bill No. 1056 (postretirement employment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, this subsection is null and void and appropriations for state agencies shall be held in unallotted status.

(5) An increase of 0.13 percent is funded for state employer contributions to the public safety employees' retirement system for the provisions of chapter 199, Laws of 2023 (public safety telecommunicators).

(6) An increase of 0.03 percent is funded for state employer contributions to the public safety employees' retirement system for the provisions of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6106 (DSHS workers/PSERS). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, this subsection is null and void and appropriations for state agencies shall be held in unallotted status.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 905. A new section is added to 2023 c 475 (uncodified) to read as follows:

(1) The office of financial management must convene a task force to identify, plan, and make recommendations on the conversion of the Larch corrections center property and facilities to an alternate use.

(2) The task force must include the state senator and a state representative whose district represents the Yacolt community.

(3) The task force must include representatives from the following entities and organizations:

(a) The Clark county commissioners;

(b) The tribe located nearest to the facility;

(c) The Clark county sheriff's office;

(d) A citizen residing near the Larch corrections center, chosen by the Clark county commissioners;

(e) The department of corrections;

(f) The department of ecology;

(g) The department of natural resources;

(h) The department of social and health services;

(i) The department of enterprise services; and

(j) The office of financial management.

(4) The task force must meet at least every other month, and the first meeting must be held by July 31, 2024.

(5) The task force shall report its findings and a prioritized list of recommendations to the governor and the fiscal committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025.

(6) Task force members that are not elected officials or a representative of a governmental entity may be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with chapter 43.03 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 906. A new section is added to 2023 c 475 (uncodified) to read as follows:

(1) The joint legislative task force on the underground economy in the Washington state construction industry is reestablished.

(2) For purposes of this section, "underground economy" means contracting and construction activities in which payroll is unreported or underreported with consequent nonpayment of payroll taxes to federal and state agencies including nonpayment of workers' compensation and unemployment compensation taxes.

(3) The task force shall study the nature and scope of the underground economy and recommend what policy changes, if any, are needed to address the underground economy, including whether greater cohesion and transparency among state agencies is needed. To assist the task force in achieving this goal and to determine the extent of and projected costs to the state and workers of the underground economy in the construction industry, the task force may contract with the institute for public policy, or, if the institute is unavailable, another entity with expertise capable of providing such assistance.

(4)(a) The task force shall consist of the following members:

(i) A member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate appointed by the president of the senate;

(ii) A member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;

(iii) Four members representing the construction business, selected from nominations submitted by statewide construction business organizations and appointed jointly by the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives;

(iv) Four members representing construction laborers, selected from nominations submitted by statewide labor organizations and appointed jointly by the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives; and

(v) One representative from the office of the attorney general.

(b) In addition, the employment security department, the department of labor and industries, and the department of revenue shall cooperate with the task force and shall each maintain a liaison representative, who will be a nonvoting member of the task force. The departments shall cooperate with the task force and the institute for public policy, or other entity as appropriate, and shall provide information and data as the task force or the institute, or other entity as appropriate, may reasonably request.

(c) The legislative members will choose the chair or cochairs of the task force from among its legislative membership at the initial meeting. The legislative staff will schedule the initial meeting of the task force at a time and date agreed to by the legislative members.

(5)(a) The task force shall use legislative facilities and staff support shall be provided by senate committee services and the house of representatives office of program research. Within available funding, the task force may hire additional staff with specific technical expertise if such expertise is necessary to carry out the mandates of this study.

(b) Legislative members of the task force shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members, except those representing an employer or organization, are entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(c) The expenses of the task force will be paid jointly by the senate and house of representatives. Task force expenditures are subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their successor committees.

(6) The task force shall report its findings and recommendations to the legislature by June 30, 2025.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 907. A new section is added to 2023 c 475 (uncodified) to read as follows:

(1) Agencies may not expend funds from the: (a) Climate investment account; (b) climate commitment account; (c) natural climate solutions account; or (d) air quality and health disparities improvement account, on or after the effective date of chapter . . . (Initiative Measure No. 2117), Laws of 2025.

(2) Unspent appropriations in the 2023-2025 omnibus appropriations act, chapter 475, Laws of 2023 and chapter . . ., Laws of 2024 (this act), which are appropriated from the accounts listed in subsection (1)(a) through (d) of this section and which take effect before January 1, 2025, must thereafter be paid from the consolidated climate account as if they were appropriated from that account.

(3) Appropriations in this act from the accounts listed in subsection (1)(a) through (d) of this section which take effect on or after January 1, 2025, shall lapse.

(4) This section takes effect only if chapter . . . (Initiative Measure No. 2117), Laws of 2025, is approved by the voters at the next general election and certified by the secretary of state.

Sec. 908. RCW 28B.93.060 and 2023 c 475 s 924 and 2023 c 389 s 7 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) The Washington student loan account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from the Washington student loan program must be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for administration and the issuance of new student loans. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the Washington student loan account to the state general fund, the workforce education investment account, and the education legacy trust account.

(2)(a) The legislature may appropriate no more than a total of $40,000,000 for the program during four consecutive fiscal years, beginning with the first fiscal year from which loans are issued from the account. In the fifth fiscal year following the fiscal year in which the first student loan was issued, the legislature may appropriate up to $10,000,000 for the program.

(b) The legislature may appropriate moneys from the account for the administrative and implementation costs of the program in the fiscal years prior to the first fiscal year in which loans are issued from the account.

Sec. 909. RCW 43.79.567 and 2023 c 435 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The community reinvestment account is created in the state treasury. Revenues to the account shall consist of appropriations and transfers by the legislature and all other moneys directed for deposit into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.

(2) Expenditures from the account may be used by the department of commerce for:

(a) Economic development, which includes addressing wealth disparities to promote asset building such as home ownership and expanding access to financial resources including, but not limited to, grants and loans for small businesses and entrepreneurs, financial literacy training, and other small business training and support activities;

(b) Civil and criminal legal assistance to provide postconviction relief and case assistance, including the expungement of criminal records and vacation of criminal convictions;

(c) Community-based violence intervention and prevention services, which may include after-school programs focused on providing education and mentorship to youths;

(d) Reentry services to facilitate successful transitions for persons formerly incarcerated in an adult correctional facility or juvenile residential facility in Washington; and

(e) Beginning July 1, 2025, agricultural and economic support and services available to historically marginalized communities.

(3) The distribution of the grants under this section must be done in collaboration with "by and for community organizations" as defined by the department of commerce and the office of equity. For the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the grants distributed under this section must be done in collaboration with "by and for community organizations" including Asian, native Hawaiian, and Pacific islander organizations.

Sec. 910. RCW 43.101.220 and 2021 c 334 s 978 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The corrections personnel of the state and all counties and municipal corporations initially employed on or after January 1, 1982, shall engage in basic corrections training which complies with standards adopted by the commission. The standards adopted must provide for basic corrections training of at least ten weeks in length for any corrections officers subject to the certification requirement under RCW ((43.101.096))43.101.095 who are hired on or after July 1, 2021, or on an earlier date set by the commission. The training shall be successfully completed during the first six months of employment of the personnel, unless otherwise extended or waived by the commission, and shall be requisite to the continuation of employment.

(2) The commission shall provide the training required in this section, together with facilities, supplies, materials, and the room and board for noncommuting attendees, except during the ((2017-2019, 2019-2021, and)) 2021-2023 and 2023-2025 fiscal biennia, when the employing county, municipal corporation, or state agency shall reimburse the commission for twenty-five percent of the cost of training its personnel.

(3)(a) Subsections (1) and (2) of this section do not apply to the Washington state department of corrections prisons division. The Washington state department of corrections is responsible for identifying training standards, designing curricula and programs, and providing the training for those corrections personnel employed by it. In doing so, the secretary of the department of corrections shall consult with staff development experts and correctional professionals both inside and outside of the agency, to include soliciting input from labor organizations.

(b) The commission and the department of corrections share the responsibility of developing and defining training standards and providing training for community corrections officers employed within the community corrections division of the department of corrections.

Sec. 911. RCW 67.16.280 and 2016 c 160 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The Washington horse racing commission operating account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts collected by the commission under RCW 67.16.105(2) must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the operating expenses of the commission and, for the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, for purposes set forth in subsection (3) of this section. Only the commission or the commission's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

(b) The commission has the authority to receive such gifts, grants, and endowments from public or private sources as may be made from time to time in trust or otherwise for the use and purpose of regulating or supporting nonprofit race meets as set forth in RCW 67.16.130 and 67.16.105(1); such gifts, grants, and endowments must also be deposited into the horse racing commission operating account and expended according to the terms of such gift, grant, or endowment.

(2) ((In))Except during fiscal year 2025, in order to provide funding in support of the legislative findings in RCW 67.16.101 (1) through (3), and to provide additional necessary support to the nonprofit race meets beyond the funding provided by RCW 67.16.101(4) and 67.16.102(2), the commission is authorized to spend up to three hundred thousand dollars per fiscal year from its operating account for the purpose of developing the equine industry, maintaining and upgrading racing facilities, and assisting equine health research. When determining how to allocate the funds available for these purposes, the commission must give first consideration to uses that regulate and assist the nonprofit race meets and equine health research. These expenditures may occur only when sufficient funds remain for the continued operations of the horse racing commission.

(3)(a) For fiscal years 2024 and 2025, expenditures from the account must be used for the operating expenses of the commission, with the remaining amount distributed annually as follows:

(i) 10 percent for grants to nonprofit entities involved with equine rescue and rehoming organizations; and

(ii) 90 percent to class 1 racing associations allocated by grant by the commission only for payment of the annual horse racing integrity and safety authority gross assessment for Washington state. The gross assessment may include required expenses for veterinarians, advanced life support ambulances, advanced life support ambulance staff, and emergency medical technicians.

(b) By December 1, 2024, the commission must report to the appropriate committees of the legislature on the use of grant funds and criteria used to determine grant awards established in (a) of this subsection and uses of funds distributed to the commission for operating expenses.

(c) It is the intent of the legislature to continue the provisions of (a) of this subsection in subsequent fiscal biennia.

Sec. 912. RCW 69.50.540 and 2023 c 470 s 1015 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For the purposes of this subsection (1), the legislature must appropriate the amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) $12,500,000 annually to the board for administration of this chapter as appropriated in the omnibus appropriations act;

(b) $11,000,000 annually to the department of health for the following:

(i) Creation, implementation, operation, and management of a cannabis, vapor product, and commercial tobacco education and public health program that contains the following:

(A) A cannabis use public health hotline that provides referrals to substance abuse treatment providers, uses evidence-based or research-based public health approaches to minimizing the harms associated with cannabis use, and does not solely advocate an abstinence-only approach;

(B) Programs that support development and implementation of coordinated intervention strategies for the prevention and reduction of commercial tobacco, vapor product, and cannabis use by youth and cannabis cessation treatment services, including grant programs to local health departments or other local community agencies;

(C) Media-based education campaigns across television, internet, radio, print, and out-of-home advertising, separately targeting youth and adults, that provide medically and scientifically accurate information about the health and safety risks posed by cannabis use; and

(D) Outreach to priority populations regarding commercial tobacco, vapor product, and cannabis use, prevention, and cessation; and

(ii) The Washington poison control center;

(c)(i) $3,000,000 annually to the department of commerce to fund cannabis social equity grants under RCW 43.330.540; and

(ii) $200,000 annually to the department of commerce to fund technical assistance through a roster of mentors under RCW 43.330.540;

(d) $200,000 annually, until June 30, 2032, to the health care authority to contract with the Washington state institute for public policy to conduct the cost-benefit evaluations and produce the reports described in RCW 69.50.550;

(e) $25,000 annually to the University of Washington alcohol and drug abuse institute for the creation, maintenance, and timely updating of web-based public education materials providing medically and scientifically accurate information about the health and safety risks posed by cannabis use;

(f) $300,000 annually to the University of Washington and $175,000 annually to the Washington State University for research on the short-term and long-term effects of cannabis use to include, but not be limited to, formal and informal methods for estimating and measuring intoxication and impairments, and for the dissemination of such research;

(g) $550,000 annually to the office of the superintendent of public instruction to fund grants to building bridges programs under chapter 28A.175 RCW;

(h) For fiscal year 2025, $250,000 to the office of the superintendent of public instruction to fund grants for life skills training to children and youth, and it is the intent of the legislature to continue this policy in subsequent fiscal biennia;

(i) $782,000 for fiscal year 2025 to the department of ecology to create and sustain a program to accredit cannabis testing laboratories. It is the intent of the legislature that this policy will be continued in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium;

(j) $2,423,000 for fiscal year 2022 and $2,423,000 for fiscal year 2023 to the Washington state patrol for a drug enforcement task force;

(((i)))(k) $270,000 for fiscal year 2022 and $290,000 for fiscal year 2023 to the department of ecology for implementation of accreditation of cannabis product testing laboratories;

(((j)))(l) $800,000 for each of fiscal years 2020 through 2023 to the department of health for the administration of the cannabis authorization database; ((and

(k)))(m) $621,000 for fiscal year 2022 and $635,000 for fiscal year 2023 to the department of agriculture for compliance-based laboratory analysis of pesticides in cannabis.

(2) ((Subsections [Subsection]))Subsection (1)(a) through (g) of this section must be adjusted annually based on the United States bureau of labor statistics' consumer price index for the Seattle area.

(3) After appropriation of the amounts identified in subsection (1) of this section, the legislature must annually appropriate such remaining amounts for the purposes listed in this subsection (3) as follows:

(a) Fifty-two percent to the state basic health plan trust account to be administered by the Washington basic health plan administrator and used as provided under chapter 70.47 RCW;

(b) Eleven percent to the health care authority to:

(i) Design and administer the Washington state healthy youth survey, analyze the collected data, and produce reports, in collaboration with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, department of health, department of commerce, family policy council, and board. The survey must be conducted at least every two years and include questions regarding, but not necessarily limited to, academic achievement, age at time of substance use initiation, antisocial behavior of friends, attitudes toward antisocial behavior, attitudes toward substance use, laws and community norms regarding antisocial behavior, family conflict, family management, parental attitudes toward substance use, peer rewarding of antisocial behavior, perceived risk of substance use, and rebelliousness. Funds disbursed under this subsection may be used to expand administration of the healthy youth survey to student populations attending institutions of higher education in Washington;

(ii) Develop, implement, maintain, and evaluate programs and practices aimed at the prevention or reduction of maladaptive substance use, substance use disorder, substance abuse or substance dependence, as these terms are defined in the diagnostic and statistical manual of mental disorders, among middle school and high school-age students, whether as an explicit goal of a given program or practice or as a consistently corresponding effect of its implementation, mental health services for children and youth, and services for pregnant and parenting women. In deciding which programs and practices to fund under this subsection (3)(b)(ii), the director of the health care authority must consult, at least annually, with the University of Washington's social development research group and the University of Washington's alcohol and drug abuse institute; and

(iii) Contract with community health centers to provide primary health and dental care services, migrant health services, and maternity health care services as provided under RCW 41.05.220;

(c)(i) One and one-half percent to counties, cities, and towns where licensed cannabis retailers are physically located. Each jurisdiction must receive a share of the revenue distribution under this subsection (3)(c)(i) based on the proportional share of the total revenues generated in the individual jurisdiction from the taxes collected under RCW 69.50.535, from licensed cannabis retailers physically located in each jurisdiction. For purposes of this subsection (3)(c), 100 percent of the proportional amount attributed to a retailer physically located in a city or town must be distributed to the city or town;

(ii) Three and one-half percent to counties, cities, and towns ratably on a per capita basis. Counties must receive 60 percent of the distribution based on each county's total proportional population. Funds may only be distributed to jurisdictions that do not prohibit the siting of any state licensed cannabis producer, processor, or retailer;

(iii) By September 15th of each year, the board must provide the state treasurer the annual distribution amount made under this subsection (3)(c), if any, for each county and city as determined in (c)(i) and (ii) of this subsection; and

(iv) Distribution amounts allocated to each county, city, and town in (c)(i) and (ii) of this subsection must be distributed in four installments by the last day of each fiscal quarter; and

(d) Thirty-two percent must be deposited in the state general fund.

Sec. 913. RCW 70A.65.250 and 2023 c 475 s 938 and 2023 c 435 s 12 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The climate investment account is created in the state treasury. Except as otherwise provided in chapter 316, Laws of 2021, all receipts from the auction of allowances authorized in this chapter must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.

(b) Projects or activities funded from the account must meet high labor standards, including family sustaining wages, providing benefits including health care and employer-contributed retirement plans, career development opportunities, and maximize access to economic benefits from such projects for local workers and diverse businesses. Each contracting entity's proposal must be reviewed for equity and opportunity improvement efforts, including: (i) Employer paid sick leave programs; (ii) pay practices in relation to living wage indicators such as the federal poverty level; (iii) efforts to evaluate pay equity based on gender identity, race, and other protected status under Washington law; (iv) facilitating career development opportunities, such as apprenticeship programs, internships, job-shadowing, and on-the-job training; and (v) employment assistance and employment barriers for justice affected individuals.

(2) Moneys in the account may be used only for projects and programs that achieve the purposes of the greenhouse gas emissions cap and invest program established under this chapter and for tribal capacity grants under RCW 70A.65.305. During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, moneys in the account may also be used for tribal capacity grant activities supporting climate resilience and adaptation, developing tribal clean energy projects, applying for state or federal grant funding, and other related work; and for providing reimbursement to agricultural fuel users. Moneys in the account as described in this subsection must first be appropriated for the administration of the requirements of this chapter, in an amount not to exceed five percent of the total receipt of funds from allowance auction proceeds under this chapter. Beginning July 1, 2023, and annually thereafter, the state treasurer shall distribute funds in the account that exceed the amounts appropriated for the purposes of this subsection (2) as follows:

(a) Seventy-five percent of the moneys to the climate commitment account created in RCW 70A.65.260; and

(b) Twenty-five percent of the moneys to the natural climate solutions account created in RCW 70A.65.270.

(3) The allocations specified in subsection (2)(a) and (b) of this section must be reviewed by the legislature on a biennial basis based on the changing needs of the state in meeting its clean economy and greenhouse gas reduction goals in a timely, economically advantageous, and equitable manner.

(4) During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the climate investment account to the carbon emissions reduction account, the climate commitment account, and the natural climate solutions account.

Sec. 914. RCW 70A.65.300 and 2021 c 316 s 46 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department shall prepare, post on the department website, and submit to the appropriate committees of the legislature an annual report that identifies all distributions of moneys from the accounts created in RCW 70A.65.240 through 70A.65.280.

(2) The report must identify, at a minimum, the recipient of the funding, the amount of the funding, the purpose of the funding, the actual end result or use of the funding, whether the project that received the funding produced any verifiable reduction in greenhouse gas emissions or other long-term impact to emissions, and if so, the quantity of reduced greenhouse gas emissions, the cost per carbon dioxide equivalent metric ton of reduced greenhouse gas emissions, and a comparison to other greenhouse gas emissions reduction projects in order to facilitate the development of cost-benefit ratios for greenhouse gas emissions reduction projects.

(3) The department shall require by rule that recipients of funds from the accounts created in RCW 70A.65.240 through 70A.65.280 report to the department, in a form and manner prescribed by the department, the information required for the department to carry out the department's duties established in this section.

(4) The department shall update its website with the information described in subsection (2) of this section as appropriate but no less frequently than once per calendar year.

(5) The department shall submit its report to the appropriate committees of the legislature with the information described in subsection (2) of this section no later than September 30 of each year. For fiscal year 2025, the report must be submitted no later than November 30, 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 915. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 916. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---