BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.79.120 and 1994 c 164 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:

The director shall employ deputy inspectors who ((shall)) have ((had))met at the time of appointment ((not less than five years practical experience in the construction, maintenance, repair, or operation of high pressure boilers and unfired pressure vessels as a mechanical engineer, steam engineer, boilermaker, or boiler inspector))the qualification requirements for a commission as set forth by the national board of boiler and pressure vessel inspectors, and who shall have passed the examination provided for in RCW 70.79.170.

--- END ---