BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Eligible student" means a student who:

(a) Is a resident student, as defined in RCW 28B.15.012;

(b) Is enrolled in a short-term workforce credential in an in-demand industry;

(c) Is enrolled in a noncredit bearing educational program that is ineligible for federal or state financial aid; and

(d) Has not yet earned a baccalaureate degree.

(2) "In-demand industry" means an industry with a nexus to the retail sector.

(3) "Institutions of higher education" has the same meaning as in RCW 28B.92.030.

(4) "Office" means the office of student financial assistance.

(5) "Program" means the Washington career skills grant program.

(6) "Short-term workforce credential" means a high quality noncredit-bearing short-term workforce credential as determined by the office with a clear workforce benefit. The credential must be able to be completed in 12 months or less.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) The Washington career skills grant program is established for the purpose of incentivizing the creation of short-term and micro credentialing opportunities and programs relevant to the retail sector by providing grants to eligible students enrolled in these high quality short-term workforce credential programs.

(2) The office shall administer the program. In administering the program, the office's powers and duties may include, but are not limited to:

(a) Establishing a grant maximum, not to exceed the maximum Washington college grant as defined in RCW 28B.92.030, plus $500 for books and supplies;

(b) Developing a process for collecting the necessary data to evaluate the effectiveness of the program. This may include entering into data-sharing agreements with the participating institutions of higher education, program participants, the education research and data center, and the employment security department to monitor program participant outcomes;

(c) Adopting the rules necessary to carry out the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. (1) Subject to amounts appropriated specifically for this purpose, the office may award program grant funds to eligible students. Grants may not:

(a) Exceed the grant maximum established by the office;

(b) Exceed the student's cost of attendance, when combined with all other public and private grants, scholarships, and waiver assistance the student receives; and

(c) Extend beyond one year or 125 percent of the published program length.

(2) Students and participating institutions of higher education must comply with all the rules adopted by the office for the administration of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. Beginning October 1, 2025, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the office shall annually report to the appropriate committees of the legislature the following:

(1) The names of each participating institution of higher education and the eligible short-term workforce credentials at each participating institution;

(2) The number of students eligible and the number of students who participated in the program each academic year along with student demographic characteristics;

(3) Data on program completion and credential attainment by students who participated in the grant program; and

(4) Precredential and postcredential completion wage data for program participants.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. A new section is added to chapter 43.131 RCW to read as follows:

The Washington career skills grant program is terminated July 1, 2029, as provided in section 7 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. A new section is added to chapter 43.131 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed, effective July 1, 2030:

(1) RCW 28B.--.--- and 2024 c . . . s 1 (section 1 of this act);

(2) RCW 28B.--.--- and 2024 c . . . s 2 (section 2 of this act);

(3) RCW 28B.--.--- and 2024 c . . . s 3 (section 3 of this act); and

(4) RCW 28B.--.--- and 2024 c . . . s 4 (section 4 of this act).

--- END ---