BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.64.246 and 2013 c 19 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) To every box, bottle, jar, tube, or other container of a prescription which is dispensed there shall be fixed a label bearing the name and address of the dispensing pharmacy, the prescription number, the name of the prescriber, the prescriber's directions, the name and strength of the medication, the name of the patient, the date, and the expiration date. The security of the cover or cap on every bottle or jar shall meet safety standards adopted by the commission. At the prescriber's request, the name and strength of the medication need not be shown. If the prescription is for a combination medication product, the generic names of the medications combined or the trade name used by the manufacturer or distributor for the product shall be noted on the label. The identification of the licensed pharmacist responsible for each dispensing of medication must either be recorded in the pharmacy's record system or on the prescription label. This section shall not apply to the dispensing of medications to inpatients in hospitals.

(2)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, at a prescriber's request, the prescription label for abortion medications may include a prescriber's national practitioner identification number or health care facility name instead of the name of the prescriber.

(b) For the purposes of this subsection, "abortion medications" means substances used in the course of medical treatment intended to induce the termination of a pregnancy including, but not limited to, mifepristone.

(3) A person violating this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

Sec. 2. RCW 69.41.050 and 2003 c 53 s 325 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) To every box, bottle, jar, tube, or other container of a legend drug, which is dispensed by a practitioner authorized to prescribe legend drugs, there shall be affixed a label bearing the name of the prescriber, complete directions for use, the name of the drug either by the brand or generic name and strength per unit dose, name of patient and date: PROVIDED, That the practitioner may omit the name and dosage of the drug if he or she determines that his or her patient should not have this information and that, if the drug dispensed is a trial sample in its original package and which is labeled in accordance with federal law or regulation, there need be set forth additionally only the name of the issuing practitioner and the name of the patient.

(2)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, at a prescriber's request, the prescription label for abortion medications may include a prescriber's national practitioner identification number or health care facility name instead of the name of the prescriber.

(b) For the purposes of this subsection, "abortion medications" means substances used in the course of medical treatment intended to induce the termination of a pregnancy including, but not limited to, mifepristone.

(3) A violation of this section is a misdemeanor.

--- END ---