BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9.68A.011 and 2010 c 227 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) An "internet session" means a period of time during which an internet user, using a specific internet protocol address, visits or is logged into an internet site for an uninterrupted period of time.

(2) To "photograph" means to make a print, negative, slide, digital image, motion picture, or videotape. A "photograph" means anything tangible or intangible produced by photographing.

(3) "Visual or printed matter" means any photograph or other material that contains a reproduction of a photograph.

(4) "Sexually explicit conduct" means actual or simulated:

(a) Sexual intercourse, including genital-genital, oral-genital, anal-genital, or oral-anal, whether between persons of the same or opposite sex or between humans and animals;

(b) Penetration of the vagina or rectum by any object;

(c) Masturbation;

(d) Sadomasochistic abuse;

(e) Defecation or urination for the purpose of sexual stimulation of the viewer;

(f) Depiction of the genitals or unclothed pubic or rectal areas of any minor, or the unclothed breast of a female minor, for the purpose of sexual stimulation of the viewer. For the purposes of this subsection (4)(f), it is not necessary that the minor know that he or she is participating in the described conduct, or any aspect of it; and

(g) Touching of a person's clothed or unclothed genitals, pubic area, buttocks, or breast area for the purpose of sexual stimulation of the viewer.

(5) "Minor" means any person under eighteen years of age.

(6) "Live performance" means any play, show, skit, dance, or other exhibition performed or presented to or before an audience of one or more, with or without consideration.

(7) "Fabricated depiction of a minor" and "fabricated depiction" mean any visual or printed matter that depicts a minor who is identifiable from the matter itself or from information displayed with or otherwise connected to the matter, and that was created or altered by digitization to depict the minor engaging in sexually explicit conduct in which the minor did not actually engage.

(8) "Digitization" means creating or altering any visual or printed matter depicting a minor in a realistic manner utilizing images of another person or computer-generated images, regardless of whether such creation or alteration is accomplished manually or through an automated process. "Digitization" includes, but is not limited to, creation or alteration of any visual or printed matter by using artificial intelligence software.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 9.68A RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) A person 18 years of age or older commits the crime of dealing in fabricated depictions of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the first degree when he or she:

(i) Knowingly develops, duplicates, publishes, prints, disseminates, exchanges, finances, attempts to finance, or sells a fabricated depiction of a minor engaged in an act of sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (a) through (e); or

(ii) Possesses with intent to develop, duplicate, publish, print, disseminate, exchange, or sell any fabricated depiction of a minor engaged in an act of sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (a) through (e).

(b) Dealing in fabricated depictions of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the first degree is a class B felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(c) For the purposes of determining the unit of prosecution under this subsection, each depiction or image of visual or printed matter constitutes a separate offense.

(2)(a) A person 18 years of age or older commits the crime of dealing in fabricated depictions of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the second degree when he or she:

(i) Knowingly develops, duplicates, publishes, prints, disseminates, exchanges, finances, attempts to finance, or sells any fabricated depiction of a minor engaged in an act of sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (f) or (g); or

(ii) Possesses with intent to develop, duplicate, publish, print, disseminate, exchange, or sell any fabricated depiction of a minor engaged in an act of sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (f) or (g).

(b) Dealing in fabricated depictions of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the second degree is a class B felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(c) For the purposes of determining the unit of prosecution under this subsection, each incident of dealing in one or more depictions or images of visual or printed matter constitutes a separate offense.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 9.68A RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a)(i) A person under the age of 18 commits the crime of a minor dealing in fabricated depictions of another minor 13 years of age or older engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the first degree when he or she knowingly distributes, publishes, transfers, disseminates, or exchanges a fabricated depiction of another minor 13 years of age or older engaged in an act of sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (a) through (e).

(ii) Minor dealing in fabricated depictions of another minor 13 years of age or older engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the first degree is a gross misdemeanor.

(b)(i) A person under the age of 18 commits the crime of a minor dealing in fabricated depictions of another minor 13 years of age or older engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the second degree when he or she knowingly distributes, publishes, transfers, disseminates, or exchanges a fabricated depiction of another minor 13 years of age or older engaged in an act of sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (f) or (g).

(ii) Minor dealing in fabricated depictions of another minor 13 years of age or older engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the second degree is a misdemeanor.

(2)(a) A person under age 18 commits the crime of minor dealing in fabricated depictions of another minor 12 years of age or younger engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the first degree when he or she:

(i) Knowingly develops, duplicates, publishes, prints, disseminates, exchanges, finances, attempts to finance, or sells a fabricated depiction of another minor 12 years of age or younger engaged in an act of sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (a) through (e); or

(ii) Possesses with intent to develop, duplicate, publish, print, disseminate, exchange, or sell any fabricated depiction of another minor 12 years of age or younger engaged in an act of sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (a) through (e).

(b) Minor dealing in fabricated depictions of another minor 12 years of age or younger engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the first degree is a class B felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(3)(a) A person under age 18 commits the crime of minor dealing in fabricated depictions of another minor 12 years of age or younger engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the second degree when he or she:

(i) Knowingly develops, duplicates, publishes, prints, disseminates, exchanges, finances, attempts to finance, or sells any fabricated depiction of another minor 12 years of age or younger engaged in an act of sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (f) or (g); or

(ii) Possesses with intent to develop, duplicate, publish, print, disseminate, exchange, or sell any fabricated depiction of another minor 12 years of age or younger engaged in an act of sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (f) or (g).

(b) Minor dealing in fabricated depictions of a minor 12 years of age or younger engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the second degree is a class B felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(4)(a) Any person under the age of 18 commits the crime of minor financing or selling fabricated depictions of another minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct when he or she finances, attempts to finance, or sells a fabricated depiction of another minor engaged in an act of sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (a) through (g).

(b) Minor financing or selling fabricated depictions of another minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct is a class B felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(5)(a) A person under the age of 18 commits the crime of minor selling fabricated depictions of himself or herself engaged in sexually explicit conduct when he or she sells a fabricated depiction of himself or herself engaged in an act of sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (a) through (g).

(b) Minor selling fabricated depictions of himself or herself engaged in sexually explicit conduct is a misdemeanor.

(6) This section does not apply to a person under 18 years of age who finances, attempts to finance, develops, duplicates, publishes, prints, disseminates, exchanges, or possesses a fabricated depiction of himself or herself engaged in an act of sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4).

(7) For the purposes of determining the unit of prosecution under this section, each depiction or image of visual or printed matter constitutes a separate offense.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 9.68A RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) Except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, a person commits the crime of sending or bringing into the state fabricated depictions of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the first degree when he or she knowingly sends or causes to be sent, or brings or causes to be brought, into this state for sale or distribution, a fabricated depiction of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (a) through (e).

(b) Sending or bringing into the state fabricated depictions of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the first degree is a class B felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(c) For the purposes of determining the unit of prosecution under this subsection, each depiction or image of visual or printed matter constitutes a separate offense.

(2)(a) Except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, a person commits the crime of sending or bringing into the state fabricated depictions of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the second degree when he or she knowingly sends or causes to be sent, or brings or causes to be brought, into this state for sale or distribution, any fabricated depiction of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (f) or (g).

(b) Sending or bringing into the state fabricated depictions of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the second degree is a class B felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(c) For the purposes of determining the unit of prosecution under this subsection, each incident of sending or bringing into the state one or more depictions or images of visual or printed matter constitutes a separate offense.

(3) This section does not apply to a minor who knowingly sends or causes to be sent, or brings or causes to be brought, into this state for distribution, fabricated depictions of any minor 13 years of age or older engaged in sexually explicit conduct.

(4) This section does not apply to a person under 13 years of age who knowingly sends or causes to be sent, or brings or causes to be brought, into this state for distribution, fabricated depictions of himself or herself engaged in sexually explicit conduct.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 9.68A RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) Except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, a person commits the crime of possession of fabricated depictions of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the first degree when he or she knowingly possesses a fabricated depiction of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (a) through (e).

(b) Possession of fabricated depictions of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the first degree is a class B felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(c) For the purposes of determining the unit of prosecution under this subsection, each depiction or image of visual or printed matter constitutes a separate offense.

(2)(a) Except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, a person commits the crime of possession of fabricated depictions of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the second degree when he or she knowingly possesses any fabricated depiction of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (f) or (g).

(b) Possession of fabricated depictions of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the second degree is a class B felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(c) For the purposes of determining the unit of prosecution under this subsection, each incident of possession of one or more depictions or images of visual or printed matter constitutes a separate offense.

(3) This section does not apply to a minor's possession of fabricated depictions of any minor 13 years of age or older engaged in sexually explicit conduct.

(4) This section does not apply to a person under 13 years of age in possession of fabricated depictions of himself or herself engaged in sexually explicit conduct.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. A new section is added to chapter 9.68A RCW to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsections (5) and (6) of this section, a person who intentionally views over the internet fabricated depictions of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (a) through (e) is guilty of viewing fabricated depictions of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the first degree, a class B felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(2) Except as provided in subsections (5) and (6) of this section, a person who intentionally views over the internet visual or printed matter depicting a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (f) or (g) is guilty of viewing depictions of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the second degree, a class C felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(3) For the purposes of determining whether a person intentionally viewed over the internet a fabricated depiction of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct in subsection (1) or (2) of this section, the trier of fact shall consider the title, text, and content of the visual or printed matter, as well as the internet history, search terms, thumbnail images, downloading activity, expert computer forensic testimony, number of fabricated depictions of minors engaged in sexually explicit conduct, defendant's access to and control over the electronic device and its contents upon which the visual or printed matter was found, or any other relevant evidence. The state must prove beyond a reasonable doubt that the viewing was initiated by the user of the computer where the viewing occurred.

(4) For the purposes of this section, each separate internet session of intentionally viewing over the internet fabricated depictions of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct constitutes a separate offense.

(5) This section does not apply to a minor who intentionally views over the internet fabricated depictions of a minor 13 years of age or older engaged in sexually explicit conduct.

(6) This section does not apply to a person under 13 years of age who intentionally views over the internet fabricated depictions of himself or herself engaged in sexually explicit conduct.

Sec. 7. RCW 9.68A.055 and 2019 c 128 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

A minor who possesses any depiction or depictions of any other minor engaged in an act of sexually explicit conduct, including any fabricated depiction or depictions of any other minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct, as defined in RCW 9.68A.011 forfeits any right to continued possession of the depiction or depictions and any court exercising jurisdiction over such depiction or depictions shall order forfeiture of the depiction or depictions to the custody of law enforcement.

Sec. 8. RCW 9.68A.080 and 2002 c 70 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person who, in the course of processing or producing visual or printed matter either privately or commercially, has reasonable cause to believe that the visual or printed matter submitted for processing or producing depicts a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct, including any fabricated depictions, shall immediately report such incident, or cause a report to be made, to the proper law enforcement agency. Persons failing to do so are guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

(2) If, in the course of repairing, modifying, or maintaining a computer that has been submitted either privately or commercially for repair, modification, or maintenance, a person has reasonable cause to believe that the computer stores visual or printed matter that depicts a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct, including any fabricated depictions, the person performing the repair, modification, or maintenance may report such incident, or cause a report to be made, to the proper law enforcement agency.

(3) A person who makes a report in good faith under this section is immune from civil liability resulting from the report.

Sec. 9. RCW 9.68A.107 and 2015 c 279 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to penalties set forth in RCW 9.68A.070 and section 5 of this act, a person who is convicted of violating RCW 9.68A.070 or section 5 of this act shall be assessed a fee of one thousand dollars for each depiction or image of visual or printed matter that constitutes a separate conviction.

(2) Fees assessed under this section shall be collected by the clerk of the court and remitted to the state treasurer for deposit into the child rescue fund created in RCW 9.68A.200.

Sec. 10. RCW 9.68A.110 and 2011 c 241 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In a prosecution under RCW 9.68A.040, it is not a defense that the defendant was involved in activities of law enforcement and prosecution agencies in the investigation and prosecution of criminal offenses. Law enforcement and prosecution agencies shall not employ minors to aid in the investigation of a violation of RCW 9.68A.090 or 9.68A.100 through 9.68A.102, except for the purpose of facilitating an investigation where the minor is also the alleged victim and the:

(a) Investigation is authorized pursuant to RCW 9.73.230(1)(b)(ii) or 9.73.210(1)(b); or

(b) Minor's aid in the investigation involves only telephone or electronic communication with the defendant.

(2) In a prosecution under RCW 9.68A.050, 9.68A.060, 9.68A.070, ((or)) 9.68A.080, or section 2, 4, or 5 of this act, it is not a defense that the defendant did not know the age of the child depicted in the visual or printed matter. It is a defense, which the defendant must prove by a preponderance of the evidence, that at the time of the offense the defendant was not in possession of any facts on the basis of which he or she should reasonably have known that the person depicted was a minor.

(3) In a prosecution under RCW 9.68A.040, 9.68A.090, 9.68A.100, 9.68A.101, or 9.68A.102, it is not a defense that the defendant did not know the alleged victim's age. It is a defense, which the defendant must prove by a preponderance of the evidence, that at the time of the offense, the defendant made a reasonable bona fide attempt to ascertain the true age of the minor by requiring production of a driver's license, marriage license, birth certificate, or other governmental or educational identification card or paper and did not rely solely on the oral allegations or apparent age of the minor.

(4) In a prosecution under RCW 9.68A.050, 9.68A.060, 9.68A.070, ((or)) 9.68A.075, or section 2, 4, 5, or 6 of this act, it shall be an affirmative defense that the defendant was a law enforcement officer or a person specifically authorized, in writing, to assist a law enforcement officer and acting at the direction of a law enforcement officer in the process of conducting an official investigation of a sex-related crime against a minor, or that the defendant was providing individual case treatment as a recognized medical facility or as a psychiatrist or psychologist licensed under Title 18 RCW. Nothing in chapter 227, Laws of 2010 is intended to in any way affect or diminish the immunity afforded an electronic communication service provider, remote computing service provider, or domain name registrar acting in the performance of its reporting or preservation responsibilities under 18 U.S.C. Secs. 2258a, 2258b, or 2258c.

(5) In a prosecution under RCW 9.68A.050, 9.68A.060, 9.68A.070, or 9.68A.075, the state is not required to establish the identity of the alleged victim.

(6) In a prosecution under RCW 9.68A.070 ((or)), 9.68A.075, or section 5 or 6 of this act, it shall be an affirmative defense that:

(a) The defendant was employed at or conducting research in partnership or in cooperation with any institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.07.020 or 28B.10.016, and:

(i) He or she was engaged in a research activity;

(ii) The research activity was specifically approved prior to the possession or viewing activity being conducted in writing by a person, or other such entity vested with the authority to grant such approval by the institution of higher education; and

(iii) Viewing or possessing the visual or printed matter is an essential component of the authorized research; or

(b) The defendant was an employee of the Washington state legislature engaged in research at the request of a member of the legislature and:

(i) The request for research is made prior to the possession or viewing activity being conducted in writing by a member of the legislature;

(ii) The research is directly related to a legislative activity; and

(iii) Viewing or possessing the visual or printed matter is an essential component of the requested research and legislative activity.

(7) In a prosecution under sections 2 through 6 of this act, it is not a defense that the defendant lacked knowledge of whether the fabricated depiction had been created or altered by digitization.

(8) Nothing in this section authorizes otherwise unlawful viewing or possession of visual or printed matter depicting a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct.

Sec. 11. RCW 9.68A.120 and 2022 c 162 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The following are subject to seizure and forfeiture:

(1) All visual or printed matter that depicts a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct.

(2) All raw materials, equipment, and other tangible personal property of any kind used or intended to be used to manufacture or process any visual or printed matter that depicts a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct, and all conveyances, including aircraft, vehicles, or vessels that are used or intended for use to transport, or in any manner to facilitate the transportation of, visual or printed matter in violation of RCW 9.68A.050 ((or)), 9.68A.060, or section 2 or 4 of this act, but:

(a) No conveyance used by any person as a common carrier in the transaction of business as a common carrier is subject to forfeiture under this section unless it appears that the owner or other person in charge of the conveyance is a consenting party or privy to a violation of this chapter;

(b) No property is subject to forfeiture under this section by reason of any act or omission established by the owner of the property to have been committed or omitted without the owner's knowledge or consent;

(c) A forfeiture of property encumbered by a bona fide security interest is subject to the interest of the secured party if the secured party neither had knowledge of nor consented to the act or omission; and

(d) When the owner of a conveyance has been arrested under this chapter the conveyance may not be subject to forfeiture unless it is seized or process is issued for its seizure within ten days of the owner's arrest.

(3) All personal property, moneys, negotiable instruments, securities, or other tangible or intangible property furnished or intended to be furnished by any person in exchange for visual or printed matter depicting a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct, or constituting proceeds traceable to any violation of this chapter.

(4) Property subject to forfeiture under this chapter may be seized by any law enforcement officer of this state upon process issued by any superior court having jurisdiction over the property. Seizure without process may be made if:

(a) The seizure is incident to an arrest or a search under a search warrant or an inspection under an administrative inspection warrant;

(b) The property subject to seizure has been the subject of a prior judgment in favor of the state in a criminal injunction or forfeiture proceeding based upon this chapter;

(c) A law enforcement officer has probable cause to believe that the property is directly or indirectly dangerous to health or safety; or

(d) The law enforcement officer has probable cause to believe that the property was used or is intended to be used in violation of this chapter.

(5) In the event of seizure under subsection (4) of this section, proceedings for forfeiture shall be deemed commenced by the seizure. The law enforcement agency under whose authority the seizure was made shall cause notice to be served within fifteen days following the seizure on the owner of the property seized and the person in charge thereof and any person having any known right or interest therein, of the seizure and intended forfeiture of the seized property. The notice may be served by any method authorized by law or court rule including but not limited to service by certified mail with return receipt requested. Service by mail shall be deemed complete upon mailing within the fifteen day period following the seizure.

(6) If no person notifies the seizing law enforcement agency in writing of the person's claim of ownership or right to possession of seized items within ((forty-five))45 days of the seizure, the item seized shall be deemed forfeited.

(7) If any person notifies the seizing law enforcement agency in writing of the person's claim of ownership or right to possession of seized items within ((forty-five))45 days of the seizure, the person or persons shall be afforded a reasonable opportunity to be heard as to the claim or right. The hearing shall be before an administrative law judge appointed under chapter 34.12 RCW, except that any person asserting a claim or right may remove the matter to a court of competent jurisdiction if the aggregate value of the article or articles involved is more than five hundred dollars. The hearing before an administrative law judge and any appeal therefrom shall be under Title 34 RCW. In a court hearing between two or more claimants to the article or articles involved, the prevailing party shall be entitled to a judgment for costs and reasonable attorney's fees. The burden of producing evidence shall be upon the person claiming to be the lawful owner or the person claiming to have the lawful right to possession of the seized items. The seizing law enforcement agency shall promptly return the article or articles to the claimant upon a determination by the administrative law judge or court that the claimant is lawfully entitled to possession thereof of the seized items.

(8) If property is sought to be forfeited on the ground that it constitutes proceeds traceable to a violation of this chapter, the seizing law enforcement agency must prove by a preponderance of the evidence that the property constitutes proceeds traceable to a violation of this chapter.

(9) When property is forfeited under this chapter the seizing law enforcement agency may:

(a) Retain it for official use or upon application by any law enforcement agency of this state release the property to that agency for the exclusive use of enforcing this chapter or chapter 9A.88 RCW;

(b) Sell that which is not required to be destroyed by law and which is not harmful to the public; or

(c) Request the appropriate sheriff or director of public safety to take custody of the property and remove it for disposition in accordance with law.

(10)(a) By January 31st of each year, each seizing agency shall remit to the state an amount equal to ten percent of the net proceeds of any property forfeited during the preceding calendar year. Money remitted shall be deposited in the prostitution prevention and intervention account under RCW 43.63A.740.

(b) The net proceeds of forfeited property is the value of the forfeitable interest in the property after deducting the cost of satisfying any bona fide security interest to which the property is subject at the time of seizure; and in the case of sold property, after deducting the cost of sale, including reasonable fees or commissions paid to an independent selling agency.

(c) The value of sold forfeited property is the sale price. The value of retained forfeited property is the fair market value of the property at the time of seizure determined when possible by reference to an applicable commonly used index. A seizing agency may use, but need not use, an independent qualified appraiser to determine the value of retained property. If an appraiser is used, the value of the property appraised is net of the cost of the appraisal. The value of destroyed property and retained firearms or illegal property is zero.

(11) Forfeited property and net proceeds not required to be remitted to the state under this chapter shall be used for payment of all proper expenses of the investigation leading to the seizure, including any money delivered to the subject of the investigation by the law enforcement agency, and of the proceedings for forfeiture and sale, including expenses of seizure, maintenance of custody, advertising, actual costs of the prosecuting or city attorney, and court costs. Money remaining after payment of these expenses shall be retained by the seizing law enforcement agency for the exclusive use of enforcing the provisions of this chapter or chapter 9A.88 RCW.

Sec. 12. RCW 9.68A.170 and 2012 c 135 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In any criminal proceeding, any property or material that constitutes a depiction of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct, including any fabricated depictions, shall remain in the care, custody, and control of either a law enforcement agency or the court.

(2) Despite any request by the defendant or prosecution, any property or material that constitutes a depiction of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct, including any fabricated depictions, shall not be copied, photographed, duplicated, or otherwise reproduced, so long as the property or material is made reasonably available to the parties. Such property or material shall be deemed to be reasonably available to the parties if the prosecution, defense counsel, or any individual sought to be qualified to furnish expert testimony at trial has ample opportunity for inspection, viewing, and examination of the property or material at a law enforcement facility or a neutral facility approved by the court upon petition by the defense.

(3) The defendant may view and examine the property and materials only while in the presence of his or her attorney. If the defendant is proceeding pro se, the court will appoint an individual to supervise the defendant while he or she examines the materials.

(4) The court may direct that a mirror image of a computer hard drive containing such depictions be produced for use by an expert only upon a showing that an expert has been retained and is prepared to conduct a forensic examination while the mirror imaged hard drive remains in the care, custody, and control of a law enforcement agency or the court. Upon a substantial showing that the expert's analysis cannot be accomplished while the mirror imaged hard drive is kept within the care, custody, and control of a law enforcement agency or the court, the court may order its release to the expert for analysis for a limited time. If release is granted, the court shall issue a protective order setting forth such terms and conditions as are necessary to protect the rights of the victims, to document the chain of custody, and to protect physical evidence.

Sec. 13. RCW 9.68A.180 and 2012 c 135 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever a depiction of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct, regardless of its format and whether it is a fabricated depiction, is marked as an exhibit in a criminal proceeding, the prosecutor shall seek an order sealing the exhibit at the close of the trial. Any exhibits sealed under this section shall be sealed with evidence tape in a manner that prevents access to, or viewing of, the depiction of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct and shall be labeled so as to identify its contents. Anyone seeking to view such an exhibit must obtain permission from the superior court after providing at least ten days notice to the prosecuting attorney. Appellate attorneys for the defendant and the state shall be given access to the exhibit, which must remain in the care and custody of either a law enforcement agency or the court. Any other person moving to view such an exhibit must demonstrate to the court that his or her reason for viewing the exhibit is of sufficient importance to justify another violation of the victim's privacy.

(2) Whenever the clerk of the court receives an exhibit of a depiction of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct, he or she shall store the exhibit in a secure location, such as a safe. The clerk may arrange for the transfer of such exhibits to a law enforcement agency evidence room for safekeeping provided the agency agrees not to destroy or dispose of the exhibits without an order of the court.

(3) If the criminal proceeding ends in a conviction, the clerk of the court shall destroy any exhibit containing a depiction of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct, including any fabricated depictions, five years after the judgment is final, as determined by the provisions of RCW 10.73.090(3). Before any destruction, the clerk shall contact the prosecuting attorney and verify that there is no collateral attack on the judgment pending in any court. If the criminal proceeding ends in a mistrial, the clerk shall either maintain the exhibit or return it to the law enforcement agency that investigated the criminal charges for safekeeping until the matter is set for retrial. If the criminal proceeding ends in an acquittal, the clerk shall return the exhibit to the law enforcement agency that investigated the criminal charges for either safekeeping or destruction.

Sec. 14. RCW 9.68A.190 and 2012 c 135 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Any depiction of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct, in any format and including any fabricated depictions, distributed as discovery to defense counsel or an expert witness prior to June 7, 2012, shall either be returned to the law enforcement agency that investigated the criminal charges or destroyed, if the case is no longer pending in superior court. If the case is still pending, the depiction shall be returned to the superior court judge assigned to the case or the presiding judge. The court shall order either the destruction of the depiction or the safekeeping of the depiction if it will be used at trial.

It is not a defense to violations of this chapter for crimes committed after December 31, 2012, that the initial receipt of the depictions was done under the color of law through the discovery process.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15. A new section is added to chapter 9A.86 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A person commits the crime of disclosing fabricated intimate images when the person knowingly discloses a fabricated intimate image of another person and the person disclosing the image:

(a) Knows or should have known that the depicted person has not consented to the disclosure; and

(b) Knows or reasonably should know that disclosure would cause harm to the depicted person.

(2) A person who is under the age of 18 is not guilty of the crime of disclosing fabricated intimate images unless the person:

(a) Intentionally and maliciously disclosed a fabricated intimate image of another person; and

(b) Knows or should have known that the depicted person has not consented to the disclosure.

(3) This section does not apply to:

(a) Disclosures made in the public interest including, but not limited to, the reporting of unlawful conduct, or the lawful and common practices of law enforcement, criminal reporting, legal proceedings, or medical treatment; or

(b) Images that constitute commentary, criticism, or disclosure protected by the Washington state Constitution or the United States Constitution.

(4) This section does not impose liability upon the following entities solely as a result of content provided by another person:

(a) An interactive computer service, as defined in Title 47 U.S.C. Sec. 230(f)(2);

(b) A mobile telecommunications service provider, as defined in RCW 82.04.065; or

(c) A telecommunications network or broadband provider.

(5) In any prosecution for a violation of this section, it is not a defense that:

(a) The perpetrator lacked knowledge of whether the disclosed image had been created or altered by digitization; or

(b) The depicted person consented to the creation or alteration of the image.

(6) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Digitization" means creating or altering an image of a person in a realistic manner utilizing images of another person or computer-generated images, regardless of whether such creation or alteration is accomplished manually or through an automated process. "Digitization" includes, but is not limited to, creation or alteration of an image by using artificial intelligence software.

(b) "Disclosing" includes transferring, publishing, or disseminating, as well as making a digital depiction available for distribution or downloading through the facilities of a telecommunications network or through any other means of transferring computer programs or data to a computer.

(c) "Fabricated intimate image" means any photograph, motion picture film, videotape, digital image, or any other recording or transmission of another person who is identifiable from the image itself or from information displayed with or otherwise connected to the image, and that was created or altered by digitization to depict:

(i) Computer-generated intimate body parts or the intimate body parts of another person as the intimate body parts of the depicted person, whether nude or visible through less than opaque clothing and including the genitals, pubic area, anus, or postpubescent female nipple; or

(ii) The depicted person engaging in sexual activity, including masturbation, sexual contact, or sexual intercourse, as those terms are defined in RCW 9A.44.010, in which the depicted person did not actually engage.

(7) The crime of disclosing fabricated intimate images:

(a) Is a gross misdemeanor on the first offense; or

(b) Is a class C felony if the defendant has one or more prior convictions for a violation of this section or RCW 9A.86.010.

(8) Nothing in this section is construed to:

(a) Alter or negate any rights, obligations, or immunities of an interactive service provider under Title 47 U.S.C. Sec. 230; or

(b) Limit or preclude a plaintiff from securing or recovering any other available remedy.

Sec. 16. RCW 9A.86.010 and 2016 c 91 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person commits the crime of disclosing intimate images when the person knowingly discloses an intimate image of another person and the person disclosing the image:

(a) Obtained it under circumstances in which a reasonable person would know or understand that the image was to remain private;

(b) Knows or should have known that the depicted person has not consented to the disclosure; and

(c) Knows or reasonably should know that disclosure would cause harm to the depicted person.

(2) A person who is under the age of eighteen is not guilty of the crime of disclosing intimate images unless the person:

(a) Intentionally and maliciously disclosed an intimate image of another person;

(b) Obtained it under circumstances in which a reasonable person would know or understand that the image was to remain private; and

(c) Knows or should have known that the depicted person has not consented to the disclosure.

(3) This section does not apply to:

(a) Images involving voluntary exposure in public or commercial settings; or

(b) Disclosures made in the public interest including, but not limited to, the reporting of unlawful conduct, or the lawful and common practices of law enforcement, criminal reporting, legal proceedings, or medical treatment.

(4) This section does not impose liability upon the following entities solely as a result of content provided by another person:

(a) An interactive computer service, as defined in 47 U.S.C. Sec. 230(f)(2);

(b) A mobile telecommunications service provider, as defined in RCW 82.04.065; or

(c) A telecommunications network or broadband provider.

(5) It shall be an affirmative defense to a violation of this section that the defendant is a family member of a minor and did not intend any harm or harassment in disclosing the images of the minor to other family or friends of the defendant. This affirmative defense shall not apply to matters defined under RCW 9.68A.011.

(6) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Disclosing" includes transferring, publishing, or disseminating, as well as making a digital depiction available for distribution or downloading through the facilities of a telecommunications network or through any other means of transferring computer programs or data to a computer;

(b) "Intimate image" means any photograph, motion picture film, videotape, digital image, or any other recording or transmission of another person who is identifiable from the image itself or from information displayed with or otherwise connected to the image, and that was taken in a private setting, is not a matter of public concern, and depicts:

(i) Sexual activity, including sexual intercourse as defined in RCW 9A.44.010 and masturbation; or

(ii) A person's intimate body parts, whether nude or visible through less than opaque clothing, including the genitals, pubic area, anus, or postpubescent female nipple.

(7) The crime of disclosing intimate images:

(a) Is a gross misdemeanor on the first offense; or

(b) Is a class C felony if the defendant has one or more prior convictions for ((disclosing intimate images))a violation of this section or section 15 of this act.

(8) Nothing in this section is construed to:

(a) Alter or negate any rights, obligations, or immunities of an interactive service provider under 47 U.S.C. Sec. 230; or

(b) Limit or preclude a plaintiff from securing or recovering any other available remedy.

Sec. 17. RCW 9A.86.020 and 2019 c 128 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

A minor who possesses any image of any other minor which constitutes an intimate image as defined in RCW 9A.86.010 or a fabricated intimate image as defined in section 15 of this act forfeits any right to continued possession of the image and any court exercising jurisdiction over such image shall order forfeiture of the image.

Sec. 18. RCW 9.94A.515 and 2023 c 196 s 3 and 2023 c 7 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

TABLE 2

CRIMES INCLUDED WITHIN EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVI

Aggravated Murder 1 (RCW 10.95.020)

XV

Homicide by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious explosion 1 (RCW 70.74.280(1))

Murder 1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

XIV

Murder 2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

Trafficking 1 (RCW 9A.40.100(1))

XIII

Malicious explosion 2 (RCW 70.74.280(2))

Malicious placement of an explosive 1 (RCW 70.74.270(1))

XII

Assault 1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious placement of an imitation device 1 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(a))

Promoting Commercial Sexual Abuse of a Minor (RCW 9.68A.101)

Rape 1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

Trafficking 2 (RCW 9A.40.100(3))

XI

Manslaughter 1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

Rape 2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

Vehicular Homicide, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.520)

Vehicular Homicide, by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.520)

X

Child Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Criminal Mistreatment 1 (RCW 9A.42.020)

Indecent Liberties (with forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping 1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading Organized Crime (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious explosion 3 (RCW 70.74.280(3))

Sexually Violent Predator Escape (RCW 9A.76.115)

IX

Abandonment of Dependent Person 1 (RCW 9A.42.060)

Assault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Explosive devices prohibited (RCW 70.74.180)

Hit and Run—Death (RCW 46.52.020(4)(a))

Homicide by Watercraft, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 79A.60.050)

Inciting Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious placement of an explosive 2 (RCW 70.74.270(2))

Robbery 1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)

VIII

Arson 1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Commercial Sexual Abuse of a Minor (RCW 9.68A.100)

Homicide by Watercraft, by the operation of any vessel in a reckless manner (RCW 79A.60.050)

Manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Promoting Prostitution 1 (RCW 9A.88.070)

Theft of Ammonia (RCW 69.55.010)

VII

Air bag diagnostic systems (causing bodily injury or death) (RCW 46.37.660(2)(b))

Air bag replacement requirements (causing bodily injury or death) (RCW 46.37.660(1)(b))

Burglary 1 (RCW 9A.52.020)

Child Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Civil Disorder Training (RCW 9A.48.120)

Custodial Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW 9A.44.160)

Dealing in depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct 1 (RCW 9.68A.050(1))

Dealing in fabricated depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct 1 (section 2(1) of this act)

Drive-by Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

False Reporting 1 (RCW 9A.84.040(2)(a))

Homicide by Watercraft, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 79A.60.050)

Indecent Liberties (without forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1) (b) and (c))

Introducing Contraband 1 (RCW 9A.76.140)

Malicious placement of an explosive 3 (RCW 70.74.270(3))

Manufacture or import counterfeit, nonfunctional, damaged, or previously deployed air bag (causing bodily injury or death) (RCW 46.37.650(1)(b))

Negligently Causing Death By Use of a Signal Preemption Device (RCW 46.37.675)

Sell, install, or reinstall counterfeit, nonfunctional, damaged, or previously deployed airbag (RCW 46.37.650(2)(b))

Sending, bringing into state depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct 1 (RCW 9.68A.060(1))

Sending, bringing into state fabricated depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct 1 (section 4(1) of this act)

Unlawful Possession of a Firearm in the first degree (RCW 9.41.040(1))

Use of a Machine Gun or Bump-fire Stock in Commission of a Felony (RCW 9.41.225)

Vehicular Homicide, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 46.61.520)

VI

Bail Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(a))

Bribery (RCW 9A.68.010)

Incest 1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating a Judge (RCW 9A.72.160)

Intimidating a Juror/Witness (RCW 9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)

Malicious placement of an imitation device 2 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(b))

Possession of Depictions of a Minor Engaged in Sexually Explicit Conduct 1 (RCW 9.68A.070(1))

Possession of Fabricated Depictions of a Minor Engaged in Sexually Explicit Conduct 1 (section 5(1) of this act)

Rape of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

Theft from a Vulnerable Adult 1 (RCW 9A.56.400(1))

Unlawful Storage of Ammonia (RCW 69.55.020)

V

Abandonment of Dependent Person 2 (RCW 9A.42.070)

Advancing money or property for extortionate extension of credit (RCW 9A.82.030)

Air bag diagnostic systems (RCW 46.37.660(2)(c))

Air bag replacement requirements (RCW 46.37.660(1)(c))

Bail Jumping with class A Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(b))

Child Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Criminal Mistreatment 2 (RCW 9A.42.030)

Custodial Sexual Misconduct 2 (RCW 9A.44.170)

Dealing in Depictions of Minor Engaged in Sexually Explicit Conduct 2 (RCW 9.68A.050(2))

Dealing in Fabricated Depictions of Minor Engaged in Sexually Explicit Conduct 2 (section 2(2) of this act)

Domestic Violence Court Order Violation (RCW 7.105.450, 10.99.040, 10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.26B.050, or 26.52.070)

Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate Extension of Credit (RCW 9A.82.020)

Extortionate Means to Collect Extensions of Credit (RCW 9A.82.040)

Incest 2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping 2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Manufacture or import counterfeit, nonfunctional, damaged, or previously deployed air bag (RCW 46.37.650(1)(c))

Perjury 1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent prison misbehavior (RCW 9.94.070)

Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310)

Rape 3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering Criminal Assistance 1 (RCW 9A.76.070)

Sell, install, or reinstall counterfeit, nonfunctional, damaged, or previously deployed airbag (RCW 46.37.650(2)(c))

Sending, Bringing into State Depictions of Minor Engaged in Sexually Explicit Conduct 2 (RCW 9.68A.060(2))

Sending, Bringing into State Fabricated Depictions of Minor Engaged in Sexually Explicit Conduct 2 (section 4(2) of this act)

Sexual Misconduct with a Minor 1 (RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually Violating Human Remains (RCW 9A.44.105)

Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without Permission 1 (RCW 9A.56.070)

IV

Arson 2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault 2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault 3 (of a Peace Officer with a Projectile Stun Gun) (RCW 9A.36.031(1)(h))

Assault 4 (third domestic violence offense) (RCW 9A.36.041(3))

Assault by Watercraft (RCW 79A.60.060)

Bribing a Witness/Bribe Received by Witness (RCW 9A.72.090, 9A.72.100)

Cheating 1 (RCW 9.46.1961)

Commercial Bribery (RCW 9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(4))

Driving While Under the Influence (RCW 46.61.502(6))

Endangerment with a Controlled Substance (RCW 9A.42.100)

Escape 1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hate Crime (RCW 9A.36.080)

Hit and Run—Injury (RCW 46.52.020(4)(b))

Hit and Run with Vessel—Injury Accident (RCW 79A.60.200(3))

Identity Theft 1 (RCW 9.35.020(2))

Indecent Exposure to Person Under Age 14 (subsequent sex offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing Outcome of Sporting Event (RCW 9A.82.070)

Physical Control of a Vehicle While Under the Influence (RCW 46.61.504(6))

Possession of Depictions of a Minor Engaged in Sexually Explicit Conduct 2 (RCW 9.68A.070(2))

Possession of Fabricated Depictions of a Minor Engaged in Sexually Explicit Conduct 2 (section 5(2) of this act)

Residential Burglary (RCW 9A.52.025)

Robbery 2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Trafficking in Stolen Property 1 (RCW 9A.82.050)

Unlawful factoring of a credit card or payment card transaction (RCW 9A.56.290(4)(b))

Unlawful transaction of health coverage as a health care service contractor (RCW 48.44.016(3))

Unlawful transaction of health coverage as a health maintenance organization (RCW 48.46.033(3))

Unlawful transaction of insurance business (RCW 48.15.023(3))

Unlicensed practice as an insurance professional (RCW 48.17.063(2))

Use of Proceeds of Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1) and (2))

Vehicle Prowling 2 (third or subsequent offense) (RCW 9A.52.100(3))

Vehicular Assault, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.522)

Viewing of Depictions of a Minor Engaged in Sexually Explicit Conduct 1 (RCW 9.68A.075(1))

Viewing of Fabricated Depictions of a Minor Engaged in Sexually Explicit Conduct 1 (section 6(1) of this act)

III

Animal Cruelty 1 (Sexual Conduct or Contact) (RCW 16.52.205(3))

Assault 3 (Except Assault 3 of a Peace Officer With a Projectile Stun Gun) (RCW 9A.36.031 except subsection (1)(h))

Assault of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail Jumping with class B or C Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(c))

Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Communication with a Minor for Immoral Purposes (RCW 9.68A.090)

Criminal Gang Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120)

Custodial Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Cyber Harassment (RCW 9A.90.120(2)(b))

Escape 2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion 2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

False Reporting 2 (RCW 9A.84.040(2)(b))

Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020)

Hazing (RCW 28B.10.901(2)(b))

Intimidating a Public Servant (RCW 9A.76.180)

Introducing Contraband 2 (RCW 9A.76.150)

Malicious Injury to Railroad Property (RCW 81.60.070)

Manufacture of Untraceable Firearm with Intent to Sell (RCW 9.41.190)

Manufacture or Assembly of an Undetectable Firearm or Untraceable Firearm (RCW 9.41.325)

Mortgage Fraud (RCW 19.144.080)

Negligently Causing Substantial Bodily Harm By Use of a Signal Preemption Device (RCW 46.37.674)

Organized Retail Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.350(2))

Perjury 2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession of Incendiary Device (RCW 9.40.120)

Possession of Machine Gun, Bump-Fire Stock, Undetectable Firearm, or Short-Barreled Shotgun or Rifle (RCW 9.41.190)

Promoting Prostitution 2 (RCW 9A.88.080)

Retail Theft with Special Circumstances 1 (RCW 9A.56.360(2))

Securities Act violation (RCW 21.20.400)

Tampering with a Witness (RCW 9A.72.120)

Telephone Harassment (subsequent conviction or threat of death) (RCW 9.61.230(2))

Theft of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.083)

Theft with the Intent to Resell 1 (RCW 9A.56.340(2))

Trafficking in Stolen Property 2 (RCW 9A.82.055)

Unlawful Hunting of Big Game 1 (RCW 77.15.410(3)(b))

Unlawful Imprisonment (RCW 9A.40.040)

Unlawful Misbranding of Fish or Shellfish 1 (RCW 77.140.060(3))

Unlawful possession of firearm in the second degree (RCW 9.41.040(2))

Unlawful Taking of Endangered Fish or Wildlife 1 (RCW 77.15.120(3)(b))

Unlawful Trafficking in Fish, Shellfish, or Wildlife 1 (RCW 77.15.260(3)(b))

Unlawful Use of a Nondesignated Vessel (RCW 77.15.530(4))

Vehicular Assault, by the operation or driving of a vehicle with disregard for the safety of others (RCW 46.61.522)

II

Commercial Fishing Without a License 1 (RCW 77.15.500(3)(b))

Computer Trespass 1 (RCW 9A.90.040)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(3))

Electronic Data Service Interference (RCW 9A.90.060)

Electronic Data Tampering 1 (RCW 9A.90.080)

Electronic Data Theft (RCW 9A.90.100)

Engaging in Fish Dealing Activity Unlicensed 1 (RCW 77.15.620(3))

Escape from Community Custody (RCW 72.09.310)

Failure to Register as a Sex Offender (second or subsequent offense) (RCW 9A.44.130 prior to June 10, 2010, and RCW 9A.44.132)

Health Care False Claims (RCW 48.80.030)

Identity Theft 2 (RCW 9.35.020(3))

Improperly Obtaining Financial Information (RCW 9.35.010)

Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070)

Organized Retail Theft 2 (RCW 9A.56.350(3))

Possession of Stolen Property 1 (RCW 9A.56.150)

Possession of a Stolen Vehicle (RCW 9A.56.068)

Retail Theft with Special Circumstances 2 (RCW 9A.56.360(3))

Scrap Processing, Recycling, or Supplying Without a License (second or subsequent offense) (RCW 19.290.100)

Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft of a Motor Vehicle (RCW 9A.56.065)

Theft of Rental, Leased, Lease-purchased, or Loaned Property (valued at $5,000 or more) (RCW 9A.56.096(5)(a))

Theft with the Intent to Resell 2 (RCW 9A.56.340(3))

Trafficking in Insurance Claims (RCW 48.30A.015)

Unlawful factoring of a credit card or payment card transaction (RCW 9A.56.290(4)(a))

Unlawful Participation of Non-Indians in Indian Fishery (RCW 77.15.570(2))

Unlawful Practice of Law (RCW 2.48.180)

Unlawful Purchase or Use of a License (RCW 77.15.650(3)(b))

Unlawful Trafficking in Fish, Shellfish, or Wildlife 2 (RCW 77.15.260(3)(a))

Unlicensed Practice of a Profession or Business (RCW 18.130.190(7))

Voyeurism 1 (RCW 9A.44.115)

I

Attempting to Elude a Pursuing Police Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

False Verification for Welfare (RCW 74.08.055)

Forgery (RCW 9A.60.020)

Fraudulent Creation or Revocation of a Mental Health Advance Directive (RCW 9A.60.060)

Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080)

Mineral Trespass (RCW 78.44.330)

Possession of Stolen Property 2 (RCW 9A.56.160)

Reckless Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Spotlighting Big Game 1 (RCW 77.15.450(3)(b))

Suspension of Department Privileges 1 (RCW 77.15.670(3)(b))

Taking Motor Vehicle Without Permission 2 (RCW 9A.56.075)

Theft 2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft from a Vulnerable Adult 2 (RCW 9A.56.400(2))

Theft of Rental, Leased, Lease-purchased, or Loaned Property (valued at $750 or more but less than $5,000) (RCW 9A.56.096(5)(b))

Transaction of insurance business beyond the scope of licensure (RCW 48.17.063)

Unlawful Fish and Shellfish Catch Accounting (RCW 77.15.630(3)(b))

Unlawful Issuance of Checks or Drafts (RCW 9A.56.060)

Unlawful Possession of Fictitious Identification (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of Instruments of Financial Fraud (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of Payment Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of a Personal Identification Device (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Production of Payment Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Releasing, Planting, Possessing, or Placing Deleterious Exotic Wildlife (RCW 77.15.250(2)(b))

Unlawful Trafficking in Food Stamps (RCW 9.91.142)

Unlawful Use of Food Stamps (RCW 9.91.144)

Unlawful Use of Net to Take Fish 1 (RCW 77.15.580(3)(b))

Vehicle Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

Violating Commercial Fishing Area or Time 1 (RCW 77.15.550(3)(b))

Sec. 19. RCW 7.110.010 and 2023 c 65 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Child" means an unemancipated individual who is less than 18 years of age.

(2) "Consent" means affirmative, conscious, and voluntary authorization by an individual with legal capacity to give authorization.

(((2)))(3) "Depicted individual" means an individual whose body is shown in whole or in part in an intimate image or a fabricated intimate image.

(4) "Digitization" means creating or altering an image of a person in a realistic manner by utilizing images of another person or computer-generated images, regardless of whether such creation or alteration is accomplished manually or through an automated process. "Digitization" includes, but is not limited to, creating or altering an image with the use of artificial intelligence software.

(((3)))(5) "Disclosing" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 9A.86.010. "Disclosure" has the same meaning as "disclosing."

(((4)))(6) "Fabricated intimate image" means any photograph, motion picture film, videotape, digital image or video, or any other recording or visual depiction of an identifiable depicted individual that was created or altered by digitization and that depicts:

(a) Computer-generated intimate body parts or the intimate body parts of another human being as the intimate body parts of the depicted individual, whether nude or visible through less than opaque clothing and including the genitals, pubic area, anus, or postpubescent female nipple; or

(b) The depicted individual engaging in sexual activity, including masturbation, sexual contact, or sexual intercourse, as those terms are defined in RCW 9A.44.010, in which the depicted individual did not engage.

(7) "Harm" includes physical harm, economic harm, and emotional distress whether or not accompanied by physical or economic harm.

(8) "Identifiable" means recognizable by a person other than the depicted individual:

(a) From an intimate image or fabricated intimate image itself; or

(b) From an intimate image or fabricated intimate image and identifying characteristic displayed in connection with the intimate image.

(((5)))(9) "Identifying characteristic" means information that may be used to identify a depicted individual.

(((6)))(10) "Individual" means a human being.

(((7)))(11) "Intimate image" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 9A.86.010.

(((8)))(12) "Parent" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 26.26A.010.

(13) "Person" means an individual, estate, business or nonprofit entity, public corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency or instrumentality, or other legal entity.

(14) "Private" means:

(a) Created or obtained under circumstances in which a depicted individual had a reasonable expectation of privacy; or

(b) Made accessible through theft, bribery, extortion, fraud, false pretenses, voyeurism, or exceeding authorized access to an account, message, file, device, resource, or property.

Sec. 20. RCW 7.110.020 and 2023 c 65 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Harm" includes physical harm, economic harm, and emotional distress whether or not accompanied by physical or economic harm.

(b) "Private" means:

(i) Created or obtained under circumstances in which a depicted individual had a reasonable expectation of privacy; or

(ii) Made accessible through theft, bribery, extortion, fraud, false pretenses, voyeurism, or exceeding authorized access to an account, message, file, device, resource, or property.

(2))) Except as otherwise provided in RCW 7.110.030, a depicted individual who is identifiable and who suffers harm from a person's intentional disclosure or threatened disclosure of an intimate image that was private without the depicted individual's consent has a cause of action against the person if the person knew or acted with reckless disregard for whether:

(a) The depicted individual did not consent to the disclosure;

(b) The intimate image was private; and

(c) The depicted individual was identifiable.

(((3)))(2) The following conduct by a depicted individual does not establish by itself that the individual consented to the disclosure of the intimate image which is the subject of an action under this chapter or that the individual lacked a reasonable expectation of privacy:

(a) Consent to creation of the image; or

(b) Previous consensual disclosure of the image.

(((4)))(3) A depicted individual who does not consent to the uncovering of the part of the body depicted in an intimate image of the individual retains a reasonable expectation of privacy even if the image was created when the individual was in a public place.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21. A new section is added to chapter 7.110 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A depicted individual who is identifiable and who suffers harm from a person's intentional disclosure or threatened disclosure of a fabricated intimate image without the depicted individual's consent has a cause of action against the person if the person knew or acted with reckless disregard for whether:

(a) The depicted individual did not consent to the disclosure; and

(b) The depicted individual was identifiable.

(2)(a) A depicted individual's consent to the creation of the fabricated intimate image does not by itself establish that the depicted individual consented to its disclosure.

(b) Consent is deemed validly given only if:

(i) It is set forth in an agreement written in plain language signed knowingly and voluntarily by the depicted individual; and

(ii) It includes a general description of the fabricated intimate image and, if applicable, the audiovisual work into which it will be incorporated.

(3) It is not a defense to an action under this section that there is a disclaimer stating that the fabricated intimate image of the depicted individual was unauthorized or that the depicted individual did not participate in the creation or development of the fabricated intimate image.

Sec. 22. RCW 7.110.030 and 2023 c 65 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Child" means an unemancipated individual who is less than 18 years of age.

(b) "Parent" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 26.26A.010.

(2))) A person is not liable under this chapter if the person proves that disclosure of, or a threat to disclose, an intimate image or fabricated intimate image was:

(a) Made in good faith in:

(i) Law enforcement activities;

(ii) A legal proceeding; or

(iii) Medical education or treatment;

(b) Made in good faith in the reporting or investigation of:

(i) Unlawful conduct; or

(ii) Unsolicited and unwelcome conduct;

(c) Related to a matter of public concern or public interest; or

(d) Reasonably intended to assist the depicted individual.

(((3) Subject))(2) In an action brought under RCW 7.110.020 and subject to subsection (((4)))(3) of this section, a defendant who is a parent, legal guardian, or individual with legal custody of a child is not liable under this chapter for a disclosure or threatened disclosure of an intimate image, as defined in RCW 7.110.010(((7)))(11), of the child.

(((4)))(3) If a defendant asserts an exception to liability under subsection (((3)))(2) of this section, the exception does not apply if the plaintiff proves the disclosure was:

(a) Prohibited by law other than this chapter; or

(b) Made for the purpose of sexual arousal, sexual gratification, humiliation, degradation, or monetary or commercial gain.

(((5)))(4) Disclosure of, or a threat to disclose, an intimate image or fabricated intimate image is not a matter of public concern or public interest solely because the depicted individual is a public figure.

(5) A person is not liable in an action brought under section 21 of this act if the fabricated intimate image is commentary, criticism, or disclosure protected by the Washington state Constitution or the United States Constitution.

Sec. 23. RCW 7.110.050 and 2023 c 65 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In an action under this chapter, a prevailing plaintiff may recover:

(a) The greater of:

(i) Economic and noneconomic damages proximately caused by the defendant's disclosure or threatened disclosure, including damages for emotional distress whether or not accompanied by other damages; or

(ii) Statutory damages not to exceed $10,000 against each defendant found liable under this chapter for all disclosures and threatened disclosures by the defendant of which the plaintiff knew or reasonably should have known when filing the action or which became known during the pendency of the action. In determining the amount of statutory damages under this subsection (1)(a)(ii), consideration must be given to the age of the parties at the time of the disclosure or threatened disclosure, the number of disclosures or threatened disclosures made by the defendant, the breadth of distribution of the intimate image or fabricated intimate image by the defendant, and other exacerbating or mitigating factors;

(b) An amount equal to any monetary gain made by the defendant from disclosure of the intimate image or fabricated intimate image; and

(c) Punitive damages in an amount not to exceed three times the amount of damages under (a) of this subsection.

(2) In an action under this chapter, the court may award a prevailing plaintiff:

(a) Reasonable attorneys' fees and costs; and

(b) Additional relief, including injunctive relief.

(3) This chapter does not affect a right or remedy available under law of this state other than this chapter.

Sec. 24. RCW 7.110.060 and 2023 c 65 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An action under RCW 7.110.020(((2)))or section 21 of this act for:

(a) An unauthorized disclosure may not be brought later than four years from the date the disclosure was discovered or should have been discovered with the exercise of reasonable diligence; and

(b) A threat to disclose may not be brought later than four years from the date of the threat to disclose.

(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section, this section is subject to the tolling statutes of this state.

(3) In an action under RCW 7.110.020(((2)))or section 21 of this act by a depicted individual who was a minor on the date of the disclosure or threat to disclose, the time specified in subsection (1)(((a))) of this section does not begin to run until the depicted individual attains the age of majority.

--- END ---