BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9.41.010 and 2023 c 295 s 2, 2023 c 262 s 1, and 2023 c 162 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Antique firearm" means a firearm or replica of a firearm not designed or redesigned for using rim fire or conventional center fire ignition with fixed ammunition and manufactured in or before 1898, including any matchlock, flintlock, percussion cap, or similar type of ignition system and also any firearm using fixed ammunition manufactured in or before 1898, for which ammunition is no longer manufactured in the United States and is not readily available in the ordinary channels of commercial trade.

(2)(a) "Assault weapon" means:

(i) Any of the following specific firearms regardless of which company produced and manufactured the firearm:

AK-47 in all forms

AK-74 in all forms

Algimec AGM-1 type semiautomatic

American Arms Spectre da semiautomatic carbine

AR15, M16, or M4 in all forms

AR 180 type semiautomatic

Argentine L.S.R. semiautomatic

Australian Automatic

Auto-Ordnance Thompson M1 and 1927 semiautomatics

Barrett .50 cal light semiautomatic

Barrett .50 cal M87

Barrett .50 cal M107A1

Barrett REC7

Beretta AR70/S70 type semiautomatic

Bushmaster Carbon 15

Bushmaster ACR

Bushmaster XM-15

Bushmaster MOE

Calico models M100 and M900

CETME Sporter

CIS SR 88 type semiautomatic

Colt CAR 15

Daewoo K-1

Daewoo K-2

Dragunov semiautomatic

Fabrique Nationale FAL in all forms

Fabrique Nationale F2000

Fabrique Nationale L1A1 Sporter

Fabrique Nationale M249S

Fabrique Nationale PS90

Fabrique Nationale SCAR

FAMAS .223 semiautomatic

Galil

Heckler & Koch G3 in all forms

Heckler & Koch HK-41/91

Heckler & Koch HK-43/93

Heckler & Koch HK94A2/3

Heckler & Koch MP-5 in all forms

Heckler & Koch PSG-1

Heckler & Koch SL8

Heckler & Koch UMP

Manchester Arms Commando MK-45

Manchester Arms MK-9

SAR-4800

SIG AMT SG510 in all forms

SIG SG550 in all forms

SKS

Spectre M4

Springfield Armory BM-59

Springfield Armory G3

Springfield Armory SAR-8

Springfield Armory SAR-48

Springfield Armory SAR-3

Springfield Armory M-21 sniper

Springfield Armory M1A

Smith & Wesson M&P 15

Sterling Mk 1

Sterling Mk 6/7

Steyr AUG

TNW M230

FAMAS F11

Uzi 9mm carbine/rifle

(ii) A semiautomatic rifle that has an overall length of less than 30 inches;

(iii) A conversion kit, part, or combination of parts, from which an assault weapon can be assembled or from which a firearm can be converted into an assault weapon if those parts are in the possession or under the control of the same person; or

(iv) A semiautomatic, center fire rifle that has the capacity to accept a detachable magazine and has one or more of the following:

(A) A grip that is independent or detached from the stock that protrudes conspicuously beneath the action of the weapon. The addition of a fin attaching the grip to the stock does not exempt the grip if it otherwise resembles the grip found on a pistol;

(B) Thumbhole stock;

(C) Folding or telescoping stock;

(D) Forward pistol, vertical, angled, or other grip designed for use by the nonfiring hand to improve control;

(E) Flash suppressor, flash guard, flash eliminator, flash hider, sound suppressor, silencer, or any item designed to reduce the visual or audio signature of the firearm;

(F) Muzzle brake, recoil compensator, or any item designed to be affixed to the barrel to reduce recoil or muzzle rise;

(G) Threaded barrel designed to attach a flash suppressor, sound suppressor, muzzle break, or similar item;

(H) Grenade launcher or flare launcher; or

(I) A shroud that encircles either all or part of the barrel designed to shield the bearer's hand from heat, except a solid forearm of a stock that covers only the bottom of the barrel;

(v) A semiautomatic, center fire rifle that has a fixed magazine with the capacity to accept more than 10 rounds;

(vi) A semiautomatic pistol that has the capacity to accept a detachable magazine and has one or more of the following:

(A) A threaded barrel, capable of accepting a flash suppressor, forward handgrip, or silencer;

(B) A second hand grip;

(C) A shroud that encircles either all or part of the barrel designed to shield the bearer's hand from heat, except a solid forearm of a stock that covers only the bottom of the barrel; or

(D) The capacity to accept a detachable magazine at some location outside of the pistol grip;

(vii) A semiautomatic shotgun that has any of the following:

(A) A folding or telescoping stock;

(B) A grip that is independent or detached from the stock that protrudes conspicuously beneath the action of the weapon. The addition of a fin attaching the grip to the stock does not exempt the grip if it otherwise resembles the grip found on a pistol;

(C) A thumbhole stock;

(D) A forward pistol, vertical, angled, or other grip designed for use by the nonfiring hand to improve control;

(E) A fixed magazine in excess of seven rounds; or

(F) A revolving cylinder shotgun.

(b) For the purposes of this subsection, "fixed magazine" means an ammunition feeding device contained in, or permanently attached to, a firearm in such a manner that the device cannot be removed without disassembly of the firearm action.

(c) "Assault weapon" does not include antique firearms, any firearm that has been made permanently inoperable, or any firearm that is manually operated by bolt, pump, lever, or slide action.

(3) "Assemble" means to fit together component parts.

(4) "Barrel length" means the distance from the bolt face of a closed action down the length of the axis of the bore to the crown of the muzzle, or in the case of a barrel with attachments to the end of any legal device permanently attached to the end of the muzzle.

(5) "Bump-fire stock" means a butt stock designed to be attached to a semiautomatic firearm with the effect of increasing the rate of fire achievable with the semiautomatic firearm to that of a fully automatic firearm by using the energy from the recoil of the firearm to generate reciprocating action that facilitates repeated activation of the trigger.

(6) "Conviction" or "convicted" means, whether in an adult court or adjudicated in a juvenile court, that a plea of guilty has been accepted or a verdict of guilty has been filed, or a finding of guilt has been entered, notwithstanding the pendency of any future proceedings including, but not limited to, sentencing or disposition, posttrial or post-fact-finding motions, and appeals. "Conviction" includes a dismissal entered after a period of probation, suspension, or deferral of sentence, and also includes equivalent dispositions by courts in jurisdictions other than Washington state.

(7) "Crime of violence" means:

(a) Any of the following felonies, as now existing or hereafter amended: Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or an attempt to commit a class A felony, criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a class A felony, manslaughter in the first degree, manslaughter in the second degree, indecent liberties if committed by forcible compulsion, kidnapping in the second degree, arson in the second degree, assault in the second degree, assault of a child in the second degree, extortion in the first degree, burglary in the second degree, residential burglary, and robbery in the second degree;

(b) Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior to June 6, 1996, which is comparable to a felony classified as a crime of violence in (a) of this subsection; and

(c) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense comparable to a felony classified as a crime of violence under (a) or (b) of this subsection.

(8) "Curio or relic" has the same meaning as provided in 27 C.F.R. Sec. 478.11.

(9) "Dealer" means a person engaged in the business of selling firearms at wholesale or retail who has, or is required to have, a federal firearms license under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 923(a). A person who does not have, and is not required to have, a federal firearms license under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 923(a), is not a dealer if that person makes only occasional sales, exchanges, or purchases of firearms for the enhancement of a personal collection or for a hobby, or sells all or part of his or her personal collection of firearms.

(10) "Detachable magazine" means an ammunition feeding device that can be loaded or unloaded while detached from a firearm and readily inserted into a firearm.

(11) "Distribute" means to give out, provide, make available, or deliver a firearm or large capacity magazine to any person in this state, with or without consideration, whether the distributor is in-state or out-of-state. "Distribute" includes, but is not limited to, filling orders placed in this state, online or otherwise. "Distribute" also includes causing a firearm or large capacity magazine to be delivered in this state.

(12) "Domestic violence" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 10.99.020.

(13) "Family or household member" has the same meaning as in RCW 7.105.010.

(14) "Federal firearms dealer" means a licensed dealer as defined in 18 U.S.C. Sec. 921(a)(11).

(15) "Federal firearms importer" means a licensed importer as defined in 18 U.S.C. Sec. 921(a)(9).

(16) "Federal firearms manufacturer" means a licensed manufacturer as defined in 18 U.S.C. Sec. 921(a)(10).

(17) "Felony" means any felony offense under the laws of this state or any federal or out-of-state offense comparable to a felony offense under the laws of this state.

(18) "Felony firearm offender" means a person who has previously been convicted or found not guilty by reason of insanity in this state of any felony firearm offense. A person is not a felony firearm offender under this chapter if any and all qualifying offenses have been the subject of an expungement, pardon, annulment, certificate, or rehabilitation, or other equivalent procedure based on a finding of the rehabilitation of the person convicted or a pardon, annulment, or other equivalent procedure based on a finding of innocence.

(19) "Felony firearm offense" means:

(a) Any felony offense that is a violation of this chapter;

(b) A violation of RCW 9A.36.045;

(c) A violation of RCW 9A.56.300;

(d) A violation of RCW 9A.56.310;

(e) Any felony offense if the offender was armed with a firearm in the commission of the offense.

(20) "Firearm" means a weapon or device from which a projectile or projectiles may be fired by an explosive such as gunpowder. For the purposes of RCW 9.41.040, "firearm" also includes frames and receivers. "Firearm" does not include a flare gun or other pyrotechnic visual distress signaling device, or a powder-actuated tool or other device designed solely to be used for construction purposes.

(21)(a) "Frame or receiver" means a part of a firearm that, when the complete firearm is assembled, is visible from the exterior and provides housing or a structure designed to hold or integrate one or more fire control components, even if pins or other attachments are required to connect the fire control components. Any such part identified with a serial number shall be presumed, absent an official determination by the bureau of alcohol, tobacco, firearms, and explosives or other reliable evidence to the contrary, to be a frame or receiver.

(b) For purposes of this subsection, "fire control component" means a component necessary for the firearm to initiate, complete, or continue the firing sequence, including any of the following: Hammer, bolt, bolt carrier, breechblock, cylinder, trigger mechanism, firing pin, striker, or slide rails.

(22) "Gun" has the same meaning as firearm.

(23) "Import" means to move, transport, or receive an item from a place outside the territorial limits of the state of Washington to a place inside the territorial limits of the state of Washington. "Import" does not mean situations where an individual possesses a large capacity magazine or assault weapon when departing from, and returning to, Washington state, so long as the individual is returning to Washington in possession of the same large capacity magazine or assault weapon the individual transported out of state.

(24) "Intimate partner" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 7.105.010.

(25) "Large capacity magazine" means an ammunition feeding device with the capacity to accept more than 10 rounds of ammunition, or any conversion kit, part, or combination of parts, from which such a device can be assembled if those parts are in possession of or under the control of the same person, but shall not be construed to include any of the following:

(a) An ammunition feeding device that has been permanently altered so that it cannot accommodate more than 10 rounds of ammunition;

(b) A 22 caliber tube ammunition feeding device; or

(c) A tubular magazine that is contained in a lever-action firearm.

(26) "Law enforcement officer" includes a general authority Washington peace officer as defined in RCW 10.93.020, or a specially commissioned Washington peace officer as defined in RCW 10.93.020. "Law enforcement officer" also includes a limited authority Washington peace officer as defined in RCW 10.93.020 if such officer is duly authorized by his or her employer to carry a concealed pistol.

(27) "Lawful permanent resident" has the same meaning afforded a person "lawfully admitted for permanent residence" in 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1101(a)(20).

(28) "Licensed collector" means a person who is federally licensed under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 923(b).

(29) "Licensed dealer" means a person who is federally licensed under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 923(a).

(30) "Loaded" means:

(a) There is a cartridge in the chamber of the firearm;

(b) Cartridges are in a clip that is locked in place in the firearm;

(c) There is a cartridge in the cylinder of the firearm, if the firearm is a revolver;

(d) There is a cartridge in the tube or magazine that is inserted in the action; or

(e) There is a ball in the barrel and the firearm is capped or primed if the firearm is a muzzle loader.

(31) "Machine gun" means any firearm known as a machine gun, mechanical rifle, submachine gun, or any other mechanism or instrument not requiring that the trigger be pressed for each shot and having a reservoir clip, disc, drum, belt, or other separable mechanical device for storing, carrying, or supplying ammunition which can be loaded into the firearm, mechanism, or instrument, and fired therefrom at the rate of five or more shots per second.

(32) "Manufacture" means, with respect to a firearm or large capacity magazine, the fabrication, making, formation, production, or construction of a firearm or large capacity magazine, by manual labor or by machinery.

(33) "Mental health professional" means a psychiatrist, psychologist, or physician assistant working with a supervising psychiatrist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, psychiatric nurse, social worker, mental health counselor, marriage and family therapist, or such other mental health professionals as may be defined in statute or by rules adopted by the department of health pursuant to the provisions of chapter 71.05 RCW.

(34) "Nonimmigrant alien" means a person defined as such in 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1101(a)(15).

(35) "Person" means any individual, corporation, company, association, firm, partnership, club, organization, society, joint stock company, or other legal entity.

(36) "Pistol" means any firearm with a barrel less than 16 inches in length, or is designed to be held and fired by the use of a single hand.

(37) "Rifle" means a weapon designed or redesigned, made or remade, and intended to be fired from the shoulder and designed or redesigned, made or remade, and intended to use the energy of the explosive in a fixed metallic cartridge to fire only a single projectile through a rifled bore for each single pull of the trigger.

(38) "Sale" and "sell" mean the actual approval of the delivery of a firearm in consideration of payment or promise of payment.

(39) "Secure gun storage" means:

(a) A locked box, gun safe, or other secure locked storage space that is designed to prevent unauthorized use or discharge of a firearm; and

(b) The act of keeping an unloaded firearm stored by such means.

(40) "Semiautomatic" means any firearm which utilizes a portion of the energy of a firing cartridge to extract the fired cartridge case and chamber the next round, and which requires a separate pull of the trigger to fire each cartridge.

(41)(a) "Semiautomatic assault rifle" means any rifle which utilizes a portion of the energy of a firing cartridge to extract the fired cartridge case and chamber the next round, and which requires a separate pull of the trigger to fire each cartridge.

(b) "Semiautomatic assault rifle" does not include antique firearms, any firearm that has been made permanently inoperable, or any firearm that is manually operated by bolt, pump, lever, or slide action.

(42) "Serious offense" means any of the following felonies or a felony attempt to commit any of the following felonies, as now existing or hereafter amended:

(a) Any crime of violence;

(b) Any felony violation of the uniform controlled substances act, chapter 69.50 RCW, that is classified as a class B felony or that has a maximum term of imprisonment of at least 10 years;

(c) Child molestation in the second degree;

(d) Incest when committed against a child under age 14;

(e) Indecent liberties;

(f) Leading organized crime;

(g) Promoting prostitution in the first degree;

(h) Rape in the third degree;

(i) Drive-by shooting;

(j) Sexual exploitation;

(k) Vehicular assault, when caused by the operation or driving of a vehicle by a person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a reckless manner;

(l) Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of any vehicle by any person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner;

(m) Any other class B felony offense with a finding of sexual motivation, as "sexual motivation" is defined under RCW 9.94A.030;

(n) Any other felony with a deadly weapon verdict under RCW 9.94A.825;

(o) Any felony offense in effect at any time prior to June 6, 1996, that is comparable to a serious offense, or any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a serious offense;

(p) Any felony conviction under RCW 9.41.115; or

(q) Any felony charged under RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6).

(43) "Sex offense" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 9.94A.030.

(44) "Short-barreled rifle" means a rifle having one or more barrels less than 16 inches in length and any weapon made from a rifle by any means of modification if such modified weapon has an overall length of less than 26 inches.

(45) "Short-barreled shotgun" means a shotgun having one or more barrels less than 18 inches in length and any weapon made from a shotgun by any means of modification if such modified weapon has an overall length of less than 26 inches.

(46) "Shotgun" means a weapon with one or more barrels, designed or redesigned, made or remade, and intended to be fired from the shoulder and designed or redesigned, made or remade, and intended to use the energy of the explosive in a fixed shotgun shell to fire through a smooth bore either a number of ball shot or a single projectile for each single pull of the trigger.

(47) "Substance use disorder professional" means a person certified under chapter 18.205 RCW.

(48) "Transfer" means the intended delivery of a firearm to another person without consideration of payment or promise of payment including, but not limited to, gifts and loans. "Transfer" does not include the delivery of a firearm owned or leased by an entity licensed or qualified to do business in the state of Washington to, or return of such a firearm by, any of that entity's employees or agents, defined to include volunteers participating in an honor guard, for lawful purposes in the ordinary course of business.

(49) "Undetectable firearm" means any firearm that is not as detectable as 3.7 ounces of 17-4 PH stainless steel by walk-through metal detectors or magnetometers commonly used at airports or any firearm where the barrel, the slide or cylinder, or the frame or receiver of the firearm would not generate an image that accurately depicts the shape of the part when examined by the types of X-ray machines commonly used at airports.

(50)(a) "Unfinished frame or receiver" means a frame or receiver that is partially complete, disassembled, or inoperable, that: (i) Has reached a stage in manufacture where it may readily be completed, assembled, converted, or restored to a functional state; or (ii) is marketed or sold to the public to become or be used as the frame or receiver of a functional firearm once finished or completed, including without limitation products marketed or sold to the public as an 80 percent frame or receiver or unfinished frame or receiver.

(b) For purposes of this subsection:

(i) "Readily" means a process that is fairly or reasonably efficient, quick, and easy, but not necessarily the most efficient, speedy, or easy process. Factors relevant in making this determination, with no single one controlling, include the following: (A) Time, i.e., how long it takes to finish the process; (B) ease, i.e., how difficult it is to do so; (C) expertise, i.e., what knowledge and skills are required; (D) equipment, i.e., what tools are required; (E) availability, i.e., whether additional parts are required, and how easily they can be obtained; (F) expense, i.e., how much it costs; (G) scope, i.e., the extent to which the subject of the process must be changed to finish it; and (H) feasibility, i.e., whether the process would damage or destroy the subject of the process, or cause it to malfunction.

(ii) "Partially complete," as it modifies frame or receiver, means a forging, casting, printing, extrusion, machined body, or similar article that has reached a stage in manufacture where it is clearly identifiable as an unfinished component part of a firearm.

(51) "Unlicensed person" means any person who is not a licensed dealer under this chapter.

(52) "Untraceable firearm" means any firearm manufactured after July 1, 2019, that is not an antique firearm and that cannot be traced by law enforcement by means of a serial number affixed to the firearm by a federal firearms manufacturer, federal firearms importer, or federal firearms dealer in compliance with all federal laws and regulations.

(53) "Washington state patrol firearms background check program" means the division within the state patrol that conducts all firearm transfers and the disposition of firearms.

Sec. 2. RCW 9.41.049 and 2020 c 302 s 61 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When a designated crisis responder files a petition for initial detention under RCW 71.05.150 or 71.05.153 on the grounds that the person presents a likelihood of serious harm, the petition shall include a copy of the person's driver's license or identicard or comparable information such as their name, address, and date of birth. If the person is not subsequently committed for involuntary treatment under RCW 71.05.240, the court shall forward within three business days of the probable cause hearing a copy of the person's driver's license or identicard, or comparable information, along with the date of release from the facility, to the department of licensing and to the Washington state patrol firearms background check program, who shall forward the information to the national instant criminal background check system index, denied persons file, created by the federal Brady handgun violence prevention act (P.L. 103-159). Upon expiration of the six-month period during which the person's right to possess a firearm is suspended as provided in RCW 71.05.182, the Washington state patrol ((shall forward to the national instant criminal background check system index, denied persons file, notice that the person's right to possess a firearm has been restored))firearms background check program must remove the person from the national instant criminal background check system.

(2) Upon receipt of the information provided for by subsection (1) of this section, the department of licensing shall determine if the detained person has a concealed pistol license. If the person does have a concealed pistol license, the department of licensing shall immediately notify the license-issuing authority, which, upon receipt of such notification, shall immediately suspend the license for a period of six months from the date of the person's release from the facility.

(3) A person who is prohibited from possessing a firearm by reason of having been detained under RCW 71.05.150 or 71.05.153 may, upon discharge, petition the superior court to have his or her right to possess a firearm restored before the six-month suspension period has elapsed by following the procedures provided in RCW 9.41.047(3).

Sec. 3. RCW 9.41.111 and 2020 c 36 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning on the date that is thirty days after the Washington state patrol issues a notification to dealers that a state firearms background check system is established within the Washington state patrol, a dealer shall use the state firearms background check system to conduct background checks for purchases or transfers of firearm frames or receivers in accordance with this section.

(a) A dealer may not deliver a firearm frame or receiver to a purchaser or transferee unless the dealer first conducts a background check of the applicant through the state firearms background check system and the requirements or time periods in RCW 9.41.092 (1) and (2) have been satisfied.

(b) When processing an application for the purchase or transfer of a firearm frame or receiver, a dealer shall comply with the application, recordkeeping, and other requirements of this chapter that apply to the sale or transfer of a ((pistol))firearm, frame or receiver or semi-automatic assault rifle.

(c) A signed application for the purchase or transfer of a firearm frame or receiver shall constitute a waiver of confidentiality and written request that the health care authority, mental health institutions, and other health care facilities release, to an inquiring court, law enforcement agency, or ((the state))the Washington state patrol firearms background check program, information relevant to the applicant's eligibility to possess a firearm. Any mental health information received by a court, law enforcement agency, or ((the state))the Washington state patrol firearms background check program pursuant to this section shall not be disclosed except as provided in RCW 42.56.240(4).

(d) The department of licensing shall keep copies or records of applications for the purchase or transfer of a firearm frame or receiver and copies or records of firearm frame or receiver transfers in the same manner as pistol and semiautomatic assault rifle application and transfer records under RCW 9.41.129.

(e) A person who knowingly makes a false statement regarding identity or eligibility requirements on the application to purchase a firearm frame or receiver is guilty of false swearing under RCW 9A.72.040.

(f) This section does not apply to sales or transfers of firearm frames or receivers to licensed dealers.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "firearm frame or receiver" means the federally regulated part of a firearm that provides housing for the hammer, bolt or breechblock, and firing mechanism, and which is usually threaded at its forward portion to receive the barrel.

Sec. 4. RCW 9.41.114 and 2020 c 28 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon denying an application for the purchase or transfer of a firearm, frame or receiver, or semi-automatic assault rifle as a result of a background check by the Washington state patrol firearms background check program or completed and submitted firearm purchase or transfer application that indicates the applicant is ineligible to possess a firearm, frame or receiver, or semi-automatic assault rifle under state or federal law, the dealer shall:

(1) Provide the applicant with a copy of a notice form generated and distributed by the Washington state patrol firearms background check program under RCW 43.43.823(6), informing denied applicants of their right to appeal the denial; and

(2) Retain the original records of the attempted purchase or transfer of a firearm for a period not less than six years.

Sec. 5. RCW 9.41.350 and 2023 c 262 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person may file a voluntary waiver of firearm rights, either in writing or electronically, with the clerk of the court in any county in Washington state. The clerk of the court must request a physical or scanned copy of photo identification to verify the person's identity prior to accepting the form. The person filing the form may provide the name of a family member, mental health professional, substance use disorder professional, or alternate person to be contacted if the filer attempts to purchase a firearm while the voluntary waiver of firearm rights is in effect or if the filer applies to have the voluntary waiver revoked. The clerk of the court must immediately give notice to the person filing the form and any listed family member, mental health professional, substance use disorder professional, or alternate person if the filer's voluntary waiver of firearm rights has been accepted. The notice must state that the filer's possession or control of a firearm is unlawful under RCW 9.41.040(7) and that any firearm in the filer's possession or control should be surrendered immediately. By the end of the business day, the clerk of the court must transmit the accepted form to the Washington state patrol firearms background check program. The Washington state patrol firearms background check program must enter the voluntary waiver of firearm rights into the national instant criminal background check system and any other federal or state computer-based systems used by law enforcement agencies or others to identify prohibited purchasers of firearms within twenty-four hours of receipt of the form. Copies and records of the voluntary waiver of firearm rights shall not be disclosed except to law enforcement agencies.

(2) A filer of a voluntary waiver of firearm rights may update the contact information for any family member, mental health professional, substance use disorder professional, or alternate person provided under subsection (1) of this section by making an electronic or written request to the clerk of the court in the same county where the voluntary waiver of firearm rights was filed. The clerk of the court must request a physical or scanned copy of photo identification to verify the person's identity prior to updating the contact information on the form. By the end of the business day, the clerk of the court must transmit the updated contact information to the Washington state patrol.

(3) No sooner than seven calendar days after filing a voluntary waiver of firearm rights, the person may file a revocation of the voluntary waiver of firearm rights, either in writing or electronically, in the same county where the voluntary waiver of firearm rights was filed. The clerk of the court must request a physical or scanned copy of photo identification to verify the person's identity prior to accepting the form. By the end of the business day, the clerk of the court must transmit the form to the Washington state patrol firearms background check program and to any family member, mental health professional, substance use disorder professional, or alternate person listed on the voluntary waiver of firearm rights. Within seven days of receiving a revocation of a voluntary waiver of firearm rights, the Washington state patrol firearms background check program must remove the person from the national instant criminal background check system, and any other federal or state computer-based systems used by law enforcement agencies or others to identify prohibited purchasers of firearms in which the person was entered, unless the person is otherwise ineligible to possess a firearm under RCW 9.41.040, and destroy all records of the voluntary waiver.

(4) A person who knowingly makes a false statement regarding their identity on the voluntary waiver of firearm rights form or revocation of waiver of firearm rights form is guilty of false swearing under RCW 9A.72.040.

(5) Neither a voluntary waiver of firearm rights nor a revocation of a voluntary waiver of firearm rights shall be considered by a court in any legal proceeding.

(6) A voluntary waiver of firearm rights may not be required of an individual as a condition for receiving employment, benefits, or services.

(7) All records obtained and all reports produced, as required by this section, are not subject to disclosure through the public records act under chapter 42.56 RCW.

Sec. 6. RCW 43.43.823 and 2020 c 28 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The Washington state patrol firearms background check program shall report each instance where an application for the purchase or transfer of a firearm is denied as the result of a background check that indicates the applicant is ineligible to possess a firearm to the local law enforcement agency in the jurisdiction where the attempted purchase or transfer took place. The reported information must include the identifying information of the applicant, the date of the application and denial of the application, the basis for the denial of the application, and other information deemed appropriate by the Washington state patrol firearms background check program.

(2) The Washington state patrol firearms background check program must incorporate the information concerning any person whose application for the purchase or transfer of a firearm is denied as the result of a background check into its electronic database accessible to law enforcement agencies and officers, including federally recognized Indian tribes, that have a connection to the Washington state patrol firearms background check program electronic database.

(3) Upon appeal of a background check denial, the Washington state patrol firearms background check program shall immediately remove the record of the person from its electronic database accessible to law enforcement agencies and officers and keep a separate record of the person's information until such time as the appeal has been resolved. If the appeal is denied, the Washington state patrol firearms background check program shall put the person's background check denial information back in its electronic database accessible to law enforcement agencies and officers.

(4) Upon receipt of satisfactory proof that a person is no longer ineligible to possess a firearm under state or federal law, the Washington state patrol firearms background check program must remove any record of the person's denied firearms purchase or transfer application from its electronic database accessible to law enforcement agencies and officers.

(5) In any case where the purchase or transfer of a firearm is initially denied as the result of a background check that indicates the applicant is ineligible to possess a firearm, but the purchase or transfer is subsequently approved, the Washington state patrol firearms background check program must remove any record of the person's denied firearms purchase or transfer application from its electronic database accessible to law enforcement agencies and officers within five business days and report the subsequent approval to the local law enforcement agency that received notification of the original denial.

(6) The Washington state patrol firearms background check program shall generate and distribute a notice form to all firearm dealers, to be provided by the dealers to applicants denied the purchase or transfer of a firearm as a result of a background check that indicates the applicant is ineligible to possess a firearm. The notice form must contain the following statements:

State law requires that the Washington state patrol transmit the following information to the local law enforcement agency as a result of your firearm purchase or transfer denial within five days of the denial:

(a) Identifying information of the applicant;

(b) The date of the application and denial of the

application;

(c) The basis for the denial; and

(d) Other information as determined by the Washington state patrol firearms background check program.

If you believe this denial is in error, and you do not exercise your right to appeal, you may be subject to criminal investigation by the Washington state patrol and/or a local law enforcement agency.

The notice form shall also contain information directing the applicant to a website describing the process of appealing a background check system denial and refer the applicant to the Washington state patrol firearms background check program for information on a denial based on a state background check. The notice form shall also contain a phone number for a contact at the Washington state patrol to direct the person to resources regarding an individual's right to appeal a background check denial.

(7) The Washington state patrol shall provide to the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs any information necessary for the administration of the grant program in RCW 36.28A.420, providing notice to a protected person pursuant to RCW 36.28A.410, or preparation of the report required under RCW 36.28A.405.

(8) The Washington state patrol may adopt rules as are necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

Sec. 7. RCW 43.43.580 and 2022 c 105 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The Washington state patrol shall establish a firearms background check unit to serve as a centralized single point of contact for dealers to conduct background checks for firearms sales or transfers required under chapter 9.41 RCW and the federal Brady handgun violence prevention act (18 U.S.C. Sec. 921 et seq.). The Washington state patrol shall establish an automated firearms background check system to conduct background checks on applicants for the purchase or transfer of a firearm. The system must include the following characteristics:

(a) Allow a dealer to contact the Washington state patrol through a web portal or other electronic means and by telephone to request a background check of an applicant for the purchase or transfer of a firearm;

(b) Provide a dealer with a notification that a firearm purchase or transfer application has been received;

(c) Assign a unique identifier to the background check inquiry;

(d) Provide an automated response to the dealer indicating whether the transfer may proceed or is denied, or that the check is indeterminate and will require further investigation;

(e) Include measures to ensure data integrity and the confidentiality and security of all records and data transmitted and received by the system; and

(f) Include a performance metrics tracking system to evaluate the performance of the background check system.

(2) Upon receipt of a request from a dealer for a background check in connection with the sale or transfer of a firearm, the Washington state patrol shall:

(a) Provide the dealer with a notification that a firearm transfer application has been received;

(b) Conduct a check of the national instant criminal background check system and the following additional records systems to determine whether the transferee is prohibited from possessing a firearm under state or federal law: (i) The Washington crime information center and Washington state identification system; (ii) the health care authority electronic database; (iii) the federal bureau of investigation national data exchange database and any available repository of statewide local law enforcement record management systems information; (iv) the administrative office of the courts case management system; and (v) other databases or resources as appropriate;

(c) Perform an equivalency analysis on criminal charges in foreign jurisdictions to determine if the applicant has been convicted as defined in RCW 9.41.040(3) and if the offense is equivalent to a Washington felony as defined in RCW 9.41.010;

(d) Notify the dealer without delay that the records indicate the individual is prohibited from possessing a firearm and the transfer is denied or that the individual is approved to complete the transfer. If the results of the background check are indeterminate, the Washington state patrol shall notify the dealer of the delay and conduct necessary research and investigation to resolve the inquiry; and

(e) Provide the dealer with a unique identifier for the inquiry.

(3) The Washington state patrol may hold the delivery of a firearm to an applicant under the circumstances provided in RCW 9.41.090 (4) and (5).

(4)(a) The Washington state patrol shall require a dealer to charge each firearm purchaser or transferee a fee for performing background checks in connection with firearms transfers. The fee must be set at an amount necessary to cover the annual costs of operating and maintaining the firearm background check system but shall not exceed eighteen dollars. The Washington state patrol shall transmit the fees collected to the state treasurer for deposit in the state firearms background check system account created in RCW 43.43.590. It is the intent of the legislature that once the state firearm background check system is established, the fee established in this section will replace the fee required in RCW 9.41.090(7).

(b) The background check fee required under this subsection does not apply to any background check conducted in connection with a pawnbroker's receipt of a pawned firearm or the redemption of a pawned firearm.

(5) The Washington state patrol shall establish a procedure for a person who has been denied a firearms transfer as the result of a background check to appeal the denial to the Washington state patrol and to obtain information on the basis for the denial and procedures to review and correct any erroneous records that led to the denial.

(6) The Washington state patrol shall work with the administrative office of the courts to build a link between the firearm background check system and the administrative office of the courts case management system for the purpose of accessing court records to determine a person's eligibility to possess a firearm.

(7) Upon establishment of the firearm background check system under this section, the Washington state patrol shall notify each dealer in the state of the existence of the system, and the dealer must use the system to conduct background checks for firearm sales or transfers beginning on the date that is thirty days after issuance of the notification.

(8) The Washington state patrol shall consult with the Washington background check advisory board created in RCW 43.43.585 in carrying out its duties under this section.

(9) No later than July 1, 2025, and annually thereafter, the Washington state patrol firearms background check unit shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature the average time between receipt of request for a background check and final decision.

(10) All records and information prepared, obtained, used, or retained by the Washington state patrol in connection with a request for a firearm background check are exempt from public inspection and copying under chapter 42.56 RCW.

(((10)))(11) The Washington state patrol may adopt rules necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

(((11)))(12) For the purposes of this section, "dealer" has the same meaning as given in RCW 9.41.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. This act takes effect on the date that is 30 days after the Washington state patrol issues a notification to dealers that a state firearms background check system is established under RCW 43.43.580. The Washington state patrol shall provide written notice of the effective date of this act to the chief clerk of the house of representatives, the secretary of the senate, the office of the code reviser, and others as deemed appropriate by the Washington state patrol.

--- END ---