BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.305.011 and 2022 c 44 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The membership of the state board of education shall be composed of ((sixteen))16 members who are residents of the state of Washington:

(a) Seven shall be members representing the educational system, as follows:

(i) Five members elected by school district directors. Three of the members elected by school district directors shall be residents of western Washington and two members shall be residents of eastern Washington;

(ii) One member elected at large by the members of the boards of directors of all private schools in the state meeting the requirements of RCW 28A.195.010; and

(iii) The superintendent of public instruction;

(b) Seven members appointed by the governor; and

(c) Two students selected in a manner determined by the state board of education.

(2) Initial appointments shall be for terms from one to four years in length, with the terms expiring on the second Monday of January of the applicable year. As the terms of the first appointees expire or vacancies on the board occur, the governor shall appoint or reappoint members of the board to complete the initial terms or to four-year terms, as appropriate.

(a) Appointees of the governor must be individuals who have demonstrated interest in public schools and are supportive of educational improvement, have a positive record of service, and who will devote sufficient time to the responsibilities of the board.

(b) In appointing board members, the governor shall consider the diversity of the population of the state.

(c) All appointments to the board made by the governor are subject to confirmation by the senate.

(d) No person may serve as a member of the board, except the superintendent of public instruction, for more than two consecutive full four-year terms.

(3) The governor may remove an appointed member of the board for neglect of duty, misconduct, malfeasance, or misfeasance in office, or for incompetent or unprofessional conduct as defined in chapter 18.130 RCW. In such a case, the governor shall file with the secretary of state a statement of the causes for and the order of removal from office, and the secretary of state shall send a certified copy of the statement of causes and order of removal to the last known post office address of the member.

(4)(a) The superintendent of public instruction shall be the chair of the board ((shall be elected by a majority vote of the members of the board. The chair of the board shall serve a term of two years, and may be reelected to an additional term. A member of the board may not serve as chair for more than two consecutive terms)).

(b) Except as provided in (d) of this subsection, nine voting members of the board constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

(c) All members are voting members.

(d) A student member selected under subsection (1)(c) of this section shall excuse themselves from voting on matters directly relating to graduation requirement changes that apply to the student's school and graduating class. In the event of a student member excusing themselves under this subsection, eight voting members of the board constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

(5) Members of the board appointed by the governor who are not public employees shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.250 and shall be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in carrying out the duties of the board in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(6) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall administer the board.

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.300.040 and 2023 c 303 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to any other powers and duties as provided by law, the powers and duties of the superintendent of public instruction shall be:

(1) To have supervision over all matters pertaining to the public schools of the state;

(2) To report to the governor and the legislature such information and data as may be required for the management and improvement of the schools;

(3) To prepare and have printed such forms, registers, courses of study, rules for the government of the common schools, and such other material and books as may be necessary for the discharge of the duties of teachers and officials charged with the administration of the laws relating to the common schools, and to distribute the same to educational service district superintendents;

(4) To travel, without neglecting his or her other official duties as superintendent of public instruction, for the purpose of attending educational meetings or conventions, of visiting schools, and of consulting educational service district superintendents or other school officials;

(5) To prepare and from time to time to revise a manual of the Washington state common school code, copies of which shall be made available online and which shall be sold at approximate actual cost of publication and distribution per volume to public and nonpublic agencies or individuals, said manual to contain Titles 28A and 28C RCW, rules related to the common schools, and such other matter as the state superintendent or the state board of education shall determine;

(6) To file all papers, reports and public documents transmitted to the superintendent by the school officials of the several counties or districts of the state, each year separately. Copies of all papers filed in the superintendent's office, and the superintendent's official acts, may, or upon request, shall be certified by the superintendent and attested by the superintendent's official seal, and when so certified shall be evidence of the papers or acts so certified to;

(7) To require annually, on or before the 15th day of August, of the president, manager, or principal of every educational institution in this state, a report as required by the superintendent of public instruction; and it is the duty of every president, manager, or principal, to complete and return such forms within such time as the superintendent of public instruction shall direct;

(8) To keep in the superintendent's office a record of all teachers receiving certificates to teach in the common schools of this state;

(9) To issue certificates as provided by law;

(10) To keep in the superintendent's office at the capital of the state, all books and papers pertaining to the business of the superintendent's office, and to keep and preserve in the superintendent's office a complete record of statistics, as well as a record of the meetings of the state board of education;

(11) With the assistance of the office of the attorney general, to decide all points of law which may be submitted to the superintendent in writing by any educational service district superintendent, or that may be submitted to the superintendent by any other person, upon appeal from the decision of any educational service district superintendent; and the superintendent shall publish his or her rulings and decisions from time to time for the information of school officials and teachers; and the superintendent's decision shall be final unless set aside by a court of competent jurisdiction;

(12) To administer oaths and affirmations in the discharge of the superintendent's official duties;

(13) To deliver to his or her successor, at the expiration of the superintendent's term of office, all records, books, maps, documents and papers of whatever kind belonging to the superintendent's office or which may have been received by the superintendent's for the use of the superintendent's office;

(14) To administer family services and programs to promote the state's policy as provided in RCW 74.14A.025;

(15) To promote the adoption of school-based curricula and policies that provide quality, daily physical education for all students, and to encourage policies that provide all students with opportunities for physical activity outside of formal physical education classes;

(16) To perform all duties required by chapter 303, Laws of 2023 for the delivery and oversight of basic education services to justice-involved students under the age of 21 who are served through institutional education programs in facilities that are not under the jurisdiction of the department of social and health services or the department of corrections; ((and))

(17) To administer the state board of education as provided in RCW 28A.305.011; and

(18) To perform such other duties as may be required by law.

Sec. 3. RCW 28A.305.130 and 2021 c 111 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

The purpose of the state board of education is to provide advocacy and strategic oversight of public education; implement a standards-based accountability framework that creates a unified system of increasing levels of support for schools in order to improve student academic achievement; provide leadership in the creation of a system that personalizes education for each student and respects diverse cultures, abilities, and learning styles; and promote achievement of the goals of RCW 28A.150.210. In addition to any other powers and duties as provided by law, the state board of education shall:

(1) Hold regularly scheduled meetings at such time and place within the state as the board shall determine and may hold such special meetings as may be deemed necessary for the transaction of public business;

(2) Form committees as necessary to effectively and efficiently conduct the work of the board;

(3) Seek advice from the public and interested parties regarding the work of the board;

(4) For purposes of statewide accountability:

(a) Adopt and revise performance improvement goals in reading, writing, science, and mathematics, by subject and grade level, once assessments in these subjects are required statewide; academic and technical skills, as appropriate, in secondary career and technical education programs; and student attendance, as the board deems appropriate to improve student learning. The goals shall be consistent with student privacy protection provisions of RCW 28A.655.090(7) and shall not conflict with requirements contained in Title I of the federal elementary and secondary education act of 1965, or the requirements of the Carl D. Perkins vocational education act of 1998, each as amended. The goals may be established for all students, economically disadvantaged students, limited English proficient students, students with disabilities, and students who are not meeting academic standards as defined in RCW 28A.165.015, disaggregated as described in RCW 28A.300.042(1) for student-level data. The board may establish school and school district goals addressing high school graduation rates and dropout reduction goals for students in grades seven through twelve. The board shall adopt the goals by rule. However, before each goal is implemented, the board shall present the goal to the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate for the committees' review and comment in a time frame that will permit the legislature to take statutory action on the goal if such action is deemed warranted by the legislature;

(b)(i)(A) Identify the scores students must achieve in order to meet the standard on the statewide student assessment, and the SAT or the ACT if used to demonstrate career and college readiness under RCW 28A.655.250. The board shall also determine student scores that identify levels of student performance below and beyond the standard. The board shall set such performance standards and levels in consultation with the superintendent of public instruction and after consideration of any recommendations that may be developed by any advisory committees that may be established for this purpose;

(B) To permit the legislature to take any statutory action it deems warranted before modified or newly established scores are implemented, the board shall notify the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate of any scores that are modified or established under (b)(i)(A) of this subsection on or after July 28, 2019. The notifications required by this subsection (4)(b)(i)(B) must be provided by November 30th of the year proceeding the beginning of the school year in which the modified or established scores will take effect;

(ii) The legislature intends to continue the implementation of chapter 22, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. when the legislature expressed the intent for the state board of education to identify the student performance standard that demonstrates a student's career and college readiness for the eleventh grade consortium-developed assessments. Therefore, by December 1, 2018, the state board of education, in consultation with the superintendent of public instruction, must identify and report to the governor and the education policy and fiscal committees of the legislature on the equivalent student performance standard that a tenth grade student would need to achieve on the state assessments to be on track to be career and college ready at the end of the student's high school experience;

(iii) The legislature shall be advised of the initial performance standards and any changes made to the elementary, middle, and high school level performance standards. The board must provide an explanation of and rationale for all initial performance standards and any changes, for all grade levels of the statewide student assessment. If the board changes the performance standards for any grade level or subject, the superintendent of public instruction must recalculate the results from the previous ten years of administering that assessment regarding students below, meeting, and beyond the state standard, to the extent that this data is available, and post a comparison of the original and recalculated results on the superintendent's website;

(c) Annually review the assessment reporting system to ensure fairness, accuracy, timeliness, and equity of opportunity, especially with regard to schools with special circumstances and unique populations of students, and a recommendation to the superintendent of public instruction of any improvements needed to the system; and

(d) Include in the biennial report required under RCW 28A.305.035, information on the progress that has been made in achieving goals adopted by the board;

(5) Accredit, subject to such accreditation standards and procedures as may be established by the state board of education, all private schools that apply for accreditation, and approve, subject to the provisions of RCW 28A.195.010, private schools carrying out a program for any or all of the grades kindergarten through twelve. However, no private school may be approved that operates a kindergarten program only and no private school shall be placed upon the list of accredited schools so long as secret societies are knowingly allowed to exist among its students by school officials;

(6) Articulate with the institutions of higher education, workforce representatives, and early learning policymakers and providers to coordinate and unify the work of the public school system;

(7) ((Hire an executive director and an administrative assistant to reside in the office of the superintendent of public instruction for administrative purposes. Any other personnel of the board shall be appointed as provided by))Have an executive director, administrative assistant, and any other personnel of the board whom are appointed as provided under RCW 28A.300.020. The board may delegate to the executive director by resolution such duties as deemed necessary to efficiently carry on the business of the board including, but not limited to, ((the authority to employ necessary personnel and)) the authority to enter into, amend, and terminate contracts on behalf of the board. The executive director, administrative assistant, and all but one of the other personnel of the board are exempt from civil service, together with other staff as now or hereafter designated as exempt in accordance with chapter 41.06 RCW; and

(8) Adopt a seal that shall be kept in the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

Sec. 4. RCW 28A.300.020 and 2005 c 497 s 403 are each amended to read as follows:

The superintendent of public instruction may appoint assistant superintendents of public instruction, a deputy superintendent of public instruction, an executive director and administrative assistant for the state board of education, and may employ such other assistants and clerical help as are necessary to carry out the duties of the superintendent and the state board of education. ((However, the superintendent shall employ without undue delay the executive director of the state board of education and other state board of education office assistants and clerical help, appointed by the state board under RCW 28A.305.130, whose positions are allotted and funded in accordance with moneys appropriated exclusively for the operation of the state board of education. The rate of compensation and termination of any such executive director, state board office assistants, and clerical help shall be subject to the prior consent of the state board of education.)) The assistant superintendents, deputy superintendent, executive director and administrative assistant for the state board of education, and such other officers and employees as are exempted from the provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW, shall serve at the pleasure of the superintendent ((or at the pleasure of the superintendent and the state board of education as provided in this section. Expenditures by the superintendent of public instruction for direct and indirect support of the state board of education are valid operational expenditures by and in behalf of the office of the superintendent of public instruction)).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. (1) All powers, duties, and functions of the state board of education are transferred to the office of the superintendent of public instruction, and the state board of education shall continue to fulfill its purpose as an advisory and rule-making board within the office of the superintendent of public instruction as provided in RCW 28A.305.130. All references to the state board of education in the Revised Code of Washington mean the state board of education under the administration of the office of the superintendent of public instruction when referring to the functions transferred in this section.

(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material in the possession of the state board of education pertaining to the powers, duties, and functions transferred must be delivered to the custody of the office of the superintendent of public instruction. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the state board of education in carrying out the powers, duties, and functions transferred must be made available to the office of the superintendent of public instruction. All funds, credits, or other assets held in connection with the powers, duties, and functions transferred are assigned to the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(b) Any appropriations made to the state board of education for carrying out the powers, duties, and functions transferred are, on the effective date of this section, transferred and credited to the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(c) Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of financial management shall make a determination as to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.

(3) All employees of the state board of education engaged in performing the powers, duties, and functions transferred are transferred to the jurisdiction of the office of the superintendent of public instruction. All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are assigned to the office of the superintendent of public instruction to perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil service.

(4) All rules and all pending business before the state board of education pertaining to the powers, duties, and functions transferred shall be continued and acted upon by the office of the superintendent of public instruction. All existing contracts and obligations remain in full force and shall be performed by the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of the state board of education does not affect the validity of any act performed before the effective date of this section.

(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers directed by this section, the director of financial management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.

(7) All classified employees of the state board of education assigned to the office of the superintendent of public instruction under this section whose positions are within an existing bargaining unit description at the office of the superintendent of public instruction must become a part of the existing bargaining unit at the office of the superintendent of public instruction and are considered an appropriate inclusion or modification of the existing bargaining unit under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. The office of the code reviser shall note, wherever any agency or agency's duties transferred, consolidated, or eliminated under this act are used or referred to in statute, that the agency has changed. The office of the code reviser shall prepare legislation for the 2025 regular session that: (1) Changes all statutory references of any agency transferred, consolidated, or eliminated under this act; and (2) changes statutory references to sections affected by this act but not amended in this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. Sections 1 through 5 of this act take effect July 1, 2025.

--- END ---