BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

Cities and counties planning under this chapter shall enforce land use regulations for residential development as provided in this section:

(1) Garages and carports may not be required as a way to meet minimum parking requirements for residential development;

(2) Parking spaces that count towards minimum parking requirements may be enclosed or unenclosed;

(3) Parking spaces in tandem must count towards meeting minimum parking requirements at a rate of one space for every 20 linear feet with any necessary provisions for turning radius. For purposes of this subsection, "tandem" is defined as having two or more vehicles, one in front of or behind the others with a single means of ingress and egress;

(4) Existence of nonconforming gravel surfacing in existing designated parking areas may not be a reason for prohibiting utilization of existing space in the parking area to meet local parking standards; and

(5) Parking spaces may not be required to exceed eight feet by 20 feet, except for required parking for people with disabilities.

--- END ---