BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 42.52 RCW to read as follows:

(1) No state officer or state employee may knowingly provide false or misleading information, or procure, induce, or coerce another person to provide false or misleading information:

(a) To the legislature, including committees and agencies of the legislature; or

(b) In an official report or document produced by an agency.

(2) Information is false or misleading under this section if it contains a material misrepresentation of fact or law or omits a fact necessary to make the information considered as a whole not materially misleading.

--- END ---