BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that participants in the boy scouts of America who suffered abuse may submit a claim against the boy scouts of America bankruptcy settlement trust in accordance with In re Boy Scouts Of America And Delaware BSA, LLC, Case No. 20-10343, United States bankruptcy court for the district of Delaware, and that each claimant's award is determined based on their home state's statute of limitations on sexual abuse claims. The legislature intends to ensure that Washington claimants receive a full allocation and that a time-limited adjustment to Washington's statute of limitations on such claims is in the best interest of justice.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 4.16 RCW to read as follows:

(1) An action for claims or causes of action based on intentional conduct brought by any person for recovery of damages for injury suffered as a result of childhood sexual abuse against a bankruptcy estate of an organization chartered under part B of subtitle II of Title 36 of the United States Code may be brought at any time after the cause of action accrues.

(2) The definitions in RCW 4.16.340 apply to this section.

(3) This section expires July 1, 2029.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---