BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The sum of $1,053,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, from the general fund to the office of the governor for the purposes of implementing RCW 43.06B.010(5).

--- END ---