BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature understands that many students suffered learning loss as a result of the COVID-19 pandemic. The legislature acknowledges that average math and English language arts test scores were lower in 2022 than before the pandemic and that the largest declines were in middle school grades.

(2) The legislature also recognizes that the Washington state institute for public policy published a report on student achievement and the pandemic. In that report, the institute estimated that test scores fell 0.20 standard deviations in 2022, which is associated with a $32,000 decrease in future earnings per student. The report further explained that the pandemic contributed to educational inequalities because some student populations were affected more than others. The report stated that low-income students, students of color, and students with disabilities experienced larger decreases in test scores compared to their economically advantaged, nondisabled, and white peers.

(3) The Washington state institute for public policy's report specified that interventions like tutoring, summer school programs, and double-dose classes may offset the decline in test scores. A double-dose class is a practice in which middle or high school students who struggle in math or reading enroll in multiple math or reading classes to increase their instructional time with the subject.

(4) The legislature intends to establish a grant program to help schools provide the effective interventions of high quality tutoring, rigorous extended learning programs, and summer school programs for students with the greatest learning recovery needs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28A.630 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall establish the learning recovery grant program.

(2) The purpose of the grant program is to provide funding for schools and school districts to support students experiencing learning loss as a result of the COVID-19 pandemic. Grant funds may only be used for the following interventions: (a) High quality tutoring for math and English language arts; (b) rigorous extended learning programs including double-dose classes; and (c) summer school programs.

(3)(a) School districts, charter schools, and state-tribal education compact schools that serve students in grades six through 12 may apply for these grants.

(b) Funding priority shall be given to applicants with the highest numbers of low-income students, students of color, and students with disabilities and who have the greatest learning recovery needs.

(4) Schools and school districts that receive grant funds must notify parents and guardians of their students' access to these interventions to promote student and family engagement.

(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction may adopt rules for the grant program established under this section.

(6) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must report on the outcomes of the grant program established under this section by November 1, 2025, and November 1, 2026. Reports must include how the grant funding was used, student demographics, and the impact on math and English language arts test scores.

(7) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Rigorous extended learning programs" means programs incorporating features that research has shown as most effective for student learning recovery, which include: (i) High quality curriculum aligned with content from the regular school day and lesson plans that include options for individualized instruction; (ii) preservice and ongoing training, and one-to-one coaching for extended learning instructors; (iii) extra instruction time during the regular school year, school breaks, or the summer, and strategies such as double-dose classes or mandatory summer school programs; (iv) opportunities for students to attend at least 44 to 100 hours; and (v) the use of certificated staff, paraeducators, and trained volunteers.

(b) "High quality tutoring" means programs that: (i) Use certificated staff, paraeducators, or trained volunteers; (ii) have small student to teacher ratios; (iii) are ongoing throughout the school year and occur at least three times a week during the school day; (iv) use data to identify students most in need of support and monitor students' progress; and (v) assess program effectiveness.

(8) This section expires December 31, 2026.

--- END ---