BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9A.32.060 and 2011 c 336 s 357 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty of manslaughter in the first degree when:

(a) He or she recklessly causes the death of another person; ((or))

(b) He or she intentionally and unlawfully kills an unborn quick child by inflicting any injury upon the mother of such child; or

(c) He or she intentionally and unlawfully delivers a controlled substance that is a Schedule I or II controlled substance in violation of RCW 69.50.401(2) (a), (b), or (c) and the controlled substance is subsequently used by the person to whom it was delivered, resulting in the death of the user.

(2) Manslaughter in the first degree is a class A felony.

--- END ---