BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 59.20.030 and 2023 c 40 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

For purposes of this chapter:

(1) "Abandoned" as it relates to a mobile home, manufactured home, or park model owned by a tenant in a mobile home park, mobile home park cooperative, or mobile home park subdivision or tenancy in a mobile home lot means the tenant has defaulted in rent and by absence and by words or actions reasonably indicates the intention not to continue tenancy;

(2) "Active duty" means service authorized by the president of the United States, the secretary of defense, or the governor for a period of more than ((thirty))30 consecutive days;

(3) "Community land trust" means a private, nonprofit, community-governed, and/or membership corporation whose mission is to acquire, hold, develop, lease, and steward land for making homes, farmland, gardens, businesses, and other community assets permanently affordable for current and future generations. A community land trust's bylaws prescribe that the governing board is comprised of individuals who reside in the community land trust's service area, one-third of whom are currently, or could be, community land trust leaseholders;

(4) "Eligible organization" includes community land trusts, resident nonprofit cooperatives, local governments, local housing authorities, nonprofit community or neighborhood-based organizations, federally recognized Indian tribes in the state of Washington, and regional or statewide nonprofit housing assistance organizations, whose mission aligns with the long-term preservation of the manufactured/mobile home community;

(5) "Housing and low-income assistance organization" means an organization that provides tenants living in mobile home parks, manufactured housing communities, and manufactured/mobile home communities with information about their rights and other pertinent information;

(6) "Housing authority" or "authority" means any of the public body corporate and politic created in RCW 35.82.030;

(7) "Landlord" or "owner" means the owner of a mobile home park and includes the agents of the owner;

(8) "Local government" means a town government, city government, code city government, or county government in the state of Washington;

(9) "Manufactured home" means a single-family dwelling built according to the United States department of housing and urban development manufactured home construction and safety standards act, which is a national preemptive building code. A manufactured home also: (a) Includes plumbing, heating, air conditioning, and electrical systems; (b) is built on a permanent chassis; and (c) can be transported in one or more sections with each section at least eight feet wide and 40 feet long when transported, or when installed on the site is three hundred twenty square feet or greater;

(10) "Manufactured/mobile home" means either a manufactured home or a mobile home;

(11) "Mobile home" means a factory-built dwelling built prior to June 15, 1976, to standards other than the United States department of housing and urban development code, and acceptable under applicable state codes in effect at the time of construction or introduction of the home into the state. Mobile homes have not been built since the introduction of the United States department of housing and urban development manufactured home construction and safety act;

(12) "Mobile home lot" means a portion of a mobile home park or manufactured housing community designated as the location of one mobile home, manufactured home, or park model and its accessory buildings, and intended for the exclusive use as a primary residence by the occupants of that mobile home, manufactured home, or park model;

(13) "Mobile home park cooperative" or "manufactured housing cooperative" means real property consisting of common areas and two or more lots held out for placement of mobile homes, manufactured homes, or park models in which both the individual lots and the common areas are owned by an association of shareholders which leases or otherwise extends the right to occupy individual lots to its own members;

(14) "Mobile home park subdivision" or "manufactured housing subdivision" means real property, whether it is called a subdivision, condominium, or planned unit development, consisting of common areas and two or more lots held for placement of mobile homes, manufactured homes, or park models in which there is private ownership of the individual lots and common, undivided ownership of the common areas by owners of the individual lots;

(15) "Mobile home park," "manufactured housing community," or "manufactured/mobile home community" means any real property which is rented or held out for rent to others for the placement of two or more mobile homes, manufactured homes, or park models for the primary purpose of production of income, except where such real property is rented or held out for rent for seasonal recreational purpose only and is not intended for year-round occupancy;

(16) "Notice of opportunity to compete to purchase" means a notice required under RCW 59.20.325;

(17) "Notice of sale" means a notice required under RCW 59.20.300 to be delivered to all tenants of a manufactured/mobile home community and other specified parties within 14 days after the date on which any advertisement, listing, or public or private notice is first made advertising that a manufactured/mobile home community or the property on which it sits is for sale or lease. A delivered notice of opportunity to compete to purchase acts as a notice of sale;

(18) "Occupant" means any person, including a live-in care provider, other than a tenant, who occupies a mobile home, manufactured home, or park model and mobile home lot;

(19) "Orders" means written official military orders, or any written notification, certification, or verification from the service member's commanding officer, with respect to the service member's current or future military status;

(20) "Park model" means a recreational vehicle intended for permanent or semi-permanent installation and is used as a primary residence;

(21) "Permanent change of station" means: (a) Transfer to a unit located at another port or duty station; (b) change of a unit's home port or permanent duty station; (c) call to active duty for a period not less than 90 days; (d) separation; or (e) retirement;

(22) "Qualified sale of manufactured/mobile home community" means the sale, as defined in RCW 82.45.010, of land and improvements comprising a manufactured/mobile home community that is transferred in a single purchase to a qualified tenant organization or to an eligible organization for the purpose of preserving the property as a manufactured/mobile home community;

(23) "Qualified tenant organization" means a formal organization of tenants within a manufactured/mobile home community, with the only requirement for membership consisting of being a tenant. If a majority of the tenants, based on home sites within the manufactured/mobile home community, agree that they want to preserve the manufactured/mobile home community then they will appoint a spokesperson to represent the wishes of the qualified tenant organization to the landlord and the landlord's representative;

(24) "Recreational vehicle" means a travel trailer, motor home, truck camper, or camping trailer that is primarily designed and used as temporary living quarters, is either self-propelled or mounted on or drawn by another vehicle, is transient, is not occupied as a primary residence, and is not immobilized or permanently affixed to a mobile home lot;

(25) "Resident nonprofit cooperative" means a nonprofit cooperative corporation formed by a group of manufactured/mobile home community residents for the purpose of acquiring the manufactured/mobile home community in which they reside and converting the manufactured/mobile home community to a mobile home park cooperative or manufactured housing cooperative;

(26) "Service member" means an active member of the United States armed forces, a member of a military reserve component, or a member of the national guard who is either stationed in or a resident of Washington state;

(27) "Tenant" means any person, except a transient, who rents a mobile home lot;

(28) "Transient" means a person who rents a mobile home lot for a period of less than one month for purposes other than as a primary residence.

Sec. 2. RCW 59.20.325 and 2023 c 40 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An owner shall give written notice of an opportunity to compete to purchase indicating the owner's interest in selling the manufactured/mobile home community before the owner markets the manufactured/mobile home community for sale or includes the sale of the manufactured/mobile home community in a multiple listing, and when the owner receives an offer to purchase that the owner intends to consider unless that offer is received during the process under RCW 59.20.330.

(2) The owner shall give the notice in subsection (1) of this section by certified mail or personal delivery to:

(a) All tenants of the manufactured/mobile home community;

(b) A qualified tenant organization, if there is an existing qualified tenant organization within the manufactured/mobile home community;

(c) The department of commerce; and

(d) The Washington state housing finance commission.

(3) The notice required in subsection (1) of this section must include:

(a) The date that the notice was mailed by certified mail or personally delivered to all recipients set forth in subsection (2) of this section;

(b) A statement that the owner is considering selling the manufactured/mobile home community or the property on which it sits;

(((b)))(c) A statement that the tenants, through a qualified tenant organization representing a majority of the tenants in the community, based on home sites, or an eligible organization, have an opportunity to compete to purchase the manufactured/mobile home community;

(((c)))(d) A statement that in order to compete to purchase the manufactured/mobile home community, within 70 days after ((delivery))the certified mailing or personal delivery date stated in accordance with (a) of this subsection of the notice of the owner's interest in selling the manufactured/mobile home community, the tenants must form or identify a single qualified tenant organization for the purpose of purchasing the manufactured/mobile home community and notify the owner in writing of:

(i) The tenants' interest in competing to purchase the manufactured/mobile home community; and

(ii) The name and contact information of the representative or representatives of the qualified tenant organization with whom the owner may communicate about the purchase; and

(((d)))(e) A statement that information about purchasing a manufactured/mobile home community is available from the department of commerce.

(4) The representative or representatives of the tenants committee will be able to request park operating expenses described in RCW 59.20.330 from the owner within a ((15-day))20-day information period following delivery of the qualified tenant organization's notice to the owner indicating interest in competing to purchase the manufactured/mobile home community.

(5) An eligible organization may also compete to purchase and is subject to the same time constraints and applicable conditions as a qualified tenant organization.

Sec. 3. RCW 59.20.330 and 2023 c 40 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Within 70 days after ((delivery of))the certified mailing or personal delivery date stated in the notice of the opportunity to compete to purchase the manufactured/mobile home community described in RCW 59.20.325, if the tenants choose to compete to purchase the manufactured/mobile home community in which the tenants reside, the tenants must notify the owner in writing of:

(a) The tenants' interest in competing to purchase the manufactured/mobile home community;

(b) Their formation or identification of a single qualified tenant organization made up of a majority of the tenants in the community, based on home sites, formed for the purpose of purchasing the manufactured/mobile home community; and

(c) The name and contact information of the representative or representatives of the qualified tenant organization with whom the owner may communicate about the purchase.

(2) The tenants may only have one qualified tenant organization for the purpose of purchasing the manufactured/mobile home community, but they may partner with a nonprofit or a housing authority to act with or for them subject to the same timelines, duties, and obligations that would apply to tenants and qualified tenant organizations under chapter 40, Laws of 2023.

(3) Within ((15))20 days following delivery of the notice in subsection (1) of this section from the tenants to the owner:

(a) The designated representative or representatives of the qualified tenant organization may make a written request to the owner for:

(i) The asking price for the manufactured/mobile home community, if any; ((and))or

(ii) Financial information relating to the operating expenses of the manufactured/mobile home community in order to assist them in making an offer to purchase the park;

(b) The owner may make a written request to the designated representative or representatives of the qualified tenant organization for proof of intent to fund a sale;

(c) All written requests made pursuant to this subsection must be fulfilled within 21 days from receipt unless otherwise agreed by the qualified tenant organization and the owner;

(d) Unless waived by the provider, information provided pursuant to this subsection shall be kept confidential, and a list must be created of persons with whom the tenants may share information who will also keep provided information confidential, including any of the following persons that are either seeking to purchase the manufactured/mobile home community on behalf of the tenants or assisting the qualified tenant organization in evaluating or purchasing the manufactured/mobile home community:

(i) A nonprofit organization or a housing authority;

(ii) An attorney or other licensed professional or adviser; and

(iii) A financial institution.

(4) Within 21 days after delivery of the information described in subsection (3)(a) of this section, if the tenants choose to continue competing to purchase the manufactured/mobile home community, the tenants must:

(a) Form a resident nonprofit cooperative that is legally capable of purchasing real property or associate with a nonprofit corporation or housing authority that is legally capable of purchasing the manufactured/mobile home community in which the tenants reside; and

(b) Submit to the owner a written offer to purchase the manufactured/mobile home community, in the form of a proposed purchase and sale agreement, and either a copy of the articles of incorporation of the corporate entity or other evidence of the legal capacity of the formed or associated corporate entity, nonprofit corporation, or housing authority to purchase real property and the manufactured/mobile home community.

(5)(a) Within 10 days of receiving the tenants' purchase and sale agreement, the owner may accept the offer, reject the offer, or submit a counteroffer.

(b) If the parties reach agreement on the purchase, the purchase and sale agreement must specify the price, due diligence duties, schedules, timelines, conditions, and any extensions.

(c) If the offer is rejected, then the owner must provide a written explanation of why the offer is being rejected and what terms and conditions might be included in a subsequent offer for the landlord to potentially accept it, if any. The price, terms, and conditions of an acceptable offer stated in the response must be universal and applicable to all potential buyers and must not be specific to and prohibitive of a qualified tenant organization or eligible organization making a successful offer to purchase the park.

(d) If the tenants do not: (i) Act as required within the time periods described in chapter 40, Laws of 2023; (ii) violate the confidentiality agreement described in this section; or (iii) reach agreement on a purchase with the owner, the owner is not obligated to take additional action under chapter 40, Laws of 2023 and may record an affidavit pursuant to RCW 59.20.345.

(6) An eligible organization acting on its own behalf is also subject to the same requirements and applicable conditions as those set out in this section.

Sec. 4. RCW 59.20.335 and 2023 c 40 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) During the process described in RCW 59.20.325 and 59.20.330, the parties shall act in good faith and in a commercially reasonable manner, which includes a duty for the tenants to notify the owner promptly if there is no intent to purchase the manufactured/mobile home community or the property on which it sits. The parties have an overall duty to act in good faith. With respect to negotiation, this overall duty of good faith requirement means that the owner must allow the tenants to develop an offer, must give their offer reasonable consideration, ((and)) must inform the tenants if a higher offer is submitted, and must work fairly with all competing buyers in the provision of information regarding the highest bid in order for all potential buyers to make further competitive offers. Furthermore, the owner may not deny residents the same access to the community and to information, such as operating expenses and rent rolls, that the landowner would give to a commercial buyer. With respect to financial information, all parties shall agree to keep this information confidential.

(2) Except as provided in RCW 59.20.340(1), before selling a manufactured/mobile home community to an entity that is not formed by or associated with the tenants, or to an eligible organization, the owner of the manufactured/mobile home community must give the notice required by RCW 59.20.325 and comply with the requirements of RCW 59.20.330.

(3) A minor error in providing the notice required by RCW 59.20.325 or in providing operating expenses information required by RCW 59.20.330 does not prevent the owner from selling the manufactured/mobile home community to an entity that is not formed by or associated with the tenants and does not cause the owner to be liable to the tenants for damages or a penalty.

(4) During the process described in RCW 59.20.325 and 59.20.330, the owner may seek, negotiate with, or enter into a contract subject to the rights of the tenants in chapter 40, Laws of 2023 with potential purchasers other than the tenants or an entity formed by or associated with the tenants or another eligible organization.

(5) If the owner does not comply with the requirements of chapter 40, Laws of 2023 in a substantial way that prevents the tenants or an eligible organization from competing to purchase the manufactured/mobile home community, the tenants or eligible organization may:

(a) Obtain injunctive relief to prevent a sale or transfer to an entity that is not formed by or associated with the tenants; and

(b) Recover actual damages not to exceed twice the monthly rent from the owner for each tenant.

(6) If a party misuses or discloses, in a substantial way, confidential information in violation of RCW 59.20.330, that party may recover actual damages from the other party.

(7) The department of commerce shall prepare and make available information for tenants about purchasing a manufactured dwelling or manufactured/mobile home community.

Sec. 5. RCW 59.20.080 and 2023 c 40 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A landlord shall not terminate or fail to renew a tenancy of a tenant or the occupancy of an occupant, of whatever duration except for one or more of the following reasons:

(a) In accordance with RCW 59.20.045(6), substantial violation, or repeated or periodic violations, of an enforceable rule of the mobile home park as established by the landlord at the inception of or during the tenancy or for violation of the tenant's duties as provided in RCW 59.20.140. The tenant shall be given written notice to cease the rule violation immediately. The notice shall state that failure to cease the violation of the rule or any subsequent violation of that or any other rule shall result in termination of the tenancy, and that the tenant shall vacate the premises within ((twenty))20 days: PROVIDED, That for a periodic violation the notice shall also specify that repetition of the same violation shall result in termination: PROVIDED FURTHER, That in the case of a violation of a "material change" in park rules with respect to pets, tenants with minor children living with them, or recreational facilities, the tenant shall be given written notice under this chapter of a six month period in which to comply or vacate;

(b) Nonpayment of rent or other charges specified in the rental agreement, upon 14 days written notice to pay rent and/or other charges or to vacate;

(c) Conviction of the tenant of a crime, commission of which threatens the health, safety, or welfare of the other mobile home park tenants. The tenant shall be given written notice of a 15-day period in which to vacate;

(d) Failure of the tenant to comply with local ordinances and state laws and regulations relating to mobile homes, manufactured homes, or park models or mobile home, manufactured homes, or park model living within a reasonable time after the tenant's receipt of notice of such noncompliance from the appropriate governmental agency;

(e) Change of land use of the mobile home park including, but not limited to, closure of the mobile home park or conversion to a use other than for mobile homes, manufactured homes, or park models or conversion of the mobile home park to a mobile home park cooperative or mobile home park subdivision. The landlord shall give the tenants two years' notice, in the form of a closure notice meeting the requirements of RCW 59.21.030, in advance of the effective date of such change. The two-year closure notice requirement does not apply if:

(i) The mobile home park or manufactured housing community has been acquired for or is under imminent threat of condemnation;

(ii) The mobile home park or manufactured housing community is sold or transferred to a county in order to reduce conflicting residential uses near a military installation;

(iii) The mobile home park or manufactured housing community is sold to an eligible organization;

(iv) The landlord provides relocation assistance of at least $15,000 for a multisection home or of at least $10,000 for a single section home, establishes a simple, straightforward, and timely process for compensating the tenants for the loss of their homes and actually compensates the tenants for the loss of their homes, at the greater of 50 percent of their assessed market value in the tax year prior to the notice of closure being issued, or $5,000, at any point during the closure notice period and prior to a change of use or sale of the property. At such time as the compensation is paid, the tenant shall be given written notice of at least 12 months in which to vacate that includes department of commerce contact information, as provided by the department of commerce, identifying financial and technical assistance programs available to support eligible tenant relocation activities, and the tenant shall continue to pay rent for as much time as he or she remains in the mobile home park or manufactured housing community. Nothing in this subsection (1)(e)(iv) prevents a tenant from relocating his or her home out of the mobile home park or manufactured housing community pursuant to chapter 59.21 RCW. In the event that a home remains in the mobile home park or manufactured housing community after a tenant vacates, the landlord shall be responsible for its demolition or disposal. A landlord is still eligible for demolition and disposal costs pursuant to RCW 59.21.021. Homeowners who receive payments or financial assistance from landlords as described in this subsection (1)(e)(iv) remain eligible to receive other state assistance for which they may be eligible including, but not limited to, relocation assistance funds pursuant to RCW 59.21.021; or

(v) The landlord provides relocation assistance of at least $15,000 for a multisection home and of at least $10,000 for a single section home at any point during the closure notice period and prior to a change of use or sale of the property. At such time as the assistance is paid, the tenant shall be given written notice of at least 18 months in which to vacate that includes department of commerce contact information, as provided by the department of commerce, identifying financial and technical assistance programs available to support eligible tenant relocation activities, and the tenant shall continue to pay rent for as much time as he or she remains in the mobile home park or manufactured housing community. Nothing in this subsection (1)(e)(v) prevents a tenant from relocating his or her home out of the mobile home park or manufactured housing community pursuant to chapter 59.21 RCW. In the event that a home remains in the mobile home park or manufactured housing community after a tenant vacates, the landlord shall be responsible for its demolition or disposal. A landlord is still eligible for demolition and disposal costs pursuant to RCW 59.21.021. Homeowners who receive payments or financial assistance from landlords as described in this subsection (1)(e)(v) remain eligible to receive other state assistance for which they may be eligible including, but not limited to, relocation assistance funds pursuant to RCW 59.21.021;

(f) Engaging in "criminal activity." "Criminal activity" means a criminal act defined by statute or ordinance that threatens the health, safety, or welfare of the tenants. A park owner seeking to evict a tenant or occupant under this subsection need not produce evidence of a criminal conviction, even if the alleged misconduct constitutes a criminal offense. Notice from a law enforcement agency of criminal activity constitutes sufficient grounds, but not the only grounds, for an eviction under this subsection. Notification of the seizure of illegal drugs under RCW 59.20.155 is evidence of criminal activity and is grounds for an eviction under this subsection. The requirement that any tenant or occupant register as a sex offender under RCW 9A.44.130 is grounds for eviction of the sex offender under this subsection. If criminal activity is alleged to be a basis of termination, the park owner may proceed directly to an unlawful detainer action;

(g) The tenant's application for tenancy contained a material misstatement that induced the park owner to approve the tenant as a resident of the park, and the park owner discovers and acts upon the misstatement within one year of the time the resident began paying rent;

(h) If the landlord serves a tenant three 20-day notices, each of which was valid under (a) of this subsection at the time of service, within a 12-month period to comply or vacate for failure to comply with the material terms of the rental agreement or an enforceable park rule, other than failure to pay rent by the due date. The applicable 12-month period shall commence on the date of the first violation;

(i) Failure of the tenant to comply with obligations imposed upon tenants by applicable provisions of municipal, county, and state codes, statutes, ordinances, and regulations, including this chapter. The landlord shall give the tenant written notice to comply immediately. The notice must state that failure to comply will result in termination of the tenancy and that the tenant shall vacate the premises within 15 days;

(j) The tenant engages in disorderly or substantially annoying conduct upon the park premises that results in the destruction of the rights of others to the peaceful enjoyment and use of the premises. The landlord shall give the tenant written notice to comply immediately. The notice must state that failure to comply will result in termination of the tenancy and that the tenant shall vacate the premises within 15 days;

(k) The tenant creates a nuisance that materially affects the health, safety, and welfare of other park residents. The landlord shall give the tenant written notice to cease the conduct that constitutes a nuisance immediately. The notice must describe the nuisance and state (i) what the tenant must do to cease the nuisance and (ii) that failure to cease the conduct will result in termination of the tenancy and that the tenant shall vacate the premises in five days;

(l) Any other substantial just cause that materially affects the health, safety, and welfare of other park residents. The landlord shall give the tenant written notice to comply immediately. The notice must describe the harm caused by the tenant, describe what the tenant must do to comply and to discontinue the harm, and state that failure to comply will result in termination of the tenancy and that the tenant shall vacate the premises within 15 days; or

(m) Failure to pay rent by the due date provided for in the rental agreement three or more times in a 12-month period, commencing with the date of the first violation, after service of a 14-day notice to comply or vacate.

(2) Within five days of a notice of eviction as required by subsection (1)(a) of this section, the landlord and tenant shall submit any dispute to mediation. The parties may agree in writing to mediation by an independent third party or through industry mediation procedures. If the parties cannot agree, then mediation shall be through industry mediation procedures. A duty is imposed upon both parties to participate in the mediation process in good faith for a period of 10 days for an eviction under subsection (1)(a) of this section. It is a defense to an eviction under subsection (1)(a) of this section that a landlord did not participate in the mediation process in good faith.

(3) Except for a tenant evicted under subsection (1)(c) or (f) of this section, a tenant evicted from a mobile home park under this section shall be allowed 120 days within which to sell the tenant's mobile home, manufactured home, or park model in place within the mobile home park: PROVIDED, That the tenant remains current in the payment of rent incurred after eviction, and pays any past due rent, reasonable attorneys' fees and court costs at the time the rental agreement is assigned. The provisions of RCW 59.20.073 regarding transfer of rental agreements apply.

(4) Chapters 59.12 and 59.18 RCW govern the eviction of recreational vehicles, as defined in RCW 59.20.030, from mobile home parks. This chapter governs the eviction of mobile homes, manufactured homes, park models, and recreational vehicles used as a primary residence from a mobile home park.

Sec. 6. RCW 59.21.030 and 2019 c 342 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The closure notice required by RCW 59.20.080 before park closure or conversion of the park shall be given to the director or the director's designee and all tenants in writing, and conspicuously posted at all park entrances.

(2) The closure notice required under RCW 59.20.080 must be in substantially the following form:

"CLOSURE NOTICE TO TENANTS

NOTICE IS HEREBY GIVEN on the . . . . day of . . . ., . . . ., of a conversion of this mobile home park or manufactured housing community to a use other than for mobile homes, manufactured homes, or park models, or of a conversion of the mobile home park or manufactured housing community to a mobile home park cooperative or a mobile home park subdivision. This change of use becomes effective on the . . . . day of . . . ., . . . ., which is the date ((twelve months))two years after the date this closure notice is given.

PARK OR COMMUNITY MANAGEMENT OR OWNERSHIP INFORMATION:

For information during the period preceding the effective change of use of this mobile home park or manufactured housing community on the . . . . day of . . . ., . . . ., contact:

Name:

Address:

Telephone:

PURCHASER INFORMATION, if applicable:

Contact information for the purchaser of the mobile home park or manufactured housing community property consists of the following:

Name:

Address:

Telephone:

PARK PURCHASE BY TENANT ORGANIZATIONS, if applicable:

The owner of this mobile home park or manufactured housing community may be willing to entertain an offer of purchase by an organization or group consisting of park or community tenants or a not-for-profit agency designated by the tenants. Tenants should contact the park owner or park management with such an offer. Any such offer must be made and accepted prior to closure, and the timeline for closure remains unaffected by an offer. Acceptance of any offer is at the discretion of the owner and is not a first right of refusal.

RELOCATION ASSISTANCE RESOURCES:

For information about the availability of relocation assistance, contact the Office of Mobile/Manufactured Home Relocation Assistance within the Department of Commerce."

(3) The closure notice required by RCW 59.20.080 must also meet the following requirements:

(a) A copy of the closure notice must be provided with all rental agreements signed after the original park closure notice date as required under RCW 59.20.060;

(b) Notice to the director or director's designee must include: (i) A good faith estimate of the timetable for removal of the mobile homes; (ii) the reason for closure; and (iii) a list of the names and mailing addresses of the current registered park tenants. Notice required under this subsection must be sent to the director or director's designee within ((ten))10 business days of the date notice was given to all tenants as required by RCW 59.20.080; and

(c) Notice must be recorded in the office of the county auditor for the county where the mobile home park is located.

(4) The department must mail every tenant an application and information on relocation assistance within ((ten))10 business days of receipt of the notice required in subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 7. RCW 59.21.040 and 2023 c 259 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

A tenant is not entitled to relocation assistance under this chapter if: (1) The tenant has given notice to the landlord of his or her intent to vacate the park and terminate the tenancy before any written notice of closure pursuant to RCW 59.20.080(1)(e) has been given; or (2) the tenant purchased a mobile home already situated in the park or moved a mobile home into the park after a written notice of closure pursuant to RCW ((59.20.090))59.20.080(1)(e) has been given and the person received actual prior notice of the change or closure((; or (3) the tenant receives assistance from an outside source that exceeds the maximum amounts of assistance to which a person is entitled under RCW 59.21.021(3), except that a tenant receiving relocation assistance from a landlord pursuant to RCW 59.20.080 remains eligible for the maximum amounts of assistance under this chapter)). However, no tenant may be denied relocation assistance under subsection (1) of this section if the tenant has remained on the premises and continued paying rent for a period of at least six months after giving notice of intent to vacate and before receiving formal notice of a closure or change of use.

--- END ---