BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 2.48 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Any party, including an attorney for a party or a pro se party, using any generative artificial intelligence language learning model tool to conduct legal research or to draft documents for filing with a Washington court must:

(a) Disclose in the filing that artificial intelligence was used, with the disclosure including the specific artificial intelligence tool and the manner in which it was used; and

(b) Certify that each and every citation to the law or the record in the document has been verified as accurate.

(2) This section does not apply to the use of products intended primarily for legal research which include editorial content or annotations produced by the product vendor without the use of artificial intelligence.

--- END ---