BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9.02.120 and 2022 c 65 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

((Unless authorized by RCW 9.02.110, any))(1) Any person who performs an abortion on another person in violation of this chapter shall be guilty of a class C felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW. The state shall not penalize, prosecute, or otherwise take adverse action against an individual based on their actual, potential, perceived, or alleged pregnancy outcomes. ((Nor shall the state penalize, prosecute, or otherwise take adverse action against someone for aiding or assisting a pregnant individual in exercising their right to reproductive freedom with their voluntary consent.))

(2) Any health care provider licensed under Title 18 RCW who violates this chapter commits an act of unprofessional conduct and his or her license shall be suspended by the appropriate disciplining authority pursuant to chapter 18.130 RCW.

--- END ---