BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9.94A.717 and 2020 c 275 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If an offender sentenced under this chapter or chapter 9.94B RCW is supervised by the department, the offender may earn supervision compliance credit in accordance with procedures that are developed and adopted by the department.

(a) The supervision compliance credit shall be awarded to offenders who are in compliance with supervision terms and are making progress towards the goals of their individualized supervision case plan, including: Participation in specific targeted interventions, risk-related programming, or treatment; or completing steps towards specific targeted goals that enhance protective factors and stability, as determined by the department.

(b) For each month in compliance with community custody conditions in accordance with (a) of this subsection, an offender may earn supervision compliance credit of ten days.

(c) Supervision compliance credit is accrued monthly and time shall not be applied to an offender's term of supervision prior to the earning of the time.

(2) An offender is not eligible to earn supervision compliance credit if he or she:

(a) Was sentenced under RCW 9.94A.507 or 10.95.030;

(b) Was sentenced under RCW 9.94A.650, 9.94A.655, 9.94A.660, or 9.94A.670;

(c) Is subject to supervision pursuant to RCW 9.94A.745;

(d) Has an indeterminate sentence and is subject to parole pursuant to RCW 9.95.017; ((or))

(e) Is serving community custody pursuant to early release under RCW 9.94A.730; or

(f) Is subject to supervision pursuant to RCW 71.09.092.

--- END ---