BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.43.944 and 2020 c 88 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The fire service training account is hereby established in the state treasury. The primary purpose of the account is firefighter training for both volunteer and career firefighters. The fund shall consist of:

(a) All fees received by the Washington state patrol for fire service training;

(b) All grants and bequests accepted by the Washington state patrol under RCW 43.43.940;

(c) ((Twenty))Twenty-two percent of all moneys received by the state on fire insurance premiums;

(d) Revenue from penalties established under RCW 19.27.740; and

(e) General fund—state moneys appropriated into the account by the legislature.

(2) Moneys in the account may be appropriated for: (a) Fire service training; (b) school fire prevention activities within the Washington state patrol; and (c) the maintenance, operations, and capital projects of the state fire training academy. However, expenditures for purposes of (b) and (c) of this subsection may only be made to the extent that these expenditures do not adversely affect expenditures for the purpose of (a) of this subsection. The state patrol may use amounts appropriated from the fire service training account under this section to contract with the Washington state firefighters apprenticeship trust for the operation of the firefighter joint apprenticeship training program. The contract may call for payments on a monthly basis.

(3) Any general fund—state moneys appropriated into the account shall be allocated solely to the firefighter joint apprenticeship training program. The Washington state patrol may contract with outside entities for the administration and delivery of the firefighter joint apprenticeship training program.

--- END ---