BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.101 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The commission shall offer reimbursements to law enforcement agencies and local jurisdictions that provide no cost or low-cost annual law enforcement officers safety act certification under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 926C to authorized retirees.

(2) Reimbursements may not include costs related to ammunition and travel.

(3) Law enforcement agencies that provide firearms training and allow the law enforcement officers safety act recertification may supply targets, an instructor, and shooting range dates for authorized retirees to attend. Firearms training must be provided by an organization or trainer approved by the commission.

(4) The commission shall adopt rules establishing the fees, requirements, and procedures for agencies requesting reimbursements for annual law enforcement officers safety act certification renewals. The fees charged by the commission shall recover the costs incurred by the commission in administering the law enforcement officers safety act certification reimbursement program.

(5) Applications for the law enforcement officers safety act certification reimbursement shall be filed with the commission on a form provided by the commission. The commission may require any information and documentation that reasonably relates to the need to determine whether the agency qualifies for the law enforcement officers safety act certification reimbursement.

(6) The commission may adopt rules that are reasonable and necessary for the effective implementation and administration of this section consistent with chapter 34.05 RCW.

--- END ---