BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.150.410 and 2022 c 109 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((Through the 2017-18 school year, the legislature shall establish for each school year in the appropriations act a statewide salary allocation schedule, for allocation purposes only, to be used to distribute funds for basic education certificated instructional staff salaries under RCW 28A.150.260. For the purposes of this section, the staff allocations for classroom teachers, teacher-librarians, counselors, and student health services staff under RCW 28A.150.260 are considered allocations for certificated instructional staff.

(2) Through the 2017-18 school year, salary allocations for state-funded basic education certificated instructional staff shall be calculated by the superintendent of public instruction by determining the district's average salary for certificated instructional staff, using the statewide salary allocation schedule and related documents, conditions, and limitations established by the omnibus appropriations act.

(3) Through the 2017-18 school year, no more than 90 college quarter-hour credits received by any employee after the baccalaureate degree may be used to determine compensation allocations under the state salary allocation schedule and LEAP documents referenced in the omnibus appropriations act, or any replacement schedules and documents, unless:

(a) The employee has a master's degree; or

(b) The credits were used in generating state salary allocations before January 1, 1992.

(4) Beginning in the 2007-08 school year and through the 2017-18 school year, the calculation of years of service for occupational therapists, physical therapists, speech-language pathologists, audiologists, nurses, social workers, counselors, and psychologists regulated under Title 18 RCW may include experience in schools and other nonschool positions as occupational therapists, physical therapists, speech-language pathologists, audiologists, nurses, social workers, counselors, or psychologists. The calculation shall be that one year of service in a nonschool position counts as one year of service for purposes of this chapter, up to a limit of two years of nonschool service. Nonschool years of service included in calculations under this subsection shall not be applied to service credit totals for purposes of any retirement benefit under chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW, or any other state retirement system benefits.

(5))) By the 2018-19 school year, the minimum state allocation for salaries for certificated instructional staff in the basic education program must be increased to provide a statewide average allocation of $64,000 adjusted for inflation from the 2017-18 school year.

(((6)))(2) By the 2018-19 school year, the minimum state allocation for salaries for certificated administrative staff in the basic education program must be increased to provide a statewide average allocation of $95,000 adjusted for inflation from the 2017-18 school year.

(((7) By the 2018-19))(3)(a) Beginning with the 2024-25 school year, the minimum state allocation for salaries for classified administrative staff in the basic education program must be increased to provide a statewide average allocation of $91,733 adjusted by inflation from the 2023-24 school year. Beginning with the 2024-25 school year, the minimum state allocation for salaries for other classified staff in the basic education program must be increased to provide a statewide average allocation of (($45,912))$54,633 adjusted by inflation from the ((2017-18))2023-24 school year.

(((8) For school year 2018-19, a district's minimum state allocation for salaries is the greater of the district's 2017-18 state salary allocation, adjusted for inflation, or the district's allocation based on the state salary level specified in subsections (5) through (7) of this section, and as further specified in the omnibus appropriations act.

(9)))(b) For the purposes of this subsection, classified administrative staff includes directors or supervisors or other school administrators that are not certificated administrative staff, including staff working in the business office, human resources, public relations, instruction supervision, and maintenance and operations supervision. Other classified staff includes all other noncertificated positions including all other office, clerical, or support personnel.

(4) Beginning with the 2018-19 school year, state allocations for salaries for certificated instructional staff, certificated administrative staff, and classified staff must be adjusted for regional differences in the cost of hiring staff. Adjustments for regional differences must be specified in the omnibus appropriations act for each school year through at least school year 2022-23. For school years 2018-19 through school year 2022-23, the school district regionalization factors are based on the median single-family residential value of each school district and proximate school district median single-family residential value as described in RCW 28A.150.412.

(((10)))(5) Beginning with the 2023-24 school year and every four years thereafter, the minimum state salary allocations and school district regionalization factors for certificated instructional staff, certificated administrative staff, classified administrative staff, and classified staff must be reviewed and rebased, as provided under RCW 28A.150.412, to ensure that state salary allocations continue to align with staffing costs for the state's program of basic education.

(((11)))(6) For the purposes of this section, "inflation" has the meaning provided in RCW 28A.400.205 for "inflationary adjustment index."

--- END ---