BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.216 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) At least once per biennium, the department must screen all children and youth between the ages of 10 and 25 in its care or custody, including children and youth supervised by or receiving services from the department, to determine whether the child or youth has been commercially sexually exploited.

(b) The department shall also conduct the screening when the child or youth:

(i) Enters the care or custody of the department as a juvenile under chapter 13.40 RCW;

(ii) Is transferred between department juvenile rehabilitation facilities for total confinement purposes, or transferred between a department juvenile rehabilitation facility and a community facility as provided for in chapter 13.40 RCW; or

(iii) Is transferred from a department juvenile rehabilitation facility to the care and custody of the department of corrections under RCW 72.01.410 or 13.40.280.

(2) To determine whether a child or youth has been commercially sexually exploited under this section, the department shall utilize the commercial sexual exploitation identification tool in conducting the trafficking assessment.

(3) By November 1, 2024, and annually thereafter, the department shall submit a report to the governor and legislature, in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, with data on the number of children or youth identified by the tool as commercially sexually exploited and the number of referrals for specialized services.

(4) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Child or youth" includes:

(i) Juveniles as defined in RCW 72.05.020;

(ii) Juveniles transferring to the department of corrections upon their 25th birthday under RCW 72.01.410;

(iii) Individuals placed in the custody of the department under chapters 13.34, 13.32A, 74.13, and 26.44 RCW; and

(iv) Nonminor dependents in extended foster care authorized under RCW 74.13.031.

(b) "Community facility" has the meaning provided in RCW 72.05.020.

--- END ---