BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.101 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The commission shall offer training on human trafficking to criminal justice and correctional personnel, and other public safety employees. The training shall be implemented by the commission in consultation with appropriate public and private organizations that have expertise in reducing and preventing human trafficking.

(2) The training shall consist of a minimum of one hour of classroom or internet instruction, and shall include instruction on the following subjects:

(a) How to identify suspicious illegal human trafficking activities; and

(b) Examples of where a victim of human trafficking may get help for health care, human services, housing, education, legal assistance, job training or preparation, interpreting services, English as a second language classes, and victim's compensation.

(3) The training developed by the commission shall be made available by the commission to all employees of state and local agencies that perform public safety duties.

(4) The commission shall incorporate all relevant components of the training program required in RCW 43.280.095.

--- END ---