BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1) By December 1, 2024, and by each December 1 thereafter, the Washington state patrol and department of commerce office of crime victims advocacy shall submit a collaborative report on child and human trafficking crimes, trends, and trainings in this state to the governor and relevant standing policy committees of the legislature.

(2) The report must be based upon data available to the Washington state patrol and department of commerce and include, but not necessarily be limited to, current data, programs, and activities of:

(a) The missing children clearinghouse under chapter 13.60 RCW;

(b) Department of commerce;

(c) Department of children, youth, and families;

(d) Attorney general's office;

(e) Federal government;

(f) Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs; and

(g) When possible, local law enforcement.

(3) The report required in this section satisfies the reporting requirement contained in RCW 43.280.095(4).

--- END ---