BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW to read as follows:

The department shall work with local health jurisdictions, emergency medical service providers, emergency departments, state and local law enforcement agencies, sheriffs' offices, medical examiners, and coroners to create a system or utilize an existing system or systems for mapping reported incidents of fatal and nonfatal drug overdoses and synthetic opiate poisonings in Washington state. Emergency departments, state and local law enforcement agencies, sheriffs' offices, and coroners are encouraged to report data not more than 24 hours after the incident or after receiving the incident toxicology report. The department shall examine the extent to which existing data reporting systems may be used to supply necessary information, including but not limited to data collected under RCW 43.70.057, and shall to the extent possible and appropriate structure its recommendations to avoid causing unnecessary increases in data reporting requirements or duplication of work.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department shall convene stakeholders for the purpose of developing recommendations for the establishment of a Washington state opioid overdose trends review committee responsible for:

(a) Identifying and reviewing fatal and nonfatal drug overdoses in the state of Washington;

(b) Identifying the causes and contributing factors of overdoses and overdose-related deaths, and conducting a review of other factors including, but not limited to, housing status, behavioral health status, or criminal justice system involvement;

(c) Developing recommendations to address preventable overdose-related deaths, including legislation, policies, areas for scientific research, rules, training, and best practices that reduce harm and support the health and safety of individuals who use substances, and prevent overdose-related deaths;

(d) Providing annual updates on drug trends, including synthetic drugs that may impact the health and well-being of Washingtonians and that present a high risk for causing overdose-related deaths, and making policy-related and funding-related recommendations to the governor and the legislature based on these trends;

(e) Establishing a process for data sharing between state departments, counties, local health jurisdictions, tribal partners, community overdose prevention groups, and other relevant entities in order to access necessary data concerning fatal and nonfatal drug-related overdoses in Washington; and

(f) Ensuring coordination and integration with the state's opioid overdose response learning community, led by the health care authority.

(2) In convening the interested stakeholders pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the department shall invite a variety of interested stakeholders, including public health experts, physicians, law enforcement, coroners, and persons who have experienced an overdose.

(3) By November 1, 2025, the department shall submit a report making recommendations for how a Washington state opioid overdose trends review committee would be established to meet the responsibilities outlined in subsection (1) of this section to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature. Such report shall take into consideration:

(a) The determination of what interested stakeholders should be included in any review committee;

(b) How often the committee should meet on an annual basis;

(c) Whether the review committee should be encompassed into the structure of the current state opioid response plan as codified in RCW 43.70.770; and

(d) Any and all costs associated with implementing subsection (1)(a) through (e) of this section.

(4) The department shall establish the Washington state opioid overdose trends review committee by September 1, 2026.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. The sum of $7,000,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, from the general fund to the criminal justice training commission for the purpose of the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs to administer a grant program for multijurisdictional drug task forces. The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall require grant recipients to adhere to the same peer review and reporting requirements that existed for recipients of the Edward Byrne memorial justice assistance grant funds as those requirements existed on January 1, 2023. The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs may retain up to five percent of the amounts provided in this section for administration of the program.

--- END ---