BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 36.26 RCW to read as follows:

By July 1, 2027, counties shall provide equal amounts of local funding for prosecuting crimes and public defense services provided in their respective jurisdictions. During the 2023-2025 and 2025-2027 biennia, any cost increases for public defense costs above expenditures on the effective date of this section shall be paid out of the state general fund.

--- END ---