BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 18.130 RCW to read as follows:

(1) An ultrasound or a similar medical imaging device or procedure may only be provided by: (a) A health care provider holding an active license under one of the chapters listed in RCW 18.130.040 and acting within their scope of practice; or (b) a person acting under the supervision of a health care provider holding an active license under one of the chapters listed in RCW 18.130.040, where all actions performed are within the supervising health care professional's scope of practice.

(2) A violation of this section shall constitute practice without a license and the disciplining authority shall investigate and adjudicate complaints pursuant to RCW 18.130.190.

(3) This section does not apply to the use of an ultrasound by a person on livestock or other animals owned or being raised by that person.

(4) Notwithstanding the requirements of this section, emergency medical personnel, including emergency medical technicians, advanced emergency medical technicians, emergency medical responders, and paramedics, may provide an ultrasound as necessary in the course of their employment.

--- END ---