BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The department of children, youth, and families shall conduct a feasibility study and provide cost estimates for a pilot program to award start-up grants, in local jurisdictions over 100,000 persons, to assist in the establishment and operation of child care programs and services with nonstandard hours for the minor children of individuals in high demand professions including, but not limited to, peace officers and criminal justice personnel, firefighters, medical professionals in rural areas, and construction workers during shift work and abnormal work hours.

(2) A report is due to the governor and relevant committees of the legislature by July 1, 2025.

--- END ---