BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.101.010 and 2023 c 168 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

When used in this chapter:

(1) "Applicant" means an individual who has received a conditional offer of employment with a law enforcement or corrections agency.

(2) "Chief for a day program" means a program in which commissioners and staff partner with local, state, and federal law enforcement agencies, hospitals, and the community to provide a day of special attention to chronically ill children. Each child is selected and sponsored by a law enforcement agency. The event, "chief for a day," occurs on one day, annually or every other year and may occur on the grounds and in the facilities of the commission. The program may include any appropriate honoring of the child as a "chief," such as a certificate swearing them in as a chief, a badge, a uniform, and donated gifts such as games, puzzles, and art supplies.

(3) "Commission" means the Washington state criminal justice training commission.

(4) "Convicted" means at the time a plea of guilty, nolo contendere, or deferred sentence has been accepted, or a verdict of guilty or finding of guilt has been filed, notwithstanding the pendency of any future proceedings, including but not limited to sentencing, posttrial or postfact-finding motions and appeals. "Conviction" includes all instances in which a plea of guilty or nolo contendere is the basis for conviction, all proceedings in which there is a case disposition agreement, and any equivalent disposition by a court in a jurisdiction other than the state of Washington.

(5) "Correctional personnel" means any employee or volunteer who by state, county, municipal, or combination thereof, statute has the responsibility for the confinement, care, management, training, treatment, education, supervision, or counseling of those individuals whose civil rights have been limited in some way by legal sanction.

(6) "Corrections officer" means any corrections agency employee whose primary job function is to provide for the custody, safety, and security of adult persons in jails and detention facilities in the state. "Corrections officer" does not include individuals employed by state agencies.

(7) "Criminal justice personnel" means any person who serves as a peace officer, reserve officer, or corrections officer.

(8) "Finding" means a determination based on a preponderance of the evidence whether alleged misconduct occurred; did not occur; occurred, but was consistent with law and policy; or could neither be proven or disproven.

(9) "Law enforcement personnel" means any person elected, appointed, or employed as a general authority Washington peace officer as defined in RCW 10.93.020 or as a limited authority Washington peace officer as defined in RCW 10.93.020 who as a normal part of their duties has powers of arrest and carries a firearm. For the purposes of this chapter, "law enforcement personnel" does not include individuals employed by the department of corrections.

(10) "Peace officer" has the same meaning as a general authority Washington peace officer as defined in RCW 10.93.020. Commissioned officers of the Washington state patrol, whether they have been or may be exempted by rule of the commission from the basic training requirement of RCW 43.101.200, are included as peace officers for purposes of this chapter. Fish and wildlife officers with enforcement powers for all criminal laws under RCW 77.15.075 are peace officers for purposes of this chapter. Limited authority Washington peace officers as defined in RCW 10.93.020, who have powers of arrest and carry a firearm as part of their normal duty, are peace officers for purposes of this chapter. For the purposes of this chapter, "peace officer" does not include individuals employed by the department of corrections.

(11) "Reserve officer" ((means any person who does not serve as a peace officer of this state on a full-time basis, but who, when called by an agency into active service, is fully commissioned on the same basis as full-time officers to enforce the criminal laws of this state and includes:

(a)))has the same meaning as provided in RCW 10.93.020.

(12) "Specially commissioned Washington peace officer((s as defined))" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 10.93.020((;))and includes:

(((b)))(a) Persons employed as security by public institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016; and

(((c)))(b) Persons employed for the purpose of providing security in the K-12 Washington state public school system as defined in RCW 28A.150.010 and who are authorized to use force in fulfilling their responsibilities.

(((12)))(13) "Tribal police officer" means any person employed and commissioned by a tribal government to enforce the criminal laws of that government.

Sec. 2. RCW 10.93.020 and 2021 c 318 s 307 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the meanings indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Agency with primary territorial jurisdiction" means a city or town police agency which has responsibility for police activity within its boundaries; or a county police or sheriff's department which has responsibility with regard to police activity in the unincorporated areas within the county boundaries; or a statutorily authorized port district police agency or four-year state college or university police agency which has responsibility for police activity within the statutorily authorized enforcement boundaries of the port district, state college, or university.

(2) "Federal peace officer" means any employee or agent of the United States government who has the authority to carry firearms and make warrantless arrests and whose duties involve the enforcement of criminal laws of the United States.

(3) "General authority Washington law enforcement agency" means any agency, department, or division of a municipal corporation, political subdivision, or other unit of local government of this state, and any agency, department, or division of state government, having as its primary function the detection and apprehension of persons committing infractions or violating the traffic or criminal laws in general, as distinguished from a limited authority Washington law enforcement agency, and any other unit of government expressly designated by statute as a general authority Washington law enforcement agency. The Washington state patrol and the department of fish and wildlife are general authority Washington law enforcement agencies.

(4) "General authority Washington peace officer" means any full-time, fully compensated and elected, appointed, or employed officer of a general authority Washington law enforcement agency who is commissioned to enforce the criminal laws of the state of Washington generally.

(5) "Limited authority Washington law enforcement agency" means any agency, political subdivision, or unit of local government of this state, and any agency, department, or division of state government, having as one of its functions the apprehension or detection of persons committing infractions or violating the traffic or criminal laws relating to limited subject areas, including but not limited to, the state departments of natural resources and social and health services, the state gambling commission, the state lottery commission, the state parks and recreation commission, the state utilities and transportation commission, the state liquor and cannabis board, the office of the insurance commissioner, the state department of corrections, and the office of independent investigations.

(6) "Limited authority Washington peace officer" means any full-time, fully compensated officer of a limited authority Washington law enforcement agency empowered by that agency to detect or apprehend violators of the laws in some or all of the limited subject areas for which that agency is responsible. A limited authority Washington peace officer may be a specially commissioned Washington peace officer if otherwise qualified for such status under this chapter.

(7) "Mutual law enforcement assistance" includes, but is not limited to, one or more law enforcement agencies aiding or assisting one or more other such agencies through loans or exchanges of personnel or of material resources, for law enforcement purposes.

(8) "Primary commissioning agency" means (a) the employing agency in the case of a general authority Washington peace officer, a limited authority Washington peace officer, a tribal peace officer from a federally recognized tribe, or a federal peace officer, and (b) the commissioning agency in the case of a specially commissioned Washington peace officer (i) who is performing functions within the course and scope of the special commission and (ii) who is not also a general authority Washington peace officer, a limited authority Washington peace officer, a tribal peace officer from a federally recognized tribe, or a federal peace officer.

(9) "Primary function of an agency" means that function to which greater than fifty percent of the agency's resources are allocated.

(10) "Reserve officer" means any person who does not serve as a peace officer of this state on a full-time basis, but who, when called by an agency into active service, is fully commissioned on the same basis as full-time officers to enforce the criminal laws of this state.

(11) "Specially commissioned Washington peace officer," for the purposes of this chapter, means any officer, whether part-time or full-time, compensated or not, commissioned by a general authority Washington law enforcement agency to enforce some or all of the criminal laws of the state of Washington, who does not qualify under this chapter as a general authority Washington peace officer for that commissioning agency, specifically including reserve peace officers, and specially commissioned full-time, fully compensated peace officers duly commissioned by the states of Oregon or Idaho or any such peace officer commissioned by a unit of local government of Oregon or Idaho. ((A reserve peace officer is an individual who is an officer of a Washington law enforcement agency who does not serve such agency on a full-time basis but who, when called by the agency into active service, is fully commissioned on the same basis as full-time peace officers to enforce the criminal laws of the state.))

--- END ---