BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 44.90.020 and 2022 c 283 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Collective bargaining" means the performance of the mutual obligations of the employer and the exclusive bargaining representative to meet at reasonable times, except that neither party may be compelled to negotiate during a legislative session or on committee assembly days, to confer and negotiate in good faith, and to execute a written agreement with respect to the subjects of bargaining specified under RCW 44.90.090. The obligation to bargain does not compel either party to agree to a proposal or to make a concession unless otherwise provided in this chapter.

(2) "Commission" means the public employment relations commission.

(((2)))(3) "Confidential employee" means an employee designated by the employer to assist in a confidential capacity, or serve as counsel to, persons who formulate, determine, and effectuate employer policies with regard to labor relations and personnel matters or who has authorized access to information relating to the effectuation or review of the employer's collective bargaining policies, strategies, or process to the extent that such access creates a conflict of interest, or who assists or aids an employee with managerial authority.

(4) "Director" means the director of the office of state legislative labor relations.

(((3)))(5)(a) "Employee" means:

(i) Any regular partisan employee of the house of representatives or the senate who is covered by this chapter; and

(ii) Any regular employee who is staff of the:

(A) Office of legislative support services;

(B) Legislative service center;

(C) Office of the code reviser who, during any legislative session, does not work full time on drafting and finalizing legislative bills to be included in the Revised Code of Washington; and

(D) House of representatives and senate administrations.

(b) "Employee" also includes temporary staff hired to perform substantially similar work to that performed by employees included under (a) of this subsection.

(c) All other regular employees and temporary employees, including casual employees, interns, and pages, and employees in the office of program research and senate committee services work groups of the house of representatives and the senate are excluded from the definition of "employee" for the purposes of this chapter.

(6) "Employee organization" means any organization, union, or association in which employees participate and that exists for the purpose, in whole or in part, of collective bargaining with employers.

(((4)))(7) "Employee with managerial authority" means any employee designated by the employer who, regardless of job title: (a) Directs the staff who work for a legislative chamber, caucus, agency, or subdivision thereof; (b) has substantial responsibility in personnel administration, or the preparation and administration of the employer's budgets; and (c) exercises authority that is not merely routine or clerical in nature and requires the use of independent judgment.

(8) "Employer" means:

(a) The chief clerk of the house of representatives, or the chief clerk's designee, for employees of the house of representatives;

(b) The secretary of the senate, or the secretary's designee, for employees of the senate; and

(c) The chief clerk of the house of representatives and the secretary of the senate, acting jointly, or their designees, for the regular employees who are staff of the office of legislative support services, the legislative service center, and the office of the code reviser.

(9) "Exclusive bargaining representative" means any employee organization that has been certified under this chapter as the representative of the employees in an appropriate bargaining unit.

(((5)))(10) "Labor dispute" means any controversy concerning terms, tenure, or conditions of employment, or concerning the association or representation of persons in negotiating, fixing, maintaining, changing, or seeking to arrange terms or conditions of employment with respect to the subjects of bargaining provided in this chapter, regardless of whether the disputants stand in the proximate relation of employer and employee.

(11) "Legislative agencies" means the joint legislative audit and review committee, the statute law committee, the legislative ethics board, the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, the office of the state actuary, the legislative service center, the office of legislative support services, the joint transportation committee, and the redistricting commission.

(((6)))(12) "Office" means the office of state legislative labor relations.

(13) "Supervisor" means an employee designated by the employer to provide supervision to and have authority over legislative employees on an ongoing basis as part of the employee's regular and usual job duties. Supervision includes the authority to direct employees, approve and deny leave, and effectively recommend decisions to hire, transfer, suspend, lay off, recall, promote, discharge, direct, reward, or discipline employees, or to adjust employee grievances, when the exercise of the authority is not of a merely routine nature but requires the exercise of individual judgment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 44.90 RCW to read as follows:

(1) This chapter does not apply to any legislative employee who has managerial authority, is a confidential employee, or who does not meet the definition of employee for the purpose of collective bargaining.

(2) This chapter also does not apply to:

(a) Elected or appointed members of the legislature;

(b) Any person appointed to office under statute, ordinance, or resolution for a specific term of office as a member of a multimember board, commission, or committee;

(c) Caucus chiefs of staff and caucus deputy chiefs of staff;

(d) The speaker's attorney, house counsel, and leadership counsel to the minority caucus of the house of representatives; and

(e) The counsel for the senate that provide direct legal advice to the administration of the senate.

Sec. 3. RCW 44.90.030 and 2022 c 283 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The office of state legislative labor relations is created to assist the house of representatives, the senate, and legislative agencies in implementing and managing the process of collective bargaining for employees of the legislative branch of state government.

(2)(a) Subject to (b) of this subsection, the secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of representatives shall employ a director of the office. The director serves at the pleasure of the secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of representatives, who shall fix the director's salary.

(b) The secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of representatives shall, before employing a director, consult with legislative employees, the senate facilities and operations committee, the house executive rules committee, and the human resources officers of the house of representatives, the senate, and legislative agencies.

(c) The director serves as the executive and administrative head of the office and may employ additional employees to assist in carrying out the duties of the office. The duties of the office include, but are not limited to, establishing bargaining teams and conducting negotiations on behalf of the employer.

(((d) The director shall contract with an external consultant for the purposes of gathering input from legislative employees, taking into consideration RCW 42.52.020 and rules of the house of representatives and the senate. The gathering of input must be in the form of, at a minimum, surveys.

(3) The director, in consultation with the secretary of the senate, the chief clerk of the house of representatives, and the administrative heads of legislative agencies shall:

(a) Examine issues related to collective bargaining for employees of the house of representatives, the senate, and legislative agencies; and

(b) After consultation with the external consultant, develop best practices and options for the legislature to consider in implementing and administering collective bargaining for employees of the house of representatives, the senate, and legislative agencies.

(4)(a) By December 1, 2022, the director shall submit a preliminary report to the appropriate committees of the legislature that provides a progress report on the director's considerations.

(b) By October 1, 2023, the director shall submit a final report to the appropriate committees of the legislature. At a minimum, the final report must address considerations on the following issues:

(i) Which employees of the house of representatives, the senate, and legislative agencies for whom collective bargaining may be appropriate;

(ii) Mandatory, permissive, and prohibited subjects of bargaining;

(iii) Who would negotiate on behalf of the house of representatives, the senate, and legislative agencies, and which entity or entities would be considered the employer for purposes of bargaining;

(iv) Definitions for relevant terms;

(v) Common public employee collective bargaining agreement frameworks related to grievance procedures and processes for disciplinary actions;

(vi) Procedures related to the commission certifying exclusive bargaining representatives, determining bargaining units, adjudicating unfair labor practices, determining representation questions, and coalition bargaining;

(vii) The efficiency and feasibility of coalition bargaining;

(viii) Procedures for approving negotiated collective bargaining agreements;

(ix) Procedures for submitting requests for funding to the appropriate legislative committees if appropriations are necessary to implement provisions of the collective bargaining agreements; and

(x) Approaches taken by other state legislatures that have authorized collective bargaining for legislative employees.

(5) The report must include a summary of any statutory changes needed to address the considerations listed in subsection (4) of this section related to the collective bargaining process for legislative employees.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 44.90 RCW to read as follows:

(1) As provided by this chapter, the commission or the court shall determine all questions described by this chapter as under the commission's authority. However, such authority may not result in an order or rule that intrudes upon or interferes with the legislature's core function of efficient and effective law making or the essential operation of the legislature, including that an order or rule may not:

(a) Require the legislature to reinstate an employee;

(b) Modify any matter relating to the qualifications and elections of members of the legislature, or the holding of office of members of the legislature;

(c) Modify any matter relating to the legislature or each house thereof choosing its officers, adopting rules for its proceedings, selecting committees necessary for the conduct of business, considering or enacting legislation, or otherwise exercising the legislative power of this state;

(d) Modify any matter relating to legislative calendars, schedules, and deadlines of the legislature; or

(e) Modify laws, rules, policies, or procedures regarding ethics or conflicts of interest.

(2) No member of the legislature may be compelled by subpoena or other means to attend a proceeding related to matters covered by this chapter during a legislative session, committee assembly days, or for 15 days before commencement of each session.

Sec. 5. RCW 44.90.050 and 2022 c 283 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as may be specifically limited by this chapter, legislative employees shall have the right to self-organization, to form, join, or assist employee organizations, and to bargain collectively through representatives of their own choosing for the purpose of collective bargaining free from interference, restraint, or coercion. Legislative employees shall also have the right to refrain from any or all such activities.

(2) Except as may be specifically limited by this chapter, the commission shall determine all questions pertaining to ascertaining exclusive bargaining representatives for legislative employees and collectively bargaining under this chapter. However, no employee organization shall be recognized or certified as the exclusive bargaining representative of a bargaining unit of employees of the legislative branch unless it receives the votes of a majority of employees in the petitioned for bargaining unit voting in a secret election ((by mail ballot)) administered by the commission. The commission's process must allow for an employee, group of employees, employee organizations, employer, or their agents to have the right to petition on any question concerning representation.

(3) ((The employer and the exclusive bargaining representative of a bargaining unit of legislative employees may not enter into a collective bargaining agreement that requires the employer to deduct, from the salary or wages of an employee, contributions for payments for political action committees sponsored by employee organizations with legislative employees as members.))The commission must adopt rules that provide for at least the following:

(a) Secret balloting;

(b) Consulting with employee organizations;

(c) Access to lists of employees, job titles, work locations, and home mailing addresses;

(d) Absentee voting;

(e) Procedures for the greatest possible participation in voting;

(f) Campaigning on the employer's property during working hours; and

(g) Election observers.

(4)(a) If an employee organization has been certified as the exclusive bargaining representative of the employees of multiple bargaining units, the employee organization may act for and negotiate a master collective bargaining agreement that includes within the coverage of the agreement all covered employees in the bargaining units.

(b) If a master collective bargaining agreement is in effect for the newly certified exclusive bargaining representative, it applies to the bargaining unit for which the new certification has been issued. Nothing in this subsection (4)(b) requires the parties to engage in new negotiations during the term of that agreement.

(5) The certified exclusive bargaining representative is responsible for representing the interests of all the employees in the bargaining unit. This section may not be construed to limit an exclusive bargaining representative's right to exercise its discretion to refuse to process grievances of employees that are unmeritorious.

(6) No question concerning representation may be raised if:

(a) Fewer than 12 months have elapsed since the last certification or election; or

(b) A valid collective bargaining agreement exists covering the unit, except for that period of no more than 120 calendar days nor less than 90 calendar days before the expiration of the contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. A new section is added to chapter 44.90 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The commission, after hearing upon reasonable notice to all interested parties, shall decide, in each application for certification as an exclusive bargaining representative, the unit appropriate for certification. In determining the new units or modifications of existing units, the commission must consider: The duties, skills, and working conditions of the employees; the history of collective bargaining; the extent of organization among the employees; the desires of the employees; and the avoidance of excessive fragmentation. However, a unit is not appropriate if it includes:

(a) Both supervisors and nonsupervisory employees. A unit that includes only supervisors may be considered appropriate if a majority of the supervisory employees indicates by vote that they desire to be included in such a unit; or

(b) Both house of representatives and senate employees.

(2) If a single employee organization is the exclusive bargaining representative for two or more units, upon petition by the employee organization, the units may be consolidated into a single larger unit if the commission considers the larger unit to be appropriate. If consolidation is appropriate, the commission shall certify the employee organization as the exclusive bargaining representative of the new unit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. A new section is added to chapter 44.90 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The parties to a collective bargaining agreement must reduce the agreement to writing and both execute it.

(2) Except as provided in this chapter, a collective bargaining agreement must contain provisions that provide for a grievance procedure of all disputes arising over the interpretation or application of the collective bargaining agreement and that is valid and enforceable under its terms when entered into in accordance with this chapter.

(3) RCW 41.56.037 applies to this chapter.

(4)(a) If a collective bargaining agreement between an employer and an exclusive bargaining representative is concluded after the termination date of the previous collective bargaining agreement between the employer and an employee organization representing the same bargaining units, the effective date of the collective bargaining agreement may be the day after the termination of the previous collective bargaining agreement, and all benefits included in the new collective bargaining agreement, including wage or salary increases, may accrue beginning with that effective date.

(b) If a collective bargaining agreement between an employer and an exclusive bargaining representative is concluded after the termination date of the previous collective bargaining agreement between the employer and the exclusive bargaining representative representing different bargaining units, the effective date of the collective bargaining agreement may be the day after the termination date of whichever previous collective bargaining agreement covering one or more of the units terminated first, and all benefits included in the new collective bargaining agreement, including wage or salary increases, may accrue beginning with that effective date.

(5) The employer and the exclusive bargaining representative of a bargaining unit of legislative employees may not enter into a collective bargaining agreement that requires the employer to deduct, from the salary or wages of an employee, contributions for payments for political action committees sponsored by employee organizations with legislative employees as members.

Sec. 8. RCW 44.90.060 and 2022 c 283 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

((During a legislative session or committee assembly days, nothing))Nothing contained in this chapter permits or grants to any legislative employee the right to strike, participate in a work stoppage, or refuse to perform their official duties.

Sec. 9. RCW 44.90.070 and 2022 c 283 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Collective bargaining negotiations under this chapter must commence no later than July 1st of each even-numbered year after a bargaining unit has been certified.

(2) The duration of any collective bargaining agreement shall not exceed one fiscal biennium.

(3)(a) The director must submit ratified collective bargaining agreements, with cost estimates, to the employer by October 1st before the legislative session at which the request for funds are to be considered. The transmission by the legislature to the governor under RCW 43.88.090 must include a request for funds necessary to implement the provisions of all collective bargaining agreements covering legislative employees.

(b) If the legislature or governor fail to provide the funds for a collective bargaining agreement for legislative employees, either party may reopen all or part of the agreement or the exclusive bargaining representative may seek to implement the procedures provided for in section 10 of this act.

(4) Negotiation for economic terms will be by a coalition of all exclusive bargaining representatives. Any such provisions agreed to by the employer and the coalition must be included in all collective bargaining agreements negotiated by the parties. The director and the exclusive bargaining representative or representatives are authorized to enter into supplemental bargaining of bargaining unit specific issues for inclusion in the collective bargaining agreement, subject to the parties' agreement regarding the issues and procedures for supplemental bargaining. This subsection does not prohibit cooperation and coordination of bargaining between two or more exclusive bargaining representatives.

(5) If a significant revenue shortfall occurs resulting in reduced appropriations, as declared by proclamation of the governor or by resolution of the legislature, both parties must immediately enter into collective bargaining for a mutually agreed upon modification of the agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. A new section is added to chapter 44.90 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Should the parties fail to reach agreement in negotiating a collective bargaining agreement, either party may request of the commission the assistance of an impartial third party to mediate the negotiations. If a collective bargaining agreement previously negotiated under this chapter expires while negotiations are underway, the terms and conditions specified in the collective bargaining agreement remain in effect for a period not to exceed one year from the expiration date stated in the agreement. Thereafter, the employer may unilaterally implement according to law.

(2) Nothing in this section may be construed to prohibit an employer and an exclusive bargaining representative from agreeing to substitute, at their own expense, their own procedure for resolving impasses in collective bargaining for that provided in this section or from agreeing to utilize for the purposes of this section any other governmental or other agency or person in lieu of the commission.

(3) The commission shall bear costs for mediator services.

Sec. 11. RCW 44.90.080 and 2022 c 283 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is an unfair labor practice for an employer in the legislative branch of state government:

(a) To interfere with, restrain, or coerce employees in the exercise of the rights guaranteed by this chapter;

(b) To dominate or interfere with the formation or administration of any employee organization or contribute financial or other support to it: PROVIDED, That subject to rules adopted by the commission, an employer shall not be prohibited from permitting employees to confer with it or its representatives or agents during working hours without loss of time or pay;

(c) To encourage or discourage membership in any employee organization by discrimination in regard to hire, tenure of employment, or any term or condition of employment;

(d) To discharge or discriminate otherwise against an employee because that employee has filed charges or given testimony under this chapter;

(e) To refuse to bargain collectively with the exclusive bargaining representatives of its employees.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, the expression of any views, arguments, or opinions, or the dissemination thereof in any form, by a member of the legislature related to this chapter or matters within the scope of representation, shall not constitute, or be evidence of, an unfair labor practice unless the employer has authorized the member to express that view, argument, or opinion on behalf of the employer or as an employer.

(3) It is an unfair labor practice for an employee organization:

(a) To restrain or coerce an employee in the exercise of the rights guaranteed by this chapter: PROVIDED, That this subsection shall not impair the right of an employee organization to prescribe its own rules with respect to the acquisition or retention of membership in the employee organization or to an employer in the selection of its representatives for the purpose of bargaining or the adjustment of grievances;

(b) To cause or attempt to cause an employer to discriminate against an employee in violation of subsection (1)(c) of this section;

(c) To discriminate against an employee because that employee has filed charges or given testimony under this chapter;

(d) To refuse to bargain collectively with an employer.

(((3)))(4) The expressing of any views, arguments, or opinion, or the dissemination thereof to the public, whether in written, printed, graphic, or visual form, shall not constitute or be evidence of an unfair labor practice under this chapter, if such expression contains no threat of reprisal or force or promise of benefit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12. A new section is added to chapter 44.90 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The commission is empowered and directed to prevent any unfair labor practice and to issue appropriate remedial orders. However, a complaint may not be processed for any unfair labor practice occurring more than six months before the filing of the complaint with the commission or in Thurston county superior court. This power may not be affected or impaired by any means of adjustment, mediation, or conciliation in labor disputes that have been or may hereafter be established by law.

(2) Except as may be specifically limited by this chapter, if the commission or court determines that any person has engaged in or is engaging in an unfair labor practice, the commission or court shall issue and cause to be served upon the person an order requiring the person to cease and desist from such unfair labor practice, and to take such affirmative action as will effectuate the purposes and policy of this chapter, such as the payment of damages.

(3) The commission may petition the Thurston county superior court for the enforcement of its order and for appropriate temporary relief.

Sec. 13. RCW 44.90.090 and 2022 c 283 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the matters subject to bargaining include wages, hours, terms, and conditions of employment, and the negotiation of any question arising under a collective bargaining agreement.

(2) The employer shall not bargain over rights of management which, in addition to all powers, duties, and rights established by constitutional provision or statute, shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(a) Any item listed in section 4(1) of this act;

(b) The functions and programs of the employer, the use of technology, and the structure of the organization, including the size and composition of standing committees;

(((b)))(c) The employer's budget and the size of the employer's workforce, including determining the financial basis for layoffs;

(((c)))(d) The right to direct and supervise employees;

(((d)))(e) The hours of work during legislative session ((and the)). However, this subsection (2)(e) does not prohibit bargaining over compensation for hours worked in excess of 40 hours in a workweek in agreements that take effect after July 1, 2027;

(f) The cutoff calendar for a legislative session; ((and

(e)))(g) The employer's right to hire, terminate, and promote employees. Legislative employees hold their positions at the employer's pleasure;

(h) Health care benefits and other employee insurance benefits. The amount paid by a legislative employee for health care premiums must be the same as that paid by a represented state employee covered by RCW 41.80.020(3);

(i) The right to take whatever actions are deemed necessary to carry out the mission of the legislature and its agencies during emergencies; and

(j) Retirement plans and retirement benefits.

(((2)))(3) Except for an applicable code of conduct policy adopted by a chamber of the legislature or a legislative agency, if a conflict exists between policies adopted by the legislature relating to wages, hours, and terms and conditions of employment and a provision of a collective bargaining agreement negotiated under this chapter, the collective bargaining agreement shall prevail. A provision of a collective bargaining agreement that conflicts with a statute or an applicable term of a code of conduct policy adopted by a chamber of the legislature or a legislative agency is invalid and unenforceable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14. A new section is added to chapter 44.90 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Upon authorization of an employee within the bargaining unit and after the certification or recognition of the bargaining unit's exclusive bargaining representative, the employer must deduct from the payments to the employee the monthly amount of dues as certified by the secretary of the exclusive bargaining representative and must transmit the same to the treasurer of the exclusive bargaining representative.

(2)(a) An employee's written, electronic, or recorded voice authorization to have the employer deduct membership dues from the employee's salary must be made by the employee to the exclusive bargaining representative. If the employer receives a request for authorization of deductions, the employer must, as soon as practicable, forward the request to the exclusive bargaining representative.

(b) Upon receiving notice of the employee's authorization, the employer must deduct from the employee's salary membership dues and remit the amounts to the exclusive bargaining representative.

(c) The employee's authorization remains in effect until expressly revoked by the employee in accordance with the terms and conditions of the authorization.

(d) An employee's request to revoke authorization for payroll deductions must be in writing and submitted by the employee to the exclusive bargaining representative in accordance with the terms and conditions of the authorization.

(e) After the employer receives confirmation from the exclusive bargaining representative that the employee has revoked authorization for deductions, the employer must end the deduction no later than the second payroll after receipt of the confirmation.

(f) The employer must rely on information provided by the exclusive bargaining representative regarding the authorization and revocation of deductions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15. A new section is added to chapter 44.90 RCW to read as follows:

(1) If the parties to a collective bargaining agreement negotiated under this chapter agree to final and binding arbitration under grievance procedures allowed by section 7 of this act, the parties may agree on one or more permanent umpires to serve as arbitrator, or may agree on any impartial person to serve as arbitrator, or may agree to select arbitrators from any source available to them, including federal and private agencies, in addition to the staff and list of arbitrators maintained by the commission. If the parties cannot agree to the selection of an arbitrator, the commission must supply a list of names in accordance with the procedures established by the commission.

(2) The authority of an arbitrator shall be subject to the limits and restrictions specified under section 4 of this act.

(3) Except as limited by this chapter, an arbitrator may require any person to attend as a witness and to bring with them any book, record, document, or other evidence. The fees for such attendance must be paid by the party requesting issuance of the subpoena and must be the same as the fees of witnesses in the superior court. Arbitrators may administer oaths. Subpoenas must issue and be signed by the arbitrator and must be served in the same manner as subpoenas to testify before a court of record in this state. If any person so summoned to testify refuses or neglects to obey such subpoena, upon petition authorized by the arbitrator, the superior court may compel the attendance of the person before the arbitrator or punish the person for contempt in the same manner provided for the attendance of witnesses or the punishment of them in the courts of this state.

(4) Except as limited by this chapter, the arbitrator shall appoint a time and place for the hearing and notify the parties thereof, and may adjourn the hearing from time to time as may be necessary, and, on application of either party and for good cause, may postpone the hearing to a time not extending beyond the date fixed by the collective bargaining agreement for making the award. The arbitration award must be in writing and signed by the arbitrator. The arbitrator must, promptly upon its rendition, serve a true copy of the award on each of the parties or their attorneys of record.

(5) If a party to a collective bargaining agreement negotiated under this chapter that includes final and binding arbitration refuses to submit a grievance for arbitration, the other party to the collective bargaining agreement may invoke the jurisdiction of the superior court of Thurston county and the court shall have jurisdiction to issue an order compelling arbitration. Disputes concerning compliance with grievance procedures shall be reserved for determination by the arbitrator. Arbitration shall be ordered if the grievance states a claim that on its face is covered by the collective bargaining agreement. Doubts as to the coverage of the arbitration clause shall be resolved in favor of arbitration.

(6) If a party to a collective bargaining agreement negotiated under this chapter that includes final and binding arbitration refuses to comply with the award of an arbitrator determining a grievance arising under the collective bargaining agreement, the other party to the collective bargaining agreement may invoke the jurisdiction of the superior court of Thurston county and the court shall have jurisdiction to issue an order enforcing the arbitration award.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16. A new section is added to chapter 44.90 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The following activities conducted by or on behalf of legislative employees related to collective bargaining under this chapter are exempt from the restrictions contained in RCW 42.52.020 and 42.52.160:

(a) Use of paid time and public resources for negotiating and administering collective bargaining agreements under this chapter;

(b) Lobbying conducted by an employee organization, lobbyist, association, or third party on behalf of legislative employees concerning legislation that directly impacts legislative workplace conditions;

(c) Communication with a prospective employee organization during nonwork hours and without the use of public resources; or

(d) Conducting the day-to-day work of organizing and representing legislative employees in the workplace while serving in a legislative employee organization leadership position.

(2)(a) Nothing in this section affects the application of the prohibition against the use of special privileges under RCW 42.52.070, confidentiality requirements under RCW 42.52.050, or other applicable provisions of chapter 42.52 RCW to legislative employees.

(b) Nothing in this section permits any direct lobbying by a legislative employee.

(3) As used in this section, "lobby" and "lobbyist" have the meanings provided in RCW 42.17A.005.

Sec. 17. RCW 42.52.020 and 1996 c 213 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No state officer or state employee may have an interest, financial or otherwise, direct or indirect, or engage in a business or transaction or professional activity, or incur an obligation of any nature, that is in conflict with the proper discharge of the state officer's or state employee's official duties.

(2) This section does not apply to activities conducted by legislative employees authorized under section 16 of this act.

Sec. 18. RCW 42.52.160 and 2023 c 91 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No state officer or state employee may employ or use any person, money, or property under the officer's or employee's official control or direction, or in his or her official custody, for the private benefit or gain of the officer, employee, or another.

(2) This section does not prohibit the use of public resources to benefit others as part of a state officer's or state employee's official duties. It is not a violation of this section for a legislator or an appropriate legislative staff designee to engage in activities listed under RCW 42.52.070(2) or 42.52.822.

(3) This section does not prohibit de minimis use of state facilities to provide employees with information about (a) medical, surgical, and hospital care; (b) life insurance or accident and health disability insurance; or (c) individual retirement accounts, by any person, firm, or corporation administering such program as part of authorized payroll deductions pursuant to RCW 41.04.020.

(4) The appropriate ethics boards may adopt rules providing exceptions to this section for occasional use of the state officer or state employee, of de minimis cost and value, if the activity does not result in interference with the proper performance of public duties.

(5) This section does not apply to activities conducted by legislative employees authorized under section 16 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect May 1, 2024.

--- END ---