BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 35.82 RCW to read as follows:

Whenever an authority attempts to contact an individual by mail regarding that individual's eligibility for financial assistance, the authority shall include a return receipt service or similar method of notification that is designed to provide evidence of delivery. An authority may allow an individual to opt out of the notification methods provided under this section.

--- END ---