BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 35.101.055 and 2008 c 137 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The lodging charge authorized in RCW 35.101.050 does not apply to temporary medical housing exempt under RCW 82.08.997, or any lodging business, lodging unit, or lodging guest so designated by the legislative authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act applies to any tourism promotion area established before, on, or after the effective date of this section.

--- END ---