BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.150.230 and 2010 c 235 s 201 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is the intent and purpose of this section to guarantee that each common school district board of directors, whether or not acting through its respective administrative staff, be held accountable for the proper operation of their district to the local community and its electorate. In accordance with the provisions of ((Title 28A RCW))this title, as now or hereafter amended, each common school district board of directors shall be vested with the final responsibility for the setting of policies ensuring quality in the content and extent of its educational program and that such program provide students with the opportunity to achieve those skills which are generally recognized as requisite to learning.

(2) In conformance with the provisions of ((Title 28A RCW))this title, as now or hereafter amended, it shall be the responsibility of each common school district board of directors to adopt policies to:

(a) Establish performance criteria and an evaluation process for its superintendent, classified staff, certificated personnel, including administrative staff, and for all programs constituting a part of such district's curriculum. Each district shall report annually to the superintendent of public instruction the following for each employee group listed in this subsection (2)(a): (i) Evaluation criteria and rubrics; (ii) a description of each rating; and (iii) the number of staff in each rating;

(b) Determine the final assignment of staff, certificated or classified, according to board enumerated classroom and program needs and data, based upon a plan to ensure that the assignment policy: (i) Supports the learning needs of all the students in the district; and (ii) gives specific attention to high-need schools and classrooms;

(c) Provide information to the local community and its electorate describing the school district's policies concerning hiring, assigning, terminating, and evaluating staff, including the criteria for evaluating teachers and principals;

(d) Determine the amount of instructional hours necessary for any student to acquire a quality education in such district, in not less than an amount otherwise required in RCW 28A.150.220, or rules of the state board of education;

(e) Determine the allocation of staff time, whether certificated or classified;

(f) Establish final curriculum standards ((consistent with law and rules of the superintendent of public instruction,)) relevant to the particular needs of district students or the unusual characteristics of the district, and ensuring a quality education for each student in the district; and

(g) Evaluate teaching materials, including text books, teaching aids, handouts, or other printed material, in public hearing upon complaint by parents, guardians or custodians of students who consider dissemination of such material to students objectionable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. RCW 28A.300.475 (Comprehensive sexual health education) and 2020 c 188 s 1 & 2007 c 265 s 2 are each repealed.

--- END ---