BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 15.140.040 and 2019 c 158 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department must develop the state's hemp plan to conform to the agriculture improvement act of 2018, to include consultation with the governor and the attorney general and the plan elements required in the agriculture improvement act of 2018.

(2) Consistent with subsection (1) of this section, the state's hemp plan must include the following elements:

(a) A practice for hemp producers to maintain relevant information regarding land on which hemp is produced, including a legal description of the land, for a period of not less than three calendar years;

(b) A procedure for testing, using postdecarboxylation or other similarly reliable methods, delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration levels of hemp, without the application of heat;

(c) A procedure for the effective disposal of plants, whether growing or not, that are produced in violation of this chapter, and products derived from such plants;

(d) A procedure for enforcement of violations of the plan and for corrective action plans for licensees as required under the agriculture improvement act of 2018;

(e) A procedure for conducting annual inspections of, at a minimum, a random sample of hemp producers to verify hemp is not produced in violation of this chapter; and

(f) A certification that the state has the resources and personnel to carry out the practices and procedures described in this section.

(3) The proposal for the state's plan may include any other practice or procedure established to the extent the practice or procedure is consistent with the agriculture improvement act of 2018.

(4) Hemp and processed hemp produced in accordance with this chapter or produced lawfully under the laws of another state, tribe, or country may be transferred and sold within this state, outside of this state, and internationally.

(5) The ((whole)) hemp plant may be used as food. The department shall regulate the processing of hemp for food products((, that are allowable under federal law,))in a hemp consumable in the same manner as other food processing under chapter((s)) 15.130 RCW and ((69.07)) RCW 69.07.220 and may adopt rules as necessary to properly regulate the processing of hemp for food products in a hemp consumable including, but not limited to, establishing standards for creating hemp extracts used for food in a hemp consumable.

Sec. 2. RCW 69.07.220 and 2021 c 104 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((Until such time as hemp extract is federally authorized for use as a food ingredient, hemp extract is not an approved food ingredient in Washington state.)) A hemp processor who wishes to engage in the production of hemp extract for use as a food ingredient ((in another state that allows its use as a food ingredient)) may apply for a hemp extract certification to certify the hemp processor's compliance with Washington's inspection and good manufacturing practices requirements. The department shall regulate hemp extract processing the same as other food processing under chapters 15.130, 69.07, and 69.22 RCW with the exceptions contained in subsections (2) through (((6)))(5) of this section.

(2) The department's oversight is limited to certifying a hemp processor's compliance with applicable inspection and good manufacturing practices requirements as adopted by the department under chapter 15.130 RCW.

(3) The department must issue a hemp extract certification in lieu of a food processing license under RCW 69.07.040 to a hemp processor who meets the application requirements described in subsection (4) of this section. A hemp processor holding a hemp extract certification must apply for renewal of the certification annually.

(4) The application, initial certification, and renewal fees must be in an amount established by the department. Applicants for certification otherwise must meet the same requirements as applicants for a food processing license under chapter 69.07 RCW including, but not limited to, successful completion of an inspection by the department.

(5) The department may deny, suspend, or revoke a hemp extract certification on the same grounds as the department may deny, suspend, or revoke a food processor's license under this chapter.

(((6) At such time as federal authorization of hemp extracts as a food ingredient occurs, the department must cease issuance of certifications under this chapter. At renewal, hemp processors certified under this section must apply for a food processor license in accordance with RCW 69.07.040.))

--- END ---