BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9.94A.832 and 2013 c 270 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

In a criminal case where((:

(1) The))the defendant has been convicted of robbery in the first degree or robbery in the second degree((;)) and

(((2) There))there has been a special allegation pleaded and proven beyond a reasonable doubt that the defendant committed a robbery of ((a)):

(1) A pharmacy as defined in RCW 18.64.011(((21))); or

(2) A retail outlet and the defendant committed the robbery by using a vehicle to damage or gain access to the retail outlet; or

(3) A retail outlet and the defendant committed the robbery in concert with another individual or individuals;

the court shall make a finding of fact of the special allegation, or if a jury is had, the jury shall, if it finds the defendant guilty, also find a special verdict as to the special allegation.

--- END ---