BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28B.20 RCW to read as follows:

The Washington national primate research center within the University of Washington shall annually publish in a publicly accessible place on its website the following:

(1) The number of nonhuman primates, listed by species, at the Washington national primate center that, in the previous year were:

(a) Used in research;

(b) Used in breeding;

(c) Born;

(d) Purchased or sold by the Washington national primate research center;

(e) Injured or died in a manner that resulted in an animal welfare citation by the United States department of agriculture;

(f) Killed or died as part of research, a test, or a study at the Washington national primate research center;

(g) Injured or died due to causes not related to research at the Washington national primate research center; and

(h) Either showing symptoms or were treated, or both, for unintended illness or infection;

(2) Links to publicly accessible websites that include descriptions of research using nonhuman primates;

(3) The total amount of money awarded to the Washington national primate research center from each source during the previous fiscal year;

(4) Any inspection reports of the United States department of agriculture related to animal welfare at the Washington national primate research center that include information about nonhuman primate welfare during the previous year;

(5) Any conservation efforts the Washington national primate research center supports to assist species recovery in the wild; and

(6) Documentation of the accreditation of the Washington national primate research center.

--- END ---