BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 3.34.010 and 2023 c 5 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The minimum number of district judges to be elected in each county shall be: Adams, two; Asotin, one; Benton, five; Chelan, two; Clallam, two; Clark, six; Columbia, one; Cowlitz, three; Douglas, one; Ferry, one; Franklin, one; Garfield, one; Grant, three; Grays Harbor, two; Island, one; Jefferson, one; King, twenty-three in 2009, twenty-five in 2010, and twenty-six in 2011; Kitsap, four; Kittitas, two; Klickitat, two; Lewis, two; Lincoln, one; Mason, one; Okanogan, two; Pacific, two; Pend Oreille, one; Pierce, eleven; San Juan, one; Skagit, three; Skamania, one; Snohomish, nine; Spokane, eight; Stevens, one; Thurston, three; Wahkiakum, one; Walla Walla, two; Whatcom, two; Whitman, one; Yakima, four. This number may be increased only as provided in RCW 3.34.020.

Sec. 2. RCW 3.34.020 and 2003 c 97 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any ((change))increase in the number of full and part-time district judges after January 1, 1992, shall be determined by the ((legislature))county legislative authority of the affected county after receiving a recommendation from the supreme court. The supreme court shall make its recommendations to the ((legislature))county legislative authority based on an objective workload analysis that takes into account available judicial resources and the caseload activity of each court.

(2) The administrator for the courts, under the supervision of the supreme court, may consult with the board of judicial administration and the district and municipal court judges' association in developing the procedures and methods of applying the objective workload analysis.

(3) For each recommended change from the number of full and part-time district judges in any county as of January 1, 1992, the administrator for the courts, under the supervision of the supreme court, shall complete a judicial impact note detailing any local or state cost associated with such recommended change.

(4) If the ((legislature))county legislative authority approves an increase in the base number of district judges in any county as of January 1, 1992, such increase in the base number of district judges and all related costs may be paid for by the county from moneys provided under RCW 82.14.310, and any such costs shall be deemed to be expended for criminal justice purposes as provided in RCW 82.14.315, and such expenses shall not constitute a supplanting of existing funding.

(5)(a) A county legislative authority that desires to ((change))increase the number of full or part-time district judges from the base number on January 1, 1992, must first request the assistance of the supreme court. The administrator for the courts, under the supervision of the supreme court, shall conduct an objective workload analysis and make a recommendation of its findings to the ((legislature))county legislative authority for consideration as provided in this section. Changes in the number of district court judges may only be made by the ((legislature))county legislative authority in a year in which the quadrennial election for district court judges is not held.

(b) The legislative authority of any county may change a part-time district judge position to a full-time position.

--- END ---