BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 80.50 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The council may not recommend approval of an application for certification of a utility-scale wind energy facility, as defined in RCW 70A.550.010, if any part of the facility is located closer than 15 miles to a military installation.

(2) This section does not apply to any facility that received approval of certification before the effective date of this section.

(3) A facility that received approval of certification consistent with this section may not have its certification revoked if a new military installation is established and located closer than 15 miles to the facility after the facility received approval of certification.

(4)(a) For purposes of this section, "military installation" means a base, camp, post, station, yard, center, homeport facility for any ship, or other activity under the jurisdiction of the United States department of defense, including any leased facility, which is located within the state of Washington.

(b) "Military installation" does not include any facility used primarily for civil works, rivers and harbors projects, or flood control projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 36.70B RCW to read as follows:

(1) A local government may not approve a project permit application for a utility-scale wind energy facility, as defined in RCW 70A.550.010, if any part of the facility is located closer than 15 miles to a military installation.

(2) This section does not apply to any utility-scale wind energy facility that was approved before the effective date of this section.

(3)(a) For purposes of this section, "military installation" means a base, camp, post, station, yard, center, homeport facility for any ship, or other activity under the jurisdiction of the United States department of defense, including any leased facility, which is located within the state of Washington.

(b) "Military installation" does not include any facility used primarily for civil works, rivers and harbors projects, or flood control projects.

--- END ---