BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 35.63 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A city may not install or construct hostile architecture elements designed to restrict the use of any public space by people experiencing homelessness.

(2) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Public space" means any publicly accessible building or real property owned or operated by the city.

(b) "Hostile architecture" means any building or structure that is designed or intended to prevent people experiencing homelessness from sitting or lying on the building or structure at street level. "Hostile architecture" does not include design elements intended to prevent individuals from skateboarding or rollerblading, or to prevent vehicles from entering certain areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 35A.63 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A code city may not install or construct hostile architecture elements designed to restrict the use of any public space by people experiencing homelessness.

(2) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Public space" means any publicly accessible building or real property owned or operated by the code city.

(b) "Hostile architecture" means any building or structure that is designed or intended to prevent people experiencing homelessness from sitting or lying on the building or structure at street level. "Hostile architecture" does not include design elements intended to prevent individuals from skateboarding or rollerblading, or to prevent vehicles from entering certain areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 36.70 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A county may not install or construct hostile architecture elements designed to restrict the use of any public space by people experiencing homelessness.

(2) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Public space" means any publicly accessible building or real property owned or operated by the county.

(b) "Hostile architecture" means any building or structure that is designed or intended to prevent people experiencing homelessness from sitting or lying on the building or structure at street level. "Hostile architecture" does not include design elements intended to prevent individuals from skateboarding or rollerblading, or to prevent vehicles from entering certain areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This act takes effect January 1, 2025.

--- END ---