BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that there is promising research that individuals with branched-chain ketoacid dehydrogenase kinase deficiency, which is linked to neurodevelopmental disorders including autism spectrum disorder, can potentially benefit significantly from early diagnosis and treatment. The legislature intends to engage the state board of health to conduct an evaluation of whether branched-chain ketoacid dehydrogenase kinase deficiency screening should be added to the newborn screening panel.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) The state board of health shall consider whether or not to add the branched-chain ketoacid dehydrogenase kinase deficiency screening to the mandatory newborn screening panel as required in RCW 70.83.020. The state board of health shall submit to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature a report no later than June 30, 2025, that includes a summary of the evaluation conducted in this section and the findings and recommendations on the addition of the branched-chain ketoacid dehydrogenase kinase deficiency screening to the mandatory newborn screening panel.

(2) This section expires July 30, 2026.

--- END ---