BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.200 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A parent who intends for the parent's child to receive home-based instruction must file a signed declaration of intent in the school year when the child turns six years of age and the school year when the child turns seven years of age. The compulsory attendance requirements in RCW 28A.225.010 and the home-based instruction requirements in RCW 28A.200.010 are not applicable until a child receiving home-based instruction is eight years of age.

(2) The signed declaration of intent must include the name and age of the child and must be written in a format prescribed by the superintendent of public instruction. Each parent shall file the declaration of intent by September 15th of the school year or within two weeks of the beginning of any public school quarter, trimester, or semester with the superintendent of the public school district within which the parent resides.

(3) For the purposes of this section, "parent" means a parent, guardian, or person having legal custody of a child.

--- END ---