BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9.41.047 and 2023 c 295 s 5 and 2023 c 161 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) At the time a person is convicted or found not guilty by reason of insanity of an offense making the person ineligible to possess a firearm under state or federal law, including if the person was convicted of possession under RCW 69.50.4011, 69.50.4013, 69.50.4014, or 69.41.030, or at the time a person is committed by court order under RCW 71.05.240, 71.05.320, 71.34.740, 71.34.750, or chapter 10.77 RCW for treatment for a mental disorder, or at the time that charges are dismissed based on incompetency to stand trial under RCW 10.77.084 or 10.77.086, or the charges are dismissed based on incompetency to stand trial under RCW 10.77.088 and the court makes a finding that the person has a history of one or more violent acts, the court shall notify the person, orally and in writing, that the person must immediately surrender all firearms to their local law enforcement agency and any concealed pistol license and that the person may not possess a firearm unless the person's right to do so is restored by the superior court that issued the order.

(b) The court shall forward within three judicial days ((after))following conviction((,))or finding of not guilty by reason of insanity((, entry of the commitment order, or dismissal of charges,)) a copy of the person's driver's license or identicard, or comparable information such as the person's name, address, and date of birth, along with the date of conviction ((or commitment, or date charges are dismissed))or finding of not guilty by reason of insanity, to the department of licensing and to the Washington state patrol firearms background check program. ((When a person is committed))

(c) The court shall forward within three judicial days following commitment by court order under RCW 71.05.240, 71.05.320, 71.34.740, 71.34.750, or chapter 10.77 RCW, for treatment for a mental disorder, or ((when a person's))upon dismissal of charges ((are dismissed)) based on incompetency to stand trial under RCW 10.77.084 or 10.77.086, or the charges are dismissed based on incompetency to stand trial under RCW 10.77.088 ((and))when the court makes a finding that the person has a history of one or more violent acts, ((the court also shall forward, within three judicial days after entry of the commitment order, or dismissal of charges,)) a copy of the person's driver's license or identicard, or comparable information such as the person's name, address, and date of birth, along with the date of commitment or date charges are dismissed, to the national instant criminal background check system index, denied persons file, created by the federal Brady handgun violence prevention act (P.L. 103-159), and to the department of licensing, Washington state patrol firearms background check program, and the criminal division of the county prosecutor in the county of commitment. The petitioning party shall provide the court with the information required. If more than one commitment order is entered under one cause number, only one notification to the national instant criminal background check system, the department of licensing, the Washington state patrol firearms background check program, and the ((national instant criminal background check system))criminal division of the county prosecutor in the county of commitment is required.

(2) Upon receipt of the information provided for by subsection (1) of this section, the department of licensing shall determine if the person has a concealed pistol license. If the person has a concealed pistol license, the department of licensing shall immediately notify the license-issuing authority which, upon receipt of such notification, shall immediately revoke the license.

(3)(a) A person who is prohibited from possessing a firearm, by reason of having been involuntarily committed for treatment for a mental disorder under RCW 71.05.240, 71.05.320, 71.34.740, 71.34.750, chapter 10.77 RCW, or equivalent statutes of another jurisdiction, or by reason of having been detained under RCW 71.05.150 or 71.05.153, or because the person's charges were dismissed based on incompetency to stand trial under RCW 10.77.086, or the charges are dismissed based on incompetency to stand trial under RCW 10.77.088 and the court made a finding that the person has a history of one or more violent acts, may, upon discharge, petition the superior court to have his or her right to possess a firearm restored, except that a person found not guilty by reason of insanity may not petition for restoration of the right to possess a firearm until one year after discharge.

(b) The petition must be brought in the superior court that ordered the involuntary commitment or dismissed the charges based on incompetency to stand trial or the superior court of the county in which the petitioner resides.

(c) Except as provided in (d) and (e) of this subsection, firearm rights shall be restored if the person petitioning for restoration of firearm rights proves by a preponderance of the evidence that:

(i) The person petitioning for restoration of firearm rights is no longer required to participate in court-ordered inpatient or outpatient treatment;

(ii) The person petitioning for restoration of firearm rights has successfully managed the condition related to the commitment or detention or incompetency;

(iii) The person petitioning for restoration of firearm rights no longer presents a substantial danger to self or to the public; ((and))

(iv) The symptoms related to the commitment or detention or incompetency are not reasonably likely to recur; and

(v) There is no active extreme risk protection order or order to surrender and prohibit weapons entered against the petitioner.

(d) If a preponderance of the evidence in the record supports a finding that the person petitioning for restoration of firearm rights has engaged in violence and that it is more likely than not that the person will engage in violence after the person's right to possess a firearm is restored, the person petitioning for restoration of firearm rights shall bear the burden of proving by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that the person does not present a substantial danger to the safety of others.

(e) If the person seeking restoration of firearm rights seeks restoration after having been detained under RCW 71.05.150 or 71.05.153, the state shall bear the burden of proof to show, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the person does not meet the restoration criteria in (c) of this subsection.

(f) When a person's right to possess a firearm has been restored under this subsection, the court shall forward, within three judicial days after entry of the restoration order, notification that the person's right to possess a firearm has been restored to the department of licensing and the Washington state patrol criminal records division, with a copy of the person's driver's license or identicard, or comparable identification such as the person's name, address, and date of birth, and to the health care authority, and the national instant criminal background check system index, denied persons file. In the case of a person whose right to possess a firearm has been suspended for six months as provided in RCW 71.05.182, the department of licensing shall forward notification of the restoration order to the licensing authority, which, upon receipt of such notification, shall immediately lift the suspension, restoring the person's concealed pistol license.

(4) No person who has been found not guilty by reason of insanity may petition a court for restoration of the right to possess a firearm unless the person meets the requirements for the restoration of the right to possess a firearm under RCW 9.41.041.

Sec. 2. RCW 9.41.049 and 2020 c 302 s 61 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When a designated crisis responder files a petition for initial detention under RCW 71.05.150 or 71.05.153 on the grounds that the person presents a likelihood of serious harm, the petition shall include a copy of the person's driver's license or identicard or comparable information such as their name, address, and date of birth. If the person is not subsequently committed for involuntary treatment under RCW 71.05.240, the court shall forward within three business days of the probable cause hearing a copy of the person's driver's license or identicard, or comparable information, along with the date of release from the facility, to the department of licensing, the criminal division of the county prosecutor in the county of commitment, and ((to)) the Washington state patrol firearms background check program, ((who))which shall forward the information to the national instant criminal background check system index, denied persons file, created by the federal Brady handgun violence prevention act (P.L. 103-159). Upon expiration of the six-month period during which the person's right to possess a firearm is suspended as provided in RCW 71.05.182, the Washington state patrol shall forward to the national instant criminal background check system index, denied persons file, notice that the person's right to possess a firearm has been restored.

(2) Upon receipt of the information provided for by subsection (1) of this section, the department of licensing shall determine if the detained person has a concealed pistol license. If the person does have a concealed pistol license, the department of licensing shall immediately notify the license-issuing authority, which, upon receipt of such notification, shall immediately suspend the license for a period of six months from the date of the person's release from the facility.

(3) A person who is prohibited from possessing a firearm by reason of having been detained under RCW 71.05.150 or 71.05.153 may, upon discharge, petition the superior court to have his or her right to possess a firearm restored before the six-month suspension period has elapsed by following the procedures provided in RCW 9.41.047(3).

Sec. 3. RCW 10.77.086 and 2023 c 453 s 8 and 2023 c 433 s 18 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, if the defendant is charged with a felony and determined to be incompetent, until he or she has regained the competency necessary to understand the proceedings against him or her and assist in his or her own defense, but in any event for a period of no longer than 90 days, the court shall commit the defendant to the custody of the secretary for inpatient competency restoration, or may alternatively order the defendant to receive outpatient competency restoration based on a recommendation from a forensic navigator and input from the parties.

(b) For a defendant who is determined to be incompetent and whose highest charge is a class C felony other than assault in the third degree under RCW 9A.36.031(1) (d) or (f), felony physical control of a vehicle under RCW 46.61.504(6), felony hit and run resulting in injury under RCW 46.52.020(4)(b), a hate crime offense under RCW 9A.36.080, a class C felony with a domestic violence designation, a class C felony sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, or a class C felony with a sexual motivation allegation, the court shall first consider all available and appropriate alternatives to inpatient competency restoration. The court shall dismiss the proceedings without prejudice upon agreement of the parties if the forensic navigator has found an appropriate and available diversion program willing to accept the defendant.

(2)(a) To be eligible for an order for outpatient competency restoration, a defendant must be clinically appropriate and be willing to:

(i) Adhere to medications or receive prescribed intramuscular medication;

(ii) Abstain from alcohol and unprescribed drugs; and

(iii) Comply with urinalysis or breathalyzer monitoring if needed.

(b) If the court orders inpatient competency restoration, the department shall place the defendant in an appropriate facility of the department for competency restoration.

(c) If the court orders outpatient competency restoration, the court shall modify conditions of release as needed to authorize the department to place the person in approved housing, which may include access to supported housing, affiliated with a contracted outpatient competency restoration program. The department, in conjunction with the health care authority, must establish rules for conditions of participation in the outpatient competency restoration program, which must include the defendant being subject to medication management. The court may order regular urinalysis testing. The outpatient competency restoration program shall monitor the defendant during the defendant's placement in the program and report any noncompliance or significant changes with respect to the defendant to the department and, if applicable, the forensic navigator.

(d) If a defendant fails to comply with the restrictions of the outpatient restoration program such that restoration is no longer appropriate in that setting or the defendant is no longer clinically appropriate for outpatient competency restoration, the director of the outpatient competency restoration program shall notify the authority and the department of the need to terminate the outpatient competency restoration placement and intent to request placement for the defendant in an appropriate facility of the department for inpatient competency restoration. The outpatient competency restoration program shall coordinate with the authority, the department, and any law enforcement personnel under (d)(i) of this subsection to ensure that the time period between termination and admission into the inpatient facility is as minimal as possible. The time period for inpatient competency restoration shall be reduced by the time period spent in active treatment within the outpatient competency restoration program, excluding time periods in which the defendant was absent from the program and all time from notice of termination of the outpatient competency restoration period through the defendant's admission to the facility. The department shall obtain a placement for the defendant within seven days of the notice of intent to terminate the outpatient competency restoration placement.

(i) The department may authorize a peace officer to detain the defendant into emergency custody for transport to the designated inpatient competency restoration facility. If medical clearance is required by the designated competency restoration facility before admission, the peace officer must transport the defendant to a crisis stabilization unit, evaluation and treatment facility, or emergency department of a local hospital for medical clearance once a bed is available at the designated inpatient competency restoration facility. The signed outpatient competency restoration order of the court shall serve as authority for the detention of the defendant under this subsection. This subsection does not preclude voluntary transportation of the defendant to a facility for inpatient competency restoration or for medical clearance, or authorize admission of the defendant into jail.

(ii) The department shall notify the court and parties of the defendant's admission for inpatient competency restoration before the close of the next judicial day. The court shall schedule a hearing within five days to review the conditions of release of the defendant and anticipated release from treatment and issue appropriate orders.

(e) The court may not issue an order for outpatient competency restoration unless the department certifies that there is an available appropriate outpatient competency restoration program that has adequate space for the person at the time the order is issued or the court places the defendant under the guidance and control of a professional person identified in the court order.

(3) For a defendant whose highest charge is a class C felony, or a class B felony that is not classified as violent under RCW 9.94A.030, the maximum time allowed for the initial competency restoration period is 45 days if the defendant is referred for inpatient competency restoration, or 90 days if the defendant is referred for outpatient competency restoration, provided that if the outpatient competency restoration placement is terminated and the defendant is subsequently admitted to an inpatient facility, the period of inpatient treatment during the first competency restoration period under this subsection shall not exceed 45 days.

(4) When any defendant whose highest charge is a class C felony other than assault in the third degree under RCW 9A.36.031(1) (d) or (f), felony physical control of a vehicle under RCW 46.61.504(6), felony hit and run resulting in injury under RCW 46.52.020(4)(b), a hate crime offense under RCW 9A.36.080, a class C felony with a domestic violence designation, a class C felony sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, or a class C felony with a sexual motivation allegation is admitted for inpatient competency restoration with an accompanying court order for involuntary medication under RCW 10.77.092, and the defendant is found not competent to stand trial following that period of competency restoration, the court shall dismiss the charges pursuant to subsection (7) of this section.

(5) If the court determines or the parties agree before the initial competency restoration period or at any subsequent stage of the proceedings that the defendant is unlikely to regain competency, the court may dismiss the charges without prejudice without ordering the defendant to undergo an initial or further period of competency restoration treatment, in which case the court shall order that the defendant be referred for evaluation for civil commitment in the manner provided in subsection (7) of this section.

(6) On or before expiration of the initial competency restoration period the court shall conduct a hearing to determine whether the defendant is now competent to stand trial. If the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the defendant is incompetent to stand trial, the court may order an extension of the competency restoration period for an additional period of 90 days, but the court must at the same time set a date for a new hearing to determine the defendant's competency to stand trial before the expiration of this second restoration period. The defendant, the defendant's attorney, and the prosecutor have the right to demand that the hearing be before a jury. No extension shall be ordered for a second or third competency restoration period if the defendant is ineligible for a subsequent competency restoration period under subsection (4) of this section or the defendant's incompetence has been determined by the secretary to be solely the result of an intellectual or developmental disability, dementia, or traumatic brain injury which is such that competence is not reasonably likely to be regained during an extension.

(7)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, at the hearing upon the expiration of the second competency restoration period, or at the end of the first competency restoration period if the defendant is ineligible for a second or third competency restoration period under subsection (3) or (6) of this section, if the jury or court finds that the defendant is incompetent to stand trial, the court shall dismiss the charges without prejudice and order the defendant to be committed to the department for placement in a facility operated or contracted by the department for up to 120 hours if the defendant has not undergone competency restoration services or has engaged in outpatient competency restoration services, and up to 72 hours if the defendant engaged in inpatient competency restoration services starting from admission to the facility, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, for evaluation for the purpose of filing a civil commitment petition under chapter 71.05 RCW. If at the time the order to dismiss the charges without prejudice is entered by the court the defendant is already in a facility operated or contracted by the department, the 72-hour or 120-hour period shall instead begin upon department receipt of the court order.

(b) The court shall not dismiss the charges if the defendant is eligible for a second or third competency restoration period under subsection (6) of this section and the court or jury finds that: (i) The defendant (A) is a substantial danger to other persons; or (B) presents a substantial likelihood of committing criminal acts jeopardizing public safety or security; and (ii) there is a substantial probability that the defendant will regain competency within a reasonable period of time. If the court or jury makes such a finding, the court may extend the period of commitment for up to an additional six months.

(8) Any period of competency restoration treatment under this section includes only the time the defendant is actually at the facility or is actively participating in an outpatient competency restoration program and is in addition to reasonable time for transport to or from the facility.

(9) If at any time the court dismisses charges under subsection (7) of this section, the court shall issue an order prohibiting the defendant from the possession of firearms until a court restores his or her right to possess a firearm under RCW 9.41.047. The court shall notify the defendant orally and in writing that the defendant may not possess a firearm unless the defendant's right to do so is restored by the superior court that issued the order under RCW 9.41.047, and that the defendant must immediately surrender all firearms and any concealed pistol license to their local law enforcement agency.

Sec. 4. RCW 10.77.088 and 2023 c 453 s 9 and 2023 c 433 s 19 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) If the defendant is charged with a nonfelony crime which is a serious offense as identified in RCW 10.77.092 and found by the court to be not competent, the court shall first consider all available and appropriate alternatives to inpatient competency restoration. If the parties agree that there is an appropriate diversion program available to accept the defendant, the court shall dismiss the proceedings without prejudice and refer the defendant to the recommended diversion program. If the parties do not agree that there is an appropriate diversion program available to accept the defendant, then the court:

(a) Shall dismiss the proceedings without prejudice and detain the defendant pursuant to subsection (6) of this section, unless the prosecutor objects to the dismissal and provides notice of a motion for an order for competency restoration treatment, in which case the court shall schedule a hearing within seven days.

(b) At the hearing, the prosecuting attorney must establish that there is a compelling state interest to order competency restoration treatment for the defendant. The court may consider prior criminal history, prior history in treatment, prior history of violence, the quality and severity of the pending charges, any history that suggests whether competency restoration treatment is likely to be successful, in addition to the factors listed under RCW 10.77.092. If the defendant is subject to an order under chapter 71.05 RCW or proceedings under chapter 71.05 RCW have been initiated, there is a rebuttable presumption that there is no compelling state interest in ordering competency restoration treatment. If the prosecuting attorney proves by a preponderance of the evidence that there is a compelling state interest in ordering competency restoration treatment, then the court shall issue an order in accordance with subsection (2) of this section.

(2)(a) If a court finds pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section that there is a compelling state interest in pursuing competency restoration treatment, the court shall order the defendant to receive outpatient competency restoration consistent with the recommendation of the forensic navigator, unless the court finds that an order for outpatient competency restoration is inappropriate considering the health and safety of the defendant and risks to public safety.

(b) To be eligible for an order for outpatient competency restoration, a defendant must be willing to:

(i) Adhere to medications or receive prescribed intramuscular medication;

(ii) Abstain from alcohol and unprescribed drugs; and

(iii) Comply with urinalysis or breathalyzer monitoring if needed.

(c) If the court orders inpatient competency restoration, the department shall place the defendant in an appropriate facility of the department for competency restoration under subsection (3) of this section.

(d) If the court orders outpatient competency restoration, the court shall modify conditions of release as needed to authorize the department to place the person in approved housing, which may include access to supported housing, affiliated with a contracted outpatient competency restoration program. The department, in conjunction with the health care authority, must establish rules for conditions of participation in the outpatient competency restoration program, which must include the defendant being subject to medication management. The court may order regular urinalysis testing. The outpatient competency restoration program shall monitor the defendant during the defendant's placement in the program and report any noncompliance or significant changes with respect to the defendant to the department and, if applicable, the forensic navigator.

(e) If a defendant fails to comply with the restrictions of the outpatient competency restoration program such that restoration is no longer appropriate in that setting or the defendant is no longer clinically appropriate for outpatient competency restoration, the director of the outpatient competency restoration program shall notify the authority and the department of the need to terminate the outpatient competency restoration placement and intent to request placement for the defendant in an appropriate facility of the department for inpatient competency restoration. The outpatient competency restoration program shall coordinate with the authority, the department, and any law enforcement personnel under (e)(i) of this subsection to ensure that the time period between termination and admission into the inpatient facility is as minimal as possible. The time period for inpatient competency restoration shall be reduced by the time period spent in active treatment within the outpatient competency restoration program, excluding time periods in which the defendant was absent from the program and all time from notice of termination of the outpatient competency restoration period through the defendant's admission to the facility. The department shall obtain a placement for the defendant within seven days of the notice of intent to terminate the outpatient competency restoration placement.

(i) The department may authorize a peace officer to detain the defendant into emergency custody for transport to the designated inpatient competency restoration facility. If medical clearance is required by the designated competency restoration facility before admission, the peace officer must transport the defendant to a crisis stabilization unit, evaluation and treatment facility, or emergency department of a local hospital for medical clearance once a bed is available at the designated inpatient competency restoration facility. The signed outpatient competency restoration order of the court shall serve as authority for the detention of the defendant under this subsection. This subsection does not preclude voluntary transportation of the defendant to a facility for inpatient competency restoration or for medical clearance, or authorize admission of the defendant into jail.

(ii) The department shall notify the court and parties of the defendant's admission for inpatient competency restoration before the close of the next judicial day. The court shall schedule a hearing within five days to review the conditions of release of the defendant and anticipated release from treatment and issue appropriate orders.

(f) The court may not issue an order for outpatient competency restoration unless the department certifies that there is an available appropriate outpatient restoration program that has adequate space for the person at the time the order is issued or the court places the defendant under the guidance and control of a professional person identified in the court order.

(g) If the court does not order the defendant to receive outpatient competency restoration under (a) of this subsection, the court shall commit the defendant to the department for placement in a facility operated or contracted by the department for inpatient competency restoration.

(3) The placement under subsection (2) of this section shall not exceed 29 days if the defendant is ordered to receive inpatient competency restoration, and shall not exceed 90 days if the defendant is ordered to receive outpatient competency restoration. The court may order any combination of this subsection, but the total period of inpatient competency restoration may not exceed 29 days.

(4) Beginning October 1, 2023, if the defendant is charged with a serious traffic offense under RCW 9.94A.030, the court may order the clerk to transmit an order to the department of licensing for revocation of the defendant's driver's license for a period of one year. The court shall direct the clerk to transmit an order to the department of licensing reinstating the defendant's driver's license if the defendant is subsequently restored to competency, and may do so at any time before the end of one year for good cause upon the petition of the defendant.

(5) If the court has determined or the parties agree that the defendant is unlikely to regain competency, the court may dismiss the charges without prejudice without ordering the defendant to undergo competency restoration treatment, in which case the court shall order that the defendant be referred for evaluation for civil commitment in the manner provided in subsection (6) of this section.

(6)(a) If the proceedings are dismissed under RCW 10.77.084 and the defendant was on conditional release at the time of dismissal, the court shall order the designated crisis responder within that county to evaluate the defendant pursuant to chapter 71.05 RCW. The evaluation may be conducted in any location chosen by the professional.

(b) If the defendant was in custody and not on conditional release at the time of dismissal, the defendant shall be detained and sent to an evaluation and treatment facility for up to 120 hours if the defendant has not undergone competency restoration services or has engaged in outpatient competency restoration services and up to 72 hours if the defendant engaged in inpatient competency restoration services, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, for evaluation for purposes of filing a petition under chapter 71.05 RCW. The 120-hour or 72-hour period shall commence upon the next nonholiday weekday following the court order and shall run to the end of the last nonholiday weekday within the 120-hour or 72-hour period.

(7) If the defendant is charged with a nonfelony crime that is not a serious offense as defined in RCW 10.77.092 and found by the court to be not competent, the court may stay or dismiss proceedings and detain the defendant for sufficient time to allow the designated crisis responder to evaluate the defendant and consider initial detention proceedings under chapter 71.05 RCW. The court must give notice to all parties at least 24 hours before the dismissal of any proceeding under this subsection, and provide an opportunity for a hearing on whether to dismiss the proceedings.

(8) If at any time the court dismisses charges under subsections (1) through (7) of this section, the court shall make a finding as to whether the defendant has a history of one or more violent acts. If the court so finds, the ((defendant is barred))court shall issue an order prohibiting the defendant from the possession of firearms until a court restores his or her right to possess a firearm under RCW 9.41.047. The court shall ((state to the defendant and provide written notice that the defendant is barred from the possession of firearms and that the prohibition remains in effect until a court restores his or her right to possess a firearm under RCW 9.41.047))notify the defendant orally and in writing that the defendant may not possess a firearm unless the defendant's right to do so is restored by the superior court that issued the order under RCW 9.41.047, and that the defendant must immediately surrender all firearms and any concealed pistol license to their local law enforcement agency.

(9) Any period of competency restoration treatment under this section includes only the time the defendant is actually at the facility or is actively participating in an outpatient competency restoration program and is in addition to reasonable time for transport to or from the facility.

Sec. 5. RCW 70.02.260 and 2018 c 201 s 8005 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) A mental health service agency shall release to the persons authorized under subsection (2) of this section, upon request:

(i) The fact, place, and date of an involuntary commitment, the fact and date of discharge or release, and the last known address of a person who has been committed under chapter 71.05 or 71.34 RCW.

(ii) Information and records related to mental health services, in the format determined under subsection (9) of this section, concerning a person who:

(A) Is currently committed to the custody or supervision of the department of corrections or the indeterminate sentence review board under chapter 9.94A or 9.95 RCW;

(B) Has been convicted or found not guilty by reason of insanity of a serious violent offense; or

(C) Was charged with a serious violent offense and the charges were dismissed under RCW 10.77.086.

(b) Legal counsel for the mental health service agency, including a county prosecutor or assistant attorney general who represents the mental health service agency for the purpose of involuntary commitment proceedings, may release ((such))this information ((to the persons authorized under subsection (2) of this section)) on behalf of the mental health service agency((, so long as nothing)).

(c) Nothing in this subsection requires the disclosure of attorney work product or attorney-client privileged information.

(2) The information subject to release under subsection (1) of this section must be released to law enforcement officers, city or county prosecuting attorneys, personnel of a county or city jail, designated mental health professionals or designated crisis responders, as appropriate, public health officers, therapeutic court personnel as defined in RCW 71.05.020, or personnel of the department of corrections, including the indeterminate sentence review board and personnel assigned to perform board-related duties, when such information is requested during the course of business and for the purpose of carrying out the responsibilities of the requesting person's office. No mental health service agency or person employed by a mental health service agency, or its legal counsel, may be liable for information released to or used under the provisions of this section or rules adopted under this section except under RCW 71.05.680.

(3) A person who requests information under subsection (1)(a)(ii) of this section must comply with the following restrictions:

(a) Information must be requested only for the purposes permitted by this subsection and for the purpose of carrying out the responsibilities of the requesting person's office. Appropriate purposes for requesting information under this section include:

(i) Completing presentence investigations or risk assessment reports;

(ii) Assessing a person's risk to the community;

(iii) Assessing a person's risk of harm to self or others when confined in a city or county jail;

(iv) Planning for and provision of supervision of an offender, including decisions related to sanctions for violations of conditions of community supervision; and

(v) Responding to an offender's failure to report for department of corrections supervision; and

(vi) Assessing the need for an extreme risk protection order under chapter 7.105 RCW;

(b) Information may not be requested under this section unless the requesting person has reasonable suspicion that the individual who is the subject of the information:

(i) Has engaged in activity indicating that a crime or a violation of community custody or parole has been committed or, based upon his or her current or recent past behavior, is likely to be committed in the near future; or

(ii) Is exhibiting signs of a deterioration in mental functioning which may make the individual appropriate for civil commitment under chapter 71.05 or 71.34 RCW, or which is associated with a recent detention or order of commitment under chapter 71.05 or 71.34 RCW or an order of commitment or dismissal of charges under chapter 10.77 RCW; and

(c) Any information received under this section must be held confidential and subject to the limitations on disclosure outlined in this chapter, except:

(i) The information may be shared with other persons who have the right to request similar information under subsection (2) of this section, solely for the purpose of coordinating activities related to the individual who is the subject of the information in a manner consistent with the official responsibilities of the persons involved;

(ii) The information may be shared with a prosecuting attorney who is acting in an advisory capacity for a person who receives information under this section or who is carrying out other official duties within the scope of this section. A prosecuting attorney under this subsection is subject to the same restrictions and confidentiality limitations as the person who requested the information; and

(iii) As provided in RCW 72.09.585.

(4) A request for information and records related to mental health services under this section does not require the consent of the subject of the records. The request must be provided in writing, except to the extent authorized in subsection (5) of this section. A written request may include requests made by email or facsimile so long as the requesting person is clearly identified. The request must specify the information being requested.

(5) In the event of an emergency situation that poses a significant risk to the public or the offender, a mental health service agency, or its legal counsel, shall release information related to mental health services delivered to the offender and, if known, information regarding where the offender is likely to be found to the department of corrections or law enforcement upon request. The initial request may be written or oral. All oral requests must be subsequently confirmed in writing. Information released in response to an oral request is limited to a statement as to whether the offender is or is not being treated by the mental health service agency and the address or information about the location or whereabouts of the offender.

(6) Disclosure under this section to state or local law enforcement authorities is mandatory for the purposes of the federal health insurance portability and accountability act.

(7) Whenever federal law or federal regulations restrict the release of information contained in the treatment records of any patient who receives treatment for alcoholism or drug dependency, the release of the information may be restricted as necessary to comply with federal law and regulations.

(8) This section does not modify the terms and conditions of disclosure of information related to sexually transmitted diseases under this chapter.

(9) In collaboration with interested organizations, the authority shall develop a standard form for requests for information related to mental health services made under this section and a standard format for information provided in response to the requests. Consistent with the goals of the health information privacy provisions of the federal health insurance portability and accountability act, in developing the standard form for responsive information, the authority shall design the form in such a way that the information disclosed is limited to the minimum necessary to serve the purpose for which the information is requested.

--- END ---