BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 71.24 RCW to read as follows:

Behavioral health administrative services organizations shall use their authorities under RCW 71.24.045 to establish coordination within the behavioral health crisis response system in each regional service area including, but not limited to, establishing comprehensive protocols for dispatching mobile rapid response crisis teams and community-based crisis teams. In furtherance of this:

(1) The behavioral health administrative services organization may convene regional behavioral health crisis response system partners and stakeholders within available resources for the purpose of establishing clear regional protocols which memorialize expectations, understandings, lines of communication, and strategies for optimizing crisis response in the regional service area. The regional protocols must describe how crisis response partners will share information consistent with data-sharing requirements under RCW 71.24.890, including real-time information sharing between 988 contact hubs, regional crisis lines, or their successors, to create a seamless delivery system that is person-centered;

(2) Behavioral health administrative services organizations shall submit regional protocols created under subsection (1) of this section to the authority for approval. If the authority does not respond within 90 days of submission, the regional protocols shall be considered approved until such time as the behavioral health administrative services organization and the authority agree to updated protocols. A behavioral health administrative services organization must notify the authority by January 1, 2025, if it does not intend to develop and submit regional protocols;

(3) A behavioral health administrative services organization may recommend to the department the 988 contact hub or hubs which it determines to be the best fit for partnership and implementation of regional protocols in its regional service area among candidates which are able to meet necessary state and federal requirements. The 988 contact hub or hubs recommended by the behavioral health administrative services organization must be able to connect to the culturally appropriate behavioral health crisis response services established under this chapter;

(4) The department may designate additional 988 contact hubs recommended by a behavioral health administrative services organization within available resources and when the addition of more hubs is consistent with the rules adopted under RCW 71.24.890 and a need identified in regional protocols. If the department declines to designate a 988 contact hub that has been recommended by a behavioral health administrative services organization, the department shall provide a written explanation of its reasons to the behavioral health administrative services organization;

(5) The department and the authority shall provide support to a behavioral health administrative services organization in the development of protocols under subsection (1) of this section upon request by the behavioral health administrative services organization;

(6) Regional protocols established under subsection (1) of this section must be in writing and, once approved, copies shall be provided to the department, authority, and state 911 coordination office. The regional protocols should be updated as needed and at intervals of no longer than three years; and

(7) For the purpose of subsection (1) of this section, partners and stakeholders in the coordinated regional behavioral health crisis response system include but are not limited to regional crisis lines, 988 contact hubs, certified public safety telecommunicators, local governments, tribal governments, first responders, co-response teams, hospitals, organizations representing persons with lived experience, and behavioral health agencies.

Sec. 2. RCW 71.24.025 and 2023 c 454 s 1 and 2023 c 433 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "23-hour crisis relief center" means a community-based facility or portion of a facility serving adults, which is licensed or certified by the department of health and open 24 hours a day, seven days a week, offering access to mental health and substance use care for no more than 23 hours and 59 minutes at a time per patient, and which accepts all behavioral health crisis walk-ins drop-offs from first responders, and individuals referred through the 988 system regardless of behavioral health acuity, and meets the requirements under RCW 71.24.916.

(2) "988 crisis hotline" means the universal telephone number within the United States designated for the purpose of the national suicide prevention and mental health crisis hotline system operating through the national suicide prevention lifeline.

(3) "Acutely mentally ill" means a condition which is limited to a short-term severe crisis episode of:

(a) A mental disorder as defined in RCW 71.05.020 or, in the case of a child, as defined in RCW 71.34.020;

(b) Being gravely disabled as defined in RCW 71.05.020 or, in the case of a child, a gravely disabled minor as defined in RCW 71.34.020; or

(c) Presenting a likelihood of serious harm as defined in RCW 71.05.020 or, in the case of a child, as defined in RCW 71.34.020.

(4) "Alcoholism" means a disease, characterized by a dependency on alcoholic beverages, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning.

(5) "Approved substance use disorder treatment program" means a program for persons with a substance use disorder provided by a treatment program licensed or certified by the department as meeting standards adopted under this chapter.

(6) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.

(7) "Available resources" means funds appropriated for the purpose of providing community behavioral health programs, federal funds, except those provided according to Title XIX of the Social Security Act, and state funds appropriated under this chapter or chapter 71.05 RCW by the legislature during any biennium for the purpose of providing residential services, resource management services, community support services, and other behavioral health services. This does not include funds appropriated for the purpose of operating and administering the state psychiatric hospitals.

(8) "Behavioral health administrative services organization" means an entity contracted with the authority to administer behavioral health services and programs under RCW 71.24.381, including crisis services and administration of chapter 71.05 RCW, the involuntary treatment act, for all individuals in a defined regional service area.

(9) "Behavioral health aide" means a counselor, health educator, and advocate who helps address individual and community-based behavioral health needs, including those related to alcohol, drug, and tobacco abuse as well as mental health problems such as grief, depression, suicide, and related issues and is certified by a community health aide program of the Indian health service or one or more tribes or tribal organizations consistent with the provisions of 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1616l and RCW 43.71B.010 (7) and (8).

(10) "Behavioral health provider" means a person licensed under chapter 18.57, 18.71, 18.71A, 18.83, 18.205, 18.225, or 18.79 RCW, as it applies to registered nurses and advanced registered nurse practitioners.

(11) "Behavioral health services" means mental health services, substance use disorder treatment services, and co-occurring disorder treatment services as described in this chapter and chapter 71.36 RCW that, depending on the type of service, are provided by licensed or certified behavioral health agencies, behavioral health providers, or integrated into other health care providers.

(12) "Child" means a person under the age of eighteen years.

(13) "Chronically mentally ill adult" or "adult who is chronically mentally ill" means an adult who has a mental disorder and meets at least one of the following criteria:

(a) Has undergone two or more episodes of hospital care for a mental disorder within the preceding two years; or

(b) Has experienced a continuous psychiatric hospitalization or residential treatment exceeding six months' duration within the preceding year; or

(c) Has been unable to engage in any substantial gainful activity by reason of any mental disorder which has lasted for a continuous period of not less than twelve months. "Substantial gainful activity" shall be defined by the authority by rule consistent with Public Law 92-603, as amended.

(14) "Clubhouse" means a community-based program that provides rehabilitation services and is licensed or certified by the department.

(15) "Community behavioral health program" means all expenditures, services, activities, or programs, including reasonable administration and overhead, designed and conducted to prevent or treat substance use disorder, mental illness, or both in the community behavioral health system.

(16) "Community behavioral health service delivery system" means public, private, or tribal agencies that provide services specifically to persons with mental disorders, substance use disorders, or both, as defined under RCW 71.05.020 and receive funding from public sources.

(17) "Community support services" means services authorized, planned, and coordinated through resource management services including, at a minimum, assessment, diagnosis, emergency crisis intervention available twenty-four hours, seven days a week, prescreening determinations for persons who are mentally ill being considered for placement in nursing homes as required by federal law, screening for patients being considered for admission to residential services, diagnosis and treatment for children who are acutely mentally ill or severely emotionally or behaviorally disturbed discovered under screening through the federal Title XIX early and periodic screening, diagnosis, and treatment program, investigation, legal, and other nonresidential services under chapter 71.05 RCW, case management services, psychiatric treatment including medication supervision, counseling, psychotherapy, assuring transfer of relevant patient information between service providers, recovery services, and other services determined by behavioral health administrative services organizations.

(18) "Community-based crisis team" means a team that is part of an emergency medical services agency, a fire service agency, a public health agency, a medical facility, a nonprofit crisis response provider, or a city or county government entity, other than a law enforcement agency, that provides the on-site community-based interventions of a mobile rapid response crisis team for individuals who are experiencing a behavioral health crisis.

(19) "Consensus-based" means a program or practice that has general support among treatment providers and experts, based on experience or professional literature, and may have anecdotal or case study support, or that is agreed but not possible to perform studies with random assignment and controlled groups.

(20) "County authority" means the board of county commissioners, county council, or county executive having authority to establish a behavioral health administrative services organization, or two or more of the county authorities specified in this subsection which have entered into an agreement to establish a behavioral health administrative services organization.

(21) "Crisis stabilization services" means services such as 23-hour crisis relief centers, crisis stabilization units, short-term respite facilities, peer-run respite services, and same-day walk-in behavioral health services, including within the overall crisis system components that operate like hospital emergency departments that accept all walk-ins, and ambulance, fire, and police drop-offs, or determine the need for involuntary hospitalization of an individual.

(22) "Crisis stabilization unit" has the same meaning as under RCW 71.05.020.

(23) "Department" means the department of health.

(24) "Designated 988 contact hub" or "988 contact hub" means a state-designated contact center that streamlines clinical interventions and access to resources for people experiencing a behavioral health crisis and participates in the national suicide prevention lifeline network to respond to statewide or regional 988 contacts that meets the requirements of RCW 71.24.890.

(25) "Designated crisis responder" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.05.020.

(26) "Director" means the director of the authority.

(27) "Drug addiction" means a disease characterized by a dependency on psychoactive chemicals, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning.

(28) "Early adopter" means a regional service area for which all of the county authorities have requested that the authority purchase medical and behavioral health services through a managed care health system as defined under RCW 71.24.380(7).

(29) "Emerging best practice" or "promising practice" means a program or practice that, based on statistical analyses or a well established theory of change, shows potential for meeting the evidence-based or research-based criteria, which may include the use of a program that is evidence-based for outcomes other than those listed in subsection (30) of this section.

(30) "Evidence-based" means a program or practice that has been tested in heterogeneous or intended populations with multiple randomized, or statistically controlled evaluations, or both; or one large multiple site randomized, or statistically controlled evaluation, or both, where the weight of the evidence from a systemic review demonstrates sustained improvements in at least one outcome. "Evidence-based" also means a program or practice that can be implemented with a set of procedures to allow successful replication in Washington and, when possible, is determined to be cost-beneficial.

(31) "First responders" includes ambulance, fire, mobile rapid response crisis team, coresponder team, designated crisis responder, fire department mobile integrated health team, community assistance referral and education services program under RCW 35.21.930, and law enforcement personnel.

(32) "Indian health care provider" means a health care program operated by the Indian health service or by a tribe, tribal organization, or urban Indian organization as those terms are defined in the Indian health care improvement act (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1603).

(33) "Intensive behavioral health treatment facility" means a community-based specialized residential treatment facility for individuals with behavioral health conditions, including individuals discharging from or being diverted from state and local hospitals, whose impairment or behaviors do not meet, or no longer meet, criteria for involuntary inpatient commitment under chapter 71.05 RCW, but whose care needs cannot be met in other community-based placement settings.

(34) "Licensed or certified behavioral health agency" means:

(a) An entity licensed or certified according to this chapter or chapter 71.05 RCW;

(b) An entity deemed to meet state minimum standards as a result of accreditation by a recognized behavioral health accrediting body recognized and having a current agreement with the department; or

(c) An entity with a tribal attestation that it meets state minimum standards for a licensed or certified behavioral health agency.

(35) "Licensed physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine or osteopathic medicine and surgery in the state of Washington.

(36) "Long-term inpatient care" means inpatient services for persons committed for, or voluntarily receiving intensive treatment for, periods of ninety days or greater under chapter 71.05 RCW. "Long-term inpatient care" as used in this chapter does not include: (a) Services for individuals committed under chapter 71.05 RCW who are receiving services pursuant to a conditional release or a court-ordered less restrictive alternative to detention; or (b) services for individuals voluntarily receiving less restrictive alternative treatment on the grounds of the state hospital.

(37) "Managed care organization" means an organization, having a certificate of authority or certificate of registration from the office of the insurance commissioner, that contracts with the authority under a comprehensive risk contract to provide prepaid health care services to enrollees under the authority's managed care programs under chapter 74.09 RCW.

(38) "Mental health peer-run respite center" means a peer-run program to serve individuals in need of voluntary, short-term, noncrisis services that focus on recovery and wellness.

(39) Mental health "treatment records" include registration and all other records concerning persons who are receiving or who at any time have received services for mental illness, which are maintained by the department of social and health services or the authority, by behavioral health administrative services organizations and their staffs, by managed care organizations and their staffs, or by treatment facilities. "Treatment records" do not include notes or records maintained for personal use by a person providing treatment services for the entities listed in this subsection, or a treatment facility if the notes or records are not available to others.

(40) "Mentally ill persons," "persons who are mentally ill," and "the mentally ill" mean persons and conditions defined in subsections (3), (13), (48), and (49) of this section.

(41) "Mobile rapid response crisis team" means a team that provides professional on-site community-based intervention such as outreach, de-escalation, stabilization, resource connection, and follow-up support for individuals who are experiencing a behavioral health crisis, that shall include certified peer counselors as a best practice to the extent practicable based on workforce availability, and that meets standards for response times established by the authority.

(42) "Recovery" means a process of change through which individuals improve their health and wellness, live a self-directed life, and strive to reach their full potential.

(43) "Research-based" means a program or practice that has been tested with a single randomized, or statistically controlled evaluation, or both, demonstrating sustained desirable outcomes; or where the weight of the evidence from a systemic review supports sustained outcomes as described in subsection (30) of this section but does not meet the full criteria for evidence-based.

(44) "Residential services" means a complete range of residences and supports authorized by resource management services and which may involve a facility, a distinct part thereof, or services which support community living, for persons who are acutely mentally ill, adults who are chronically mentally ill, children who are severely emotionally disturbed, or adults who are seriously disturbed and determined by the behavioral health administrative services organization or managed care organization to be at risk of becoming acutely or chronically mentally ill. The services shall include at least evaluation and treatment services as defined in chapter 71.05 RCW, acute crisis respite care, long-term adaptive and rehabilitative care, and supervised and supported living services, and shall also include any residential services developed to service persons who are mentally ill in nursing homes, residential treatment facilities, assisted living facilities, and adult family homes, and may include outpatient services provided as an element in a package of services in a supported housing model. Residential services for children in out-of-home placements related to their mental disorder shall not include the costs of food and shelter, except for children's long-term residential facilities existing prior to January 1, 1991.

(45) "Resilience" means the personal and community qualities that enable individuals to rebound from adversity, trauma, tragedy, threats, or other stresses, and to live productive lives.

(46) "Resource management services" mean the planning, coordination, and authorization of residential services and community support services administered pursuant to an individual service plan for: (a) Adults and children who are acutely mentally ill; (b) adults who are chronically mentally ill; (c) children who are severely emotionally disturbed; or (d) adults who are seriously disturbed and determined by a behavioral health administrative services organization or managed care organization to be at risk of becoming acutely or chronically mentally ill. Such planning, coordination, and authorization shall include mental health screening for children eligible under the federal Title XIX early and periodic screening, diagnosis, and treatment program. Resource management services include seven day a week, twenty-four hour a day availability of information regarding enrollment of adults and children who are mentally ill in services and their individual service plan to designated crisis responders, evaluation and treatment facilities, and others as determined by the behavioral health administrative services organization or managed care organization, as applicable.

(47) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of health.

(48) "Seriously disturbed person" means a person who:

(a) Is gravely disabled or presents a likelihood of serious harm to himself or herself or others, or to the property of others, as a result of a mental disorder as defined in chapter 71.05 RCW;

(b) Has been on conditional release status, or under a less restrictive alternative order, at some time during the preceding two years from an evaluation and treatment facility or a state mental health hospital;

(c) Has a mental disorder which causes major impairment in several areas of daily living;

(d) Exhibits suicidal preoccupation or attempts; or

(e) Is a child diagnosed by a mental health professional, as defined in chapter 71.34 RCW, as experiencing a mental disorder which is clearly interfering with the child's functioning in family or school or with peers or is clearly interfering with the child's personality development and learning.

(49) "Severely emotionally disturbed child" or "child who is severely emotionally disturbed" means a child who has been determined by the behavioral health administrative services organization or managed care organization, if applicable, to be experiencing a mental disorder as defined in chapter 71.34 RCW, including those mental disorders that result in a behavioral or conduct disorder, that is clearly interfering with the child's functioning in family or school or with peers and who meets at least one of the following criteria:

(a) Has undergone inpatient treatment or placement outside of the home related to a mental disorder within the last two years;

(b) Has undergone involuntary treatment under chapter 71.34 RCW within the last two years;

(c) Is currently served by at least one of the following child-serving systems: Juvenile justice, child-protection/welfare, special education, or developmental disabilities;

(d) Is at risk of escalating maladjustment due to:

(i) Chronic family dysfunction involving a caretaker who is mentally ill or inadequate;

(ii) Changes in custodial adult;

(iii) Going to, residing in, or returning from any placement outside of the home, for example, psychiatric hospital, short-term inpatient, residential treatment, group or foster home, or a correctional facility;

(iv) Subject to repeated physical abuse or neglect;

(v) Drug or alcohol abuse; or

(vi) Homelessness.

(50) "State minimum standards" means minimum requirements established by rules adopted and necessary to implement this chapter by:

(a) The authority for:

(i) Delivery of mental health and substance use disorder services; and

(ii) Community support services and resource management services;

(b) The department of health for:

(i) Licensed or certified behavioral health agencies for the purpose of providing mental health or substance use disorder programs and services, or both;

(ii) Licensed behavioral health providers for the provision of mental health or substance use disorder services, or both; and

(iii) Residential services.

(51) "Substance use disorder" means a cluster of cognitive, behavioral, and physiological symptoms indicating that an individual continues using the substance despite significant substance-related problems. The diagnosis of a substance use disorder is based on a pathological pattern of behaviors related to the use of the substances.

(52) "Tribe," for the purposes of this section, means a federally recognized Indian tribe.

(53) "Coordinated regional behavioral health crisis response system" means the coordinated operation of 988 call centers, regional crisis lines, certified public safety telecommunicators, and other behavioral health crisis system partners within each regional service area.

(54) "Regional crisis line" means the behavioral health crisis hotline in each regional service area which provides crisis response services 24 hours a day, seven days a week, 365 days a year including but not limited to dispatch of mobile rapid response crisis teams, community-based crisis teams, and designated crisis responders.

Sec. 3. RCW 71.24.045 and 2022 c 210 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The behavioral health administrative services organization contracted with the authority pursuant to RCW 71.24.381 shall:

(a) Administer crisis services for the assigned regional service area. Such services must include:

(i) A behavioral health crisis hotline for its assigned regional service area;

(ii) Crisis response services twenty-four hours a day, seven days a week, three hundred sixty-five days a year;

(iii) Services related to involuntary commitments under chapters 71.05 and 71.34 RCW;

(iv) Tracking of less restrictive alternative orders issued within the region by superior courts, and providing notification to a managed care organization in the region when one of its enrollees receives a less restrictive alternative order so that the managed care organization may ensure that the person is connected to services and that the requirements of RCW 71.05.585 are complied with. If the person receives a less restrictive alternative order and is returning to another region, the behavioral health administrative services organization shall notify the behavioral health administrative services organization in the home region of the less restrictive alternative order so that the home behavioral health administrative services organization may notify the person's managed care organization or provide services if the person is not enrolled in medicaid and does not have other insurance which can pay for those services;

(v) Additional noncrisis behavioral health services, within available resources, to individuals who meet certain criteria set by the authority in its contracts with the behavioral health administrative services organization. These services may include services provided through federal grant funds, provisos, and general fund state appropriations;

(vi) Care coordination, diversion services, and discharge planning for nonmedicaid individuals transitioning from state hospitals or inpatient settings to reduce rehospitalization and utilization of crisis services, as required by the authority in contract; ((and))

(vii) Regional coordination, cross-system and cross-jurisdiction coordination with tribal governments, and capacity building efforts, such as supporting the behavioral health advisory board and efforts to support access to services or to improve the behavioral health system; and

(viii) Duties under section 1 of this act;

(b) Administer and provide for the availability of an adequate network of evaluation and treatment services to ensure access to treatment, investigation, transportation, court-related, and other services provided as required under chapter 71.05 RCW;

(c) Coordinate services for individuals under RCW 71.05.365;

(d) Administer and provide for the availability of resource management services, residential services, and community support services as required under its contract with the authority;

(e) Contract with a sufficient number, as determined by the authority, of licensed or certified providers for crisis services and other behavioral health services required by the authority;

(f) Maintain adequate reserves or secure a bond as required by its contract with the authority;

(g) Establish and maintain quality assurance processes;

(h) Meet established limitations on administrative costs for agencies that contract with the behavioral health administrative services organization; and

(i) Maintain patient tracking information as required by the authority.

(2) The behavioral health administrative services organization must collaborate with the authority and its contracted managed care organizations to develop and implement strategies to coordinate care with tribes and community behavioral health providers for individuals with a history of frequent crisis system utilization.

(3) The behavioral health administrative services organization shall:

(a) Assure that the special needs of minorities, older adults, individuals with disabilities, children, and low-income persons are met;

(b) Collaborate with local government entities to ensure that policies do not result in an adverse shift of persons with mental illness into state and local correctional facilities; and

(c) Work with the authority to expedite the enrollment or reenrollment of eligible persons leaving state or local correctional facilities and institutions for mental diseases.

(4) The behavioral health administrative services organization shall employ an assisted outpatient treatment program coordinator to oversee system coordination and legal compliance for assisted outpatient treatment under RCW 71.05.148 and 71.34.815.

Sec. 4. RCW 71.24.890 and 2023 c 454 s 5 and 2023 c 433 s 16 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Establishing the state designated 988 contact hubs and enhancing the crisis response system will require collaborative work between the department ((and)), the authority, and regional system partners within their respective roles. The department shall have primary responsibility for ((establishing and)) designating ((the designated)) 988 contact hubs, and shall seek recommendations from the behavioral health administrative services organizations to determine which 988 contact hubs best meet regional needs. The authority shall have primary responsibility for developing ((and)), implementing, and facilitating coordination of the crisis response system and services to support the work of the designated 988 contact hubs, regional crisis lines, and other coordinated regional behavioral health crisis response system partners. In any instance in which one agency is identified as the lead, the expectation is that agency will ((be communicating and collaborating))communicate and collaborate with the other to ensure seamless, continuous, and effective service delivery within the statewide crisis response system.

(2) The department shall provide adequate funding for the state's crisis call centers to meet an expected increase in the use of the ((call centers))988 contact hubs based on the implementation of the 988 crisis hotline. The funding level shall be established at a level anticipated to achieve an in-state call response rate of at least 90 percent by July 22, 2022. The funding level shall be determined by considering standards and cost per call predictions provided by the administrator of the national suicide prevention lifeline, call volume predictions, guidance on crisis call center performance metrics, and necessary technology upgrades. ((In contracting))Contracts with the ((crisis call centers, the department))988 contact hubs:

(a) May provide funding to support regional crisis ((call centers))lines administered by behavioral health administrative services organizations and designated 988 contact hubs to enter into limited on-site partnerships with the public safety answering point to increase the coordination and transfer of behavioral health calls received by certified public safety telecommunicators that are better addressed by clinic interventions provided by the ((988))coordinated regional behavioral health crisis response system. Tax revenue may be used to support on-site partnerships;

(b) Shall require that ((crisis call centers))988 contact hubs enter into data-sharing agreements, when appropriate, with the department, the authority, regional crisis lines, and applicable regional behavioral health administrative services organizations to provide reports and client level data regarding 988 ((crisis hotline))contact hub calls, as allowed by and in compliance with existing federal and state law governing the sharing and use of protected health information((, including)). Data-sharing agreements with regional crisis lines must include real-time information sharing. All coordinated regional behavioral health crisis response system partners must share dispatch time, arrival time, and disposition ((of the outreach for each call))for behavioral health calls referred for outreach by each region consistent with any regional protocols developed under section 1 of this act. The department and the authority shall establish requirements ((that the crisis call centers))for 988 contact hubs to report ((the)) data ((identified in this subsection (2)(b))) to regional behavioral health administrative services organizations for the purposes of maximizing medicaid reimbursement, as appropriate, and implementing this chapter and chapters 71.05 and 71.34 RCW ((including, but not limited to,)). The behavioral health administrative services organization may use information received from the 988 contact hubs in administering crisis services for the assigned regional service area, contracting with a sufficient number of licensed or certified providers for crisis services, establishing and maintaining quality assurance processes, maintaining patient tracking, and developing and implementing strategies to coordinate care for individuals with a history of frequent crisis system utilization.

(3) The department shall adopt rules by January 1, 2025, to establish standards for designation of crisis call centers as designated 988 contact hubs. The department shall collaborate with the authority ((and)), other agencies, and coordinated regional behavioral health crisis response system partners to assure coordination and availability of services, and shall consider national guidelines for behavioral health crisis care as determined by the federal substance abuse and mental health services administration, national behavioral health accrediting bodies, and national behavioral health provider associations to the extent they are appropriate, and recommendations from behavioral health administrative services organizations and the crisis response improvement strategy committee created in RCW 71.24.892.

(4) The department shall designate ((designated)) 988 contact hubs considering the recommendations of behavioral health administrative services organizations by January 1, 2026. The designated 988 contact hubs shall provide connections to crisis intervention services, triage, care coordination, and referrals((, and connections to))for individuals contacting the 988 ((crisis hotline))contact hubs from any jurisdiction within Washington 24 hours a day, seven days a week, using the system platform developed under subsection (5) of this section.

(a) To be designated as a ((designated)) 988 contact hub, the applicant must demonstrate to the department the ability to comply with the requirements of this section and to contract to provide ((designated)) 988 contact hub services. ((The department may revoke the designation of any designated 988 contact hub that fails to substantially comply with the contract))If a 988 contact hub fails to substantially comply with the contract, data-sharing requirements, or approved regional protocols developed under section 1 of this act, the department shall revoke the designation of the 988 contact hub and, after consulting with the affected behavioral health administrative services organization, may designate a 988 contact hub recommended by a behavioral health administrative services organization which is able to meet necessary state and federal requirements.

(b) The contracts entered shall require designated 988 contact hubs to:

(i) Have an active agreement with the administrator of the national suicide prevention lifeline for participation within its network;

(ii) Meet the requirements for operational and clinical standards established by the department and based upon the national suicide prevention lifeline best practices guidelines and other recognized best practices;

(iii) Employ highly qualified, skilled, and trained clinical staff who have sufficient training and resources to provide empathy to callers in acute distress, de-escalate crises, assess behavioral health disorders and suicide risk, triage to system partners for callers that need additional clinical interventions, and provide case management and documentation. Call center staff shall be trained to make every effort to resolve cases in the least restrictive environment and without law enforcement involvement whenever possible. Call center staff shall coordinate with certified peer counselors to provide follow-up and outreach to callers in distress as available. It is intended for transition planning to include a pathway for continued employment and skill advancement as needed for experienced crisis call center employees;

(iv) Train employees on agricultural community cultural competencies for suicide prevention, which may include sharing resources with callers that are specific to members from the agricultural community. The training must prepare staff to provide appropriate assessments, interventions, and resources to members of the agricultural community. Employees may make warm transfers and referrals to a crisis hotline that specializes in working with members from the agricultural community, provided that no person contacting 988 shall be transferred or referred to another service if they are currently in crisis and in need of emotional support;

(v) Prominently display 988 crisis hotline information on their websites and social media, including a description of what the caller should expect when contacting the crisis call center and a description of the various options available to the caller, including call lines specialized in the behavioral health needs of veterans, American Indian and Alaska Native persons, Spanish-speaking persons, and LGBTQ populations. The website may also include resources for programs and services related to suicide prevention for the agricultural community;

(vi) Collaborate with the authority, the national suicide prevention lifeline, and veterans crisis line networks to assure consistency of public messaging about the 988 crisis hotline;

(vii) ((Develop and submit to the department protocols between the designated 988 contact hub and 911 call centers within the region in which the designated crisis call center operates and receive approval of the protocols by the department and the state 911 coordination office;

(viii) Develop, in collaboration with the region's behavioral health administrative services organizations, and jointly submit to the authority))Collaborate with coordinated regional behavioral health crisis response system partners within the 988 contact hub's regional service area to develop protocols under section 1 of this act, including protocols related to the dispatching of mobile rapid response crisis teams and community-based crisis teams endorsed under RCW 71.24.903 ((and receive approval of the protocols by the authority));

(((ix)))(viii) Provide data and reports and participate in evaluations and related quality improvement activities, according to standards established by the department in collaboration with the authority; and

(((x)))(ix) Enter into data-sharing agreements with the department, the authority, regional crisis lines, and applicable ((regional)) behavioral health administrative services organizations to provide reports and client level data regarding 988 ((crisis hotline))contact hub calls, as allowed by and in compliance with existing federal and state law governing the sharing and use of protected health information, ((including dispatch time, arrival time, and disposition of the outreach for each call referred for outreach by each region))which shall include sharing real-time information with regional crisis lines. The department and the authority shall establish requirements that the designated 988 contact hubs report ((the)) data ((identified in this subsection (4)(b)(x))) to regional behavioral health administrative services organizations for the purposes of maximizing medicaid reimbursement, as appropriate, and implementing this chapter and chapters 71.05 and 71.34 RCW including, but not limited to, administering crisis services for the assigned regional service area, contracting with a sufficient number ((or))of licensed or certified providers for crisis services, establishing and maintaining quality assurance processes, maintaining patient tracking, and developing and implementing strategies to coordinate care for individuals with a history of frequent crisis system utilization.

(c) The department and the authority shall incorporate recommendations from the crisis response improvement strategy committee created under RCW 71.24.892 in its agreements with designated 988 contact hubs, as appropriate.

(5) The department and authority must coordinate to develop the technology and platforms necessary to manage and operate the behavioral health crisis response and suicide prevention system. The department and the authority must include ((the crisis call centers and)) designated 988 contact hubs, regional crisis lines, and behavioral health administrative services organizations in the decision-making process for selecting any technology platforms that will be used to operate the system. No decisions made by the department or the authority shall interfere with the routing of the 988 ((crisis hotline))contact hubs calls, texts, or chat as part of Washington's active agreement with the administrator of the national suicide prevention lifeline or 988 administrator that routes 988 contacts into Washington's system. The technologies developed must include:

(a) A new technologically advanced behavioral health and suicide prevention crisis call center system platform for use in ((designated)) 988 contact hubs designated by the department under subsection (4) of this section. This platform, which shall be fully funded by July 1, 2024, shall be developed by the department and must include the capacity to receive crisis assistance requests through phone calls, texts, chats, and other similar methods of communication that may be developed in the future that promote access to the behavioral health crisis system; and

(b) A behavioral health integrated client referral system capable of providing system coordination information to designated 988 contact hubs and the other entities involved in behavioral health care. This system shall be developed by the authority.

(6) In developing the new technologies under subsection (5) of this section, the department and the authority must coordinate to designate a primary technology system to provide each of the following:

(a) Access to real-time information relevant to the coordination of behavioral health crisis response and suicide prevention services, including:

(i) Real-time bed availability for all behavioral health bed types and recliner chairs, including but not limited to crisis stabilization services, 23-hour crisis relief centers, psychiatric inpatient, substance use disorder inpatient, withdrawal management, peer-run respite centers, and crisis respite services, inclusive of both voluntary and involuntary beds, for use by crisis response workers, first responders, health care providers, emergency departments, and individuals in crisis; and

(ii) Real-time information relevant to the coordination of behavioral health crisis response and suicide prevention services for a person, including the means to access:

(A) Information about any less restrictive alternative treatment orders or mental health advance directives related to the person; and

(B) Information necessary to enable the designated 988 contact ((hub))hubs to actively collaborate with regional crisis lines, emergency departments, primary care providers and behavioral health providers within managed care organizations, behavioral health administrative services organizations, and other health care payers to establish a safety plan for the person in accordance with best practices and provide the next steps for the person's transition to follow-up noncrisis care. To establish information-sharing guidelines that fulfill the intent of this section the authority shall consider input from the confidential information compliance and coordination subcommittee established under RCW 71.24.892;

(([(b)]))(b) The means to track the outcome of the 988 call to enable appropriate follow-up, cross-system coordination, and accountability, including as appropriate: (i) Any immediate services dispatched and reports generated from the encounter; (ii) the validation of a safety plan established for the caller in accordance with best practices; (iii) the next steps for the caller to follow in transition to noncrisis follow-up care, including a next-day appointment for callers experiencing urgent, symptomatic behavioral health care needs; and (iv) the means to verify and document whether the caller was successful in making the transition to appropriate noncrisis follow-up care indicated in the safety plan for the person, to be completed either by the care coordinator provided through the person's managed care organization, health plan, or behavioral health administrative services organization, or if such a care coordinator is not available or does not follow through, by the staff of the designated 988 contact hub;

(c) A means to facilitate actions to verify and document whether the person's transition to follow-up noncrisis care was completed and services offered, to be performed by a care coordinator provided through the person's managed care organization, health plan, or behavioral health administrative services organization, or if such a care coordinator is not available or does not follow through, by the staff of the designated 988 contact hub;

(d) The means to provide geographically, culturally, and linguistically appropriate services to persons who are part of high-risk populations or otherwise have need of specialized services or accommodations, and to document these services or accommodations; and

(e) When appropriate, consultation with tribal governments to ensure coordinated care in government-to-government relationships, and access to dedicated services to tribal members.

(7) The authority shall:

(a) Collaborate with county authorities and behavioral health administrative services organizations to develop procedures to dispatch behavioral health crisis services in coordination with designated 988 contact hubs to effectuate the intent of this section;

(b) Establish formal agreements with managed care organizations and behavioral health administrative services organizations by January 1, 2023, to provide for the services, capacities, and coordination necessary to effectuate the intent of this section, which shall include a requirement to arrange next-day appointments for persons contacting the 988 ((crisis hotline))contact hub or a regional crisis line experiencing urgent, symptomatic behavioral health care needs with geographically, culturally, and linguistically appropriate primary care or behavioral health providers within the person's provider network, or, if uninsured, through the person's behavioral health administrative services organization;

(c) Create best practices guidelines by July 1, 2023, for deployment of appropriate and available crisis response services by behavioral health administrative services organizations in coordination with designated 988 contact hubs to assist 988 hotline callers to minimize nonessential reliance on emergency room services and the use of law enforcement, considering input from relevant stakeholders and recommendations made by the crisis response improvement strategy committee created under RCW 71.24.892;

(d) Develop procedures to allow appropriate information sharing and communication between and across crisis and emergency response systems for the purpose of real-time crisis care coordination including, but not limited to, deployment of crisis and outgoing services, follow-up care, and linked, flexible services specific to crisis response; and

(e) Establish guidelines to appropriately serve high-risk populations who request crisis services. The authority shall design these guidelines to promote behavioral health equity for all populations with attention to circumstances of race, ethnicity, gender, socioeconomic status, sexual orientation, and geographic location, and include components such as training requirements for call response workers, policies for transferring such callers to an appropriate specialized center or subnetwork within or external to the national suicide prevention lifeline network, and procedures for referring persons who access the 988 ((crisis hotline))contact hubs to linguistically and culturally competent care.

(8) The department shall monitor trends in 988 crisis hotline caller data, as reported by designated 988 contact hubs under subsection (4)(b)(((x)))(ix) of this section, and submit an annual report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature summarizing the data and trends beginning December 1, 2027.

--- END ---