BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.18.140 and 2007 c 218 s 54 are each amended to read as follows:

The board shall pay from the firefighters' pension fund upon the death of any active or retired firefighter the sum of ((five hundred dollars))$1,000, to assist in defraying the funeral expenses of such firefighter.

--- END ---