BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 19.315 RCW to read as follows:

A grocery establishment must post a sign at the checkout register in a location conspicuous to consumers stating that any coupons or reduced sales prices that are posted in the store or offered through electronic mediums are available and will be honored upon request even if the consumer has not signed up for the electronic medium.

Sec. 2. RCW 19.315.010 and 2009 c 374 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this chapter:

(1) "Grocery establishment" means a retail store in this state that is over 15,000 square feet in size and that sells primarily household foodstuffs for off-site consumption including, but not limited to, the sale of fresh produce, meats, poultry, fish, deli products, dairy products, canned foods, dry foods, beverages, baked foods, or prepared foods. Other household supplies or other products must be secondary to the primary purpose of food sales.

(2) "Person" has the same meaning as in RCW 19.86.010.

(((2)))(3) "Rebate" means an offer to provide cash, credit, or credit towards future purchases, that is offered to consumers who acquire or purchase a specified product or service and that is conditioned upon the customer submitting a request for redemption after satisfying the terms and conditions of the offer. "Rebate" does not include: Any discount from the purchase price that is taken at the time of purchase; any discount, cash, credit, or credit towards a future purchase that is automatically provided to a consumer without the need to submit a request for redemption; or any refund that may be given to a consumer in accordance with a company's return, guarantee, adjustment, or warranty policies, or any company's frequent shopper customer reward program.

--- END ---