BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 42.30 RCW to read as follows:

Any communication distributed to the public by a state agency, as defined in RCW 42.56.010, including but not limited to letters, notices, citations, flyers, postcards, and newsletters, must use a minimum of 10 point type and a recommended accessible font, such as Times New Roman, Verdana, Arial, Tahoma, Helvetica, or Calibri fonts. If needed, eight point type is acceptable for tables.

--- END ---