BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall establish a grant program for the purposes of supporting computer science programs through funding for establishing computer science courses and related technology purchases and upgrades. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall establish and publish criteria for the grant program, subject to the provisions of this section, and may accept gifts, grants, or endowments from public or private sources for the grant program.

(b) In order to qualify for a grant under this section, a school district must be located in a county with fewer than 300,000 residents, as determined by the office of financial management.

(c) A school district that receives a grant under this section is not prohibited from receiving a grant in subsequent grant cycles.

(d) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall award grants beginning in the 2024-25 school year.

(2) Beginning in 2025, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, in accordance with RCW 43.01.036, must submit an annual report to the appropriate committees of the legislature with an evaluation of the program established by this section. The report must include program outcomes, including recipients of the grants' usage of the funds.

(3) Funding for the grant program shall be limited to $5,000,000 per biennium.

(4) For the purposes of this section, "school districts" include state-tribal education compact schools subject to chapter 28A.715 RCW.

--- END ---