BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 69.50 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Beginning December 1, 2024, the board must collect data on the following information on cannabis products sold within Washington state:

(a) The amount of products being sold in the following categories: Usable cannabis, cannabis concentrates, and cannabis-infused products;

(b) The average THC concentration in usable cannabis and cannabis concentrates, and the average milligrams of THC per unit in cannabis-infused products; and

(c) The range of THC concentration in usable cannabis and cannabis concentrates.

(2) By November 14, 2025, the board must submit a report to the relevant committees of the legislature on the information collected under subsection (1) of this section.

(3) The board must formulate a recommended approach and implementation plan for modifying the cannabis excise tax under RCW 69.50.535. The board may recommend alternative approaches and plans for the legislature to consider. The proposed modifications must be revenue neutral and propose a higher tax on products with a higher THC concentration relative to other products in the same category for each of the following categories: Usable cannabis, cannabis concentrates, and cannabis-infused products. The board must submit a report to the relevant committees of the legislature by September 18, 2026, on their findings under this subsection.

(4) For the purposes of this section, "product" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.50.535.

(5) This section expires December 31, 2026.

--- END ---