BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.300.650 and 2019 c 333 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, by January 1, 2020, the state school safety center, established in RCW 28A.300.630, in collaboration with the school safety and student well-being advisory committee, established in RCW 28A.300.635, and law enforcement entities interested in providing training to school resource officers, shall identify and make publicly available training materials that are consistent with the requirements in RCW 28A.320.124.

(2)(((a))) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must establish and implement a grant program to fund training for school resource officers ((as described in RCW 28A.320.124)). Eligible grantees include school districts, educational service districts, law enforcement agencies, and law enforcement training organizations. Training under this section may be developed by schools in partnership with local law enforcement and organizations that have expertise in topics such as juvenile brain development; restorative practices or restorative justice; social-emotional learning; civil rights; and student rights, including free speech and search and seizure. This training may be provided by the criminal justice training commission.

(((b)))(3) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must establish and implement a grant program to help fund school resource officers on school campuses. School districts may apply for these grants and must identify how many school resource officers are needed for their district in their grant application. Funding priority must be given to urban and rural school districts.

(4) By December 1st of each year the program ((is))in either subsection (2) or (3) of this section, or both, are funded, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must submit an annual report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature on the program.

(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction may adopt rules to implement this section.

(6) For purposes of this section, "school resource officer" has the same meaning as in RCW 28A.320.124.

--- END ---