BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9.02.110 and 2022 c 65 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The state may not deny or interfere with a pregnant individual's right to choose to have an abortion prior to viability of the fetus, or to protect the pregnant individual's life or health.

(2) A physician, physician assistant, advanced registered nurse practitioner, or other health care provider acting within the provider's scope of practice may terminate and a health care provider may assist a physician, physician assistant, advanced registered nurse practitioner, or other health care provider acting within the provider's scope of practice in terminating a pregnancy as permitted by this section.

(3) If an ultrasound is used prior to any abortion, the physician, physician assistant, advanced registered nurse practitioner, or other health care provider or an agent of a health care provider acting within the provider's scope of practice may offer a pregnant individual the ability to see the ultrasound prior to the termination of the individual's pregnancy.

--- END ---