BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.37.020 and 1977 ex.s. c 355 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

((Every))(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, every vehicle upon a highway within this state at any time from a half hour after sunset to a half hour before sunrise and at any other time when, due to insufficient light or unfavorable atmospheric conditions, persons and vehicles on the highway are not clearly discernible at a distance of ((one thousand))1,000 feet ahead shall display lighted headlights, other lights, and illuminating devices as hereinafter respectively required for different classes of vehicles, subject to exceptions with respect to parked vehicles, and such stop lights, turn signals, and other signaling devices shall be lighted as prescribed for the use of such devices.

(2) Every motor vehicle upon a highway within this state at any time shall display lighted headlights as required in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. RCW 47.04.180 (Twenty-four hour headlight policy) and 1998 c 245 s 94 & 1989 c 195 s 1 are each repealed.

--- END ---