BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that eliminating the sale of fur products in the state of Washington will decrease demand for cruel products; reduce public health risks, including risks to consumers from toxic chemicals used to treat fur; protect consumers from false and misleading advertising and labeling of fur products; promote community awareness of animal welfare; promote environmental awareness of animal welfare; alleviate environmental burdens; and enhance the reputation of the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Fur" means any animal skin or part thereof with hair, fleece, or fur fibers attached, either in its raw or processed state.

(2)(a) "Fur product" means any article of clothing or covering for any part of the body, or any fashion accessory including, but not limited to, handbags, shoes, slippers, hats, earmuffs, scarves, shawls, gloves, jewelry, keychains, toys or trinkets, and home accessories and decor, that is made in whole or in part of fur.

(b) "Fur product" does not include any of the following:

(i) An animal skin or part thereof that is to be converted into leather, which in processing will have the hair, fleece, or fur fiber completely removed;

(ii) Cowhide, deerskin, goatskin, or sheepskin with hair attached thereto; or

(iii) The pelt or skin of an animal that is preserved through taxidermy or for the purpose of taxidermy.

(3) "Nonprofit organization" means any corporation that is organized under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) that is created for charitable, religious, philanthropic, educational, or similar purposes.

(4) "Taxidermy" means the practice of preparing, stuffing, and mounting the skin, in lifelike form, of any deceased fish, reptile, amphibian, bird, or mammal.

(5) "Ultimate consumer" means an individual who buys a fur product for their own use or for the use of another, but not for resale or trade.

(6) "Used fur product" means a fur product that has been worn or used by an ultimate consumer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. (1) It is unlawful to sell, offer for sale, display for sale, trade, or otherwise distribute for monetary or nonmonetary consideration a fur product in the state. For the purposes of this section, the sale of a fur product is deemed to occur in Washington if the seller is located in Washington or the buyer takes physical possession of the fur product in Washington.

(2) The prohibition set forth in subsection (1) of this section does not apply to the following:

(a) A used fur product offered for sale by an individual but excluding a retail transaction; a nonprofit organization; or a second hand store, including a pawn shop;

(b) A fur product:

(i) The fur of which was obtained from an animal through lawful trapping or hunting; and

(ii) When sold in a face-to-face transaction at a place such as a residence, craft fair, or other location used on a temporary or short-term basis, by the person who trapped or hunted the animal, or by an immediate family member of the person who hunted or trapped the animal, where the revenue from the sale of the fur products is not the primary source of income of such person; or

(c) Any activity expressly authorized by federal law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. (1) Every person who violates any provision of this chapter shall forfeit and pay a civil penalty of not more than $1,000.

(2) Each fur product that constitutes a violation of this section must be treated as a separate violation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. This act takes effect January 1, 2025.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. Sections 1 through 4 and 6 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---