BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9.02.110 and 2022 c 65 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The state may not deny or interfere with a pregnant individual's right to choose to have an abortion prior to viability of the fetus, or to protect the pregnant individual's life or health.

(2) A physician, physician assistant, advanced registered nurse practitioner, or other health care provider acting within the provider's scope of practice may terminate and a health care provider may assist a physician, physician assistant, advanced registered nurse practitioner, or other health care provider acting within the provider's scope of practice in terminating a pregnancy as permitted by this section.

(3) A physician assistant, advanced registered nurse practitioner, or any other health care provider that is not a licensed physician must carry a medical malpractice insurance policy providing liability limits of at least $1,000,000 per occurrence or claim prior to terminating a pregnancy as permitted by this section.

--- END ---