BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 48.44.495 and 2010 c 228 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, no contract of any health care service contractor subject to the jurisdiction of the state of Washington that covers any dental services, and no contract or participating provider agreement with a dentist may:

(a) Require, directly or indirectly, that a dentist who is a participating provider provide services to an enrolled participant at a fee set by, or at a fee subject to the approval of, the health care service contractor unless the dental services are covered services, including services that would be reimbursable but for the application of contractual limitations such as benefit maximums, deductibles, coinsurance, waiting periods, or frequency limitations, under the applicable group contract or individual contract; nor

(b) Prohibit, directly or indirectly, a dentist who is a participating provider from offering or providing to an enrolled participant dental services that are not covered services on any terms or conditions acceptable to the dentist and the enrolled participant.

(2) An employee benefit plan or health insurance policy shall provide that payment or reimbursement for a noncontracting provider dentist shall be the same as payment or reimbursement for a contracting provider dentist.

(3) For the purposes of this section, "covered services" means dental services that are reimbursable under the applicable subscriber agreement or would be reimbursable but for the application of contractual limitations such as benefit maximums, deductibles, coinsurance, waiting periods, or frequency limitations.

--- END ---