BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 29A.68 RCW to read as follows:

No candidate seeking federal elective office may be kept off of any Washington state ballot due to an allegation of federal insurrection or rebellion unless that candidate has been convicted under a federal criminal statute for insurrection or rebellion, and that criminal statute for insurrection or rebellion explicitly enables section 3 of the 14th Amendment of the United States Constitution. Any attempt at keeping such a candidate off of the ballot shall be a violation of RCW 29A.84.630.

--- END ---