BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.655 RCW to read as follows:

(1) By September 2027, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall adopt Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander history learning standards as part of the state social studies learning standards and shall identify available curricula and other instructional materials that are aligned to those standards for use by school districts. For purposes of developing the learning standards, Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander history includes, but is not limited to, the history of Americans of East Asian, Southeast Asian, South Asian, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander descent.

(2) The learning standards must include, but need not be limited to, the following topics:

(a) A focus on the history of Asian Americans, Native Hawaiians, and Pacific Islanders in the state, the region, and the United States; and

(b) The contributions of:

(i) Asian Americans, Native Hawaiians, and Pacific Islanders towards advancing civil rights from the 19th century to the present day;

(ii) Individual Asian Americans, Native Hawaiians, and Pacific Islanders in government, the arts, humanities, and sciences; and

(iii) Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander communities to the economic, cultural, social, and political development of the United States.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28A.320 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Beginning in the 2028-29 school year, school districts shall provide instruction in grades K-12 on Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander history when the topic aligns with the social studies learning standards and included in United States history and Washington state history. This instruction must include the topics identified in section 1(2)(b) of this act.

(2) When providing instruction on Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander history, school districts are encouraged to use the curricular resources identified by the office of the superintendent of public instruction under the provisions of section 1 of this act or other existing and appropriate public or private materials, personnel, and resources, provided that they are in accordance with the state learning standards adopted by the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(3) A school district may accept gifts, grants, and donations, including in-kind donations, related to instruction on Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander history.

(4) Beginning in 2029, and annually thereafter, each school district shall attest to the state board of education that the district is offering the program of instruction required under this section, and that the program of instruction is planned, ongoing, and systematic.

--- END ---