BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to
nonresident individuals of vessels thirty feet or longer if an
individual purchasing a vessel purchases and displays a valid use
permit.
(2)(a) An individual claiming exemption from retail sales tax under
this section must display proof of his or her current nonresident
status at the time of purchase.
(b) Acceptable proof of a nonresident individual's status includes
one piece of identification such as a valid driver's license from the
jurisdiction in which the out-of-state residency is claimed or a valid
identification card that has a photograph of the holder and is issued
by the out-of-state jurisdiction. Identification under this subsection
(2)(b) must show the holder's residential address and have as one of
its legal purposes the establishment of residency in that out-of-state
jurisdiction.
(3) Nothing in this section requires the vessel dealer to make tax
exempt retail sales to nonresidents. A dealer may choose to make sales
to nonresidents, collect the sales tax, and remit the amount of sales
tax collected to the state as otherwise provided by law. If the dealer
chooses to make a sale to a nonresident without collecting the sales
tax, the vendor shall, in good faith, examine the proof of
nonresidence, determine whether the proof is acceptable under
subsection (2)(b) of this section, and maintain records for each
nontaxable sale that shows the type of proof accepted, including any
identification numbers where appropriate, and the expiration date, if
any.
(4) A vessel dealer shall issue a use permit to a buyer if the
dealer is satisfied that the buyer is a nonresident. The use permit
shall be in a form and manner required by the department and shall
include an affidavit, signed by the purchaser, declaring that the
vessel will be used in a manner consistent with this section. The fee
for the issuance of a use permit is five hundred dollars for vessels
fifty feet in length or less and eight hundred dollars for vessels
greater than fifty feet in length. Funds collected under this section
and section 2 of this act shall be reported on the dealer's excise tax
return and remitted to the department in accordance with RCW 82.32.045.
The department shall transmit the fees to the state treasurer to be
deposited in the state general fund. The use permit must be displayed
on the vessel and is valid for twelve consecutive months from the date
of issuance. A use permit is not renewable. A purchaser at the time
of purchase must make an irrevocable election to take the exemption
authorized in this section or the exemption in either RCW 82.08.0266 or
82.08.02665. A vessel dealer must maintain a copy of the use permit
for the dealer's records. Vessel dealers must provide copies of use
permits issued by the dealer under this section and section 2 of this
act to the department on a quarterly basis.
(5) A nonresident who claims an exemption under this section and
who uses a vessel in this state after his or her use permit for that
vessel has expired is liable for the tax imposed under RCW 82.08.020 on
the original selling price of the vessel and shall pay the tax directly
to the department. Interest at the rate provided in RCW 82.32.050
applies to amounts due under this subsection, retroactively to the date
the vessel was purchased, and accrues until the full amount of tax due
is paid to the department.
(6) Any vessel dealer who makes sales without collecting the tax to
a person who does not hold valid identification establishing
out-of-state residency, and any dealer who fails to maintain records of
sales to nonresidents as provided in this section, is personally liable
for the amount of tax due.
(7) Chapter 82.32 RCW applies to the administration of the fee
imposed in this section and section 2 of this act.
(8) A vessel dealer that issues use permits under this section and
section 2 of this act must file with the department all returns in an
electronic format as provided or approved by the department. As used
in this subsection, "returns" has the same meaning as "return" in RCW
82.32.050.
(a) Any return required to be filed in an electronic format under
this subsection is not filed until received by the department in an
electronic format provided or approved by the department.
(b) The electronic filing requirement in this subsection ends when
a vessel dealer no longer issues use permits, and the dealer has
electronically filed all of its returns reporting the fees collected
under this section and section 2 of this act.
(c) The department may waive the electronic filing requirement in
this subsection for good cause shown.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of a vessel thirty feet or longer if a nonresident individual:
(a) Purchased the vessel from a vessel dealer in accordance with
section 1 of this act;
(b) Purchased the vessel in the state from a person other than a
vessel dealer, but the nonresident individual purchases and displays a
valid use permit from a vessel dealer under this section within
fourteen days of the date that the vessel is purchased in this state;
or
(c) Acquired the vessel outside the state, but purchases and
displays a valid use permit from a vessel dealer under this section
within fourteen days of the date that the vessel is first brought into
this state.
(2) Any vessel dealer that makes tax exempt sales under section 1
of this act shall issue use permits under this section. A vessel
dealer shall issue a use permit under this section if the dealer is
satisfied that the individual purchasing the permit is a nonresident.
The use permit is valid for twelve consecutive months from the date of
issuance. A use permit is not renewable, and an individual may only
purchase one use permit for a particular vessel. A person who has been
issued a use permit under section 1 of this act for a particular vessel
may not purchase a use permit under this section for the same vessel
after the use permit issued under section 1 of this act expires. All
other requirements and conditions, not inconsistent with the provisions
of this section, relating to use permits in section 1 of this act,
apply to use permits under this section. A person may not claim an
exemption under RCW 82.12.0251(1) within twenty-four months after a use
permit, issued under this section or section 1 of this act, for the
same vessel, has expired.
(3)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, a nonresident
who claims an exemption under this section and who uses a vessel in
this state after his or her use permit for that vessel has expired is
liable for the tax imposed under RCW 82.12.020 based on the value of
the vessel at the time that the vessel was either purchased in this
state under circumstances in which the exemption under section 1 of
this act did not apply or was first brought into this state, as the
case may be. Interest at the rate provided in RCW 82.32.050 applies to
amounts due under this subsection, retroactively to the date that the
vessel was purchased in this state or first brought into the state, and
accrues until the full amount of tax due is paid to the department.
(b) A nonresident individual who is exempt under both this section
and section 1 of this act and who uses a vessel in this state after his
or her use permit for that vessel expires is liable for tax and
interest as provided in section 1(5) of this act.
(4) Any vessel dealer that issues a use permit to an individual who
does not hold valid identification establishing out-of-state residency,
and any dealer that fails to maintain records for each use permit
issued that shows the type of proof accepted, including any
identification numbers where appropriate, and the expiration date, if
any, is personally liable for the amount of tax due.

Sec. 3 RCW 88.02.030 and 2002 c 286 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
Vessel registration is required under this chapter except for the
following:
(1) Military or public vessels of the United States, except
recreational-type public vessels;
(2) Vessels owned by a state or subdivision thereof, used
principally for governmental purposes and clearly identifiable as such;
(3) Vessels either (a) registered or numbered under the laws of a
country other than the United States; or (b) having a valid United
States customs service cruising license issued pursuant to 19 C.F.R.
Sec. 4.94. On or before the sixty-first day of use in the state, any
vessel in the state under this subsection shall obtain an
identification document from the department of licensing, its agents,
or subagents indicating when the vessel first came into the state. At
the time of any issuance of an identification document, a thirty dollar
identification document fee shall be paid by the vessel owner to the
department of licensing for the cost of providing the identification
document by the department of licensing. Five dollars from each such
transaction must be deposited in the derelict vessel removal account
created in RCW 79.100.100. Any moneys remaining from the fee after the
payment of costs and the deposit to the derelict vessel removal account
shall be allocated to counties by the state treasurer for approved
boating safety programs under RCW 88.02.045. The department of
licensing shall adopt rules to implement its duties under this
subsection, including issuing and displaying the identification
document and collecting the thirty dollar fee;
(4) Vessels that have been issued a valid number under federal law
or by an approved issuing authority of the state of principal
operation. However, a vessel that is validly registered in another
state but that is removed to this state for principal use is subject to
registration under this chapter. The issuing authority for this state
shall recognize the validity of the numbers previously issued for a
period of sixty days after arrival in this state;
(5) Vessels owned by a nonresident if the vessel is located upon
the waters of this state exclusively for repairs, alteration, or
reconstruction, or any testing related to the repair, alteration, or
reconstruction conducted in this state if an employee of the repair,
alteration, or construction facility is on board the vessel during any
testing. However, any vessel owned by a nonresident is located upon
the waters of this state exclusively for repairs, alteration,
reconstruction, or testing for a period longer than sixty days, that
the nonresident shall file an affidavit with the department of revenue
verifying the vessel is located upon the waters of this state for
repair, alteration, reconstruction, or testing and shall continue to
file such affidavit every sixty days thereafter, while the vessel is
located upon the waters of this state exclusively for repairs,
alteration, reconstruction, or testing;
(6) Vessels equipped with propulsion machinery of less than ten
horsepower that:
(a) Are owned by the owner of a vessel for which a valid vessel
number has been issued;
(b) Display the number of that numbered vessel followed by the
suffix "1" in the manner prescribed by the department; and
(c) Are used as a tender for direct transportation between that
vessel and the shore and for no other purpose;
(7) Vessels under sixteen feet in overall length which have no
propulsion machinery of any type or which are not used on waters
subject to the jurisdiction of the United States or on the high seas
beyond the territorial seas for vessels owned in the United States and
are powered by propulsion machinery of ten or less horsepower;
(8) Vessels with no propulsion machinery of any type for which the
primary mode of propulsion is human power;
(9) Vessels primarily engaged in commerce which have or are
required to have a valid marine document as a vessel of the United
States. Commercial vessels which the department of revenue determines
have the external appearance of vessels which would otherwise be
required to register under this chapter, must display decals issued
annually by the department of revenue that indicate the vessel's exempt
status;
(10) Vessels primarily engaged in commerce which are owned by a
resident of a country other than the United States; ((and))
(11) ((On and after January 1, 1998,)) Vessels owned by a
nonresident individual brought into the state for his or her use or
enjoyment while temporarily within the state for not more than six
months in any continuous twelve-month period, unless the vessel is used
in conducting a nontransitory business activity within the state.
However, the vessel must have been issued a valid number under federal
law or by an approved issuing authority of the state of principal
operation. On or before the sixty-first day of use in the state, any
vessel temporarily in the state under this subsection shall obtain an
identification document from the department of licensing, its agents,
or subagents indicating when the vessel first came into the state. An
identification document shall be valid for a period of two months. At
the time of any issuance of an identification document, a twenty-five
dollar identification document fee shall be paid by the vessel owner to
the department of licensing for the cost of providing the
identification document by the department of licensing. Any moneys
remaining from the fee after payment of costs shall be allocated to
counties by the state treasurer for approved boating safety programs
under RCW 88.02.045. The department of licensing shall adopt rules to
implement its duties under this subsection, including issuing and
displaying the identification document and collecting the twenty-five
dollar fee; and
(12) Vessels used in this state by a nonresident individual
possessing a valid use permit issued under section 1 or 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2007.

--- END ---