BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that there is a
disproportionately high rate of HIV and AIDS among incarcerated
persons. Approximately twenty-five percent of the HIV-positive
population of the United States passes through correctional facilities
each year. The bureau of justice statistics has determined that the
rate of confirmed AIDS cases is three times higher among incarcerated
offenders than in the general population.
(2) Studies suggest that other sexually transmitted infections,
such as gonorrhea, chlamydia, syphilis, genital herpes, viral
hepatitis, and human papillomavirus, also exist at a higher rate among
incarcerated persons than in the general population. Researchers
estimate that the rate of hepatitis C infection among incarcerated
persons is twenty times higher than that of the general population.
(3) The legislature intends to study and implement a uniform system
of sexually transmitted infections testing, reporting, and treatment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The secretary of the department of corrections or the
secretary's designee, in consultation with the secretary of the
department of health or the secretary's designee, shall develop and
implement a five-year strategic plan to reduce the prevalence and
spread of sexually transmitted infections in correctional facilities
operated by the department of corrections.
(2) The strategic plan shall include the following:
(a) A plan for improving prevention education, information, and
training offered to incarcerated offenders and correctional facility
staff, including information and training on sexual violence and the
spread of sexually transmitted infections, and comprehensive sexuality
education;
(b) A plan for reducing the incidence of sexual violence among
incarcerated offenders and correctional facility staff;
(c) A plan for expanding access to counseling and supportive
services related to sexually transmitted infections in correctional
facilities;
(d) A plan for testing incarcerated offenders for sexually
transmitted infections during intake, during regular health exams, and
prior to release, that:
(i) Is conducted in accordance with guidelines established by the
centers for disease control;
(ii) Includes pretest counseling;
(iii) Requires that incarcerated offenders are notified of their
option to decline testing at any time;
(iv) Requires that incarcerated offenders are confidentially
notified of their test results in a timely manner; and
(v) Ensures that incarcerated offenders testing positive for
sexually transmitted infections receive posttest counseling, care,
treatment, and supportive services;
(e) A plan for ensuring that correctional facilities have the
necessary medicine and equipment to treat and monitor sexually
transmitted infections, and for ensuring that incarcerated offenders
living with or testing positive for sexually transmitted infections
receive and have access to care and treatment services;
(f) A plan for developing and implementing culturally appropriate,
sensitive, and specific strategies to reduce the spread of sexually
transmitted infections among demographic groups heavily impacted by
sexually transmitted infections;
(g) A plan for establishing and strengthening linkages to local
communities and health facilities that provide counseling, testing,
care, and treatment services, and that may receive offenders recently
released from incarceration who are living with sexually transmitted
infections;
(h) Any other plans developed by the department of corrections for
reducing the spread of sexually transmitted infections or improving the
quality of health care in correctional facilities;
(i) A monitoring system that establishes performance goals related
to reducing the prevalence and spread of sexually transmitted
infections in correctional facilities and which, where feasible,
expresses such goals in quantifiable form;
(j) Performance indicators that measure or assess the achievement
of the performance goals described in (i) of this subsection;
(k) A plan for establishing a uniform collection system to assist
in developing and targeting counseling and treatment programs for
incarcerated offenders; and
(l) A detailed estimate of the funding necessary to implement the
plan for all five years, including the amount of funds required by
community organizations to implement the parts of the strategy that
they are involved in.
(3) The department of corrections and the department of health may
consult with individuals from the public and private sector in carrying
out the duties under this section.
(4) The secretary of the department of corrections shall report the
department's five-year strategic plan and recommendations to the
governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature, annually on
November 1st, regarding the implementation and effectiveness of the
strategy described in this section. The annual report shall include an
evaluation of the implementation of the strategic plan using the
monitoring system and performance indicators provided for in subsection
(2)(i) and (j) of this section.
(5) This section expires December 1, 2011.

--- END ---