BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Following consultation with the department
of information services regarding scope of work, the public disclosure
commission shall contract with a private contractor for a feasibility
study to determine the cost of designing, developing, implementing, and
maintaining:
(1) Software or other applications to accommodate electronic filing
by lobbyists reporting under RCW 42.17.150 and 42.17.170, by lobbyist
employers reporting under RCW 42.17.180 and by public agencies
reporting under RCW 42.17.190;
(2) A database and query system that results in data that is
readily available to the public for review and analysis; and
(3) Keeping such reporting database and query systems compatible
with current computer architecture, technology and operating systems,
including but not limited to Windows and Apple operating systems.
The study may include other elements, as determined by the
commission, that promote public access to information about lobbying
activity reportable under chapter 42.17 RCW. The study shall be
provided to the legislature by January 2008.

--- END ---