BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.34.020 and 2006 c 339 s 109 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Abandonment" means action or inaction by a person or entity
with a duty of care for a vulnerable adult that leaves the vulnerable
person without the means or ability to obtain necessary food, clothing,
shelter, or health care.
(2) "Abuse" means the willful action or inaction that inflicts
injury, unreasonable confinement, intimidation, or punishment on a
vulnerable adult. In instances of abuse of a vulnerable adult who is
unable to express or demonstrate physical harm, pain, or mental
anguish, the abuse is presumed to cause physical harm, pain, or mental
anguish. Abuse includes sexual abuse, mental abuse, physical abuse,
and exploitation of a vulnerable adult, which have the following
meanings:
(a) "Sexual abuse" means any form of nonconsensual sexual contact,
including but not limited to unwanted or inappropriate touching, rape,
sodomy, sexual coercion, sexually explicit photographing, and sexual
harassment. Sexual abuse includes any sexual contact between a staff
person, who is not also a resident or client, of a facility or a staff
person of a program authorized under chapter 71A.12 RCW, and a
vulnerable adult living in that facility or receiving service from a
program authorized under chapter 71A.12 RCW, whether or not it is
consensual.
(b) "Physical abuse" means the willful action of inflicting bodily
injury or physical mistreatment. Physical abuse includes, but is not
limited to, striking with or without an object, slapping, pinching,
choking, kicking, shoving, prodding, or the use of chemical restraints
or physical restraints unless the restraints are consistent with
licensing requirements, and includes restraints that are otherwise
being used inappropriately.
(c) "Mental abuse" means any willful action or inaction of mental
or verbal abuse. Mental abuse includes, but is not limited to,
coercion, harassment, inappropriately isolating a vulnerable adult from
family, friends, or regular activity, and verbal assault that includes
ridiculing, intimidating, yelling, or swearing.
(d) "Exploitation" means an act of forcing, compelling, or exerting
undue influence over a vulnerable adult causing the vulnerable adult to
act in a way that is inconsistent with relevant past behavior, or
causing the vulnerable adult to perform services for the benefit of
another.
(3) "Consent" means express written consent granted after the
vulnerable adult or his or her legal representative has been fully
informed of the nature of the services to be offered and that the
receipt of services is voluntary.
(4) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(5) "Facility" means a residence licensed or required to be
licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW, boarding homes; chapter 18.51 RCW,
nursing homes; chapter 70.128 RCW, adult family homes; chapter 72.36
RCW, soldiers' homes; or chapter 71A.20 RCW, residential habilitation
centers; or any other facility licensed by the department.
(6) "Financial exploitation" means the illegal or improper use of
the property, income, resources, or trust funds of the vulnerable adult
by any person for any person's profit or advantage other than for the
vulnerable adult's profit or advantage.
(7) "Individual provider" means a person under contract with the
department to provide services in the home under chapter 74.09 or
74.39A RCW.
(8) "Interested person" means a person who is interested in the
welfare of the vulnerable adult and who has a good faith belief that
the court's intervention is necessary to protect the vulnerable adult.
(9) "Mandated reporter" is an employee of the department; law
enforcement officer; social worker; professional school personnel;
individual provider; an employee of a facility; an operator of a
facility; an employee of a social service, welfare, mental health,
adult day health, adult day care, home health, home care, or hospice
agency; county coroner or medical examiner; Christian Science
practitioner; or health care provider subject to chapter 18.130 RCW.
(((9))) (10) "Neglect" means (a) a pattern of conduct or inaction
by a person or entity with a duty of care that fails to provide the
goods and services that maintain physical or mental health of a
vulnerable adult, or that fails to avoid or prevent physical or mental
harm or pain to a vulnerable adult; or (b) an act or omission that
demonstrates a serious disregard of consequences of such a magnitude as
to constitute a clear and present danger to the vulnerable adult's
health, welfare, or safety, including but not limited to conduct
prohibited under RCW 9A.42.100.
(((10))) (11) "Permissive reporter" means any person, including,
but not limited to, an employee of a financial institution, attorney,
or volunteer in a facility or program providing services for vulnerable
adults.
(((11))) (12) "Protective services" means any services provided by
the department to a vulnerable adult with the consent of the vulnerable
adult, or the legal representative of the vulnerable adult, who has
been abandoned, abused, financially exploited, neglected, or in a state
of self-neglect. These services may include, but are not limited to
case management, social casework, home care, placement, arranging for
medical evaluations, psychological evaluations, day care, or referral
for legal assistance.
(((12))) (13) "Self-neglect" means the failure of a vulnerable
adult, not living in a facility, to provide for himself or herself the
goods and services necessary for the vulnerable adult's physical or
mental health, and the absence of which impairs or threatens the
vulnerable adult's well-being. This definition may include a
vulnerable adult who is receiving services through home health,
hospice, or a home care agency, or an individual provider when the
neglect is not a result of inaction by that agency or individual
provider.
(((13))) (14) "Vulnerable adult" includes a person:
(a) Sixty years of age or older who has the functional, mental, or
physical inability to care for himself or herself; or
(b) Found incapacitated under chapter 11.88 RCW; or
(c) Who has a developmental disability as defined under RCW
71A.10.020; or
(d) Admitted to any facility; or
(e) Receiving services from home health, hospice, or home care
agencies licensed or required to be licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW;
or
(f) Receiving services from an individual provider.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.34.110 and 1999 c 176 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
An action known as a petition for an order for protection of a
vulnerable adult in cases of abandonment, abuse, financial
exploitation, or neglect is created.
(1) A vulnerable adult, or interested person on behalf of the
vulnerable adult, may seek relief from abandonment, abuse, financial
exploitation, or neglect, or the threat thereof, by filing a petition
for an order for protection in superior court.
(2) A petition shall allege that the petitioner, or person on whose
behalf the petition is brought, is a vulnerable adult and that the
petitioner, or person on whose behalf the petition is brought, has been
abandoned, abused, financially exploited, or neglected, or is
threatened with abandonment, abuse, financial exploitation, or neglect
by respondent.
(3) A petition shall be accompanied by affidavit made under oath,
or a declaration signed under penalty of perjury, stating the specific
facts and circumstances which demonstrate the need for the relief
sought. If the petition is filed by an interested person, the
affidavit or declaration must also include a statement of why the
petitioner qualifies as an interested person.
(4) A petition for an order may be made whether or not there is a
pending lawsuit, complaint, petition, or other action ((between the
parties)) pending that relates to the issues presented in the petition
for an order for protection.
(5) Within ninety days of receipt of the master copy from the
administrative office of the courts, all court clerk's offices shall
make available the standardized forms and instructions required by
section 3 of this act.
(6) Any assistance or information provided by any person,
including, but not limited to, court clerks, employees of the
department, and other court facilitators, to another to complete the
forms provided by the court in subsection (5) of this section does not
constitute the practice of law.
(7) A petitioner is not required to post bond to obtain relief in
any proceeding under this section.
(((6))) (8) An action under this section shall be filed in the
county where the ((petitioner)) vulnerable adult resides; except that
if the ((petitioner)) vulnerable adult has left or been removed from
the residence as a result of abandonment, abuse, financial
exploitation, or neglect, or in order to avoid abandonment, abuse,
financial exploitation, or neglect, the petitioner may bring an action
in the county of either the vulnerable adult's previous or new
residence.
(((7) The filing fee for the petition may be waived at the
discretion of the court.))
(9) No filing fee may be charged to the petitioner for proceedings
under this section. Standard forms and written instructions shall be
provided free of charge.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 74.34 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The administrative office of the courts shall develop and
prepare standard petition, temporary order for protection, and
permanent order for protection forms, a standard notice form to provide
notice to the vulnerable adult if the vulnerable adult is not the
petitioner, instructions, and a court staff handbook on the protection
order process. The standard petition and order for protection forms
must be used after October 1, 2007, for all petitions filed and orders
issued under this chapter. The administrative office of the courts, in
preparing the instructions, forms, notice, and handbook, may consult
with attorneys from the elder law section of the Washington state bar
association, judges, the department, the Washington protection and
advocacy system, and law enforcement personnel.
(a) The instructions shall be designed to assist petitioners in
completing the petition, and shall include a sample of the standard
petition and order for protection forms.
(b) The order for protection form shall include, in a conspicuous
location, notice of criminal penalties resulting from violation of the
order.
(c) The standard notice form shall be designed to explain to the
vulnerable adult in clear, plain language the purpose and nature of the
petition and that the vulnerable adult has the right to participate in
the hearing and to either support or object to the petition.
(2) The administrative office of the courts shall distribute a
master copy of the standard forms, instructions, and court staff
handbook to all court clerks and shall distribute a master copy of the
standard forms to all superior, district, and municipal courts.
(3) The administrative office of the courts shall determine the
significant non-English-speaking or limited-English-speaking
populations in the state. The administrator shall then arrange for
translation of the instructions required by this section, which shall
contain a sample of the standard forms, into the languages spoken by
those significant non-English-speaking populations, and shall
distribute a master copy of the translated instructions to all court
clerks by December 31, 2007.
(4) The administrative office of the courts shall update the
instructions, standard forms, and court staff handbook when changes in
the law make an update necessary. The updates may be made in
consultation with the persons and entities specified in subsection (1)
of this section.
(5) For purposes of this section, "court clerks" means court
administrators in courts of limited jurisdiction and elected court
clerks.

Sec. 4 RCW 74.34.120 and 1986 c 187 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The court shall order a hearing on a petition under RCW
74.34.110 not later than fourteen days from the date of filing the
petition.
(2) Personal service shall be made upon the respondent not less
than ((five)) six court days before the hearing. When good faith
attempts to personally serve the respondent have been unsuccessful, the
court shall permit service by mail or by publication.
(3) When a petition under RCW 74.34.110 is filed by someone other
than the vulnerable adult, notice of the petition and hearing must be
personally served upon the vulnerable adult not less than six court
days before the hearing. In addition to copies of all pleadings filed
by the petitioner, the petitioner shall provide a written notice to the
vulnerable adult using the standard notice form developed under section
3 of this act. When good faith attempts to personally serve the
vulnerable adult have been unsuccessful, the court shall permit service
by mail, or by publication if the court determines that personal
service and service by mail cannot be obtained.
(4) If timely service under subsections (2) and (3) of this section
cannot be made, the court ((may set a new hearing date)) shall continue
the hearing date until the substitute service approved by the court has
been satisfied. The court may continue any temporary order for
protection until the hearing is held. A petitioner may also move for
temporary relief under chapter 7.40 RCW.

Sec. 5 RCW 74.34.130 and 2000 c 119 s 27 and 2000 c 51 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The court may order relief as it deems necessary for the protection
of the ((petitioner)) vulnerable adult, including, but not limited to
the following:
(1) Restraining respondent from committing acts of abandonment,
abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation against the vulnerable adult;
(2) Excluding the respondent from ((petitioner's)) the vulnerable
adult's residence for a specified period or until further order of the
court;
(3) Prohibiting contact with the vulnerable adult by respondent for
a specified period or until further order of the court;
(4) Prohibiting the respondent from knowingly coming within, or
knowingly remaining within, a specified distance from a specified
location;
(5) Requiring an accounting by respondent of the disposition of
((petitioner's)) the vulnerable adult's income or other resources;
(6) Restraining the transfer of the respondent's and/or vulnerable
adult's property for a specified period not exceeding ninety days; and
(7) Requiring the respondent to pay ((the)) a filing fee and court
costs, including service fees, and to reimburse the petitioner for
costs incurred in bringing the action, including a reasonable
attorney's fee.
Any relief granted by an order for protection, other than a
judgment for costs, shall be for a fixed period not to exceed ((one
year)) five years. The clerk of the court shall enter any order for
protection issued under this section into the judicial information
system.

Sec. 6 RCW 74.34.145 and 2000 c 119 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An order for protection of a vulnerable adult issued under this
chapter which restrains the respondent or another person from
committing acts of abuse, prohibits contact with the ((petitioner))
vulnerable adult, excludes the person from any specified location, or
prohibits the person from coming within a specified distance from a
location, shall prominently bear on the front page of the order the
legend: VIOLATION OF THIS ORDER WITH ACTUAL NOTICE OF ITS TERMS IS A
CRIMINAL OFFENSE UNDER CHAPTER 26.50 RCW AND WILL SUBJECT A VIOLATOR TO
ARREST.
(2) Whenever an order for protection of a vulnerable adult is
issued under this chapter, and the respondent or person to be
restrained knows of the order, a violation of a provision restraining
the person from committing acts of abuse, prohibiting contact with the
((petitioner)) vulnerable adult, excluding the person from any
specified location, or prohibiting the person from coming within a
specified distance of a location, shall be punishable under RCW
26.50.110, regardless of whether the person is a family or household
member as defined in RCW 26.50.010.

Sec. 7 RCW 74.34.150 and 1986 c 187 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department of social and health services, in its discretion,
may seek relief under RCW 74.34.110 through 74.34.140 on behalf of and
with the consent of any vulnerable adult. When the department has
reason to believe a vulnerable adult lacks the ability or capacity to
consent, the department, in its discretion, may seek relief under RCW
74.34.110 through 74.34.140 on behalf of the vulnerable adult. Neither
the department of social and health services nor the state of
Washington shall be liable for ((failure)) seeking or failing to seek
relief on behalf of any persons under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 74.34 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When a petition for protection under RCW 74.34.110 is filed by
someone other than the vulnerable adult or the vulnerable adult's
guardian, and the vulnerable adult for whom protection is sought
advises the court at the hearing that he or she does not want all or
part of the protection sought in the petition, then the court may
dismiss the petition or the provisions that the vulnerable adult
objects to and any protection order issued under RCW 74.34.120 or
74.34.130, or the court may take additional testimony or evidence, or
order additional hearings to determine whether the vulnerable adult is
unable, due to incapacity, undue influence, or other factors found by
the court, to protect his or her person or estate in connection with
the issues raised in the petition or order.
(2) If the court issues a protection order over the objection of
the vulnerable adult, and is not able to make an adequate determination
regarding whether the vulnerable adult is unable, due to incapacity,
undue influence, or other factors found by the court, to protect his or
her person or estate in connection with the issues raised in the
petition or order, based on the evidence and testimony offered at the
hearing, then the court shall schedule a separate evidentiary hearing
on this issue and on any other issue the court may order. The hearing
shall be held within fourteen days of entry of the order. Notice of
the time and place of the evidentiary hearing shall be personally
served upon the vulnerable adult and the respondent not less than six
court days before the hearing. When good faith attempts to personally
serve the vulnerable adult and the respondent have been unsuccessful,
the court shall permit service by mail, or by publication if the court
determines that personal service and service by mail cannot be
obtained. If timely service cannot be made, the court may set a new
hearing date. A hearing under this subsection is not necessary if the
vulnerable adult has been determined to be incapacitated under the
guardianship laws, chapter 11.88 RCW. If a hearing is scheduled under
this subsection, the protection order shall remain in effect pending
the court's decision at the subsequent hearing.
(3) At the hearing scheduled by the court, the court shall give the
vulnerable adult, the respondent, the petitioner, and in the court's
discretion other interested persons, the opportunity to testify and
submit relevant evidence.
(4) If the court determines that the vulnerable adult is capable of
protecting his or her person or estate in connection with the issues
raised in the petition, and the individual continues to object to the
protection order, the court shall dismiss the order or may modify the
order if agreed to by the vulnerable adult, or the court may enter any
other orders as are proper or necessary in the court's discretion. If
the court determines that the vulnerable adult is not capable of
protecting his or her person or estate in connection with the issues
raised in the petition or order, and that the individual continues to
need protection, the court shall order relief consistent with RCW
74.34.130 as it deems necessary for the protection of the vulnerable
adult. In the entry of any order that is inconsistent with the
expressed wishes of the vulnerable adult, the court's order shall be
governed by the legislative findings contained in RCW 74.34.005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 74.34 RCW
to read as follows:
Any vulnerable adult who has not been adjudicated incapacitated
under chapter 11.88 RCW, or the vulnerable adult's guardian, at any
time subsequent to entry of a permanent protection order under this
chapter, may apply to the court for an order to modify or vacate the
order. In a hearing on an application to dismiss or modify the
protection order, the court shall grant such relief consistent with RCW
74.34.110 as it deems necessary for the protection of the vulnerable
adult, including dismissal or modification of the protection order.

Sec. 10 RCW 74.34.210 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 18 s 86 are each
amended to read as follows:
A petition for an order for protection ((or)) may be brought by the
vulnerable adult, the vulnerable adult's guardian or legal fiduciary,
the department, or any interested person as defined in RCW 74.34.020.
An action for damages under this chapter may be brought by the
((plaintiff)) vulnerable adult, or where necessary, by his or her
family members and/or guardian or legal fiduciary((, or as otherwise
provided under this chapter)). The death of the ((plaintiff))
vulnerable adult shall not deprive the court of jurisdiction over a
petition or claim brought under this chapter. Upon petition, after the
death of the vulnerable ((person)) adult, the right to initiate or
maintain the action shall be transferred to the executor or
administrator of the deceased, for recovery of all damages for the
benefit of the ((surviving spouse, child or children, or other heirs))
deceased person's beneficiaries set forth in chapter 4.20 RCW or if
there are no beneficiaries, then for recovery of all economic losses
sustained by the deceased person's estate.

--- END ---