BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Federal law requires the states to
periodically review and update their child support guidelines.
Accurate and consistent reporting of the terms of child support orders
entered by the courts or administrative agencies in Washington state is
necessary in order to accomplish a review of the child support
guidelines. In addition, a process for review of the guidelines should
be established to ensure the integrity of any reviews undertaken to
comply with federal law.

Sec. 2 RCW 26.09.173 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 2 s 23 are each amended
to read as follows:
The party seeking the establishment or modification of a child
support order shall file with the clerk of the court the child support
order summary report. The summary report shall be on the form
developed by the administrator for the courts pursuant to RCW
26.18.210. The party must complete the form and file the form with the
court order. The clerk of the court must forward the form to the
((administrator for the courts)) division of child support on at least
a monthly basis.

Sec. 3 RCW 26.10.195 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 2 s 24 are each amended
to read as follows:
The party seeking the establishment or modification of a child
support order shall file with the clerk of the court the child support
order summary report. The summary report shall be on the form
developed by the administrator for the courts pursuant to RCW
26.18.210. The party must complete the form and file the form with the
court order. The clerk of the court must forward the form to the
((administrator for the courts)) division of child support on at least
a monthly basis.

Sec. 4 RCW 26.18.210 and 2005 c 282 s 33 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The administrative office of the courts shall develop a child
support order summary report form to provide for the reporting of
summary information in every case in which a child support order is
entered or modified either judicially or administratively. ((The
administrative office of the courts shall attempt to the greatest
extent possible to make the form simple and understandable by the
parties. The form shall indicate the following:
(a) The county in which the order was entered and the cause number;
(b) Whether it was a judicial or administrative order;
(c) Whether the order is an original order or from a modification;
(d) The number of children of the parties and the children's ages;
(e) The combined monthly net income of parties;
(f) The monthly net income of the father as determined by the
court;
(g) The monthly net income of the mother as determined by the
court;
(h) The basic child support obligation for each child as determined
from the economic table;
(i) Whether or not the court deviated from the child support for
each child;
(j) The reason or reasons stated by the court for the deviation;
(k) The amount of child support after the deviation;
(l) Any amount awarded for day care;
(m) Any other extraordinary amounts in the order;
(n) Any amount ordered for postsecondary education;
(o) The total amount of support ordered;
(p) In the case of a modification, the amount of support in the
previous order;
(q) If the change in support was in excess of thirty percent,
whether the change was phased in;
(r) The amount of the transfer payment ordered;
(s) Which parent was ordered to make the transfer payment; and
(t) The date of the entry of the order.
(2) The administrative office of the courts shall make the form
available to the parties.)) The child support order summary report must
be included at the top of the first page of the Washington state child
support worksheets, but must not be considered part of the worksheets.
(2) The child support order summary report form must include all
data the department of social and health services division of child
support has determined necessary, in order to perform the required
quadrennial review of the Washington state child support guidelines
under RCW 26.19.025. The division of child support must store and
maintain all of the order summary report information and prepare a
report at least every four years. On a monthly basis, the clerk of the
court must forward all child support worksheets that have been filed
with the court to the division of child support.

Sec. 5 RCW 26.19.025 and 1991 c 367 s 26 are each amended to read
as follows:
((The legislature shall)) (1) Beginning in 2011 and every four
years thereafter, the division of child support shall convene a work
group to review the child support ((schedule every four years to))
guidelines and the child support review report prepared under section
6 of this act and determine if the application of the child support
((schedule)) guidelines results in appropriate support orders.
Membership of the work group shall be determined as provided in this
subsection.
(a) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from each
of the two largest caucuses of the senate;
(b) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one
member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of
representatives;
(c) The governor, in consultation with the division of child
support, shall appoint the following members:
(i) The director of the division of child support;
(ii) A professor of law specializing in family law;
(iii) A representative from the Washington state bar association's
family law executive committee;
(iv) An economist;
(v) A representative of the tribal community;
(vi) Two representatives from the superior court judges
association, including a superior court judge and a court commissioner
who is familiar with child support issues;
(vii) A representative from the administrative office of the
courts;
(viii) A prosecutor appointed by the Washington association of
prosecuting attorneys;
(ix) A representative from legal services;
(x) Three noncustodial parents, each of whom may be a
representative of an advocacy group, an attorney, or an individual,
with at least one representing the interests of low-income,
noncustodial parents;
(xi) Three custodial parents, each of whom may be a representative
of an advocacy group, an attorney, or an individual, with at least one
representing the interests of low-income, custodial parents; and
(xii) An administrative law judge appointed by the office of
administrative hearings.
(2) Appointments to the work group shall be made by December 1,
2010, and every four years thereafter. The governor shall appoint the
chair from among the work group membership.
(3) The division of child support shall provide staff support to
the work group, and shall carefully consider all input received from
interested organizations and individuals during the review process.
(4) The work group may form an executive committee, create
subcommittees, designate alternative representatives, and define other
procedures, as needed, for operation of the work group.
(5) Legislative members of the work group shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses under RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members, except
those representing an employee or organization, are entitled to be
reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.
(6) By October 1, 2011, and every four years thereafter, the work
group shall report its findings and recommendations to the legislature,
including recommendations for legislative action, if necessary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 26.19 RCW
to read as follows:
By July 1, 2010, the joint legislative audit and review committee
shall:
(1) Review and analyze data collected from the order summary
report, the recommendations of the child support work group in section
7 of this act, the current child support guidelines, and other relevant
research and data regarding the cost of child rearing, as well as
research and data on the application of, and deviations from, the child
support guidelines.
(2) Prepare a report on the application of the current child
support guidelines and the recommendations of the work group.
This section expires July 1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) By August 1, 2007, the division of child
support shall convene a work group to examine the current laws,
administrative rules, and practices regarding child support, with
members as provided in this subsection. The objective of the work
group shall be to continue the work of the 2005 child support
guidelines work group, and produce findings and recommendations to the
legislature, including recommendations for legislative action, by
December 30, 2008.
(a) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one
member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of
representatives;
(b) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from each
of the two largest caucuses in the senate;
(c) The governor, in consultation with the division of child
support, shall appoint the following members:
(i) The director of the division of child support;
(ii) A professor of law specializing in family law;
(iii) A representative from the Washington state bar association's
family law executive committee;
(iv) An economist;
(v) A representative of the tribal community;
(vi) Two representatives from the superior court judges
association, including a superior court judge and a court commissioner
who is familiar with child support issues;
(vii) A representative from the administrative office of the
courts;
(viii) A prosecutor appointed by the Washington association of
prosecuting attorneys;
(ix) A representative from legal services;
(x) Three noncustodial parents, each of whom may be a
representative of an advocacy group, an attorney, or an individual,
with at least one representing the interests of low-income,
noncustodial parents;
(xi) Three custodial parents, each of whom may be a representative
of an advocacy group, an attorney, or an individual, with at least one
representing the interests of low-income, custodial parents;
(xii) An administrative law judge appointed by the office of
administrative hearings.
(2) The director of the division of child support shall serve as
chair of the work group.
(3) The division of child support shall provide staff support to
the work group.
(4) The work group shall review and make recommendations to the
legislature and the governor regarding the child support guidelines in
Washington state. In preparing the recommendations, the work group
shall, at a minimum, review the following issues:
(a) How the support schedule and guidelines shall treat children
from other relationships, including whether the whole family formula
should be applied presumptively;
(b) Whether the economic table for calculating child support should
include combined income greater than five thousand dollars;
(c) Whether the economic table should start at one hundred twenty-five percent of the federal poverty guidelines, and move upward in one
hundred dollar increments;
(d) Whether the economic table should distinguish between children
under twelve years of age and over twelve years of age;
(e) Whether child care costs and ordinary medical costs should be
included in the economic table, or treated separately;
(f) Whether the estimated cost of child rearing, as reflected in
the economic table, should be based on the Rothbarth estimate, the
Engle estimator, or some other basis for calculating the cost of child
rearing;
(g) Whether the self-support reserve should be tied to the federal
poverty level;
(h) How to treat imputation of income for purposes of calculating
the child support obligation, including whether minimum wage should be
imputed in the absence of adequate information regarding income;
(i) How extraordinary medical expenses should be addressed, either
through the basic child support obligation or independently;
(j) Whether the amount of the presumptive minimum order should be
adjusted;
(k) Whether gross or net income should be used for purposes of
calculating the child support obligation;
(l) How to treat overtime income or income from a second job for
purposes of calculating the child support obligation;
(m) Whether the noncustodial parent's current child support
obligation should be limited to forty-five percent of net income; and
(n) Whether the residential schedule should affect the amount of
the child support obligation.
(5) Legislative members of the work group shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses under RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members, except
those representing an employee or organization, are entitled to be
reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.
(6) This section expires June 30, 2009.

--- END ---