BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 13.40 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that parents have a fundamental interest
in knowing if their child has been taken into police custody for
questioning and where their child is being held.
(2) When a law enforcement officer takes a juvenile into custody,
a reasonable attempt must be made to notify a parent, guardian, or
custodian that the juvenile is in custody and where the juvenile is
being held.

--- END ---