BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the conditions and limitations provided in this
section, the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to the sale of
the following tangible personal property: (a) Clothing items; (b)
computers; (c) school art supply items; (d) school computer supply
items; (e) school instructional material items; and (f) school supply
items.
(2)(a) A clothing item is exempt under this section if the sales
price of the item is less than one hundred fifty dollars.
(b) A computer is exempt under this section if the sales price of
the item is less than two thousand dollars.
(c) A school art supply item, school instructional material item,
or school supply item, is exempt under this section if the sales price
of the item is less than one hundred fifty dollars.
(d) A school computer supply item is exempt under this section if
the sales price of the item is less than two thousand dollars.
(3) The exemption authorized in this section only applies to
purchases made on the second adjacent Saturday and Sunday of August of
each year.
(4) Rules adopted by the department for the administration of this
section must be substantially consistent with the streamlined sales and
use tax agreement, as that term is used in chapter 82.58 RCW.
(5) The definitions in this subsection apply for the purposes of
this section.
(a) "Clothing item" means human wearing apparel suitable for
general use.
(i) "Clothing item" includes, but is not limited to, the following:
Aprons, household and shop; athletic supporters; baby receiving
blankets; bathing suits and caps; beach capes and coats; belts and
suspenders; boots; coats and jackets; costumes; diapers, children and
adult, including disposable diapers; ear muffs; footlets; formal wear;
garters and garter belts; girdles; gloves and mittens for general use;
hats and caps; hosiery; insoles for shoes; lab coats; neckties;
overshoes; pantyhose; rainwear; rubber pants; sandals; scarves; shoes
and shoe laces; slippers; sneakers; socks and stockings; steel toed
shoes; underwear; uniforms, athletic and nonathletic; and wedding
apparel.
(ii) "Clothing item" does not include: Belt buckles sold
separately; costume masks sold separately; patches and emblems sold
separately; sewing equipment and supplies including, but not limited
to, knitting needles, patterns, pins, scissors, sewing machines, sewing
needles, tape measures, and thimbles; and sewing materials that become
part of "clothing" including, but not limited to, buttons, fabric,
lace, thread, yarn, and zippers.
(b) "Computer" means an electronic device that accepts information
in digital or similar form and manipulates it for a result based on a
sequence of instructions.
(c) "School art supply item" means clay and glazes; paints;
acrylic, tempora, and oil; paintbrushes for artwork; sketch and drawing
pads; or watercolors.
(d) "School computer supply item" means computer storage media;
handheld electronic schedulers, except devices that are cellular
phones; personal digital assistants, except devices that are cellular
phones; computer printers; or printer supplies for computer printers
such as printer paper and printer ink.
(e) "School instructional material item" means reference books;
reference maps and globes; textbooks; or workbooks.
(f) "School supply item" means binders; book bags; calculators;
cellophane tape; blackboard chalk; compasses; composition books;
crayons; erasers; folders, expandable, pocket, plastic, and manila;
glue, paste, and paste sticks; highlighters; index cards; index card
boxes; legal pads; lunch boxes; markers; notebooks; paper; loose leaf
ruled notebook paper, copy paper, graph paper, tracing paper, manila
paper, colored paper, poster board, and construction paper; pencil
boxes and other school supply boxes; pencil sharpeners; pencils; pens;
protractors; rulers; scissors; or writing tablets.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply to the use of the
following tangible personal property: (a) Clothing items not used
primarily for conducting business; (b) computers not used primarily for
conducting business; (c) school art supply items not used primarily for
conducting business; (d) school computer supply items not used
primarily for conducting business; (e) school instructional material
items not used primarily for conducting business; and (f) school supply
items not used primarily for conducting business.
(2) The definitions, conditions, and limitations in section 1 of
this act apply to this section.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "business" has the meaning
provided in RCW 82.04.140 and also includes activities engaged in by a
common school, school district, or educational service district.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.12.040 and 2005 c 514 s 109 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every person who maintains in this state a place of business or
a stock of goods, or engages in business activities within this state,
shall obtain from the department a certificate of registration, and
shall, at the time of making sales of tangible personal property,
extended warranties, or sales of any service defined as a retail sale
in RCW 82.04.050 (2)(a) or (3)(a), or making transfers of either
possession or title, or both, of tangible personal property for use in
this state, collect from the purchasers or transferees the tax imposed
under this chapter. The tax to be collected under this section shall
be in an amount equal to the purchase price multiplied by the rate in
effect for the retail sales tax under RCW 82.08.020. For the purposes
of this chapter, the phrase "maintains in this state a place of
business" shall include the solicitation of sales and/or taking of
orders by sales agents or traveling representatives. For the purposes
of this chapter, "engages in business activity within this state"
includes every activity which is sufficient under the Constitution of
the United States for this state to require collection of tax under
this chapter. The department shall in rules specify activities which
constitute engaging in business activity within this state, and shall
keep the rules current with future court interpretations of the
Constitution of the United States.
(2) Every person who engages in this state in the business of
acting as an independent selling agent for persons who do not hold a
valid certificate of registration, and who receives compensation by
reason of sales of tangible personal property, extended warranties, or
sales of any service defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050 (2)(a)
or (3)(a), of his or her principals for use in this state, shall, at
the time such sales are made, collect from the purchasers the tax
imposed on the purchase price under this chapter, and for that purpose
shall be deemed a retailer as defined in this chapter.
(3) The tax required to be collected by this chapter shall be
deemed to be held in trust by the retailer until paid to the department
and any retailer who appropriates or converts the tax collected to the
retailer's own use or to any use other than the payment of the tax
provided herein to the extent that the money required to be collected
is not available for payment on the due date as prescribed shall be
guilty of a misdemeanor. In case any seller fails to collect the tax
herein imposed or having collected the tax, fails to pay the same to
the department in the manner prescribed, whether such failure is the
result of the seller's own acts or the result of acts or conditions
beyond the seller's control, the seller shall nevertheless, be
personally liable to the state for the amount of such tax, unless the
seller has taken from the buyer in good faith a copy of a direct pay
permit issued under RCW 82.32.087.
(4) Any retailer who refunds, remits, or rebates to a purchaser, or
transferee, either directly or indirectly, and by whatever means, all
or any part of the tax levied by this chapter shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor.
(5) Notwithstanding subsections (1) through (4) of this section,
any person making sales is not obligated to collect the tax imposed by
this chapter if:
(a) The person's activities in this state, whether conducted
directly or through another person, are limited to:
(i) The storage, dissemination, or display of advertising;
(ii) The taking of orders; or
(iii) The processing of payments; and
(b) The activities are conducted electronically via a web site on
a server or other computer equipment located in Washington that is not
owned or operated by the person making sales into this state nor owned
or operated by an affiliated person. "Affiliated persons" has the same
meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.424.
(6) Subsection (5) of this section expires when: (a) The United
States congress grants individual states the authority to impose sales
and use tax collection duties on remote sellers; or (b) it is
determined by a court of competent jurisdiction, in a judgment not
subject to review, that a state can impose sales and use tax collection
duties on remote sellers.
(7) Notwithstanding subsections (1) through (4) of this section, a
seller is not obligated to collect the tax imposed by this chapter if
the product is exempt from retail sales tax under section 1 of this
act, but is not exempt from use tax under section 2 of this act.

--- END ---