BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It is a traffic infraction for a commercial motor vehicle
driver to violate RCW 46.32.010 and 49 C.F.R. 395.3 by falsifying the
logbook of hours of service. For the purposes of this section,
"commercial motor vehicle driver" means a person who operates a
commercial motor vehicle.
(2) A person who violates this section is subject to a penalty of
seven hundred twenty-five dollars. The penalties in this section shall
not be reduced or suspended and shall be distributed as follows: (a)
Ninety percent to the motor vehicle account for increased commercial
motor vehicle enforcement; and (b) the remainder as provided in chapter
3.62 RCW.

--- END ---