BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a person is
allowed a credit against the tax due. The credit is equal to one
thousand dollars per fiscal year for each full-time employment position
filled by an individual with a developmental disability after the
effective date of this act. A credit is earned for the fiscal year the
person is hired to fill the position. Additionally, a credit is earned
for each fiscal year the position is continuously maintained over the
subsequent consecutive fiscal years. If a position is filled before
January 1st, this position is eligible for the full yearly credit. If
it is filled after December 31st, this position is eligible for half of
the credit.
(b) Credits are available on a first-in-time basis. The department
shall maintain a running total of all credits claimed under this
section during each fiscal year. The department may not allow any
credit, or portion thereof, which would cause the total amount of
credit claimed under this section to exceed two million dollars in any
fiscal year. The department shall provide written notice to any person
who has claimed tax credits in excess of the two million dollar
limitation in this subsection. The notice shall indicate the amount of
tax due and shall provide that the tax be paid within thirty days from
the date of such notice. The notice shall also advise the person that
the unused credit can be claimed in the next fiscal year, subject to
the two million dollar limit. The department shall not assess
penalties and interest as provided in chapter 82.32 RCW on the amount
due in the initial notice, if the amount due is paid by the due date
specified in the notice, or any extension thereof.
(c) A person may claim the credit under this section only against
taxes originally due and reported to the department on or after the
date that the employment position is filled. The amount of credit
claimed for a reporting period may not exceed the tax otherwise due
under this chapter for that reporting period. Persons unable to claim
their credit, or any portion thereof, in the fiscal year for which the
credit was earned may carry the unused credit over to subsequent fiscal
years until used. However, the carryover into subsequent fiscal years
is only permitted to the extent that the two million dollar limit for
any fiscal year is not exceeded. No refunds may be granted for credits
under this section.
(d) No application is necessary to claim the tax credit.
(e) To claim a credit under this section, a person must
electronically file with the department all returns, forms, and any
other information required by the department, in an electronic format
as provided or approved by the department. Any return, form, or
information required to be filed in an electronic format under this
section is not filed until received by the department in an electronic
format. As used in this subsection, "return" has the same meaning as
"return" in RCW 82.32.050.
(f) If the position filled by an individual with a developmental
disability is not full time, the credit in (a) of this subsection must
be ratably reduced.
(g) Credit is authorized only for employees hired for full-time
employment positions where the hiring takes place on or after July 1,
2007. Full-time employment positions filled by existing employees are
eligible for the credit under this section only if the position vacated
by the existing employee is filled by a new hire, and both the existing
employee and the new hire are individuals with a developmental
disability.
(h) A person may not claim the credit under this section if the
person has claimed a credit against the tax due under this chapter,
under any other provision of law, with respect to the same employment
position.
(2) If at any time the department finds that a person is not
eligible for the tax credit under this section for any reason, the
amount of taxes for which a credit has been claimed for which the
person was not eligible for the credit shall be immediately due. The
department shall assess interest, but not penalties, on the taxes for
which the person is not eligible. The interest shall be assessed at
the rate provided for delinquent excise taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW,
shall be assessed retroactively to the date the tax credit was claimed,
and shall accrue until the taxes for which a credit has been used are
repaid.
(3) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this subsection apply throughout this section:
(a) "Fiscal year" means the twelve-month period beginning July 1st
and ending the following June 30th.
(b) "Full-time" means at least thirty-five hours a week, four
hundred fifty-five hours a quarter, or one thousand eight hundred
twenty hours a year.
(c) "Full-time employment position" means a permanent full-time
employee, who is employed for at least twelve consecutive months. Once
a permanent full-time employee has been hired, a position does not
cease to be a full-time employment position solely due to periods in
which the position goes vacant, as long as:
(i) The cumulative period of any vacancies in that position is not
more than one hundred twenty days in the fiscal year;
(ii) During a vacancy, the employer is training or actively
recruiting a replacement; and
(iii) The vacancy is filled by a permanent full-time employee who
is an individual with a developmental disability.
(d) "Individual with a developmental disability" means an
individual with a developmental disability as defined in RCW
71A.10.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2007.

--- END ---