BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 44.04 RCW
to read as follows:
Under Article IX, section 1 of the state Constitution, it is the
paramount duty of the state to make ample provision for the education
of all of Washington's children. According to the state supreme court,
this constitutional provision requires that the legislature define and
fully fund a program of K-12 basic education before the legislature
funds any other statutory programs. For these reasons, it is the
intent of the legislature to require that all appropriations for K-12
basic education, together with appropriations for other K-12 education
programs, be enacted into law before the legislature takes executive
action on other omnibus appropriations legislation.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.150.380 and 2001 c 3 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state legislature shall, at each regular session in an odd-numbered year, appropriate from the state general fund for the current
use of the common schools such amounts as needed for state support to
the common schools during the ensuing biennium as provided in this
chapter, RCW 28A.160.150 through 28A.160.210, 28A.300.170, and
28A.500.010.
(2) The state legislature shall also, at each regular session in an
odd-numbered year, appropriate from the student achievement fund and
education construction fund solely for the purposes of and in
accordance with the provisions of the student achievement act during
the ensuing biennium.
(3) Beginning with the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium and thereafter,
appropriations for the purposes of this section and other K-12
education purposes must be made in legislation that is separate from
the omnibus operating appropriations act. Such appropriations must be
enacted into law before it is in order for either house of the
legislature to take executive action on omnibus operating
appropriations legislation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 44.04 RCW
to read as follows:
Beginning with the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium and thereafter,
appropriations for the purposes of RCW 28A.150.380 and other K-12
education purposes must be enacted into law before it is in order for
either house of the legislature to take executive action on omnibus
operating or transportation appropriations legislation.
The house of representatives and senate, jointly or separately, may
adopt rules or resolutions to implement their respective
responsibilities under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect January 1, 2008, if
the proposed amendment to Article IX of the state Constitution HJR
. . . . (H-0393.1/07) is validly submitted to and is approved and
ratified by the voters at the next general election. If the proposed
amendment is not approved and ratified, this act is void in its
entirety.

--- END ---