BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that consumers should
be able to access loans at reasonable rates; no one should have to pay
usurious interest rates. Paying the interest rates associated with
payday loans can cause a borrower to need a loan to pay off their loan.
By turning to payday loans again and again, the borrower can become
trapped in a debt cycle. This cycle is most likely to impact people
with low incomes who can least afford to pay high interest rates and
have the fewest options in breaking the debt cycle. While every person
must take responsibility for their actions and decisions, the state has
a duty to help protect consumers, particularly the most vulnerable
members of our society. To fulfill this duty, the laws regarding
payday loans must be vigorously enforced. In particular, the director
of the department of financial institutions must ensure compliance with
laws prohibiting rollovers by thorough and regular examinations and
investigations. Violations of the prohibition on rollovers or other
consumer protections by a licensee in chapter 31.45 RCW must be
followed by timely and appropriate disciplinary actions.

Sec. 2 RCW 31.45.010 and 2003 c 86 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Applicant" means a person that files an application for a
license under this chapter, including the applicant's sole proprietor,
owners, directors, officers, partners, members, and controlling
persons.
(2) "Borrower" means a natural person who receives a small loan.
(3) "Business day" means any day that the licensee is open for
business in at least one physical location.
(4) "Check" means the same as defined in RCW 62A.3-104(f) and, for
purposes of conducting the business of making small loans, includes
other electronic forms of payment, including stored value cards,
internet transfers, and automated clearing house transactions.
(5) "Check casher" means an individual, partnership, unincorporated
association, or corporation that, for compensation, engages, in whole
or in part, in the business of cashing checks, drafts, money orders, or
other commercial paper serving the same purpose.
(6) "Check seller" means an individual, partnership, unincorporated
association, or corporation that, for compensation, engages, in whole
or in part, in the business of or selling checks, drafts, money orders,
or other commercial paper serving the same purpose.
(7) "Collateral" means the same as defined in chapter 62A.9A RCW.
(8) "Controlling person" means a person owning or controlling ten
percent or more of the total outstanding shares of the applicant or
licensee, if the applicant or licensee is a corporation, and a member
who owns ten percent or more of a limited liability company or limited
liability partnership.
(9) "Default" means the borrower's failure to repay the small loan
in compliance with the terms contained in the small loan agreement or
note or failure to make payments in compliance with a loan payment
plan.
(10) "Director" means the director of financial institutions.
(11) "Financial institution" means a commercial bank, savings bank,
savings and loan association, or credit union.
(12) "Licensee" means a check casher or seller licensed by the
director to engage in business in accordance with this chapter. For
purposes of the enforcement powers of this chapter, including the power
to issue cease and desist orders under RCW 31.45.110, "licensee" also
means a check casher or seller who fails to obtain the license required
by this chapter.
(13) "Origination date" means the date upon which the borrower and
the licensee initiate a small loan transaction.
(14) "Outstanding principal balance" of a small loan means any of
the principal amount that has not been paid by the borrower.
(15) "Paid" means that moment in time when the licensee deposits
the borrower's check or accepts cash for the full amount owing on a
valid small loan.
(16) "Person" means an individual, partnership, association,
limited liability company, limited liability partnership, trust,
corporation, and any other legal entity.
(17) "Principal" means the loan proceeds advanced for the benefit
of the borrower in a small loan, excluding any fee or interest charge.
(18) "Rescission" means annulling the loan contract and, with
respect to the small loan contract, returning the borrower and the
licensee to their financial condition prior to the origination date of
the loan.
(19) "Small loan" means a loan of up to the maximum amount and for
a period of time up to the maximum term specified in RCW 31.45.073.
(20) (("Successive loans" means a series of loans made by the same
licensee to the same borrower in such a manner that no more than three
business days separate the termination date of any one loan and the
origination date of any other loan in the series.
(21))) "Termination date" means the date upon which payment for the
small loan transaction is due or paid to the licensee, whichever occurs
first.
(((22))) (21) "Total of payments" means the principal amount of the
small loan plus all fees or interest charged on the loan.
(((23))) (22) "Trade secret" means the same as defined in RCW
19.108.010.

Sec. 3 RCW 31.45.073 and 2003 c 86 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No licensee may engage in the business of making small loans to
any person physically located in Washington state, including through
use of the internet, facsimile, telephone, kiosk, or other remote means
without first obtaining a small loan endorsement to its license from
the director in accordance with this chapter. An endorsement will be
required for each location where a licensee engages in the business of
making small loans, but a small loan endorsement may authorize a
licensee to make small loans at a location different than the licensed
locations where it cashes or sells checks. A licensee may have more
than one endorsement.
(2) The termination date of a small loan may not exceed the
origination date of that same small loan by less than ninety days or
more than ((forty-five)) one hundred twenty days, including weekends
and holidays, unless the term of the loan is extended by agreement of
both the borrower and the licensee and no additional fee or interest is
charged. The maximum principal amount of any small loan, or the
outstanding principal balances of all small loans made by a licensee to
a single borrower at any one time, may not exceed seven hundred
dollars.
(3) A licensee that has obtained the required small loan
endorsement may charge interest or fees for small loans not to exceed
in the aggregate ((fifteen percent of the first five hundred dollars of
principal. If the principal exceeds five hundred dollars, a licensee
may charge interest or fees not to exceed in the aggregate ten percent
of that portion of the principal in excess of five hundred dollars. If
a licensee makes more than one loan to a single borrower, and the
aggregated principal of all loans made to that borrower exceeds five
hundred dollars at any one time, the licensee may charge interest or
fees not to exceed in the aggregate ten percent on that portion of the
aggregated principal of all loans at any one time that is in excess of
five hundred dollars. The director may determine by rule which fees,
if any, are not subject to the interest or fee limitations described in
this section)) thirty-six percent per annum. It is a violation of this
chapter for any licensee to knowingly loan to a single borrower at any
one time, in a single loan or in the aggregate, more than the maximum
principal amount described in this section.
(4) Prior to making a small loan, a licensee must fully consider
the ability of the potential borrower to repay the loan.
(5) In connection with making a small loan, a licensee may advance
moneys on the security of a postdated check. The licensee may not
accept any other property, title to property, or other evidence of
ownership of property as collateral for a small loan. The licensee may
accept only one postdated check per loan as security for the loan. A
licensee may permit a borrower to redeem a postdated check with a
payment of cash or the equivalent of cash. The licensee may disburse
the proceeds of a small loan in cash, in the form of a check, or in the
form of the electronic equivalent of cash or a check.
(((5))) (6) No person may at any time cash or advance any moneys on
a postdated check or draft in excess of the amount of goods or services
purchased without first obtaining a small loan endorsement to a check
casher or check seller license.
(7) Any small loan agreement or contract made between a borrower
and a licensee without the licensee first obtaining a small loan
endorsement is void and unenforceable.

Sec. 4 RCW 31.45.084 and 2003 c 86 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((A licensee and borrower may agree to a payment plan for a
small loan at any time. After four successive loans and prior to
default upon the last loan,)) Each borrower may convert their small
loan to a payment plan at any time. Each agreement for a loan payment
plan must be in writing and acknowledged by both the borrower and the
licensee. ((The licensee may charge the borrower, at the time both
parties enter into the payment plan, a one-time fee for the payment
plan in an amount up to the fee or interest on the outstanding
principal of the loan as allowed under RCW 31.45.073(3).)) The
licensee may not assess any other fee, interest charge, or other charge
on the borrower as a result of converting the small loan into a payment
plan. This payment plan must provide for the payment of the total of
payments due on the small loan over a period not less than ((sixty))
one hundred twenty days in three or more payments, unless the borrower
and licensee agree to a shorter payment period. The borrower may pay
the total of payments at any time. The licensee may not charge any
penalty, fee, or charge to the borrower for prepayment of the loan
payment plan by the borrower. Each licensee shall conspicuously
disclose to each borrower in the small loan agreement or small loan
note that the borrower has access to such a payment plan ((after four
successive loans)). A licensee's violation of such a payment plan
constitutes a violation of this chapter.
(2) The licensee may take postdated checks at the initiation of the
payment plan for the payments agreed to under the plan. If any check
accepted by the licensee as payment under the payment plan is
dishonored, the licensee may not charge the borrower any fee for the
dishonored check.
(3) If the borrower defaults on the payment plan, the licensee may
initiate action to collect the total of payments under RCW 31.45.082.
The licensee may charge the borrower a one-time payment plan default
fee of twenty-five dollars.
(4) If the licensee enters into a payment plan with the borrower
through an accredited third party, with certified credit counselors,
that is representing the borrower, the licensee's failure to comply
with the terms of that payment plan constitutes a violation of this
chapter.

Sec. 5 RCW 31.45.088 and 2003 c 86 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When advertising the availability of small loans, if a licensee
includes in an advertisement the fee or interest rate charged by the
licensee for a small loan, then the licensee shall also disclose the
annual percentage rate resulting from this fee or interest rate.
(2) When advertising the availability of small loans, compliance
with all applicable state and federal laws and regulations, including
the truth in lending act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1601 and Regulation Z, 12
C.F.R. ((Sec. [Part])) Part 226 constitutes compliance with subsection
(1) of this section.
(3) When making a small loan, each licensee shall disclose to the
borrower the terms of the small loan, including the principal amount of
the small loan, the total of payments of the small loan, the fee or
interest rate charged by the licensee on the small loan, the cost of
the loan expressed as an amount of dollars per hundred dollars
borrowed, and the annual percentage rate resulting from this fee or
interest rate.
(4) When making a small loan, disclosure of the terms of the small
loan in compliance with all applicable state and federal laws and
regulations, including the truth in lending act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1601
and Regulation Z, 12 C.F.R. ((Sec. [Part])) Part 226 constitutes
compliance with subsection (3) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The director of the department of financial
institutions shall study the merits of implementing a real-time
database that allows licensees to verify if a consumer has an
outstanding small loan. The director shall study the cost of a
database and the effectiveness of a database in limiting the
possibility of an excessive number of contemporaneous loans. The
director must provide the findings of this study to the committees of
the legislature that address financial regulation no later than
November 30, 2007. The director may include recommendations based upon
the study.

--- END ---