BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that consumers should
be able to access loans at reasonable rates; no one should have to pay
usurious interest rates. Paying the interest rates associated with
payday loans can cause a borrower to need a loan to pay off their loan.
By turning to payday loans again and again, the borrower can become
trapped in a debt cycle. This cycle is most likely to impact people
with low incomes who can least afford to pay high interest rates and
have the fewest options in breaking the debt cycle. While every person
must take responsibility for their actions and decisions, the state has
a duty to help protect consumers, particularly the most vulnerable
members of our society. To fulfill this duty, the laws regarding
payday loans must be vigorously enforced. In particular, the director
of the department of financial institutions must ensure compliance with
laws prohibiting rollovers by thorough and regular examinations and
investigations. Violations of the prohibition on rollovers or other
consumer protections by a licensee in chapter 31.45 RCW must be
followed by timely and appropriate disciplinary actions.

Sec. 2 RCW 31.45.073 and 2003 c 86 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No licensee may engage in the business of making small loans to
any person physically located in Washington state, including through
use of the internet, facsimile, telephone, kiosk, or other remote means
without first obtaining a small loan endorsement to its license from
the director in accordance with this chapter. An endorsement will be
required for each location where a licensee engages in the business of
making small loans, but a small loan endorsement may authorize a
licensee to make small loans at a location different than the licensed
locations where it cashes or sells checks. A licensee may have more
than one endorsement.
(2) The termination date of a small loan may not exceed the
origination date of that same small loan by less than ninety days or
more than ((forty-five)) one hundred twenty days, including weekends
and holidays, unless the term of the loan is extended by agreement of
both the borrower and the licensee and no additional fee or interest is
charged. The maximum principal amount of any small loan, or the
outstanding principal balances of all small loans made by a licensee to
a single borrower at any one time, may not exceed seven hundred
dollars.
(3) A licensee that has obtained the required small loan
endorsement may charge interest or fees for small loans not to exceed
in the aggregate ((fifteen percent of the first five hundred dollars of
principal. If the principal exceeds five hundred dollars, a licensee
may charge interest or fees not to exceed in the aggregate ten percent
of that portion of the principal in excess of five hundred dollars. If
a licensee makes more than one loan to a single borrower, and the
aggregated principal of all loans made to that borrower exceeds five
hundred dollars at any one time, the licensee may charge interest or
fees not to exceed in the aggregate ten percent on that portion of the
aggregated principal of all loans at any one time that is in excess of
five hundred dollars. The director may determine by rule which fees,
if any, are not subject to the interest or fee limitations described in
this section)) thirty-six percent per annum. It is a violation of this
chapter for any licensee to knowingly loan to a single borrower at any
one time, in a single loan or in the aggregate, more than the maximum
principal amount described in this section.
(4) Prior to making a small loan, a licensee must fully consider
the ability of the potential borrower to repay the loan.
(5) In connection with making a small loan, a licensee may advance
moneys on the security of a postdated check. The licensee may not
accept any other property, title to property, or other evidence of
ownership of property as collateral for a small loan. The licensee may
accept only one postdated check per loan as security for the loan. A
licensee may permit a borrower to redeem a postdated check with a
payment of cash or the equivalent of cash. The licensee may disburse
the proceeds of a small loan in cash, in the form of a check, or in the
form of the electronic equivalent of cash or a check.
(((5))) (6) No person may at any time cash or advance any moneys on
a postdated check or draft in excess of the amount of goods or services
purchased without first obtaining a small loan endorsement to a check
casher or check seller license.
(7) Any small loan agreement or contract made between a borrower
and a licensee without the licensee first obtaining a small loan
endorsement is void and unenforceable.

Sec. 3 RCW 31.45.084 and 2003 c 86 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A licensee and borrower may agree to a payment plan for a small
loan at any time. After four successive loans and prior to default
upon the last loan, each borrower may convert their small loan to a
payment plan. Each agreement for a loan payment plan must be in
writing and acknowledged by both the borrower and the licensee. The
licensee may charge the borrower, at the time both parties enter into
the payment plan, a one-time fee for the payment plan in an amount up
to the fee or interest on the outstanding principal of the loan as
allowed under RCW 31.45.073(3). The licensee may not assess any other
fee, interest charge, or other charge on the borrower as a result of
converting the small loan into a payment plan. This payment plan must
provide for the payment of the total of payments due on the small loan
over a period not less than sixty days in three or more payments,
unless the borrower and licensee agree to a shorter payment period.
The borrower may pay the total of payments at any time. The licensee
may not charge any penalty, fee, or charge to the borrower for
prepayment of the loan payment plan by the borrower. Each licensee
shall conspicuously disclose to each borrower in the small loan
agreement or small loan note that the borrower has access to such a
payment plan after four successive loans. A licensee's violation of
such a payment plan constitutes a violation of this chapter.
(2) The licensee may take postdated checks at the initiation of the
payment plan for the payments agreed to under the plan. If any check
accepted by the licensee as payment under the payment plan is
dishonored, the licensee may not charge the borrower any fee for the
dishonored check.
(3) If the borrower defaults on the payment plan, the licensee may
initiate action to collect the total of payments under RCW 31.45.082.
The licensee may charge the borrower a one-time payment plan default
fee of twenty-five dollars.
(4) If the licensee enters into a payment plan with the borrower
through an accredited third party, with certified credit counselors,
that is representing the borrower, the licensee's failure to comply
with the terms of that payment plan constitutes a violation of this
chapter.
(5) Military borrowers, as defined in RCW 31.45.210(3), must be
offered the payment plan option terms and conditions in RCW
31.45.210(2).

Sec. 4 RCW 31.45.088 and 2003 c 86 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When advertising the availability of small loans, if a licensee
includes in an advertisement the fee or interest rate charged by the
licensee for a small loan, then the licensee shall also disclose the
annual percentage rate resulting from this fee or interest rate.
(2) When advertising the availability of small loans, compliance
with all applicable state and federal laws and regulations, including
the truth in lending act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1601 and Regulation Z, 12
C.F.R. ((Sec. [Part])) Part 226 constitutes compliance with subsection
(1) of this section.
(3) When making a small loan, each licensee shall disclose to the
borrower the terms of the small loan, including the principal amount of
the small loan, the total of payments of the small loan, the fee or
interest rate charged by the licensee on the small loan, the cost of
the loan expressed as an amount of dollars per hundred dollars
borrowed, and the annual percentage rate resulting from this fee or
interest rate.
(4) When making a small loan, disclosure of the terms of the small
loan in compliance with all applicable state and federal laws and
regulations, including the truth in lending act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1601
and Regulation Z, 12 C.F.R. ((Sec. [Part])) Part 226 constitutes
compliance with subsection (3) of this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 31.45.210 and 2005 c 256 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A licensee shall:
(a) When collecting any delinquent small loan, not garnish any
wages or salary paid for service in the armed forces;
(b) Defer any payments on a small loan that was taken out prior to
deployment by a military borrower who has been deployed to a combat or
combat support posting until thirty days after the duration of the
posting. A licensee shall not charge a fee or accrue interest on a
small loan while the payments are deferred;
(c) Defer ((for)) until thirty days after the duration of the
posting all collection activity against a military borrower who has
been deployed to a combat or combat support posting ((for the duration
of the posting));
(((c))) (d) Not contact, or threaten to contact, either orally or
in writing, the military chain of command of a military borrower in an
effort to collect a delinquent small loan;
(((d))) (e) Not communicate with a military borrower in such a
manner as to harass, intimidate, threaten, or embarrass the military
borrower, including but not limited to communication at an unreasonable
hour, with unreasonable frequency, by threats of force or violence, by
threats of criminal prosecution, and by use of offensive language. A
communication is presumed to have been made for the purposes of
harassment when:
(i) It is made with a military borrower in any form, manner, or
place, more than three times in a single week;
(ii) It is made with a military borrower at his or her place of
employment more than one time in a single week; or
(iii) It is made with a military borrower at his or her place of
residence between the hours of 9:00 p.m. and 7:30 a.m.;
(f) Honor the terms of any repayment agreement between the licensee
and any military borrower, including any repayment agreement negotiated
through military counselors or third party credit counselors; ((and
(e))) (g) Not require binding arbitration in connection with a
small loan to a military borrower as a condition for the small loan:
(i) A military borrower must be informed in clear, written language
that the military borrower may reject binding arbitration and will
still obtain the loan; and
(ii) A military borrower must sign a statement indicating that they
understand that binding arbitration is not required and that they are
choosing the option of binding arbitration;
(h) Not make a loan from a specific location to a person that the
licensee knows is a military borrower when the military borrower's
commander has notified the licensee in writing that the specific
location is designated off-limits to military personnel under their
command; and
(i) Not directly market small loans to military borrowers in a
manner that suggests that the licensee is affiliated with the armed
forces of the United States.
(2)(a) A military borrower may convert their small loan to a
payment plan at any time. An agreement for a loan payment plan must be
in writing and acknowledged by both the military borrower and the
licensee. The licensee may not assess any fee, interest charge, or
other charge on the military borrower as a result of converting the
small loan into a payment plan. This payment plan must provide for the
payment of the total of payments due on the small loan over a period of
not less than one hundred twenty days in three or more payments, unless
the military borrower and licensee agree to a shorter payment period.
The military borrower may pay the total of payments at any time. The
licensee may not charge any penalty, fee, or charge to the borrower for
prepayment of the loan payment plan by the military borrower. Each
licensee shall conspicuously disclose to each military borrower in the
small loan agreement or small loan note that the military borrower has
access to such a payment plan after four successive loans. A
licensee's violation of such a payment plan constitutes a violation of
this chapter.
(b) The licensee may take postdated checks at the initiation of the
payment plan for the payments agreed to under the plan. If any check
accepted by the licensee as payment under the payment plan is
dishonored, the licensee may not charge the military borrower any fee
for the dishonored check.
(c) If the military borrower defaults on the payment plan, the
licensee may initiate action to collect the total of payments under RCW
31.45.082. The licensee may charge the military borrower a one-time
payment plan default fee of twenty-five dollars.
(d) If the licensee enters into a payment plan with the military
borrower through an accredited third party, with certified credit
counselors, that is representing the military borrower, the licensee's
failure to comply with the terms of that payment plan constitutes a
violation of this chapter.
(3) For purposes of this section, "military borrower" means any
active duty member of the armed forces of the United States, or the
member's spouse, or any member of the national guard or the reserves of
the armed forces of the United States who has been called to active
duty, or the member's spouse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The director of the department of financial
institutions shall study the merits of implementing a real-time
database that allows licensees to verify if a consumer has an
outstanding small loan. The director shall study the cost of a
database and the effectiveness of a database in limiting the
possibility of an excessive number of contemporaneous loans. The
director must provide the findings of this study to the committees of
the legislature that address financial regulation no later than
November 30, 2007. The director may include recommendations based upon
the study.

--- END ---