BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71.24.015 and 2005 c 503 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is the intent of the legislature to establish a community mental
health program ((which shall)) to help people experiencing mental
illness to retain a respected and productive position in the community.
This will be accomplished through programs that focus on resilience and
recovery, and practices that are evidence-based, research-based,
consensus-based, or, where these do not exist, promising or emerging
best practices, which provide for:
(1) Access to mental health services for adults of the state who
are acutely mentally ill, chronically mentally ill, or seriously
disturbed and children of the state who are acutely mentally ill,
severely emotionally disturbed, or seriously disturbed, which services
recognize the special needs of underserved populations, including
minorities, children, the elderly, disabled, and low-income persons.
Access to mental health services shall not be limited by a person's
history of confinement in a state, federal, or local correctional
facility. It is also the purpose of this chapter to promote the early
identification of mentally ill children and to ensure that they receive
the mental health care and treatment which is appropriate to their
developmental level. This care should improve home, school, and
community functioning, maintain children in a safe and nurturing home
environment, and should enable treatment decisions to be made in
response to clinical needs in accordance with sound professional
judgment while also recognizing parents' rights to participate in
treatment decisions for their children;
(2) The involvement of persons with mental illness, their family
members, and advocates in designing and implementing mental health
services that reduce unnecessary hospitalization and incarceration and
promote the recovery and employment of persons with mental illness. To
improve the quality of services available and promote the
rehabilitation, recovery, and reintegration of persons with mental
illness, consumer and advocate participation in mental health services
is an integral part of the community mental health system and shall be
supported;
(3) Accountability of efficient and effective services through
state of the art outcome and performance measures and statewide
standards for monitoring client and system outcomes, performance, and
reporting of client and system outcome information. These processes
shall be designed so as to maximize the use of available resources for
direct care of people with a mental illness and to assure uniform data
collection across the state;
(4) Minimum service delivery standards;
(5) Priorities for the use of available resources for the care of
the mentally ill consistent with the priorities defined in the statute;
(6) Coordination of services within the department, including those
divisions within the department that provide services to children,
between the department and the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, and among state mental hospitals, county authorities,
regional support networks, community mental health services, and other
support services, which shall to the maximum extent feasible also
include the families of the mentally ill, and other service providers;
and
(7) Coordination of services aimed at reducing duplication in
service delivery and promoting complementary services among all
entities that provide mental health services to adults and children.
It is the policy of the state to encourage the provision of a full
range of treatment and rehabilitation services in the state for mental
disorders including services operated by consumers and advocates. The
legislature intends to encourage the development of regional mental
health services with adequate local flexibility to assure eligible
people in need of care access to the least-restrictive treatment
alternative appropriate to their needs, and the availability of
treatment components to assure continuity of care. To this end,
counties are encouraged to enter into joint operating agreements with
other counties to form regional systems of care. Regional systems of
care, whether operated by a county, group of counties, or another
entity shall integrate planning, administration, and service delivery
duties under chapters 71.05 and 71.24 RCW to consolidate
administration, reduce administrative layering, and reduce
administrative costs. The legislature hereby finds and declares that
sound fiscal management requires vigilance to ensure that funds
appropriated by the legislature for the provision of needed community
mental health programs and services are ultimately expended solely for
the purpose for which they were appropriated, and not for any other
purpose.
It is further the intent of the legislature to integrate the
provision of services to provide continuity of care through all phases
of treatment. To this end the legislature intends to promote active
engagement with mentally ill persons and collaboration between families
and service providers.

Sec. 2 RCW 71.24.025 and 2006 c 333 s 104 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Acutely mentally ill" means a condition which is limited to a
short-term severe crisis episode of:
(a) A mental disorder as defined in RCW 71.05.020 or, in the case
of a child, as defined in RCW 71.34.020;
(b) Being gravely disabled as defined in RCW 71.05.020 or, in the
case of a child, a gravely disabled minor as defined in RCW 71.34.020;
or
(c) Presenting a likelihood of serious harm as defined in RCW
71.05.020 or, in the case of a child, as defined in RCW 71.34.020.
(2) "Advocate" means family members of consumers, members of
consumer controlled organizations, or members of family member
controlled organizations.
(3) "Available resources" means funds appropriated for the purpose
of providing community mental health programs, federal funds, except
those provided according to Title XIX of the Social Security Act, and
state funds appropriated under this chapter or chapter 71.05 RCW by the
legislature during any biennium for the purpose of providing
residential services, resource management services, community support
services, and other mental health services. This does not include
funds appropriated for the purpose of operating and administering the
state psychiatric hospitals.
(((3))) (4) "Child" means a person under the age of eighteen years.
(((4))) (5) "Chronically mentally ill adult" means an adult who has
a mental disorder and meets at least one of the following criteria:
(a) Has undergone two or more episodes of hospital care for a
mental disorder within the preceding two years; or
(b) Has experienced a continuous psychiatric hospitalization or
residential treatment exceeding six months' duration within the
preceding year; or
(c) Has been unable to engage in any substantial gainful activity
by reason of any mental disorder which has lasted for a continuous
period of not less than twelve months. "Substantial gainful activity"
shall be defined by the department by rule consistent with Public Law
92-603, as amended.
(((5))) (6) "Community mental health program" means all mental
health services, activities, or programs using available resources.
(((6))) (7) "Community mental health service delivery system" means
public or private agencies that provide services specifically to
persons with mental disorders as defined under RCW 71.05.020 and
receive funding from public sources.
(((7))) (8) "Community support services" means services authorized,
planned, and coordinated through resource management services
including, at a minimum, assessment, diagnosis, emergency crisis
intervention available twenty-four hours, seven days a week,
prescreening determinations for mentally ill persons being considered
for placement in nursing homes as required by federal law, screening
for patients being considered for admission to residential services,
diagnosis and treatment for acutely mentally ill and severely
emotionally disturbed children discovered under screening through the
federal Title XIX early and periodic screening, diagnosis, and
treatment program, investigation, legal, and other nonresidential
services under chapter 71.05 RCW, case management services, psychiatric
treatment including medication supervision, counseling, psychotherapy,
assuring transfer of relevant patient information between service
providers, recovery services, and other services determined by regional
support networks.
(((8))) (9) "Consensus-based" means a program or practice that has
general support among treatment providers and experts, based on
experience or professional literature, and may have anecdotal or case
study support, or that is agreed but not possible to perform studies
with random assignment and controlled groups.
(((9))) (10) "Consumer" or "mental health consumer" means a person
who has applied for, is eligible for, is receiving, or has received
mental health services. For a child under the age of thirteen, or for
a child age thirteen or older whose parents or legal guardians are
involved in the treatment plan, the definition of consumer includes
parents or legal guardians.
(11) "Consumer-run" or "consumer or advocate-run" means entirely
consumer-directed and operated or directed and operated by a
partnership of consumers or advocates and nonconsumer professionals.
(12) "County authority" means the board of county commissioners,
county council, or county executive having authority to establish a
community mental health program, or two or more of the county
authorities specified in this subsection which have entered into an
agreement to provide a community mental health program.
(((10))) (13) "Department" means the department of social and
health services.
(((11))) (14) "Designated mental health professional" means a
mental health professional designated by the county or other authority
authorized in rule to perform the duties specified in this chapter.
(((12))) (15) "Emerging best practice" or "promising practice"
means a practice that presents, based on preliminary information,
potential for becoming a research-based or consensus-based practice.
(((13))) (16) "Evidence-based" means a program or practice that has
had multiple site random controlled trials across heterogeneous
populations demonstrating that the program or practice is effective for
the population.
(((14))) (17) "Licensed service provider" means an entity licensed
according to this chapter or chapter 71.05 RCW or an entity deemed to
meet state minimum standards as a result of accreditation by a
recognized behavioral health accrediting body recognized and having a
current agreement with the department, that meets state minimum
standards or persons licensed under chapter 18.57, 18.71, 18.83, or
18.79 RCW, as it applies to registered nurses and advanced registered
nurse practitioners.
(((15))) (18) "Long-term inpatient care" means inpatient services
for persons committed for, or voluntarily receiving intensive treatment
for, periods of ninety days or greater under chapter 71.05 RCW. "Long-term inpatient care" as used in this chapter does not include: (a)
Services for individuals committed under chapter 71.05 RCW who are
receiving services pursuant to a conditional release or a court-ordered
less restrictive alternative to detention; or (b) services for
individuals voluntarily receiving less restrictive alternative
treatment on the grounds of the state hospital.
(((16))) (19) "Mental health services" means all services provided
by regional support networks and other services provided by the state
for the mentally ill.
(((17))) (20) "Mentally ill persons" and "the mentally ill" mean
persons and conditions defined in subsections (1), (((4))) (5),
(((26))) (29), and (((27))) (30) of this section.
(((18))) (21) "Recovery" means the process in which people are able
to live, work, learn, and participate fully in their communities.
(((19))) (22) "Regional support network" means a county authority
or group of county authorities or other nonprofit entity recognized by
the secretary in contract in a defined region.
(((20))) (23) "Registration records" include all the records of the
department, regional support networks, treatment facilities, and other
persons providing services to the department, county departments, or
facilities which identify persons who are receiving or who at any time
have received services for mental illness.
(((21))) (24) "Research-based" means a program or practice that has
some research demonstrating effectiveness, but that does not yet meet
the standard of evidence-based practices.
(((22))) (25) "Residential services" means a complete range of
residences and supports authorized by resource management services and
which may involve a facility, a distinct part thereof, or services
which support community living, for acutely mentally ill persons,
chronically mentally ill adults, severely emotionally disturbed
children, or seriously disturbed adults determined by the regional
support network to be at risk of becoming acutely or chronically
mentally ill. The services shall include at least evaluation and
treatment services as defined in chapter 71.05 RCW, acute crisis
respite care, long-term adaptive and rehabilitative care, and
supervised and supported living services, and shall also include any
residential services developed to service mentally ill persons in
nursing homes, boarding homes, and adult family homes, and may include
outpatient services provided as an element in a package of services in
a supported housing model. Residential services for children in out-of-home placements related to their mental disorder shall not include
the costs of food and shelter, except for children's long-term
residential facilities existing prior to January 1, 1991.
(((23))) (26) "Resilience" means the personal and community
qualities that enable individuals to rebound from adversity, trauma,
tragedy, threats, or other stresses, and to live productive lives.
(((24))) (27) "Resource management services" mean the planning,
coordination, and authorization of residential services and community
support services administered pursuant to an individual service plan
for: (a) Acutely mentally ill adults and children; (b) chronically
mentally ill adults; (c) severely emotionally disturbed children; or
(d) seriously disturbed adults determined solely by a regional support
network to be at risk of becoming acutely or chronically mentally ill.
Such planning, coordination, and authorization shall include mental
health screening for children eligible under the federal Title XIX
early and periodic screening, diagnosis, and treatment program.
Resource management services include seven day a week, twenty-four hour
a day availability of information regarding mentally ill adults' and
children's enrollment in services and their individual service plan to
designated mental health professionals, evaluation and treatment
facilities, and others as determined by the regional support network.
(((25))) (28) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health
services.
(((26))) (29) "Seriously disturbed person" means a person who:
(a) Is gravely disabled or presents a likelihood of serious harm to
himself or herself or others, or to the property of others, as a result
of a mental disorder as defined in chapter 71.05 RCW;
(b) Has been on conditional release status, or under a less
restrictive alternative order, at some time during the preceding two
years from an evaluation and treatment facility or a state mental
health hospital;
(c) Has a mental disorder which causes major impairment in several
areas of daily living;
(d) Exhibits suicidal preoccupation or attempts; or
(e) Is a child diagnosed by a mental health professional, as
defined in chapter 71.34 RCW, as experiencing a mental disorder which
is clearly interfering with the child's functioning in family or school
or with peers or is clearly interfering with the child's personality
development and learning.
(((27))) (30) "Severely emotionally disturbed child" means a child
who has been determined by the regional support network to be
experiencing a mental disorder as defined in chapter 71.34 RCW,
including those mental disorders that result in a behavioral or conduct
disorder, that is clearly interfering with the child's functioning in
family or school or with peers and who meets at least one of the
following criteria:
(a) Has undergone inpatient treatment or placement outside of the
home related to a mental disorder within the last two years;
(b) Has undergone involuntary treatment under chapter 71.34 RCW
within the last two years;
(c) Is currently served by at least one of the following child-serving systems: Juvenile justice, child-protection/welfare, special
education, or developmental disabilities;
(d) Is at risk of escalating maladjustment due to:
(i) Chronic family dysfunction involving a mentally ill or
inadequate caretaker;
(ii) Changes in custodial adult;
(iii) Going to, residing in, or returning from any placement
outside of the home, for example, psychiatric hospital, short-term
inpatient, residential treatment, group or foster home, or a
correctional facility;
(iv) Subject to repeated physical abuse or neglect;
(v) Drug or alcohol abuse; or
(vi) Homelessness.
(((28))) (31) "State minimum standards" means minimum requirements
established by rules adopted by the secretary and necessary to
implement this chapter for: (a) Delivery of mental health services;
(b) licensed service providers for the provision of mental health
services; (c) residential services; and (d) community support services
and resource management services.
(((29))) (32) "Treatment records" include registration and all
other records concerning persons who are receiving or who at any time
have received services for mental illness, which are maintained by the
department, by regional support networks and their staffs, and by
treatment facilities. Treatment records do not include notes or
records maintained for personal use by a person providing treatment
services for the department, regional support networks, or a treatment
facility if the notes or records are not available to others.
(((30))) (33) "Tribal authority," for the purposes of this section
and RCW 71.24.300 only, means: The federally recognized Indian tribes
and the major Indian organizations recognized by the secretary insofar
as these organizations do not have a financial relationship with any
regional support network that would present a conflict of interest.

Sec. 3 RCW 71.24.300 and 2006 c 333 s 106 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon the request of a tribal authority or authorities within a
regional support network the joint operating agreement or the county
authority shall allow for the inclusion of the tribal authority to be
represented as a party to the regional support network.
(2) The roles and responsibilities of the county and tribal
authorities shall be determined by the terms of that agreement
including a determination of membership on the governing board and
advisory committees, the number of tribal representatives to be party
to the agreement, and the provisions of law and shall assure the
provision of culturally competent services to the tribes served.
(3) The state mental health authority may not determine the roles
and responsibilities of county authorities as to each other under
regional support networks by rule, except to assure that all duties
required of regional support networks are assigned and that counties
and the regional support network do not duplicate functions and that a
single authority has final responsibility for all available resources
and performance under the regional support network's contract with the
secretary.
(4) If a regional support network is a private nonprofit entity,
the department shall allow for the inclusion of the tribal authority to
be represented as a party to the regional support network.
(5) The roles and responsibilities of the private nonprofit entity
and the tribal authorities shall be determined by the department,
through negotiation with the tribal authority.
(6) Regional support networks shall submit an overall six-year
operating and capital plan, timeline, and budget and submit progress
reports and an updated two-year plan biennially thereafter, to assume
within available resources all of the following duties:
(a) Administer and provide for the availability of all resource
management services, residential services, and community support
services.
(b) Administer and provide for the availability of all
investigation, transportation, court-related, and other services
provided by the state or counties pursuant to chapter 71.05 RCW.
(c) Provide within the boundaries of each regional support network
evaluation and treatment services for at least ninety percent of
persons detained or committed for periods up to seventeen days
according to chapter 71.05 RCW. Regional support networks may contract
to purchase evaluation and treatment services from other networks if
they are unable to provide for appropriate resources within their
boundaries. Insofar as the original intent of serving persons in the
community is maintained, the secretary is authorized to approve
exceptions on a case-by-case basis to the requirement to provide
evaluation and treatment services within the boundaries of each
regional support network. Such exceptions are limited to:
(i) Contracts with neighboring or contiguous regions; or
(ii) Individuals detained or committed for periods up to seventeen
days at the state hospitals at the discretion of the secretary.
(d) Administer and provide for the availability of all other mental
health services, which shall include patient counseling, day treatment,
consultation, education services, employment services as defined in RCW
71.24.035, and mental health services to children.
(e) Establish standards and procedures for reviewing individual
service plans and determining when that person may be discharged from
resource management services.
(7) The regional support networks, or its designee, shall provide
consumer or advocate-run services.
(a) The department shall not require a consumer or advocate-run
service to maintain licensure under this chapter if the service is
nonclinical. If a service is clinical, the service shall comply with
the requirements for licensed services in this chapter.
(b) Consumer or advocate-run services may include, but are not
limited to:
(i) Consumer and/or advocate-operated businesses;
(ii) Clubhouses, including but not limited to the Fountain House
model as certified by the International Center for Clubhouse
Development;
(iii) Crisis services;
(iv) Advocacy and referral services;
(v) Vocational and employment services;
(vi) Self-help and peer counseling and support groups;
(vii) Community presence in state hospitals; and
(viii) Mental health advance directive training.
(8) A regional support network may request that any state-owned
land, building, facility, or other capital asset which was ever
purchased, deeded, given, or placed in trust for the care of the
mentally ill and which is within the boundaries of a regional support
network be made available to support the operations of the regional
support network. State agencies managing such capital assets shall
give first priority to requests for their use pursuant to this chapter.
(((8))) (9) Each regional support network shall appoint a mental
health advisory board which shall review and provide comments on plans
and policies developed under this chapter, provide local oversight
regarding the activities of the regional support network, and work with
the regional support network to resolve significant concerns regarding
service delivery and outcomes. The department shall establish
statewide procedures for the operation of regional advisory committees
including mechanisms for advisory board feedback to the department
regarding regional support network performance. The composition of the
board shall be broadly representative of the demographic character of
the region and shall include, but not be limited to, representatives of
consumers and families, law enforcement, and where the county is not
the regional support network, county elected officials. Composition
and length of terms of board members may differ between regional
support networks but shall be included in each regional support
network's contract and approved by the secretary.
(((9))) (10) Regional support networks shall assume all duties
specified in their plans and joint operating agreements through
biennial contractual agreements with the secretary.
(((10))) (11) Regional support networks may receive technical
assistance from the housing trust fund and may identify and submit
projects for housing and housing support services to the housing trust
fund established under chapter 43.185 RCW. Projects identified or
submitted under this subsection must be fully integrated with the
regional support network six-year operating and capital plan, timeline,
and budget required by subsection (6) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The sum of five million dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the biennium ending
June 30, 2009, from the general fund to the department of social and
health services for the purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2007.

--- END ---