BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Polybrominated diphenyl ethers (PBDEs) have
been used extensively as flame retardants in a large number of common
household products for the past thirty years. Studies on animals show
that PBDEs can impact the developing brain, affecting behavior and
learning after birth and into adulthood, making exposure to fetuses and
children a particular concern. Levels of PBDEs are increasing in
people, and in the environment, particularly in North America. Because
people can be exposed to these chemicals through house dust and indoor
air as well as through food, it is important to phase out their use in
common household products, provided that effective flame retardants
that are safer and technically feasible are available at a reasonable
cost.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Comestible" means edible.
(2) "Commercial decabromo diphenyl ether" or "commercial deca-bde"
means the chemical mixture of decabromo diphenyl ether, including
associated polybrominated diphenyl ether impurities not intentionally
added.
(3) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(4) "Electronic enclosure" means the plastic housing that encloses
the components of electronic products, including but not limited to
televisions and computers.
(5) "Manufacturer" means any person, firm, association,
partnership, corporation, governmental entity, organization, or joint
venture that produces a product containing polybrominated diphenyl
ethers or an importer or domestic distributor of a noncomestible
product containing polybrominated diphenyl ethers. A manufacturer does
not include a retailer who:
(a) Adds a private label brand or cobrands a product for sale; or
(b) Assembles components to create a single noncomestible product
based on an individual consumer preference.
(6) "Mattress" has the same meaning as defined by the United States
consumer product safety commission in 16 C.F.R. Part 1633 (2007) as it
existed on the effective date of this section, and includes mattress
sets, box springs, futons, crib mattresses, and youth mattresses.
"Mattress" includes mattress pads.
(7) "Medical device" means an instrument, machine, implant, or
diagnostic test used to help diagnose a disease or other condition or
to cure, treat, or prevent disease.
(8) "Polybrominated diphenyl ethers" or "PBDEs" means chemical
forms that consist of diphenyl ethers bound with bromine atoms.
Polybrominated diphenyl ethers include, but are not limited to, the
three primary forms of the commercial mixtures known as pentabromo
diphenyl ether (penta-bde), octabromo diphenyl ether (octa-bde), and
decabromo diphenyl ether (deca-bde).
(9) "Residential upholstered furniture" means residential seating
products intended for indoor use in a home or other dwelling intended
for residential occupancy that consists in whole or in part of
resilient cushioning materials enclosed within a covering consisting of
fabric or related materials, if the resilient cushioning materials are
sold with the item of upholstered furniture and the upholstered
furniture is constructed with a contiguous upholstered seat and back
that may include arms.
(10) "Retailer" means a person who offers a product for sale at
retail through any means including, but not limited to, remote
offerings such as sales outlets, catalogs, or the internet, but does
not include a sale that is a wholesale transaction with a distributor
or a retailer. A retailer does not include a person, firm,
association, partnership, corporation, governmental entity,
organization, or joint venture that both manufactures and sells a
product at retail.
(11) "Technically feasible" means an alternative that is available
at a cost and in sufficient quantity to permit the manufacturer to
produce an economically viable product.
(12) "Transportation vehicle" means a mechanized vehicle that is
used to transport goods or people including, but not limited to,
airplanes, automobiles, motorcycles, trucks, buses, trains, boats,
ships, streetcars, or monorail cars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 After January 1, 2008, no person may
manufacture, knowingly sell, offer for sale, distribute for sale, or
distribute for use in this state noncomestible products containing
PDBEs. Exemptions from the prohibition in this section are limited to
the following:
(1) Products containing deca-bde, except as provided in section 4
of this act;
(2) The sale or distribution of any used transportation vehicle
manufactured before January 1, 2008, with component parts containing
PBDEs;
(3) The sale or distribution of any used transportation vehicle
parts or new transportation vehicle parts manufactured before January
1, 2008, that contain PBDEs;
(4) The manufacture, sale, repair, distribution, maintenance,
refurbishment, or modification of equipment containing PBDEs and used
primarily for military or federally funded space program applications.
The exemption in this subsection (4) does not cover consumer-based
goods with broad applicability;
(5) Federal aviation administration fire worthiness requirements
and recommendations;
(6) The manufacture, sale, repair, distribution, maintenance,
refurbishment, or modification of any new raw material or component
part used in a transportation vehicle with component parts, including
original spare parts, containing deca-bde;
(7) The use of commercial deca-bde in the maintenance,
refurbishment, or modification of transportation equipment;
(8) The sale or distribution of any product containing PBDEs that
has been previously owned, purchased, or sold in commerce, provided it
was manufactured before the effective date of the prohibition;
(9) The manufacture, sale, or distribution of any new product or
product component consisting of recycled or used materials containing
deca-bde;
(10) The sale or purchase of any previously owned product
containing PBDEs made in casual or isolated sales as defined in RCW
82.04.040 and to sales by nonprofit organizations;
(11) The manufacture, sale, or distribution of new carpet cushion
made from recycled foam containing less than one-tenth of one percent
penta-bde; and
(12) Medical devices.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Except as provided in section 10 of this
act, no person may manufacture, knowingly sell, offer for sale,
distribute for sale, or distribute for use in this state mattresses
containing commercial deca-bde after January 1, 2008.
(2) Except as provided in section 10 of this act, no person may
manufacture, knowingly sell, offer for sale, distribute for sale, or
distribute for use in this state residential upholstered furniture that
contains commercial deca-bde, or any television or computer that has an
electronic enclosure that contains commercial deca-bde after the
effective date established in subsection (3) of this section. This
prohibition may not take effect until the department and the department
of health identify that a safer and technically feasible alternative is
available, and the fire safety committee, created in section 5 of this
act, determines that the identified alternative meets applicable fire
safety standards. The effective date of the prohibition must be
established according to the following process:
(a) The department and the department of health shall review risk
assessments, scientific studies, and other relevant findings regarding
alternatives to the use of commercial deca-bde in residential
upholstered furniture, televisions, and computers.
(b) If the department and the department of health jointly find
that safer and technically feasible alternatives are available for any
of these uses, the department shall convene the fire safety committee
created in section 5 of this act to determine whether the identified
alternatives meet applicable fire safety standards.
(c) By majority vote, the fire safety committee created in section
5 of this act shall make a finding whether an alternative identified
under (b) of this subsection meets applicable fire safety standards.
The fire safety committee shall report their finding to the state fire
marshal. After reviewing the finding of the fire safety committee, the
state fire marshal shall determine whether an alternative identified
under (b) of this subsection meets applicable fire safety standards.
The determination of the fire marshal must be based upon the finding of
the fire safety committee. The state fire marshal shall report the
determination to the department.
(d) The department shall seek public input on their findings, the
findings of the fire safety committee, and the determination by the
state fire marshal. The department shall publish these findings in the
Washington State Register, and submit them in a report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature. The department shall
initially report these findings by December 31, 2008.
(3) The effective date of the prohibition is as follows:
(a) If the December 31, 2008, report required in subsection (2)(d)
of this section finds that a safer and technically feasible alternative
that meets applicable fire safety standards is available, the
prohibition takes effect January 1, 2011;
(b) If the December 31, 2008, report required in subsection (2)(d)
of this section does not find that a safer and technically feasible
alternative that meets applicable fire safety standards is available,
the prohibition does not take effect January 1, 2011. Beginning in
2009, by December 31st of each year, the department shall review and
report on alternatives as described in subsection (2) of this section.
The prohibition in subsection (2) of this section takes effect two
years after a report submitted to the legislature required under
subsection (2)(d) of this section finds that a safer and technically
feasible alternative that meets applicable fire safety standards is
available.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The fire safety committee is created for
the exclusive purpose of finding whether an alternative identified
under section 4(2)(b) of this act meets applicable fire safety
standards.
(2) A majority vote of the members of the fire safety committee
constitutes a finding that an alternative meets applicable fire safety
standards.
(3) The fire safety committee consists of the following members:
(a) A representative from the department, who shall chair the fire
safety committee, and serve as an ex officio nonvoting member.
(b) Five voting members, appointed by the governor, as follows:
(i) A representative of the office of the state fire marshal;
(ii) A representative of a statewide association representing the
interests of fire chiefs;
(iii) A representative of a statewide association representing the
interests of fire commissioners;
(iv) A representative of a recognized statewide council, affiliated
with an international association representing the interests of
firefighters; and
(v) A representative of a statewide association representing the
interests of volunteer firefighters.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The department and the department of health
shall review risk assessments, scientific studies, and other relevant
findings regarding alternatives to the use of commercial deca-bde in
products not directly addressed in this chapter. If a flame retardant
that is safer and technically feasible becomes available, the
department shall convene the fire safety committee created in section
5 of this act. The fire safety committee and the state fire marshal
shall proceed as required in section 4(2)(c) of this act to determine
if the identified alternative meets applicable fire safety standards.
The department and the department of health shall also review risk
assessments, scientific studies, and other findings regarding the
potential effect of PBDEs in the waste stream. By December 31st of the
year in which the finding is made, the department must publish the
information required by this subsection in the Washington State
Register and present it in a report to the appropriate committees of
the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Nothing in this chapter restricts the
ability of a manufacturer, importer, or distributor from transporting
products containing PBDEs through the state or storing the products in
the state for later distribution outside the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A manufacturer of products containing PBDEs
that are restricted under this chapter must notify persons that sell
the manufacturer's products in this state about the provisions of this
chapter no less than ninety days prior to the effective date of the
restrictions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The department shall assist state agencies
to give priority and preference to the purchase of equipment, supplies,
and other products that do not contain PBDEs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) Retailers who unknowingly sell products
prohibited under section 3 or 4 of this act are not liable under this
chapter.
(2) In-state retailers in possession of products on the date that
restrictions on the sale of the products become effective under section
3 or 4 of this act may exhaust their existing stock through sales to
the public.
(3) The department must assist in-state retailers in identifying
potential products containing PBDEs.
(4) If a retailer unknowingly possesses products that are
prohibited for sale under section 3 or 4 of this act and the
manufacturer does not recall the products as required under section
11(2) of this act, the retailer may exhaust its existing stock through
sales to the public. However, no additional prohibited stock may be
sold or offered for sale.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) Enforcement of this chapter must rely
on notification and information exchange between the department and
manufacturers. The department shall achieve compliance with this
chapter using the following enforcement sequence:
(a) Before the effective date of the product prohibition in section
3 or 4 of this act, the department shall prepare and distribute
information to in-state manufacturers and out-of-state manufacturers,
to the maximum extent practicable, to assist them in identifying
products prohibited for manufacture, sale, or distribution under this
chapter.
(b) The department may request a certificate of compliance from a
manufacturer. A certificate of compliance attests that a
manufacturer's product or products meets the requirements of this
chapter.
(c) The department may issue a warning letter to a manufacturer
that produces, sells, or distributes prohibited products in violation
of this chapter. The department shall offer information or other
appropriate assistance to the manufacturer in complying with this
chapter. If, after one year, compliance is not achieved, penalties may
be assessed under subsection (3) of this section.
(2) A manufacturer that knowingly produces, sells, or distributes
a product prohibited from manufacture, sale, or distribution in this
state under this chapter shall recall the product and reimburse the
retailer or any other purchaser for the product and any applicable
shipping and handling for returning the products.
(3) A manufacturer of products containing PBDEs in violation of
this chapter is subject to a civil penalty not to exceed one thousand
dollars for each violation in the case of a first offense.
Manufacturers who are repeat violators are subject to a civil penalty
not to exceed five thousand dollars for each repeat offense. Penalties
collected under this section must be deposited in the state toxics
control account created in RCW 70.l05D.070.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 The department may adopt rules to fully
implement this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 1 through 12 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---