BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 31.45 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It is a violation of this chapter for any person subject to
this chapter to:
(a) Directly or indirectly employ any scheme, device, or artifice
to defraud or mislead any borrower, to defraud or mislead any lender,
or to defraud or mislead any person;
(b) Directly or indirectly engage in any unfair or deceptive
practice toward any person;
(c) Directly or indirectly obtain property by fraud or
misrepresentation; and
(d) Make a small loan to any person physically located in
Washington through use of the internet, facsimile, telephone, kiosk, or
other means without first obtaining a small loan endorsement.
(2) In addition to any other penalties, any transaction in
violation of subsection (1) of this section is uncollectible and
unenforceable.

--- END ---